
 
 Transcribed 1898 William Heinemann edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pflaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                                  St. Ives
 
 
                                   Being
 
                    The Adventures of a French Prisoner
                                 in England
 
                                     By
 
                           Robert Louis Stevenson
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                              _SECOND EDITION_
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   London
                             William Heinemann
                                    1898
 
                                 * * * * *
 
          _First Edition_, _May_ 5, 1897; _Reprinted May_ 6, 1897
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                           _All rights reserved_
 
                                 * * * * *
 
 _The following tale was taken down from Mr. Stevenson's dictation by his
 stepdaughter and amanuensis_, _Mrs. Strong_, _at intervals between
 January_ 1893 _and October_ 1894 (_see_ Vailima Letters, _pp._ 242-246,
 299, 324 _and_ 350).  _About six weeks before his death he laid the story
 aside to take up_ Weir of Hermiston.  _The thirty chapters of_ St. Ives
 _which he had written_ (_the last few of them apparently unrevised_)
 _brought the tale within sight of its conclusion_, _and the intended
 course of the remainder was known in outline to Mrs. Strong_.  _For the
 benefit of those readers who do not like a story to be left unfinished_,
 _the delicate task of supplying the missing chapters has been entrusted
 to Mr. Quiller-Couch_, _whose work begins at Chap. XXXI._ {0}
 
                                                                  [_S. C._]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I--A TALE OF A LION RAMPANT
 
 
 It was in the month of May 1813 that I was so unlucky as to fall at last
 into the hands of the enemy.  My knowledge of the English language had
 marked me out for a certain employment.  Though I cannot conceive a
 soldier refusing to incur the risk, yet to be hanged for a spy is a
 disgusting business; and I was relieved to be held a prisoner of war.
 Into the Castle of Edinburgh, standing in the midst of that city on the
 summit of an extraordinary rock, I was cast with several hundred
 fellow-sufferers, all privates like myself, and the more part of them, by
 an accident, very ignorant, plain fellows.  My English, which had brought
 me into that scrape, now helped me very materially to bear it.  I had a
 thousand advantages.  I was often called to play the part of an
 interpreter, whether of orders or complaints, and thus brought in
 relations, sometimes of mirth, sometimes almost of friendship, with the
 officers in charge.  A young lieutenant singled me out to be his
 adversary at chess, a game in which I was extremely proficient, and would
 reward me for my gambits with excellent cigars.  The major of the
 battalion took lessons of French from me while at breakfast, and was
 sometimes so obliging as to have me join him at the meal.  Chevenix was
 his name.  He was stiff as a drum-major and selfish as an Englishman, but
 a fairly conscientious pupil and a fairly upright man.  Little did I
 suppose that his ramrod body and frozen face would, in the end, step in
 between me and all my dearest wishes; that upon this precise, regular,
 icy soldier-man my fortunes should so nearly shipwreck!  I never liked,
 but yet I trusted him; and though it may seem but a trifle, I found his
 snuff-box with the bean in it come very welcome.
 
 For it is strange how grown men and seasoned soldiers can go back in
 life; so that after but a little while in prison, which is after all the
 next thing to being in the nursery, they grow absorbed in the most
 pitiful, childish interests, and a sugar biscuit or a pinch of snuff
 become things to follow after and scheme for!
 
 We made but a poor show of prisoners.  The officers had been all offered
 their parole, and had taken it.  They lived mostly in suburbs of the
 city, lodging with modest families, and enjoyed their freedom and
 supported the almost continual evil tidings of the Emperor as best they
 might.  It chanced I was the only gentleman among the privates who
 remained.  A great part were ignorant Italians, of a regiment that had
 suffered heavily in Catalonia.  The rest were mere diggers of the soil,
 treaders of grapes or hewers of wood, who had been suddenly and violently
 preferred to the glorious state of soldiers.  We had but the one interest
 in common: each of us who had any skill with his fingers passed the hours
 of his captivity in the making of little toys and _articles of Paris_;
 and the prison was daily visited at certain hours by a concourse of
 people of the country, come to exult over our distress, or--it is more
 tolerant to suppose--their own vicarious triumph.  Some moved among us
 with a decency of shame or sympathy.  Others were the most offensive
 personages in the world, gaped at us as if we had been baboons, sought to
 evangelise us to their rustic, northern religion, as though we had been
 savages, or tortured us with intelligence of disasters to the arms of
 France.  Good, bad, and indifferent, there was one alleviation to the
 annoyance of these visitors; for it was the practice of almost all to
 purchase some specimen of our rude handiwork.  This led, amongst the
 prisoners, to a strong spirit of competition.  Some were neat of hand,
 and (the genius of the French being always distinguished) could place
 upon sale little miracles of dexterity and taste.  Some had a more
 engaging appearance; fine features were found to do as well as fine
 merchandise, and an air of youth in particular (as it appealed to the
 sentiment of pity in our visitors) to be a source of profit.  Others
 again enjoyed some acquaintance with the language, and were able to
 recommend the more agreeably to purchasers such trifles as they had to
 sell.  To the first of these advantages I could lay no claim, for my
 fingers were all thumbs.  Some at least of the others I possessed; and
 finding much entertainment in our commerce, I did not suffer my
 advantages to rust.  I have never despised the social arts, in which it
 is a national boast that every Frenchman should excel.  For the approach
 of particular sorts of visitors, I had a particular manner of address,
 and even of appearance, which I could readily assume and change on the
 occasion rising.  I never lost an opportunity to flatter either the
 person of my visitor, if it should be a lady, or, if it should be a man,
 the greatness of his country in war.  And in case my compliments should
 miss their aim, I was always ready to cover my retreat with some
 agreeable pleasantry, which would often earn me the name of an 'oddity'
 or a 'droll fellow.'  In this way, although I was so left-handed a
 toy-maker, I made out to be rather a successful merchant; and found means
 to procure many little delicacies and alleviations, such as children or
 prisoners desire.
 
 I am scarcely drawing the portrait of a very melancholy man.  It is not
 indeed my character; and I had, in a comparison with my comrades, many
 reasons for content.  In the first place, I had no family: I was an
 orphan and a bachelor; neither wife nor child awaited me in France.  In
 the second, I had never wholly forgot the emotions with which I first
 found myself a prisoner; and although a military prison be not altogether
 a garden of delights, it is still preferable to a gallows.  In the third,
 I am almost ashamed to say it, but I found a certain pleasure in our
 place of residence: being an obsolete and really mediaeval fortress, high
 placed and commanding extraordinary prospects, not only over sea,
 mountain, and champaign but actually over the thoroughfares of a capital
 city, which we could see blackened by day with the moving crowd of the
 inhabitants, and at night shining with lamps.  And lastly, although I was
 not insensible to the restraints of prison or the scantiness of our
 rations, I remembered I had sometimes eaten quite as ill in Spain, and
 had to mount guard and march perhaps a dozen leagues into the bargain.
 The first of my troubles, indeed, was the costume we were obliged to
 wear.  There is a horrible practice in England to trick out in ridiculous
 uniforms, and as it were to brand in mass, not only convicts but military
 prisoners, and even the children in charity schools.  I think some
 malignant genius had found his masterpiece of irony in the dress which we
 were condemned to wear: jacket, waistcoat, and trousers of a sulphur or
 mustard yellow, and a shirt or blue-and-white striped cotton.  It was
 conspicuous, it was cheap, it pointed us out to laughter--we, who were
 old soldiers, used to arms, and some of us showing noble scars,--like a
 set of lugubrious zanies at a fair.  The old name of that rock on which
 our prison stood was (I have heard since then) the _Painted Hill_.  Well,
 now it was all painted a bright yellow with our costumes; and the dress
 of the soldiers who guarded us being of course the essential British red
 rag, we made up together the elements of a lively picture of hell.  I
 have again and again looked round upon my fellow-prisoners, and felt my
 anger rise, and choked upon tears, to behold them thus parodied.  The
 more part, as I have said, were peasants, somewhat bettered perhaps by
 the drill-sergeant, but for all that ungainly, loutish fellows, with no
 more than a mere barrack-room smartness of address: indeed, you could
 have seen our army nowhere more discreditably represented than in this
 Castle of Edinburgh.  And I used to see myself in fancy, and blush.  It
 seemed that my more elegant carriage would but point the insult of the
 travesty.  And I remembered the days when I wore the coarse but
 honourable coat of a soldier; and remembered further back how many of the
 noble, the fair, and the gracious had taken a delight to tend my
 childhood. . . .  But I must not recall these tender and sorrowful
 memories twice; their place is further on, and I am now upon another
 business.  The perfidy of the Britannic Government stood nowhere more
 openly confessed than in one particular of our discipline: that we were
 shaved twice in the week.  To a man who has loved all his life to be
 fresh shaven, can a more irritating indignity be devised?  Monday and
 Thursday were the days.  Take the Thursday, and conceive the picture I
 must present by Sunday evening!  And Saturday, which was almost as bad,
 was the great day for visitors.
 
 Those who came to our market were of all qualities, men and women, the
 lean and the stout, the plain and the fairly pretty.  Sure, if people at
 all understood the power of beauty, there would be no prayers addressed
 except to Venus; and the mere privilege of beholding a comely woman is
 worth paying for.  Our visitors, upon the whole, were not much to boast
 of; and yet, sitting in a corner and very much ashamed of myself and my
 absurd appearance, I have again and again tasted the finest, the rarest,
 and the most ethereal pleasures in a glance of an eye that I should never
 see again--and never wanted to.  The flower of the hedgerow and the star
 in heaven satisfy and delight us: how much more the look of that
 exquisite being who was created to bear and rear, to madden and rejoice,
 mankind!
 
 There was one young lady in particular, about eighteen or nineteen, tall,
 of a gallant carriage, and with a profusion of hair in which the sun
 found threads of gold.  As soon as she came in the courtyard (and she was
 a rather frequent visitor) it seemed I was aware of it.  She had an air
 of angelic candour, yet of a high spirit; she stepped like a Diana, every
 movement was noble and free.  One day there was a strong east wind; the
 banner was straining at the flagstaff; below us the smoke of the city
 chimneys blew hither and thither in a thousand crazy variations; and away
 out on the Forth we could see the ships lying down to it and scudding.  I
 was thinking what a vile day it was, when she appeared.  Her hair blew in
 the wind with changes of colour; her garments moulded her with the
 accuracy of sculpture; the ends of her shawl fluttered about her ear and
 were caught in again with an inimitable deftness.  You have seen a pool
 on a gusty day, how it suddenly sparkles and flashes like a thing alive?
 So this lady's face had become animated and coloured; and as I saw her
 standing, somewhat inclined, her lips parted, a divine trouble in her
 eyes, I could have clapped my hands in applause, and was ready to acclaim
 her a genuine daughter of the winds.  What put it in my head, I know not:
 perhaps because it was a Thursday and I was new from the razor; but I
 determined to engage her attention no later than that day.  She was
 approaching that part of the court in which I sat with my merchandise,
 when I observed her handkerchief to escape from her hands and fall to the
 ground; the next moment the wind had taken it up and carried it within my
 reach.  I was on foot at once: I had forgot my mustard-coloured clothes,
 I had forgot the private soldier and his salute.  Bowing deeply, I
 offered her the slip of cambric.
 
 'Madam,' said I, 'your handkerchief.  The wind brought it me.'
 
 I met her eyes fully.
 
 'I thank you, sir,' said she.
 
 'The wind brought it me,' I repeated.  'May I not take it for an omen?
 You have an English proverb, "It's an ill wind that blows nobody good."'
 
 'Well,' she said, with a smile, '"One good turn deserves another."  I
 will see what you have.'
 
 She followed me to where my wares were spread out under lee of a piece of
 cannon.
 
 'Alas, mademoiselle!' said I, 'I am no very perfect craftsman.  This is
 supposed to be a house, and you see the chimneys are awry.  You may call
 this a box if you are very indulgent; but see where my tool slipped!
 Yes, I am afraid you may go from one to another, and find a flaw in
 everything.  _Failures for Sale_ should be on my signboard.  I do not
 keep a shop; I keep a Humorous Museum.'  I cast a smiling glance about my
 display, and then at her, and instantly became grave.  'Strange, is it
 not,' I added, 'that a grown man and a soldier should be engaged upon
 such trash, and a sad heart produce anything so funny to look at?'
 
 An unpleasant voice summoned her at this moment by the name of Flora, and
 she made a hasty purchase and rejoined her party.
 
 A few days after she came again.  But I must first tell you how she came
 to be so frequent.  Her aunt was one of those terrible British old maids,
 of which the world has heard much; and having nothing whatever to do, and
 a word or two of French, she had taken what she called an _interest in
 the French prisoners_.  A big, bustling, bold old lady, she flounced
 about our market-place with insufferable airs of patronage and
 condescension.  She bought, indeed, with liberality, but her manner of
 studying us through a quizzing-glass, and playing cicerone to her
 followers, acquitted us of any gratitude.  She had a tail behind her of
 heavy, obsequious old gentlemen, or dull, giggling misses, to whom she
 appeared to be an oracle.  'This one can really carve prettily: is he not
 a quiz with his big whiskers?' she would say.  'And this one,' indicating
 myself with her gold eye-glass, 'is, I assure you, quite an oddity.'  The
 oddity, you may be certain, ground his teeth.  She had a way of standing
 in our midst, nodding around, and addressing us in what she imagined to
 be French: '_Bienne_, _hommes_! _ca va bienne_?'  I took the freedom to
 reply in the same lingo: _Bienne_, _femme_! _ca va couci-couci tout
 d'meme_, _la bourgeoise_!'  And at that, when we had all laughed with a
 little more heartiness than was entirely civil, 'I told you he was quite
 an oddity!' says she in triumph.  Needless to say, these passages were
 before I had remarked the niece.
 
 The aunt came on the day in question with a following rather more than
 usually large, which she manoeuvred to and fro about the market and
 lectured to at rather more than usual length, and with rather less than
 her accustomed tact.  I kept my eyes down, but they were ever fixed in
 the same direction, quite in vain.  The aunt came and went, and pulled us
 out, and showed us off, like caged monkeys; but the niece kept herself on
 the outskirts of the crowd and on the opposite side of the courtyard, and
 departed at last as she had come, without a sign.  Closely as I had
 watched her, I could not say her eyes had ever rested on me for an
 instant; and my heart was overwhelmed with bitterness and blackness.  I
 tore out her detested image; I felt I was done with her for ever; I
 laughed at myself savagely, because I had thought to please; when I lay
 down at night sleep forsook me, and I lay, and rolled, and gloated on her
 charms, and cursed her insensibility, for half the night.  How trivial I
 thought her! and how trivial her sex!  A man might be an angel or an
 Apollo, and a mustard-coloured coat would wholly blind them to his
 merits.  I was a prisoner, a slave, a contemned and despicable being, the
 butt of her sniggering countrymen.  I would take the lesson: no proud
 daughter of my foes should have the chance to mock at me again; none in
 the future should have the chance to think I had looked at her with
 admiration.  You cannot imagine any one of a more resolute and
 independent spirit, or whose bosom was more wholly mailed with patriotic
 arrogance, than I.  Before I dropped asleep, I had remembered all the
 infamies of Britain, and debited them in an overwhelming column to Flora.
 
 The next day, as I sat in my place, I became conscious there was some one
 standing near; and behold, it was herself!  I kept my seat, at first in
 the confusion of my mind, later on from policy; and she stood, and leaned
 a little over me, as in pity.  She was very still and timid; her voice
 was low.  Did I suffer in my captivity? she asked me.  Had I to complain
 of any hardship?
 
 'Mademoiselle, I have not learned to complain,' said I.  'I am a soldier
 of Napoleon.'
 
 She sighed.  'At least you must regret _La France_,' said she, and
 coloured a little as she pronounced the words, which she did with a
 pretty strangeness of accent.
 
 'What am I to say?' I replied.  'If you were carried from this country,
 for which you seem so wholly suited, where the very rains and winds seem
 to become you like ornaments, would you regret, do you think?  We must
 surely all regret! the son to his mother, the man to his country; these
 are native feelings.'
 
 'You have a mother?' she asked.
 
 'In heaven, mademoiselle,' I answered.  'She, and my father also, went by
 the same road to heaven as so many others of the fair and brave: they
 followed their queen upon the scaffold.  So, you see, I am not so much to
 be pitied in my prison,' I continued: 'there are none to wait for me; I
 am alone in the world.  'Tis a different case, for instance, with yon
 poor fellow in the cloth cap.  His bed is next to mine, and in the night
 I hear him sobbing to himself.  He has a tender character, full of tender
 and pretty sentiments; and in the dark at night, and sometimes by day
 when he can get me apart with him, he laments a mother and a sweetheart.
 Do you know what made him take me for a confidant?'
 
 She parted her lips with a look, but did not speak.  The look burned all
 through me with a sudden vital heat.
 
 'Because I had once seen, in marching by, the belfry of his village!' I
 continued.  'The circumstance is quaint enough.  It seems to bind up into
 one the whole bundle of those human instincts that make life beautiful,
 and people and places dear--and from which it would seem I am cut off!'
 
 I rested my chin on my knee and looked before me on the ground.  I had
 been talking until then to hold her; but I was now not sorry she should
 go: an impression is a thing so delicate to produce and so easy to
 overthrow!  Presently she seemed to make an effort.
 
 'I will take this toy,' she said, laid a five-and-sixpenny piece in my
 hand, and was gone ere I could thank her.
 
 I retired to a place apart near the ramparts and behind a gun.  The
 beauty, the expression of her eyes, the tear that had trembled there, the
 compassion in her voice, and a kind of wild elegance that consecrated the
 freedom of her movements, all combined to enslave my imagination and
 inflame my heart.  What had she said?  Nothing to signify; but her eyes
 had met mine, and the fire they had kindled burned inextinguishably in my
 veins.  I loved her; and I did not fear to hope.  Twice I had spoken with
 her; and in both interviews I had been well inspired, I had engaged her
 sympathies, I had found words that she must remember, that would ring in
 her ears at night upon her bed.  What mattered if I were half shaved and
 my clothes a caricature?  I was still a man, and I had drawn my image on
 her memory.  I was still a man, and, as I trembled to realise, she was
 still a woman.  Many waters cannot quench love; and love, which is the
 law of the world, was on my side.  I closed my eyes, and she sprang up on
 the background of the darkness, more beautiful than in life.  'Ah!'
 thought I, 'and you too, my dear, you too must carry away with you a
 picture, that you are still to behold again and still to embellish.  In
 the darkness of night, in the streets by day, still you are to have my
 voice and face, whispering, making love for me, encroaching on your shy
 heart.  Shy as your heart is, _it_ is lodged there--_I_ am lodged there;
 let the hours do their office--let time continue to draw me ever in more
 lively, ever in more insidious colours.'  And then I had a vision of
 myself, and burst out laughing.
 
 A likely thing, indeed, that a beggar-man, a private soldier, a prisoner
 in a yellow travesty, was to awake the interest of this fair girl!  I
 would not despair; but I saw the game must be played fine and close.  It
 must be my policy to hold myself before her, always in a pathetic or
 pleasing attitude; never to alarm or startle her; to keep my own secret
 locked in my bosom like a story of disgrace, and let hers (if she could
 be induced to have one) grow at its own rate; to move just so fast, and
 not by a hair's-breadth any faster, than the inclination of her heart.  I
 was the man, and yet I was passive, tied by the foot in prison.  I could
 not go to her; I must cast a spell upon her at each visit, so that she
 should return to me; and this was a matter of nice management.  I had
 done it the last time--it seemed impossible she should not come again
 after our interview; and for the next I had speedily ripened a fresh
 plan.  A prisoner, if he has one great disability for a lover, has yet
 one considerable advantage: there is nothing to distract him, and he can
 spend all his hours ripening his love and preparing its manifestations.
 I had been then some days upon a piece of carving,--no less than the
 emblem of Scotland, the Lion Rampant.  This I proceeded to finish with
 what skill I was possessed of; and when at last I could do no more to it
 (and, you may be sure, was already regretting I had done so much), added
 on the base the following dedication.--
 
                                A LA BELLE FLORA
                          LE PRISONNIER RECONNAISSANT
                              A. D. ST.  Y. D. K.
 
 I put my heart into the carving of these letters.  What was done with so
 much ardour, it seemed scarce possible that any should behold with
 indifference; and the initials would at least suggest to her my noble
 birth.  I thought it better to suggest: I felt that mystery was my
 stock-in-trade; the contrast between my rank and manners, between my
 speech and my clothing, and the fact that she could only think of me by a
 combination of letters, must all tend to increase her interest and engage
 her heart.
 
 This done, there was nothing left for me but to wait and to hope.  And
 there is nothing further from my character: in love and in war, I am all
 for the forward movement; and these days of waiting made my purgatory.
 It is a fact that I loved her a great deal better at the end of them, for
 love comes, like bread, from a perpetual rehandling.  And besides, I was
 fallen into a panic of fear.  How, if she came no more, how was I to
 continue to endure my empty days? how was I to fall back and find my
 interest in the major's lessons, the lieutenant's chess, in a twopenny
 sale in the market, or a halfpenny addition to the prison fare?
 
 Days went by, and weeks; I had not the courage to calculate, and to-day I
 have not the courage to remember; but at last she was there.  At last I
 saw her approach me in the company of a boy about her own age, and whom I
 divined at once to be her brother.
 
 I rose and bowed in silence.
 
 'This is my brother, Mr. Ronald Gilchrist,' said she.  'I have told him
 of your sufferings.  He is so sorry for you!'
 
 'It is more than I have the right to ask,' I replied; 'but among
 gentlefolk these generous sentiments are natural.  If your brother and I
 were to meet in the field, we should meet like tigers; but when he sees
 me here disarmed and helpless, he forgets his animosity.'  (At which, as
 I had ventured to expect, this beardless champion coloured to the ears
 for pleasure.)  'Ah, my dear young lady,' I continued, 'there are many of
 your countrymen languishing in my country, even as I do here.  I can but
 hope there is found some French lady to convey to each of them the
 priceless consolation of her sympathy.  You have given me alms; and more
 than alms--hope; and while you were absent I was not forgetful.  Suffer
 me to be able to tell myself that I have at least tried to make a return;
 and for the prisoner's sake deign to accept this trifle.'
 
 So saying, I offered her my lion, which she took, looked at in some
 embarrassment, and then, catching sight of the dedication, broke out with
 a cry.
 
 'Why, how did you know my name?' she exclaimed.
 
 'When names are so appropriate, they should be easily guessed,' said I,
 bowing.  'But indeed, there was no magic in the matter.  A lady called
 you by name on the day I found your handkerchief, and I was quick to
 remark and cherish it.'
 
 'It is very, very beautiful,' said she, 'and I shall be always proud of
 the inscription.--Come, Ronald, we must be going.'  She bowed to me as a
 lady bows to her equal, and passed on (I could have sworn) with a
 heightened colour.
 
 I was overjoyed: my innocent ruse had succeeded; she had taken my gift
 without a hint of payment, and she would scarce sleep in peace till she
 had made it up to me.  No greenhorn in matters of the heart, I was
 besides aware that I had now a resident ambassador at the court of my
 lady.  The lion might be ill chiselled; it was mine.  My hands had made
 and held it; my knife--or, to speak more by the mark, my rusty nail--had
 traced those letters; and simple as the words were, they would keep
 repeating to her that I was grateful and that I found her fair.  The boy
 had looked like a gawky, and blushed at a compliment; I could see besides
 that he regarded me with considerable suspicion; yet he made so manly a
 figure of a lad, that I could not withhold from him my sympathy.  And as
 for the impulse that had made her bring and introduce him, I could not
 sufficiently admire it.  It seemed to me finer than wit, and more tender
 than a caress.  It said (plain as language), 'I do not and I cannot know
 you.  Here is my brother--you can know him; this is the way to me--follow
 it.'
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--A TALE OF A PAIR OF SCISSORS
 
 
 I was still plunged in these thoughts when the bell was rung that
 discharged our visitors into the street.  Our little market was no sooner
 closed than we were summoned to the distribution, and received our
 rations, which we were then allowed to eat according to fancy in any part
 of our quarters.
 
 I have said the conduct of some of our visitors was unbearably offensive;
 it was possibly more so than they dreamed--as the sight-seers at a
 menagerie may offend in a thousand ways, and quite without meaning it,
 the noble and unfortunate animals behind the bars; and there is no doubt
 but some of my compatriots were susceptible beyond reason.  Some of these
 old whiskerandos, originally peasants, trained since boyhood in
 victorious armies, and accustomed to move among subject and trembling
 populations, could ill brook their change of circumstance.  There was one
 man of the name of Goguelat, a brute of the first water, who had enjoyed
 no touch of civilisation beyond the military discipline, and had risen by
 an extreme heroism of bravery to a grade for which he was otherwise
 unfitted--that of _marechal des logis_ in the 22nd of the line.  In so
 far as a brute can be a good soldier, he was a good soldier; the Cross
 was on his breast, and gallantly earned; but in all things outside his
 line of duty the man was no other than a brawling, bruising ignorant
 pillar of low pothouses.  As a gentleman by birth, and a scholar by taste
 and education, I was the type of all that he least understood and most
 detested; and the mere view of our visitors would leave him daily in a
 transport of annoyance, which he would make haste to wreak on the nearest
 victim, and too often on myself.
 
 It was so now.  Our rations were scarce served out, and I had just
 withdrawn into a corner of the yard, when I perceived him drawing near.
 He wore an air of hateful mirth; a set of young fools, among whom he
 passed for a wit, followed him with looks of expectation; and I saw I was
 about to be the object of some of his insufferable pleasantries.  He took
 a place beside me, spread out his rations, drank to me derisively from
 his measure of prison beer, and began.  What he said it would be
 impossible to print; but his admirers, who believed their wit to have
 surpassed himself, actually rolled among the gravel.  For my part, I
 thought at first I should have died.  I had not dreamed the wretch was so
 observant; but hate sharpens the ears, and he had counted our interviews
 and actually knew Flora by her name.  Gradually my coolness returned to
 me, accompanied by a volume of living anger that surprised myself.
 
 'Are you nearly done?' I asked.  'Because if you are, I am about to say a
 word or two myself.'
 
 'Oh, fair play!' said he.  'Turn about!  The Marquis of Carabas to the
 tribune.'
 
 'Very well,' said I.  'I have to inform you that I am a gentleman.  You
 do not know what that means, hey?  Well, I will tell you.  It is a
 comical sort of animal; springs from another strange set of creatures
 they call ancestors; and, in common with toads and other vermin, has a
 thing that he calls feelings.  The lion is a gentleman; he will not touch
 carrion.  I am a gentleman, and I cannot bear to soil my fingers with
 such a lump of dirt.  Sit still, Philippe Goguelat! sit still and do not
 say a word, or I shall know you are a coward; the eyes of our guards are
 upon us.  Here is your health!' said I, and pledged him in the prison
 beer.  'You have chosen to speak in a certain way of a young child,' I
 continued, 'who might be your daughter, and who was giving alms to me and
 some others of us mendicants.  If the Emperor'--saluting--'if my Emperor
 could hear you, he would pluck off the Cross from your gross body.  I
 cannot do that; I cannot take away what His Majesty has given; but one
 thing I promise you--I promise you, Goguelat, you shall be dead
 to-night.'
 
 I had borne so much from him in the past, I believe he thought there was
 no end to my forbearance, and he was at first amazed.  But I have the
 pleasure to think that some of my expressions had pierced through his
 thick hide; and besides, the brute was truly a hero of valour, and loved
 fighting for itself.  Whatever the cause, at least, he had soon pulled
 himself together, and took the thing (to do him justice) handsomely.
 
 'And I promise you, by the devil's horns, that you shall have the
 chance!' said he, and pledged me again; and again I did him scrupulous
 honour.
 
 The news of this defiance spread from prisoner to prisoner with the speed
 of wings; every face was seen to be illuminated like those of the
 spectators at a horse-race; and indeed you must first have tasted the
 active life of a soldier, and then mouldered for a while in the tedium of
 a jail, in order to understand, perhaps even to excuse, the delight of
 our companions.  Goguelat and I slept in the same squad, which greatly
 simplified the business; and a committee of honour was accordingly formed
 of our shed-mates.  They chose for president a sergeant-major in the 4th
 Dragoons, a greybeard of the army, an excellent military subject, and a
 good man.  He took the most serious view of his functions, visited us
 both, and reported our replies to the committee.  Mine was of a decent
 firmness.  I told him the young lady of whom Goguelat had spoken had on
 several occasions given me alms.  I reminded him that, if we were now
 reduced to hold out our hands and sell pill-boxes for charity, it was
 something very new for soldiers of the Empire.  We had all seen bandits
 standing at a corner of a wood truckling for copper halfpence, and after
 their benefactors were gone spitting out injuries and curses.  'But,'
 said I, 'I trust that none of us will fall so low.  As a Frenchman and a
 soldier, I owe that young child gratitude, and am bound to protect her
 character, and to support that of the army.  You are my elder and my
 superior: tell me if I am not right.'
 
 He was a quiet-mannered old fellow, and patted me with three fingers on
 the back.  '_C'est bien_, _mon enfant_,' says he, and returned to his
 committee.
 
 Goguelat was no more accommodating than myself.  'I do not like apologies
 nor those that make them,' was his only answer.  And there remained
 nothing but to arrange the details of the meeting.  So far as regards
 place and time we had no choice; we must settle the dispute at night, in
 the dark, after a round had passed by, and in the open middle of the shed
 under which we slept.  The question of arms was more obscure.  We had a
 good many tools, indeed, which we employed in the manufacture of our
 toys; but they were none of them suited for a single combat between
 civilised men, and, being nondescript, it was found extremely hard to
 equalise the chances of the combatants.  At length a pair of scissors was
 unscrewed; and a couple of tough wands being found in a corner of the
 courtyard, one blade of the scissors was lashed solidly to each with
 resined twine--the twine coming I know not whence, but the resin from the
 green pillars of the shed, which still sweated from the axe.  It was a
 strange thing to feel in one's hand this weapon, which was no heavier
 than a riding-rod, and which it was difficult to suppose would prove more
 dangerous.  A general oath was administered and taken, that no one should
 interfere in the duel nor (suppose it to result seriously) betray the
 name of the survivor.  And with that, all being then ready, we composed
 ourselves to await the moment.
 
 The evening fell cloudy; not a star was to be seen when the first round
 of the night passed through our shed and wound off along the ramparts;
 and as we took our places, we could still hear, over the murmurs of the
 surrounding city, the sentries challenging its further passage.  Leclos,
 the sergeant-major, set us in our stations, engaged our wands, and left
 us.  To avoid blood-stained clothing, my adversary and I had stripped to
 the shoes; and the chill of the night enveloped our bodies like a wet
 sheet.  The man was better at fencing than myself; he was vastly taller
 than I, being of a stature almost gigantic, and proportionately strong.
 In the inky blackness of the shed, it was impossible to see his eyes; and
 from the suppleness of the wands, I did not like to trust to a parade.  I
 made up my mind accordingly to profit, if I might, by my defect; and as
 soon as the signal should be given, to throw myself down and lunge at the
 same moment.  It was to play my life upon one card: should I not mortally
 wound him, no defence would be left me; what was yet more appalling, I
 thus ran the risk of bringing my own face against his scissor with the
 double force of our assaults, and my face and eyes are not that part of
 me that I would the most readily expose.
 
 '_Allez_!' said the sergeant-major.
 
 Both lunged in the same moment with an equal fury, and but for my
 manoeuvre both had certainly been spitted.  As it was, he did no more
 than strike my shoulder, while my scissor plunged below the girdle into a
 mortal part; and that great bulk of a man, falling from his whole height,
 knocked me immediately senseless.
 
 When I came to myself I was laid in my own sleeping-place, and could make
 out in the darkness the outline of perhaps a dozen heads crowded around
 me.  I sat up.  'What is it?' I exclaimed.
 
 'Hush!' said the sergeant-major.  'Blessed be God, all is well.'  I felt
 him clasp my hand, and there were tears in his voice.  ''Tis but a
 scratch, my child; here is papa, who is taking good care of you.  Your
 shoulder is bound up; we have dressed you in your clothes again, and it
 will all be well.'
 
 At this I began to remember.  'And Goguelat?' I gasped.
 
 'He cannot bear to be moved; he has his bellyful; 'tis a bad business,'
 said the sergeant-major.
 
 The idea of having killed a man with such an instrument as half a pair of
 scissors seemed to turn my stomach.  I am sure I might have killed a
 dozen with a firelock, a sabre, a bayonet, or any accepted weapon, and
 been visited by no such sickness of remorse.  And to this feeling every
 unusual circumstance of our rencounter, the darkness in which we had
 fought, our nakedness, even the resin on the twine, appeared to
 contribute.  I ran to my fallen adversary, kneeled by him, and could only
 sob his name.
 
 He bade me compose myself.  'You have given me the key of the fields,
 comrade,' said he.  '_Sans rancune_!'
 
 At this my horror redoubled.  Here had we two expatriated Frenchmen
 engaged in an ill-regulated combat like the battles of beasts.  Here was
 he, who had been all his life so great a ruffian, dying in a foreign land
 of this ignoble injury, and meeting death with something of the spirit of
 a Bayard.  I insisted that the guards should be summoned and a doctor
 brought.  'It may still be possible to save him,' I cried.
 
 The sergeant-major reminded me of our engagement.  'If you had been
 wounded,' said he, 'you must have lain there till the patrol came by and
 found you.  It happens to be Goguelat--and so must he!  Come, child, time
 to go to by-by.'  And as I still resisted, 'Champdivers!' he said, 'this
 is weakness.  You pain me.'
 
 'Ay, off to your beds with you!' said Goguelat, and named us in a company
 with one of his jovial gross epithets.
 
 Accordingly the squad lay down in the dark and simulated, what they
 certainly were far from experiencing, sleep.  It was not yet late.  The
 city, from far below, and all around us, sent up a sound of wheels and
 feet and lively voices.  Yet awhile, and the curtain of the cloud was
 rent across, and in the space of sky between the eaves of the shed and
 the irregular outline of the ramparts a multitude of stars appeared.
 Meantime, in the midst of us lay Goguelat, and could not always withhold
 himself from groaning.
 
 We heard the round far off; heard it draw slowly nearer.  Last of all, it
 turned the corner and moved into our field of vision: two file of men and
 a corporal with a lantern, which he swung to and fro, so as to cast its
 light in the recesses of the yards and sheds.
 
 'Hullo!' cried the corporal, pausing as he came by Goguelat.
 
 He stooped with his lantern.  All our hearts were flying.
 
 'What devil's work is this?' he cried, and with a startling voice
 summoned the guard.
 
 We were all afoot upon the instant; more lanterns and soldiers crowded in
 front of the shed; an officer elbowed his way in.  In the midst was the
 big naked body, soiled with blood.  Some one had covered him with his
 blanket; but as he lay there in agony, he had partly thrown it off.
 
 'This is murder!' cried the officer.  'You wild beasts, you will hear of
 this to-morrow.'
 
 As Goguelat was raised and laid upon a stretcher, he cried to us a
 cheerful and blasphemous farewell.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--MAJOR CHEVENIX COMES INTO THE STORY, AND GOGUELAT GOES OUT
 
 
 There was never any talk of a recovery, and no time was lost in getting
 the man's deposition.  He gave but the one account of it: that he had
 committed suicide because he was sick of seeing so many Englishmen.  The
 doctor vowed it was impossible, the nature and direction of the wound
 forbidding it.  Goguelat replied that he was more ingenious than the
 other thought for, and had propped up the weapon in the ground and fallen
 on the point--'just like Nebuchadnezzar,' he added, winking to the
 assistants.  The doctor, who was a little, spruce, ruddy man of an
 impatient temper, pished and pshawed and swore over his patient.
 'Nothing to be made of him!' he cried.  'A perfect heathen.  If we could
 only find the weapon!'  But the weapon had ceased to exist.  A little
 resined twine was perhaps blowing about in the castle gutters; some bits
 of broken stick may have trailed in corners; and behold, in the pleasant
 air of the morning, a dandy prisoner trimming his nails with a pair of
 scissors!
 
 Finding the wounded man so firm, you may be sure the authorities did not
 leave the rest of us in peace.  No stone was left unturned.  We were had
 in again and again to be examined, now singly, now in twos and threes.
 We were threatened with all sorts of impossible severities and tempted
 with all manner of improbable rewards.  I suppose I was five times
 interrogated, and came off from each with flying colours.  I am like old
 Souvaroff, I cannot understand a soldier being taken aback by any
 question; he should answer, as he marches on the fire, with an instant
 briskness and gaiety.  I may have been short of bread, gold or grace; I
 was never yet found wanting in an answer.  My comrades, if they were not
 all so ready, were none of them less staunch; and I may say here at once
 that the inquiry came to nothing at the time, and the death of Goguelat
 remained a mystery of the prison.  Such were the veterans of France!  And
 yet I should be disingenuous if I did not own this was a case apart; in
 ordinary circumstances, some one might have stumbled or been intimidated
 into an admission; and what bound us together with a closeness beyond
 that of mere comrades was a secret to which we were all committed and a
 design in which all were equally engaged.  No need to inquire as to its
 nature: there is only one desire, and only one kind of design, that
 blooms in prisons.  And the fact that our tunnel was near done supported
 and inspired us.
 
 I came off in public, as I have said, with flying colours; the sittings
 of the court of inquiry died away like a tune that no one listens to; and
 yet I was unmasked--I, whom my very adversary defended, as good as
 confessed, as good as told the nature of the quarrel, and by so doing
 prepared for myself in the future a most anxious, disagreeable adventure.
 It was the third morning after the duel, and Goguelat was still in life,
 when the time came round for me to give Major Chevenix a lesson.  I was
 fond of this occupation; not that he paid me much--no more, indeed, than
 eighteenpence a month, the customary figure, being a miser in the grain;
 but because I liked his breakfasts and (to some extent) himself.  At
 least, he was a man of education; and of the others with whom I had any
 opportunity of speech, those that would not have held a book upsidedown
 would have torn the pages out for pipe-lights.  For I must repeat again
 that our body of prisoners was exceptional: there was in Edinburgh Castle
 none of that educational busyness that distinguished some of the other
 prisons, so that men entered them unable to read, and left them fit for
 high employments.  Chevenix was handsome, and surprisingly young to be a
 major: six feet in his stockings, well set up, with regular features and
 very clear grey eyes.  It was impossible to pick a fault in him, and yet
 the sum-total was displeasing.  Perhaps he was too clean; he seemed to
 bear about with him the smell of soap.  Cleanliness is good, but I cannot
 bear a man's nails to seem japanned.  And certainly he was too
 self-possessed and cold.  There was none of the fire of youth, none of
 the swiftness of the soldier, in this young officer.  His kindness was
 cold, and cruel cold; his deliberation exasperating.  And perhaps it was
 from this character, which is very much the opposite of my own, that even
 in these days, when he was of service to me, I approached him with
 suspicion and reserve.
 
 I looked over his exercise in the usual form, and marked six faults.
 
 'H'm.  Six,' says he, looking at the paper.  'Very annoying!  I can never
 get it right.'
 
 'Oh, but you make excellent progress!' I said.  I would not discourage
 him, you understand, but he was congenitally unable to learn French.
 Some fire, I think, is needful, and he had quenched his fire in soapsuds.
 
 He put the exercise down, leaned his chin upon his hand, and looked at me
 with clear, severe eyes.
 
 'I think we must have a little talk,' said he.
 
 'I am entirely at your disposition,' I replied; but I quaked, for I knew
 what subject to expect.
 
 'You have been some time giving me these lessons,' he went on, 'and I am
 tempted to think rather well of you.  I believe you are a gentleman.'
 
 'I have that honour, sir,' said I.
 
 'You have seen me for the same period.  I do not know how I strike you;
 but perhaps you will be prepared to believe that I also am a man of
 honour,' said he.
 
 'I require no assurances; the thing is manifest,' and I bowed.
 
 'Very well, then,' said he.  'What about this Goguelat?'
 
 'You heard me yesterday before the court,' I began.  'I was awakened
 only--'
 
 'Oh yes; I "heard you yesterday before the court," no doubt,' he
 interrupted, 'and I remember perfectly that you were "awakened only."  I
 could repeat the most of it by rote, indeed.  But do you suppose that I
 believed you for a moment?'
 
 'Neither would you believe me if I were to repeat it here,' said I.
 
 'I may be wrong--we shall soon see,' says he; 'but my impression is that
 you will not "repeat it here."  My impression is that you have come into
 this room, and that you will tell me something before you go out.'
 
 I shrugged my shoulders.
 
 'Let me explain,' he continued.  'Your evidence, of course, is nonsense.
 I put it by, and the court put it by.'
 
 'My compliments and thanks!' said I.
 
 'You _must_ know--that's the short and the long,' he proceeded.  'All of
 you in shed B are bound to know.  And I want to ask you where is the
 common-sense of keeping up this farce, and maintaining this cock-and-bull
 story between friends.  Come, come, my good fellow, own yourself beaten,
 and laugh at it yourself.'
 
 'Well, I hear you, go ahead,' said I.  'You put your heart in it.'
 
 He crossed his legs slowly.  'I can very well understand,' he began,
 'that precautions have had to be taken.  I dare say an oath was
 administered.  I can comprehend that perfectly.'  (He was watching me all
 the time with his cold, bright eyes.)  'And I can comprehend that, about
 an affair of honour, you would be very particular to keep it.'
 
 'About an affair of honour?' I repeated, like a man quite puzzled.
 
 'It was not an affair of honour, then?' he asked.
 
 'What was not?  I do not follow,' said I.
 
 He gave no sign of impatience; simply sat awhile silent, and began again
 in the same placid and good-natured voice: 'The court and I were at one
 in setting aside your evidence.  It could not deceive a child.  But there
 was a difference between myself and the other officers, because _I knew
 my man_ and they did not.  They saw in you a common soldier, and I knew
 you for a gentleman.  To them your evidence was a leash of lies, which
 they yawned to hear you telling.  Now, I was asking myself, how far will
 a gentleman go?  Not surely so far as to help hush a murder up?  So
 that--when I heard you tell how you knew nothing of the matter, and were
 only awakened by the corporal, and all the rest of it--I translated your
 statements into something else.  Now, Champdivers,' he cried, springing
 up lively and coming towards me with animation, 'I am going to tell you
 what that was, and you are going to help me to see justice done: how, I
 don't know, for of course you are under oath--but somehow.  Mark what I'm
 going to say.'
 
 At that moment he laid a heavy, hard grip upon my shoulder; and whether
 he said anything more or came to a full stop at once, I am sure I could
 not tell you to this day.  For, as the devil would have it, the shoulder
 he laid hold of was the one Goguelat had pinked.  The wound was but a
 scratch; it was healing with the first intention; but in the clutch of
 Major Chevenix it gave me agony.  My head swam; the sweat poured off my
 face; I must have grown deadly pale.
 
 He removed his hand as suddenly as he had laid it there.  'What is wrong
 with you?' said he.
 
 'It is nothing,' said I.  'A qualm.  It has gone by.'
 
 'Are you sure?' said he.  'You are as white as a sheet.'
 
 'Oh no, I assure you!  Nothing whatever.  I am my own man again,' I said,
 though I could scarce command my tongue.
 
 'Well, shall I go on again?' says he.  'Can you follow me?'
 
 'Oh, by all means!' said I, and mopped my streaming face upon my sleeve,
 for you may be sure in those days I had no handkerchief.
 
 'If you are sure you can follow me.  That was a very sudden and sharp
 seizure,' he said doubtfully.  'But if you are sure, all right, and here
 goes.  An affair of honour among you fellows would, naturally, be a
 little difficult to carry out, perhaps it would be impossible to have it
 wholly regular.  And yet a duel might be very irregular in form, and,
 under the peculiar circumstances of the case, loyal enough in effect.  Do
 you take me?  Now, as a gentleman and a soldier.'
 
 His hand rose again at the words and hovered over me.  I could bear no
 more, and winced away from him.  'No,' I cried,  'not that.  Do not put
 your hand upon my shoulder.  I cannot bear it.  It is rheumatism,' I made
 haste to add.  'My shoulder is inflamed and very painful.'
 
 He returned to his chair and deliberately lighted a cigar.
 
 'I am sorry about your shoulder,' he said at last.  'Let me send for the
 doctor.'
 
 'Not in the least,' said I.  'It is a trifle.  I am quite used to it.  It
 does not trouble me in the smallest.  At any rate, I don't believe in
 doctors.'
 
 'All right,' said he, and sat and smoked a good while in a silence which
 I would have given anything to break.  'Well,' he began presently, 'I
 believe there is nothing left for me to learn.  I presume I may say that
 I know all.'
 
 'About what?' said I boldly.
 
 'About Goguelat,' said he.
 
 'I beg your pardon.  I cannot conceive,' said I.
 
 'Oh,' says the major, 'the man fell in a duel, and by your hand!  I am
 not an infant.'
 
 'By no means,' said I.  'But you seem to me to be a good deal of a
 theorist.'
 
 'Shall we test it?' he asked.  'The doctor is close by.  If there is not
 an open wound on your shoulder, I am wrong.  If there is--'  He waved his
 hand.  'But I advise you to think twice.  There is a deuce of a nasty
 drawback to the experiment--that what might have remained private between
 us two becomes public property.'
 
 'Oh, well!' said I, with a laugh, 'anything rather than a doctor!  I
 cannot bear the breed.'
 
 His last words had a good deal relieved me, but I was still far from
 comfortable.
 
 Major Chevenix smoked awhile, looking now at his cigar ash, now at me.
 'I'm a soldier myself,' he says presently, 'and I've been out in my time
 and hit my man.  I don't want to run any one into a corner for an affair
 that was at all necessary or correct.  At the same time, I want to know
 that much, and I'll take your word of honour for it.  Otherwise, I shall
 be very sorry, but the doctor must be called in.'
 
 'I neither admit anything nor deny anything,' I returned.  'But if this
 form of words will suffice you, here is what I say: I give you my parole,
 as a gentleman and a soldier, there has nothing taken place amongst us
 prisoners that was not honourable as the day.'
 
 'All right,' says he.  'That was all I wanted.  You can go now,
 Champdivers.'
 
 And as I was going out he added, with a laugh: 'By the bye, I ought to
 apologise: I had no idea I was applying the torture!'
 
 The same afternoon the doctor came into the courtyard with a piece of
 paper in his hand.  He seemed hot and angry, and had certainly no mind to
 be polite.
 
 'Here!' he cried.  'Which of you fellows knows any English?  Oh!'--spying
 me--'there you are, what's your name!  _You'll_ do.  Tell these fellows
 that the other fellow's dying.  He's booked; no use talking; I expect
 he'll go by evening.  And tell them I don't envy the feelings of the
 fellow who spiked him.  Tell them that first.'
 
 I did so.
 
 'Then you can tell 'em,' he resumed, 'that the fellow, Goggle--what's his
 name?--wants to see some of them before he gets his marching orders.  If
 I got it right, he wants to kiss or embrace you, or some sickening stuff.
 Got that?  Then here's a list he's had written, and you'd better read it
 out to them--I can't make head or tail of your beastly names--and they
 can answer _present_, and fall in against that wall.'
 
 It was with a singular movement of incongruous feelings that I read the
 first name on the list.  I had no wish to look again on my own handiwork;
 my flesh recoiled from the idea; and how could I be sure what reception
 he designed to give me?  The cure was in my own hand; I could pass that
 first name over--the doctor would not know--and I might stay away.  But
 to the subsequent great gladness of my heart, I did not dwell for an
 instant on the thought, walked over to the designated wall, faced about,
 read out the name 'Champdivers,' and answered myself with the word
 'Present.'
 
 There were some half dozen on the list, all told; and as soon as we were
 mustered, the doctor led the way to the hospital, and we followed after,
 like a fatigue party, in single file.  At the door he paused, told us
 'the fellow' would see each of us alone, and, as soon as I had explained
 that, sent me by myself into the ward.  It was a small room, whitewashed;
 a south window stood open on a vast depth of air and a spacious and
 distant prospect; and from deep below, in the Grassmarket the voices of
 hawkers came up clear and far away.  Hard by, on a little bed, lay
 Goguelat.  The sunburn had not yet faded from his face, and the stamp of
 death was already there.  There was something wild and unmannish in his
 smile, that took me by the throat; only death and love know or have ever
 seen it.  And when he spoke, it seemed to shame his coarse talk.
 
 He held out his arms as if to embrace me.  I drew near with incredible
 shrinkings, and surrendered myself to his arms with overwhelming disgust.
 But he only drew my ear down to his lips.
 
 'Trust me,' he whispered.  '_Je suis bon bougre_, _moi_.  I'll take it to
 hell with me, and tell the devil.'
 
 Why should I go on to reproduce his grossness and trivialities?  All that
 he thought, at that hour, was even noble, though he could not clothe it
 otherwise than in the language of a brutal farce.  Presently he bade me
 call the doctor; and when that officer had come in, raised a little up in
 his bed, pointed first to himself and then to me, who stood weeping by
 his side, and several times repeated the expression, 'Frinds--frinds--dam
 frinds.'
 
 To my great surprise, the doctor appeared very much affected.  He nodded
 his little bob-wigged head at us, and said repeatedly, 'All right,
 Johnny--me comprong.'
 
 Then Goguelat shook hands with me, embraced me again, and I went out of
 the room sobbing like an infant.
 
 How often have I not seen it, that the most unpardonable fellows make the
 happiest exits!  It is a fate we may well envy them.  Goguelat was
 detested in life; in the last three days, by his admirable staunchness
 and consideration, he won every heart; and when word went about the
 prison the same evening that he was no more, the voice of conversation
 became hushed as in a house of mourning.
 
 For myself I was like a man distracted; I cannot think what ailed me:
 when I awoke the following day, nothing remained of it; but that night I
 was filled with a gloomy fury of the nerves.  I had killed him; he had
 done his utmost to protect me; I had seen him with that awful smile.  And
 so illogical and useless is this sentiment of remorse, that I was ready,
 at a word or a look, to quarrel with somebody else.  I presume the
 disposition of my mind was imprinted on my face; and when, a little
 after, I overtook, saluted and addressed the doctor, he looked on me with
 commiseration and surprise.
 
 I had asked him if it was true.
 
 'Yes,' he said, 'the fellow's gone.'
 
 'Did he suffer much?' I asked.
 
 'Devil a bit; passed away like a lamb,' said he.  He looked on me a
 little, and I saw his hand go to his fob.  'Here, take that! no sense in
 fretting,' he said, and, putting a silver two-penny-bit in my hand, he
 left me.
 
 I should have had that twopenny framed to hang upon the wall, for it was
 the man's one act of charity in all my knowledge of him.  Instead of
 that, I stood looking at it in my hand and laughed out bitterly, as I
 realised his mistake; then went to the ramparts, and flung it far into
 the air like blood money.  The night was falling; through an embrasure
 and across the gardened valley I saw the lamplighters hasting along
 Princes Street with ladder and lamp, and looked on moodily.  As I was so
 standing a hand was laid upon my shoulder, and I turned about.  It was
 Major Chevenix, dressed for the evening, and his neckcloth really
 admirably folded.  I never denied the man could dress.
 
 'Ah!' said he, 'I thought it was you, Champdivers.  So he's gone?'
 
 I nodded.
 
 'Come, come,' said he, 'you must cheer up.  Of course it's very
 distressing, very painful and all that.  But do you know, it ain't such a
 bad thing either for you or me?  What with his death and your visit to
 him I am entirely reassured.'
 
 So I was to owe my life to Goguelat at every point.
 
 'I had rather not discuss it,' said I.
 
 'Well,' said he, 'one word more, and I'll agree to bury the subject.
 What did you fight about?'
 
 'Oh, what do men ever fight about?' I cried.
 
 'A lady?' said he.
 
 I shrugged my shoulders.
 
 'Deuce you did!' said he.  'I should scarce have thought it of him.'
 
 And at this my ill-humour broke fairly out in words.  'He!' I cried.  'He
 never dared to address her--only to look at her and vomit his vile
 insults!  She may have given him sixpence: if she did, it may take him to
 heaven yet!'
 
 At this I became aware of his eyes set upon me with a considering look,
 and brought up sharply.
 
 'Well, well,' said he.  'Good night to you, Champdivers.  Come to me at
 breakfast-time to-morrow, and we'll talk of other subjects.'
 
 I fully admit the man's conduct was not bad: in writing it down so long
 after the events I can even see that it was good.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--ST. IVES GETS A BUNDLE OF BANK NOTES
 
 
 I was surprised one morning, shortly after, to find myself the object of
 marked consideration by a civilian and a stranger.  This was a man of the
 middle age; he had a face of a mulberry colour, round black eyes, comical
 tufted eyebrows, and a protuberant forehead; and was dressed in clothes
 of a Quakerish cut.  In spite of his plainness, he had that inscrutable
 air of a man well-to-do in his affairs.  I conceived he had been some
 while observing me from a distance, for a sparrow sat betwixt us quite
 unalarmed on the breech of a piece of cannon.  So soon as our eyes met,
 he drew near and addressed me in the French language, which he spoke with
 a good fluency but an abominable accent.
 
 'I have the pleasure of addressing Monsieur le Vicomte Anne de Keroual de
 Saint-Yves?' said he.
 
 'Well,' said I, 'I do not call myself all that; but I have a right to, if
 I chose.  In the meanwhile I call myself plain Champdivers, at your
 disposal.  It was my mother's name, and good to go soldiering with.'
 
 'I think not quite,' said he; 'for if I remember rightly, your mother
 also had the particle.  Her name was Florimonde de Champdivers.'
 
 'Right again!' said I, 'and I am extremely pleased to meet a gentleman so
 well informed in my quarterings.  Is monsieur Born himself?'  This I said
 with a great air of assumption, partly to conceal the degree of curiosity
 with which my visitor had inspired me, and in part because it struck me
 as highly incongruous and comical in my prison garb and on the lips of a
 private soldier.
 
 He seemed to think so too, for he laughed.
 
 'No, sir,' he returned, speaking this time in English; 'I am not
 "_born_," as you call it, and must content myself with _dying_, of which
 I am equally susceptible with the best of you.  My name is Mr.
 Romaine--Daniel Romaine--a solicitor of London City, at your service;
 and, what will perhaps interest you more, I am here at the request of
 your great-uncle, the Count.'
 
 'What!' I cried, 'does M. de Keroual de St.-Yves remember the existence
 of such a person as myself, and will he deign to count kinship with a
 soldier of Napoleon?'
 
 'You speak English well,' observed my visitor.
 
 'It has been a second language to me from a child,' said I.  'I had an
 English nurse; my father spoke English with me; and I was finished by a
 countryman of yours and a dear friend of mine, a Mr. Vicary.'
 
 A strong expression of interest came into the lawyer's face.
 
 'What!' he cried, 'you knew poor Vicary?'
 
 'For more than a year,' said I; 'and shared his hiding-place for many
 months.'
 
 'And I was his clerk, and have succeeded him in business,' said he.
 'Excellent man!  It was on the affairs of M. de Keroual that he went to
 that accursed country, from which he was never destined to return.  Do
 you chance to know his end, sir?'
 
 'I am sorry,' said I, 'I do.  He perished miserably at the hands of a
 gang of banditti, such as we call _chauffeurs_.  In a word, he was
 tortured, and died of it.  See,' I added, kicking off one shoe, for I had
 no stockings; 'I was no more than a child, and see how they had begun to
 treat myself.'
 
 He looked at the mark of my old burn with a certain shrinking.  'Beastly
 people!' I heard him mutter to himself.
 
 'The English may say so with a good grace,' I observed politely.
 
 Such speeches were the coin in which I paid my way among this credulous
 race.  Ninety per cent. of our visitors would have accepted the remark as
 natural in itself and creditable to my powers of judgment, but it
 appeared my lawyer was more acute.
 
 'You are not entirely a fool, I perceive,' said he.
 
 'No,' said I; 'not wholly.'
 
 'And yet it is well to beware of the ironical mood,' he continued.  'It
 is a dangerous instrument.  Your great-uncle has, I believe, practised it
 very much, until it is now become a problem what he means.'
 
 'And that brings me back to what you will admit is a most natural
 inquiry,' said I.  'To what do I owe the pleasure of this visit? how did
 you recognise me? and how did you know I was here?'
 
 Carefull separating his coat skirts, the lawyer took a seat beside me on
 the edge of the flags.
 
 'It is rather an odd story,' says he, 'and, with your leave, I'll answer
 the second question first.  It was from a certain resemblance you bear to
 your cousin, M. le Vicomte.'
 
 'I trust, sir, that I resemble him advantageously?' said I.
 
 'I hasten to reassure you,' was the reply: 'you do.  To my eyes, M. Alain
 de St.-Yves has scarce a pleasing exterior.  And yet, when I knew you
 were here, and was actually looking for you--why, the likeness helped.
 As for how I came to know your whereabouts, by an odd enough chance, it
 is again M. Alain we have to thank.  I should tell you, he has for some
 time made it his business to keep M. de Keroual informed of your career;
 with what purpose I leave you to judge.  When he first brought the news
 of your--that you were serving Buonaparte, it seemed it might be the
 death of the old gentleman, so hot was his resentment.  But from one
 thing to another, matters have a little changed.  Or I should rather say,
 not a little.  We learned you were under orders for the Peninsula, to
 fight the English; then that you had been commissioned for a piece of
 bravery, and were again reduced to the ranks.  And from one thing to
 another (as I say), M. de Keroual became used to the idea that you were
 his kinsman and yet served with Buonaparte, and filled instead with
 wonder that he should have another kinsman who was so remarkably well
 informed of events in France.  And it now became a very disagreeable
 question, whether the young gentleman was not a spy?  In short, sir, in
 seeking to disserve you, he had accumulated against himself a load of
 suspicions.'
 
 My visitor now paused, took snuff, and looked at me with an air of
 benevolence.
 
 'Good God, sir!' says I, 'this is a curious story.'
 
 'You will say so before I have done,' said he.  'For there have two
 events followed.  The first of these was an encounter of M. de Keroual
 and M. de Mauseant.'
 
 'I know the man to my cost,' said I: 'it was through him I lost my
 commission.'
 
 'Do you tell me so?' he cried.  'Why, here is news!'
 
 'Oh, I cannot complain!' said I.  'I was in the wrong.  I did it with my
 eyes open.  If a man gets a prisoner to guard and lets him go, the least
 he can expect is to be degraded.'
 
 'You will be paid for it,' said he.  'You did well for yourself and
 better for your king.'
 
 'If I had thought I was injuring my emperor,' said I, 'I would have let
 M. de Mauseant burn in hell ere I had helped him, and be sure of that!  I
 saw in him only a private person in a difficulty: I let him go in private
 charity; not even to profit myself will I suffer it to be misunderstood.'
 
 'Well, well,' said the lawyer, 'no matter now.  This is a foolish
 warmth--a very misplaced enthusiasm, believe me!  The point of the story
 is that M. de Mauseant spoke of you with gratitude, and drew your
 character in such a manner as greatly to affect your uncle's views.  Hard
 upon the back of which, in came your humble servant, and laid before him
 the direct proof of what we had been so long suspecting.  There was no
 dubiety permitted.  M. Alain's expensive way of life, his clothes and
 mistresses, his dicing and racehorses, were all explained: he was in the
 pay of Buonaparte, a hired spy, and a man that held the strings of what I
 can only call a convolution of extremely fishy enterprises.  To do M. de
 Keroual justice, he took it in the best way imaginable, destroyed the
 evidences of the one great-nephew's disgrace--and transferred his
 interest wholly to the other.'
 
 'What am I to understand by that?' said I.
 
 'I will tell you,' says he.  'There is a remarkable inconsistency in
 human nature which gentlemen of my cloth have a great deal of occasion to
 observe.  Selfish persons can live without chick or child, they can live
 without all mankind except perhaps the barber and the apothecary; but
 when it comes to dying, they seem physically unable to die without an
 heir.  You can apply this principle for yourself.  Viscount Alain, though
 he scarce guesses it, is no longer in the field.  Remains, Viscount
 Anne.'
 
 'I see,' said I, 'you give a very unfavourable impression of my uncle,
 the Count.'
 
 'I had not meant it,' said he.  'He has led a loose life--sadly
 loose--but he is a man it is impossible to know and not to admire; his
 courtesy is exquisite.'
 
 'And so you think there is actually a chance for me?' I asked.
 
 'Understand,' said he: 'in saying as much as I have done, I travel quite
 beyond my brief.  I have been clothed with no capacity to talk of wills,
 or heritages, or your cousin.  I was sent here to make but the one
 communication: that M. de Keroual desires to meet his great-nephew.'
 
 'Well,' said I, looking about me on the battlements by which we sat
 surrounded, 'this is a case in which Mahomet must certainly come to the
 mountain.'
 
 'Pardon me,' said Mr. Romaine; 'you know already your uncle is an aged
 man; but I have not yet told you that he is quite broken up, and his
 death shortly looked for.  No, no, there is no doubt about it--it is the
 mountain that must come to Mahomet.'
 
 'From an Englishman, the remark is certainly significant,' said I; 'but
 you are of course, and by trade, a keeper of men's secrets, and I see you
 keep that of Cousin Alain, which is not the mark of a truculent
 patriotism, to say the least.'
 
 'I am first of all the lawyer of your family!' says he.
 
 'That being so,' said I, 'I can perhaps stretch a point myself.  This
 rock is very high, and it is very steep; a man might come by a devil of a
 fall from almost any part of it, and yet I believe I have a pair of wings
 that might carry me just so far as to the bottom.  Once at the bottom I
 am helpless.'
 
 'And perhaps it is just then that I could step in,' returned the lawyer.
 'Suppose by some contingency, at which I make no guess, and on which I
 offer no opinion--'
 
 But here I interrupted him.  'One word ere you go further.  I am under no
 parole,' said I.
 
 'I understood so much,' he replied, 'although some of you French gentry
 find their word sit lightly on them.'
 
 'Sir, I am not one of those,' said I.
 
 'To do you plain justice, I do not think you one,' said he.  'Suppose
 yourself, then, set free and at the bottom of the rock,' he continued,
 'although I may not be able to do much, I believe I can do something to
 help you on your road.  In the first place I would carry this, whether in
 an inside pocket or my shoe.'  And he passed me a bundle of bank notes.
 
 'No harm in that,' said I, at once concealing them.
 
 'In the second place,' he resumed, 'it is a great way from here to where
 your uncle lives--Amersham Place, not far from Dunstable; you have a
 great part of Britain to get through; and for the first stages, I must
 leave you to your own luck and ingenuity.  I have no acquaintance here in
 Scotland, or at least' (with a grimace) 'no dishonest ones.  But further
 to the south, about Wakefield, I am told there is a gentleman called
 Burchell Fenn, who is not so particular as some others, and might be
 willing to give you a cast forward.  In fact, sir, I believe it's the
 man's trade: a piece of knowledge that burns my mouth.  But that is what
 you get by meddling with rogues; and perhaps the biggest rogue now
 extant, M. de Saint-Yves, is your cousin, M. Alain.'
 
 'If this be a man of my cousin's,' I observed, 'I am perhaps better to
 keep clear of him?'
 
 'It was through some paper of your cousin's that we came across his
 trail,' replied the lawyer.  'But I am inclined to think, so far as
 anything is safe in such a nasty business, you might apply to the man
 Fenn.  You might even, I think, use the Viscount's name; and the little
 trick of family resemblance might come in.  How, for instance, if you
 were to call yourself his brother?'
 
 'It might be done,' said I.  'But look here a moment?  You propose to me
 a very difficult game: I have apparently a devil of an opponent in my
 cousin; and, being a prisoner of war, I can scarcely be said to hold good
 cards.  For what stakes, then, am I playing?'
 
 'They are very large,' said he.  'Your great-uncle is immensely
 rich--immensely rich.  He was wise in time; he smelt the revolution long
 before; sold all that he could, and had all that was movable transported
 to England through my firm.  There are considerable estates in England;
 Amersham Place itself is very fine; and he has much money, wisely
 invested.  He lives, indeed, like a prince.  And of what use is it to
 him?  He has lost all that was worth living for--his family, his country;
 he has seen his king and queen murdered; he has seen all these miseries
 and infamies,' pursued the lawyer, with a rising inflection and a
 heightening colour; and then broke suddenly off,--'In short, sir, he has
 seen all the advantages of that government for which his nephew carries
 arms, and he has the misfortune not to like them.'
 
 'You speak with a bitterness that I suppose I must excuse,' said I; 'yet
 which of us has the more reason to be bitter?  This man, my uncle, M. de
 Keroual, fled.  My parents, who were less wise perhaps, remained.  In the
 beginning, they were even republicans; to the end they could not be
 persuaded to despair of the people.  It was a glorious folly, for which,
 as a son, I reverence them.  First one and then the other perished.  If I
 have any mark of a gentleman, all who taught me died upon the scaffold,
 and my last school of manners was the prison of the Abbaye.  Do you think
 you can teach bitterness to a man with a history like mine?'
 
 'I have no wish to try,' said he.  'And yet there is one point I cannot
 understand: I cannot understand that one of your blood and experience
 should serve the Corsican.  I cannot understand it: it seems as though
 everything generous in you must rise against that--domination.'
 
 'And perhaps,' I retorted, 'had your childhood passed among wolves, you
 would have been overjoyed yourself to see the Corsican Shepherd.'
 
 'Well, well,' replied Mr. Romaine, 'it may be.  There are things that do
 not bear discussion.'
 
 And with a wave of his hand he disappeared abruptly down a flight of
 steps and under the shadow of a ponderous arch.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V--ST. IVES IS SHOWN A HOUSE
 
 
 The lawyer was scarce gone before I remembered many omissions; and chief
 among these, that I had neglected to get Mr. Burchell Fenn's address.
 Here was an essential point neglected; and I ran to the head of the
 stairs to find myself already too late.  The lawyer was beyond my view;
 in the archway that led downward to the castle gate, only the red coat
 and the bright arms of a sentry glittered in the shadow; and I could but
 return to my place upon the ramparts.
 
 I am not very sure that I was properly entitled to this corner.  But I
 was a high favourite; not an officer, and scarce a private, in the castle
 would have turned me back, except upon a thing of moment; and whenever I
 desired to be solitary, I was suffered to sit here behind my piece of
 cannon unmolested.  The cliff went down before me almost sheer, but
 mantled with a thicket of climbing trees; from farther down, an outwork
 raised its turret; and across the valley I had a view of that long
 terrace of Princes Street which serves as a promenade to the fashionable
 inhabitants of Edinburgh.  A singularity in a military prison, that it
 should command a view on the chief thoroughfare!
 
 It is not necessary that I should trouble you with the train of my
 reflections, which turned upon the interview I had just concluded and the
 hopes that were now opening before me.  What is more essential, my eye
 (even while I thought) kept following the movement of the passengers on
 Princes Street, as they passed briskly to and fro--met, greeted, and
 bowed to each other--or entered and left the shops, which are in that
 quarter, and, for a town of the Britannic provinces, particularly fine.
 My mind being busy upon other things, the course of my eye was the more
 random; and it chanced that I followed, for some time, the advance of a
 young gentleman with a red head and a white great-coat, for whom I cared
 nothing at the moment, and of whom it is probable I shall be gathered to
 my fathers without learning more.  He seemed to have a large
 acquaintance: his hat was for ever in his hand; and I daresay I had
 already observed him exchanging compliments with half a dozen, when he
 drew up at last before a young man and a young lady whose tall persons
 and gallant carriage I thought I recognised.
 
 It was impossible at such a distance that I could be sure, but the
 thought was sufficient, and I craned out of the embrasure to follow them
 as long as possible.  To think that such emotions, that such a concussion
 of the blood, may have been inspired by a chance resemblance, and that I
 may have stood and thrilled there for a total stranger!  This distant
 view, at least, whether of Flora or of some one else, changed in a moment
 the course of my reflections.  It was all very well, and it was highly
 needful, I should see my uncle; but an uncle, a great-uncle at that, and
 one whom I had never seen, leaves the imagination cold; and if I were to
 leave the castle, I might never again have the opportunity of finding
 Flora.  The little impression I had made, even supposing I had made any,
 how soon it would die out! how soon I should sink to be a phantom memory,
 with which (in after days) she might amuse a husband and children!  No,
 the impression must be clenched, the wax impressed with the seal, ere I
 left Edinburgh.  And at this the two interests that were now contending
 in my bosom came together and became one.  I wished to see Flora again;
 and I wanted some one to further me in my flight and to get me new
 clothes.  The conclusion was apparent.  Except for persons in the
 garrison itself, with whom it was a point of honour and military duty to
 retain me captive, I knew, in the whole country of Scotland, these two
 alone.  If it were to be done at all, they must be my helpers.  To tell
 them of my designed escape while I was still in bonds, would be to lay
 before them a most difficult choice.  What they might do in such a case,
 I could not in the least be sure of, for (the same case arising) I was
 far from sure what I should do myself.  It was plain I must escape first.
 When the harm was done, when I was no more than a poor wayside fugitive,
 I might apply to them with less offence and more security.  To this end
 it became necessary that I should find out where they lived and how to
 reach it; and feeling a strong confidence that they would soon return to
 visit me, I prepared a series of baits with which to angle for my
 information.  It will be seen the first was good enough.
 
 Perhaps two days after, Master Ronald put in an appearance by himself.  I
 had no hold upon the boy, and pretermitted my design till I should have
 laid court to him and engaged his interest.  He was prodigiously
 embarrassed, not having previously addressed me otherwise than by a bow
 and blushes; and he advanced to me with an air of one stubbornly
 performing a duty, like a raw soldier under fire.  I laid down my
 carving; greeted him with a good deal of formality, such as I thought he
 would enjoy; and finding him to remain silent, branched off into
 narratives of my campaigns such as Goguelat himself might have scrupled
 to endorse.  He visibly thawed and brightened; drew more near to where I
 sat; forgot his timidity so far as to put many questions; and at last,
 with another blush, informed me he was himself expecting a commission.
 
 'Well,' said I, 'they are fine troops, your British troops in the
 Peninsula.  A young gentleman of spirit may well be proud to be engaged
 at the head of such soldiers.'
 
 'I know that,' he said; 'I think of nothing else.  I think shame to be
 dangling here at home and going through with this foolery of education,
 while others, no older than myself, are in the field.'
 
 'I cannot blame you,' said I.  'I have felt the same myself.'
 
 'There are--there are no troops, are there, quite so good as ours?' he
 asked.
 
 'Well,' said I, 'there is a point about them: they have a defect,--they
 are not to be trusted in a retreat.  I have seen them behave very ill in
 a retreat.'
 
 'I believe that is our national character,' he said--God forgive
 him!--with an air of pride.
 
 'I have seen your national character running away at least, and had the
 honour to run after it!' rose to my lips, but I was not so ill advised as
 to give it utterance.  Every one should be flattered, but boys and women
 without stint; and I put in the rest of the afternoon narrating to him
 tales of British heroism, for which I should not like to engage that they
 were all true.
 
 'I am quite surprised,' he said at last.  'People tell you the French are
 insincere.  Now, I think your sincerity is beautiful.  I think you have a
 noble character.  I admire you very much.  I am very grateful for your
 kindness to--to one so young,' and he offered me his hand.
 
 'I shall see you again soon?' said I.
 
 'Oh, now!  Yes, very soon,' said he.  'I--I wish to tell you.  I would
 not let Flora--Miss Gilchrist, I mean--come to-day.  I wished to see more
 of you myself.  I trust you are not offended: you know, one should be
 careful about strangers.'
 
 I approved his caution, and he took himself away: leaving me in a mixture
 of contrarious feelings, part ashamed to have played on one so gullible,
 part raging that I should have burned so much incense before the vanity
 of England; yet, in the bottom of my soul, delighted to think I had made
 a friend--or, at least, begun to make a friend--of Flora's brother.
 
 As I had half expected, both made their appearance the next day.  I
 struck so fine a shade betwixt the pride that is allowed to soldiers and
 the sorrowful humility that befits a captive, that I declare, as I went
 to meet them, I might have afforded a subject for a painter.  So much was
 high comedy, I must confess; but so soon as my eyes lighted full on her
 dark face and eloquent eyes, the blood leaped into my cheeks--and that
 was nature!  I thanked them, but not the least with exultation; it was my
 cue to be mournful, and to take the pair of them as one.
 
 'I have been thinking,' I said, 'you have been so good to me, both of
 you, stranger and prisoner as I am, that I have been thinking how I could
 testify to my gratitude.  It may seem a strange subject for a confidence,
 but there is actually no one here, even of my comrades, that knows me by
 my name and title.  By these I am called plain Champdivers, a name to
 which I have a right, but not the name which I should bear, and which
 (but a little while ago) I must hide like a crime.  Miss Flora, suffer me
 to present to you the Vicomte Anne de Keroual de Saint-Yves, a private
 soldier.'
 
 'I knew it!' cried the boy; 'I knew he was a noble!'
 
 And I thought the eyes of Miss Flora said the same, but more
 persuasively.  All through this interview she kept them on the ground, or
 only gave them to me for a moment at a time, and with a serious
 sweetness.
 
 'You may conceive, my friends, that this is rather a painful confession,'
 I continued.  'To stand here before you, vanquished, a prisoner in a
 fortress, and take my own name upon my lips, is painful to the proud.
 And yet I wished that you should know me.  Long after this, we may yet
 hear of one another--perhaps Mr. Gilchrist and myself in the field and
 from opposing camps--and it would be a pity if we heard and did not
 recognise.'
 
 They were both moved; and began at once to press upon me offers of
 service, such as to lend me books, get me tobacco if I used it, and the
 like.  This would have been all mighty welcome, before the tunnel was
 ready.  Now it signified no more to me than to offer the transition I
 required.
 
 'My dear friends,' I said--'for you must allow me to call you that, who
 have no others within so many hundred leagues--perhaps you will think me
 fanciful and sentimental; and perhaps indeed I am; but there is one
 service that I would beg of you before all others.  You see me set here
 on the top of this rock in the midst of your city.  Even with what
 liberty I have, I have the opportunity to see a myriad roofs, and I dare
 to say, thirty leagues of sea and land.  All this hostile!  Under all
 these roofs my enemies dwell; wherever I see the smoke of a house rising,
 I must tell myself that some one sits before the chimney and reads with
 joy of our reverses.  Pardon me, dear friends, I know that you must do
 the same, and I do not grudge at it!  With you, it is all different.
 Show me your house then, were it only the chimney, or, if that be not
 visible, the quarter of the town in which it lies!  So, when I look all
 about me, I shall be able to say: "_There is one house in which I am not
 quite unkindly thought of_."'
 
 Flora stood a moment.
 
 'It is a pretty thought,' said she, 'and, as far as regards Ronald and
 myself, a true one.  Come, I believe I can show you the very smoke out of
 our chimney.'
 
 So saying, she carried me round the battlements towards the opposite or
 southern side of the fortress, and indeed to a bastion almost immediately
 overlooking the place of our projected flight.  Thence we had a view of
 some foreshortened suburbs at our feet, and beyond of a green, open, and
 irregular country rising towards the Pentland Hills.  The face of one of
 these summits (say two leagues from where we stood) is marked with a
 procession of white scars.  And to this she directed my attention.
 
 'You see these marks?' she said.  'We call them the Seven Sisters.
 Follow a little lower with your eye, and you will see a fold of the hill,
 the tops of some trees, and a tail of smoke out of the midst of them.
 That is Swanston Cottage, where my brother and I are living with my aunt.
 If it gives you pleasure to see it, I am glad.  We, too, can see the
 castle from a corner in the garden, and we go there in the morning
 often--do we not, Ronald?--and we think of you, M. de Saint-Yves; but I
 am afraid it does not altogether make us glad.'
 
 'Mademoiselle!' said I, and indeed my voice was scarce under command, 'if
 you knew how your generous words--how even the sight of you--relieved the
 horrors of this place, I believe, I hope, I know, you would be glad.  I
 will come here daily and look at that dear chimney and these green hills,
 and bless you from the heart, and dedicate to you the prayers of this
 poor sinner.  Ah!  I do not say they can avail!'
 
 'Who can say that, M. de Saint-Yves?' she said softly.  'But I think it
 is time we should be going.'
 
 'High time,' said Ronald, whom (to say the truth) I had a little
 forgotten.
 
 On the way back, as I was laying myself out to recover lost ground with
 the youth, and to obliterate, if possible, the memory of my last and
 somewhat too fervent speech, who should come past us but the major?  I
 had to stand aside and salute as he went by, but his eyes appeared
 entirely occupied with Flora.
 
 'Who is that man?' she asked.
 
 'He is a friend of mine,' said I.  'I give him lessons in French, and he
 has been very kind to me.'
 
 'He stared,' she said,--'I do not say, rudely; but why should he stare?'
 
 'If you do not wish to be stared at, mademoiselle, suffer me to recommend
 a veil,' said I.
 
 She looked at me with what seemed anger.  'I tell you the man stared,'
 she said.
 
 And Ronald added.  'Oh, I don't think he meant any harm.  I suppose he
 was just surprised to see us walking about with a pr--- with M.
 Saint-Yves.'
 
 But the next morning, when I went to Chevenix's rooms, and after I had
 dutifully corrected his exercise--'I compliment you on your taste,' said
 he to me.
 
 'I beg your pardon?' said I.
 
 'Oh no, I beg yours,' said he.  'You understand me perfectly, just as I
 do you.'
 
 I murmured something about enigmas.
 
 'Well, shall I give you the key to the enigma?' said he, leaning back.
 'That was the young lady whom Goguelat insulted and whom you avenged.  I
 do not blame you.  She is a heavenly creature.'
 
 'With all my heart, to the last of it!' said I.  'And to the first also,
 if it amuses you!  You are become so very acute of late that I suppose
 you must have your own way.'
 
 'What is her name?' he asked.
 
 'Now, really!' said I.  'Do you think it likely she has told me?'
 
 'I think it certain,' said he.
 
 I could not restrain my laughter.  'Well, then, do you think it likely I
 would tell you?' I cried.
 
 'Not a bit.' said he.  'But come, to our lesson!'
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI--THE ESCAPE
 
 
 The time for our escape drew near, and the nearer it came the less we
 seemed to enjoy the prospect.  There is but one side on which this castle
 can be left either with dignity or safety; but as there is the main gate
 and guard, and the chief street of the upper city, it is not to be
 thought of by escaping prisoners.  In all other directions an abominable
 precipice surrounds it, down the face of which (if anywhere at all) we
 must regain our liberty.  By our concurrent labours in many a dark night,
 working with the most anxious precautions against noise, we had made out
 to pierce below the curtain about the south-west corner, in a place they
 call the _Devil's Elbow_.  I have never met that celebrity; nor (if the
 rest of him at all comes up to what they called his elbow) have I the
 least desire of his acquaintance.  From the heel of the masonry, the
 rascally, breakneck precipice descended sheer among waste lands,
 scattered suburbs of the city, and houses in the building.  I had never
 the heart to look for any length of time--the thought that I must make
 the descent in person some dark night robbing me of breath; and, indeed,
 on anybody not a seaman or a steeple-jack, the mere sight of the _Devil's
 Elbow_ wrought like an emetic.
 
 I don't know where the rope was got, and doubt if I much cared.  It was
 not that which gravelled me, but whether, now that we had it, it would
 serve our turn.  Its length, indeed, we made a shift to fathom out; but
 who was to tell us how that length compared with the way we had to go?
 Day after day, there would be always some of us stolen out to the
 _Devil's Elbow_ and making estimates of the descent, whether by a bare
 guess or the dropping of stones.  A private of pioneers remembered the
 formula for that--or else remembered part of it and obligingly invented
 the remainder.  I had never any real confidence in that formula; and even
 had we got it from a book, there were difficulties in the way of the
 application that might have daunted Archimedes.  We durst not drop any
 considerable pebble lest the sentinels should hear, and those that we
 dropped we could not hear ourselves.  We had never a watch--or none that
 had a second-hand; and though every one of us could guess a second to a
 nicety, all somehow guessed it differently.  In short, if any two set
 forth upon this enterprise, they invariably returned with two opinions,
 and often with a black eye in the bargain.  I looked on upon these
 proceedings, although not without laughter, yet with impatience and
 disgust.  I am one that cannot bear to see things botched or gone upon
 with ignorance; and the thought that some poor devil was to hazard his
 bones upon such premises, revolted me.  Had I guessed the name of that
 unhappy first adventurer, my sentiments might have been livelier still.
 
 The designation of this personage was indeed all that remained for us to
 do; and even in that we had advanced so far that the lot had fallen on
 Shed B.  It had been determined to mingle the bitter and the sweet; and
 whoever went down first, the whole of his shed-mates were to follow next
 in order.  This caused a good deal of joy in Shed B, and would have
 caused more if it had not still remained to choose our pioneer.  In view
 of the ambiguity in which we lay as to the length of the rope and the
 height of the precipice--and that this gentleman was to climb down from
 fifty to seventy fathoms on a pitchy night, on a rope entirely free, and
 with not so much as an infant child to steady it at the bottom, a little
 backwardness was perhaps excusable.  But it was, in our case, more than a
 little.  The truth is, we were all womanish fellows about a height; and I
 have myself been put, more than once, _hors de combat_ by a less affair
 than the rock of Edinburgh Castle.
 
 We discussed it in the dark and between the passage of the rounds; and it
 was impossible for any body of men to show a less adventurous spirit.  I
 am sure some of us, and myself first among the number, regretted
 Goguelat.  Some were persuaded it was safe, and could prove the same by
 argument; but if they had good reasons why some one else should make the
 trial, they had better still why it should not be themselves.  Others,
 again, condemned the whole idea as insane; among these, as ill-luck would
 have it, a seaman of the fleet; who was the most dispiriting of all.  The
 height, he reminded us, was greater than the tallest ship's mast, the
 rope entirely free; and he as good as defied the boldest and strongest to
 succeed.  We were relieved from this dead-lock by our sergeant-major of
 dragoons.
 
 'Comrades,' said he, 'I believe I rank you all; and for that reason, if
 you really wish it, I will be the first myself.  At the same time, you
 are to consider what the chances are that I may prove to be the last, as
 well.  I am no longer young--I was sixty near a month ago.  Since I have
 been a prisoner, I have made for myself a little _bedaine_.  My arms are
 all gone to fat.  And you must promise not to blame me, if I fall and
 play the devil with the whole thing.'
 
 'We cannot hear of such a thing!' said I.  'M. Laclas is the oldest man
 here; and, as such, he should be the very last to offer.  It is plain, we
 must draw lots.'
 
 'No,' said M. Laclas; 'you put something else in my head!  There is one
 here who owes a pretty candle to the others, for they have kept his
 secret.  Besides, the rest of us are only rabble; and he is another
 affair altogether.  Let Champdivers--let the noble go the first.'
 
 I confess there was a notable pause before the noble in question got his
 voice.  But there was no room for choice.  I had been so ill-advised,
 when I first joined the regiment, as to take ground on my nobility.  I
 had been often rallied on the matter in the ranks, and had passed under
 the by-names of _Monseigneur_ and _the Marquis_.  It was now needful I
 should justify myself and take a fair revenge.
 
 Any little hesitation I may have felt passed entirely unnoticed, from the
 lucky incident of a round happening at that moment to go by.  And during
 the interval of silence there occurred something that sent my blood to
 the boil.  There was a private in our shed called Clausel, a man of a
 very ugly disposition.  He had made one of the followers of Goguelat;
 but, whereas Goguelat had always a kind of monstrous gaiety about him,
 Clausel was no less morose than he was evil-minded.  He was sometimes
 called _the General_, and sometimes by a name too ill-mannered for
 repetition.  As we all sat listening, this man's hand was laid on my
 shoulder, and his voice whispered in my ear: 'If you don't go, I'll have
 you hanged, Marquis!'
 
 As soon as the round was past--'Certainly, gentlemen!' said I.  'I will
 give you a lead, with all the pleasure in the world.  But, first of all,
 there is a hound here to be punished.  M. Clausel has just insulted me,
 and dishonoured the French army; and I demand that he run the gauntlet of
 this shed.'
 
 There was but one voice asking what he had done, and, as soon as I had
 told them, but one voice agreeing to the punishment.  The General was, in
 consequence, extremely roughly handled, and the next day was
 congratulated by all who saw him on his _new decorations_.  It was lucky
 for us that he was one of the prime movers and believers in our project
 of escape, or he had certainly revenged himself by a denunciation.  As
 for his feelings towards myself, they appeared, by his looks, to surpass
 humanity; and I made up my mind to give him a wide berth in the future.
 
 Had I been to go down that instant, I believe I could have carried it
 well.  But it was already too late--the day was at hand.  The rest had
 still to be summoned.  Nor was this the extent of my misfortune; for the
 next night, and the night after, were adorned with a perfect galaxy of
 stars, and showed every cat that stirred in a quarter of a mile.  During
 this interval, I have to direct your sympathies on the Vicomte de
 Saint-Yves!  All addressed me softly, like folk round a sickbed.  Our
 Italian corporal, who had got a dozen of oysters from a fishwife, laid
 them at my feet, as though I were a Pagan idol; and I have never since
 been wholly at my ease in the society of shellfish.  He who was the best
 of our carvers brought me a snuff-box, which he had just completed, and
 which, while it was yet in hand, he had often declared he would not part
 with under fifteen dollars.  I believe the piece was worth the money too!
 And yet the voice stuck in my throat with which I must thank him.  I
 found myself, in a word, to be fed up like a prisoner in a camp of
 anthropophagi, and honoured like the sacrificial bull.  And what with
 these annoyances, and the risky venture immediately ahead, I found my
 part a trying one to play.
 
 It was a good deal of a relief when the third evening closed about the
 castle with volumes of sea-fog.  The lights of Princes Street sometimes
 disappeared, sometimes blinked across at us no brighter than the eyes of
 cats; and five steps from one of the lanterns on the ramparts it was
 already groping dark.  We made haste to lie down.  Had our jailers been
 upon the watch, they must have observed our conversation to die out
 unusually soon.  Yet I doubt if any of us slept.  Each lay in his place,
 tortured at once with the hope of liberty and the fear of a hateful
 death.  The guard call sounded; the hum of the town declined by little
 and little.  On all sides of us, in their different quarters, we could
 hear the watchman cry the hours along the street.  Often enough, during
 my stay in England, have I listened to these gruff or broken voices; or
 perhaps gone to my window when I lay sleepless, and watched the old
 gentleman hobble by upon the causeway with his cape and his cap, his
 hanger and his rattle.  It was ever a thought with me how differently
 that cry would re-echo in the chamber of lovers, beside the bed of death,
 or in the condemned cell.  I might be said to hear it that night myself
 in the condemned cell!  At length a fellow with a voice like a bull's
 began to roar out in the opposite thoroughfare:
 
 'Past yin o'cloak, and a dark, haary moarnin'.'
 
 At which we were all silently afoot.
 
 As I stole about the battlements towards the--gallows, I was about to
 write--the sergeant-major, perhaps doubtful of my resolution, kept close
 by me, and occasionally proffered the most indigestible reassurances in
 my ear.  At last I could bear them no longer.
 
 'Be so obliging as to let me be!' said I.  'I am neither a coward nor a
 fool.  What do _you_ know of whether the rope be long enough?  But I
 shall know it in ten minutes!'
 
 The good old fellow laughed in his moustache, and patted me.
 
 It was all very well to show the disposition of my temper before a friend
 alone; before my assembled comrades the thing had to go handsomely.  It
 was then my time to come on the stage; and I hope I took it handsomely.
 
 'Now, gentlemen,' said I, 'if the rope is ready, here is the criminal!'
 
 The tunnel was cleared, the stake driven, the rope extended.  As I moved
 forward to the place, many of my comrades caught me by the hand and wrung
 it, an attention I could well have done without.
 
 'Keep an eye on Clausel!' I whispered to Laclas; and with that, got down
 on my elbows and knees took the rope in both hands, and worked myself,
 feet foremost, through the tunnel.  When the earth failed under my feet,
 I thought my heart would have stopped; and a moment after I was demeaning
 myself in mid-air like a drunken jumping-jack.  I have never been a model
 of piety, but at this juncture prayers and a cold sweat burst from me
 simultaneously.
 
 The line was knotted at intervals of eighteen inches; and to the inexpert
 it may seem as if it should have been even easy to descend.  The trouble
 was, this devil of a piece of rope appeared to be inspired, not with life
 alone, but with a personal malignity against myself.  It turned to the
 one side, paused for a moment, and then spun me like a toasting-jack to
 the other; slipped like an eel from the clasp of my feet; kept me all the
 time in the most outrageous fury of exertion; and dashed me at intervals
 against the face of the rock.  I had no eyes to see with; and I doubt if
 there was anything to see but darkness.  I must occasionally have caught
 a gasp of breath, but it was quite unconscious.  And the whole forces of
 my mind were so consumed with losing hold and getting it again, that I
 could scarce have told whether I was going up or coming down.
 
 Of a sudden I knocked against the cliff with such a thump as almost
 bereft me of my sense; and, as reason twinkled back, I was amazed to find
 that I was in a state of rest, that the face of the precipice here
 inclined outwards at an angle which relieved me almost wholly of the
 burthen of my own weight, and that one of my feet was safely planted on a
 ledge.  I drew one of the sweetest breaths in my experience, hugged
 myself against the rope, and closed my eyes in a kind of ecstasy of
 relief.  It occurred to me next to see how far I was advanced on my
 unlucky journey, a point on which I had not a shadow of a guess.  I
 looked up: there was nothing above me but the blackness of the night and
 the fog.  I craned timidly forward and looked down.  There, upon a floor
 of darkness, I beheld a certain pattern of hazy lights, some of them
 aligned as in thoroughfares, others standing apart as in solitary houses;
 and before I could well realise it, or had in the least estimated my
 distance, a wave of nausea and vertigo warned me to lie back and close my
 eyes.  In this situation I had really but the one wish, and that was:
 something else to think of!  Strange to say, I got it: a veil was torn
 from my mind, and I saw what a fool I was--what fools we had all
 been--and that I had no business to be thus dangling between earth and
 heaven by my arms.  The only thing to have done was to have attached me
 to a rope and lowered me, and I had never the wit to see it till that
 moment!
 
 I filled my lungs, got a good hold on my rope, and once more launched
 myself on the descent.  As it chanced, the worst of the danger was at an
 end, and I was so fortunate as to be never again exposed to any violent
 concussion.  Soon after I must have passed within a little distance of a
 bush of wallflower, for the scent of it came over me with that impression
 of reality which characterises scents in darkness.  This made me a second
 landmark, the ledge being my first.  I began accordingly to compute
 intervals of time: so much to the ledge, so much again to the wallflower,
 so much more below.  If I were not at the bottom of the rock, I
 calculated I must be near indeed to the end of the rope, and there was no
 doubt that I was not far from the end of my own resources.  I began to be
 light-headed and to be tempted to let go,--now arguing that I was
 certainly arrived within a few feet of the level and could safely risk a
 fall, anon persuaded I was still close at the top and it was idle to
 continue longer on the rock.  In the midst of which I came to a bearing
 on plain ground, and had nearly wept aloud.  My hands were as good as
 flayed, my courage entirely exhausted, and, what with the long strain and
 the sudden relief, my limbs shook under me with more than the violence of
 ague, and I was glad to cling to the rope.
 
 But this was no time to give way.  I had (by God's single mercy) got
 myself alive out of that fortress; and now I had to try to get the
 others, my comrades.  There was about a fathom of rope to spare; I got it
 by the end, and searched the whole ground thoroughly for anything to make
 it fast to.  In vain: the ground was broken and stony, but there grew not
 there so much as a bush of furze.
 
 'Now then,' thought I to myself, 'here begins a new lesson, and I believe
 it will prove richer than the first.  I am not strong enough to keep this
 rope extended.  If I do not keep it extended the next man will be dashed
 against the precipice.  There is no reason why he should have my
 extravagant good luck.  I see no reason why he should not fall--nor any
 place for him to fall on but my head.'
 
 From where I was now standing there was occasionally visible, as the fog
 lightened, a lamp in one of the barrack windows, which gave me a measure
 of the height he had to fall and the horrid force that he must strike me
 with.  What was yet worse, we had agreed to do without signals: every so
 many minutes by Laclas' watch another man was to be started from the
 battlements.  Now, I had seemed to myself to be about half an hour in my
 descent, and it seemed near as long again that I waited, straining on the
 rope for my next comrade to begin.  I began to be afraid that our
 conspiracy was out, that my friends were all secured, and that I should
 pass the remainder of the night, and be discovered in the morning, vainly
 clinging to the rope's end like a hooked fish upon an angle.  I could not
 refrain, at this ridiculous image, from a chuckle of laughter.  And the
 next moment I knew, by the jerking of the rope, that my friend had
 crawled out of the tunnel and was fairly launched on his descent.  It
 appears it was the sailor who had insisted on succeeding me: as soon as
 my continued silence had assured him the rope was long enough, Gautier,
 for that was his name, had forgot his former arguments, and shown himself
 so extremely forward, that Laclas had given way.  It was like the fellow,
 who had no harm in him beyond an instinctive selfishness.  But he was
 like to have paid pretty dearly for the privilege.  Do as I would, I
 could not keep the rope as I could have wished it; and he ended at last
 by falling on me from a height of several yards, so that we both rolled
 together on the ground.  As soon as he could breathe he cursed me beyond
 belief, wept over his finger, which he had broken, and cursed me again.
 I bade him be still and think shame of himself to be so great a cry-baby.
 Did he not hear the round going by above? I asked; and who could tell but
 what the noise of his fall was already remarked, and the sentinels at the
 very moment leaning upon the battlements to listen?
 
 The round, however, went by, and nothing was discovered; the third man
 came to the ground quite easily; the fourth was, of course, child's play;
 and before there were ten of us collected, it seemed to me that, without
 the least injustice to my comrades, I might proceed to take care of
 myself.
 
 I knew their plan: they had a map and an almanack, and designed for
 Grangemouth, where they were to steal a ship.  Suppose them to do so, I
 had no idea they were qualified to manage it after it was stolen.  Their
 whole escape, indeed, was the most haphazard thing imaginable; only the
 impatience of captives and the ignorance of private soldiers would have
 entertained so misbegotten a device; and though I played the good comrade
 and worked with them upon the tunnel, but for the lawyer's message I
 should have let them go without me.  Well, now they were beyond my help,
 as they had always been beyond my counselling; and, without word said or
 leave taken, I stole out of the little crowd.  It is true I would rather
 have waited to shake hands with Laclas, but in the last man who had
 descended I thought I recognised Clausel, and since the scene in the shed
 my distrust of Clausel was perfect.  I believed the man to be capable of
 any infamy, and events have since shown that I was right.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII--SWANSTON COTTAGE
 
 
 I had two views.  The first was, naturally, to get clear of Edinburgh
 Castle and the town, to say nothing of my fellow-prisoners; the second to
 work to the southward so long as it was night, and be near Swanston
 Cottage by morning.  What I should do there and then, I had no guess, and
 did not greatly care, being a devotee of a couple of divinities called
 Chance and Circumstance.  Prepare, if possible; where it is impossible,
 work straight forward, and keep your eyes open and your tongue oiled.
 Wit and a good exterior--there is all life in a nutshell.
 
 I had at first a rather chequered journey: got involved in gardens,
 butted into houses, and had even once the misfortune to awake a sleeping
 family, the father of which, as I suppose, menaced me from the window
 with a blunderbuss.  Altogether, though I had been some time gone from my
 companions, I was still at no great distance, when a miserable accident
 put a period to the escape.  Of a sudden the night was divided by a
 scream.  This was followed by the sound of something falling, and that
 again by the report of a musket from the Castle battlements.  It was
 strange to hear the alarm spread through the city.  In the fortress drums
 were beat and a bell rung backward.  On all hands the watchmen sprang
 their rattles.  Even in that limbo or no-man's-land where I was
 wandering, lights were made in the houses; sashes were flung up; I could
 hear neighbouring families converse from window to window, and at length
 I was challenged myself.
 
 'Wha's that?' cried a big voice.
 
 I could see it proceeded from a big man in a big nightcap, leaning from a
 one-pair window; and as I was not yet abreast of his house, I judged it
 was more wise to answer.  This was not the first time I had had to stake
 my fortunes on the goodness of my accent in a foreign tongue; and I have
 always found the moment inspiriting, as a gambler should.  Pulling around
 me a sort of great-coat I had made of my blanket, to cover my
 sulphur-coloured livery,--'A friend!' said I.
 
 'What like's all this collieshangie?' said he.
 
 I had never heard of a collieshangie in my days, but with the racket all
 about us in the city, I could have no doubt as to the man's meaning.
 
 'I do not know, sir, really,' said I; 'but I suppose some of the
 prisoners will have escaped.'
 
 'Bedamned!' says he.
 
 'Oh, sir, they will be soon taken,' I replied: 'it has been found in
 time.  Good morning, sir!'
 
 'Ye walk late, sir?' he added.
 
 'Oh, surely not,' said I, with a laugh.  'Earlyish, if you like!' which
 brought me finally beyond him, highly pleased with my success.
 
 I was now come forth on a good thoroughfare, which led (as well as I
 could judge) in my direction.  It brought me almost immediately through a
 piece of street, whence I could hear close by the springing of a
 watchman's rattle, and where I suppose a sixth part of the windows would
 be open, and the people, in all sorts of night gear, talking with a kind
 of tragic gusto from one to another.  Here, again, I must run the
 gauntlet of a half-dozen questions, the rattle all the while sounding
 nearer; but as I was not walking inordinately quick, as I spoke like a
 gentleman, and the lamps were too dim to show my dress, I carried it off
 once more.  One person, indeed, inquired where I was off to at that hour.
 
 I replied vaguely and cheerfully, and as I escaped at one end of this
 dangerous pass I could see the watchman's lantern entering by the other.
 I was now safe on a dark country highway, out of sight of lights and out
 of the fear of watchmen.  And yet I had not gone above a hundred yards
 before a fellow made an ugly rush at me from the roadside.  I avoided him
 with a leap, and stood on guard, cursing my empty hands, wondering
 whether I had to do with an officer or a mere footpad, and scarce knowing
 which to wish.  My assailant stood a little; in the thick darkness I
 could see him bob and sidle as though he were feinting at me for an
 advantageous onfall.  Then he spoke.
 
 'My goo' frien',' says he, and at the first word I pricked my ears, 'my
 goo' frien', will you oblishe me with lil neshary infamation?  Whish roa'
 t' Cramond?'
 
 I laughed out clear and loud, stepped up to the convivialist, took him by
 the shoulders and faced him about.  'My good friend,' said I, 'I believe
 I know what is best for you much better than yourself, and may God
 forgive you the fright you have given me!  There, get you gone to
 Edinburgh!'  And I gave a shove, which he obeyed with the passive agility
 of a ball, and disappeared incontinently in the darkness down the road by
 which I had myself come.
 
 Once clear of this foolish fellow, I went on again up a gradual hill,
 descended on the other side through the houses of a country village, and
 came at last to the bottom of the main ascent leading to the Pentlands
 and my destination.  I was some way up when the fog began to lighten; a
 little farther, and I stepped by degrees into a clear starry night, and
 saw in front of me, and quite distinct, the summits of the Pentlands, and
 behind, the valley of the Forth and the city of my late captivity buried
 under a lake of vapour.  I had but one encounter--that of a farm-cart,
 which I heard, from a great way ahead of me, creaking nearer in the
 night, and which passed me about the point of dawn like a thing seen in a
 dream, with two silent figures in the inside nodding to the horse's
 steps.  I presume they were asleep; by the shawl about her head and
 shoulders, one of them should be a woman.  Soon, by concurrent steps, the
 day began to break and the fog to subside and roll away.  The east grew
 luminous and was barred with chilly colours, and the Castle on its rock,
 and the spires and chimneys of the upper town, took gradual shape, and
 arose, like islands, out of the receding cloud.  All about me was still
 and sylvan; the road mounting and winding, with nowhere a sign of any
 passenger, the birds chirping, I suppose for warmth, the boughs of the
 trees knocking together, and the red leaves falling in the wind.
 
 It was broad day, but still bitter cold and the sun not up, when I came
 in view of my destination.  A single gable and chimney of the cottage
 peeped over the shoulder of the hill; not far off, and a trifle higher on
 the mountain, a tall old white-washed farmhouse stood among the trees,
 beside a falling brook; beyond were rough hills of pasture.  I bethought
 me that shepherd folk were early risers, and if I were once seen skulking
 in that neighbourhood it might prove the ruin of my prospects; took
 advantage of a line of hedge, and worked myself up in its shadow till I
 was come under the garden wall of my friends' house.  The cottage was a
 little quaint place of many rough-cast gables and grey roofs.  It had
 something the air of a rambling infinitesimal cathedral, the body of it
 rising in the midst two storeys high, with a steep-pitched roof, and
 sending out upon all hands (as it were chapter-houses, chapels, and
 transepts) one-storeyed and dwarfish projections.  To add to this
 appearance, it was grotesquely decorated with crockets and gargoyles,
 ravished from some medieval church.  The place seemed hidden away, being
 not only concealed in the trees of the garden, but, on the side on which
 I approached it, buried as high as the eaves by the rising of the ground.
 About the walls of the garden there went a line of well-grown elms and
 beeches, the first entirely bare, the last still pretty well covered with
 red leaves, and the centre was occupied with a thicket of laurel and
 holly, in which I could see arches cut and paths winding.
 
 I was now within hail of my friends, and not much the better.  The house
 appeared asleep; yet if I attempted to wake any one, I had no guarantee
 it might not prove either the aunt with the gold eyeglasses (whom I could
 only remember with trembling), or some ass of a servant-maid who should
 burst out screaming at sight of me.  Higher up I could hear and see a
 shepherd shouting to his dogs and striding on the rough sides of the
 mountain, and it was clear I must get to cover without loss of time.  No
 doubt the holly thickets would have proved a very suitable retreat, but
 there was mounted on the wall a sort of signboard not uncommon in the
 country of Great Britain, and very damping to the adventurous: SPRING
 GUNS AND MAN-TRAPS was the legend that it bore.  I have learned since
 that these advertisements, three times out of four, were in the nature of
 Quaker guns on a disarmed battery, but I had not learned it then, and
 even so, the odds would not have been good enough.  For a choice, I would
 a hundred times sooner be returned to Edinburgh Castle and my corner in
 the bastion, than to leave my foot in a steel trap or have to digest the
 contents of an automatic blunderbuss.  There was but one chance
 left--that Ronald or Flora might be the first to come abroad; and in
 order to profit by this chance if it occurred, I got me on the cope of
 the wall in a place where it was screened by the thick branches of a
 beech, and sat there waiting.
 
 As the day wore on, the sun came very pleasantly out.  I had been awake
 all night, I had undergone the most violent agitations of mind and body,
 and it is not so much to be wondered at, as it was exceedingly unwise and
 foolhardy, that I should have dropped into a doze.  From this I awakened
 to the characteristic sound of digging, looked down, and saw immediately
 below me the back view of a gardener in a stable waistcoat.  Now he would
 appear steadily immersed in his business; anon, to my more immediate
 terror, he would straighten his back, stretch his arms, gaze about the
 otherwise deserted garden, and relish a deep pinch of snuff.  It was my
 first thought to drop from the wall upon the other side.  A glance
 sufficed to show me that even the way by which I had come was now cut
 off, and the field behind me already occupied by a couple of shepherds'
 assistants and a score or two of sheep.  I have named the talismans on
 which I habitually depend, but here was a conjuncture in which both were
 wholly useless.  The copestone of a wall arrayed with broken bottles is
 no favourable rostrum; and I might be as eloquent as Pitt, and as
 fascinating as Richelieu, and neither the gardener nor the shepherd lads
 would care a halfpenny.  In short, there was no escape possible from my
 absurd position: there I must continue to sit until one or other of my
 neighbours should raise his eyes and give the signal for my capture.
 
 The part of the wall on which (for my sins) I was posted could be scarce
 less than twelve feet high on the inside; the leaves of the beech which
 made a fashion of sheltering me were already partly fallen; and I was
 thus not only perilously exposed myself, but enabled to command some part
 of the garden walks and (under an evergreen arch) the front lawn and
 windows of the cottage.  For long nothing stirred except my friend with
 the spade; then I heard the opening of a sash; and presently after saw
 Miss Flora appear in a morning wrapper and come strolling hitherward
 between the borders, pausing and visiting her flowers--herself as fair.
 _There_ was a friend; _here_, immediately beneath me, an unknown
 quantity--the gardener: how to communicate with the one and not attract
 the notice of the other?  To make a noise was out of the question; I
 dared scarce to breathe.  I held myself ready to make a gesture as soon
 as she should look, and she looked in every possible direction but the
 one.  She was interested in the vilest tuft of chickweed, she gazed at
 the summit of the mountain, she came even immediately below me and
 conversed on the most fastidious topics with the gardener; but to the top
 of that wall she would not dedicate a glance!  At last she began to
 retrace her steps in the direction of the cottage; whereupon, becoming
 quite desperate, I broke off a piece of plaster, took a happy aim, and
 hit her with it in the nape of the neck.  She clapped her hand to the
 place, turned about, looked on all sides for an explanation, and spying
 me (as indeed I was parting the branches to make it the more easy), half
 uttered and half swallowed down again a cry of surprise.
 
 The infernal gardener was erect upon the instant.  'What's your wull,
 miss?' said he.
 
 Her readiness amazed me.  She had already turned and was gazing in the
 opposite direction.  'There's a child among the artichokes,' she said.
 
 'The Plagues of Egyp'!  _I'll_ see to them!' cried the gardener
 truculently, and with a hurried waddle disappeared among the evergreens.
 
 That moment she turned, she came running towards me, her arms stretched
 out, her face incarnadined for the one moment with heavenly blushes, the
 next pale as death.  'Monsieur de. Saint-Yves!' she said.
 
 'My dear young lady,' I said, 'this is the damnedest liberty--I know it!
 But what else was I to do?'
 
 'You have escaped?' said she.
 
 'If you call this escape,' I replied.
 
 'But you cannot possibly stop there!' she cried.
 
 'I know it,' said I.  'And where am I to go?'
 
 She struck her hands together.  'I have it!' she exclaimed.  'Come down
 by the beech trunk--you must leave no footprint in the border--quickly,
 before Robie can get back!  I am the hen-wife here: I keep the key; you
 must go into the hen-house--for the moment.'
 
 I was by her side at once.  Both cast a hasty glance at the blank windows
 of the cottage and so much as was visible of the garden alleys; it seemed
 there was none to observe us.  She caught me by the sleeve and ran.  It
 was no time for compliments; hurry breathed upon our necks; and I ran
 along with her to the next corner of the garden, where a wired court and
 a board hovel standing in a grove of trees advertised my place of refuge.
 She thrust me in without a word; the bulk of the fowls were at the same
 time emitted; and I found myself the next moment locked in alone with
 half a dozen sitting hens.  In the twilight of the place all fixed their
 eyes on me severely, and seemed to upbraid me with some crying
 impropriety.  Doubtless the hen has always a puritanic appearance,
 although (in its own behaviour) I could never observe it to be more
 particular than its neighbours.  But conceive a British hen!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII--THE HEN-HOUSE
 
 
 I was half an hour at least in the society of these distressing bipeds,
 and alone with my own reflections and necessities.  I was in great pain
 of my flayed hands, and had nothing to treat them with; I was hungry and
 thirsty, and had nothing to eat or to drink; I was thoroughly tired, and
 there was no place for me to sit.  To be sure there was the floor, but
 nothing could be imagined less inviting.
 
 At the sound of approaching footsteps, my good-humour was restored.  The
 key rattled in the lock, and Master Ronald entered, closed the door
 behind him, and leaned his back to it.
 
 'I say, you know!' he said, and shook a sullen young head.
 
 'I know it's a liberty,' said I.
 
 'It's infernally awkward: my position is infernally embarrassing,' said
 he.
 
 'Well,' said I, 'and what do you think of mine?'
 
 This seemed to pose him entirely, and he remained gazing upon me with a
 convincing air of youth and innocence.  I could have laughed, but I was
 not so inhumane.
 
 'I am in your hands,' said I, with a little gesture.  'You must do with
 me what you think right.'
 
 'Ah, yes!' he cried: 'if I knew!'
 
 'You see,' said I, 'it would be different if you had received your
 commission.  Properly speaking, you are not yet a combatant; I have
 ceased to be one; and I think it arguable that we are just in the
 position of one ordinary gentleman to another, where friendship usually
 comes before the law.  Observe, I only say _arguable_.  For God's sake,
 don't think I wish to dictate an opinion.  These are the sort of nasty
 little businesses, inseparable from war, which every gentleman must
 decide for himself.  If I were in your place--'
 
 'Ay, what would you do, then?' says he.
 
 'Upon my word, I do not know,' said I.  'Hesitate, as you are doing, I
 believe.'
 
 'I will tell you,' he said.  'I have a kinsman, and it is what _he_ would
 think, that I am thinking.  It is General Graham of Lynedoch--Sir Thomas
 Graham.  I scarcely know him, but I believe I admire him more than I do
 God.'
 
 'I admire him a good deal myself,' said I, 'and have good reason to.  I
 have fought with him, been beaten, and run away.  _Veni_, _victus sum_,
 _evasi_.'
 
 'What!' he cried.  'You were at Barossa?'
 
 'There and back, which many could not say,' said I.  'It was a pretty
 affair and a hot one, and the Spaniards behaved abominably, as they
 usually did in a pitched field; the Marshal Duke of Belluno made a fool
 of himself, and not for the first time; and your friend Sir Thomas had
 the best of it, so far as there was any best.  He is a brave and ready
 officer.'
 
 'Now, then, you will understand!' said the boy.  'I wish to please Sir
 Thomas: what would he do?'
 
 'Well, I can tell you a story,' said I, 'a true one too, and about this
 very combat of Chiclana, or Barossa as you call it.  I was in the Eighth
 of the Line; we lost the eagle of the First Battalion, more betoken, but
 it cost you dear.  Well, we had repulsed more charges than I care to
 count, when your 87th Regiment came on at a foot's pace, very slow but
 very steady; in front of them a mounted officer, his hat in his hand,
 white-haired, and talking very quietly to the battalions.  Our Major,
 Vigo-Roussillon, set spurs to his horse and galloped out to sabre him,
 but seeing him an old man, very handsome, and as composed as if he were
 in a coffee-house, lost heart and galloped back again.  Only, you see,
 they had been very close together for the moment, and looked each other
 in the eyes.  Soon after the Major was wounded, taken prisoner, and
 carried into Cadiz.  One fine day they announced to him the visit of the
 General, Sir Thomas Graham.  "Well, sir," said the General, taking him by
 the hand, "I think we were face to face upon the field."  It was the
 white-haired officer!'
 
 'Ah!' cried the boy,--his eyes were burning.
 
 'Well, and here is the point,' I continued.  'Sir Thomas fed the Major
 from his own table from that day, and served him with six covers.'
 
 'Yes, it is a beautiful--a beautiful story,' said Ronald.  'And yet
 somehow it is not the same--is it?'
 
 'I admit it freely,' said I.
 
 The boy stood awhile brooding.  'Well, I take my risk of it,' he cried.
 'I believe it's treason to my sovereign--I believe there is an infamous
 punishment for such a crime--and yet I'm hanged if I can give you up.'
 
 I was as much moved as he.  'I could almost beg you to do otherwise,' I
 said.  'I was a brute to come to you, a brute and a coward.  You are a
 noble enemy; you will make a noble soldier.'  And with rather a happy
 idea of a compliment for this warlike youth, I stood up straight and gave
 him the salute.
 
 He was for a moment confused; his face flushed.  'Well, well, I must be
 getting you something to eat, but it will not be for six,' he added, with
 a smile: 'only what we can get smuggled out.  There is my aunt in the
 road, you see,' and he locked me in again with the indignant hens.
 
 I always smile when I recall that young fellow; and yet, if the reader
 were to smile also, I should feel ashamed.  If my son shall be only like
 him when he comes to that age, it will be a brave day for me and not a
 bad one for his country.
 
 At the same time I cannot pretend that I was sorry when his sister
 succeeded in his place.  She brought me a few crusts of bread and a jug
 of milk, which she had handsomely laced with whisky after the Scottish
 manner.
 
 'I am so sorry,' she said: 'I dared not bring on anything more.  We are
 so small a family, and my aunt keeps such an eye upon the servants.  I
 have put some whisky in the milk--it is more wholesome so--and with eggs
 you will be able to make something of a meal.  How many eggs will you be
 wanting to that milk? for I must be taking the others to my aunt--that is
 my excuse for being here.  I should think three or four.  Do you know how
 to beat them? or shall I do it?'
 
 Willing to detain her a while longer in the hen-house, I displayed my
 bleeding palms; at which she cried aloud.
 
 'My dear Miss Flora, you cannot make an omelette without breaking eggs,'
 said I; 'and it is no bagatelle to escape from Edinburgh Castle.  One of
 us, I think, was even killed.'
 
 'And you are as white as a rag, too,' she exclaimed, 'and can hardly
 stand!  Here is my shawl, sit down upon it here in the corner, and I will
 beat your eggs.  See, I have brought a fork too; I should have been a
 good person to take care of Jacobites or Covenanters in old days!  You
 shall have more to eat this evening; Ronald is to bring it you from town.
 We have money enough, although no food that we can call our own.  Ah, if
 Ronald and I kept house, you should not be lying in this shed!  He
 admires you so much.'
 
 'My dear friend,' said I, 'for God's sake do not embarrass me with more
 alms.  I loved to receive them from that hand, so long as they were
 needed; but they are so no more, and whatever else I may lack--and I lack
 everything--it is not money.'  I pulled out my sheaf of notes and
 detached the top one: it was written for ten pounds, and signed by that
 very famous individual, Abraham Newlands.  'Oblige me, as you would like
 me to oblige your brother if the parts were reversed, and take this note
 for the expenses.  I shall need not only food, but clothes.'
 
 'Lay it on the ground,' said she.  'I must not stop my beating.'
 
 'You are not offended?' I exclaimed.
 
 She answered me by a look that was a reward in itself, and seemed to
 imply the most heavenly offers for the future.  There was in it a shadow
 of reproach, and such warmth of communicative cordiality as left me
 speechless.  I watched her instead till her hens' milk was ready.
 
 'Now,' said she, 'taste that.'
 
 I did so, and swore it was nectar.  She collected her eggs and crouched
 in front of me to watch me eat.  There was about this tall young lady at
 the moment an air of motherliness delicious to behold.  I am like the
 English general, and to this day I still wonder at my moderation.
 
 'What sort of clothes will you be wanting?' said she.
 
 'The clothes of a gentleman,' said I.  'Right or wrong, I think it is the
 part I am best qualified to play.  Mr. St. Ives (for that's to be my name
 upon the journey) I conceive as rather a theatrical figure, and his
 make-up should be to match.'
 
 'And yet there is a difficulty,' said she.  'If you got coarse clothes
 the fit would hardly matter.  But the clothes of a fine gentleman--O, it
 is absolutely necessary that these should fit!  And above all, with
 your'--she paused a moment--'to our ideas somewhat noticeable manners.'
 
 'Alas for my poor manners!' said I.  'But my dear friend Flora, these
 little noticeabilities are just what mankind has to suffer under.
 Yourself, you see, you're very noticeable even when you come in a crowd
 to visit poor prisoners in the Castle.'
 
 I was afraid I should frighten my good angel visitant away, and without
 the smallest breath of pause went on to add a few directions as to stuffs
 and colours.
 
 She opened big eyes upon me.  'O, Mr. St. Ives!' she cried--'if that is
 to be your name--I do not say they would not be becoming; but for a
 journey, do you think they would be wise?  I am afraid'--she gave a
 pretty break of laughter--'I am afraid they would be daft-like!'
 
 'Well, and am I not daft?' I asked her.
 
 'I do begin to think you are,' said she.
 
 'There it is, then!' said I.  'I have been long enough a figure of fun.
 Can you not feel with me that perhaps the bitterest thing in this
 captivity has been the clothes?  Make me a captive--bind me with chains
 if you like--but let me be still myself.  You do not know what it is to
 be a walking travesty--among foes,' I added bitterly.
 
 'O, but you are too unjust!' she cried.  'You speak as though any one
 ever dreamed of laughing at you.  But no one did.  We were all pained to
 the heart.  Even my aunt--though sometimes I do think she was not quite
 in good taste--you should have seen her and heard her at home!  She took
 so much interest.  Every patch in your clothes made us sorry; it should
 have been a sister's work.'
 
 'That is what I never had--a sister,' said I.  'But since you say that I
 did not make you laugh--'
 
 'O, Mr. St. Ives! never!' she exclaimed.  'Not for one moment.  It was
 all too sad.  To see a gentleman--'
 
 'In the clothes of a harlequin, and begging?' I suggested.
 
 'To see a gentleman in distress, and nobly supporting it,' she said.
 
 'And do you not understand, my fair foe,' said I, 'that even if all were
 as you say--even if you had thought my travesty were becoming--I should
 be only the more anxious, for my sake, for my country's sake, and for the
 sake of your kindness, that you should see him whom you have helped as
 God meant him to be seen? that you should have something to remember him
 by at least more characteristic than a misfitting sulphur-yellow suit,
 and half a week's beard?'
 
 'You think a great deal too much of clothes,' she said.  'I am not that
 kind of girl.'
 
 'And I am afraid I am that kind of man,' said I.  'But do not think of me
 too harshly for that.  I talked just now of something to remember by.  I
 have many of them myself, of these beautiful reminders, of these
 keepsakes, that I cannot be parted from until I lose memory and life.
 Many of them are great things, many of them are high virtues--charity,
 mercy, faith.  But some of them are trivial enough.  Miss Flora, do you
 remember the day that I first saw you, the day of the strong east wind?
 Miss Flora, shall I tell you what you wore?'
 
 We had both risen to our feet, and she had her hand already on the door
 to go.  Perhaps this attitude emboldened me to profit by the last seconds
 of our interview; and it certainly rendered her escape the more easy.
 
 'O, you are too romantic!' she said, laughing; and with that my sun was
 blown out, my enchantress had fled away, and I was again left alone in
 the twilight with the lady hens.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX--THREE IS COMPANY, AND FOUR NONE
 
 
 The rest of the day I slept in the corner of the hen-house upon Flora's
 shawl.  Nor did I awake until a light shone suddenly in my eyes, and
 starting up with a gasp (for, indeed, at the moment I dreamed I was still
 swinging from the Castle battlements) I found Ronald bending over me with
 a lantern.  It appeared it was past midnight, that I had slept about
 sixteen hours, and that Flora had returned her poultry to the shed and I
 had heard her not.  I could not but wonder if she had stooped to look at
 me as I slept.  The puritan hens now slept irremediably; and being
 cheered with the promise of supper I wished them an ironical good-night,
 and was lighted across the garden and noiselessly admitted to a bedroom
 on the ground floor of the cottage.  There I found soap, water,
 razors--offered me diffidently by my beardless host--and an outfit of new
 clothes.  To be shaved again without depending on the barber of the gaol
 was a source of a delicious, if a childish joy.  My hair was sadly too
 long, but I was none so unwise as to make an attempt on it myself.  And,
 indeed, I thought it did not wholly misbecome me as it was, being by
 nature curly.  The clothes were about as good as I expected.  The
 waistcoat was of toilenet, a pretty piece, the trousers of fine
 kerseymere, and the coat sat extraordinarily well.  Altogether, when I
 beheld this changeling in the glass, I kissed my hand to him.
 
 'My dear fellow,' said I, 'have you no scent?'
 
 'Good God, no!' cried Ronald.  'What do you want with scent?'
 
 'Capital thing on a campaign,' said I.  'But I can do without.'
 
 I was now led, with the same precautions against noise, into the little
 bow-windowed dining-room of the cottage.  The shutters were up, the lamp
 guiltily turned low; the beautiful Flora greeted me in a whisper; and
 when I was set down to table, the pair proceeded to help me with
 precautions that might have seemed excessive in the Ear of Dionysius.
 
 'She sleeps up there,' observed the boy, pointing to the ceiling; and the
 knowledge that I was so imminently near to the resting-place of that gold
 eyeglass touched even myself with some uneasiness.
 
 Our excellent youth had imported from the city a meat pie, and I was glad
 to find it flanked with a decanter of really admirable wine of Oporto.
 While I ate, Ronald entertained me with the news of the city, which had
 naturally rung all day with our escape: troops and mounted messengers had
 followed each other forth at all hours and in all directions; but
 according to the last intelligence no recapture had been made.  Opinion
 in town was very favourable to us: our courage was applauded, and many
 professed regret that our ultimate chance of escape should be so small.
 The man who had fallen was one Sombref, a peasant; he was one who slept
 in a different part of the Castle; and I was thus assured that the whole
 of my former companions had attained their liberty, and Shed A was
 untenanted.
 
 From this we wandered insensibly into other topics.  It is impossible to
 exaggerate the pleasure I took to be thus sitting at the same table with
 Flora, in the clothes of a gentleman, at liberty and in the full
 possession of my spirits and resources; of all of which I had need,
 because it was necessary that I should support at the same time two
 opposite characters, and at once play the cavalier and lively soldier for
 the eyes of Ronald, and to the ears of Flora maintain the same profound
 and sentimental note that I had already sounded.  Certainly there are
 days when all goes well with a man; when his wit, his digestion, his
 mistress are in a conspiracy to spoil him, and even the weather smiles
 upon his wishes.  I will only say of myself upon that evening that I
 surpassed my expectations, and was privileged to delight my hosts.
 Little by little they forgot their terrors and I my caution; until at
 last we were brought back to earth by a catastrophe that might very
 easily have been foreseen, but was not the less astonishing to us when it
 occurred.
 
 I had filled all the glasses.  'I have a toast to propose,' I whispered,
 'or rather three, but all so inextricably interwoven that they will not
 bear dividing.  I wish first to drink to the health of a brave and
 therefore a generous enemy.  He found me disarmed, a fugitive and
 helpless.  Like the lion, he disdained so poor a triumph; and when he
 might have vindicated an easy valour, he preferred to make a friend.  I
 wish that we should next drink to a fairer and a more tender foe.  She
 found me in prison; she cheered me with a priceless sympathy; what she
 has done since, I know she has done in mercy, and I only pray--I dare
 scarce hope--her mercy may prove to have been merciful.  And I wish to
 conjoin with these, for the first, and perhaps the last time, the
 health--and I fear I may already say the memory--of one who has fought,
 not always without success, against the soldiers of your nation; but who
 came here, vanquished already, only to be vanquished again by the loyal
 hand of the one, by the unforgettable eyes of the other.'
 
 It is to be feared I may have lent at times a certain resonancy to my
 voice; it is to be feared that Ronald, who was none the better for his
 own hospitality, may have set down his glass with something of a clang.
 Whatever may have been the cause, at least, I had scarce finished my
 compliment before we were aware of a thump upon the ceiling overhead.  It
 was to be thought some very solid body had descended to the floor from
 the level (possibly) of a bed.  I have never seen consternation painted
 in more lively colours than on the faces of my hosts.  It was proposed to
 smuggle me forth into the garden, or to conceal my form under a horsehair
 sofa which stood against the wall.  For the first expedient, as was now
 plain by the approaching footsteps, there was no longer time; from the
 second I recoiled with indignation.
 
 'My dear creatures,' said I, 'let us die, but do not let us be
 ridiculous.'
 
 The words were still upon my lips when the door opened and my friend of
 the gold eyeglass appeared, a memorable figure, on the threshold.  In one
 hand she bore a bedroom candlestick; in the other, with the steadiness of
 a dragoon, a horse-pistol.  She was wound about in shawls which did not
 wholly conceal the candid fabric of her nightdress, and surmounted by a
 nightcap of portentous architecture.  Thus accoutred, she made her
 entrance; laid down the candle and pistol, as no longer called for;
 looked about the room with a silence more eloquent than oaths; and then,
 in a thrilling voice--'To whom have I the pleasure?' she said, addressing
 me with a ghost of a bow.
 
 'Madam, I am charmed, I am sure,' said I.  'The story is a little long;
 and our meeting, however welcome, was for the moment entirely unexpected
 by myself.  I am sure--' but here I found I was quite sure of nothing,
 and tried again.  'I have the honour,' I began, and found I had the
 honour to be only exceedingly confused.  With that, I threw myself
 outright upon her mercy.  'Madam, I must be more frank with you,' I
 resumed.  'You have already proved your charity and compassion for the
 French prisoners, I am one of these; and if my appearance be not too much
 changed, you may even yet recognise in me that _Oddity_ who had the good
 fortune more than once to make you smile.'
 
 Still gazing upon me through her glass, she uttered an uncompromising
 grunt; and then, turning to her niece--'Flora,' said she, 'how comes he
 here?'
 
 The culprits poured out for a while an antiphony of explanations, which
 died out at last in a miserable silence.
 
 'I think at least you might have told your aunt,' she snorted.
 
 'Madam,' I interposed, 'they were about to do so.  It is my fault if it
 be not done already.  But I made it my prayer that your slumbers might be
 respected, and this necessary formula of my presentation should be
 delayed until to-morrow in the morning.'
 
 The old lady regarded me with undissembled incredulity, to which I was
 able to find no better repartee than a profound and I trust graceful
 reverence.
 
 'French prisoners are very well in their place,' she said, 'but I cannot
 see that their place is in my private dining-room.'
 
 'Madam,' said I, 'I hope it may be said without offence, but (except the
 Castle of Edinburgh) I cannot think upon the spot from which I would so
 readily be absent.'
 
 At this, to my relief, I thought I could perceive a vestige of a smile to
 steal upon that iron countenance and to be bitten immediately in.
 
 'And if it is a fair question, what do they call ye?' she asked.
 
 'At your service, the Vicomte Anne de St.-Yves,' said I.
 
 'Mosha the Viscount,' said she, 'I am afraid you do us plain people a
 great deal too much honour.'
 
 'My dear lady,' said I, 'let us be serious for a moment.  What was I to
 do?  Where was I to go?  And how can you be angry with these benevolent
 children who took pity on one so unfortunate as myself?  Your humble
 servant is no such terrific adventurer that you should come out against
 him with horse-pistol and'--smiling--'bedroom candlesticks.  It is but a
 young gentleman in extreme distress, hunted upon every side, and asking
 no more than to escape from his pursuers.  I know your character, I read
 it in your face'--the heart trembled in my body as I said these daring
 words.  'There are unhappy English prisoners in France at this day,
 perhaps at this hour.  Perhaps at this hour they kneel as I do; they take
 the hand of her who might conceal and assist them; they press it to their
 lips as I do--'
 
 'Here, here!' cried the old lady, breaking from my solicitations.
 'Behave yourself before folk!  Saw ever anyone the match of that?  And on
 earth, my dears, what are we to do with him?'
 
 'Pack him off, my dear lady,' said I: 'pack off the impudent fellow
 double-quick!  And if it may be, and if your good heart allows it, help
 him a little on the way he has to go.'
 
 'What's this pie?' she cried stridently.  'Where is this pie from,
 Flora?'
 
 No answer was vouchsafed by my unfortunate and (I may say) extinct
 accomplices.
 
 'Is that my port?' she pursued.  'Hough!  Will somebody give me a glass
 of my port wine?'
 
 I made haste to serve her.
 
 She looked at me over the rim with an extraordinary expression.  'I hope
 ye liked it?' said she.
 
 'It is even a magnificent wine,' said I.
 
 'Aweel, it was my father laid it down,' said she.  'There were few knew
 more about port wine than my father, God rest him!'  She settled herself
 in a chair with an alarming air of resolution.  'And so there is some
 particular direction that you wish to go in?' said she.
 
 'O,' said I, following her example, 'I am by no means such a vagrant as
 you suppose.  I have good friends, if I could get to them, for which all
 I want is to be once clear of Scotland; and I have money for the road.'
 And I produced my bundle.
 
 'English bank-notes?' she said.  'That's not very handy for Scotland.
 It's been some fool of an Englishman that's given you these, I'm
 thinking.  How much is it?'
 
 'I declare to heaven I never thought to count!' I exclaimed.  'But that
 is soon remedied.'
 
 And I counted out ten notes of ten pound each, all in the name of Abraham
 Newlands, and five bills of country bankers for as many guineas.
 
 'One hundred and twenty six pound five,' cried the old lady.  'And you
 carry such a sum about you, and have not so much as counted it!  If you
 are not a thief, you must allow you are very thief-like.'
 
 'And yet, madam, the money is legitimately mine,' said I.
 
 She took one of the bills and held it up.  'Is there any probability,
 now, that this could be traced?' she asked.
 
 'None, I should suppose; and if it were, it would be no matter,' said I.
 'With your usual penetration, you guessed right.  An Englishman brought
 it me.  It reached me, through the hands of his English solicitor, from
 my great-uncle, the Comte de Keroual de Saint-Yves, I believe the richest
 _emigre_ in London.'
 
 'I can do no more than take your word for it,' said she.
 
 'And I trust, madam, not less,' said I.
 
 'Well,' said she, 'at this rate the matter may be feasible.  I will cash
 one of these five-guinea bills, less the exchange, and give you silver
 and Scots notes to bear you as far as the border.  Beyond that, Mosha the
 Viscount, you will have to depend upon yourself.'
 
 I could not but express a civil hesitation as to whether the amount would
 suffice, in my case, for so long a journey.
 
 'Ay,' said she, 'but you havenae heard me out.  For if you are not too
 fine a gentleman to travel with a pair of drovers, I believe I have found
 the very thing, and the Lord forgive me for a treasonable old wife!
 There are a couple stopping up by with the shepherd-man at the farm;
 to-morrow they will take the road for England, probably by skriegh of
 day--and in my opinion you had best be travelling with the stots,' said
 she.
 
 'For Heaven's sake do not suppose me to be so effeminate a character!' I
 cried.  'An old soldier of Napoleon is certainly beyond suspicion.  But,
 dear lady, to what end? and how is the society of these excellent
 gentlemen supposed to help me?'
 
 'My dear sir,' said she, 'you do not at all understand your own
 predicament, and must just leave your matters in the hands of those who
 do.  I dare say you have never even heard tell of the drove-roads or the
 drovers; and I am certainly not going to sit up all night to explain it
 to you.  Suffice it, that it is me who is arranging this affair--the more
 shame to me!--and that is the way ye have to go.  Ronald,' she continued,
 'away up-by to the shepherds; rowst them out of their beds, and make it
 perfectly distinct that Sim is not to leave till he has seen me.'
 
 Ronald was nothing loath to escape from his aunt's neighbourhood, and
 left the room and the cottage with a silent expedition that was more like
 flight than mere obedience.  Meanwhile the old lady turned to her niece.
 
 'And I would like to know what we are to do with him the night!' she
 cried.
 
 'Ronald and I meant to put him in the hen-house,' said the encrimsoned
 Flora.
 
 'And I can tell you he is to go to no such a place,' replied the aunt.
 'Hen-house, indeed!  If a guest he is to be, he shall sleep in no mortal
 hen-house.  Your room is the most fit, I think, if he will consent to
 occupy it on so great a suddenty.  And as for you, Flora, you shall sleep
 with me.'
 
 I could not help admiring the prudence and tact of this old dowager, and
 of course it was not for me to make objections.  Ere I well knew how, I
 was alone with a flat candlestick, which is not the most sympathetic of
 companions, and stood studying the snuff in a frame of mind between
 triumph and chagrin.  All had gone well with my flight: the masterful
 lady who had arrogated to herself the arrangement of the details gave me
 every confidence; and I saw myself already arriving at my uncle's door.
 But, alas! it was another story with my love affair.  I had seen and
 spoken with her alone; I had ventured boldly; I had been not ill
 received; I had seen her change colour, had enjoyed the undissembled
 kindness of her eyes; and now, in a moment, down comes upon the scene
 that apocalyptic figure with the nightcap and the horse-pistol, and with
 the very wind of her coming behold me separated from my love!  Gratitude
 and admiration contended in my breast with the extreme of natural
 rancour.  My appearance in her house at past midnight had an air (I could
 not disguise it from myself) that was insolent and underhand, and could
 not but minister to the worst suspicions.  And the old lady had taken it
 well.  Her generosity was no more to be called in question than her
 courage, and I was afraid that her intelligence would be found to match.
 Certainly, Miss Flora had to support some shrewd looks, and certainly she
 had been troubled.  I could see but the one way before me: to profit by
 an excellent bed, to try to sleep soon, to be stirring early, and to hope
 for some renewed occasion in the morning.  To have said so much and yet
 to say no more, to go out into the world upon so half-hearted a parting,
 was more than I could accept.
 
 It is my belief that the benevolent fiend sat up all night to baulk me.
 She was at my bedside with a candle long ere day, roused me, laid out for
 me a damnable misfit of clothes, and bade me pack my own (which were
 wholly unsuited to the journey) in a bundle.  Sore grudging, I arrayed
 myself in a suit of some country fabric, as delicate as sackcloth and
 about as becoming as a shroud; and, on coming forth, found the dragon had
 prepared for me a hearty breakfast.  She took the head of the table,
 poured out the tea, and entertained me as I ate with a great deal of good
 sense and a conspicuous lack of charm.  How often did I not regret the
 change!--how often compare her, and condemn her in the comparison, with
 her charming niece!  But if my entertainer was not beautiful, she had
 certainly been busy in my interest.  Already she was in communication
 with my destined fellow-travellers; and the device on which she had
 struck appeared entirely suitable.  I was a young Englishman who had
 outrun the constable; warrants were out against me in Scotland, and it
 had become needful I should pass the border without loss of time, and
 privately.
 
 'I have given a very good account of you,' said she, 'which I hope you
 may justify.  I told them there was nothing against you beyond the fact
 that you were put to the haw (if that is the right word) for debt.'
 
 'I pray God you have the expression incorrectly, ma'am,' said I.  'I do
 not give myself out for a person easily alarmed; but you must admit there
 is something barbarous and mediaeval in the sound well qualified to
 startle a poor foreigner.'
 
 'It is the name of a process in Scots Law, and need alarm no honest man,'
 said she.  'But you are a very idle-minded young gentleman; you must
 still have your joke, I see: I only hope you will have no cause to regret
 it.'
 
 'I pray you not to suppose, because I speak lightly, that I do not feel
 deeply,' said I.  'Your kindness has quite conquered me; I lay myself at
 your disposition, I beg you to believe, with real tenderness; I pray you
 to consider me from henceforth as the most devoted of your friends.'
 
 'Well, well,' she said, 'here comes your devoted friend the drover.  I'm
 thinking he will be eager for the road; and I will not be easy myself
 till I see you well off the premises, and the dishes washed, before my
 servant-woman wakes.  Praise God, we have gotten one that is a treasure
 at the sleeping!'
 
 The morning was already beginning to be blue in the trees of the garden,
 and to put to shame the candle by which I had breakfasted.  The lady rose
 from table, and I had no choice but to follow her example.  All the time
 I was beating my brains for any means by which I should be able to get a
 word apart with Flora, or find the time to write her a billet.  The
 windows had been open while I breakfasted, I suppose to ventilate the
 room from any traces of my passage there; and, Master Ronald appearing on
 the front lawn, my ogre leaned forth to address him.
 
 'Ronald,' she said, 'wasn't that Sim that went by the wall?'
 
 I snatched my advantage.  Right at her back there was pen, ink, and paper
 laid out.  I wrote: 'I love you'; and before I had time to write more, or
 so much as to blot what I had written, I was again under the guns of the
 gold eyeglasses.
 
 'It's time,' she began; and then, as she observed my occupation, 'Umph!'
 she broke off.  'Ye have something to write?' she demanded.
 
 'Some notes, madam,' said I, bowing with alacrity.
 
 'Notes,' she said; 'or a note?'
 
 'There is doubtless some _finesse_ of the English language that I do not
 comprehend,' said I.
 
 'I'll contrive, however, to make my meaning very plain to ye, Mosha le
 Viscount,' she continued.  'I suppose you desire to be considered a
 gentleman?'
 
 'Can you doubt it, madam?' said I.
 
 'I doubt very much, at least, whether you go to the right way about it,'
 she said.  'You have come here to me, I cannot very well say how; I think
 you will admit you owe me some thanks, if it was only for the breakfast I
 made ye.  But what are you to me?  A waif young man, not so far to seek
 for looks and manners, with some English notes in your pocket and a price
 upon your head.  I am a lady; I have been your hostess, with however
 little will; and I desire that this random acquaintance of yours with my
 family will cease and determine.'
 
 I believe I must have coloured.  'Madam,' said I, 'the notes are of no
 importance; and your least pleasure ought certainly to be my law.  You
 have felt, and you have been pleased to express, a doubt of me.  I tear
 them up.'  Which you may be sure I did thoroughly.
 
 'There's a good lad!' said the dragon, and immediately led the way to the
 front lawn.
 
 The brother and sister were both waiting us here, and, as well as I could
 make out in the imperfect light, bore every appearance of having passed
 through a rather cruel experience.  Ronald seemed ashamed to so much as
 catch my eye in the presence of his aunt, and was the picture of
 embarrassment.  As for Flora, she had scarce the time to cast me one look
 before the dragon took her by the arm, and began to march across the
 garden in the extreme first glimmer of the dawn without exchanging
 speech.  Ronald and I followed in equal silence.
 
 There was a door in that same high wall on the top of which I had sat
 perched no longer gone than yesterday morning.  This the old lady set
 open with a key; and on the other side we were aware of a rough-looking,
 thick-set man, leaning with his arms (through which was passed a
 formidable staff) on a dry-stone dyke.  Him the old lady immediately
 addressed.
 
 'Sim,' said she, 'this is the young gentleman.'
 
 Sim replied with an inarticulate grumble of sound, and a movement of one
 arm and his head, which did duty for a salutation.
 
 'Now, Mr. St. Ives,' said the old lady, 'it's high time for you to be
 taking the road.  But first of all let me give the change of your
 five-guinea bill.  Here are four pounds of it in British Linen notes, and
 the balance in small silver, less sixpence.  Some charge a shilling, I
 believe, but I have given you the benefit of the doubt.  See and guide it
 with all the sense that you possess.'
 
 'And here, Mr. St. Ives,' said Flora, speaking for the first time, 'is a
 plaid which you will find quite necessary on so rough a journey.  I hope
 you will take it from the hands of a Scotch friend,' she added, and her
 voice trembled.
 
 'Genuine holly: I cut it myself,' said Ronald, and gave me as good a
 cudgel as a man could wish for in a row.
 
 The formality of these gifts, and the waiting figure of the driver, told
 me loudly that I must be gone.  I dropped on one knee and bade farewell
 to the aunt, kissing her hand.  I did the like--but with how different a
 passion!--to her niece; as for the boy, I took him to my arms and
 embraced him with a cordiality that seemed to strike him speechless.
 'Farewell!' and 'Farewell!' I said.  'I shall never forget my friends.
 Keep me sometimes in memory.  Farewell!' With that I turned my back and
 began to walk away; and had scarce done so, when I heard the door in the
 high wall close behind me.  Of course this was the aunt's doing; and of
 course, if I know anything of human character, she would not let me go
 without some tart expressions.  I declare, even if I had heard them, I
 should not have minded in the least, for I was quite persuaded that,
 whatever admirers I might be leaving behind me in Swanston Cottage, the
 aunt was not the least sincere.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X--THE DROVERS
 
 
 It took me a little effort to come abreast of my new companion; for
 though he walked with an ugly roll and no great appearance of speed, he
 could cover the around at a good rate when he wanted to.  Each looked at
 the other: I with natural curiosity, he with a great appearance of
 distaste.  I have heard since that his heart was entirely set against me;
 he had seen me kneel to the ladies, and diagnosed me for a 'gesterin'
 eediot.'
 
 'So, ye're for England, are ye?' said he.
 
 I told him yes.
 
 'Weel, there's waur places, I believe,' was his reply; and he relapsed
 into a silence which was not broken during a quarter of an hour of steady
 walking.
 
 This interval brought us to the foot of a bare green valley, which wound
 upwards and backwards among the hills.  A little stream came down the
 midst and made a succession of clear pools; near by the lowest of which I
 was aware of a drove of shaggy cattle, and a man who seemed the very
 counterpart of Mr. Sim making a breakfast upon bread and cheese.  This
 second drover (whose name proved to be Candlish) rose on our approach.
 
 'Here's a mannie that's to gang through with us,' said Sim.  'It was the
 auld wife, Gilchrist, wanted it.'
 
 'Aweel, aweel,' said the other; and presently, remembering his manners,
 and looking on me with a solemn grin, 'A fine day!' says he.
 
 I agreed with him, and asked him how he did.
 
 'Brawly,' was the reply; and without further civilities, the pair
 proceeded to get the cattle under way.  This, as well as almost all the
 herding, was the work of a pair of comely and intelligent dogs, directed
 by Sim or Candlish in little more than monosyllables.  Presently we were
 ascending the side of the mountain by a rude green track, whose presence
 I had not hitherto observed.  A continual sound of munching and the
 crying of a great quantity of moor birds accompanied our progress, which
 the deliberate pace and perennial appetite of the cattle rendered
 wearisomely slow.  In the midst my two conductors marched in a contented
 silence that I could not but admire.  The more I looked at them, the more
 I was impressed by their absurd resemblance to each other.  They were
 dressed in the same coarse homespun, carried similar sticks, were equally
 begrimed about the nose with snuff, and each wound in an identical plaid
 of what is called the shepherd's tartan.  In a back view they might be
 described as indistinguishable; and even from the front they were much
 alike.  An incredible coincidence of humours augmented the impression.
 Thrice and four times I attempted to pave the way for some exchange of
 thought, sentiment, or--at the least of it--human words.  An _Ay_ or an
 _Nhm_ was the sole return, and the topic died on the hill-side without
 echo.  I can never deny that I was chagrined; and when, after a little
 more walking, Sim turned towards me and offered me a ram's horn of snuff,
 with the question 'Do ye use it?' I answered, with some animation,
 'Faith, sir, I would use pepper to introduce a little cordiality.'  But
 even this sally failed to reach, or at least failed to soften, my
 companions.
 
 At this rate we came to the summit of a ridge, and saw the track descend
 in front of us abruptly into a desert vale, about a league in length, and
 closed at the farther end by no less barren hilltops.  Upon this point of
 vantage Sim came to a halt, took off his hat, and mopped his brow.
 
 'Weel,' he said, 'here we're at the top o' Howden.'
 
 'The top o' Howden, sure eneuch,' said Candlish.
 
 'Mr. St. Ivey, are ye dry?' said the first.
 
 'Now, really,' said I, 'is not this Satan reproving sin?'
 
 'What ails ye, man?' said he.  'I'm offerin' ye a dram.'
 
 'Oh, if it be anything to drink,' said I, 'I am as dry as my neighbours.'
 
 Whereupon Sim produced from the corner of his plaid a black bottle, and
 we all drank and pledged each other.  I found these gentlemen followed
 upon such occasions an invariable etiquette, which you may be certain I
 made haste to imitate.  Each wiped his mouth with the back of his left
 hand, held up the bottle in his right, remarked with emphasis, 'Here's to
 ye!' and swallowed as much of the spirit as his fancy prompted.  This
 little ceremony, which was the nearest thing to manners I could perceive
 in either of my companions, was repeated at becoming intervals, generally
 after an ascent.  Occasionally we shared a mouthful of ewe-milk cheese
 and an inglorious form of bread, which I understood (but am far from
 engaging my honour on the point) to be called 'shearer's bannock.'  And
 that may be said to have concluded our whole active intercourse for the
 first day.
 
 I had the more occasion to remark the extraordinarily desolate nature of
 that country, through which the drove road continued, hour after hour and
 even day after day, to wind.  A continual succession of insignificant
 shaggy hills, divided by the course of ten thousand brooks, through which
 we had to wade, or by the side of which we encamped at night; infinite
 perspectives of heather, infinite quantities of moorfowl; here and there,
 by a stream side, small and pretty clumps of willows or the silver birch;
 here and there, the ruins of ancient and inconsiderable fortresses--made
 the unchanging characters of the scene.  Occasionally, but only in the
 distance, we could perceive the smoke of a small town or of an isolated
 farmhouse or cottage on the moors; more often, a flock of sheep and its
 attendant shepherd, or a rude field of agriculture perhaps not yet
 harvested.  With these alleviations, we might almost be said to pass
 through an unbroken desert--sure, one of the most impoverished in Europe;
 and when I recalled to mind that we were yet but a few leagues from the
 chief city (where the law courts sat every day with a press of business,
 soldiers garrisoned the castle, and men of admitted parts were carrying
 on the practice of letters and the investigations of science), it gave me
 a singular view of that poor, barren, and yet illustrious country through
 which I travelled.  Still more, perhaps, did it commend the wisdom of
 Miss Gilchrist in sending me with these uncouth companions and by this
 unfrequented path.
 
 My itinerary is by no means clear to me; the names and distances I never
 clearly knew, and have now wholly forgotten; and this is the more to be
 regretted as there is no doubt that, in the course of those days, I must
 have passed and camped among sites which have been rendered illustrious
 by the pen of Walter Scott.  Nay, more, I am of opinion that I was still
 more favoured by fortune, and have actually met and spoken with that
 inimitable author.  Our encounter was of a tall, stoutish, elderly
 gentleman, a little grizzled, and of a rugged but cheerful and engaging
 countenance.  He sat on a hill pony, wrapped in a plaid over his green
 coat, and was accompanied by a horse-woman, his daughter, a young lady of
 the most charming appearance.  They overtook us on a stretch of heath,
 reined up as they came alongside, and accompanied us for perhaps a
 quarter of an hour before they galloped off again across the hillsides to
 our left.  Great was my amazement to find the unconquerable Mr. Sim thaw
 immediately on the accost of this strange gentleman, who hailed him with
 a ready familiarity, proceeded at once to discuss with him the trade of
 droving and the prices of cattle, and did not disdain to take a pinch
 from the inevitable ram's horn.  Presently I was aware that the
 stranger's eye was directed on myself; and there ensued a conversation,
 some of which I could not help overhearing at the time, and the rest have
 pieced together more or less plausibly from the report of Sim.
 
 'Surely that must be an _amateur drover_ ye have gotten there?' the
 gentleman seems to have asked.
 
 Sim replied, I was a young gentleman that had a reason of his own to
 travel privately.
 
 'Well, well, ye must tell me nothing of that.  I am in the law, you know,
 and _tace_ is the Latin for a candle,' answered the gentleman.  'But I
 hope it's nothing bad.'
 
 Sim told him it was no more than debt.
 
 'Oh, Lord, if that be all!' cried the gentleman; and turning to myself,
 'Well, sir,' he added, 'I understand you are taking a tramp through our
 forest here for the pleasure of the thing?'
 
 'Why, yes, sir,' said I; 'and I must say I am very well entertained.'
 
 'I envy you,' said he.  'I have jogged many miles of it myself when I was
 younger.  My youth lies buried about here under every heather-bush, like
 the soul of the licentiate Lucius.  But you should have a guide.  The
 pleasure of this country is much in the legends, which grow as plentiful
 as blackberries.'  And directing my attention to a little fragment of a
 broken wall no greater than a tombstone, he told me for an example a
 story of its earlier inhabitants.  Years after it chanced that I was one
 day diverting myself with a Waverley Novel, when what should I come upon
 but the identical narrative of my green-coated gentleman upon the moors!
 In a moment the scene, the tones of his voice, his northern accent, and
 the very aspect of the earth and sky and temperature of the weather,
 flashed back into my mind with the reality of dreams.  The unknown in the
 green-coat had been the Great Unknown!  I had met Scott; I had heard a
 story from his lips; I should have been able to write, to claim
 acquaintance, to tell him that his legend still tingled in my ears.  But
 the discovery came too late, and the great man had already succumbed
 under the load of his honours and misfortunes.
 
 Presently, after giving us a cigar apiece, Scott bade us farewell and
 disappeared with his daughter over the hills.  And when I applied to Sim
 for information, his answer of 'The Shirra, man!  A'body kens the
 Shirra!' told me, unfortunately, nothing.
 
 A more considerable adventure falls to be related.  We were now near the
 border.  We had travelled for long upon the track beaten and browsed by a
 million herds, our predecessors, and had seen no vestige of that traffic
 which had created it.  It was early in the morning when we at last
 perceived, drawing near to the drove road, but still at a distance of
 about half a league, a second caravan, similar to but larger than our
 own.  The liveliest excitement was at once exhibited by both my comrades.
 They climbed hillocks, they studied the approaching drove from under
 their hand, they consulted each other with an appearance of alarm that
 seemed to me extraordinary.  I had learned by this time that their
 stand-off manners implied, at least, no active enmity; and I made bold to
 ask them what was wrong.
 
 'Bad yins,' was Sim's emphatic answer.
 
 All day the dogs were kept unsparingly on the alert, and the drove pushed
 forward at a very unusual and seemingly unwelcome speed.  All day Sim and
 Candlish, with a more than ordinary expenditure both of snuff and of
 words, continued to debate the position.  It seems that they had
 recognised two of our neighbours on the road--one Faa, and another by the
 name of Gillies.  Whether there was an old feud between them still
 unsettled I could never learn; but Sim and Candlish were prepared for
 every degree of fraud or violence at their hands.  Candlish repeatedly
 congratulated himself on having left 'the watch at home with the
 mistress'; and Sim perpetually brandished his cudgel, and cursed his
 ill-fortune that it should be sprung.
 
 'I willna care a damn to gie the daashed scoon'rel a fair clout wi' it,'
 he said.  'The daashed thing micht come sindry in ma hand.'
 
 'Well, gentlemen,' said I, 'suppose they do come on, I think we can give
 a very good account of them.'  And I made my piece of holly, Ronald's
 gift, the value of which I now appreciated, sing about my head.
 
 'Ay, man?  Are ye stench?' inquired Sim, with a gleam of approval in his
 wooden countenance.
 
 The same evening, somewhat wearied with our day-long expedition, we
 encamped on a little verdant mound, from the midst of which there welled
 a spring of clear water scarce great enough to wash the hands in.  We had
 made our meal and lain down, but were not yet asleep, when a growl from
 one of the collies set us on the alert.  All three sat up, and on a
 second impulse all lay down again, but now with our cudgels ready.  A man
 must be an alien and an outlaw, an old soldier and a young man in the
 bargain, to take adventure easily.  With no idea as to the rights of the
 quarrel or the probable consequences of the encounter, I was as ready to
 take part with my two drovers, as ever to fall in line on the morning of
 a battle.  Presently there leaped three men out of the heather; we had
 scarce time to get to our feet before we were assailed; and in a moment
 each one of us was engaged with an adversary whom the deepening twilight
 scarce permitted him to see.  How the battle sped in other quarters I am
 in no position to describe.  The rogue that fell to my share was
 exceedingly agile and expert with his weapon; had and held me at a
 disadvantage from the first assault; forced me to give ground
 continually, and at last, in mere self-defence, to let him have the
 point.  It struck him in the throat, and he went down like a ninepin and
 moved no more.
 
 It seemed this was the signal for the engagement to be discontinued.  The
 other combatants separated at once; our foes were suffered, without
 molestation, to lift up and bear away their fallen comrade; so that I
 perceived this sort of war to be not wholly without laws of chivalry, and
 perhaps rather to partake of the character of a tournament than of a
 battle _a outrance_.  There was no doubt, at least, that I was supposed
 to have pushed the affair too seriously.  Our friends the enemy removed
 their wounded companion with undisguised consternation; and they were no
 sooner over the top of the brae, than Sim and Candlish roused up their
 wearied drove and set forth on a night march.
 
 'I'm thinking Faa's unco bad,' said the one.
 
 'Ay,' said the other, 'he lookit dooms gash.'
 
 'He did that,' said the first.
 
 And their weary silence fell upon them again.
 
 Presently Sim turned to me.  'Ye're unco ready with the stick,' said he.
 
 'Too ready, I'm afraid,' said I.  'I am afraid Mr. Faa (if that be his
 name) has got his gruel.'
 
 'Weel, I wouldnae wonder,' replied Sim.
 
 'And what is likely to happen?' I inquired.
 
 'Aweel,' said Sim, snuffing profoundly, 'if I were to offer an opeenion,
 it would not be conscientious.  For the plain fac' is, Mr. St. Ivy, that
 I div not ken.  We have had crackit heids--and rowth of them--ere now;
 and we have had a broken leg or maybe twa; and the like of that we drover
 bodies make a kind of a practice like to keep among oursel's.  But a corp
 we have none of us ever had to deal with, and I could set nae leemit to
 what Gillies micht consider proper in the affair.  Forbye that, he would
 be in raither a hobble himsel', if he was to gang hame wantin' Faa.  Folk
 are awfu' throng with their questions, and parteecularly when they're no
 wantit.'
 
 'That's a fac',' said Candlish.
 
 I considered this prospect ruefully; and then making the best of it,
 'Upon all which accounts,' said I, 'the best will be to get across the
 border and there separate.  If you are troubled, you can very truly put
 the blame upon your late companion; and if I am pursued, I must just try
 to keep out of the way.'
 
 'Mr. St. Ivy,' said Sim, with something resembling enthusiasm, 'no' a
 word mair!  I have met in wi' mony kinds o' gentry ere now; I hae seen o'
 them that was the tae thing, and I hae seen o' them that was the tither;
 but the wale of a gentleman like you I have no sae very frequently seen
 the bate of.'
 
 Our night march was accordingly pursued with unremitting diligence.  The
 stars paled, the east whitened, and we were still, both dogs and men,
 toiling after the wearied cattle.  Again and again Sim and Candlish
 lamented the necessity: it was 'fair ruin on the bestial,' they declared;
 but the thought of a judge and a scaffold hunted them ever forward.  I
 myself was not so much to be pitied.  All that night, and during the
 whole of the little that remained before us of our conjunct journey, I
 enjoyed a new pleasure, the reward of my prowess, in the now loosened
 tongue of Mr. Sim.  Candlish was still obdurately taciturn: it was the
 man's nature; but Sim, having finally appraised and approved me,
 displayed without reticence a rather garrulous habit of mind and a pretty
 talent for narration.  The pair were old and close companions,
 co-existing in these endless moors in a brotherhood of silence such as I
 have heard attributed to the trappers of the west.  It seems absurd to
 mention love in connection with so ugly and snuffy a couple; at least,
 their trust was absolute; and they entertained a surprising admiration
 for each other's qualities; Candlish exclaiming that Sim was 'grand
 company!' and Sim frequently assuring me in an aside that for 'a rale,
 auld, stench bitch, there was nae the bate of Candlish in braid
 Scotland.'  The two dogs appeared to be entirely included in this family
 compact, and I remarked that their exploits and traits of character were
 constantly and minutely observed by the two masters.  Dog stories
 particularly abounded with them; and not only the dogs of the present but
 those of the past contributed their quota.  'But that was naething,' Sim
 would begin: 'there was a herd in Manar, they ca'd him Tweedie--ye'll
 mind Tweedie, Can'lish?'  'Fine, that!' said Candlish.  'Aweel, Tweedie
 had a dog--'  The story I have forgotten; I dare say it was dull, and I
 suspect it was not true; but indeed, my travels with the drove rendered
 me indulgent, and perhaps even credulous, in the matter of dog stories.
 Beautiful, indefatigable beings! as I saw them at the end of a long day's
 journey frisking, barking, bounding, striking attitudes, slanting a bushy
 tail, manifestly playing to the spectator's eye, manifestly rejoicing in
 their grace and beauty--and turned to observe Sim and Candlish
 unornamentally plodding in the rear with the plaids about their bowed
 shoulders and the drop at their snuffy nose--I thought I would rather
 claim kinship with the dogs than with the men!  My sympathy was
 unreturned; in their eyes I was a creature light as air; and they would
 scarce spare me the time for a perfunctory caress or perhaps a hasty lap
 of the wet tongue, ere they were back again in sedulous attendance on
 those dingy deities, their masters--and their masters, as like as not,
 damning their stupidity.
 
 Altogether the last hours of our tramp were infinitely the most agreeable
 to me, and I believe to all of us; and by the time we came to separate,
 there had grown up a certain familiarity and mutual esteem that made the
 parting harder.  It took place about four of the afternoon on a bare
 hillside from which I could see the ribbon of the great north road,
 henceforth to be my conductor.  I asked what was to pay.
 
 'Naething,' replied Sim.
 
 'What in the name of folly is this?' I exclaimed.  'You have led me, you
 have fed me, you have filled me full of whisky, and now you will take
 nothing!'
 
 'Ye see we indentit for that,' replied Sim.
 
  'Indented?' I repeated; 'what does the man mean?'
 
 'Mr. St. Ivy,' said Sim, 'this is a maitter entirely between Candlish and
 me and the auld wife, Gilchrist.  You had naething to say to it; weel, ye
 can have naething to do with it, then.'
 
 'My good man,' said I, 'I can allow myself to be placed in no such
 ridiculous position.  Mrs. Gilchrist is nothing to me, and I refuse to be
 her debtor.'
 
 'I dinna exac'ly see what way ye're gaun to help it,' observed my drover.
 
 'By paying you here and now,' said I.
 
 'There's aye twa to a bargain, Mr. St. Ives,' said he.
 
 'You mean that you will not take it?' said I.
 
 'There or thereabout,' said he.  'Forbye, that it would set ye a heap
 better to keep your siller for them you awe it to.  Ye're young, Mr. St.
 Ivy, and thoughtless; but it's my belief that, wi' care and
 circumspection, ye may yet do credit to yoursel'.  But just you bear this
 in mind: that him that _awes_ siller should never _gie_ siller.'
 
 Well, what was there to say?  I accepted his rebuke, and bidding the pair
 farewell, set off alone upon my southward way.
 
 'Mr. St. Ivy,' was the last word of Sim, 'I was never muckle ta'en up in
 Englishry; but I think that I really ought to say that ye seem to me to
 have the makings of quite a decent lad.'
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI--THE GREAT NORTH ROAD
 
 
 It chanced that as I went down the hill these last words of my friend the
 drover echoed not unfruitfully in my head.  I had never told these men
 the least particulars as to my race or fortune, as it was a part, and the
 best part, of their civility to ask no questions: yet they had dubbed me
 without hesitation English.  Some strangeness in the accent they had
 doubtless thus explained.  And it occurred to me, that if I could pass in
 Scotland for an Englishman, I might be able to reverse the process and
 pass in England for a Scot.  I thought, if I was pushed to it, I could
 make a struggle to imitate the brogue; after my experience with Candlish
 and Sim, I had a rich provision of outlandish words at my command; and I
 felt I could tell the tale of Tweedie's dog so as to deceive a native.
 At the same time, I was afraid my name of St. Ives was scarcely suitable;
 till I remembered there was a town so called in the province of Cornwall,
 thought I might yet be glad to claim it for my place of origin, and
 decided for a Cornish family and a Scots education.  For a trade, as I
 was equally ignorant of all, and as the most innocent might at any moment
 be the means of my exposure, it was best to pretend to none.  And I
 dubbed myself a young gentleman of a sufficient fortune and an idle,
 curious habit of mind, rambling the country at my own charges, in quest
 of health, information, and merry adventures.
 
 At Newcastle, which was the first town I reached, I completed my
 preparations for the part, before going to the inn, by the purchase of a
 knapsack and a pair of leathern gaiters.  My plaid I continued to wear
 from sentiment.  It was warm, useful to sleep in if I were again
 benighted, and I had discovered it to be not unbecoming for a man of
 gallant carriage.  Thus equipped, I supported my character of the
 light-hearted pedestrian not amiss.  Surprise was indeed expressed that I
 should have selected such a season of the year; but I pleaded some delays
 of business, and smilingly claimed to be an eccentric.  The devil was in
 it, I would say, if any season of the year was not good enough for me; I
 was not made of sugar, I was no mollycoddle to be afraid of an ill-aired
 bed or a sprinkle of snow; and I would knock upon the table with my fist
 and call for t'other bottle, like the noisy and free-hearted young
 gentleman I was.  It was my policy (if I may so express myself) to talk
 much and say little.  At the inn tables, the country, the state of the
 roads, the business interest of those who sat down with me, and the
 course of public events, afforded me a considerable field in which I
 might discourse at large and still communicate no information about
 myself.  There was no one with less air of reticence; I plunged into my
 company up to the neck; and I had a long cock-and-bull story of an aunt
 of mine which must have convinced the most suspicious of my innocence.
 'What!' they would have said, 'that young ass to be concealing anything!
 Why, he has deafened me with an aunt of his until my head aches.  He only
 wants you should give him a line, and he would tell you his whole descent
 from Adam downward, and his whole private fortune to the last shilling.'
 A responsible solid fellow was even so much moved by pity for my
 inexperience as to give me a word or two of good advice: that I was but a
 young man after all--I had at this time a deceptive air of youth that
 made me easily pass for one-and-twenty, and was, in the circumstances,
 worth a fortune--that the company at inns was very mingled, that I should
 do well to be more careful, and the like; to all which I made answer that
 I meant no harm myself and expected none from others, or the devil was in
 it.  'You are one of those d---d prudent fellows that I could never abide
 with,' said I.  'You are the kind of man that has a long head.  That's
 all the world, my dear sir: the long-heads and the short-horns!  Now, I
 am a short-horn.'  'I doubt,' says he, 'that you will not go very far
 without getting sheared.'  I offered to bet with him on that, and he made
 off, shaking his head.
 
 But my particular delight was to enlarge on politics and the war.  None
 damned the French like me; none was more bitter against the Americans.
 And when the north-bound mail arrived, crowned with holly, and the
 coachman and guard hoarse with shouting victory, I went even so far as to
 entertain the company to a bowl of punch, which I compounded myself with
 no illiberal hand, and doled out to such sentiments as the following:--
 
 'Our glorious victory on the Nivelle'!  'Lord Wellington, God bless him!
 and may victory ever attend upon his arms!' and, 'Soult, poor devil! and
 may he catch it again to the same tune!'
 
 Never was oratory more applauded to the echo--never any one was more of
 the popular man than I.  I promise you, we made a night of it.  Some of
 the company supported each other, with the assistance of boots, to their
 respective bedchambers, while the rest slept on the field of glory where
 we had left them; and at the breakfast table the next morning there was
 an extraordinary assemblage of red eyes and shaking fists.  I observed
 patriotism to burn much lower by daylight.  Let no one blame me for
 insensibility to the reverses of France!  God knows how my heart raged.
 How I longed to fall on that herd of swine and knock their heads together
 in the moment of their revelry!  But you are to consider my own situation
 and its necessities; also a certain lightheartedness, eminently Gallic,
 which forms a leading trait in my character, and leads me to throw myself
 into new circumstances with the spirit of a schoolboy.  It is possible
 that I sometimes allowed this impish humour to carry me further than good
 taste approves: and I was certainly punished for it once.
 
 This was in the episcopal city of Durham.  We sat down, a considerable
 company, to dinner, most of us fine old vatted English tories of that
 class which is often so enthusiastic as to be inarticulate.  I took and
 held the lead from the beginning; and, the talk having turned on the
 French in the Peninsula, I gave them authentic details (on the authority
 of a cousin of mine, an ensign) of certain cannibal orgies in Galicia, in
 which no less a person than General Caffarelli had taken a part.  I
 always disliked that commander, who once ordered me under arrest for
 insubordination; and it is possible that a spice of vengeance added to
 the rigour of my picture.  I have forgotten the details; no doubt they
 were high-coloured.  No doubt I rejoiced to fool these jolter-heads; and
 no doubt the sense of security that I drank from their dull, gasping
 faces encouraged me to proceed extremely far.  And for my sins, there was
 one silent little man at table who took my story at the true value.  It
 was from no sense of humour, to which he was quite dead.  It was from no
 particular intelligence, for he had not any.  The bond of sympathy, of
 all things in the world, had rendered him clairvoyant.
 
 Dinner was no sooner done than I strolled forth into the streets with
 some design of viewing the cathedral; and the little man was silently at
 my heels.  A few doors from the inn, in a dark place of the street, I was
 aware of a touch on my arm, turned suddenly, and found him looking up at
 me with eyes pathetically bright.
 
 'I beg your pardon, sir; but that story of yours was particularly rich.
 He--he!  Particularly racy,' said he.  'I tell you, sir, I took you
 wholly!  I _smoked_ you!  I believe you and I, sir, if we had a chance to
 talk, would find we had a good many opinions in common.  Here is the
 "Blue Bell," a very comfortable place.  They draw good ale, sir.  Would
 you be so condescending as to share a pot with me?'
 
 There was something so ambiguous and secret in the little man's perpetual
 signalling, that I confess my curiosity was much aroused.  Blaming
 myself, even as I did so, for the indiscretion, I embraced his proposal,
 and we were soon face to face over a tankard of mulled ale.  He lowered
 his voice to the least attenuation of a whisper.
 
 'Here, sir,' said he, 'is to the Great Man.  I think you take me?  No?'
 He leaned forward till our noses touched.  'Here is to the Emperor!' said
 he.
 
 I was extremely embarrassed, and, in spite of the creature's innocent
 appearance, more than half alarmed.  I thought him too ingenious, and,
 indeed, too daring for a spy.  Yet if he were honest he must be a man of
 extraordinary indiscretion, and therefore very unfit to be encouraged by
 an escaped prisoner.  I took a half course, accordingly--accepted his
 toast in silence, and drank it without enthusiasm.
 
 He proceeded to abound in the praises of Napoleon, such as I had never
 heard in France, or at least only on the lips of officials paid to offer
 them.
 
 'And this Caffarelli, now,' he pursued: 'he is a splendid fellow, too, is
 he not?  I have not heard vastly much of him myself.  No details, sir--no
 details!  We labour under huge difficulties here as to unbiassed
 information.'
 
 'I believe I have heard the same complaint in other countries,' I could
 not help remarking.  'But as to Caffarelli, he is neither lame nor blind,
 he has two legs and a nose in the middle of his face.  And I care as much
 about him as you care for the dead body of Mr. Perceval!'
 
 He studied me with glowing eyes.
 
 'You cannot deceive me!' he cried.  'You have served under him.  You are
 a Frenchman!  I hold by the hand, at last, one of that noble race, the
 pioneers of the glorious principles of liberty and brotherhood.  Hush!
 No, it is all right.  I thought there had been somebody at the door.  In
 this wretched, enslaved country we dare not even call our souls our own.
 The spy and the hangman, sir--the spy and the hangman!  And yet there is
 a candle burning, too.  The good leaven is working, sir--working
 underneath.  Even in this town there are a few brave spirits, who meet
 every Wednesday.  You must stay over a day or so, and join us.  We do not
 use this house.  Another, and a quieter.  They draw fine ale,
 however--fair, mild ale.  You will find yourself among friends, among
 brothers.  You will hear some very daring sentiments expressed!' he
 cried, expanding his small chest.  'Monarchy, Christianity--all the
 trappings of a bloated past--the Free Confraternity of Durham and
 Tyneside deride.'
 
 Here was a devil of a prospect for a gentleman whose whole design was to
 avoid observation!  The Free Confraternity had no charms for me; daring
 sentiments were no part of my baggage; and I tried, instead, a little
 cold water.
 
 'You seem to forget, sir, that my Emperor has re-established
 Christianity,' I observed.
 
 'Ah, sir, but that was policy!' he exclaimed.  'You do not understand
 Napoleon.  I have followed his whole career.  I can explain his policy
 from first to last.  Now for instance in the Peninsula, on which you were
 so very amusing, if you will come to a friend's house who has a map of
 Spain, I can make the whole course of the war quite clear to you, I
 venture to say, in half an hour.'
 
 This was intolerable.  Of the two extremes, I found I preferred the
 British tory; and, making an appointment for the morrow, I pleaded sudden
 headache, escaped to the inn, packed my knapsack, and fled, about nine at
 night, from this accursed neighbourhood.  It was cold, starry, and clear,
 and the road dry, with a touch of frost.  For all that, I had not the
 smallest intention to make a long stage of it; and about ten o'clock,
 spying on the right-hand side of the way the lighted windows of an
 alehouse, I determined to bait there for the night.
 
 It was against my principle, which was to frequent only the dearest inns;
 and the misadventure that befell me was sufficient to make me more
 particular in the future.  A large company was assembled in the parlour,
 which was heavy with clouds of tobacco smoke, and brightly lighted up by
 a roaring fire of coal.  Hard by the chimney stood a vacant chair in what
 I thought an enviable situation, whether for warmth or the pleasure of
 society; and I was about to take it, when the nearest of the company
 stopped me with his hand.
 
 'Beg thy pardon, sir,' said he; 'but that there chair belongs to a
 British soldier.'
 
 A chorus of voices enforced and explained.  It was one of Lord
 Wellington's heroes.  He had been wounded under Rowland Hill.  He was
 Colbourne's right-hand man.  In short, this favoured individual appeared
 to have served with every separate corps, and under every individual
 general in the Peninsula.  Of course I apologised.  I had not known.  The
 devil was in it if a soldier had not a right to the best in England.  And
 with that sentiment, which was loudly applauded, I found a corner of a
 bench, and awaited, with some hopes of entertainment, the return of the
 hero.  He proved, of course, to be a private soldier.  I say of course,
 because no officer could possibly enjoy such heights of popularity.  He
 had been wounded before San Sebastian, and still wore his arm in a sling.
 What was a great deal worse for him, every member of the company had been
 plying him with drink.  His honest yokel's countenance blazed as if with
 fever, his eyes were glazed and looked the two ways, and his feet
 stumbled as, amidst a murmur of applause, he returned to the midst of his
 admirers.
 
 Two minutes afterwards I was again posting in the dark along the highway;
 to explain which sudden movement of retreat I must trouble the reader
 with a reminiscence of my services.
 
 I lay one night with the out-pickets in Castile.  We were in close touch
 with the enemy; the usual orders had been issued against smoking, fires,
 and talk, and both armies lay as quiet as mice, when I saw the English
 sentinel opposite making a signal by holding up his musket.  I repeated
 it, and we both crept together in the dry bed of a stream, which made the
 demarcation of the armies.  It was wine he wanted, of which we had a good
 provision, and the English had quite run out.  He gave me the money, and
 I, as was the custom, left him my firelock in pledge, and set off for the
 canteen.  When I returned with a skin of wine, behold, it had pleased
 some uneasy devil of an English officer to withdraw the outposts!  Here
 was a situation with a vengeance, and I looked for nothing but ridicule
 in the present and punishment in the future.  Doubtless our officers
 winked pretty hard at this interchange of courtesies, but doubtless it
 would be impossible to wink at so gross a fault, or rather so pitiable a
 misadventure as mine; and you are to conceive me wandering in the plains
 of Castile, benighted, charged with a wine-skin for which I had no use,
 and with no knowledge whatever of the whereabouts of my musket, beyond
 that it was somewhere in my Lord Wellington's army.  But my Englishman
 was either a very honest fellow, or else extremely thirsty, and at last
 contrived to advertise me of his new position.  Now, the English sentry
 in Castile, and the wounded hero in the Durham public-house, were one and
 the same person; and if he had been a little less drunk, or myself less
 lively in getting away, the travels of M. St. Ives might have come to an
 untimely end.
 
 I suppose this woke me up; it stirred in me besides a spirit of
 opposition, and in spite of cold, darkness, the highwaymen and the
 footpads, I determined to walk right on till breakfast-time: a happy
 resolution, which enabled me to observe one of those traits of manners
 which at once depict a country and condemn it.  It was near midnight when
 I saw, a great way ahead of me, the light of many torches; presently
 after, the sound of wheels reached me, and the slow tread of feet, and
 soon I had joined myself to the rear of a sordid, silent, and lugubrious
 procession, such as we see in dreams.  Close on a hundred persons marched
 by torchlight in unbroken silence; in their midst a cart, and in the
 cart, on an inclined platform, the dead body of a man--the centre-piece
 of this solemnity, the hero whose obsequies we were come forth at this
 unusual hour to celebrate.  It was but a plain, dingy old fellow of fifty
 or sixty, his throat cut, his shirt turned over as though to show the
 wound.  Blue trousers and brown socks completed his attire, if we can
 talk so of the dead.  He had a horrid look of a waxwork.  In the tossing
 of the lights he seemed to make faces and mouths at us, to frown, and to
 be at times upon the point of speech.  The cart, with this shabby and
 tragic freight, and surrounded by its silent escort and bright torches,
 continued for some distance to creak along the high-road, and I to follow
 it in amazement, which was soon exchanged for horror.  At the corner of a
 lane the procession stopped, and, as the torches ranged themselves along
 the hedgerow-side, I became aware of a grave dug in the midst of the
 thoroughfare, and a provision of quicklime piled in the ditch.  The cart
 was backed to the margin, the body slung off the platform and dumped into
 the grave with an irreverent roughness.  A sharpened stake had hitherto
 served it for a pillow.  It was now withdrawn, held in its place by
 several volunteers, and a fellow with a heavy mallet (the sound of which
 still haunts me at night) drove it home through the bosom of the corpse.
 The hole was filled with quicklime, and the bystanders, as if relieved of
 some oppression, broke at once into a sound of whispered speech.
 
 My shirt stuck to me, my heart had almost ceased beating, and I found my
 tongue with difficulty.
 
 'I beg your pardon,' I gasped to a neighbour, 'what is this? what has he
 done? is it allowed?'
 
 'Why, where do you come from?' replied the man.
 
 'I am a traveller, sir,' said I, 'and a total stranger in this part of
 the country.  I had lost my way when I saw your torches, and came by
 chance on this--this incredible scene.  Who was the man?'
 
 'A suicide,' said he.  'Ay, he was a bad one, was Johnnie Green.'
 
 It appeared this was a wretch who had committed many barbarous murders,
 and being at last upon the point of discovery fell of his own hand.  And
 the nightmare at the crossroads was the regular punishment, according to
 the laws of England, for an act which the Romans honoured as a virtue!
 Whenever an Englishman begins to prate of civilisation (as, indeed, it's
 a defect they are rather prone to), I hear the measured blows of a
 mallet, see the bystanders crowd with torches about the grave, smile a
 little to myself in conscious superiority--and take a thimbleful of
 brandy for the stomach's sake.
 
 I believe it must have been at my next stage, for I remember going to bed
 extremely early, that I came to the model of a good old-fashioned English
 inn, and was attended on by the picture of a pretty chambermaid.  We had
 a good many pleasant passages as she waited table or warmed my bed for me
 with a devil of a brass warming pan, fully larger than herself; and as
 she was no less pert than she was pretty, she may be said to have given
 rather better than she took.  I cannot tell why (unless it were for the
 sake of her saucy eyes), but I made her my confidante, told her I was
 attached to a young lady in Scotland, and received the encouragement of
 her sympathy, mingled and connected with a fair amount of rustic wit.
 While I slept the down-mail stopped for supper; it chanced that one of
 the passengers left behind a copy of the _Edinburgh Courant_, and the
 next morning my pretty chambermaid set the paper before me at breakfast,
 with the remark that there was some news from my lady-love.  I took it
 eagerly, hoping to find some further word of our escape, in which I was
 disappointed; and I was about to lay it down, when my eye fell on a
 paragraph immediately concerning me.  Faa was in hospital, grievously
 sick, and warrants were out for the arrest of Sim and Candlish.  These
 two men had shown themselves very loyal to me.  This trouble emerging,
 the least I could do was to be guided by a similar loyalty to them.
 Suppose my visit to my uncle crowned with some success, and my finances
 re-established, I determined I should immediately return to Edinburgh,
 put their case in the hands of a good lawyer, and await events.  So my
 mind was very lightly made up to what proved a mighty serious matter.
 Candlish and Sim were all very well in their way, and I do sincerely
 trust I should have been at some pains to help them, had there been
 nothing else.  But in truth my heart and my eyes were set on quite
 another matter, and I received the news of their tribulation almost with
 joy.  That is never a bad wind that blows where we want to go, and you
 may be sure there was nothing unwelcome in a circumstance that carried me
 back to Edinburgh and Flora.  From that hour I began to indulge myself
 with the making of imaginary scenes and interviews, in which I confounded
 the aunt, flattered Ronald, and now in the witty, now in the sentimental
 manner, declared my love and received the assurance of its return.  By
 means of this exercise my resolution daily grew stronger, until at last I
 had piled together such a mass of obstinacy as it would have taken a
 cataclysm of nature to subvert.
 
 'Yes,' said I to the chambermaid, 'here is news of my lady-love indeed,
 and very good news too.'
 
 All that day, in the teeth of a keen winter wind, I hugged myself in my
 plaid, and it was as though her arms were flung around me.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII--I FOLLOW A COVERED CART NEARLY TO MY DESTINATION
 
 
 At last I began to draw near, by reasonable stages, to the neighbourhood
 of Wakefield; and the name of Mr. Burchell Fenn came to the top in my
 memory.  This was the gentleman (the reader may remember) who made a
 trade of forwarding the escape of French prisoners.  How he did so:
 whether he had a sign-board, _Escapes forwarded_, _apply within_; what he
 charged for his services, or whether they were gratuitous and charitable,
 were all matters of which I was at once ignorant and extremely curious.
 Thanks to my proficiency in English, and Mr. Romaine's bank-notes, I was
 getting on swimmingly without him; but the trouble was that I could not
 be easy till I had come to the bottom of these mysteries, and it was my
 difficulty that I knew nothing of him beyond the name.  I knew not his
 trade beyond that of Forwarder of Escapes--whether he lived in town or
 country, whether he were rich or poor, nor by what kind of address I was
 to gain his confidence.  It would have a very bad appearance to go along
 the highwayside asking after a man of whom I could give so scanty an
 account; and I should look like a fool, indeed, if I were to present
 myself at his door and find the police in occupation!  The interest of
 the conundrum, however, tempted me, and I turned aside from my direct
 road to pass by Wakefield; kept my ears pricked, as I went, for any
 mention of his name, and relied for the rest on my good fortune.  If Luck
 (who must certainly be feminine) favoured me as far as to throw me in the
 man's way, I should owe the lady a candle; if not, I could very readily
 console myself.  In this experimental humour, and with so little to help
 me, it was a miracle that I should have brought my enterprise to a good
 end; and there are several saints in the calendar who might be happy to
 exchange with St. Ives!
 
 I had slept that night in a good inn at Wakefield, made my breakfast by
 candle-light with the passengers of an up-coach, and set off in a very
 ill temper with myself and my surroundings.  It was still early; the air
 raw and cold; the sun low, and soon to disappear under a vast canopy of
 rain-clouds that had begun to assemble in the north-west, and from that
 quarter invaded the whole width of the heaven.  Already the rain fell in
 crystal rods; already the whole face of the country sounded with the
 discharge of drains and ditches; and I looked forward to a day of
 downpour and the hell of wet clothes, in which particular I am as dainty
 as a cat.  At a corner of the road, and by the last glint of the drowning
 sun, I spied a covered cart, of a kind that I thought I had never seen
 before, preceding me at the foot's pace of jaded horses.  Anything is
 interesting to a pedestrian that can help him to forget the miseries of a
 day of rain; and I bettered my pace and gradually overtook the vehicle.
 
 The nearer I came, the more it puzzled me.  It was much such a cart as I
 am told the calico printers use, mounted on two wheels, and furnished
 with a seat in front for the driver.  The interior closed with a door,
 and was of a bigness to contain a good load of calico, or (at a pinch and
 if it were necessary) four or five persons.  But, indeed, if human beings
 were meant to travel there, they had my pity!  They must travel in the
 dark, for there was no sign of a window; and they would be shaken all the
 way like a phial of doctor's stuff, for the cart was not only ungainly to
 look at--it was besides very imperfectly balanced on the one pair of
 wheels, and pitched unconscionably.  Altogether, if I had any glancing
 idea that the cart was really a carriage, I had soon dismissed it; but I
 was still inquisitive as to what it should contain, and where it had come
 from.  Wheels and horses were splashed with many different colours of
 mud, as though they had come far and across a considerable diversity of
 country.  The driver continually and vainly plied his whip.  It seemed to
 follow they had made a long, perhaps an all-night, stage; and that the
 driver, at that early hour of a little after eight in the morning,
 already felt himself belated.  I looked for the name of the proprietor on
 the shaft, and started outright.  Fortune had favoured the careless: it
 was Burchell Fenn!
 
 'A wet morning, my man,' said I.
 
 The driver, a loutish fellow, shock-headed and turnip-faced, returned not
 a word to my salutation, but savagely flogged his horses.  The tired
 animals, who could scarce put the one foot before the other, paid no
 attention to his cruelty; and I continued without effort to maintain my
 position alongside, smiling to myself at the futility of his attempts,
 and at the same time pricked with curiosity as to why he made them.  I
 made no such formidable a figure as that a man should flee when I
 accosted him; and my conscience not being entirely clear, I was more
 accustomed to be uneasy myself than to see others timid.  Presently he
 desisted, and put back his whip in the holster with the air of a man
 vanquished.
 
 'So you would run away from me?' said I.  'Come, come, that's not
 English.'
 
 'Beg pardon, master: no offence meant,' he said, touching his hat.
 
 'And none taken!' cried I.  'All I desire is a little gaiety by the way.'
 
 I understood him to say he didn't 'take with gaiety.'
 
 'Then I will try you with something else,' said I.  'Oh, I can be all
 things to all men, like the apostle!  I dare to say I have travelled with
 heavier fellows than you in my time, and done famously well with them.
 Are you going home?'
 
 'Yes, I'm a goin' home, I am,' he said.
 
 'A very fortunate circumstance for me!' said I.  'At this rate we shall
 see a good deal of each other, going the same way; and, now I come to
 think of it, why should you not give me a cast?  There is room beside you
 on the bench.'
 
 With a sudden snatch, he carried the cart two yards into the roadway.
 The horses plunged and came to a stop.  'No, you don't!' he said,
 menacing me with the whip.  'None o' that with me.'
 
 'None of what?' said I.  'I asked you for a lift, but I have no idea of
 taking one by force.'
 
 'Well, I've got to take care of the cart and 'orses, I have,' says he.
 'I don't take up with no runagate vagabones, you see, else.'
 
 'I ought to thank you for your touching confidence,' said I, approaching
 carelessly nearer as I spoke.  'But I admit the road is solitary
 hereabouts, and no doubt an accident soon happens.  Little fear of
 anything of the kind with you!  I like you for it, like your prudence,
 like that pastoral shyness of disposition.  But why not put it out of my
 power to hurt?  Why not open the door and bestow me here in the box, or
 whatever you please to call it?' And I laid my hand demonstratively on
 the body of the cart.
 
 He had been timorous before; but at this, he seemed to lose the power of
 speech a moment, and stared at me in a perfect enthusiasm of fear.
 
 'Why not?' I continued.  'The idea is good.  I should be safe in there if
 I were the monster Williams himself.  The great thing is to have me under
 lock and key.  For it does lock; it is locked now,' said I, trying the
 door.  '_A propos_, what have you for a cargo?  It must be precious.'
 
 He found not a word to answer.
 
 Rat-tat-tat, I went upon the door like a well-drilled footman.
 
 'Any one at home?' I said, and stooped to listen.
 
 There came out of the interior a stifled sneeze, the first of an
 uncontrollable paroxysm; another followed immediately on the heels of it;
 and then the driver turned with an oath, laid the lash upon the horses
 with so much energy that they found their heels again, and the whole
 equipage fled down the road at a gallop.
 
 At the first sound of the sneeze, I had started back like a man shot.
 The next moment, a great light broke on my mind, and I understood.  Here
 was the secret of Fenn's trade: this was how he forwarded the escape of
 prisoners, hawking them by night about the country in his covered cart.
 There had been Frenchmen close to me; he who had just sneezed was my
 countryman, my comrade, perhaps already my friend!  I took to my heels in
 pursuit.  'Hold hard!' I shouted.  'Stop!  It's all right!  Stop!'  But
 the driver only turned a white face on me for a moment, and redoubled his
 efforts, bending forward, plying his whip and crying to his horses; these
 lay themselves down to the gallop and beat the highway with flying hoofs;
 and the cart bounded after them among the ruts and fled in a halo of rain
 and spattering mud.  But a minute since, and it had been trundling along
 like a lame cow; and now it was off as though drawn by Apollo's coursers.
 There is no telling what a man can do, until you frighten him!
 
 It was as much as I could do myself, though I ran valiantly, to maintain
 my distance; and that (since I knew my countrymen so near) was become a
 chief point with me.  A hundred yards farther on the cart whipped out of
 the high-road into a lane embowered with leafless trees, and became lost
 to view.  When I saw it next, the driver had increased his advantage
 considerably, but all danger was at an end, and the horses had again
 declined into a hobbling walk.  Persuaded that they could not escape me,
 I took my time, and recovered my breath as I followed them.
 
 Presently the lane twisted at right angles, and showed me a gate and the
 beginning of a gravel sweep; and a little after, as I continued to
 advance, a red brick house about seventy years old, in a fine style of
 architecture, and presenting a front of many windows to a lawn and
 garden.  Behind, I could see outhouses and the peaked roofs of stacks;
 and I judged that a manor-house had in some way declined to be the
 residence of a tenant-farmer, careless alike of appearances and
 substantial comfort.  The marks of neglect were visible on every side, in
 flower-bushes straggling beyond the borders, in the ill-kept turf, and in
 the broken windows that were incongruously patched with paper or stuffed
 with rags.  A thicket of trees, mostly evergreen, fenced the place round
 and secluded it from the eyes of prying neighbours.  As I came in view of
 it, on that melancholy winter's morning, in the deluge of the falling
 rain, and with the wind that now rose in occasional gusts and hooted over
 the old chimneys, the cart had already drawn up at the front-door steps,
 and the driver was already in earnest discourse with Mr. Burchell Fenn.
 He was standing with his hands behind his back--a man of a gross,
 misbegotten face and body, dewlapped like a bull and red as a harvest
 moon; and in his jockey cap, blue coat and top boots, he had much the air
 of a good, solid tenant-farmer.
 
 The pair continued to speak as I came up the approach, but received me at
 last in a sort of goggling silence.  I had my hat in my hand.
 
 'I have the pleasure of addressing Mr. Burchell Fenn?' said I.
 
 'The same, sir,' replied Mr. Fenn, taking off his jockey cap in answer to
 my civility, but with the distant look and the tardy movements of one who
 continues to think of something else.  'And who may you be?' he asked.
 
 'I shall tell you afterwards,' said I.  'Suffice it, in the meantime,
 that I come on business.'
 
 He seemed to digest my answer laboriously, his mouth gaping, his little
 eyes never straying from my face.
 
 'Suffer me to point out to you, sir,' I resumed, 'that this is a devil of
 a wet morning; and that the chimney corner, and possibly a glass of
 something hot, are clearly indicated.'
 
 Indeed, the rain was now grown to be a deluge; the gutters of the house
 roared; the air was filled with the continuous, strident crash.  The
 stolidity of his face, on which the rain streamed, was far from
 reassuring me.  On the contrary, I was aware of a distinct qualm of
 apprehension, which was not at all lessened by a view of the driver,
 craning from his perch to observe us with the expression of a fascinated
 bird.  So we stood silent, when the prisoner again began to sneeze from
 the body of the cart; and at the sound, prompt as a transformation, the
 driver had whipped up his horses and was shambling off round the corner
 of the house, and Mr. Fenn, recovering his wits with a gulp, had turned
 to the door behind him.
 
 'Come in, come in, sir,' he said.  'I beg your pardon, sir; the lock goes
 a trifle hard.'
 
 Indeed, it took him a surprising time to open the door, which was not
 only locked on the outside, but the lock seemed rebellious from disuse;
 and when at last he stood back and motioned me to enter before him, I was
 greeted on the threshold by that peculiar and convincing sound of the
 rain echoing over empty chambers.  The entrance-hall, in which I now
 found myself, was of a good size and good proportions; potted plants
 occupied the corners; the paved floor was soiled with muddy footprints
 and encumbered with straw; on a mahogany hall-table, which was the only
 furniture, a candle had been stuck and suffered to burn down--plainly a
 long while ago, for the gutterings were green with mould.  My mind, under
 these new impressions, worked with unusual vivacity.  I was here shut off
 with Fenn and his hireling in a deserted house, a neglected garden, and a
 wood of evergreens: the most eligible theatre for a deed of darkness.
 There came to me a vision of two flagstones raised in the hall-floor, and
 the driver putting in the rainy afternoon over my grave, and the prospect
 displeased me extremely.  I felt I had carried my pleasantry as far as
 was safe; I must lose no time in declaring my true character, and I was
 even choosing the words in which I was to begin, when the hall-door was
 slammed-to behind me with a bang, and I turned, dropping my stick as I
 did so, in time--and not any more than time--to save my life.
 
 The surprise of the onslaught and the huge weight of my assailant gave
 him the advantage.  He had a pistol in his right hand of a portentous
 size, which it took me all my strength to keep deflected.  With his left
 arm he strained me to his bosom, so that I thought I must be crushed or
 stifled.  His mouth was open, his face crimson, and he panted aloud with
 hard animal sounds.  The affair was as brief as it was hot and sudden.
 The potations which had swelled and bloated his carcase had already
 weakened the springs of energy.  One more huge effort, that came near to
 overpower me, and in which the pistol happily exploded, and I felt his
 grasp slacken and weakness come on his joints; his legs succumbed under
 his weight, and he grovelled on his knees on the stone floor.  'Spare
 me!' he gasped.
 
 I had not only been abominably frightened; I was shocked besides: my
 delicacy was in arms, like a lady to whom violence should have been
 offered by a similar monster.  I plucked myself from his horrid contact,
 I snatched the pistol--even discharged, it was a formidable weapon--and
 menaced him with the butt.  'Spare you!' I cried, 'you beast!'
 
 His voice died in his fat inwards, but his lips still vehemently framed
 the same words of supplication.  My anger began to pass off, but not all
 my repugnance; the picture he made revolted me, and I was impatient to be
 spared the further view of it.
 
 'Here,' said I, 'stop this performance: it sickens me.  I am not going to
 kill you, do you hear?  I have need of you.'
 
 A look of relief, that I could almost have called beautiful, dawned on
 his countenance.  'Anything--anything you wish,' said he.
 
 Anything is a big word, and his use of it brought me for a moment to a
 stand.  'Why, what do you mean?' I asked.  'Do you mean that you will
 blow the gaff on the whole business?'
 
 He answered me Yes with eager asseverations.
 
 'I know Monsieur de Saint-Yves is in it; it was through his papers we
 traced you,' I said.  'Do you consent to make a clean breast of the
 others?'
 
 'I do--I will!' he cried.  'The 'ole crew of 'em; there's good names
 among 'em.  I'll be king's evidence.'
 
 'So that all shall hang except yourself?  You damned villain!' I broke
 out.  'Understand at once that I am no spy or thief-taker.  I am a
 kinsman of Monsieur de St. Yves--here in his interest.  Upon my word, you
 have put your foot in it prettily, Mr. Burchell Fenn!  Come, stand up;
 don't grovel there.  Stand up, you lump of iniquity!'
 
 He scrambled to his feet.  He was utterly unmanned, or it might have gone
 hard with me yet; and I considered him hesitating, as, indeed, there was
 cause.  The man was a double-dyed traitor: he had tried to murder me, and
 I had first baffled his endeavours and then exposed and insulted him.
 Was it wise to place myself any longer at his mercy?  With his help I
 should doubtless travel more quickly; doubtless also far less agreeably;
 and there was everything to show that it would be at a greater risk.  In
 short, I should have washed my hands of him on the spot, but for the
 temptation of the French officers, whom I knew to be so near, and for
 whose society I felt so great and natural an impatience.  If I was to see
 anything of my countrymen, it was clear I had first of all to make my
 peace with Mr. Fenn; and that was no easy matter.  To make friends with
 any one implies concessions on both sides; and what could I concede?
 What could I say of him, but that he had proved himself a villain and a
 fool, and the worse man?
 
 'Well,' said I, 'here has been rather a poor piece of business, which I
 dare say you can have no pleasure in calling to mind; and, to say truth,
 I would as readily forget it myself.  Suppose we try.  Take back your
 pistol, which smells very ill; put it in your pocket or wherever you had
 it concealed.  There!  Now let us meet for the first time.--Give you good
 morning, Mr. Fenn!  I hope you do very well.  I come on the
 recommendation of my kinsman, the Vicomte de St. Yves.'
 
 'Do you mean it?' he cried.  'Do you mean you will pass over our little
 scrimmage?'
 
 'Why, certainly!' said I.  'It shows you are a bold fellow, who may be
 trusted to forget the business when it comes to the point.  There is
 nothing against you in the little scrimmage, unless that your courage is
 greater than your strength.  You are not so young as you once were, that
 is all.'
 
 'And I beg of you, sir, don't betray me to the Vis-count,' he pleaded.
 'I'll not deny but what my 'eart failed me a trifle; but it was only a
 word, sir, what anybody might have said in the 'eat of the moment, and
 over with it.'
 
 'Certainly,' said I.  'That is quite my own opinion.'
 
 'The way I came to be anxious about the Vis-count,' he continued, 'is
 that I believe he might be induced to form an 'asty judgment.  And the
 business, in a pecuniary point of view, is all that I could ask; only
 trying, sir--very trying.  It's making an old man of me before my time.
 You might have observed yourself, sir, that I 'aven't got the knees I
 once 'ad.  The knees and the breathing, there's where it takes me.  But
 I'm very sure, sir, I address a gentleman as would be the last to make
 trouble between friends.'
 
 'I am sure you do me no more than justice,' said I; 'and I shall think it
 quite unnecessary to dwell on any of these passing circumstances in my
 report to the Vicomte.'
 
 'Which you do favour him (if you'll excuse me being so bold as to mention
 it) exac'ly!' said he.  'I should have known you anywheres.  May I offer
 you a pot of 'ome-brewed ale, sir?  By your leave!  This way, if you
 please.  I am 'eartily grateful--'eartily pleased to be of any service to
 a gentleman like you, sir, which is related to the Vis-count, and really
 a fambly of which you might well be proud!  Take care of the step, sir.
 You have good news of 'is 'ealth, I trust? as well as that of Monseer the
 Count?'
 
 God forgive me! the horrible fellow was still puffing and panting with
 the fury of his assault, and already he had fallen into an obsequious,
 wheedling familiarity like that of an old servant,--already he was
 flattering me on my family connections!
 
 I followed him through the house into the stable-yard, where I observed
 the driver washing the cart in a shed.  He must have heard the explosion
 of the pistol.  He could not choose but hear it: the thing was shaped
 like a little blunderbuss, charged to the mouth, and made a report like a
 piece of field artillery.  He had heard, he had paid no attention; and
 now, as we came forth by the back-door, he raised for a moment a pale and
 tell-tale face that was as direct as a confession.  The rascal had
 expected to see Fenn come forth alone; he was waiting to be called on for
 that part of sexton, which I had already allotted to him in fancy.
 
 I need not detain the reader very long with any description of my visit
 to the back-kitchen; of how we mulled our ale there, and mulled it very
 well; nor of how we sat talking, Fenn like an old, faithful, affectionate
 dependant, and I--well!  I myself fallen into a mere admiration of so
 much impudence, that transcended words, and had very soon conquered
 animosity.  I took a fancy to the man, he was so vast a humbug.  I began
 to see a kind of beauty in him, his _aplomb_ was so majestic.  I never
 knew a rogue to cut so fat; his villainy was ample, like his belly, and I
 could scarce find it in my heart to hold him responsible for either.  He
 was good enough to drop into the autobiographical; telling me how the
 farm, in spite of the war and the high prices, had proved a
 disappointment; how there was 'a sight of cold, wet land as you come
 along the 'igh-road'; how the winds and rains and the seasons had been
 misdirected, it seemed 'o' purpose'; how Mrs. Fenn had died--'I lost her
 coming two year agone; a remarkable fine woman, my old girl, sir! if
 you'll excuse me,' he added, with a burst of humility.  In short, he gave
 me an opportunity of studying John Bull, as I may say, stuffed naked--his
 greed, his usuriousness, his hypocrisy, his perfidy of the back-stairs,
 all swelled to the superlative--such as was well worth the little
 disarray and fluster of our passage in the hall.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII--I MEET TWO OF MY COUNTRYMEN
 
 
 As soon as I judged it safe, and that was not before Burchell Fenn had
 talked himself back into his breath and a complete good humour, I
 proposed he should introduce me to the French officers, henceforth to
 become my fellow-passengers.  There were two of them, it appeared, and my
 heart beat as I approached the door.  The specimen of Perfidious Albion
 whom I had just been studying gave me the stronger zest for my
 fellow-countrymen.  I could have embraced them; I could have wept on
 their necks.  And all the time I was going to a disappointment.
 
 It was in a spacious and low room, with an outlook on the court, that I
 found them bestowed.  In the good days of that house the apartment had
 probably served as a library, for there were traces of shelves along the
 wainscot.  Four or five mattresses lay on the floor in a corner, with a
 frowsy heap of bedding; near by was a basin and a cube of soap; a rude
 kitchen-table and some deal chairs stood together at the far end; and the
 room was illuminated by no less than four windows, and warmed by a
 little, crazy, sidelong grate, propped up with bricks in the vent of a
 hospitable chimney, in which a pile of coals smoked prodigiously and gave
 out a few starveling flames.  An old, frail, white-haired officer sat in
 one of the chairs, which he had drawn close to this apology for a fire.
 He was wrapped in a camlet cloak, of which the collar was turned up, his
 knees touched the bars, his hands were spread in the very smoke, and yet
 he shivered for cold.  The second--a big, florid, fine animal of a man,
 whose every gesture labelled him the cock of the walk and the admiration
 of the ladies--had apparently despaired of the fire, and now strode up
 and down, sneezing hard, bitterly blowing his nose, and proffering a
 continual stream of bluster, complaint, and barrack-room oaths.
 
 Fenn showed me in with the brief form of introduction: 'Gentlemen all,
 this here's another fare!' and was gone again at once.  The old man gave
 me but the one glance out of lack-lustre eyes; and even as he looked a
 shiver took him as sharp as a hiccough.  But the other, who represented
 to admiration the picture of a Beau in a Catarrh, stared at me
 arrogantly.
 
 'And who are you, sir?' he asked.
 
 I made the military salute to my superiors.
 
 'Champdivers, private, Eighth of the Line,' said I.
 
 'Pretty business!' said he.  'And you are going on with us?  Three in a
 cart, and a great trolloping private at that!  And who is to pay for you,
 my fine fellow?' he inquired.
 
 'If monsieur comes to that,' I answered civilly, 'who paid for him?'
 
 'Oh, if you choose to play the wit!' said he,--and began to rail at large
 upon his destiny, the weather, the cold, the danger and the expense of
 the escape, and, above all, the cooking of the accursed English.  It
 seemed to annoy him particularly that I should have joined their party.
 'If you knew what you were doing, thirty thousand millions of pigs! you
 would keep yourself to yourself!  The horses can't drag the cart; the
 roads are all ruts and swamps.  No longer ago than last night the Colonel
 and I had to march half the way--thunder of God!--half the way to the
 knees in mud--and I with this infernal cold--and the danger of detection!
 Happily we met no one: a desert--a real desert--like the whole abominable
 country!  Nothing to eat--no, sir, there is nothing to eat but raw cow
 and greens boiled in water--nor to drink but Worcestershire sauce!  Now
 I, with my catarrh, I have no appetite; is it not so?  Well, if I were in
 France, I should have a good soup with a crust in it, an omelette, a fowl
 in rice, a partridge in cabbages--things to tempt me, thunder of God!
 But here--day of God!--what a country!  And cold, too!  They talk about
 Russia--this is all the cold I want!  And the people--look at them!  What
 a race!  Never any handsome men; never any fine officers!'--and he looked
 down complacently for a moment at his waist--'And the women--what
 faggots!  No, that is one point clear, I cannot stomach the English!'
 
 There was something in this man so antipathetic to me, as sent the
 mustard into my nose.  I can never bear your bucks and dandies, even when
 they are decent-looking and well dressed; and the Major--for that was his
 rank--was the image of a flunkey in good luck.  Even to be in agreement
 with him, or to seem to be so, was more than I could make out to endure.
 
 'You could scarce be expected to stomach them,' said I civilly, 'after
 having just digested your parole.'
 
 He whipped round on his heel and turned on me a countenance which I dare
 say he imagined to be awful; but another fit of sneezing cut him off ere
 he could come the length of speech.
 
 'I have not tried the dish myself,' I took the opportunity to add.  'It
 is said to be unpalatable.  Did monsieur find it so?'
 
 With surprising vivacity the Colonel woke from his lethargy.  He was
 between us ere another word could pass.
 
 'Shame, gentlemen!' he said.  'Is this a time for Frenchmen and
 fellow-soldiers to fall out?  We are in the midst of our enemies; a
 quarrel, a loud word, may suffice to plunge us back into irretrievable
 distress.  _Monsieur le Commandant_, you have been gravely offended.  I
 make it my request, I make it my prayer--if need be, I give you my
 orders--that the matter shall stand by until we come safe to France.
 Then, if you please, I will serve you in any capacity.  And for you,
 young man, you have shown all the cruelty and carelessness of youth.
 This gentleman is your superior; he is no longer young'--at which word
 you are to conceive the Major's face.  'It is admitted he has broken his
 parole.  I know not his reason, and no more do you.  It might be
 patriotism in this hour of our country's adversity, it might be humanity,
 necessity; you know not what in the least, and you permit yourself to
 reflect on his honour.  To break parole may be a subject for pity and not
 derision.  I have broken mine--I, a colonel of the Empire.  And why?  I
 have been years negotiating my exchange, and it cannot be managed; those
 who have influence at the Ministry of War continually rush in before me,
 and I have to wait, and my daughter at home is in a decline.  I am going
 to see my daughter at last, and it is my only concern lest I should have
 delayed too long.  She is ill, and very ill,--at death's door.  Nothing
 is left me but my daughter, my Emperor, and my honour; and I give my
 honour, blame me for it who dare!'
 
 At this my heart smote me.
 
 'For God's sake,' I cried, 'think no more of what I have said!  A parole?
 what is a parole against life and death and love?  I ask your pardon;
 this gentleman's also.  As long as I shall be with you, you shall not
 have cause to complain of me again.  I pray God you will find your
 daughter alive and restored.'
 
 'That is past praying for,' said the Colonel; and immediately the brief
 fire died out of him, and, returning to the hearth, he relapsed into his
 former abstraction.
 
 But I was not so easy to compose.  The knowledge of the poor gentleman's
 trouble, and the sight of his face, had filled me with the bitterness of
 remorse; and I insisted upon shaking hands with the Major (which he did
 with a very ill grace), and abounded in palinodes and apologies.
 
 'After all,' said I, 'who am I to talk?  I am in the luck to be a private
 soldier; I have no parole to give or to keep; once I am over the rampart,
 I am as free as air.  I beg you to believe that I regret from my soul the
 use of these ungenerous expressions.  Allow me . . . Is there no way in
 this damned house to attract attention?  Where is this fellow, Fenn?'
 
 I ran to one of the windows and threw it open.  Fenn, who was at the
 moment passing below in the court, cast up his arms like one in despair,
 called to me to keep back, plunged into the house, and appeared next
 moment in the doorway of the chamber.
 
 'Oh, sir!' says he, 'keep away from those there windows.  A body might
 see you from the back lane.'
 
 'It is registered,' said I.  'Henceforward I will be a mouse for
 precaution and a ghost for invisibility.  But in the meantime, for God's
 sake, fetch us a bottle of brandy!  Your room is as damp as the bottom of
 a well, and these gentlemen are perishing of cold.'
 
 So soon as I had paid him (for everything, I found, must be paid in
 advance), I turned my attention to the fire, and whether because I threw
 greater energy into the business, or because the coals were now warmed
 and the time ripe, I soon started a blaze that made the chimney roar
 again.  The shine of it, in that dark, rainy day, seemed to reanimate the
 Colonel like a blink of sun.  With the outburst of the flames, besides, a
 draught was established, which immediately delivered us from the plague
 of smoke; and by the time Fenn returned, carrying a bottle under his arm
 and a single tumbler in his hand, there was already an air of gaiety in
 the room that did the heart good.
 
 I poured out some of the brandy.
 
 'Colonel,' said I, 'I am a young man and a private soldier.  I have not
 been long in this room, and already I have shown the petulance that
 belongs to the one character and the ill manners that you may look for in
 the other.  Have the humanity to pass these slips over, and honour me so
 far as to accept this glass.'
 
 'My lad,' says he, waking up and blinking at me with an air of suspicion,
 'are you sure you can afford it?'
 
 I assured him I could.
 
 'I thank you, then: I am very cold.'  He took the glass out, and a little
 colour came in his face.  'I thank you again,' said he.  'It goes to the
 heart.'
 
 The Major, when I motioned him to help himself, did so with a good deal
 of liberality; continued to do so for the rest of the morning, now with
 some sort of apology, now with none at all; and the bottle began to look
 foolish before dinner was served.  It was such a meal as he had himself
 predicted: beef, greens, potatoes, mustard in a teacup, and beer in a
 brown jug that was all over hounds, horses, and hunters, with a fox at
 the fat end and a gigantic John Bull--for all the world like
 Fenn--sitting in the midst in a bob-wig and smoking tobacco.  The beer
 was a good brew, but not good enough for the Major; he laced it with
 brandy--for his cold, he said; and in this curative design the remainder
 of the bottle ebbed away.  He called my attention repeatedly to the
 circumstance; helped me pointedly to the dregs, threw the bottle in the
 air and played tricks with it; and at last, having exhausted his
 ingenuity, and seeing me remain quite blind to every hint, he ordered and
 paid for another himself.
 
 As for the Colonel, he ate nothing, sat sunk in a muse, and only awoke
 occasionally to a sense of where he was, and what he was supposed to be
 doing.  On each of these occasions he showed a gratitude and kind
 courtesy that endeared him to me beyond expression.  'Champdivers, my
 lad, your health!' he would say.  'The Major and I had a very arduous
 march last night, and I positively thought I should have eaten nothing,
 but your fortunate idea of the brandy has made quite a new man of
 me--quite a new man.'  And he would fall to with a great air of
 heartiness, cut himself a mouthful, and, before he had swallowed it,
 would have forgotten his dinner, his company, the place where he then
 was, and the escape he was engaged on, and become absorbed in the vision
 of a sick-room and a dying girl in France.  The pathos of this continual
 preoccupation, in a man so old, sick, and over-weary, and whom I looked
 upon as a mere bundle of dying bones and death-pains, put me wholly from
 my victuals: it seemed there was an element of sin, a kind of rude
 bravado of youth, in the mere relishing of food at the same table with
 this tragic father; and though I was well enough used to the coarse,
 plain diet of the English, I ate scarce more than himself.  Dinner was
 hardly over before he succumbed to a lethargic sleep; lying on one of the
 mattresses with his limbs relaxed, and his breath seemingly
 suspended--the very image of dissolution.
 
 This left the Major and myself alone at the table.  You must not suppose
 our _tete-a-tete_ was long, but it was a lively period while it lasted.
 He drank like a fish or an Englishman; shouted, beat the table, roared
 out songs, quarrelled, made it up again, and at last tried to throw the
 dinner-plates through the window, a feat of which he was at that time
 quite incapable.  For a party of fugitives, condemned to the most
 rigorous discretion, there was never seen so noisy a carnival; and
 through it all the Colonel continued to sleep like a child.  Seeing the
 Major so well advanced, and no retreat possible, I made a fair wind of a
 foul one, keeping his glass full, pushing him with toasts; and sooner
 than I could have dared to hope, he became drowsy and incoherent.  With
 the wrong-headedness of all such sots, he would not be persuaded to lie
 down upon one of the mattresses until I had stretched myself upon
 another.  But the comedy was soon over; soon he slept the sleep of the
 just, and snored like a military music; and I might get up again and face
 (as best I could) the excessive tedium of the afternoon.
 
 I had passed the night before in a good bed; I was denied the resource of
 slumber; and there was nothing open for me but to pace the apartment,
 maintain the fire, and brood on my position.  I compared yesterday and
 to-day--the safety, comfort, jollity, open-air exercise and pleasant
 roadside inns of the one, with the tedium, anxiety, and discomfort of the
 other.  I remembered that I was in the hands of Fenn, who could not be
 more false--though he might be more vindictive--than I fancied him.  I
 looked forward to nights of pitching in the covered cart, and days of
 monotony in I knew not what hiding-places; and my heart failed me, and I
 was in two minds whether to slink off ere it was too late, and return to
 my former solitary way of travel.  But the Colonel stood in the path.  I
 had not seen much of him; but already I judged him a man of a childlike
 nature--with that sort of innocence and courtesy that, I think, is only
 to be found in old soldiers or old priests--and broken with years and
 sorrow.  I could not turn my back on his distress; could not leave him
 alone with the selfish trooper who snored on the next mattress.
 'Champdivers, my lad, your health!' said a voice in my ear, and stopped
 me--and there are few things I am more glad of in the retrospect than
 that it did.
 
 It must have been about four in the afternoon--at least the rain had
 taken off, and the sun was setting with some wintry pomp--when the
 current of my reflections was effectually changed by the arrival of two
 visitors in a gig.  They were farmers of the neighbourhood, I
 suppose--big, burly fellows in great-coats and top-boots, mightily
 flushed with liquor when they arrived, and, before they left, inimitably
 drunk.  They stayed long in the kitchen with Burchell, drinking,
 shouting, singing, and keeping it up; and the sound of their merry
 minstrelsy kept me a kind of company.  The night fell, and the shine of
 the fire brightened and blinked on the panelled wall.  Our illuminated
 windows must have been visible not only from the back lane of which Fenn
 had spoken, but from the court where the farmers' gig awaited them.  In
 the far end of the firelit room lay my companions, the one silent, the
 other clamorously noisy, the images of death and drunkenness.  Little
 wonder if I were tempted to join in the choruses below, and sometimes
 could hardly refrain from laughter, and sometimes, I believe, from
 tears--so unmitigated was the tedium, so cruel the suspense, of this
 period.
 
 At last, about six at night, I should fancy, the noisy minstrels appeared
 in the court, headed by Fenn with a lantern, and knocking together as
 they came.  The visitors clambered noisily into the gig, one of them
 shook the reins, and they were snatched out of sight and hearing with a
 suddenness that partook of the nature of prodigy.  I am well aware there
 is a Providence for drunken men, that holds the reins for them and
 presides over their troubles; doubtless he had his work cut out for him
 with this particular gigful!  Fenn rescued his toes with an ejaculation
 from under the departing wheels, and turned at once with uncertain steps
 and devious lantern to the far end of the court.  There, through the open
 doors of a coach-house, the shock-headed lad was already to be seen
 drawing forth the covered cart.  If I wished any private talk with our
 host, it must be now or never.
 
 Accordingly I groped my way downstairs, and came to him as he looked on
 at and lighted the harnessing of the horses.
 
 'The hour approaches when we have to part,' said I; 'and I shall be
 obliged if you will tell your servant to drop me at the nearest point for
 Dunstable.  I am determined to go so far with our friends, Colonel X and
 Major Y, but my business is peremptory, and it takes me to the
 neighbourhood of Dunstable.'
 
 Orders were given to my satisfaction, with an obsequiousness that seemed
 only inflamed by his potations.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV--TRAVELS OF THE COVERED CART
 
 
 My companions were aroused with difficulty: the Colonel, poor old
 gentleman, to a sort of permanent dream, in which you could say of him
 only that he was very deaf and anxiously polite; the Major still maudlin
 drunk.  We had a dish of tea by the fireside, and then issued like
 criminals into the scathing cold of the night.  For the weather had in
 the meantime changed.  Upon the cessation of the rain, a strict frost had
 succeeded.  The moon, being young, was already near the zenith when we
 started, glittered everywhere on sheets of ice, and sparkled in ten
 thousand icicles.  A more unpromising night for a journey it was hard to
 conceive.  But in the course of the afternoon the horses had been well
 roughed; and King (for such was the name of the shock-headed lad) was
 very positive that he could drive us without misadventure.  He was as
 good as his word; indeed, despite a gawky air, he was simply invaluable
 in his present employment, showing marked sagacity in all that concerned
 the care of horses, and guiding us by one short cut after another for
 days, and without a fault.
 
 The interior of that engine of torture, the covered cart, was fitted with
 a bench, on which we took our places; the door was shut; in a moment, the
 night closed upon us solid and stifling; and we felt that we were being
 driven carefully out of the courtyard.  Careful was the word all night,
 and it was an alleviation of our miseries that we did not often enjoy.
 In general, as we were driven the better part of the night and day, often
 at a pretty quick pace and always through a labyrinth of the most
 infamous country lanes and by-roads, we were so bruised upon the bench,
 so dashed against the top and sides of the cart, that we reached the end
 of a stage in truly pitiable case, sometimes flung ourselves down without
 the formality of eating, made but one sleep of it until the hour of
 departure returned, and were only properly awakened by the first jolt of
 the renewed journey.  There were interruptions, at times, that we hailed
 as alleviations.  At times the cart was bogged, once it was upset, and we
 must alight and lend the driver the assistance of our arms; at times, too
 (as on the occasion when I had first encountered it), the horses gave
 out, and we had to trail alongside in mud or frost until the first peep
 of daylight, or the approach to a hamlet or a high road, bade us
 disappear like ghosts into our prison.
 
 The main roads of England are incomparable for excellence, of a beautiful
 smoothness, very ingeniously laid down, and so well kept that in most
 weathers you could take your dinner off any part of them without
 distaste.  On them, to the note of the bugle, the mail did its sixty
 miles a day; innumerable chaises whisked after the bobbing postboys; or
 some young blood would flit by in a curricle and tandem, to the vast
 delight and danger of the lieges.  On them, the slow-pacing waggons made
 a music of bells, and all day long the travellers on horse-back and the
 travellers on foot (like happy Mr. St. Ives so little a while before!)
 kept coming and going, and baiting and gaping at each other, as though a
 fair were due, and they were gathering to it from all England.  No,
 nowhere in the world is travel so great a pleasure as in that country.
 But unhappily our one need was to be secret; and all this rapid and
 animated picture of the road swept quite apart from us, as we lumbered up
 hill and down dale, under hedge and over stone, among circuitous byways.
 Only twice did I receive, as it were, a whiff of the highway.  The first
 reached my ears alone.  I might have been anywhere.  I only knew I was
 walking in the dark night and among ruts, when I heard very far off, over
 the silent country that surrounded us, the guard's horn wailing its
 signal to the next post-house for a change of horses.  It was like the
 voice of the day heard in darkness, a voice of the world heard in prison,
 the note of a cock crowing in the mid-seas--in short, I cannot tell you
 what it was like, you will have to fancy for yourself--but I could have
 wept to hear it.  Once we were belated: the cattle could hardly crawl,
 the day was at hand, it was a nipping, rigorous morning, King was lashing
 his horses, I was giving an arm to the old Colonel, and the Major was
 coughing in our rear.  I must suppose that King was a thought careless,
 being nearly in desperation about his team, and, in spite of the cold
 morning, breathing hot with his exertions.  We came, at last, a little
 before sunrise to the summit of a hill, and saw the high-road passing at
 right angles through an open country of meadows and hedgerow pollards;
 and not only the York mail, speeding smoothly at the gallop of the four
 horses, but a post-chaise besides, with the post-boy titupping briskly,
 and the traveller himself putting his head out of the window, but whether
 to breathe the dawn, or the better to observe the passage of the mail, I
 do not know.  So that we enjoyed for an instant a picture of free life on
 the road, in its most luxurious forms of despatch and comfort.  And
 thereafter, with a poignant feeling of contrast in our hearts, we must
 mount again into our wheeled dungeon.
 
 We came to our stages at all sorts of odd hours, and they were in all
 kinds of odd places.  I may say at once that my first experience was my
 best.  Nowhere again were we so well entertained as at Burchell Fenn's.
 And this, I suppose, was natural, and indeed inevitable, in so long and
 secret a journey.  The first stop, we lay six hours in a barn standing by
 itself in a poor, marshy orchard, and packed with hay; to make it more
 attractive, we were told it had been the scene of an abominable murder,
 and was now haunted.  But the day was beginning to break, and our fatigue
 was too extreme for visionary terrors.  The second or third, we alighted
 on a barren heath about midnight, built a fire to warm us under the
 shelter of some thorns, supped like beggars on bread and a piece of cold
 bacon, and slept like gipsies with our feet to the fire.  In the
 meanwhile, King was gone with the cart, I know not where, to get a change
 of horses, and it was late in the dark morning when he returned and we
 were able to resume our journey.  In the middle of another night, we came
 to a stop by an ancient, whitewashed cottage of two stories; a privet
 hedge surrounded it; the frosty moon shone blankly on the upper windows;
 but through those of the kitchen the firelight was seen glinting on the
 roof and reflected from the dishes on the wall.  Here, after much
 hammering on the door, King managed to arouse an old crone from the
 chimney-corner chair, where she had been dozing in the watch; and we were
 had in, and entertained with a dish of hot tea.  This old lady was an
 aunt of Burchell Fenn's--and an unwilling partner in his dangerous trade.
 Though the house stood solitary, and the hour was an unlikely one for any
 passenger upon the road, King and she conversed in whispers only.  There
 was something dismal, something of the sick-room, in this perpetual,
 guarded sibilation.  The apprehensions of our hostess insensibly
 communicated themselves to every one present.  We ate like mice in a
 cat's ear; if one of us jingled a teaspoon, all would start; and when the
 hour came to take the road again, we drew a long breath of relief, and
 climbed to our places in the covered cart with a positive sense of
 escape.  The most of our meals, however, were taken boldly at hedgerow
 alehouses, usually at untimely hours of the day, when the clients were in
 the field or the farmyard at labour.  I shall have to tell presently of
 our last experience of the sort, and how unfortunately it miscarried; but
 as that was the signal for my separation from my fellow-travellers, I
 must first finish with them.
 
 I had never any occasion to waver in my first judgment of the Colonel.
 The old gentleman seemed to me, and still seems in the retrospect, the
 salt of the earth.  I had occasion to see him in the extremes of
 hardship, hunger and cold; he was dying, and he looked it; and yet I
 cannot remember any hasty, harsh, or impatient word to have fallen from
 his lips.  On the contrary, he ever showed himself careful to please; and
 even if he rambled in his talk, rambled always gently--like a humane,
 half-witted old hero, true to his colours to the last.  I would not dare
 to say how often he awoke suddenly from a lethargy, and told us again, as
 though we had never heard it, the story of how he had earned the cross,
 how it had been given him by the hand of the Emperor, and of the
 innocent--and, indeed, foolish--sayings of his daughter when he returned
 with it on his bosom.  He had another anecdote which he was very apt to
 give, by way of a rebuke, when the Major wearied us beyond endurance with
 dispraises of the English.  This was an account of the _braves gens_ with
 whom he had been boarding.  True enough, he was a man so simple and
 grateful by nature, that the most common civilities were able to touch
 him to the heart, and would remain written in his memory; but from a
 thousand inconsiderable but conclusive indications, I gathered that this
 family had really loved him, and loaded him with kindness.  They made a
 fire in his bedroom, which the sons and daughters tended with their own
 hands; letters from France were looked for with scarce more eagerness by
 himself than by these alien sympathisers; when they came, he would read
 them aloud in the parlour to the assembled family, translating as he
 went.  The Colonel's English was elementary; his daughter not in the
 least likely to be an amusing correspondent; and, as I conceived these
 scenes in the parlour, I felt sure the interest centred in the Colonel
 himself, and I thought I could feel in my own heart that mixture of the
 ridiculous and the pathetic, the contest of tears and laughter, which
 must have shaken the bosoms of the family.  Their kindness had continued
 till the end.  It appears they were privy to his flight, the camlet cloak
 had been lined expressly for him, and he was the bearer of a letter from
 the daughter of the house to his own daughter in Paris.  The last
 evening, when the time came to say good-night, it was tacitly known to
 all that they were to look upon his face no more.  He rose, pleading
 fatigue, and turned to the daughter, who had been his chief ally: 'You
 will permit me, my dear--to an old and very unhappy soldier--and may God
 bless you for your goodness!'  The girl threw her arms about his neck and
 sobbed upon his bosom; the lady of the house burst into tears; '_et je
 vous le jure_, _le pere se mouchait_!' quoth the Colonel, twisting his
 moustaches with a cavalry air, and at the same time blinking the water
 from his eyes at the mere recollection.
 
 It was a good thought to me that he had found these friends in captivity;
 that he had started on this fatal journey from so cordial a farewell.  He
 had broken his parole for his daughter: that he should ever live to reach
 her sick-bed, that he could continue to endure to an end the hardships,
 the crushing fatigue, the savage cold, of our pilgrimage, I had early
 ceased to hope.  I did for him what I was able,--nursed him, kept him
 covered, watched over his slumbers, sometimes held him in my arms at the
 rough places of the road.  'Champdivers,' he once said, 'you are like a
 son to me--like a son.'  It is good to remember, though at the time it
 put me on the rack.  All was to no purpose.  Fast as we were travelling
 towards France, he was travelling faster still to another destination.
 Daily he grew weaker and more indifferent.  An old rustic accent of Lower
 Normandy reappeared in his speech, from which it had long been banished,
 and grew stronger; old words of the _patois_, too: _Ouistreham_,
 _matrasse_, and others, the sense of which we were sometimes unable to
 guess.  On the very last day he began again his eternal story of the
 cross and the Emperor.  The Major, who was particularly ill, or at least
 particularly cross, uttered some angry words of protest.
 '_Pardonnez-moi_, _monsieur le commandant_, _mais c'est pour monsieur_,'
 said the Colonel: 'Monsieur has not yet heard the circumstance, and is
 good enough to feel an interest.'  Presently after, however, he began to
 lose the thread of his narrative; and at last: '_Que que j'ai_?  _Je
 m'embrouille_!' says he, '_Suffit_: _s'm'a la donne_, _et Berthe en etait
 bien contente_.'  It struck me as the falling of the curtain or the
 closing of the sepulchre doors.
 
 Sure enough, in but a little while after, he fell into a sleep as gentle
 as an infant's, which insensibly changed into the sleep of death.  I had
 my arm about his body at the time and remarked nothing, unless it were
 that he once stretched himself a little, so kindly the end came to that
 disastrous life.  It was only at our evening halt that the Major and I
 discovered we were travelling alone with the poor clay.  That night we
 stole a spade from a field--I think near Market Bosworth--and a little
 farther on, in a wood of young oak trees and by the light of King's
 lantern, we buried the old soldier of the Empire with both prayers and
 tears.
 
 We had needs invent Heaven if it had not been revealed to us; there are
 some things that fall so bitterly ill on this side Time!  As for the
 Major, I have long since forgiven him.  He broke the news to the poor
 Colonel's daughter; I am told he did it kindly; and sure, nobody could
 have done it without tears!  His share of purgatory will be brief; and in
 this world, as I could not very well praise him, I have suppressed his
 name.  The Colonel's also, for the sake of his parole.  _Requiescat_.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV--THE ADVENTURE OF THE ATTORNEY'S CLERK
 
 
 I have mentioned our usual course, which was to eat in inconsiderable
 wayside hostelries, known to King.  It was a dangerous business; we went
 daily under fire to satisfy our appetite, and put our head in the loin's
 mouth for a piece of bread.  Sometimes, to minimise the risk, we would
 all dismount before we came in view of the house, straggle in severally,
 and give what orders we pleased, like disconnected strangers.  In like
 manner we departed, to find the cart at an appointed place, some half a
 mile beyond.  The Colonel and the Major had each a word or two of
 English--God help their pronunciation!  But they did well enough to order
 a rasher and a pot or call a reckoning; and, to say truth, these country
 folks did not give themselves the pains, and had scarce the knowledge, to
 be critical.
 
 About nine or ten at night the pains of hunger and cold drove us to an
 alehouse in the flats of Bedfordshire, not far from Bedford itself.  In
 the inn kitchen was a long, lean, characteristic-looking fellow of
 perhaps forty, dressed in black.  He sat on a settle by the fireside,
 smoking a long pipe, such as they call a yard of clay.  His hat and wig
 were hanged upon the knob behind him, his head as bald as a bladder of
 lard, and his expression very shrewd, cantankerous, and inquisitive.  He
 seemed to value himself above his company, to give himself the airs of a
 man of the world among that rustic herd; which was often no more than his
 due; being, as I afterwards discovered, an attorney's clerk.  I took upon
 myself the more ungrateful part of arriving last; and by the time I
 entered on the scene the Major was already served at a side table.  Some
 general conversation must have passed, and I smelled danger in the air.
 The Major looked flustered, the attorney's clerk triumphant, and three or
 four peasants in smock-frocks (who sat about the fire to play chorus) had
 let their pipes go out.
 
 'Give you good evening, sir!' said the attorney's clerk to me.
 
 'The same to you, sir,' said I.
 
 'I think this one will do,' quoth the clerk to the yokels with a wink;
 and then, as soon as I had given my order, 'Pray, sir, whither are you
 bound?' he added.
 
 'Sir,' said I, 'I am not one of those who speak either of their business
 or their destination in houses of public entertainment.'
 
 'A good answer,' said he, 'and an excellent principle.  Sir, do you speak
 French?'
 
 'Why, no, sir,' said I.  'A little Spanish at your service.'
 
 'But you know the French accent, perhaps?' said the clerk.
 
 'Well do I do that!' said I.  'The French accent?  Why, I believe I can
 tell a Frenchman in ten words.'
 
 'Here is a puzzle for you, then!' he said.  'I have no material doubt
 myself, but some of these gentlemen are more backward.  The lack of
 education, you know.  I make bold to say that a man cannot walk, cannot
 hear, and cannot see, without the blessings of education.'
 
 He turned to the Major, whose food plainly stuck in his throat.
 
 'Now, sir,' pursued the clerk, 'let me have the pleasure to hear your
 voice again.  Where are you going, did you say?'
 
 'Sare, I am go-ing to Lon-don,' said the Major.
 
 I could have flung my plate at him to be such an ass, and to have so
 little a gift of languages where that was the essential.
 
 'What think ye of that?' said the clerk.  'Is that French enough?'
 
 'Good God!' cried I, leaping up like one who should suddenly perceive an
 acquaintance, 'is this you, Mr. Dubois?  Why, who would have dreamed of
 encountering you so far from home?'  As I spoke, I shook hands with the
 Major heartily; and turning to our tormentor, 'Oh, sir, you may be
 perfectly reassured!  This is a very honest fellow, a late neighbour of
 mine in the city of Carlisle.'
 
 I thought the attorney looked put out; I little knew the man!
 
 'But he is French,' said he, 'for all that?'
 
 'Ay, to be sure!' said I.  'A Frenchman of the emigration!  None of your
 Buonaparte lot.  I will warrant his views of politics to be as sound as
 your own.'
 
 'What is a little strange,' said the clerk quietly, 'is that Mr. Dubois
 should deny it.'
 
 I got it fair in the face, and took it smiling; but the shock was rude,
 and in the course of the next words I contrived to do what I have rarely
 done, and make a slip in my English.  I kept my liberty and life by my
 proficiency all these months, and for once that I failed, it is not to be
 supposed that I would make a public exhibition of the details.  Enough,
 that it was a very little error, and one that might have passed
 ninety-nine times in a hundred.  But my limb of the law was as swift to
 pick it up as though he had been by trade a master of languages.
 
 'Aha!' cries he; 'and you are French, too!  Your tongue bewrays you.  Two
 Frenchmen coming into an alehouse, severally and accidentally, not
 knowing each other, at ten of the clock at night, in the middle of
 Bedfordshire?  No, sir, that shall not pass!  You are all prisoners
 escaping, if you are nothing worse.  Consider yourselves under arrest.  I
 have to trouble you for your papers.'
 
 'Where is your warrant, if you come to that?' said I.  'My papers!  A
 likely thing that I would show my papers on the _ipse dixit_ of an
 unknown fellow in a hedge alehouse!'
 
 'Would you resist the law?' says he.
 
 'Not the law, sir!' said I.  'I hope I am too good a subject for that.
 But for a nameless fellow with a bald head and a pair of gingham
 small-clothes, why certainly!  'Tis my birthright as an Englishman.
 Where's _Magna Charta_, else?'
 
 'We will see about that,' says he; and then, addressing the assistants,
 'where does the constable live?'
 
 'Lord love you, sir!' cried the landlord, 'what are you thinking of?  The
 constable at past ten at night!  Why, he's abed and asleep, and good and
 drunk two hours agone!'
 
 'Ah that a' be!' came in chorus from the yokels.
 
 The attorney's clerk was put to a stand.  He could not think of force;
 there was little sign of martial ardour about the landlord, and the
 peasants were indifferent--they only listened, and gaped, and now
 scratched a head, and now would get a light to their pipes from the
 embers on the hearth.  On the other hand, the Major and I put a bold
 front on the business and defied him, not without some ground of law.  In
 this state of matters he proposed I should go along with him to one
 Squire Merton, a great man of the neighbourhood, who was in the
 commission of the peace, the end of his avenue but three lanes away.  I
 told him I would not stir a foot for him if it were to save his soul.
 Next he proposed I should stay all night where I was, and the constable
 could see to my affair in the morning, when he was sober.  I replied I
 should go when and where I pleased; that we were lawful travellers in the
 fear of God and the king, and I for one would suffer myself to be stayed
 by nobody.  At the same time, I was thinking the matter had lasted
 altogether too long, and I determined to bring it to an end at once.
 
 'See here,' said I, getting up, for till now I had remained carelessly
 seated, 'there's only one way to decide a thing like this--only one way
 that's right _English_--and that's man to man.  Take off your coat, sir,
 and these gentlemen shall see fair play.'  At this there came a look in
 his eye that I could not mistake.  His education had been neglected in
 one essential and eminently British particular: he could not box.  No
 more could I, you may say; but then I had the more impudence--and I had
 made the proposal.
 
 'He says I'm no Englishman, but the proof of the pudding is the eating of
 it,' I continued.  And here I stripped my coat and fell into the proper
 attitude, which was just about all I knew of this barbarian art.  'Why,
 sir, you seem to me to hang back a little,' said I.  'Come, I'll meet
 you; I'll give you an appetiser--though hang me if I can understand the
 man that wants any enticement to hold up his hands.'  I drew a bank-note
 out of my fob and tossed it to the landlord.  'There are the stakes,'
 said I.  'I'll fight you for first blood, since you seem to make so much
 work about it.  If you tap my claret first, there are five guineas for
 you, and I'll go with you to any squire you choose to mention.  If I tap
 yours, you'll perhaps let on that I'm the better man, and allow me to go
 about my lawful business at my own time and convenience, by God; is that
 fair, my lads?' says I, appealing to the company.
 
 'Ay, ay,' said the chorus of chawbacons; 'he can't say no fairer nor
 that, he can't.  Take off thy coat master!'
 
 The limb of the law was now on the wrong side of public opinion, and,
 what heartened me to go on, the position was rapidly changing in our
 favour.  Already the Major was paying his shot to the very indifferent
 landlord, and I could see the white face of King at the back-door, making
 signals of haste.
 
 'Oho!' quoth my enemy, 'you are as full of doubles as a fox, are you not?
 But I see through you; I see through and through you.  You would change
 the venue, would you?'
 
 'I may be transparent, sir,' says I, 'but if you'll do me the favour to
 stand up, you'll find I can hit dam hard.'
 
 'Which is a point, if you will observe, that I had never called in
 question,' said he.  'Why, you ignorant clowns,' he proceeded, addressing
 the company, 'can't you see the fellow's gulling you before your eyes?
 Can't you see that he has changed the point upon me?  I say he's a French
 prisoner, and he answers that he can box!  What has that to do with it?
 I would not wonder but what he can dance, too--they're all dancing
 masters over there.  I say, and I stick to it, that he's a Frenchy.  He
 says he isn't.  Well then, let him out with his papers, if he has them!
 If he had, would he not show them?  If he had, would he not jump at the
 idea of going to Squire Merton, a man you all know?  Now, you are all
 plain, straightforward Bedfordshire men, and I wouldn't ask a better lot
 to appeal to.  You're not the kind to be talked over with any French
 gammon, and he's plenty of that.  But let me tell him, he can take his
 pigs to another market; they'll never do here; they'll never go down in
 Bedfordshire.  Why! look at the man!  Look at his feet!  Has anybody got
 a foot in the room like that?  See how he stands! do any of you fellows
 stand like that?  Does the landlord, there?  Why, he has Frenchman wrote
 all over him, as big as a sign-post!'
 
 This was all very well; and in a different scene I might even have been
 gratified by his remarks; but I saw clearly, if I were to allow him to
 talk, he might turn the tables on me altogether.  He might not be much of
 a hand at boxing; but I was much mistaken, or he had studied forensic
 eloquence in a good school.  In this predicament I could think of nothing
 more ingenious than to burst out of the house, under the pretext of an
 ungovernable rage.  It was certainly not very ingenious--it was
 elementary, but I had no choice.
 
 'You white-livered dog!' I broke out.  'Do you dare to tell me you're an
 Englishman, and won't fight?  But I'll stand no more of this!  I leave
 this place, where I've been insulted!  Here! what's to pay?  Pay
 yourself!' I went on, offering the landlord a handful of silver, 'and
 give me back my bank-note!'
 
 The landlord, following his usual policy of obliging everybody, offered
 no opposition to my design.  The position of my adversary was now
 thoroughly bad.  He had lost my two companions.  He was on the point of
 losing me also.  There was plainly no hope of arousing the company to
 help; and watching him with a corner of my eye, I saw him hesitate for a
 moment.  The next, he had taken down his hat and his wig, which was of
 black horsehair; and I saw him draw from behind the settle a vast hooded
 great-coat and a small valise.  'The devil!' thought I: 'is the rascal
 going to follow me?'
 
 I was scarce clear of the inn before the limb of the law was at my heels.
 I saw his face plain in the moonlight; and the most resolute purpose
 showed in it, along with an unmoved composure.  A chill went over me.
 'This is no common adventure,' thinks I to myself.  'You have got hold of
 a man of character, St. Ives!  A bite-hard, a bull-dog, a weasel is on
 your trail; and how are you to throw him off?'  Who was he?  By some of
 his expressions I judged he was a hanger-on of courts.  But in what
 character had he followed the assizes?  As a simple spectator, as a
 lawyer's clerk, as a criminal himself, or--last and worst supposition--as
 a Bow-street 'runner'?
 
 The cart would wait for me, perhaps, half a mile down our onward road,
 which I was already following.  And I told myself that in a few minutes'
 walking, Bow-street runner or not, I should have him at my mercy.  And
 then reflection came to me in time.  Of all things, one was out of the
 question.  Upon no account must this obtrusive fellow see the cart.
 Until I had killed or shook him off, I was quite divorced from my
 companions--alone, in the midst of England, on a frosty by-way leading
 whither I knew not, with a sleuth-hound at my heels, and never a friend
 but the holly-stick!
 
 We came at the same time to a crossing of lanes.  The branch to the left
 was overhung with trees, deeply sunken and dark.  Not a ray of moonlight
 penetrated its recesses; and I took it at a venture.  The wretch followed
 my example in silence; and for some time we crunched together over frozen
 pools without a word.  Then he found his voice, with a chuckle.
 
 'This is not the way to Mr. Merton's,' said he.
 
 'No?' said I. 'It is mine, however.'
 
 'And therefore mine,' said he.
 
 Again we fell silent; and we may thus have covered half a mile before the
 lane, taking a sudden turn, brought us forth again into the moonshine.
 With his hooded great-coat on his back, his valise in his hand, his black
 wig adjusted, and footing it on the ice with a sort of sober doggedness
 of manner, my enemy was changed almost beyond recognition: changed in
 everything but a certain dry, polemical, pedantic air, that spoke of a
 sedentary occupation and high stools.  I observed, too, that his valise
 was heavy; and, putting this and that together, hit upon a plan.
 
 'A seasonable night, sir,' said I.  'What do you say to a bit of running?
 The frost has me by the toes.'
 
 'With all the pleasure in life,' says he.
 
 His voice seemed well assured, which pleased me little.  However, there
 was nothing else to try, except violence, for which it would always be
 too soon.  I took to my heels accordingly, he after me; and for some time
 the slapping of our feet on the hard road might have been heard a mile
 away.  He had started a pace behind me, and he finished in the same
 position.  For all his extra years and the weight of his valise, he had
 not lost a hair's breadth.  The devil might race him for me--I had enough
 of it!
 
 And, besides, to run so fast was contrary to my interests.  We could not
 run long without arriving somewhere.  At any moment we might turn a
 corner and find ourselves at the lodge-gate of some Squire Merton, in the
 midst of a village whose constable was sober, or in the hands of a
 patrol.  There was no help for it--I must finish with him on the spot, as
 long as it was possible.  I looked about me, and the place seemed
 suitable; never a light, never a house--nothing but stubble-fields,
 fallows, and a few stunted trees.  I stopped and eyed him in the
 moonlight with an angry stare.
 
 'Enough of this foolery!' said I.
 
 He had tamed, and now faced me full, very pale, but with no sign of
 shrinking.
 
 'I am quite of your opinion,' said he.  'You have tried me at the
 running; you can try me next at the high jump.  It will be all the same.
 It must end the one way.'
 
 I made my holly whistle about my head.
 
 'I believe you know what way!' said I.  'We are alone, it is night, and I
 am wholly resolved.  Are you not frightened?'
 
 'No,' he said, 'not in the smallest.  I do not box, sir; but I am not a
 coward, as you may have supposed.  Perhaps it will simplify our relations
 if I tell you at the outset that I walk armed.'
 
 Quick as lightning I made a feint at his head; as quickly he gave ground,
 and at the same time I saw a pistol glitter in his hand.
 
 'No more of that, Mr. French-Prisoner!' he said.  'It will do me no good
 to have your death at my door.'
 
 'Faith, nor me either!' said I; and I lowered my stick and considered the
 man, not without a twinkle of admiration.  'You see,' I said, 'there is
 one consideration that you appear to overlook: there are a great many
 chances that your pistol may miss fire.'
 
 'I have a pair,' he returned.  'Never travel without a brace of barkers.'
 
 'I make you my compliment,' said I.  'You are able to take care of
 yourself, and that is a good trait.  But, my good man! let us look at
 this matter dispassionately.  You are not a coward, and no more am I; we
 are both men of excellent sense; I have good reason, whatever it may be,
 to keep my concerns to myself and to walk alone.  Now I put it to you
 pointedly, am I likely to stand it?  Am I likely to put up with your
 continued and--excuse me--highly impudent _ingerence_ into my private
 affairs?'
 
 'Another French word,' says he composedly.
 
 'Oh! damn your French words!' cried I.  'You seem to be a Frenchman
 yourself!'
 
 'I have had many opportunities by which I have profited,' he explained.
 'Few men are better acquainted with the similarities and differences,
 whether of idiom or accent, of the two languages.'
 
 'You are a pompous fellow, too!' said I.
 
 'Oh, I can make distinctions, sir,' says he.  'I can talk with
 Bedfordshire peasants; and I can express myself becomingly, I hope, in
 the company of a gentleman of education like yourself.'
 
 'If you set up to be a gentleman--' I began.
 
 'Pardon me,' he interrupted: 'I make no such claim.  I only see the
 nobility and gentry in the way of business.  I am quite a plain person.'
 
 'For the Lord's sake,' I exclaimed, 'set my mind at rest upon one point.
 In the name of mystery, who and what are you?'
 
 'I have no cause to be ashamed of my name, sir,' said he, 'nor yet my
 trade.  I am Thomas Dudgeon, at your service, clerk to Mr. Daniel
 Romaine, solicitor of London; High Holborn is our address, sir.'
 
 It was only by the ecstasy of the relief that I knew how horribly I had
 been frightened.  I flung my stick on the road.
 
 'Romaine?' I cried.  'Daniel Romaine?  An old hunks with a red face and a
 big head, and got up like a Quaker?  My dear friend, to my arms!'
 
 'Keep back, I say!' said Dudgeon weakly.
 
 I would not listen to him.  With the end of my own alarm, I felt as if I
 must infallibly be at the end of all dangers likewise; as if the pistol
 that he held in one hand were no more to be feared than the valise that
 he carried with the other, and now put up like a barrier against my
 advance.
 
 'Keep back, or I declare I will fire,' he was crying.  'Have a care, for
 God's sake!  My pistol--'
 
 He might scream as be pleased.  Willy nilly, I folded him to my breast, I
 pressed him there, I kissed his ugly mug as it had never been kissed
 before and would never be kissed again; and in the doing so knocked his
 wig awry and his hat off.  He bleated in my embrace; so bleats the sheep
 in the arms of the butcher.  The whole thing, on looking back, appears
 incomparably reckless and absurd; I no better than a madman for offering
 to advance on Dudgeon, and he no better than a fool for not shooting me
 while I was about it.  But all's well that ends well; or, as the people
 in these days kept singing and whistling on the streets:--
 
     'There's a sweet little cherub that sits up aloft
     And looks out for the life of poor Jack.'
 
 'There!' said I, releasing him a little, but still keeping my hands on
 his shoulders, '_je vous ai bel et bien embrasse_--and, as you would say,
 there is another French word.'  With his wig over one eye, he looked
 incredibly rueful and put out.  'Cheer up, Dudgeon; the ordeal is over,
 you shall be embraced no more.  But do, first of all, for God's-sake, put
 away your pistol; you handle it as if you were a cockatrice; some time or
 other, depend upon it, it will certainly go off.  Here is your hat.  No,
 let me put it on square, and the wig before it.  Never suffer any stress
 of circumstances to come between you and the duty you owe to yourself.
 If you have nobody else to dress for, dress for God!
 
     'Put your wig straight
     On your bald pate,
     Keep your chin scraped,
     And your figure draped.
 
 Can you match me that?  The whole duty of man in a quatrain!  And remark,
 I do not set up to be a professional bard; these are the outpourings of a
 _dilettante_.'
 
 'But, my dear sir!' he exclaimed.
 
 'But, my dear sir!' I echoed, 'I will allow no man to interrupt the flow
 of my ideas.  Give me your opinion on my quatrain, or I vow we shall have
 a quarrel of it.'
 
 'Certainly you are quite an original,' he said.
 
 'Quite,' said I; 'and I believe I have my counterpart before me.'
 
 'Well, for a choice,' says he, smiling, 'and whether for sense or poetry,
 give me
 
     '"Worth makes the man, and want of it the fellow:
     The rest is all but leather and prunello."'
 
 'Oh, but that's not fair--that's Pope!  It's not original, Dudgeon.
 Understand me,' said I, wringing his breast-button, 'the first duty of
 all poetry is to be mine, sir--mine.  Inspiration now swells in my bosom,
 because--to tell you the plain truth, and descend a little in style--I am
 devilish relieved at the turn things have taken.  So, I dare say, are you
 yourself, Dudgeon, if you would only allow it.  And _a propos_, let me
 ask you a home question.  Between friends, have you ever fired that
 pistol?'
 
 'Why, yes, sir,' he replied.  'Twice--at hedgesparrows.'
 
 'And you would have fired at me, you bloody-minded man?' I cried.
 
 'If you go to that, you seemed mighty reckless with your stick,' said
 Dudgeon.
 
 'Did I indeed?  Well, well, 'tis all past history; ancient as King
 Pharamond--which is another French word, if you cared to accumulate more
 evidence,' says I.  'But happily we are now the best of friends, and have
 all our interests in common.'
 
 'You go a little too fast, if you'll excuse me, Mr. ---: I do not know
 your name, that I am aware,' said Dudgeon.
 
 'No, to be sure!' said I.  'Never heard of it!'
 
 'A word of explanation--' he began.
 
 'No, Dudgeon!' I interrupted.  'Be practical; I know what you want, and
 the name of it is supper.  _Rien ne creuse comme l'emotion_.  I am hungry
 myself, and yet I am more accustomed to warlike palpitations than you,
 who are but a hunter of hedgesparrows.  Let me look at your face
 critically: your bill of fare is three slices of cold rare roast beef, a
 Welsh rabbit, a pot of stout, and a glass or two of sound tawny port, old
 in bottle--the right milk of Englishmen.'  Methought there seemed a
 brightening in his eye and a melting about his mouth at this enumeration.
 
 'The night is young,' I continued; 'not much past eleven, for a wager.
 Where can we find a good inn?  And remark that I say _good_, for the port
 must be up to the occasion--not a headache in a pipe of it.'
 
 'Really, sir,' he said, smiling a little, 'you have a way of carrying
 things--'
 
 'Will nothing make you stick to the subject?' I cried; 'you have the most
 irrelevant mind!  How do you expect to rise in your profession?  The
 inn?'
 
 'Well, I will say you are a facetious gentleman!' said he.  'You must
 have your way, I see.  We are not three miles from Bedford by this very
 road.'
 
 'Done!' cried I.  'Bedford be it!'
 
 I tucked his arm under mine, possessed myself of the valise, and walked
 him off unresisting.  Presently we came to an open piece of country lying
 a thought downhill.  The road was smooth and free of ice, the moonshine
 thin and bright over the meadows and the leafless trees.  I was now
 honestly done with the purgatory of the covered cart; I was close to my
 great-uncle's; I had no more fear of Mr. Dudgeon; which were all grounds
 enough for jollity.  And I was aware, besides, of us two as of a pair of
 tiny and solitary dolls under the vast frosty cupola of the midnight; the
 rooms decked, the moon burnished, the least of the stars lighted, the
 floor swept and waxed, and nothing wanting but for the band to strike up
 and the dancing to begin.  In the exhilaration of my heart I took the
 music on myself--
 
     'Merrily danced the Quaker's wife,
     And merrily danced the Quaker.'
 
 I broke into that animated and appropriate air, clapped my arm about
 Dudgeon's waist, and away down the hill at a dancing step!  He hung back
 a little at the start, but the impulse of the tune, the night, and my
 example, were not to be resisted.  A man made of putty must have danced,
 and even Dudgeon showed himself to be a human being.  Higher and higher
 were the capers that we cut; the moon repeated in shadow our antic
 footsteps and gestures; and it came over my mind of a sudden--really like
 balm--what appearance of man I was dancing with, what a long bilious
 countenance he had shown under his shaven pate, and what a world of
 trouble the rascal had given me in the immediate past.
 
 Presently we began to see the lights of Bedford.  My Puritanic companion
 stopped and disengaged himself.
 
 'This is a trifle _infra dig._, sir, is it not?' said he.  'A party might
 suppose we had been drinking.'
 
 'And so you shall be, Dudgeon,' said I.  'You shall not only be drinking,
 you old hypocrite, but you shall be drunk--dead drunk, sir--and the boots
 shall put you to bed!  We'll warn him when we go in.  Never neglect a
 precaution; never put off till to-morrow what you can do to-day!'
 
 But he had no more frivolity to complain of.  We finished our stage and
 came to the inn-door with decorum, to find the house still alight and in
 a bustle with many late arrivals; to give our orders with a prompt
 severity which ensured obedience, and to be served soon after at a
 side-table, close to the fire and in a blaze of candle-light, with such a
 meal as I had been dreaming of for days past.  For days, you are to
 remember, I had been skulking in the covered cart, a prey to cold,
 hunger, and an accumulation of discomforts that might have daunted the
 most brave; and the white table napery, the bright crystal, the
 reverberation of the fire, the red curtains, the Turkey carpet, the
 portraits on the coffee-room wall, the placid faces of the two or three
 late guests who were silently prolonging the pleasures of digestion, and
 (last, but not by any means least) a glass of an excellent light dry
 port, put me in a humour only to be described as heavenly.  The thought
 of the Colonel, of how he would have enjoyed this snug room and roaring
 fire, and of his cold grave in the wood by Market Bosworth, lingered on
 my palate, _amari aliquid_, like an after-taste, but was not able--I say
 it with shame--entirely to dispel my self-complacency.  After all, in
 this world every dog hangs by its own tail.  I was a free adventurer, who
 had just brought to a successful end--or, at least, within view of it--an
 adventure very difficult and alarming; and I looked across at Mr.
 Dudgeon, as the port rose to his cheeks, and a smile, that was
 semi-confidential and a trifle foolish, began to play upon his leathery
 features, not only with composure, but with a suspicion of kindness.  The
 rascal had been brave, a quality for which I would value the devil; and
 if he had been pertinacious in the beginning, he had more than made up
 for it before the end.
 
 'And now, Dudgeon, to explain,' I began.  'I know your master, he knows
 me, and he knows and approves of my errand.  So much I may tell you, that
 I am on my way to Amersham Place.'
 
 'Oho!' quoth Dudgeon, 'I begin to see.'
 
 'I am heartily glad of it,' said I, passing the bottle, 'because that is
 about all I can tell you.  You must take my word for the remainder.
 Either believe me or don't.  If you don't, let's take a chaise; you can
 carry me to-morrow to High Holborn, and confront me with Mr. Romaine; the
 result of which will be to set your mind at rest--and to make the holiest
 disorder in your master's plans.  If I judge you aright (for I find you a
 shrewd fellow), this will not be at all to your mind.  You know what a
 subordinate gets by officiousness; if I can trust my memory, old Romaine
 has not at all the face that I should care to see in anger; and I venture
 to predict surprising results upon your weekly salary--if you are paid by
 the week, that is.  In short, let me go free, and 'tis an end of the
 matter; take me to London, and 'tis only a beginning--and, by my opinion,
 a beginning of troubles.  You can take your choice.'
 
 'And that is soon taken,' said he.  'Go to Amersham tomorrow, or go to
 the devil if you prefer--I wash my hands of you and the whole
 transaction.  No, you don't find me putting my head in between Romaine
 and a client!  A good man of business, sir, but hard as millstone grit.
 I might get the sack, and I shouldn't wonder!  But, it's a pity, too,' he
 added, and sighed, shook his head, and took his glass off sadly.
 
 'That reminds me,' said I.  'I have a great curiosity, and you can
 satisfy it.  Why were you so forward to meddle with poor Mr. Dubois?  Why
 did you transfer your attentions to me?  And generally, what induced you
 to make yourself such a nuisance?'
 
 He blushed deeply.
 
 'Why, sir,' says he, 'there is such a thing as patriotism, I hope.'
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI--THE HOME-COMING OF MR. ROWLEY'S VISCOUNT
 
 
 By eight the next morning Dudgeon and I had made our parting.  By that
 time we had grown to be extremely familiar; and I would very willingly
 have kept him by me, and even carried him to Amersham Place.  But it
 appeared he was due at the public-house where we had met, on some affairs
 of my great-uncle the Count, who had an outlying estate in that part of
 the shire.  If Dudgeon had had his way the night before, I should have
 been arrested on my uncle's land and by my uncle's agent, a culmination
 of ill-luck.
 
 A little after noon I started, in a hired chaise, by way of Dunstable.
 The mere mention of the name Amersham Place made every one supple and
 smiling.  It was plainly a great house, and my uncle lived there in
 style.  The fame of it rose as we approached, like a chain of mountains;
 at Bedford they touched their caps, but in Dunstable they crawled upon
 their bellies.  I thought the landlady would have kissed me; such a
 flutter of cordiality, such smiles, such affectionate attentions were
 called forth, and the good lady bustled on my service in such a pother of
 ringlets and with such a jingling of keys.  'You're probably expected,
 sir, at the Place?  I do trust you may 'ave better accounts of his
 lordship's 'elth, sir.  We understood that his lordship, Mosha de
 Carwell, was main bad.  Ha, sir, we shall all feel his loss, poor, dear,
 noble gentleman; and I'm sure nobody more polite!  They do say, sir, his
 wealth is enormous, and before the Revolution, quite a prince in his own
 country!  But I beg your pardon, sir; 'ow I do run on, to be sure; and
 doubtless all beknown to you already!  For you do resemble the family,
 sir.  I should have known you anywheres by the likeness to the dear
 viscount.  Ha, poor gentleman, he must 'ave a 'eavy 'eart these days.'
 
 In the same place I saw out of the inn-windows a man-servant passing in
 the livery of my house, which you are to think I had never before seen
 worn, or not that I could remember.  I had often enough, indeed, pictured
 myself advanced to be a Marshal, a Duke of the Empire, a Grand Cross of
 the Legion of Honour, and some other kickshaws of the kind, with a
 perfect rout of flunkeys correctly dressed in my own colours.  But it is
 one thing to imagine, and another to see; it would be one thing to have
 these liveries in a house of my own in Paris--it was quite another to
 find them flaunting in the heart of hostile England; and I fear I should
 have made a fool of myself, if the man had not been on the other side of
 the street, and I at a one-pane window.  There was something illusory in
 this transplantation of the wealth and honours of a family, a thing by
 its nature so deeply rooted in the soil; something ghostly in this sense
 of home-coming so far from home.
 
 From Dunstable I rolled away into a crescendo of similar impressions.
 There are certainly few things to be compared with these castles, or
 rather country seats, of the English nobility and gentry; nor anything at
 all to equal the servility of the population that dwells in their
 neighbourhood.  Though I was but driving in a hired chaise, word of my
 destination seemed to have gone abroad, and the women curtseyed and the
 men louted to me by the wayside.  As I came near, I began to appreciate
 the roots of this widespread respect.  The look of my uncle's park wall,
 even from the outside, had something of a princely character; and when I
 came in view of the house itself, a sort of madness of vicarious
 vain-glory struck me dumb and kept me staring.  It was about the size of
 the Tuileries.  It faced due north; and the last rays of the sun, that
 was setting like a red-hot shot amidst a tumultuous gathering of snow
 clouds, were reflected on the endless rows of windows.  A portico of
 Doric columns adorned the front, and would have done honour to a temple.
 The servant who received me at the door was civil to a fault--I had
 almost said, to offence; and the hall to which he admitted me through a
 pair of glass doors was warmed and already partly lighted by a liberal
 chimney heaped with the roots of beeches.
 
 'Vicomte Anne de St. Yves,' said I, in answer to the man's question;
 whereupon he bowed before me lower still, and stepping upon one side
 introduced me to the truly awful presence of the major-domo.  I have seen
 many dignitaries in my time, but none who quite equalled this eminent
 being; who was good enough to answer to the unassuming name of Dawson.
 From him I learned that my uncle was extremely low, a doctor in close
 attendance, Mr. Romaine expected at any moment, and that my cousin, the
 Vicomte de St. Yves, had been sent for the same morning.
 
 'It was a sudden seizure, then?' I asked.
 
 Well, he would scarcely go as far as that.  It was a decline, a fading
 away, sir; but he was certainly took bad the day before, had sent for Mr.
 Romaine, and the major-domo had taken it on himself a little later to
 send word to the Viscount.  'It seemed to me, my lord,' said he, 'as if
 this was a time when all the fambly should be called together.'
 
 I approved him with my lips, but not in my heart.  Dawson was plainly in
 the interests of my cousin.
 
 'And when can I expect to see my great-uncle, the Count?' said I.
 
 In the evening, I was told; in the meantime he would show me to my room,
 which had been long prepared for me, and I should be expected to dine in
 about an hour with the doctor, if my lordship had no objections.
 
 My lordship had not the faintest.
 
 'At the same time,' I said, 'I have had an accident: I have unhappily
 lost my baggage, and am here in what I stand in.  I don't know if the
 doctor be a formalist, but it is quite impossible I should appear at
 table as I ought.'
 
 He begged me to be under no anxiety.  'We have been long expecting you,'
 said he.  'All is ready.'
 
 Such I found to be the truth.  A great room had been prepared for me;
 through the mullioned windows the last flicker of the winter sunset
 interchanged with the reverberation of a royal fire; the bed was open, a
 suit of evening clothes was airing before the blaze, and from the far
 corner a boy came forward with deprecatory smiles.  The dream in which I
 had been moving seemed to have reached its pitch.  I might have quitted
 this house and room only the night before; it was my own place that I had
 come to; and for the first time in my life I understood the force of the
 words home and welcome.
 
 'This will be all as you would want, sir?' said Mr. Dawson.  'This 'ere
 boy, Rowley, we place entirely at your disposition.  'E's not exactly a
 trained vallet, but Mossho Powl, the Viscount's gentleman, 'ave give him
 the benefick of a few lessons, and it is 'oped that he may give
 sitisfection.  Hanythink that you may require, if you will be so good as
 to mention the same to Rowley, I will make it my business myself, sir, to
 see you sitisfied.'
 
 So saying, the eminent and already detested Mr. Dawson took his
 departure, and I was left alone with Rowley.  A man who may be said to
 have wakened to consciousness in the prison of the Abbaye, among those
 ever graceful and ever tragic figures of the brave and fair, awaiting the
 hour of the guillotine and denuded of every comfort, I had never known
 the luxuries or the amenities of my rank in life.  To be attended on by
 servants I had only been accustomed to in inns.  My toilet had long been
 military, to a moment, at the note of a bugle, too often at a ditch-side.
 And it need not be wondered at if I looked on my new valet with a certain
 diffidence.  But I remembered that if he was my first experience of a
 valet, I was his first trial as a master.  Cheered by which
 consideration, I demanded my bath in a style of good assurance.  There
 was a bathroom contiguous; in an incredibly short space of time the hot
 water was ready; and soon after, arrayed in a shawl dressing-gown, and in
 a luxury of contentment and comfort, I was reclined in an easy-chair
 before the mirror, while Rowley, with a mixture of pride and anxiety
 which I could well understand, laid out his razors.
 
 'Hey, Rowley?' I asked, not quite resigned to go under fire with such an
 inexperienced commander.  'It's all right, is it?  You feel pretty sure
 of your weapons?'
 
 'Yes, my lord,' he replied.  'It's all right, I assure your lordship.'
 
 'I beg your pardon, Mr. Rowley, 'but for the sake of shortness, would you
 mind not belording me in private?' said I.  'It will do very well if you
 call me Mr. Anne.  It is the way of my country, as I dare say you know.'
 
 Mr. Rowley looked blank.
 
 'But you're just as much a Viscount as Mr. Powl's, are you not?' he said.
 
 'As Mr. Powl's Viscount?' said I, laughing.  'Oh, keep your mind easy,
 Mr. Rowley's is every bit as good.  Only, you see, as I am of the younger
 line, I bear my Christian name along with the title.  Alain is the
 _Viscount_; I am the _Viscount Anne_.  And in giving me the name of Mr.
 Anne, I assure you you will be quite regular.'
 
 'Yes, Mr. Anne,' said the docile youth.  'But about the shaving, sir, you
 need be under no alarm.  Mr. Powl says I 'ave excellent dispositions.'
 
 'Mr. Powl?' said I.  'That doesn't seem to me very like a French name.'
 
 'No, sir, indeed, my lord,' said he, with a burst of confidence.  'No,
 indeed, Mr. Anne, and it do not surely.  I should say now, it was more
 like Mr. Pole.'
 
 'And Mr. Powl is the Viscount's man?'
 
 'Yes, Mr. Anne,' said he.  'He 'ave a hard billet, he do.  The Viscount
 is a very particular gentleman.  I don't think as you'll be, Mr. Anne?'
 he added, with a confidential smile in the mirror.
 
 He was about sixteen, well set up, with a pleasant, merry, freckled face,
 and a pair of dancing eyes.  There was an air at once deprecatory and
 insinuating about the rascal that I thought I recognised.  There came to
 me from my own boyhood memories of certain passionate admirations long
 passed away, and the objects of them long ago discredited or dead.  I
 remembered how anxious I had been to serve those fleeting heroes, how
 readily I told myself I would have died for _them_, how much greater and
 handsomer than life they had appeared.  And looking in the mirror, it
 seemed to me that I read the face of Rowley, like an echo or a ghost, by
 the light of my own youth.  I have always contended (somewhat against the
 opinion of my friends) that I am first of all an economist; and the last
 thing that I would care to throw away is that very valuable piece of
 property--a boy's hero-worship.
 
 'Why,' said I, 'you shave like an angel, Mr. Rowley!'
 
 'Thank you, my lord,' says he.  'Mr. Powl had no fear of me. You may be
 sure, sir, I should never 'ave had this berth if I 'adn't 'ave been up to
 Dick.  We been expecting of you this month back.  My eye!  I never see
 such preparations.  Every day the fires has been kep' up, the bed made,
 and all!  As soon as it was known you were coming, sir, I got the
 appointment; and I've been up and down since then like a Jack-in-the-box.
 A wheel couldn't sound in the avenue but what I was at the window!  I've
 had a many disappointments; but to-night, as soon as you stepped out of
 the shay, I knew it was my--it was you.  Oh, you had been expected!  Why,
 when I go down to supper, I'll be the 'ero of the servants' 'all: the
 'ole of the staff is that curious!'
 
 'Well,' said I, 'I hope you may be able to give a fair account of
 me--sober, steady, industrious, good-tempered, and with a first-rate
 character from my last place?'
 
 He laughed an embarrassed laugh.  'Your hair curls beautiful,' he said,
 by way of changing the subject.  'The Viscount's the boy for curls,
 though; and the richness of it is, Mr. Powl tells me his don't curl no
 more than that much twine--by nature.  Gettin' old, the Viscount is.  He
 '_ave_ gone the pace, 'aven't 'e, sir?'
 
 'The fact is,' said I, 'that I know very little about him.  Our family
 has been much divided, and I have been a soldier from a child.'
 
 'A soldier, Mr. Anne, sir?' cried Rowley, with a sudden feverish
 animation.  'Was you ever wounded?'
 
 It is contrary to my principles to discourage admiration for myself; and,
 slipping back the shoulder of the dressing-gown, I silently exhibited the
 scar which I had received in Edinburgh Castle.  He looked at it with awe.
 
 'Ah, well!' he continued, 'there's where the difference comes in!  It's
 in the training.  The other Viscount have been horse-racing, and dicing,
 and carrying on all his life.  All right enough, no doubt; but what I do
 say is, that it don't lead to nothink.  Whereas--'
 
 'Whereas Mr. Rowley's?' I put in.
 
 'My Viscount?' said he.  'Well, sir, I _did_ say it; and now that I've
 seen you, I say it again!'
 
 I could not refrain from smiling at this outburst, and the rascal caught
 me in the mirror and smiled to me again.
 
 'I'd say it again, Mr. Hanne,' he said.  'I know which side my bread's
 buttered.  I know when a gen'leman's a gen'leman.  Mr. Powl can go to
 Putney with his one!  Beg your pardon, Mr. Anne, for being so familiar,'
 said he, blushing suddenly scarlet.  'I was especially warned against it
 by Mr. Powl.'
 
 'Discipline before all,' said I.  'Follow your front-rank man.
 
 With that, we began to turn our attention to the clothes.  I was amazed
 to find them fit so well: not _a la diable_, in the haphazard manner of a
 soldier's uniform or a ready-made suit; but with nicety, as a trained
 artist might rejoice to make them for a favourite subject.
 
 ''Tis extraordinary,' cried I: 'these things fit me perfectly.'
 
 'Indeed, Mr. Anne, you two be very much of a shape,' said Rowley.
 
 'Who?  What two?' said I.
 
 'The Viscount,' he said.
 
 'Damnation!  Have I the man's clothes on me, too?' cried I.
 
 But Rowley hastened to reassure me.  On the first word of my coming, the
 Count had put the matter of my wardrobe in the hands of his own and my
 cousin's tailors; and on the rumour of our resemblance, my clothes had
 been made to Alain's measure.
 
 'But they were all made for you express, Mr. Anne.  You may be certain
 the Count would never do nothing by 'alf: fires kep' burning; the finest
 of clothes ordered, I'm sure, and a body-servant being trained
 a-purpose.'
 
 'Well,' said I, 'it's a good fire, and a good set-out of clothes; and
 what a valet, Mr. Rowley!  And there's one thing to be said for my
 cousin--I mean for Mr. Powl's Viscount--he has a very fair figure.'
 
 'Oh, don't you be took in, Mr. Anne,' quoth the faithless Rowley: 'he has
 to be hyked into a pair of stays to get them things on!'
 
 'Come, come, Mr. Rowley,' said I, 'this is telling tales out of school!
 Do not you be deceived.  The greatest men of antiquity, including Caesar
 and Hannibal and Pope Joan, may have been very glad, at my time of life
 or Alain's, to follow his example.  'Tis a misfortune common to all; and
 really,' said I, bowing to myself before the mirror like one who should
 dance the minuet, 'when the result is so successful as this, who would do
 anything but applaud?'
 
 My toilet concluded, I marched on to fresh surprises.  My chamber, my new
 valet and my new clothes had been beyond hope: the dinner, the soup, the
 whole bill of fare was a revelation of the powers there are in man.  I
 had not supposed it lay in the genius of any cook to create, out of
 common beef and mutton, things so different and dainty.  The wine was of
 a piece, the doctor a most agreeable companion; nor could I help
 reflecting on the prospect that all this wealth, comfort and handsome
 profusion might still very possibly become mine.  Here were a change
 indeed, from the common soldier and the camp kettle, the prisoner and his
 prison rations, the fugitive and the horrors of the covered cart!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII--THE DESPATCH-BOX
 
 
 The doctor had scarce finished his meal before he hastened with an
 apology to attend upon his patient; and almost immediately after I was
 myself summoned and ushered up the great staircase and along interminable
 corridors to the bedside of my great-uncle the Count.  You are to think
 that up to the present moment I had not set eyes on this formidable
 personage, only on the evidences of his wealth and kindness.  You are to
 think besides that I had heard him miscalled and abused from my earliest
 childhood up.  The first of the _emigres_ could never expect a good word
 in the society in which my father moved.  Even yet the reports I received
 were of a doubtful nature; even Romaine had drawn of him no very amiable
 portrait; and as I was ushered into the room, it was a critical eye that
 I cast on my great-uncle.  He lay propped on pillows in a little cot no
 greater than a camp-bed, not visibly breathing.  He was about eighty
 years of age, and looked it; not that his face was much lined, but all
 the blood and colour seemed to have faded from his body, and even his
 eyes, which last he kept usually closed as though the light distressed
 him.  There was an unspeakable degree of slyness in his expression, which
 kept me ill at ease; he seemed to lie there with his arms folded, like a
 spider waiting for prey.  His speech was very deliberate and courteous,
 but scarce louder than a sigh.
 
 'I bid you welcome, _Monsieur le Vicomte Anne_,' said he, looking at me
 hard with his pale eyes, but not moving on his pillows.  'I have sent for
 you, and I thank you for the obliging expedition you have shown.  It is
 my misfortune that I cannot rise to receive you.  I trust you have been
 reasonably well entertained?'
 
 '_Monsieur mon oncle_,' I said, bowing very low, 'I am come at the
 summons of the head of my family.'
 
 'It is well,' he said.  'Be seated.  I should be glad to hear some
 news--if that can be called news that is already twenty years old--of how
 I have the pleasure to see you here.'
 
 By the coldness of his address, not more than by the nature of the times
 that he bade me recall, I was plunged in melancholy.  I felt myself
 surrounded as with deserts of friendlessness, and the delight of my
 welcome was turned to ashes in my mouth.
 
 'That is soon told, _monseigneur_,' said I.  'I understand that I need
 tell you nothing of the end of my unhappy parents?  It is only the story
 of the lost dog.'
 
 'You are right.  I am sufficiently informed of that deplorable affair; it
 is painful to me.  My nephew, your father, was a man who would not be
 advised,' said he.  'Tell me, if you please, simply of yourself.'
 
 'I am afraid I must run the risk of harrowing your sensibility in the
 beginning,' said I, with a bitter smile, 'because my story begins at the
 foot of the guillotine.  When the list came out that night, and her name
 was there, I was already old enough, not in years but in sad experience,
 to understand the extent of my misfortune.  She--'  I paused.  'Enough
 that she arranged with a friend, Madame de Chasserades, that she should
 take charge of me, and by the favour of our jailers I was suffered to
 remain in the shelter of the _Abbaye_.  That was my only refuge; there
 was no corner of France that I could rest the sole of my foot upon except
 the prison.  Monsieur le Comte, you are as well aware as I can be what
 kind of a life that was, and how swiftly death smote in that society.  I
 did not wait long before the name of Madame de Chasserades succeeded to
 that of my mother on the list.  She passed me on to Madame de Noytot;
 she, in her turn, to Mademoiselle de Braye; and there were others.  I was
 the one thing permanent; they were all transient as clouds; a day or two
 of their care, and then came the last farewell and--somewhere far off in
 that roaring Paris that surrounded us--the bloody scene.  I was the
 cherished one, the last comfort, of these dying women.  I have been in
 pitched fights, my lord, and I never knew such courage.  It was all done
 smiling, in the tone of good society; _belle maman_ was the name I was
 taught to give to each; and for a day or two the new "pretty mamma" would
 make much of me, show me off, teach me the minuet, and to say my prayers;
 and then, with a tender embrace, would go the way of her predecessors,
 smiling.  There were some that wept too.  There was a childhood!  All the
 time Monsieur de Culemberg kept his eye on me, and would have had me out
 of the _Abbaye_ and in his own protection, but my "pretty mammas" one
 after another resisted the idea.  Where could I be safer? they argued;
 and what was to become of them without the darling of the prison?  Well,
 it was soon shown how safe I was!  The dreadful day of the massacre came;
 the prison was overrun; none paid attention to me, not even the last of
 my "pretty mammas," for she had met another fate.  I was wandering
 distracted, when I was found by some one in the interests of Monsieur de
 Culemberg.  I understand he was sent on purpose; I believe, in order to
 reach the interior of the prison, he had set his hand to nameless
 barbarities: such was the price paid for my worthless, whimpering little
 life!  He gave me his hand; it was wet, and mine was reddened; he led me
 unresisting.  I remember but the one circumstance of my flight--it was my
 last view of my last pretty mamma.  Shall I describe it to you?' I asked
 the Count, with a sudden fierceness.
 
 'Avoid unpleasant details,' observed my great-uncle gently.
 
 At these words a sudden peace fell upon me.  I had been angry with the
 man before; I had not sought to spare him; and now, in a moment, I saw
 that there was nothing to spare.  Whether from natural heartlessness or
 extreme old age, the soul was not at home; and my benefactor, who had
 kept the fire lit in my room for a month past--my only relative except
 Alain, whom I knew already to be a hired spy--had trodden out the last
 sparks of hope and interest.
 
 'Certainly,' said I; 'and, indeed, the day for them is nearly over.  I
 was taken to Monsieur de Culemberg's,--I presume, sir, that you know the
 Abbe de Culemberg?'
 
 He indicated assent without opening his eyes.
 
 'He was a very brave and a very learned man--'
 
 'And a very holy one,' said my uncle civilly.
 
 'And a very holy one, as you observe,' I continued.  'He did an infinity
 of good, and through all the Terror kept himself from the guillotine.  He
 brought me up, and gave me such education as I have.  It was in his house
 in the country at Dammarie, near Melun, that I made the acquaintance of
 your agent, Mr. Vicary, who lay there in hiding, only to fall a victim at
 the last to a gang of _chauffeurs_.'
 
 'That poor Mr. Vicary!' observed my uncle.  'He had been many times in my
 interests to France, and this was his first failure.  _Quel charmant
 homme_, _n'est-ce pas_?'
 
 'Infinitely so,' said I.  'But I would not willingly detain you any
 further with a story, the details of which it must naturally be more or
 less unpleasant for you to hear.  Suffice it that, by M. de Culemberg's
 own advice, I said farewell at eighteen to that kind preceptor and his
 books, and entered the service of France; and have since then carried
 arms in such a manner as not to disgrace my family.'
 
 'You narrate well; _vous aves la voix chaude_,' said my uncle, turning on
 his pillows as if to study me.  'I have a very good account of you by
 Monsieur de Mauseant, whom you helped in Spain.  And you had some
 education from the Abbe de Culemberg, a man of a good house?  Yes, you
 will do very well.  You have a good manner and a handsome person, which
 hurts nothing.  We are all handsome in the family; even I myself, I have
 had my successes, the memories of which still charm me.  It is my
 intention, my nephew, to make of you my heir.  I am not very well content
 with my other nephew, Monsieur le Vicomte: he has not been respectful,
 which is the flattery due to age.  And there are other matters.'
 
 I was half tempted to throw back in his face that inheritance so coldly
 offered.  At the same time I had to consider that he was an old man, and,
 after all, my relation; and that I was a poor one, in considerable
 straits, with a hope at heart which that inheritance might yet enable me
 to realise.  Nor could I forget that, however icy his manners, he had
 behaved to me from the first with the extreme of liberality and--I was
 about to write, kindness, but the word, in that connection, would not
 come.  I really owed the man some measure of gratitude, which it would be
 an ill manner to repay if I were to insult him on his deathbed.
 
 'Your will, monsieur, must ever be my rule,' said I, bowing.
 
 'You have wit, _monsieur mon neveu_,' said he, 'the best wit--the wit of
 silence.  Many might have deafened me with their gratitude.  Gratitude!'
 he repeated, with a peculiar intonation, and lay and smiled to himself.
 'But to approach what is more important.  As a prisoner of war, will it
 be possible for you to be served heir to English estates?  I have no
 idea: long as I have dwelt in England, I have never studied what they
 call their laws.  On the other hand, how if Romaine should come too late?
 I have two pieces of business to be transacted--to die, and to make my
 will; and, however desirous I may be to serve you, I cannot postpone the
 first in favour of the second beyond a very few hours.'
 
 'Well, sir, I must then contrive to be doing as I did before,' said I.
 
 'Not so,' said the Count.  'I have an alternative.  I have just drawn my
 balance at my banker's, a considerable sum, and I am now to place it in
 your hands.  It will be so much for you and so much less--' he paused,
 and smiled with an air of malignity that surprised me.  'But it is
 necessary it should be done before witnesses.  _Monsieur le Vicomte_ is
 of a particular disposition, and an unwitnessed donation may very easily
 be twisted into a theft.'
 
 He touched a bell, which was answered by a man having the appearance of a
 confidential valet.  To him he gave a key.
 
 'Bring me the despatch-box that came yesterday, La Ferriere,' said he.
 'You will at the same time present my compliments to Dr. Hunter and M.
 l'Abbe, and request them to step for a few moments to my room.'
 
 The despatch-box proved to be rather a bulky piece of baggage, covered
 with Russia leather.  Before the doctor and an excellent old smiling
 priest it was passed over into my hands with a very clear statement of
 the disposer's wishes; immediately after which, though the witnesses
 remained behind to draw up and sign a joint note of the transaction,
 Monsieur de Keroual dismissed me to my own room, La Ferriere following
 with the invaluable box.
 
 At my chamber door I took it from him with thanks, and entered alone.
 Everything had been already disposed for the night, the curtains drawn
 and the fire trimmed; and Rowley was still busy with my bedclothes.  He
 turned round as I entered with a look of welcome that did my heart good.
 Indeed, I had never a much greater need of human sympathy, however
 trivial, than at that moment when I held a fortune in my arms.  In my
 uncle's room I had breathed the very atmosphere of disenchantment.  He
 had gorged my pockets; he had starved every dignified or affectionate
 sentiment of a man.  I had received so chilling an impression of age and
 experience that the mere look of youth drew me to confide in Rowley: he
 was only a boy, his heart must beat yet, he must still retain some
 innocence and natural feelings, he could blurt out follies with his
 mouth, he was not a machine to utter perfect speech!  At the same time, I
 was beginning to outgrow the painful impressions of my interview; my
 spirits were beginning to revive; and at the jolly, empty looks of Mr.
 Rowley, as he ran forward to relieve me of the box, St. Ives became
 himself again.
 
 'Now, Rowley, don't be in a hurry,' said I.  'This is a momentous
 juncture.  Man and boy, you have been in my service about three hours.
 You must already have observed that I am a gentleman of a somewhat morose
 disposition, and there is nothing that I more dislike than the smallest
 appearance of familiarity.  Mr. Pole or Mr. Powl, probably in the spirit
 of prophecy, warned you against this danger.'
 
 'Yes, Mr. Anne,' said Rowley blankly.
 
 'Now there has just arisen one of those rare cases, in which I am willing
 to depart from my principles.  My uncle has given me a box--what you
 would call a Christmas box.  I don't know what's in it, and no more do
 you: perhaps I am an April fool, or perhaps I am already enormously
 wealthy; there might be five hundred pounds in this apparently harmless
 receptacle!'
 
 'Lord, Mr. Anne!' cried Rowley.
 
 'Now, Rowley, hold up your right hand and repeat the words of the oath
 after me,' said I, laying the despatch-box on the table.  'Strike me blue
 if I ever disclose to Mr. Powl, or Mr. Powl's Viscount, or anything that
 is Mr. Powl's, not to mention Mr. Dawson and the doctor, the treasures of
 the following despatch-box; and strike me sky-blue scarlet if I do not
 continually maintain, uphold, love, honour and obey, serve, and follow to
 the four corners of the earth and the waters that are under the earth,
 the hereinafter before-mentioned (only that I find I have neglected to
 mention him) Viscount Anne de Keroual de St.-Yves, commonly known as Mr.
 Rowley's Viscount.  So be it.  Amen.'
 
 He took the oath with the same exaggerated seriousness as I gave it to
 him.
 
 'Now,' said I.  'Here is the key for you; I will hold the lid with both
 hands in the meanwhile.'  He turned the key.  'Bring up all the candles
 in the room, and range them along-side.  What is it to be?  A live
 gorgon, a Jack-in-the-box, or a spring that fires a pistol?  On your
 knees, sir, before the prodigy!'
 
 So saying, I turned the despatch-box upside down upon the table.  At
 sight of the heap of bank paper and gold that lay in front of us, between
 the candles, or rolled upon the floor alongside, I stood astonished.
 
 'O Lord!' cried Mr. Rowley; 'oh Lordy, Lordy, Lord!' and he scrambled
 after the fallen guineas.  'O my, Mr. Anne! what a sight o' money!  Why,
 it's like a blessed story-book.  It's like the Forty Thieves.'
 
 'Now Rowley, let's be cool, let's be businesslike,' said I.  'Riches are
 deceitful, particularly when you haven't counted them; and the first
 thing we have to do is to arrive at the amount of my--let me say, modest
 competency.  If I'm not mistaken, I have enough here to keep you in gold
 buttons all the rest of your life.  You collect the gold, and I'll take
 the paper.'
 
 Accordingly, down we sat together on the hearthrug, and for some time
 there was no sound but the creasing of bills and the jingling of guineas,
 broken occasionally by the exulting exclamations of Rowley.  The
 arithmetical operation on which we were embarked took long, and it might
 have been tedious to others; not to me nor to my helper.
 
 'Ten thousand pounds!' I announced at last.
 
 'Ten thousand!' echoed Mr. Rowley.
 
 And we gazed upon each other.
 
 The greatness of this fortune took my breath away.  With that sum in my
 hands, I need fear no enemies.  People are arrested, in nine cases out of
 ten, not because the police are astute, but because they themselves run
 short of money; and I had here before me in the despatch-box a succession
 of devices and disguises that insured my liberty.  Not only so; but, as I
 felt with a sudden and overpowering thrill, with ten thousand pounds in
 my hands I was become an eligible suitor.  What advances I had made in
 the past, as a private soldier in a military prison, or a fugitive by the
 wayside, could only be qualified or, indeed, excused as acts of
 desperation.  And now, I might come in by the front door; I might
 approach the dragon with a lawyer at my elbow, and rich settlements to
 offer.  The poor French prisoner, Champdivers, might be in a perpetual
 danger of arrest; but the rich travelling Englishman, St.-Ives, in his
 post-chaise, with his despatch-box by his side, could smile at fate and
 laugh at locksmiths.  I repeated the proverb, exulting, _Love laughs at
 locksmiths_!  In a moment, by the mere coming of this money, my love had
 become possible--it had come near, it was under my hand--and it may be by
 one of the curiosities of human nature, but it burned that instant
 brighter.
 
 'Rowley,' said I, 'your Viscount is a made man.'
 
 'Why, we both are, sir,' said Rowley.
 
 'Yes, both,' said I; 'and you shall dance at the wedding;' and I flung at
 his head a bundle of bank notes, and had just followed it up with a
 handful of guineas, when the door opened, and Mr. Romaine appeared upon
 the threshold.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII--MR. ROMAINE CALLS ME NAMES
 
 
 Feeling very much of a fool to be thus taken by surprise, I scrambled to
 my feet and hastened to make my visitor welcome.  He did not refuse me
 his hand; but he gave it with a coldness and distance for which I was
 quite unprepared, and his countenance, as he looked on me, was marked in
 a strong degree with concern and severity.
 
 'So, sir, I find you here?' said he, in tones of little encouragement.
 'Is that you, George?  You can run away; I have business with your
 master.'
 
 He showed Rowley out, and locked the door behind him.  Then he sat down
 in an armchair on one side of the fire, and looked at me with
 uncompromising sternness.
 
 'I am hesitating how to begin,' said he.  'In this singular labyrinth of
 blunders and difficulties that you have prepared for us, I am positively
 hesitating where to begin.  It will perhaps be best that you should read,
 first of all, this paragraph.'  And he handed over to me a newspaper.
 
 The paragraph in question was brief.  It announced the recapture of one
 of the prisoners recently escaped from Edinburgh Castle; gave his name,
 Clausel, and added that he had entered into the particulars of the recent
 revolting murder in the Castle, and denounced the murderer:--
 
     'It is a common soldier called Champdivers, who had himself escaped,
     and is in all probability involved in the common fate of his
     comrades.  In spite of the activity along all the Forth and the East
     Coast, nothing has yet been seen of the sloop which these desperadoes
     seized at Grangemouth, and it is now almost certain that they have
     found a watery grave.'
 
 At the reading of this paragraph, my heart turned over.  In a moment I
 saw my castle in the air ruined; myself changed from a mere military
 fugitive into a hunted murderer, fleeing from the gallows; my love, which
 had a moment since appeared so near to me, blotted from the field of
 possibility.  Despair, which was my first sentiment, did not, however,
 endure for more than a moment.  I saw that my companions had indeed
 succeeded in their unlikely design; and that I was supposed to have
 accompanied and perished along with them by shipwreck--a most probable
 ending to their enterprise.  If they thought me at the bottom of the
 North Sea, I need not fear much vigilance on the streets of Edinburgh.
 Champdivers was wanted: what was to connect him with St. Ives?  Major
 Chevenix would recognise me if he met me; that was beyond bargaining: he
 had seen me so often, his interest had been kindled to so high a point,
 that I could hope to deceive him by no stratagem of disguise.  Well, even
 so; he would have a competition of testimony before him: he knew Clausel,
 he knew me, and I was sure he would decide for honour.  At the same time
 the image of Flora shot up in my mind's eye with such a radiancy as
 fairly overwhelmed all other considerations; the blood sprang to every
 corner of my body, and I vowed I would see and win her, if it cost my
 neck.
 
 'Very annoying, no doubt,' said I, as I returned the paper to Mr.
 Romaine.
 
 'Is annoying your word for it?' said he.
 
 'Exasperating, if you like,' I admitted.
 
 'And true?' he inquired.
 
 'Well, true in a sense,' said I.  'But perhaps I had better answer that
 question by putting you in possession of the facts?'
 
 'I think so, indeed,' said he.
 
 I narrated to him as much as seemed necessary of the quarrel, the duel,
 the death of Goguelat, and the character of Clausel.  He heard me through
 in a forbidding silence, nor did he at all betray the nature of his
 sentiments, except that, at the episode of the scissors, I could observe
 his mulberry face to turn three shades paler.
 
 'I suppose I may believe you?' said he, when I had done.
 
 'Or else conclude this interview,' said I.
 
 'Can you not understand that we are here discussing matters of the
 gravest import?  Can you not understand that I feel myself weighed with a
 load of responsibility on your account--that you should take this
 occasion to air your fire-eating manners against your own attorney?
 There are serious hours in life, Mr. Anne,' he said severely.  'A capital
 charge, and that of a very brutal character and with singularly
 unpleasant details; the presence of the man Clausel, who (according to
 your account of it) is actuated by sentiments of real malignity, and
 prepared to swear black white; all the other witnesses scattered and
 perhaps drowned at sea; the natural prejudice against a Frenchman and a
 runaway prisoner: this makes a serious total for your lawyer to consider,
 and is by no means lessened by the incurable folly and levity of your own
 disposition.'
 
 'I beg your pardon!' said I.
 
 'Oh, my expressions have been selected with scrupulous accuracy,' he
 replied.  'How did I find you, sir, when I came to announce this
 catastrophe?  You were sitting on the hearthrug playing, like a silly
 baby, with a servant, were you not, and the floor all scattered with gold
 and bank paper?  There was a tableau for you!  It was I who came, and you
 were lucky in that.  It might have been any one--your cousin as well as
 another.'
 
 'You have me there, sir,' I admitted.  'I had neglected all precautions,
 and you do right to be angry.  _Apropos_, Mr. Romaine, how did you come
 yourself, and how long have you been in the house?' I added, surprised,
 on the retrospect, not to have heard him arrive.
 
 'I drove up in a chaise and pair,' he returned.  'Any one might have
 heard me.  But you were not listening, I suppose? being so extremely at
 your ease in the very house of your enemy, and under a capital charge!
 And I have been long enough here to do your business for you.  Ah, yes, I
 did it, God forgive me!--did it before I so much as asked you the
 explanation of the paragraph.  For some time back the will has been
 prepared; now it is signed; and your uncle has heard nothing of your
 recent piece of activity.  Why?  Well, I had no fancy to bother him on
 his death-bed: you might be innocent; and at bottom I preferred the
 murderer to the spy.'
 
 No doubt of it but the man played a friendly part; no doubt also that, in
 his ill-temper and anxiety, he expressed himself unpalatably.
 
 'You will perhaps find me over delicate,' said I.  'There is a word you
 employed--'
 
 'I employ the words of my brief, sir,' he cried, striking with his hand
 on the newspaper.  'It is there in six letters.  And do not be so
 certain--you have not stood your trial yet.  It is an ugly affair, a
 fishy business.  It is highly disagreeable.  I would give my hand off--I
 mean I would give a hundred pound down, to have nothing to do with it.
 And, situated as we are, we must at once take action.  There is here no
 choice.  You must at once quit this country, and get to France, or
 Holland, or, indeed, to Madagascar.'
 
 'There may be two words to that,' said I.
 
 'Not so much as one syllable!' he retorted.  'Here is no room for
 argument.  The case is nakedly plain.  In the disgusting position in
 which you have found means to place yourself, all that is to be hoped for
 is delay.  A time may come when we shall be able to do better.  It cannot
 be now: now it would be the gibbet.'
 
 'You labour under a false impression, Mr. Romaine,' said I.  'I have no
 impatience to figure in the dock.  I am even as anxious as yourself to
 postpone my first appearance there.  On the other hand, I have not the
 slightest intention of leaving this country, where I please myself
 extremely.  I have a good address, a ready tongue, an English accent that
 passes, and, thanks to the generosity of my uncle, as much money as I
 want.  It would be hard indeed if, with all these advantages, Mr. St.
 Ives should not be able to live quietly in a private lodging, while the
 authorities amuse themselves by looking for Champdivers.  You forget,
 there is no connection between these two personages.'
 
 'And you forget your cousin,' retorted Romaine.  'There is the link.
 There is the tongue of the buckle.  He knows you are Champdivers.'  He
 put up his hand as if to listen.  'And, for a wager, here he is himself!'
 he exclaimed.
 
 As when a tailor takes a piece of goods upon his counter, and rends it
 across, there came to our ears from the avenue the long tearing sound of
 a chaise and four approaching at the top speed of the horses.  And,
 looking out between the curtains, we beheld the lamps skimming on the
 smooth ascent.
 
 'Ay,' said Romaine, wiping the window-pane that he might see more
 clearly.  'Ay, that is he by the driving!  So he squanders money along
 the king's highway, the triple idiot! gorging every man he meets with
 gold for the pleasure of arriving--where?  Ah, yes, where but a debtor's
 jail, if not a criminal prison!'
 
 'Is he that kind of a man?' I said, staring on these lamps as though I
 could decipher in them the secret of my cousin's character.
 
 'You will find him a dangerous kind,' answered the lawyer.  'For you,
 these are the lights on a lee shore!  I find I fall in a muse when I
 consider of him; what a formidable being he once was, and what a
 personable! and how near he draws to the moment that must break him
 utterly! we none of us like him here; we hate him, rather; and yet I have
 a sense--I don't think at my time of life it can be pity--but a
 reluctance rather, to break anything so big and figurative, as though he
 were a big porcelain pot or a big picture of high price.  Ay, there is
 what I was waiting for!' he cried, as the lights of a second chaise swam
 in sight.  'It is he beyond a doubt.  The first was the signature and the
 next the flourish.  Two chaises, the second following with the baggage,
 which is always copious and ponderous, and one of his valets: he cannot
 go a step without a valet.'
 
 'I hear you repeat the word big,' said I.  'But it cannot be that he is
 anything out of the way in stature.'
 
 'No,' said the attorney.  'About your height, as I guessed for the
 tailors, and I see nothing wrong with the result.  But, somehow, he
 commands an atmosphere; he has a spacious manner; and he has kept up, all
 through life, such a volume of racket about his personality, with his
 chaises and his racers and his dicings, and I know not what--that somehow
 he imposes!  It seems, when the farce is done, and he locked in Fleet
 prison--and nobody left but Buonaparte and Lord Wellington and the Hetman
 Platoff to make a work about--the world will be in a comparison quite
 tranquil.  But this is beside the mark,' he added, with an effort,
 turning again from the window.  'We are now under fire, Mr. Anne, as you
 soldiers would say, and it is high time we should prepare to go into
 action.  He must not see you; that would be fatal.  All that he knows at
 present is that you resemble him, and that is much more than enough.  If
 it were possible, it would be well he should not know you were in the
 house.'
 
 'Quite impossible, depend upon it,' said I.  'Some of the servants are
 directly in his interests, perhaps in his pay: Dawson, for an example.'
 
 'My own idea!' cried Romaine.  'And at least,' he added, as the first of
 the chaises drew up with a dash in front of the portico, 'it is now too
 late.  Here he is.'
 
 We stood listening, with a strange anxiety, to the various noises that
 awoke in the silent house: the sound of doors opening and closing, the
 sound of feet near at hand and farther off.  It was plain the arrival of
 my cousin was a matter of moment, almost of parade, to the household.
 And suddenly, out of this confused and distant bustle, a rapid and light
 tread became distinguishable.  We heard it come upstairs, draw near along
 the corridor, pause at the door, and a stealthy and hasty rapping
 succeeded.
 
 'Mr. Anne--Mr. Anne, sir!  Let me in!' said the voice of Rowley.
 
 We admitted the lad, and locked the door again behind him.
 
 'It's _him_, sir,' he panted.  'He've come.'
 
 'You mean the Viscount?' said I.  'So we supposed.  But come, Rowley--out
 with the rest of it!  You have more to tell us, or your face belies you!'
 
 'Mr. Anne, I do,' he said.  'Mr. Romaine, sir, you're a friend of his,
 ain't you?'
 
 'Yes, George, I am a friend of his,' said Romaine, and, to my great
 surprise, laid his hand upon my shoulder.
 
 'Well, it's this way,' said Rowley--'Mr. Powl have been at me!  It's to
 play the spy!  I thought he was at it from the first!  From the first I
 see what he was after--coming round and round, and hinting things!  But
 to-night he outs with it plump!  I'm to let him hear all what you're to
 do beforehand, he says; and he gave me this for an arnest'--holding up
 half a guinea; 'and I took it, so I did!  Strike me sky-blue scarlet?'
 says he, adducing the words of the mock oath; and he looked askance at me
 as he did so.
 
 I saw that he had forgotten himself, and that he knew it.  The expression
 of his eye changed almost in the passing of the glance from the
 significant to the appealing--from the look of an accomplice to that of a
 culprit; and from that moment he became the model of a well-drilled
 valet.
 
 'Sky-blue scarlet?' repeated the lawyer.  'Is the fool delirious?'
 
 'No,' said I; 'he is only reminding me of something.'
 
 'Well--and I believe the fellow will be faithful,' said Romaine.  'So you
 are a friend of Mr. Anne's' too?' he added to Rowley.
 
 'If you please, sir,' said Rowley.
 
 ''Tis something sudden,' observed Romaine; 'but it may be genuine enough.
 I believe him to be honest.  He comes of honest people.  Well, George
 Rowley, you might embrace some early opportunity to earn that
 half-guinea, by telling Mr. Powl that your master will not leave here
 till noon to-morrow, if he go even then.  Tell him there are a hundred
 things to be done here, and a hundred more that can only be done properly
 at my office in Holborn.  Come to think of it--we had better see to that
 first of all,' he went on, unlocking the door.  'Get hold of Powl, and
 see.  And be quick back, and clear me up this mess.'
 
 Mr. Rowley was no sooner gone than the lawyer took a pinch of snuff, and
 regarded me with somewhat of a more genial expression.
 
 'Sir,' said he, 'it is very fortunate for you that your face is so strong
 a letter of recommendation.  Here am I, a tough old practitioner, mixing
 myself up with your very distressing business; and here is this farmer's
 lad, who has the wit to take a bribe and the loyalty to come and tell you
 of it--all, I take it, on the strength of your appearance.  I wish I
 could imagine how it would impress a jury!' says he.
 
 'And how it would affect the hangman, sir?' I asked
 
 '_Absit omen_!' said Mr. Romaine devoutly.
 
 We were just so far in our talk, when I heard a sound that brought my
 heart into my mouth: the sound of some one slyly trying the handle of the
 door.  It had been preceded by no audible footstep.  Since the departure
 of Rowley our wing of the house had been entirely silent.  And we had
 every right to suppose ourselves alone, and to conclude that the
 new-comer, whoever he might be, was come on a clandestine, if not a
 hostile, errand.
 
 'Who is there?' asked Romaine.
 
 'It's only me, sir,' said the soft voice of Dawson.  'It's the Viscount,
 sir.  He is very desirous to speak with you on business.'
 
 'Tell him I shall come shortly, Dawson,' said the lawyer.  'I am at
 present engaged.'
 
 'Thank you, sir!' said Dawson.
 
 And we heard his feet draw off slowly along the corridor.
 
 'Yes,' said Mr. Romaine, speaking low, and maintaining the attitude of
 one intently listening, 'there is another foot.  I cannot be deceived!'
 
 'I think there was indeed!' said I.  'And what troubles me--I am not sure
 that the other has gone entirely away.  By the time it got the length of
 the head of the stair the tread was plainly single.'
 
 'Ahem--blockaded?' asked the lawyer.
 
 'A siege _en regle_!' I exclaimed.
 
 'Let us come farther from the door,' said Romaine, 'and reconsider this
 damnable position.  Without doubt, Alain was this moment at the door.  He
 hoped to enter and get a view of you, as if by accident.  Baffled in
 this, has he stayed himself, or has he planted Dawson here by way of
 sentinel?'
 
 'Himself, beyond a doubt,' said I.  'And yet to what end?  He cannot
 think to pass the night there!'
 
 'If it were only possible to pay no heed!' said Mr. Romaine.  'But this
 is the accursed drawback of your position.  We can do nothing openly.  I
 must smuggle you out of this room and out of this house like seizable
 goods; and how am I to set about it with a sentinel planted at your very
 door?'
 
 'There is no good in being agitated,' said I.
 
 'None at all,' he acquiesced.  'And, come to think of it, it is droll
 enough that I should have been that very moment commenting on your
 personal appearance, when your cousin came upon this mission.  I was
 saying, if you remember, that your face was as good or better than a
 letter of recommendation.  I wonder if M. Alain would be like the rest of
 us--I wonder what he would think of it?'
 
 Mr. Romaine was sitting in a chair by the fire with his back to the
 windows, and I was myself kneeling on the hearthrug and beginning
 mechanically to pick up the scattered bills, when a honeyed voice joined
 suddenly in our conversation.
 
 'He thinks well of it, Mr. Romaine.  He begs to join himself to that
 circle of admirers which you indicate to exist already.'
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX--THE DEVIL AND ALL AT AMERSHAM PLACE
 
 
 Never did two human creatures get to their feet with more alacrity than
 the lawyer and myself.  We had locked and barred the main gates of the
 citadel; but unhappily we had left open the bath-room sally-port; and
 here we found the voice of the hostile trumpets sounding from within, and
 all our defences taken in reverse.  I took but the time to whisper Mr.
 Romaine in the ear: 'Here is another tableau for you!' at which he looked
 at me a moment with a kind of pathos, as who should say, 'Don't hit a man
 when he's down.'  Then I transferred my eyes to my enemy.
 
 He had his hat on, a little on one side: it was a very tall hat, raked
 extremely, and had a narrow curling brim.  His hair was all curled out in
 masses like an Italian mountebank--a most unpardonable fashion.  He
 sported a huge tippeted overcoat of frieze, such as watchmen wear, only
 the inside was lined with costly furs, and he kept it half open to
 display the exquisite linen, the many-coloured waistcoat, and the profuse
 jewellery of watch-chains and brooches underneath.  The leg and the ankle
 were turned to a miracle.  It is out of the question that I should deny
 the resemblance altogether, since it has been remarked by so many
 different persons whom I cannot reasonably accuse of a conspiracy.  As a
 matter of fact, I saw little of it and confessed to nothing.  Certainly
 he was what some might call handsome, of a pictorial, exuberant style of
 beauty, all attitude, profile, and impudence: a man whom I could see in
 fancy parade on the grand stand at a race-meeting or swagger in
 Piccadilly, staring down the women, and stared at himself with admiration
 by the coal-porters.  Of his frame of mind at that moment his face
 offered a lively if an unconscious picture.  He was lividly pale, and his
 lip was caught up in a smile that could almost be called a snarl, of a
 sheer, arid malignity that appalled me and yet put me on my mettle for
 the encounter.  He looked me up and down, then bowed and took off his hat
 to me.
 
 'My cousin, I presume?' he said.
 
 'I understand I have that honour,' I replied.
 
 'The honour is mine,' said he, and his voice shook as he said it.
 
 'I should make you welcome, I believe,' said I.
 
 'Why?' he inquired.  'This poor house has been my home for longer than I
 care to claim.  That you should already take upon yourself the duties of
 host here is to be at unnecessary pains.  Believe me, that part would be
 more becomingly mine.  And, by the way, I must not fail to offer you my
 little compliment.  It is a gratifying surprise to meet you in the dress
 of a gentleman, and to see'--with a circular look upon the scattered
 bills--'that your necessities have already been so liberally relieved.'
 
 I bowed with a smile that was perhaps no less hateful than his own.
 
 'There are so many necessities in this world,' said I.  'Charity has to
 choose.  One gets relieved, and some other, no less indigent, perhaps
 indebted, must go wanting.'
 
 'Malice is an engaging trait,' said he.
 
 'And envy, I think?' was my reply.
 
 He must have felt that he was not getting wholly the better of this
 passage at arms; perhaps even feared that he should lose command of his
 temper, which he reined in throughout the interview as with a red-hot
 curb, for he flung away from me at the word, and addressed the lawyer
 with insulting arrogance.
 
 'Mr. Romaine,' he said, 'since when have you presumed to give orders in
 this house?'
 
 'I am not prepared to admit that I have given any,' replied Romaine;
 'certainly none that did not fall in the sphere of my responsibilities.'
 
 'By whose orders, then, am I denied entrance to my uncle's room?' said my
 cousin.
 
 'By the doctor's, sir,' replied Romaine; 'and I think even you will admit
 his faculty to give them.'
 
 'Have a care, sir,' cried Alain.  'Do not be puffed up with your
 position.  It is none so secure, Master Attorney.  I should not wonder in
 the least if you were struck off the rolls for this night's work, and the
 next I should see of you were when I flung you alms at a pothouse door to
 mend your ragged elbows.  The doctor's orders?  But I believe I am not
 mistaken!  You have to-night transacted business with the Count; and this
 needy young gentleman has enjoyed the privilege of still another
 interview, in which (as I am pleased to see) his dignity has not
 prevented his doing very well for himself.  I wonder that you should care
 to prevaricate with me so idly.'
 
 'I will confess so much,' said Mr. Romaine, 'if you call it
 prevarication.  The order in question emanated from the Count himself.
 He does not wish to see you.'
 
 'For which I must take the word of Mr. Daniel Romaine?' asked Alain.
 
 'In default of any better,' said Romaine.
 
 There was an instantaneous convulsion in my cousin's face, and I
 distinctly heard him gnash his teeth at this reply; but, to my surprise,
 he resumed in tones of almost good humour:
 
 'Come, Mr. Romaine, do not let us be petty!'  He drew in a chair and sat
 down.  'Understand you have stolen a march upon me.  You have introduced
 your soldier of Napoleon, and (how, I cannot conceive) he has been
 apparently accepted with favour.  I ask no better proof than the funds
 with which I find him literally surrounded--I presume in consequence of
 some extravagance of joy at the first sight of so much money.  The odds
 are so far in your favour, but the match is not yet won.  Questions will
 arise of undue influence, of sequestration, and the like: I have my
 witnesses ready.  I tell it you cynically, for you cannot profit by the
 knowledge; and, if the worst come to the worst, I have good hopes of
 recovering my own and of ruining you.'
 
 'You do what you please,' answered Romaine; 'but I give it you for a
 piece of good advice, you had best do nothing in the matter.  You will
 only make yourself ridiculous; you will only squander money, of which you
 have none too much, and reap public mortification.'
 
 'Ah, but there you make the common mistake, Mr. Romaine!' returned Alain.
 'You despise your adversary.  Consider, if you please, how very
 disagreeable I could make myself, if I chose.  Consider the position of
 your _protege_--an escaped prisoner!  But I play a great game.  I condemn
 such petty opportunities.'
 
 At this Romaine and I exchanged a glance of triumph.  It seemed manifest
 that Alain had as yet received no word of Clausel's recapture and
 denunciation.  At the same moment the lawyer, thus relieved of the
 instancy of his fear, changed his tactics.  With a great air of
 unconcern, he secured the newspaper, which still lay open before him on
 the table.
 
 'I think, Monsieur Alain, that you labour under some illusion,' said he.
 'Believe me, this is all beside the mark.  You seem to be pointing to
 some compromise.  Nothing is further from my views.  You suspect me of an
 inclination to trifle with you, to conceal how things are going.  I
 cannot, on the other hand, be too early or too explicit in giving you
 information which concerns you (I must say) capitally.  Your great-uncle
 has to-night cancelled his will, and made a new one in favour of your
 cousin Anne.  Nay, and you shall hear it from his own lips, if you
 choose!  I will take so much upon me,' said the lawyer, rising.  'Follow
 me, if you please, gentlemen.'
 
 Mr. Romaine led the way out of the room so briskly, and was so briskly
 followed by Alain, that I had hard ado to get the remainder of the money
 replaced and the despatch-box locked, and to overtake them, even by
 running ere they should be lost in that maze of corridors, my uncle's
 house.  As it was, I went with a heart divided; and the thought of my
 treasure thus left unprotected, save by a paltry lid and lock that any
 one might break or pick open, put me in a perspiration whenever I had the
 time to remember it.  The lawyer brought us to a room, begged us to be
 seated while he should hold a consultation with the doctor, and, slipping
 out of another door, left Alain and myself closeted together.
 
 Truly he had done nothing to ingratiate himself; his every word had been
 steeped in unfriendliness, envy, and that contempt which (as it is born
 of anger) it is possible to support without humiliation.  On my part, I
 had been little more conciliating; and yet I began to be sorry for this
 man, hired spy as I knew him to be.  It seemed to me less than decent
 that he should have been brought up in the expectation of this great
 inheritance, and now, at the eleventh hour, be tumbled forth out of the
 house door and left to himself, his poverty and his debts--those debts of
 which I had so ungallantly reminded him so short a time before.  And we
 were scarce left alone ere I made haste to hang out a flag of truce.
 
 'My cousin,' said I, 'trust me, you will not find me inclined to be your
 enemy.'
 
 He paused in front of me--for he had not accepted the lawyer's invitation
 to be seated, but walked to and fro in the apartment--took a pinch of
 snuff, and looked at me while he was taking it with an air of much
 curiosity.
 
 'Is it even so?' said he.  'Am I so far favoured by fortune as to have
 your pity?  Infinitely obliged, my cousin Anne!  But these sentiments are
 not always reciprocal, and I warn you that the day when I set my foot on
 your neck, the spine shall break.  Are you acquainted with the properties
 of the spine?' he asked with an insolence beyond qualification.
 
 It was too much.  'I am acquainted also with the properties of a pair of
 pistols,' said I, toising him.
 
 'No, no, no!' says he, holding up his finger.  'I will take my revenge
 how and when I please.  We are enough of the same family to understand
 each other, perhaps; and the reason why I have not had you arrested on
 your arrival, why I had not a picket of soldiers in the first clump of
 evergreens, to await and prevent your coming--I, who knew all, before
 whom that pettifogger, Romaine, has been conspiring in broad daylight to
 supplant me--is simply this: that I had not made up my mind how I was to
 take my revenge.'
 
 At that moment he was interrupted by the tolling of a bell.  As we stood
 surprised and listening, it was succeeded by the sound of many feet
 trooping up the stairs and shuffling by the door of our room.  Both, I
 believe, had a great curiosity to set it open, which each, owing to the
 presence of the other, resisted; and we waited instead in silence, and
 without moving, until Romaine returned and bade us to my uncle's
 presence.
 
 He led the way by a little crooked passage, which brought us out in the
 sick-room, and behind the bed.  I believe I have forgotten to remark that
 the Count's chamber was of considerable dimensions.  We beheld it now
 crowded with the servants and dependants of the house, from the doctor
 and the priest to Mr. Dawson and the housekeeper, from Dawson down to
 Rowley and the last footman in white calves, the last plump chambermaid
 in her clean gown and cap, and the last ostler in a stable waiscoat.
 This large congregation of persons (and I was surprised to see how large
 it was) had the appearance, for the most part, of being ill at ease and
 heartily bewildered, standing on one foot, gaping like zanies, and those
 who were in the corners nudging each other and grinning aside.  My uncle,
 on the other hand, who was raised higher than I had yet seen him on his
 pillows, wore an air of really imposing gravity.  No sooner had we
 appeared behind him, than he lifted his voice to a good loudness, and
 addressed the assemblage.
 
 'I take you all to witness--can you hear me?--I take you all to witness
 that I recognise as my heir and representative this gentleman, whom most
 of you see for the first time, the Viscount Anne de St.-Yves, my nephew
 of the younger line.  And I take you to witness at the same time that,
 for very good reasons known to myself, I have discarded and disinherited
 this other gentleman whom you all know, the Viscount de St.-Yves.  I have
 also to explain the unusual trouble to which I have put you all--and,
 since your supper was not over, I fear I may even say annoyance.  It has
 pleased M. Alain to make some threats of disputing my will, and to
 pretend that there are among your number certain estimable persons who
 may be trusted to swear as he shall direct them.  It pleases me thus to
 put it out of his power and to stop the mouths of his false witnesses.  I
 am infinitely obliged by your politeness, and I have the honour to wish
 you all a very good evening.'
 
 As the servants, still greatly mystified, crowded out of the sickroom
 door, curtseying, pulling the forelock, scraping with the foot, and so
 on, according to their degree, I turned and stole a look at my cousin.
 He had borne this crushing public rebuke without change of countenance.
 He stood, now, very upright, with folded arms, and looking inscrutably at
 the roof of the apartment.  I could not refuse him at that moment the
 tribute of my admiration.  Still more so when, the last of the domestics
 having filed through the doorway and left us alone with my great-uncle
 and the lawyer, he took one step forward towards the bed, made a
 dignified reverence, and addressed the man who had just condemned him to
 ruin.
 
 'My lord,' said he, 'you are pleased to treat me in a manner which my
 gratitude, and your state, equally forbid me to call in question.  It
 will be only necessary for me to call your attention to the length of
 time in which I have been taught to regard myself as your heir.  In that
 position, I judged it only loyal to permit myself a certain scale of
 expenditure.  If I am now to be cut off with a shilling as the reward of
 twenty years of service, I shall be left not only a beggar, but a
 bankrupt.'
 
 Whether from the fatigue of his recent exertion, or by a well-inspired
 ingenuity of hate, my uncle had once more closed his eyes; nor did he
 open them now.  'Not with a shilling,' he contented himself with
 replying; and there stole, as he said it, a sort of smile over his face,
 that flickered there conspicuously for the least moment of time, and then
 faded and left behind the old impenetrable mask of years, cunning, and
 fatigue.  There could be no mistake: my uncle enjoyed the situation as he
 had enjoyed few things in the last quarter of a century.  The fires of
 life scarce survived in that frail body; but hatred, like some immortal
 quality, was still erect and unabated.
 
 Nevertheless my cousin persevered.
 
 'I speak at a disadvantage,' he resumed.  'My supplanter, with perhaps
 more wisdom than delicacy, remains in the room,' and he cast a glance at
 me that might have withered an oak tree.
 
 I was only too willing to withdraw, and Romaine showed as much alacrity
 to make way for my departure.  But my uncle was not to be moved.  In the
 same breath of a voice, and still without opening his eyes, he bade me
 remain.
 
 'It is well,' said Alain.  'I cannot then go on to remind you of the
 twenty years that have passed over our heads in England, and the services
 I may have rendered you in that time.  It would be a position too odious.
 Your lordship knows me too well to suppose I could stoop to such
 ignominy.  I must leave out all my defence--your lordship wills it so!  I
 do not know what are my faults; I know only my punishment, and it is
 greater than I have the courage to face.  My uncle, I implore your pity:
 pardon me so far; do not send me for life into a debtors' jail--a pauper
 debtor.'
 
 '_Chat et vieux_, _pardonnez_?' said my uncle, quoting from La Fontaine;
 and then, opening a pale-blue eye full on Alain, he delivered with some
 emphasis:
 
     'La jeunesse se flatte et croit tout obtenir;
     La vieillesse est impitoyable.'
 
 The blood leaped darkly into Alain's face.  He turned to Romaine and me,
 and his eyes flashed.
 
 'It is your turn now,' he said.  'At least it shall be prison for prison
 with the two viscounts.'
 
 'Not so, Mr. Alain, by your leave,' said Romaine.  'There are a few
 formalities to be considered first.'
 
 But Alain was already striding towards the door.
 
 'Stop a moment, stop a moment!' cried Romaine.  'Remember your own
 counsel not to despise an adversary.'
 
 Alain turned.
 
 'If I do not despise I hate you!' he cried, giving a loose to his
 passion.  'Be warned of that, both of you.'
 
 'I understand you to threaten Monsieur le Vicomte Anne,' said the lawyer.
 'Do you know, I would not do that.  I am afraid, I am very much afraid,
 if you were to do as you propose, you might drive me into extremes.'
 
 'You have made me a beggar and a bankrupt,' said Alain.  What extreme is
 left?'
 
 'I scarce like to put a name upon it in this company,' replied Romaine.
 'But there are worse things than even bankruptcy, and worse places than a
 debtors' jail.'
 
 The words were so significantly said that there went a visible thrill
 through Alain; sudden as a sword-stroke, he fell pale again.
 
 'I do not understand you,' said he.
 
 'O yes, you do,' returned Romaine.  'I believe you understand me very
 well.  You must not suppose that all this time, while you were so very
 busy, others were entirely idle.  You must not fancy, because I am an
 Englishman, that I have not the intelligence to pursue an inquiry.  Great
 as is my regard for the honour of your house, M. Alain de St.-Yves, if I
 hear of you moving directly or indirectly in this matter, I shall do my
 duty, let it cost what it will: that is, I shall communicate the real
 name of the Buonapartist spy who signs his letters _Rue Gregoire de
 Tours_.'
 
 I confess my heart was already almost altogether on the side of my
 insulted and unhappy cousin; and if it had not been before, it must have
 been so now, so horrid was the shock with which he heard his infamy
 exposed.  Speech was denied him; he carried his hand to his neckcloth; he
 staggered; I thought he must have fallen.  I ran to help him, and at that
 he revived, recoiled before me, and stood there with arms stretched forth
 as if to preserve himself from the outrage of my touch.
 
 'Hands off!' he somehow managed to articulate.
 
 'You will now, I hope,' pursued the lawyer, without any change of voice,
 'understand the position in which you are placed, and how delicately it
 behoves you to conduct yourself.  Your arrest hangs, if I may so express
 myself, by a hair; and as you will be under the perpetual vigilance of
 myself and my agents, you must look to it narrowly that you walk
 straight.  Upon the least dubiety, I will take action.'  He snuffed,
 looking critically at the tortured man.  'And now let me remind you that
 your chaise is at the door.  This interview is agitating to his
 lordship--it cannot be agreeable for you--and I suggest that it need not
 be further drawn out.  It does not enter into the views of your uncle,
 the Count, that you should again sleep under this roof.'
 
 As Alain turned and passed without a word or a sign from the apartment, I
 instantly followed.  I suppose I must be at bottom possessed of some
 humanity; at least, this accumulated torture, this slow butchery of a man
 as by quarters of rock, had wholly changed my sympathies.  At that moment
 I loathed both my uncle and the lawyer for their coldblooded cruelty.
 
 Leaning over the banisters, I was but in time to hear his hasty footsteps
 in that hall that had been crowded with servants to honour his coming,
 and was now left empty against his friendless departure.  A moment later,
 and the echoes rang, and the air whistled in my ears, as he slammed the
 door on his departing footsteps.  The fury of the concussion gave me (had
 one been still wanted) a measure of the turmoil of his passions.  In a
 sense, I felt with him; I felt how he would have gloried to slam that
 door on my uncle, the lawyer, myself, and the whole crowd of those who
 had been witnesses to his humiliation.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX--AFTER THE STORM
 
 
 No sooner was the house clear of my cousin than I began to reckon up,
 ruefully enough, the probable results of what had passed.  Here were a
 number of pots broken, and it looked to me as if I should have to pay for
 all!  Here had been this proud, mad beast goaded and baited both publicly
 and privately, till he could neither hear nor see nor reason; whereupon
 the gate had been set open, and he had been left free to go and contrive
 whatever vengeance he might find possible.  I could not help thinking it
 was a pity that, whenever I myself was inclined to be upon my good
 behaviour, some friends of mine should always determine to play a piece
 of heroics and cast me for the hero--or the victim--which is very much
 the same.  The first duty of heroics is to be of your own choosing.  When
 they are not that, they are nothing.  And I assure you, as I walked back
 to my own room, I was in no very complaisant humour: thought my uncle and
 Mr. Romaine to have played knuckle-bones with my life and prospects;
 cursed them for it roundly; had no wish more urgent than to avoid the
 pair of them; and was quite knocked out of time, as they say in the ring,
 to find myself confronted with the lawyer.
 
 He stood on my hearthrug, leaning on the chimney-piece, with a gloomy,
 thoughtful brow, as I was pleased to see, and not in the least as though
 he were vain of the late proceedings.
 
 'Well?' said I.  'You have done it now!'
 
 'Is he gone?' he asked.
 
 'He is gone,' said I.  'We shall have the devil to pay with him when he
 comes back.'
 
 'You are right,' said the lawyer, 'and very little to pay him with but
 flams and fabrications, like to-night's.'
 
 'To-night's?' I repeated.
 
 'Ay, to-night's!' said he.
 
 'To-night's _what_?' I cried.
 
 'To-night's flams and fabrications.'
 
 'God be good to me, sir,' said I, 'have I something more to admire in
 your conduct than ever _I_ had suspected?  You cannot think how you
 interest me!  That it was severe, I knew; I had already chuckled over
 that.  But that it should be false also!  In what sense, dear sir?'
 
 I believe I was extremely offensive as I put the question, but the lawyer
 paid no heed.
 
 'False in all senses of the word,' he replied seriously.  'False in the
 sense that they were not true, and false in the sense that they were not
 real; false in the sense that I boasted, and in the sense that I lied.
 How can I arrest him?  Your uncle burned the papers!  I told you so--but
 doubtless you have forgotten--the day I first saw you in Edinburgh
 Castle.  It was an act of generosity; I have seen many of these acts, and
 always regretted--always regretted!  "That shall be his inheritance," he
 said, as the papers burned; he did not mean that it should have proved so
 rich a one.  How rich, time will tell.'
 
 'I beg your pardon a hundred thousand times, my dear sir, but it strikes
 me you have the impudence--in the circumstances, I may call it the
 indecency--to appear cast down?'
 
 'It is true,' said he: 'I am.  I am cast down.  I am literally cast down.
 I feel myself quite helpless against your cousin.'
 
 'Now, really!' I asked.  'Is this serious?  And is it perhaps the reason
 why you have gorged the poor devil with every species of insult? and why
 you took such surprising pains to supply me with what I had so little
 need of--another enemy?  That you were helpless against them?  "Here is
 my last missile," say you; "my ammunition is quite exhausted: just wait
 till I get the last in--it will irritate, it cannot hurt him.  There--you
 see!--he is furious now, and I am quite helpless.  One more prod, another
 kick: now he is a mere lunatic!  Stand behind me; I am quite helpless!"
 Mr. Romaine, I am asking myself as to the background or motive of this
 singular jest, and whether the name of it should not be called
 treachery?'
 
 'I can scarce wonder,' said he.  'In truth it has been a singular
 business, and we are very fortunate to be out of it so well.  Yet it was
 not treachery: no, no, Mr. Anne, it was not treachery; and if you will do
 me the favour to listen to me for the inside of a minute, I shall
 demonstrate the same to you beyond cavil.'  He seemed to wake up to his
 ordinary briskness.  'You see the point?' he began.  'He had not yet read
 the newspaper, but who could tell when he might?  He might have had that
 damned journal in his pocket, and how should we know?  We were--I may
 say, we are--at the mercy of the merest twopenny accident.'
 
 'Why, true,' said I: 'I had not thought of that.'
 
 'I warrant you,' cried Romaine, 'you had supposed it was nothing to be
 the hero of an interesting notice in the journals!  You had supposed, as
 like as not, it was a form of secrecy!  But not so in the least.  A part
 of England is already buzzing with the name of Champdivers; a day or two
 more and the mail will have carried it everywhere: so wonderful a machine
 is this of ours for disseminating intelligence!  Think of it!  When my
 father was born--but that is another story.  To return: we had here the
 elements of such a combustion as I dread to think of--your cousin and the
 journal.  Let him but glance an eye upon that column of print, and where
 were we?  It is easy to ask; not so easy to answer, my young friend.  And
 let me tell you, this sheet is the Viscount's usual reading.  It is my
 conviction he had it in his pocket.'
 
 'I beg your pardon, sir,' said I.  'I have been unjust.  I did not
 appreciate my danger.'
 
 'I think you never do,' said he.
 
 'But yet surely that public scene--' I began.
 
 'It was madness.  I quite agree with you,' Mr. Romaine interrupted.  'But
 it was your uncle's orders, Mr. Anne, and what could I do?  Tell him you
 were the murderer of Goguelat?  I think not.'
 
 'No, sure!' said I.  'That would but have been to make the trouble
 thicker.  We were certainly in a very ill posture.'
 
 'You do not yet appreciate how grave it was,' he replied.  'It was
 necessary for you that your cousin should go, and go at once.  You
 yourself had to leave to-night under cover of darkness, and how could you
 have done that with the Viscount in the next room?  He must go, then; he
 must leave without delay.  And that was the difficulty.'
 
 'Pardon me, Mr. Romaine, but could not my uncle have bidden him go?' I
 asked.
 
 'Why, I see I must tell you that this is not so simple as it sounds,' he
 replied.  'You say this is your uncle's house, and so it is.  But to all
 effects and purposes it is your cousin's also.  He has rooms here; has
 had them coming on for thirty years now, and they are filled with a
 prodigious accumulation of trash--stays, I dare say, and powder-puffs,
 and such effeminate idiocy--to which none could dispute his title, even
 suppose any one wanted to.  We had a perfect right to bid him go, and he
 had a perfect right to reply, "Yes, I will go, but not without my stays
 and cravats.  I must first get together the nine-hundred-and-ninety-nine
 chestsfull of insufferable rubbish, that I have spent the last thirty
 years collecting--and may very well spend the next thirty hours a-packing
 of."  And what should we have said to that?'
 
 'By way of repartee?' I asked.  'Two tall footmen and a pair of crabtree
 cudgels, I suggest.'
 
 'The Lord deliver me from the wisdom of laymen!' cried Romaine.  'Put
 myself in the wrong at the beginning of a lawsuit?  No, indeed!  There
 was but one thing to do, and I did it, and burned my last cartridge in
 the doing of it.  I stunned him.  And it gave us three hours, by which we
 should make haste to profit; for if there is one thing sure, it is that
 he will be up to time again to-morrow in the morning.'
 
 'Well,' said I, 'I own myself an idiot.  Well do they say, _an old
 soldier_, _an old innocent_!  For I guessed nothing of all this.'
 
 'And, guessing it, have you the same objections to leave England?' he
 inquired.
 
 'The same,' said I.
 
 'It is indispensable,' he objected.
 
 'And it cannot be,' I replied.  'Reason has nothing to say in the matter;
 and I must not let you squander any of yours.  It will be enough to tell
 you this is an affair of the heart.'
 
 'Is it even so?' quoth Romaine, nodding his head.  'And I might have been
 sure of it.  Place them in a hospital, put them in a jail in yellow
 overalls, do what you will, young Jessamy finds young Jenny.  O, have it
 your own way; I am too old a hand to argue with young gentlemen who
 choose to fancy themselves in love; I have too much experience, thank
 you.  Only, be sure that you appreciate what you risk: the prison, the
 dock, the gallows, and the halter--terribly vulgar circumstances, my
 young friend; grim, sordid, earnest; no poetry in that!'
 
 'And there I am warned,' I returned gaily.  'No man could be warned more
 finely or with a greater eloquence.  And I am of the same opinion still.
 Until I have again seen that lady, nothing shall induce me to quit Great
 Britain.  I have besides--'
 
 And here I came to a full stop.  It was upon my tongue to have told him
 the story of the drovers, but at the first word of it my voice died in my
 throat.  There might be a limit to the lawyer's toleration, I reflected.
 I had not been so long in Britain altogether; for the most part of that
 time I had been by the heels in limbo in Edinburgh Castle; and already I
 had confessed to killing one man with a pair of scissors; and now I was
 to go on and plead guilty to having settled another with a holly stick!
 A wave of discretion went over me as cold and as deep as the sea.
 
 'In short, sir, this is a matter of feeling,' I concluded, 'and nothing
 will prevent my going to Edinburgh.'
 
 If I had fired a pistol in his ear he could not have been more startled.
 
 'To Edinburgh?' he repeated.  'Edinburgh? where the very paving-stones
 know you!'
 
 'Then is the murder out!' said I.  'But, Mr. Romaine, is there not
 sometimes safety in boldness?  Is it not a common-place of strategy to
 get where the enemy least expects you?  And where would he expect me
 less?'
 
 'Faith, there is something in that, too!' cried the lawyer.  'Ay,
 certainly, a great deal in that.  All the witnesses drowned but one, and
 he safe in prison; you yourself changed beyond recognition--let us
 hope--and walking the streets of the very town you have illustrated by
 your--well, your eccentricity!  It is not badly combined, indeed!'
 
 'You approve it, then?' said I.
 
 'O, approve!' said he; 'there is no question of approval.  There is only
 one course which I could approve, and that were to escape to France
 instanter.'
 
 'You do not wholly disapprove, at least?' I substituted.
 
 'Not wholly; and it would not matter if I did,' he replied.  'Go your own
 way; you are beyond argument.  And I am not sure that you will run more
 danger by that course than by any other.  Give the servants time to get
 to bed and fall asleep, then take a country cross-road and walk, as the
 rhyme has it, like blazes all night.  In the morning take a chaise or
 take the mail at pleasure, and continue your journey with all the decorum
 and reserve of which you shall be found capable.'
 
 'I am taking the picture in,' I said.  'Give me time.  'Tis the _tout
 ensemble_ I must see: the whole as opposed to the details.'
 
 'Mountebank!' he murmured.
 
 'Yes, I have it now; and I see myself with a servant, and that servant is
 Rowley,' said I.
 
 'So as to have one more link with your uncle?' suggested the lawyer.
 'Very judicious!'
 
 'And, pardon me, but that is what it is,' I exclaimed.  'Judicious is the
 word.  I am not making a deception fit to last for thirty years; I do not
 found a palace in the living granite for the night.  This is a shelter
 tent--a flying picture--seen, admired, and gone again in the wink of an
 eye.  What is wanted, in short, is a _trompe-l'oeil_ that shall be good
 enough for twelve hours at an inn: is it not so?'
 
 'It is, and the objection holds.  Rowley is but another danger,' said
 Romaine.
 
 'Rowley,' said I, 'will pass as a servant from a distance--as a creature
 seen poised on the dicky of a bowling chaise.  He will pass at hand as a
 smart, civil fellow one meets in the inn corridor, and looks back at, and
 asks, and is told, "Gentleman's servant in Number 4."  He will pass, in
 fact, all round, except with his personal friends!  My dear sir, pray
 what do you expect?  Of course if we meet my cousin, or if we meet
 anybody who took part in the judicious exhibition of this evening, we are
 lost; and who's denying it?  To every disguise, however good and safe,
 there is always the weak point; you must always take (let us say--and to
 take a simile from your own waistcoat pocket) a snuff box-full of risk.
 You'll get it just as small with Rowley as with anybody else.  And the
 long and short of it is, the lad's honest, he likes me, I trust him; he
 is my servant, or nobody.'
 
 'He might not accept,' said Romaine.
 
 'I bet you a thousand pounds he does!' cried I.  'But no matter; all you
 have to do is to send him out to-night on this cross-country business,
 and leave the thing to me.  I tell you, he will be my servant, and I tell
 you, he will do well.'
 
 I had crossed the room, and was already overhauling my wardrobe as I
 spoke.
 
 'Well,' concluded the lawyer, with a shrug, 'one risk with another: _a la
 guerre comme a la guerre_, as you would say.  Let the brat come and be
 useful, at least.'  And he was about to ring the bell, when his eye was
 caught by my researches in the wardrobe.  'Do not fall in love with these
 coats, waistcoats, cravats, and other panoply and accoutrements by which
 you are now surrounded.  You must not run the post as a dandy.  It is not
 the fashion, even.'
 
 'You are pleased to be facetious, sir,' said I; 'and not according to
 knowledge.  These clothes are my life, they are my disguise; and since I
 can take but few of them, I were a fool indeed if I selected hastily!
 Will you understand, once and for all, what I am seeking?  To be
 invisible, is the first point; the second, to be invisible in a
 post-chaise and with a servant.  Can you not perceive the delicacy of the
 quest?  Nothing must be too coarse, nothing too fine; _rien de voyant_,
 _rien qui detonne_; so that I may leave everywhere the inconspicuous
 image of a handsome young man of a good fortune travelling in proper
 style, whom the landlord will forget in twelve hours--and the chambermaid
 perhaps remember, God bless her! with a sigh.  This is the very fine art
 of dress.'
 
 'I have practised it with success for fifty years,' said Romaine, with a
 chuckle.  'A black suit and a clean shirt is my infallible recipe.'
 
 'You surprise me; I did not think you would be shallow!' said I,
 lingering between two coats.  'Pray, Mr. Romaine, have I your head? or
 did you travel post and with a smartish servant?'
 
 'Neither, I admit,' said he.
 
 'Which change the whole problem,' I continued.  'I have to dress for a
 smartish servant and a Russia leather despatch-box.'  That brought me to
 a stand.  I came over and looked at the box with a moment's hesitation.
 'Yes,' I resumed.  'Yes, and for the despatch-box!  It looks moneyed and
 landed; it means I have a lawyer.  It is an invaluable property.  But I
 could have wished it to hold less money.  The responsibility is crushing.
 Should I not do more wisely to take five hundred pounds, and intrust the
 remainder with you, Mr. Romaine?'
 
 'If you are sure you will not want it,' answered Romaine.
 
 'I am far from sure of that,' cried I.  'In the first place, as a
 philosopher.  This is the first time I have been at the head of a large
 sum, and it is conceivable--who knows himself?--that I may make it fly.
 In the second place, as a fugitive.  Who knows what I may need?  The
 whole of it may be inadequate.  But I can always write for more.'
 
 'You do not understand,' he replied.  'I break off all communication with
 you here and now.  You must give me a power of attorney ere you start
 to-night, and then be done with me trenchantly until better days.'
 
 I believe I offered some objection.
 
 'Think a little for once of me!' said Romaine.  'I must not have seen you
 before to-night.  To-night we are to have had our only interview, and you
 are to have given me the power; and to-night I am to have lost sight of
 you again--I know not whither, you were upon business, it was none of my
 affairs to question you!  And this, you are to remark, in the interests
 of your own safety much more than mine.'
 
 'I am not even to write to you?' I said, a little bewildered.
 
 'I believe I am cutting the last strand that connects you with common
 sense,' he replied.  'But that is the plain English of it.  You are not
 even to write; and if you did, I would not answer.'
 
 'A letter, however--' I began.
 
 'Listen to me,' interrupted Romaine.  'So soon as your cousin reads the
 paragraph, what will he do?  Put the police upon looking into my
 correspondence!  So soon as you write to me, in short, you write to Bow
 Street; and if you will take my advice, you will date that letter from
 France.'
 
 'The devil!' said I, for I began suddenly to see that this might put me
 out of the way of my business.
 
 'What is it now?' says he.
 
 'There will be more to be done, then, before we can part,' I answered.
 
 'I give you the whole night,' said he.  'So long as you are off ere
 daybreak, I am content.'
 
 'In short, Mr. Romaine,' said I, 'I have had so much benefit of your
 advice and services that I am loth to sever the connection, and would
 even ask a substitute.  I would be obliged for a letter of introduction
 to one of your own cloth in Edinburgh--an old man for choice, very
 experienced, very respectable, and very secret.  Could you favour me with
 such a letter?'
 
 'Why, no,' said he.  'Certainly not.  I will do no such thing, indeed.'
 
 'It would be a great favour, sir,' I pleaded.
 
 'It would be an unpardonable blunder,' he replied.  'What?  Give you a
 letter of introduction? and when the police come, I suppose, I must
 forget the circumstance?  No, indeed.  Talk of it no more.'
 
 'You seem to be always in the right,' said I.  'The letter would be out
 of the question, I quite see that.  But the lawyer's name might very well
 have dropped from you in the way of conversation; having heard him
 mentioned, I might profit by the circumstance to introduce myself; and in
 this way my business would be the better done, and you not in the least
 compromised.'
 
 'What is this business?' said Romaine.
 
 'I have not said that I had any,' I replied.  'It might arise.  This is
 only a possibility that I must keep in view.'
 
 'Well,' said he, with a gesture of the hands, 'I mention Mr. Robbie; and
 let that be an end of it!--Or wait!' he added, 'I have it.  Here is
 something that will serve you for an introduction, and cannot compromise
 me.'  And he wrote his name and the Edinburgh lawyer's address on a piece
 of card and tossed it to me.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI--I BECOME THE OWNER OF A CLARET-COLOURED CHAISE
 
 
 What with packing, signing papers, and partaking of an excellent cold
 supper in the lawyer's room, it was past two in the morning before we
 were ready for the road.  Romaine himself let us out of a window in a
 part of the house known to Rowley: it appears it served as a kind of
 postern to the servants' hall, by which (when they were in the mind for a
 clandestine evening) they would come regularly in and out; and I remember
 very well the vinegar aspect of the lawyer on the receipt of this piece
 of information--how he pursed his lips, jutted his eyebrows, and kept
 repeating, 'This must be seen to, indeed! this shall be barred to-morrow
 in the morning!'  In this preoccupation, I believe he took leave of me
 without observing it; our things were handed out; we heard the window
 shut behind us; and became instantly lost in a horrid intricacy of
 blackness and the shadow of woods.
 
 A little wet snow kept sleepily falling, pausing, and falling again; it
 seemed perpetually beginning to snow and perpetually leaving off; and the
 darkness was intense.  Time and again we walked into trees; time and
 again found ourselves adrift among garden borders or stuck like a ram in
 the thicket.  Rowley had possessed himself of the matches, and he was
 neither to be terrified nor softened.  'No, I will not, Mr. Anne, sir,'
 he would reply.  'You know he tell me to wait till we were over the 'ill.
 It's only a little way now.  Why, and I thought you was a soldier, too!'
 I was at least a very glad soldier when my valet consented at last to
 kindle a thieves' match.  From this, we easily lit the lantern; and
 thenceforward, through a labyrinth of woodland paths, were conducted by
 its uneasy glimmer.  Both booted and great-coated, with tall hats much of
 a shape, and laden with booty in the form of a despatch-box, a case of
 pistols, and two plump valises, I thought we had very much the look of a
 pair of brothers returning from the sack of Amersham Place.
 
 We issued at last upon a country by-road where we might walk abreast and
 without precaution.  It was nine miles to Aylesbury, our immediate
 destination; by a watch, which formed part of my new outfit, it should be
 about half-past three in the morning; and as we did not choose to arrive
 before daylight, time could not be said to press.  I gave the order to
 march at ease.
 
 'Now, Rowley,' said I, 'so far so good.  You have come, in the most
 obliging manner in the world, to carry these valises.  The question is,
 what next?  What are we to do at Aylesbury? or, more particularly, what
 are you?  Thence, I go on a journey.  Are you to accompany me?'
 
 He gave a little chuckle.  'That's all settled already, Mr. Anne, sir,'
 he replied.  'Why, I've got my things here in the valise--a half a dozen
 shirts and what not; I'm all ready, sir: just you lead on: _you'll_ see.'
 
 'The devil you have!' said I.  'You made pretty sure of your welcome.'
 
 'If you please, sir,' said Rowley.
 
 He looked up at me, in the light of the lantern, with a boyish shyness
 and triumph that awoke my conscience.  I could never let this innocent
 involve himself in the perils and difficulties that beset my course,
 without some hint of warning, which it was a matter of extreme delicacy
 to make plain enough and not too plain.
 
 'No, no,' said I; 'you may think you have made a choice, but it was
 blindfold, and you must make it over again.  The Count's service is a
 good one; what are you leaving it for?  Are you not throwing away the
 substance for the shadow?  No, do not answer me yet.  You imagine that I
 am a prosperous nobleman, just declared my uncle's heir, on the threshold
 of the best of good fortune, and, from the point of view of a judicious
 servant, a jewel of a master to serve and stick to?  Well, my boy, I am
 nothing of the kind, nothing of the kind.'
 
 As I said the words, I came to a full stop and held up the lantern to his
 face.  He stood before me, brilliantly illuminated on the background of
 impenetrable night and falling snow, stricken to stone between his double
 burden like an ass between two panniers, and gaping at me like a
 blunderbuss.  I had never seen a face so predestined to be astonished, or
 so susceptible of rendering the emotion of surprise; and it tempted me as
 an open piano tempts the musician.
 
 'Nothing of the sort, Rowley,' I continued, in a churchyard voice.
 'These are appearances, petty appearances.  I am in peril, homeless,
 hunted.  I count scarce any one in England who is not my enemy.  From
 this hour I drop my name, my title; I become nameless; my name is
 proscribed.  My liberty, my life, hang by a hair.  The destiny which you
 will accept, if you go forth with me, is to be tracked by spies, to hide
 yourself under a false name, to follow the desperate pretences and
 perhaps share the fate of a murderer with a price upon his head.'
 
 His face had been hitherto beyond expectation, passing from one depth to
 another of tragic astonishment, and really worth paying to see; but at
 this it suddenly cleared.  'Oh, I ain't afraid!' he said; and then,
 choking into laughter, 'why, I see it from the first!'
 
 I could have beaten him.  But I had so grossly overshot the mark that I
 suppose it took me two good miles of road and half an hour of elocution
 to persuade him I had been in earnest.  In the course of which I became
 so interested in demonstrating my present danger that I forgot all about
 my future safety, and not only told him the story of Goguelat, but threw
 in the business of the drovers as well, and ended by blurting out that I
 was a soldier of Napoleon's and a prisoner of war.
 
 This was far from my views when I began; and it is a common complaint of
 me that I have a long tongue.  I believe it is a fault beloved by
 fortune.  Which of you considerate fellows would have done a thing at
 once so foolhardy and so wise as to make a confidant of a boy in his
 teens, and positively smelling of the nursery?  And when had I cause to
 repent it?  There is none so apt as a boy to be the adviser of any man in
 difficulties such as mine.  To the beginnings of virile common sense he
 adds the last lights of the child's imagination; and he can fling himself
 into business with that superior earnestness that properly belongs to
 play.  And Rowley was a boy made to my hand.  He had a high sense of
 romance, and a secret cultus for all soldiers and criminals.  His
 travelling library consisted of a chap-book life of Wallace and some
 sixpenny parts of the 'Old Bailey Sessions Papers' by Gurney the
 shorthand writer; and the choice depicts his character to a hair.  You
 can imagine how his new prospects brightened on a boy of this
 disposition.  To be the servant and companion of a fugitive, a soldier,
 and a murderer, rolled in one--to live by stratagems, disguises, and
 false names, in an atmosphere of midnight and mystery so thick that you
 could cut it with a knife--was really, I believe, more dear to him than
 his meals, though he was a great trencherman, and something of a glutton
 besides.  For myself, as the peg by which all this romantic business
 hung, I was simply idolised from that moment; and he would rather have
 sacrificed his hand than surrendered the privilege of serving me.
 
 We arranged the terms of our campaign, trudging amicably in the snow,
 which now, with the approach of morning, began to fall to purpose.  I
 chose the name of Ramornie, I imagine from its likeness to Romaine;
 Rowley, from an irresistible conversion of ideas, I dubbed Gammon.  His
 distress was laughable to witness: his own choice of an unassuming
 nickname had been Claude Duval!  We settled our procedure at the various
 inns where we should alight, rehearsed our little manners like a piece of
 drill until it seemed impossible we should ever be taken unprepared; and
 in all these dispositions, you maybe sure the despatch-box was not
 forgotten.  Who was to pick it up, who was to set it down, who was to
 remain beside it, who was to sleep with it--there was no contingency
 omitted, all was gone into with the thoroughness of a drill-sergeant on
 the one hand and a child with a new plaything on the other.
 
 'I say, wouldn't it look queer if you and me was to come to the
 post-house with all this luggage?' said Rowley.
 
 'I dare say,' I replied.  'But what else is to be done?'
 
 'Well, now, sir--you hear me,' says Rowley.  'I think it would look more
 natural-like if you was to come to the post-house alone, and with nothing
 in your 'ands--more like a gentleman, you know.  And you might say that
 your servant and baggage was a-waiting for you up the road.  I think I
 could manage, somehow, to make a shift with all them dratted
 things--leastways if you was to give me a 'and up with them at the
 start.'
 
 'And I would see you far enough before I allowed you to try, Mr. Rowley!'
 I cried.  'Why, you would be quite defenceless!  A footpad that was an
 infant child could rob you.  And I should probably come driving by to
 find you in a ditch with your throat cut.  But there is something in your
 idea, for all that; and I propose we put it in execution no farther
 forward than the next corner of a lane.'
 
 Accordingly, instead of continuing to aim for Aylesbury, we headed by
 cross-roads for some point to the northward of it, whither I might assist
 Rowley with the baggage, and where I might leave him to await my return
 in the post-chaise.
 
 It was snowing to purpose, the country all white, and ourselves walking
 snowdrifts, when the first glimmer of the morning showed us an inn upon
 the highwayside.  Some distance off, under the shelter of a corner of the
 road and a clump of trees, I loaded Rowley with the whole of our
 possessions, and watched him till he staggered in safety into the doors
 of the _Green Dragon_, which was the sign of the house.  Thence I walked
 briskly into Aylesbury, rejoicing in my freedom and the causeless good
 spirits that belong to a snowy morning; though, to be sure, long before I
 had arrived the snow had again ceased to fall, and the eaves of Aylesbury
 were smoking in the level sun.  There was an accumulation of gigs and
 chaises in the yard, and a great bustle going forward in the coffee-room
 and about the doors of the inn.  At these evidences of so much travel on
 the road I was seized with a misgiving lest it should be impossible to
 get horses, and I should be detained in the precarious neighbourhood of
 my cousin.  Hungry as I was, I made my way first of all to the
 postmaster, where he stood--a big, athletic, horsey-looking man, blowing
 into a key in the corner of the yard.
 
 On my making my modest request, he awoke from his indifference into what
 seemed passion.
 
 'A po'-shay and 'osses!' he cried.  'Do I look as if I 'ad a po'-shay and
 'osses?  Damn me, if I 'ave such a thing on the premises.  I don't _make_
 'osses and chaises--I '_ire_ 'em.  You might be God Almighty!' said he;
 and instantly, as if he had observed me for the first time, he broke off,
 and lowered his voice into the confidential.  'Why, now that I see you
 are a gentleman,' said he, 'I'll tell you what!  If you like to _buy_, I
 have the article to fit you.  Second-'and shay by Lycett, of London.
 Latest style; good as new.  Superior fittin's, net on the roof, baggage
 platform, pistol 'olsters--the most com-plete and the most gen-teel
 turn-out I ever see!  The 'ole for seventy-five pound!  It's as good as
 givin' her away!'
 
 'Do you propose I should trundle it myself, like a hawker's barrow?' said
 I.  'Why, my good man, if I had to stop here, anyway, I should prefer to
 buy a house and garden!'
 
 'Come and look at her!' he cried; and, with the word, links his arm in
 mine and carries me to the outhouse where the chaise was on view.
 
 It was just the sort of chaise that I had dreamed of for my purpose:
 eminently rich, inconspicuous, and genteel; for, though I thought the
 postmaster no great authority, I was bound to agree with him so far.  The
 body was painted a dark claret, and the wheels an invisible green.  The
 lamp and glasses were bright as silver; and the whole equipage had an air
 of privacy and reserve that seemed to repel inquiry and disarm suspicion.
 With a servant like Rowley, and a chaise like this, I felt that I could
 go from the Land's End to John o' Groat's House amid a population of
 bowing ostlers.  And I suppose I betrayed in my manner the degree in
 which the bargain tempted me.
 
 'Come,' cried the postmaster--'I'll make it seventy, to oblige a friend!'
 
 'The point is: the horses,' said I.
 
 'Well,' said he, consulting his watch, 'it's now gone the 'alf after
 eight.  What time do you want her at the door?'
 
 'Horses and all?' said I.
 
 ''Osses and all!' says he.  'One good turn deserves another.  You give me
 seventy pound for the shay, and I'll 'oss it for you.  I told you I
 didn't _make_ 'osses; but I _can_ make 'em, to oblige a friend.'
 
 What would you have?  It was not the wisest thing in the world to buy a
 chaise within a dozen miles of my uncle's house; but in this way I got my
 horses for the next stage.  And by any other it appeared that I should
 have to wait.  Accordingly I paid the money down--perhaps twenty pounds
 too much, though it was certainly a well-made and well-appointed
 vehicle--ordered it round in half an hour, and proceeded to refresh
 myself with breakfast.
 
 The table to which I sat down occupied the recess of a bay-window, and
 commanded a view of the front of the inn, where I continued to be amused
 by the successive departures of travellers--the fussy and the offhand,
 the niggardly and the lavish--all exhibiting their different characters
 in that diagnostic moment of the farewell: some escorted to the stirrup
 or the chaise door by the chamberlain, the chambermaids and the waiters
 almost in a body, others moving off under a cloud, without human
 countenance.  In the course of this I became interested in one for whom
 this ovation began to assume the proportions of a triumph; not only the
 under-servants, but the barmaid, the landlady, and my friend the
 postmaster himself, crowding about the steps to speed his departure.  I
 was aware, at the same time, of a good deal of merriment, as though the
 traveller were a man of a ready wit, and not too dignified to air it in
 that society.  I leaned forward with a lively curiosity; and the next
 moment I had blotted myself behind the teapot.  The popular traveller had
 turned to wave a farewell; and behold! he was no other than my cousin
 Alain.  It was a change of the sharpest from the angry, pallid man I had
 seen at Amersham Place.  Ruddy to a fault, illuminated with vintages,
 crowned with his curls like Bacchus, he now stood before me for an
 instant, the perfect master of himself, smiling with airs of conscious
 popularity and insufferable condescension.  He reminded me at once of a
 royal duke, or an actor turned a little elderly, and of a blatant bagman
 who should have been the illegitimate son of a gentleman.  A moment after
 he was gliding noiselessly on the road to London.
 
 I breathed again.  I recognised, with heartfelt gratitude, how lucky I
 had been to go in by the stable-yard instead of the hostelry door, and
 what a fine occasion of meeting my cousin I had lost by the purchase of
 the claret-coloured chaise!  The next moment I remembered that there was
 a waiter present.  No doubt but he must have observed me when I crouched
 behind the breakfast equipage; no doubt but he must have commented on
 this unusual and undignified behaviour; and it was essential that I
 should do something to remove the impression.
 
 'Waiter!' said I, 'that was the nephew of Count Carwell that just drove
 off, wasn't it?'
 
 'Yes, sir: Viscount Carwell we calls him,' he replied.
 
 'Ah, I thought as much,' said I.  'Well, well, damn all these Frenchmen,
 say I!'
 
 'You may say so indeed, sir,' said the waiter.  'They ain't not to say in
 the same field with our 'ome-raised gentry.'
 
 'Nasty tempers?' I suggested.
 
 'Beas'ly temper, sir, the Viscount 'ave,' said the waiter with feeling.
 'Why, no longer agone than this morning, he was sitting breakfasting and
 reading in his paper.  I suppose, sir, he come on some pilitical
 information, or it might be about 'orses, but he raps his 'and upon the
 table sudden and calls for curacoa.  It gave me quite a turn, it did; he
 did it that sudden and 'ard.  Now, sir, that may be manners in France,
 but hall I can say is, that I'm not used to it.'
 
 'Reading the paper, was he?' said I.  'What paper, eh?'
 
 'Here it is, sir,' exclaimed the waiter.  'Seems like as if he'd dropped
 it.'
 
 And picking it off the floor he presented it to me.
 
 I may say that I was quite prepared, that I already knew what to expect;
 but at sight of the cold print my heart stopped beating.  There it was:
 the fulfilment of Romaine's apprehension was before me; the paper was
 laid open at the capture of Clausel.  I felt as if I could take a little
 curacoa myself, but on second thoughts called for brandy.  It was badly
 wanted; and suddenly I observed the waiter's eye to sparkle, as it were,
 with some recognition; made certain he had remarked the resemblance
 between me and Alain; and became aware--as by a revelation--of the fool's
 part I had been playing.  For I had now managed to put my identification
 beyond a doubt, if Alain should choose to make his inquiries at
 Aylesbury; and, as if that were not enough, I had added, at an expense of
 seventy pounds, a clue by which he might follow me through the length and
 breadth of England, in the shape of the claret-coloured chaise!  That
 elegant equipage (which I began to regard as little better than a
 claret-coloured ante-room to the hangman's cart) coming presently to the
 door, I left my breakfast in the middle and departed; posting to the
 north as diligently as my cousin Alain was posting to the south, and
 putting my trust (such as it was) in an opposite direction and equal
 speed.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII--CHARACTER AND ACQUIREMENTS OF MR.  ROWLEY
 
 
 I am not certain that I had ever really appreciated before that hour the
 extreme peril of the adventure on which I was embarked.  The sight of my
 cousin, the look of his face--so handsome, so jovial at the first sight,
 and branded with so much malignity as you saw it on the second--with his
 hyperbolical curls in order, with his neckcloth tied as if for the
 conquests of love, setting forth (as I had no doubt in the world he was
 doing) to clap the Bow Street runners on my trail, and cover England with
 handbills, each dangerous as a loaded musket, convinced me for the first
 time that the affair was no less serious than death.  I believe it came
 to a near touch whether I should not turn the horses' heads at the next
 stage and make directly for the coast.  But I was now in the position of
 a man who should have thrown his gage into the den of lions; or, better
 still, like one who should have quarrelled overnight under the influence
 of wine, and now, at daylight, in a cold winter's morning, and humbly
 sober, must make good his words.  It is not that I thought any the less,
 or any the less warmly, of Flora.  But, as I smoked a grim segar that
 morning in a corner of the chaise, no doubt I considered, in the first
 place, that the letter-post had been invented, and admitted privately to
 myself, in the second, that it would have been highly possible to write
 her on a piece of paper, seal it, and send it skimming by the mail,
 instead of going personally into these egregious dangers, and through a
 country that I beheld crowded with gibbets and Bow Street officers.  As
 for Sim and Candlish, I doubt if they crossed my mind.
 
 At the Green Dragon Rowley was waiting on the doorsteps with the luggage,
 and really was bursting with unpalatable conversation.
 
 'Who do you think we've 'ad 'ere, sir?' he began breathlessly, as the
 chaise drove off.  'Red Breasts'; and he nodded his head portentously.
 
 'Red Breasts?' I repeated, for I stupidly did not understand at the
 moment an expression I had often heard.
 
 'Ah!' said he.  'Red weskits.  Runners.  Bow Street runners.  Two on' em,
 and one was Lavender himself!  I hear the other say quite plain, "Now,
 Mr. Lavender, _if_ you're ready."  They was breakfasting as nigh me as I
 am to that postboy.  They're all right; they ain't after us.  It's a
 forger; and I didn't send them off on a false scent--O no!  I thought
 there was no use in having them over our way; so I give them "very
 valuable information," Mr. Lavender said, and tipped me a tizzy for
 myself; and they're off to Luton.  They showed me the 'andcuffs, too--the
 other one did--and he clicked the dratted things on my wrist; and I tell
 you, I believe I nearly went off in a swound!  There's something so
 beastly in the feel of them!  Begging your pardon, Mr. Anne,' he added,
 with one of his delicious changes from the character of the confidential
 schoolboy into that of the trained, respectful servant.
 
 Well, I must not be proud!  I cannot say I found the subject of handcuffs
 to my fancy; and it was with more asperity than was needful that I
 reproved him for the slip about the name.
 
 'Yes, Mr. Ramornie,' says he, touching his hat.  'Begging your pardon,
 Mr. Ramornie.  But I've been very piticular, sir, up to now; and you may
 trust me to be very piticular in the future.  It were only a slip, sir.'
 
 'My good boy,' said I, with the most imposing severity, 'there must be no
 slips.  Be so good as to remember that my life is at stake.'
 
 I did not embrace the occasion of telling him how many I had made myself.
 It is my principle that an officer must never be wrong.  I have seen two
 divisions beating their brains out for a fortnight against a worthless
 and quite impregnable castle in a pass: I knew we were only doing it for
 discipline, because the General had said so at first, and had not yet
 found any way out of his own words; and I highly admired his force of
 character, and throughout these operations thought my life exposed in a
 very good cause.  With fools and children, which included Rowley, the
 necessity was even greater.  I proposed to myself to be infallible; and
 even when he expressed some wonder at the purchase of the claret-coloured
 chaise, I put him promptly in his place.  In our situation, I told him,
 everything had to be sacrificed to appearances; doubtless, in a hired
 chaise, we should have had more freedom, but look at the dignity!  I was
 so positive, that I had sometimes almost convinced myself.  Not for long,
 you may be certain!  This detestable conveyance always appeared to me to
 be laden with Bow Street officers, and to have a placard upon the back of
 it publishing my name and crimes.  If I had paid seventy pounds to get
 the thing, I should not have stuck at seven hundred to be safely rid of
 it.
 
 And if the chaise was a danger, what an anxiety was the despatch-box and
 its golden cargo!  I had never had a care but to draw my pay and spend
 it; I had lived happily in the regiment, as in my father's house, fed by
 the great Emperor's commissariat as by ubiquitous doves of Elijah--or, my
 faith! if anything went wrong with the commissariat, helping myself with
 the best grace in the world from the next peasant!  And now I began to
 feel at the same time the burthen of riches and the fear of destitution.
 There were ten thousand pounds in the despatch-box, but I reckoned in
 French money, and had two hundred and fifty thousand agonies; I kept it
 under my hand all day, I dreamed of it at night.  In the inns, I was
 afraid to go to dinner and afraid to go to sleep.  When I walked up a
 hill I durst not leave the doors of the claret-coloured chaise.
 Sometimes I would change the disposition of the funds: there were days
 when I carried as much as five or six thousand pounds on my own person,
 and only the residue continued to voyage in the treasure-chest--days when
 I bulked all over like my cousin, crackled to a touch with bank paper,
 and had my pockets weighed to bursting-point with sovereigns.  And there
 were other days when I wearied of the thing--or grew ashamed of it--and
 put all the money back where it had come from: there let it take its
 chance, like better people!  In short, I set Rowley a poor example of
 consistency, and in philosophy, none at all.
 
 Little he cared!  All was one to him so long as he was amused, and I
 never knew any one amused more easily.  He was thrillingly interested in
 life, travel, and his own melodramatic position.  All day he would be
 looking from the chaise windows with ebullitions of gratified curiosity,
 that were sometimes justified and sometimes not, and that (taken
 altogether) it occasionally wearied me to be obliged to share.  I can
 look at horses, and I can look at trees too, although not fond of it.
 But why should I look at a lame horse, or a tree that was like the letter
 Y?  What exhilaration could I feel in viewing a cottage that was the same
 colour as 'the second from the miller's' in some place where I had never
 been, and of which I had not previously heard?  I am ashamed to complain,
 but there were moments when my juvenile and confidential friend weighed
 heavy on my hands.  His cackle was indeed almost continuous, but it was
 never unamiable.  He showed an amiable curiosity when he was asking
 questions; an amiable guilelessness when he was conferring information.
 And both he did largely.  I am in a position to write the biographies of
 Mr. Rowley, Mr. Rowley's father and mother, his Aunt Eliza, and the
 miller's dog; and nothing but pity for the reader, and some misgivings as
 to the law of copyright, prevail on me to withhold them.
 
 A general design to mould himself upon my example became early apparent,
 and I had not the heart to check it.  He began to mimic my carriage; he
 acquired, with servile accuracy, a little manner I had of shrugging the
 shoulders; and I may say it was by observing it in him that I first
 discovered it in myself.  One day it came out by chance that I was of the
 Catholic religion.  He became plunged in thought, at which I was gently
 glad.  Then suddenly--
 
 'Odd-rabbit it!  I'll be Catholic too!' he broke out.  'You must teach me
 it, Mr. Anne--I mean, Ramornie.'
 
 I dissuaded him: alleging that he would find me very imperfectly informed
 as to the grounds and doctrines of the Church, and that, after all, in
 the matter of religions, it was a very poor idea to change.  'Of course,
 my Church is the best,' said I; 'but that is not the reason why I belong
 to it: I belong to it because it was the faith of my house.  I wish to
 take my chances with my own people, and so should you.  If it is a
 question of going to hell, go to hell like a gentleman with your
 ancestors.'
 
 'Well, it wasn't that,' he admitted.  'I don't know that I was exactly
 thinking of hell.  Then there's the inquisition, too.  That's rather a
 cawker, you know.'
 
 'And I don't believe you were thinking of anything in the world,' said
 I--which put a period to his respectable conversion.
 
 He consoled himself by playing for awhile on a cheap flageolet, which was
 one of his diversions, and to which I owed many intervals of peace.  When
 he first produced it, in the joints, from his pocket, he had the
 duplicity to ask me if I played upon it.  I answered, no; and he put the
 instrument away with a sigh and the remark that he had thought I might.
 For some while he resisted the unspeakable temptation, his fingers
 visibly itching and twittering about his pocket, even his interest in the
 landscape and in sporadic anecdote entirely lost.  Presently the pipe was
 in his hands again; he fitted, unfitted, refitted, and played upon it in
 dumb show for some time.
 
 'I play it myself a little,' says he.
 
 'Do you?' said I, and yawned.
 
 And then he broke down.
 
 'Mr. Ramornie, if you please, would it disturb you, sir, if I was to play
 a chune?' he pleaded.  And from that hour, the tootling of the flageolet
 cheered our way.
 
 He was particularly keen on the details of battles, single combats,
 incidents of scouting parties, and the like.  These he would make haste
 to cap with some of the exploits of Wallace, the only hero with whom he
 had the least acquaintance.  His enthusiasm was genuine and pretty.  When
 he learned we were going to Scotland, 'Well, then,' he broke out, 'I'll
 see where Wallace lived!'  And presently after, he fell to moralising.
 'It's a strange thing, sir,' he began, 'that I seem somehow to have
 always the wrong sow by the ear.  I'm English after all, and I glory in
 it.  My eye! don't I, though!  Let some of your Frenchies come over here
 to invade, and you'll see whether or not!  Oh, yes, I'm English to the
 backbone, I am.  And yet look at me!  I got hold of this 'ere William
 Wallace and took to him right off; I never heard of such a man before!
 And then you came along, and I took to you.  And both the two of you were
 my born enemies!  I--I beg your pardon, Mr. Ramornie, but would you mind
 it very much if you didn't go for to do anything against England'--he
 brought the word out suddenly, like something hot--'when I was along of
 you?'
 
 I was more affected than I can tell.
 
 'Rowley,' I said, 'you need have no fear.  By how much I love my own
 honour, by so much I will take care to protect yours.  We are but
 fraternising at the outposts, as soldiers do.  When the bugle calls, my
 boy, we must face each other, one for England, one for France, and may
 God defend the right!'
 
 So I spoke at the moment; but for all my brave airs, the boy had wounded
 me in a vital quarter.  His words continued to ring in my hearing.  There
 was no remission all day of my remorseful thoughts; and that night (which
 we lay at Lichfield, I believe) there was no sleep for me in my bed.  I
 put out the candle and lay down with a good resolution; and in a moment
 all was light about me like a theatre, and I saw myself upon the stage of
 it playing ignoble parts.  I remembered France and my Emperor, now
 depending on the arbitrament of war, bent down, fighting on their knees
 and with their teeth against so many and such various assailants.  And I
 burned with shame to be here in England, cherishing an English fortune,
 pursuing an English mistress, and not there, to handle a musket in my
 native fields, and to manure them with my body if I fell.  I remembered
 that I belonged to France.  All my fathers had fought for her, and some
 had died; the voice in my throat, the sight of my eyes, the tears that
 now sprang there, the whole man of me, was fashioned of French earth and
 born of a French mother; I had been tended and caressed by a succession
 of the daughters of France, the fairest, the most ill-starred; and I had
 fought and conquered shoulder to shoulder with her sons.  A soldier, a
 noble, of the proudest and bravest race in Europe, it had been left to
 the prattle of a hobbledehoy lackey in an English chaise to recall me to
 the consciousness of duty.
 
 When I saw how it was I did not lose time in indecision.  The old
 classical conflict of love and honour being once fairly before me, it did
 not cost me a thought.  I was a Saint-Yves de Keroual; and I decided to
 strike off on the morrow for Wakefield and Burchell Fenn, and embark, as
 soon as it should be morally possible, for the succour of my downtrodden
 fatherland and my beleaguered Emperor.  Pursuant on this resolve, I
 leaped from bed, made a light, and as the watchman was crying half-past
 two in the dark streets of Lichfield, sat down to pen a letter of
 farewell to Flora.  And then--whether it was the sudden chill of the
 night, whether it came by association of ideas from the remembrance of
 Swanston Cottage I know not, but there appeared before me--to the barking
 of sheep-dogs--a couple of snuffy and shambling figures, each wrapped in
 a plaid, each armed with a rude staff; and I was immediately bowed down
 to have forgotten them so long, and of late to have thought of them so
 cavalierly.
 
 Sure enough there was my errand!  As a private person I was neither
 French nor English; I was something else first: a loyal gentleman, an
 honest man.  Sim and Candlish must not be left to pay the penalty of my
 unfortunate blow.  They held my honour tacitly pledged to succour them;
 and it is a sort of stoical refinement entirely foreign to my nature to
 set the political obligation above the personal and private.  If France
 fell in the interval for the lack of Anne de St.-Yves, fall she must!
 But I was both surprised and humiliated to have had so plain a duty bound
 upon me for so long--and for so long to have neglected and forgotten it.
 I think any brave man will understand me when I say that I went to bed
 and to sleep with a conscience very much relieved, and woke again in the
 morning with a light heart.  The very danger of the enterprise reassured
 me: to save Sim and Candlish (suppose the worst to come to the worst) it
 would be necessary for me to declare myself in a court of justice, with
 consequences which I did not dare to dwell upon; it could never be said
 that I had chosen the cheap and the easy--only that in a very perplexing
 competition of duties I had risked my life for the most immediate.
 
 We resumed the journey with more diligence: thenceforward posted day and
 night; did not halt beyond what was necessary for meals; and the
 postillions were excited by gratuities, after the habit of my cousin
 Alain.  For twopence I could have gone farther and taken four horses; so
 extreme was my haste, running as I was before the terrors of an awakened
 conscience.  But I feared to be conspicuous.  Even as it was, we
 attracted only too much attention, with our pair and that white elephant,
 the seventy-pounds-worth of claret-coloured chaise.
 
 Meanwhile I was ashamed to look Rowley in the face.  The young shaver had
 contrived to put me wholly in the wrong; he had cost me a night's rest
 and a severe and healthful humiliation; and I was grateful and
 embarrassed in his society.  This would never do; it was contrary to all
 my ideas of discipline; if the officer has to blush before the private,
 or the master before the servant, nothing is left to hope for but
 discharge or death.  I hit upon the idea of teaching him French; and
 accordingly, from Lichfield, I became the distracted master, and he the
 scholar--how shall I say? indefatigable, but uninspired.  His interest
 never flagged.  He would hear the same word twenty times with profound
 refreshment, mispronounce it in several different ways, and forget it
 again with magical celerity.  Say it happened to be _stirrup_.  'No, I
 don't seem to remember that word, Mr. Anne,' he would say: 'it don't seem
 to stick to me, that word don't.'  And then, when I had told it him
 again, '_Etrier_!' he would cry.  'To be sure!  I had it on the tip of my
 tongue.  _Eterier_!' (going wrong already, as if by a fatal instinct).
 'What will I remember it by, now?  Why, _interior_, to be sure!  I'll
 remember it by its being something that ain't in the interior of a
 horse.'  And when next I had occasion to ask him the French for stirrup,
 it was a toss-up whether he had forgotten all about it, or gave me
 _exterior_ for an answer.  He was never a hair discouraged.  He seemed to
 consider that he was covering the ground at a normal rate.  He came up
 smiling day after day.  'Now, sir, shall we do our French?' he would say;
 and I would put questions, and elicit copious commentary and explanation,
 but never the shadow of an answer.  My hands fell to my sides; I could
 have wept to hear him.  When I reflected that he had as yet learned
 nothing, and what a vast deal more there was for him to learn, the period
 of these lessons seemed to unroll before me vast as eternity, and I saw
 myself a teacher of a hundred, and Rowley a pupil of ninety, still
 hammering on the rudiments!  The wretched boy, I should say, was quite
 unspoiled by the inevitable familiarities of the journey.  He turned out
 at each stage the pink of serving-lads, deft, civil, prompt, attentive,
 touching his hat like an automaton, raising the status of Mr. Ramornie in
 the eyes of all the inn by his smiling service, and seeming capable of
 anything in the world but the one thing I had chosen--learning French!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII--THE ADVENTURE OF THE RUNAWAY COUPLE
 
 
 The country had for some time back been changing in character.  By a
 thousand indications I could judge that I was again drawing near to
 Scotland.  I saw it written in the face of the hills, in the growth of
 the trees, and in the glint of the waterbrooks that kept the high-road
 company.  It might have occurred to me, also, that I was, at the same
 time, approaching a place of some fame in Britain--Gretna Green.  Over
 these same leagues of road--which Rowley and I now traversed in the
 claret-coloured chaise, to the note of the flageolet and the French
 lesson--how many pairs of lovers had gone bowling northwards to the music
 of sixteen scampering horseshoes; and how many irate persons, parents,
 uncles, guardians, evicted rivals, had come tearing after, clapping the
 frequent red face to the chaise-window, lavishly shedding their gold
 about the post-houses, sedulously loading and re-loading, as they went,
 their avenging pistols!  But I doubt if I had thought of it at all,
 before a wayside hazard swept me into the thick of an adventure of this
 nature; and I found myself playing providence with other people's lives,
 to my own admiration at the moment--and subsequently to my own brief but
 passionate regret.
 
 At rather an ugly corner of an uphill reach I came on the wreck of a
 chaise lying on one side in the ditch, a man and a woman in animated
 discourse in the middle of the road, and the two postillions, each with
 his pair of horses, looking on and laughing from the saddle.
 
 'Morning breezes! here's a smash!' cried Rowley, pocketing his flageolet
 in the middle of the _Tight Little Island_.
 
 I was perhaps more conscious of the moral smash than the physical--more
 alive to broken hearts than to broken chaises; for, as plain as the sun
 at morning, there was a screw loose in this runaway match.  It is always
 a bad sign when the lower classes laugh: their taste in humour is both
 poor and sinister; and for a man, running the posts with four horses,
 presumably with open pockets, and in the company of the most entrancing
 little creature conceivable, to have come down so far as to be laughed at
 by his own postillions, was only to be explained on the double
 hypothesis, that he was a fool and no gentleman.
 
 I have said they were man and woman.  I should have said man and child.
 She was certainly not more than seventeen, pretty as an angel, just plump
 enough to damn a saint, and dressed in various shades of blue, from her
 stockings to her saucy cap, in a kind of taking gamut, the top note of
 which she flung me in a beam from her too appreciative eye.  There was no
 doubt about the case: I saw it all.  From a boarding-school, a
 black-board, a piano, and Clementi's _Sonatinas_, the child had made a
 rash adventure upon life in the company of a half-bred hawbuck; and she
 was already not only regretting it, but expressing her regret with point
 and pungency.
 
 As I alighted they both paused with that unmistakable air of being
 interrupted in a scene.  I uncovered to the lady and placed my services
 at their disposal.
 
 It was the man who answered.  'There's no use in shamming, sir,' said he.
 'This lady and I have run away, and her father's after us: road to
 Gretna, sir.  And here have these nincompoops spilt us in the ditch and
 smashed the chaise!'
 
 'Very provoking,' said I.
 
 'I don't know when I've been so provoked!' cried he, with a glance down
 the road, of mortal terror.
 
 'The father is no doubt very much incensed?' I pursued civilly.
 
 'O God!' cried the hawbuck.  'In short, you see, we must get out of this.
 And I'll tell you what--it may seem cool, but necessity has no law--if
 you would lend us your chaise to the next post-house, it would be the
 very thing, sir.'
 
 'I confess it seems cool,' I replied.
 
 'What's that you say, sir?' he snapped.
 
 'I was agreeing with you,' said I.  'Yes, it does seem cool; and what is
 more to the point, it seems unnecessary.  This thing can be arranged in a
 more satisfactory manner otherwise, I think.  You can doubtless ride?'
 
 This opened a door on the matter of their previous dispute, and the
 fellow appeared life-sized in his true colours.  'That's what I've been
 telling her: that, damn her! she must ride!' he broke out.  'And if the
 gentleman's of the same mind, why, damme, you shall!'
 
 As he said so, he made a snatch at her wrist, which she evaded with
 horror.
 
 I stepped between them.
 
 'No, sir,' said I; 'the lady shall not.'
 
 He turned on me raging.  'And who are you to interfere?' he roared.
 
 'There is here no question of who I am,' I replied.  'I may be the devil
 or the Archbishop of Canterbury for what you know, or need know.  The
 point is that I can help you--it appears that nobody else can; and I will
 tell you how I propose to do it.  I will give the lady a seat in my
 chaise, if you will return the compliment by allowing my servant to ride
 one of your horses.'
 
 I thought he would have sprung at my throat.
 
 'You have always the alternative before you: to wait here for the arrival
 of papa,' I added.
 
 And that settled him.  He cast another haggard look down the road, and
 capitulated.
 
 'I am sure, sir, the lady is very much obliged to you,' he said, with an
 ill grace.
 
 I gave her my hand; she mounted like a bird into the chaise; Rowley,
 grinning from ear to ear, closed the door behind us; the two impudent
 rascals of post-boys cheered and laughed aloud as we drove off; and my
 own postillion urged his horses at once into a rattling trot.  It was
 plain I was supposed by all to have done a very dashing act, and ravished
 the bride from the ravisher.
 
 In the meantime I stole a look at the little lady.  She was in a state of
 pitiable discomposure, and her arms shook on her lap in her black lace
 mittens.
 
 'Madam--' I began.
 
 And she, in the same moment, finding her voice: 'O, what you must think
 of me!'
 
 'Madam,' said I, 'what must any gentleman think when he sees youth,
 beauty and innocence in distress?  I wish I could tell you that I was old
 enough to be your father; I think we must give that up,' I continued,
 with a smile.  'But I will tell you something about myself which ought to
 do as well, and to set that little heart at rest in my society.  I am a
 lover.  May I say it of myself--for I am not quite used to all the
 niceties of English--that I am a true lover?  There is one whom I admire,
 adore, obey; she is no less good than she is beautiful; if she were here,
 she would take you to her arms: conceive that she has sent me--that she
 has said to me, "Go, be her knight!"'
 
 'O, I know she must be sweet, I know she must be worthy of you!' cried
 the little lady.  'She would never forget female decorum--nor make the
 terrible _erratum_ I've done!'
 
 And at this she lifted up her voice and wept.
 
 This did not forward matters: it was in vain that I begged her to be more
 composed and to tell me a plain, consecutive tale of her misadventures;
 but she continued instead to pour forth the most extraordinary mixture of
 the correct school miss and the poor untutored little piece of womanhood
 in a false position--of engrafted pedantry and incoherent nature.
 
 'I am certain it must have been judicial blindness,' she sobbed.  'I
 can't think how I didn't see it, but I didn't; and he isn't, is he?  And
 then a curtain rose . . . O, what a moment was that!  But I knew at once
 that _you were_; you had but to appear from your carriage, and I knew it,
 O, she must be a fortunate young lady!  And I have no fear with you,
 none--a perfect confidence.'
 
 'Madam,' said I, 'a gentleman.'
 
 'That's what I mean--a gentleman,' she exclaimed.  'And he--and
 that--_he_ isn't.  O, how shall I dare meet father!'  And disclosing to
 me her tear-stained face, and opening her arms with a tragic gesture:
 'And I am quite disgraced before all the young ladies, my
 school-companions!' she added.
 
 'O, not so bad as that!' I cried.  'Come, come, you exaggerate, my dear
 Miss--?  Excuse me if I am too familiar: I have not yet heard your name.'
 
 'My name is Dorothy Greensleeves, sir: why should I conceal it?  I fear
 it will only serve to point an adage to future generations, and I had
 meant so differently!  There was no young female in the county more
 emulous to be thought well of than I.  And what a fall was there!  O,
 dear me, what a wicked, piggish donkey of a girl I have made of myself,
 to be sure!  And there is no hope! O, Mr.--'
 
 And at that she paused and asked my name.
 
 I am not writing my eulogium for the Academy; I will admit it was
 unpardonably imbecile, but I told it her.  If you had been there--and
 seen her, ravishingly pretty and little, a baby in years and mind--and
 heard her talking like a book, with so much of schoolroom propriety in
 her manner, with such an innocent despair in the matter--you would
 probably have told her yours.  She repeated it after me.
 
 'I shall pray for you all my life,' she said.  'Every night, when I
 retire to rest, the last thing I shall do is to remember you by name.'
 
 Presently I succeeded in winning from her her tale, which was much what I
 had anticipated: a tale of a schoolhouse, a walled garden, a fruit-tree
 that concealed a bench, an impudent raff posturing in church, an exchange
 of flowers and vows over the garden wall, a silly schoolmate for a
 confidante, a chaise and four, and the most immediate and perfect
 disenchantment on the part of the little lady.  'And there is nothing to
 be done!' she wailed in conclusion.  'My error is irretrievable, I am
 quite forced to that conclusion.  O, Monsieur de Saint-Yves! who would
 have thought that I could have been such a blind, wicked donkey!'
 
 I should have said before--only that I really do not know when it came
 in--that we had been overtaken by the two post-boys, Rowley and Mr.
 Bellamy, which was the hawbuck's name, bestriding the four post-horses;
 and that these formed a sort of cavalry escort, riding now before, now
 behind the chaise, and Bellamy occasionally posturing at the window and
 obliging us with some of his conversation.  He was so ill-received that I
 declare I was tempted to pity him, remembering from what a height he had
 fallen, and how few hours ago it was since the lady had herself fled to
 his arms, all blushes and ardour.  Well, these great strokes of fortune
 usually befall the unworthy, and Bellamy was now the legitimate object of
 my commiseration and the ridicule of his own post-boys!
 
 'Miss Dorothy,' said I, 'you wish to be delivered from this man?'
 
 'O, if it were possible!' she cried.  'But not by violence.'
 
 'Not in the least, ma'am,' I replied.  'The simplest thing in life.  We
 are in a civilised country; the man's a malefactor--'
 
 'O, never!' she cried.  'Do not even dream it!  With all his faults, I
 know he is not _that_.'
 
 'Anyway, he's in the wrong in this affair--on the wrong side of the law,
 call it what you please,' said I; and with that, our four horsemen having
 for the moment headed us by a considerable interval, I hailed my post-boy
 and inquired who was the nearest magistrate and where he lived.
 Archdeacon Clitheroe, he told me, a prodigious dignitary, and one who
 lived but a lane or two back, and at the distance of only a mile or two
 out of the direct road.  I showed him the king's medallion.
 
 'Take the lady there, and at full gallop,' I cried.
 
 'Right, sir!  Mind yourself,' says the postillion.
 
 And before I could have thought it possible, he had turned the carriage
 to the rightabout and we were galloping south.
 
 Our outriders were quick to remark and imitate the manoeuvre, and came
 flying after us with a vast deal of indiscriminate shouting; so that the
 fine, sober picture of a carriage and escort, that we had presented but a
 moment back, was transformed in the twinkling of an eye into the image of
 a noisy fox-chase.  The two postillions and my own saucy rogue were, of
 course, disinterested actors in the comedy; they rode for the mere sport,
 keeping in a body, their mouths full of laughter, waving their hats as
 they came on, and crying (as the fancy struck them) Tally-ho!'  'Stop,
 thief!'  'A highwayman!  A highwayman!'  It was otherguess work with
 Bellamy.  That gentleman no sooner observed our change of direction than
 he turned his horse with so much violence that the poor animal was almost
 cast upon its side, and launched her in immediate and desperate pursuit.
 As he approached I saw that his face was deadly white and that he carried
 a drawn pistol in his hand.  I turned at once to the poor little bride
 that was to have been, and now was not to be; she, upon her side,
 deserting the other window, turned as if to meet me.
 
 'O, O, don't let him kill me!' she screamed.
 
 'Never fear,' I replied.
 
 Her face was distorted with terror.  Her hands took hold upon me with the
 instinctive clutch of an infant.  The chaise gave a flying lurch, which
 took the feet from under me and tumbled us anyhow upon the seat.  And
 almost in the same moment the head of Bellamy appeared in the window
 which Missy had left free for him.
 
 Conceive the situation!  The little lady and I were falling--or had just
 fallen--backward on the seat, and offered to the eye a somewhat ambiguous
 picture.  The chaise was speeding at a furious pace, and with the most
 violent leaps and lurches, along the highway.  Into this bounding
 receptacle Bellamy interjected his head, his pistol arm, and his pistol;
 and since his own horse was travelling still faster than the chaise, he
 must withdraw all of them again in the inside of the fraction of a
 minute.  He did so, but he left the charge of the pistol behind
 him--whether by design or accident I shall never know, and I dare say he
 has forgotten!  Probably he had only meant to threaten, in hopes of
 causing us to arrest our flight.  In the same moment came the explosion
 and a pitiful cry from Missy; and my gentleman, making certain he had
 struck her, went down the road pursued by the furies, turned at the first
 corner, took a flying leap over the thorn hedge, and disappeared across
 country in the least possible time.
 
 Rowley was ready and eager to pursue; but I withheld him, thinking we
 were excellently quit of Mr. Bellamy, at no more cost than a scratch on
 the forearm and a bullet-hole in the left-hand claret-coloured panel.
 And accordingly, but now at a more decent pace, we proceeded on our way
 to Archdeacon Clitheroe's, Missy's gratitude and admiration were aroused
 to a high pitch by this dramatic scene, and what she was pleased to call
 my wound.  She must dress it for me with her handkerchief, a service
 which she rendered me even with tears.  I could well have spared them,
 not loving on the whole to be made ridiculous, and the injury being in
 the nature of a cat's scratch.  Indeed, I would have suggested for her
 kind care rather the cure of my coat-sleeve, which had suffered worse in
 the encounter; but I was too wise to risk the anti-climax.  That she had
 been rescued by a hero, that the hero should have been wounded in the
 affray, and his wound bandaged with her handkerchief (which it could not
 even bloody), ministered incredibly to the recovery of her self-respect;
 and I could hear her relate the incident to 'the young ladies, my
 school-companions,' in the most approved manner of Mrs. Radcliffe!  To
 have insisted on the torn coat-sleeve would have been unmannerly, if not
 inhuman.
 
 Presently the residence of the archdeacon began to heave in sight.  A
 chaise and four smoking horses stood by the steps, and made way for us on
 our approach; and even as we alighted there appeared from the interior of
 the house a tall ecclesiastic, and beside him a little, headstrong, ruddy
 man, in a towering passion, and brandishing over his head a roll of
 paper.  At sight of him Miss Dorothy flung herself on her knees with the
 most moving adjurations, calling him father, assuring him she was wholly
 cured and entirely repentant of her disobedience, and entreating
 forgiveness; and I soon saw that she need fear no great severity from Mr.
 Greensleeves, who showed himself extraordinarily fond, loud, greedy of
 caresses and prodigal of tears.
 
 To give myself a countenance, as well as to have all ready for the road
 when I should find occasion, I turned to quit scores with Bellamy's two
 postillions.  They had not the least claim on me, but one of which they
 were quite ignorant--that I was a fugitive.  It is the worst feature of
 that false position that every gratuity becomes a case of conscience.
 You must not leave behind you any one discontented nor any one grateful.
 But the whole business had been such a 'hurrah-boys' from the beginning,
 and had gone off in the fifth act so like a melodrama, in explosions,
 reconciliations, and the rape of a post-horse, that it was plainly
 impossible to keep it covered.  It was plain it would have to be talked
 over in all the inn-kitchens for thirty miles about, and likely for six
 months to come.  It only remained for me, therefore, to settle on that
 gratuity which should be least conspicuous--so large that nobody could
 grumble, so small that nobody would be tempted to boast.  My decision was
 hastily and nor wisely taken.  The one fellow spat on his tip (so he
 called it) for luck; the other developing a sudden streak of piety,
 prayed God bless me with fervour.  It seemed a demonstration was brewing,
 and I determined to be off at once.  Bidding my own post-boy and Rowley
 be in readiness for an immediate start, I reascended the terrace and
 presented myself, hat in hand, before Mr. Greensleeves and the
 archdeacon.
 
 'You will excuse me, I trust,' said I.  'I think shame to interrupt this
 agreeable scene of family effusion, which I have been privileged in some
 small degree to bring about.'
 
 And at these words the storm broke.
 
 'Small degree! small degree, sir!' cries the father; 'that shall not
 pass, Mr. St. Eaves!  If I've got my darling back, and none the worse for
 that vagabone rascal, I know whom I have to thank.  Shake hands with
 me--up to the elbows, sir!  A Frenchman you may be, but you're one of the
 right breed, by God!  And, by God, sir, you may have anything you care to
 ask of me, down to Dolly's hand, by God!'
 
 All this he roared out in a voice surprisingly powerful from so small a
 person.  Every word was thus audible to the servants, who had followed
 them out of the house and now congregated about us on the terrace, as
 well as to Rowley and the five postillions on the gravel sweep below.
 The sentiments expressed were popular; some ass, whom the devil moved to
 be my enemy, proposed three cheers, and they were given with a will.  To
 hear my own name resounding amid acclamations in the hills of Westmorland
 was flattering, perhaps; but it was inconvenient at a moment when (as I
 was morally persuaded) police handbills were already speeding after me at
 the rate of a hundred miles a day.
 
 Nor was that the end of it.  The archdeacon must present his compliments,
 and pressed upon me some of his West India sherry, and I was carried into
 a vastly fine library, where I was presented to his lady wife.  While we
 were at sherry in the library, ale was handed round upon the terrace.
 Speeches were made, hands were shaken, Missy (at her father's request)
 kissed me farewell, and the whole party reaccompanied me to the terrace,
 where they stood waving hats and handkerchiefs, and crying farewells to
 all the echoes of the mountains until the chaise had disappeared.
 
 The echoes of the mountains were engaged in saying to me privately: 'You
 fool, you have done it now!'
 
 'They do seem to have got 'old of your name, Mr. Anne,' said Rowley.  'It
 weren't my fault this time.'
 
 'It was one of those accidents that can never be foreseen,' said I,
 affecting a dignity that I was far from feeling.  'Some one recognised
 me.'
 
 'Which on 'em, Mr. Anne?' said the rascal.
 
 'That is a senseless question; it can make no difference who it was,' I
 returned.
 
 'No, nor that it can't!' cried Rowley.  'I say, Mr. Anne, sir, it's what
 you would call a jolly mess, ain't it? looks like "clean bowled-out in
 the middle stump," don't it?'
 
 'I fail to understand you, Rowley.'
 
 'Well, what I mean is, what are we to do about this one?' pointing to the
 postillion in front of us, as he alternately hid and revealed his patched
 breeches to the trot of his horse.  'He see you get in this morning under
 _Mr. Ramornie_--I was very piticular to _Mr. Ramornie_ you, if you
 remember, sir--and he see you get in again under Mr. Saint Eaves, and
 whatever's he going to see you get out under? that's what worries me,
 sir.  It don't seem to me like as if the position was what you call
 _stratetegic_!'
 
 '_Parrrbleu_! will you let me be!' I cried.  'I have to think; you cannot
 imagine how your constant idiotic prattle annoys me.'
 
 'Beg pardon, Mr. Anne,' said he; and the next moment, 'You wouldn't like
 for us to do our French now, would you, Mr. Anne?'
 
 'Certainly not,' said I.  'Play upon your flageolet.'
 
 The which he did with what seemed to me to be irony.
 
 Conscience doth make cowards of us all!  I was so downcast by my pitiful
 mismanagement of the morning's business that I shrank from the eye of my
 own hired infant, and read offensive meanings into his idle tootling.
 
 I took off my coat, and set to mending it, soldier-fashion, with a needle
 and thread.  There is nothing more conducive to thought, above all in
 arduous circumstances; and as I sewed, I gradually gained a clearness
 upon my affairs.  I must be done with the claret-coloured chaise at once.
 It should be sold at the next stage for what it would bring.  Rowley and
 I must take back to the road on our four feet, and after a decent
 interval of trudging, get places on some coach for Edinburgh again under
 new names!  So much trouble and toil, so much extra risk and expense and
 loss of time, and all for a slip of the tongue to a little lady in blue!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV--THE INN-KEEPER OF KIRKBY-LONSDALE
 
 
 I had hitherto conceived and partly carried out an ideal that was dear to
 my heart.  Rowley and I descended from our claret-coloured chaise, a
 couple of correctly dressed, brisk, bright-eyed young fellows, like a
 pair of aristocratic mice; attending singly to our own affairs,
 communicating solely with each other, and that with the niceties and
 civilities of drill.  We would pass through the little crowd before the
 door with high-bred preoccupation, inoffensively haughty, after the best
 English pattern; and disappear within, followed by the envy and
 admiration of the bystanders, a model master and servant, point-device in
 every part.  It was a heavy thought to me, as we drew up before the inn
 at Kirkby-Lonsdale, that this scene was now to be enacted for the last
 time.  Alas! and had I known it, it was to go of with so inferior a
 grace!
 
 I had been injudiciously liberal to the post-boys of the chaise and four.
 My own post-boy, he of the patched breeches, now stood before me, his
 eyes glittering with greed, his hand advanced.  It was plain he
 anticipated something extraordinary by way of a _pourboire_; and
 considering the marches and counter-marches by which I had extended the
 stage, the military character of our affairs with Mr. Bellamy, and the
 bad example I had set before him at the archdeacon's, something
 exceptional was certainly to be done.  But these are always nice
 questions, to a foreigner above all: a shade too little will suggest
 niggardliness, a shilling too much smells of hush-money.  Fresh from the
 scene at the archdeacon's, and flushed by the idea that I was now nearly
 done with the responsibilities of the claret-coloured chaise, I put into
 his hands five guineas; and the amount served only to waken his cupidity.
 
 'O, come, sir, you ain't going to fob me of with this?  Why, I seen fire
 at your side!' he cried.
 
 It would never do to give him more; I felt I should become the fable of
 Kirkby-Lonsdale if I did; and I looked him in the face, sternly but still
 smiling, and addressed him with a voice of uncompromising firmness.
 
 'If you do not like it, give it back,' said I.
 
 He pocketed the guineas with the quickness of a conjurer, and, like a
 base-born cockney as he was, fell instantly to casting dirt.
 
 ''Ave your own way of it, Mr. Ramornie--leastways Mr. St. Eaves, or
 whatever your blessed name may be.  Look 'ere'--turning for sympathy to
 the stable-boys--'this is a blessed business.  Blessed 'ard, I calls it.
 'Ere I takes up a blessed son of a pop-gun what calls hisself anything
 you care to mention, and turns out to be a blessed _mounseer_ at the end
 of it!  'Ere 'ave I been drivin' of him up and down all day, a-carrying
 off of gals, a-shootin' of pistyils, and a-drinkin' of sherry and hale;
 and wot does he up and give me but a blank, blank, blanketing blank!'
 
 The fellow's language had become too powerful for reproduction, and I
 passed it by.
 
 Meanwhile I observed Rowley fretting visibly at the bit; another moment,
 and he would have added a last touch of the ridiculous to our arrival by
 coming to his hands with the postillion.
 
 'Rowley!' cried I reprovingly.
 
 Strictly it should have been Gammon; but in the hurry of the moment, my
 fault (I can only hope) passed unperceived.  At the same time I caught
 the eye of the postmaster.  He was long and lean, and brown and bilious;
 he had the drooping nose of the humourist, and the quick attention of a
 man of parts.  He read my embarrassment in a glance, stepped instantly
 forward, sent the post-boy to the rightabout with half a word, and was
 back next moment at my side.
 
 'Dinner in a private room, sir?  Very well.  John, No. 4!  What wine
 would you care to mention?  Very well, sir.  Will you please to order
 fresh horses?  Not, sir?  Very well.'
 
 Each of these expressions was accompanied by something in the nature of a
 bow, and all were prefaced by something in the nature of a smile, which I
 could very well have done without.  The man's politeness was from the
 teeth outwards; behind and within, I was conscious of a perpetual
 scrutiny: the scene at his doorstep, the random confidences of the
 post-boy, had not been thrown away on this observer; and it was under a
 strong fear of coming trouble that I was shown at last into my private
 room.  I was in half a mind to have put off the whole business.  But the
 truth is, now my name had got abroad, my fear of the mail that was
 coming, and the handbills it should contain, had waxed inordinately, and
 I felt I could never eat a meal in peace till I had severed my connection
 with the claret-coloured chaise.
 
 Accordingly, as soon as I had done with dinner, I sent my compliments to
 the landlord and requested he should take a glass of wine with me.  He
 came; we exchanged the necessary civilities, and presently I approached
 my business.
 
 'By the bye,' said I, 'we had a brush down the road to-day.  I dare say
 you may have heard of it?'
 
 He nodded.
 
 'And I was so unlucky as to get a pistol ball in the panel of my chaise,'
 I continued, 'which makes it simply useless to me.  Do you know any one
 likely to buy?'
 
 'I can well understand that,' said the landlord, 'I was looking at it
 just now; it's as good as ruined, is that chaise.  General rule, people
 don't like chaises with bullet-holes.'
 
 'Too much _Romance of the Forest_?' I suggested, recalling my little
 friend of the morning, and what I was sure had been her favourite
 reading--Mrs. Radcliffe's novels.
 
 'Just so,' said he.  'They may be right, they may be wrong; I'm not the
 judge.  But I suppose it's natural, after all, for respectable people to
 like things respectable about them; not bullet-holes, nor puddles of
 blood, nor men with aliases.'
 
 I took a glass of wine and held it up to the light to show that my hand
 was steady.
 
 'Yes,' said I, 'I suppose so.'
 
 'You have papers, of course, showing you are the proper owner?' he
 inquired.
 
 'There is the bill, stamped and receipted,' said I, tossing it across to
 him.
 
 He looked at it.
 
 'This all you have?' he asked.
 
 'It is enough, at least,' said I.  'It shows you where I bought and what
 I paid for it.'
 
 'Well, I don't know,' he said.  'You want some paper of identification.'
 
 'To identify the chaise?' I inquired.
 
 'Not at all: to identify _you_,' said he.
 
 'My good sir, remember yourself!' said I.  'The title-deeds of my estate
 are in that despatch-box; but you do not seriously suppose that I should
 allow you to examine them?'
 
 'Well, you see, this paper proves that some Mr. Ramornie paid seventy
 guineas for a chaise,' said the fellow.  'That's all well and good; but
 who's to prove to me that you are Mr. Ramornie?'
 
 'Fellow!' cried I.
 
 'O, fellow as much as you please!' said he.  'Fellow, with all my heart!
 That changes nothing.  I am fellow, of course--obtrusive fellow, impudent
 fellow, if you like--but who are you?  I hear of you with two names; I
 hear of you running away with young ladies, and getting cheered for a
 Frenchman, which seems odd; and one thing I will go bail for, that you
 were in a blue fright when the post-boy began to tell tales at my door.
 In short, sir, you may be a very good gentleman; but I don't know enough
 about you, and I'll trouble you for your papers, or to go before a
 magistrate.  Take your choice; if I'm not fine enough, I hope the
 magistrates are.'
 
 'My good man,' I stammered, for though I had found my voice, I could
 scarce be said to have recovered my wits, 'this is most unusual, most
 rude.  Is it the custom in Westmorland that gentlemen should be
 insulted?'
 
 'That depends,' said he.  'When it's suspected that gentlemen are spies
 it _is_ the custom; and a good custom, too.  No no,' he broke out,
 perceiving me to make a movement.  'Both hands upon the table, my
 gentleman!  I want no pistol balls in my chaise panels.'
 
 'Surely, sir, you do me strange injustice!' said I, now the master of
 myself.  'You see me sitting here, a monument of tranquillity: pray may I
 help myself to wine without umbraging you?'
 
 I took this attitude in sheer despair.  I had no plan, no hope.  The best
 I could imagine was to spin the business out some minutes longer, then
 capitulate.  At least, I would not capituatle one moment too soon.
 
 'Am I to take that for _no_?' he asked.
 
 'Referring to your former obliging proposal?' said I.  'My good sir, you
 are to take it, as you say, for "No."  Certainly I will not show you my
 deeds; certainly I will not rise from table and trundle out to see your
 magistrates.  I have too much respect for my digestion, and too little
 curiosity in justices of the peace.'
 
 He leaned forward, looked me nearly in the face, and reached out one hand
 to the bell-rope.  'See here, my fine fellow!' said he.  'Do you see that
 bell-rope?  Let me tell you, there's a boy waiting below: one jingle, and
 he goes to fetch the constable.'
 
 'Do you tell me so?' said I.  'Well, there's no accounting for tastes!  I
 have a prejudice against the society of constables, but if it is your
 fancy to have one in for the dessert--'  I shrugged my shoulders lightly.
 'Really, you know,' I added, 'this is vastly entertaining.  I assure you,
 I am looking on, with all the interest of a man of the world, at the
 development of your highly original character.'
 
 He continued to study my face without speech, his hand still on the
 button of the bell-rope, his eyes in mine; this was the decisive heat.
 My face seemed to myself to dislimn under his gaze, my expression to
 change, the smile (with which I had began) to degenerate into the grin of
 the man upon the rack.  I was besides harassed with doubts.  An innocent
 man, I argued, would have resented the fellow's impudence an hour ago;
 and by my continued endurance of the ordeal, I was simply signing and
 sealing my confession; in short, I had reached the end of my powers.
 
 'Have you any objection to my putting my hands in my breeches pockets?' I
 inquired.  'Excuse me mentioning it, but you showed yourself so extremely
 nervous a moment back.'  My voice was not all I could have wished, but it
 sufficed.  I could hear it tremble, but the landlord apparently could
 not.  He turned away and drew a long breath, and you may be sure I was
 quick to follow his example.
 
 'You're a cool hand at least, and that's the sort I like,' said he.  'Be
 you what you please, I'll deal square.  I'll take the chaise for a
 hundred pound down, and throw the dinner in.'
 
 'I beg your pardon,' I cried, wholly mystified by this form of words.
 
 'You pay me a hundred down,' he repeated, 'and I'll take the chaise.
 It's very little more than it cost,' he added, with a grin, 'and you know
 you must get it off your hands somehow.'
 
 I do not know when I have been better entertained than by this impudent
 proposal.  It was broadly funny, and I suppose the least tempting offer
 in the world.  For all that, it came very welcome, for it gave me the
 occasion to laugh.  This I did with the most complete abandonment, till
 the tears ran down my cheeks; and ever and again, as the fit abated, I
 would get another view of the landlord's face, and go off into another
 paroxysm.
 
 'You droll creature, you will be the death of me yet!' I cried, drying my
 eyes.
 
 My friend was now wholly disconcerted; he knew not where to look, nor yet
 what to say; and began for the first time to conceive it possible he was
 mistaken.
 
 'You seem rather to enjoy a laugh, sir,' said he.
 
 'O, yes!  I am quite an original,' I replied, and laughed again.
 
 Presently, in a changed voice, he offered me twenty pounds for the
 chaise; I ran him up to twenty-five, and closed with the offer: indeed, I
 was glad to get anything; and if I haggled, it was not in the desire of
 gain, but with the view at any price of securing a safe retreat.  For
 although hostilities were suspended, he was yet far from satisfied; and I
 could read his continued suspicions in the cloudy eye that still hovered
 about my face.  At last they took shape in words.
 
 'This is all very well,' says he: 'you carry it off well; but for all
 that, I must do my duty.'
 
 I had my strong effect in reserve; it was to burn my ships with a
 vengeance!  I rose.  'Leave the room,' said I.  'This is insuperable.  Is
 the man mad?'  And then, as if already half-ashamed of my passion: 'I can
 take a joke as well as any one,' I added; 'but this passes measure.  Send
 my servant and the bill.'
 
 When he had left me alone, I considered my own valour with amazement.  I
 had insulted him; I had sent him away alone; now, if ever, he would take
 what was the only sensible resource, and fetch the constable.  But there
 was something instinctively treacherous about the man which shrank from
 plain courses.  And, with all his cleverness, he missed the occasion of
 fame.  Rowley and I were suffered to walk out of his door, with all our
 baggage, on foot, with no destination named, except in the vague
 statement that we were come 'to view the lakes'; and my friend only
 watched our departure with his chin in his hand, still moodily
 irresolute.
 
 I think this one of my great successes.  I was exposed, unmasked,
 summoned to do a perfectly natural act, which must prove my doom and
 which I had not the slightest pretext for refusing.  I kept my head,
 stuck to my guns, and, against all likelihood, here I was once more at
 liberty and in the king's highway.  This was a strong lesson never to
 despair; and, at the same time, how many hints to be cautious! and what a
 perplexed and dubious business the whole question of my escape now
 appeared!  That I should have risked perishing upon a trumpery question
 of a _pourboire_, depicted in lively colours the perils that perpetually
 surrounded us.  Though, to be sure, the initial mistake had been
 committed before that; and if I had not suffered myself to be drawn a
 little deep in confidences to the innocent Dolly, there need have been no
 tumble at the inn of Kirkby-Lonsdale.  I took the lesson to heart, and
 promised myself in the future to be more reserved.  It was none of my
 business to attend to broken chaises or shipwrecked travellers.  I had my
 hands full of my own affairs; and my best defence would be a little more
 natural selfishness and a trifle less imbecile good-nature.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV--I MEET A CHEERFUL EXTRAVAGANT
 
 
 I pass over the next fifty or sixty leagues of our journey without
 comment.  The reader must be growing weary of scenes of travel; and for
 my own part I have no cause to recall these particular miles with any
 pleasure.  We were mainly occupied with attempts to obliterate our trail,
 which (as the result showed) were far from successful; for, on my cousin
 following, he was able to run me home with the least possible loss of
 time, following the claret-coloured chaise to Kirkby-Lonsdale, where I
 think the landlord must have wept to learn what he had missed, and
 tracing us thereafter to the doors of the coach-office in Edinburgh
 without a single check.  Fortune did not favour me, and why should I
 recapitulate the details of futile precautions which deceived nobody, and
 wearisome arts which proved to be artless?
 
 The day was drawing to an end when Mr. Rowley and I bowled into Edinburgh
 to the stirring sound of the guard's bugle and the clattering team.  I
 was here upon my field of battle; on the scene of my former captivity,
 escape and exploits; and in the same city with my love.  My heart
 expanded; I have rarely felt more of a hero.  All down the Bridges I sat
 by the driver with my arms folded and my face set, unflinchingly meeting
 every eye, and prepared every moment for a cry of recognition.  Hundreds
 of the population were in the habit of visiting the Castle, where it was
 my practice (before the days of Flora) to make myself conspicuous among
 the prisoners; and I think it an extraordinary thing that I should have
 encountered so few to recognise me.  But doubtless a clean chin is a
 disguise in itself; and the change is great from a suit of sulphur-yellow
 to fine linen, a well-fitting mouse-coloured great-coat furred in black,
 a pair of tight trousers of fashionable cut, and a hat of inimitable
 curl.  After all, it was more likely that I should have recognised our
 visitors, than that they should have identified the modish gentleman with
 the miserable prisoner in the Castle.
 
 I was glad to set foot on the flagstones, and to escape from the crowd
 that had assembled to receive the mail.  Here we were, with but little
 daylight before us, and that on Saturday afternoon, the eve of the famous
 Scottish Sabbath, adrift in the New Town of Edinburgh, and overladen with
 baggage.  We carried it ourselves.  I would not take a cab, nor so much
 as hire a porter, who might afterwards serve as a link between my
 lodgings and the mail, and connect me again with the claret-coloured
 chaise and Aylesbury.  For I was resolved to break the chain of evidence
 for good, and to begin life afresh (so far as regards caution) with a new
 character.  The first step was to find lodgings, and to find them
 quickly.  This was the more needful as Mr. Rowley and I, in our smart
 clothes and with our cumbrous burthen, made a noticeable appearance in
 the streets at that time of the day and in that quarter of the town,
 which was largely given up to fine folk, bucks and dandies and young
 ladies, or respectable professional men on their way home to dinner.
 
 On the north side of St. James' Square I was so happy as to spy a bill in
 a third-floor window.  I was equally indifferent to cost and convenience
 in my choice of a lodging--'any port in a storm' was the principle on
 which I was prepared to act; and Rowley and I made at once for the common
 entrance and sealed the stair.
 
 We were admitted by a very sour-looking female in bombazine.  I gathered
 she had all her life been depressed by a series of bereavements, the last
 of which might very well have befallen her the day before; and I
 instinctively lowered my voice when I addressed her.  She admitted she
 had rooms to let--even showed them to us--a sitting-room and bedroom in a
 _suite_, commanding a fine prospect to the Firth and Fifeshire, and in
 themselves well proportioned and comfortably furnished, with pictures on
 the wall, shells on the mantelpiece, and several books upon the table
 which I found afterwards to be all of a devotional character, and all
 presentation copies, 'to my Christian friend,' or 'to my devout
 acquaintance in the Lord, Bethiah McRankine.'  Beyond this my 'Christian
 friend' could not be made to advance: no, not even to do that which
 seemed the most natural and pleasing thing in the world--I mean to name
 her price--but stood before us shaking her head, and at times mourning
 like the dove, the picture of depression and defence.  She had a voice
 the most querulous I have ever heard, and with this she produced a whole
 regiment of difficulties and criticisms.
 
 She could not promise an attendance.
 
 'Well, madam,' said I, 'and what is my servant for?'
 
 'Him?' she asked.  'Be gude to us!  Is _he_ your servant?'
 
 'I am sorry, ma'am, he meets with your disapproval.'
 
 'Na, I never said that.  But he's young.  He'll be a great breaker, I'm
 thinkin'.  Ay! he'll be a great responsibeelity to ye, like.  Does he
 attend to his releegion?'
 
 'Yes, m'm,' returned Rowley, with admirable promptitude, and, immediately
 closing his eyes, as if from habit, repeated the following distich with
 more celerity than fervour:--
 
     'Matthew, Mark, Luke and John
     Bless the bed that I lie on!'
 
 'Nhm!' said the lady, and maintained an awful silence.
 
 'Well, ma'am,' said I, 'it seems we are never to hear the beginning of
 your terms, let alone the end of them.  Come--a good movement! and let us
 be either off or on.'
 
 She opened her lips slowly.  'Ony raferences?' she inquired, in a voice
 like a bell.
 
 I opened my pocket-book and showed her a handful of bank bills.  'I
 think, madam, that these are unexceptionable,' said I.
 
 'Ye'll be wantin' breakfast late?' was her reply.
 
 'Madam, we want breakfast at whatever hour it suits you to give it, from
 four in the morning till four in the afternoon!' I cried.  'Only tell us
 your figure, if your mouth be large enough to let it out!'
 
 'I couldnae give ye supper the nicht,' came the echo.
 
 'We shall go out to supper, you incorrigible female!' I vowed, between
 laughter and tears.  'Here--this is going to end!  I want you for a
 landlady--let me tell you that!--and I am going to have my way.  You
 won't tell me what you charge?  Very well; I will do without!  I can
 trust you!  You don't seem to know when you have a good lodger; but I
 know perfectly when I have an honest landlady!  Rowley, unstrap the
 valises!'
 
 Will it be credited?  The monomaniac fell to rating me for my
 indiscretion!  But the battle was over; these were her last guns, and
 more in the nature of a salute than of renewed hostilities.  And
 presently she condescended on very moderate terms, and Rowley and I were
 able to escape in quest of supper.  Much time had, however, been lost;
 the sun was long down, the lamps glimmered along the streets, and the
 voice of a watchman already resounded in the neighbouring Leith Road.  On
 our first arrival I had observed a place of entertainment not far off, in
 a street behind the Register House.  Thither we found our way, and sat
 down to a late dinner alone.  But we had scarce given our orders before
 the door opened, and a tall young fellow entered with something of a
 lurch, looked about him, and approached the same table.
 
 'Give you good evening, most grave and reverend seniors!' said he.  'Will
 you permit a wanderer, a pilgrim--the pilgrim of love, in short--to come
 to temporary anchor under your lee?  I care not who knows it, but I have
 a passionate aversion from the bestial practice of solitary feeding!'
 
 'You are welcome, sir,' said I, 'if I may take upon me so far to play the
 host in a public place.'
 
 He looked startled, and fixed a hazy eye on me, as he sat down.
 
 'Sir,' said he, 'you are a man not without some tincture of letters, I
 perceive!  What shall we drink, sir?'
 
 I mentioned I had already called for a pot of porter.
 
 'A modest pot--the seasonable quencher?' said he.  'Well, I do not know
 but what I could look at a modest pot myself!  I am, for the moment, in
 precarious health.  Much study hath heated my brain, much walking wearied
 my--well, it seems to be more my eyes!'
 
 'You have walked far, I dare say?' I suggested.
 
 'Not so much far as often,' he replied.  'There is in this city--to
 which, I think, you are a stranger?  Sir, to your very good health and
 our better acquaintance!--there is, in this city of Dunedin, a certain
 implication of streets which reflects the utmost credit on the designer
 and the publicans--at every hundred yards is seated the Judicious Tavern,
 so that persons of contemplative mind are secure, at moderate distances,
 of refreshment.  I have been doing a trot in that favoured quarter,
 favoured by art and nature.  A few chosen comrades--enemies of publicity
 and friends to wit and wine--obliged me with their society.  "Along the
 cool, sequestered vale of Register Street we kept the uneven tenor of our
 way," sir.'
 
 'It struck me, as you came in--' I began.
 
 'O, don't make any bones about it!' he interrupted.  'Of course it struck
 you! and let me tell you I was devilish lucky not to strike myself.  When
 I entered this apartment I shone "with all the pomp and prodigality of
 brandy and water," as the poet Gray has in another place expressed it.
 Powerful bard, Gray! but a niminy-piminy creature, afraid of a petticoat
 and a bottle--not a man, sir, not a man!  Excuse me for being so
 troublesome, but what the devil have I done with my fork?  Thank you, I
 am sure.  _Temulentia_, _quoad me ipsum_, _brevis colligo est_.  I sit
 and eat, sir, in a London fog.  I should bring a link-boy to table with
 me; and I would too, if the little brutes were only washed!  I intend to
 found a Philanthropical Society for Washing the Deserving Poor and
 Shaving Soldiers.  I am pleased to observe that, although not of an
 unmilitary bearing, you are apparently shaved.  In my calendar of the
 virtues shaving comes next to drinking.  A gentleman may be a low-minded
 ruffian without sixpence, but he will always be close shaved.  See me,
 with the eye of fancy, in the chill hours of the morning, say about a
 quarter to twelve, noon--see me awake!  First thing of all, without one
 thought of the plausible but unsatisfactory small beer, or the healthful
 though insipid soda-water, I take the deadly razor in my vacillating
 grasp; I proceed to skate upon the margin of eternity.  Stimulating
 thought!  I bleed, perhaps, but with medicable wounds.  The stubble
 reaped, I pass out of my chamber, calm but triumphant.  To employ a
 hackneyed phrase, I would not call Lord Wellington my uncle!  I, too,
 have dared, perhaps bled, before the imminent deadly shaving-table.'
 
 In this manner the bombastic fellow continued to entertain me all through
 dinner, and by a common error of drunkards, because he had been extremely
 talkative himself, leaped to the conclusion that he had chanced on very
 genial company.  He told me his name, his address; he begged we should
 meet again; finally he proposed that I should dine with him in the
 country at an early date.
 
 'The dinner is official,' he explained.  'The office-bearers and Senatus
 of the University of Cramond--an educational institution in which I have
 the honour to be Professor of Nonsense--meet to do honour to our friend
 Icarus, at the old-established _howff_, Cramond Bridge.  One place is
 vacant, fascinating stranger,--I offer it to you!'
 
 'And who is your friend Icarus?' I asked,
 
 'The aspiring son of Daedalus!' said he.  'Is it possible that you have
 never heard the name of Byfield?'
 
 'Possible and true,' said I.
 
 'And is fame so small a thing?' cried he.  'Byfield, sir, is an aeronaut.
 He apes the fame of a Lunardi, and is on the point of offering to the
 inhabitants--I beg your pardon, to the nobility and gentry of our
 neighbourhood--the spectacle of an ascension.  As one of the gentry
 concerned I may be permitted to remark that I am unmoved.  I care not a
 Tinker's Damn for his ascension.  No more--I breathe it in your ear--does
 anybody else.  The business is stale, sir, stale.  Lunardi did it, and
 overdid it.  A whimsical, fiddling, vain fellow, by all accounts--for I
 was at that time rocking in my cradle.  But once was enough.  If Lunardi
 went up and came down, there was the matter settled.  We prefer to grant
 the point.  We do not want to see the experiment repeated _ad nauseam_ by
 Byfield, and Brown, and Butler, and Brodie, and Bottomley.  Ah! if they
 would go up and _not_ come down again!  But this is by the question.  The
 University of Cramond delights to honour merit in the man, sir, rather
 than utility in the profession; and Byfield, though an ignorant dog, is a
 sound reliable drinker, and really not amiss over his cups.  Under the
 radiance of the kindly jar partiality might even credit him with wit.'
 
 It will be seen afterwards that this was more my business than I thought
 it at the time.  Indeed, I was impatient to be gone.  Even as my friend
 maundered ahead a squall burst, the jaws of the rain were opened against
 the coffee-house windows, and at that inclement signal I remembered I was
 due elsewhere.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI--THE COTTAGE AT NIGHT
 
 
 At the door I was nearly blown back by the unbridled violence of the
 squall, and Rowley and I must shout our parting words.  All the way along
 Princes Street (whither my way led) the wind hunted me behind and
 screamed in my ears.  The city was flushed with bucketfuls of rain that
 tasted salt from the neighbouring ocean.  It seemed to darken and lighten
 again in the vicissitudes of the gusts.  Now you would say the lamps had
 been blown out from end to end of the long thoroughfare; now, in a lull,
 they would revive, re-multiply, shine again on the wet pavements, and
 make darkness sparingly visible.
 
 By the time I had got to the corner of the Lothian Road there was a
 distinct improvement.  For one thing, I had now my shoulder to the wind;
 for a second, I came in the lee of my old prison-house, the Castle; and,
 at any rate, the excessive fury of the blast was itself moderating.  The
 thought of what errand I was on re-awoke within me, and I seemed to
 breast the rough weather with increasing ease.  With such a destination,
 what mattered a little buffeting of wind or a sprinkle of cold water?  I
 recalled Flora's image, I took her in fancy to my arms, and my heart
 throbbed.  And the next moment I had recognised the inanity of that
 fool's paradise.  If I could spy her taper as she went to bed, I might
 count myself lucky.
 
 I had about two leagues before me of a road mostly uphill, and now deep
 in mire.  So soon as I was clear of the last street lamp, darkness
 received me--a darkness only pointed by the lights of occasional rustic
 farms, where the dogs howled with uplifted heads as I went by.  The wind
 continued to decline: it had been but a squall, not a tempest.  The rain,
 on the other hand, settled into a steady deluge, which had soon drenched
 me thoroughly.  I continued to tramp forward in the night, contending
 with gloomy thoughts and accompanied by the dismal ululation of the dogs.
 What ailed them that they should have been thus wakeful, and perceived
 the small sound of my steps amid the general reverberation of the rain,
 was more than I could fancy.  I remembered tales with which I had been
 entertained in childhood.  I told myself some murderer was going by, and
 the brutes perceived upon him the faint smell of blood; and the next
 moment, with a physical shock, I had applied the words to my own case!
 
 Here was a dismal disposition for a lover.  'Was ever lady in this humour
 wooed?' I asked myself, and came near turning back.  It is never wise to
 risk a critical interview when your spirits are depressed, your clothes
 muddy, and your hands wet!  But the boisterous night was in itself
 favourable to my enterprise: now, or perhaps never, I might find some way
 to have an interview with Flora; and if I had one interview (wet clothes,
 low spirits and all), I told myself there would certainly be another.
 
 Arrived in the cottage-garden I found the circumstances mighty inclement.
 From the round holes in the shutters of the parlour, shafts of
 candle-light streamed forth; elsewhere the darkness was complete.  The
 trees, the thickets, were saturated; the lower parts of the garden turned
 into a morass.  At intervals, when the wind broke forth again, there
 passed overhead a wild coil of clashing branches; and between whiles the
 whole enclosure continuously and stridently resounded with the rain.  I
 advanced close to the window and contrived to read the face of my watch.
 It was half-past seven; they would not retire before ten, they might not
 before midnight, and the prospect was unpleasant.  In a lull of the wind
 I could hear from the inside the voice of Flora reading aloud; the words
 of course inaudible--only a flow of undecipherable speech, quiet,
 cordial, colourless, more intimate and winning, more eloquent of her
 personality, but not less beautiful than song.  And the next moment the
 clamour of a fresh squall broke out about the cottage; the voice was
 drowned in its bellowing, and I was glad to retreat from my dangerous
 post.
 
 For three egregious hours I must now suffer the elements to do their
 worst upon me, and continue to hold my ground in patience.  I recalled
 the least fortunate of my services in the field: being out-sentry of the
 pickets in weather no less vile, sometimes unsuppered and with nothing to
 look forward to by way of breakfast but musket-balls; and they seemed
 light in comparison.  So strangely are we built: so much more strong is
 the love of woman than the mere love of life.
 
 At last my patience was rewarded.  The light disappeared from the parlour
 and reappeared a moment after in the room above.  I was pretty well
 informed for the enterprise that lay before me.  I knew the lair of the
 dragon--that which was just illuminated.  I knew the bower of my
 Rosamond, and how excellently it was placed on the ground-level, round
 the flank of the cottage and out of earshot of her formidable aunt.
 Nothing was left but to apply my knowledge.  I was then at the bottom of
 the garden, whether I had gone (Heaven save the mark!) for warmth, that I
 might walk to and fro unheard and keep myself from perishing.  The night
 had fallen still, the wind ceased; the noise of the rain had much
 lightened, if it had not stopped, and was succeeded by the dripping of
 the garden trees.  In the midst of this lull, and as I was already
 drawing near to the cottage, I was startled by the sound of a window-sash
 screaming in its channels; and a step or two beyond I became aware of a
 gush of light upon the darkness.  It fell from Flora's window, which she
 had flung open on the night, and where she now sat, roseate and pensive,
 in the shine of two candles falling from behind, her tresses deeply
 embowering and shading her; the suspended comb still in one hand, the
 other idly clinging to the iron stanchions with which the window was
 barred.
 
 Keeping to the turf, and favoured by the darkness of the night and the
 patter of the rain which was now returning, though without wind, I
 approached until I could almost have touched her.  It seemed a grossness
 of which I was incapable to break up her reverie by speech.  I stood and
 drank her in with my eyes; how the light made a glory in her hair, and
 (what I have always thought the most ravishing thing in nature) how the
 planes ran into each other, and were distinguished, and how the hues
 blended and varied, and were shaded off, between the cheek and neck.  At
 first I was abashed: she wore her beauty like an immediate halo of
 refinement; she discouraged me like an angel, or what I suspect to be the
 next most discouraging, a modern lady.  But as I continued to gaze, hope
 and life returned to me; I forgot my timidity, I forgot the sickening
 pack of wet clothes with which I stood burdened, I tingled with new
 blood.
 
 Still unconscious of my presence, still gazing before her upon the
 illuminated image of the window, the straight shadows of the bars, the
 glinting of pebbles on the path, and the impenetrable night on the garden
 and the hills beyond it, she heaved a deep breath that struck upon my
 heart like an appeal.
 
 'Why does Miss Gilchrist sigh?' I whispered.  'Does she recall absent
 friends?'
 
 She turned her head swiftly in my direction; it was the only sign of
 surprise she deigned to make.  At the same time I stepped into the light
 and bowed profoundly.
 
 'You!' she said.  'Here?'
 
 'Yes, I am here,' I replied.  'I have come very far, it may be a hundred
 and fifty leagues, to see you.  I have waited all this night in your
 garden.  Will Miss Gilchrist not offer her hand--to a friend in trouble?'
 
 She extended it between the bars, and I dropped upon one knee on the wet
 path and kissed it twice.  At the second it was withdrawn suddenly,
 methought with more of a start than she had hitherto displayed.  I
 regained my former attitude, and we were both silent awhile.  My timidity
 returned on me tenfold.  I looked in her face for any signals of anger,
 and seeing her eyes to waver and fall aside from mine, augured that all
 was well.
 
 'You must have been mad to come here!' she broke out.  'Of all places
 under heaven this is no place for you to come.  And I was just thinking
 you were safe in France!'
 
 'You were thinking of me!' I cried.
 
 'Mr. St. Ives, you cannot understand your danger,' she replied.  'I am
 sure of it, and yet I cannot find it in my heart to tell you.  O, be
 persuaded, and go!'
 
 'I believe I know the worst.  But I was never one to set an undue value
 on life, the life that we share with beasts.  My university has been in
 the wars, not a famous place of education, but one where a man learns to
 carry his life in his hand as lightly as a glove, and for his lady or his
 honour to lay it as lightly down.  You appeal to my fears, and you do
 wrong.  I have come to Scotland with my eyes quite open to see you and to
 speak with you--it may be for the last time.  With my eyes quite open, I
 say; and if I did not hesitate at the beginning do you think that I would
 draw back now?'
 
 'You do not know!' she cried, with rising agitation.  'This country, even
 this garden, is death to you.  They all believe it; I am the only one
 that does not.  If they hear you now, if they heard a whisper--I dread to
 think of it.  O, go, go this instant.  It is my prayer.'
 
 'Dear lady, do not refuse me what I have come so far to seek; and
 remember that out of all the millions in England there is no other but
 yourself in whom I can dare confide.  I have all the world against me;
 you are my only ally; and as I have to speak, you have to listen.  All is
 true that they say of me, and all of it false at the same time.  I did
 kill this man Goguelat--it was that you meant?'
 
 She mutely signed to me that it was; she had become deadly pale.
 
 'But I killed him in fair fight.  Till then, I had never taken a life
 unless in battle, which is my trade.  But I was grateful, I was on fire
 with gratitude, to one who had been good to me, who had been better to me
 than I could have dreamed of an angel, who had come into the darkness of
 my prison like sunrise.  The man Goguelat insulted her.  O, he had
 insulted me often, it was his favourite pastime, and he might insult me
 as he pleased--for who was I?  But with that lady it was different.  I
 could never forgive myself if I had let it pass.  And we fought, and he
 fell, and I have no remorse.'
 
 I waited anxiously for some reply.  The worst was now out, and I knew
 that she had heard of it before; but it was impossible for me to go on
 with my narrative without some shadow of encouragement.
 
 'You blame me?'
 
 'No, not at all.  It is a point I cannot speak on--I am only a girl.  I
 am sure you were in the right: I have always said so--to Ronald.  Not, of
 course, to my aunt.  I am afraid I let her speak as she will.  You must
 not think me a disloyal friend; and even with the Major--I did not tell
 you he had become quite a friend of ours--Major Chevenix, I mean--he has
 taken such a fancy to Ronald!  It was he that brought the news to us of
 that hateful Clausel being captured, and all that he was saying.  I was
 indignant with him.  I said--I dare say I said too much--and I must say
 he was very good-natured.  He said, "You and I, who are his friends,
 _know_ that Champdivers is innocent.  But what is the use of saying it?"
 All this was in the corner of the room in what they call an aside.  And
 then he said, "Give me a chance to speak to you in private, I have much
 to tell you."  And he did.  And told me just what you did--that it was an
 affair of honour, and no blame attached to you.  O, I must say I like
 that Major Chevenix!'
 
 At this I was seized with a great pang of jealousy.  I remembered the
 first time that he had seen her, the interest that he seemed immediately
 to conceive; and I could not but admire the dog for the use he had been
 ingenious enough to make of our acquaintance in order to supplant me.
 All is fair in love and war.  For all that, I was now no less anxious to
 do the speaking myself than I had been before to hear Flora.  At least, I
 could keep clear of the hateful image of Major Chevenix.  Accordingly I
 burst at once on the narrative of my adventures.  It was the same as you
 have read, but briefer, and told with a very different purpose.  Now
 every incident had a particular bearing, every by-way branched off to
 Rome--and that was Flora.
 
 When I had begun to speak I had kneeled upon the gravel withoutside the
 low window, rested my arms upon the sill, and lowered my voice to the
 most confidential whisper.  Flora herself must kneel upon the other side,
 and this brought our heads upon a level with only the bars between us.
 So placed, so separated, it seemed that our proximity, and the continuous
 and low sounds of my pleading voice, worked progressively and powerfully
 on her heart, and perhaps not less so on my own.  For these spells are
 double-edged.  The silly birds may be charmed with the pipe of the
 fowler, which is but a tube of reeds.  Not so with a bird of our own
 feather!  As I went on, and my resolve strengthened, and my voice found
 new modulations, and our faces were drawn closer to the bars and to each
 other, not only she, but I, succumbed to the fascination, and were
 kindled by the charm.  We make love, and thereby ourselves fall the
 deeper in it.  It is with the heart only that one captures a heart.
 
 'And now,' I continued, 'I will tell you what you can still do for me.  I
 run a little risk just now, and you see for yourself how unavoidable it
 is for any man of honour.  But if--but in case of the worst I do not
 choose to enrich either my enemies or the Prince Regent.  I have here the
 bulk of what my uncle gave me.  Eight thousand odd pounds.  Will you take
 care of it for me?  Do not think of it merely as money; take and keep it
 as a relic of your friend or some precious piece of him.  I may have
 bitter need of it ere long.  Do you know the old country story of the
 giant who gave his heart to his wife to keep for him, thinking it safer
 to repose on her loyalty than his own strength?  Flora, I am the giant--a
 very little one: will you be the keeper of my life?  It is my heart I
 offer you in this symbol.  In the sight of God, if you will have it, I
 give you my name, I endow you with my money.  If the worst come, if I may
 never hope to call you wife, let me at least think that you will use my
 uncle's legacy as my widow.'
 
 'No, not that,' she said.  'Never that.'
 
 'What then?' I said.  'What else, my angel?  What are words to me?  There
 is but one name that I care to know you by.  Flora, my love!'
 
 'Anne!' she said.
 
 What sound is so full of music as one's own name uttered for the first
 time in the voice of her we love!
 
 'My darling!' said I.
 
 The jealous bars, set at the top and bottom in stone and lime, obstructed
 the rapture of the moment; but I took her to myself as wholly as they
 allowed.  She did not shun my lips.  My arms were wound round her body,
 which yielded itself generously to my embrace.  As we so remained,
 entwined and yet severed, bruising our faces unconsciously on the cold
 bars, the irony of the universe--or as I prefer to say, envy of some of
 the gods--again stirred up the elements of that stormy night.  The wind
 blew again in the tree-tops; a volley of cold sea-rain deluged the
 garden, and, as the deuce would have it, a gutter which had been hitherto
 choked up began suddenly to play upon my head and shoulders with the
 vivacity of a fountain.  We parted with a shock; I sprang to my feet, and
 she to hers, as though we had been discovered.  A moment after, but now
 both standing, we had again approached the window on either side.
 
 'Flora,' I said, 'this is but a poor offer I can make you.'
 
 She took my hand in hers and clasped it to her bosom.
 
 'Rich enough for a queen!' she said, with a lift in her breathing that
 was more eloquent than words.  'Anne, my brave Anne!  I would be glad to
 be your maidservant; I could envy that boy Rowley.  But, no!' she broke
 off, 'I envy no one--I need not--I am yours.'
 
 'Mine,' said I, 'for ever!  By this and this, mine!'
 
 'All of me,' she repeated.  'Altogether and forever!'
 
 And if the god were envious, he must have seen with mortification how
 little he could do to mar the happiness of mortals.  I stood in a mere
 waterspout; she herself was wet, not from my embrace only, but from the
 splashing of the storm.  The candles had guttered out; we were in
 darkness.  I could scarce see anything but the shining of her eyes in the
 dark room.  To her I must have appeared as a silhouette, haloed by rain
 and the spouting of the ancient Gothic gutter above my head.
 
 Presently we became more calm and confidential; and when that squall,
 which proved to be the last of the storm, had blown by, fell into a talk
 of ways and means.  It seemed she knew Mr. Robbie, to whom I had been so
 slenderly accredited by Romaine--was even invited to his house for the
 evening of Monday, and gave me a sketch of the old gentleman's character
 which implied a great deal of penetration in herself, and proved of great
 use to me in the immediate sequel.  It seemed he was an enthusiastic
 antiquary, and in particular a fanatic of heraldry.  I heard it with
 delight, for I was myself, thanks to M. de Culemberg, fairly grounded in
 that science, and acquainted with the blazons of most families of note in
 Europe.  And I had made up my mind--even as she spoke, it was my fixed
 determination, though I was a hundred miles from saying it--to meet Flora
 on Monday night as a fellow-guest in Mr. Robbie's house.
 
 I gave her my money--it was, of course, only paper I had brought.  I gave
 it her, to be her marriage-portion, I declared.
 
 'Not so bad a marriage-portion for a private soldier,' I told her,
 laughing, as I passed it through the bars.
 
 'O, Anne, and where am I to keep it?' she cried.  'If my aunt should find
 it!  What would I say!'
 
 'Next your heart,' I suggested.
 
 'Then you will always be near your treasure,' she cried, 'for you are
 always there!'
 
 We were interrupted by a sudden clearness that fell upon the night.  The
 clouds dispersed; the stars shone in every part of the heavens; and,
 consulting my watch, I was startled to find it already hard on five in
 the morning.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII--THE SABBATH DAY
 
 
 It was indeed high time I should be gone from Swanston; but what I was to
 do in the meanwhile was another question.  Rowley had received his orders
 last night: he was to say that I had met a friend, and Mrs. McRankine was
 not to expect me before morning.  A good enough tale in itself; but the
 dreadful pickle I was in made it out of the question.  I could not go
 home till I had found harbourage, a fire to dry my clothes at, and a bed
 where I might lie till they were ready.
 
 Fortune favoured me again.  I had scarce got to the top of the first hill
 when I spied a light on my left, about a furlong away.  It might be a
 case of sickness; what else it was likely to be--in so rustic a
 neighbourhood, and at such an ungodly time of the morning--was beyond my
 fancy.  A faint sound of singing became audible, and gradually swelled as
 I drew near, until at last I could make out the words, which were
 singularly appropriate both to the hour and to the condition of the
 singers.  'The cock may craw, the day may daw,' they sang; and sang it
 with such laxity both in time and tune, and such sentimental complaisance
 in the expression, as assured me they had got far into the third bottle
 at least.
 
 I found a plain rustic cottage by the wayside, of the sort called double,
 with a signboard over the door; and, the lights within streaming forth
 and somewhat mitigating the darkness of the morning, I was enabled to
 decipher the inscription: 'The Hunters' Tryst, by Alexander Hendry.
 Porter Ales, and British Spirits.  Beds.'
 
 My first knock put a period to the music, and a voice challenged tipsily
 from within.
 
 'Who goes there?' it said; and I replied, 'A lawful traveller.'
 
 Immediately after, the door was unbarred by a company of the tallest lads
 my eyes had ever rested on, all astonishingly drunk and very decently
 dressed, and one (who was perhaps the drunkest of the lot) carrying a
 tallow candle, from which he impartially bedewed the clothes of the whole
 company.  As soon as I saw them I could not help smiling to myself to
 remember the anxiety with which I had approached.  They received me and
 my hastily-concocted story, that I had been walking from Peebles and had
 lost my way, with incoherent benignity; jostled me among them into the
 room where they had been sitting, a plain hedgerow alehouse parlour, with
 a roaring fire in the chimney and a prodigious number of empty bottles on
 the floor; and informed me that I was made, by this reception, a
 temporary member of the _Six-Feet-High Club_, an athletic society of
 young men in a good station, who made of the Hunters' Tryst a frequent
 resort.  They told me I had intruded on an 'all-night sitting,' following
 upon an 'all-day Saturday tramp' of forty miles; and that the members
 would all be up and 'as right as ninepence' for the noonday service at
 some neighbouring church--Collingwood, if memory serves me right.  At
 this I could have laughed, but the moment seemed ill-chosen.  For, though
 six feet was their standard, they all exceeded that measurement
 considerably; and I tasted again some of the sensations of childhood, as
 I looked up to all these lads from a lower plane, and wondered what they
 would do next.  But the Six-Footers, if they were very drunk, proved no
 less kind.  The landlord and servants of the Hunters' Tryst were in bed
 and asleep long ago.  Whether by natural gift or acquired habit they
 could suffer pandemonium to reign all over the house, and yet lie ranked
 in the kitchen like Egyptian mummies, only that the sound of their
 snoring rose and fell ceaselessly like the drone of a bagpipe.  Here the
 Six-Footers invaded them--in their citadel, so to speak; counted the
 bunks and the sleepers; proposed to put me in bed to one of the lasses,
 proposed to have one of the lasses out to make room for me, fell over
 chairs, and made noise enough to waken the dead: the whole illuminated by
 the same young torch-bearer, but now with two candles, and rapidly
 beginning to look like a man in a snowstorm.  At last a bed was found for
 me, my clothes were hung out to dry before the parlour fire, and I was
 mercifully left to my repose.
 
 I awoke about nine with the sun shining in my eyes.  The landlord came at
 my summons, brought me my clothes dried and decently brushed, and gave me
 the good news that the Six-Feet-High Club were all abed and sleeping off
 their excesses.  Where they were bestowed was a puzzle to me until (as I
 was strolling about the garden patch waiting for breakfast) I came on a
 barn door, and, looking in, saw all the red face mixed in the straw like
 plums in a cake.  Quoth the stalwart maid who brought me my porridge and
 bade me 'eat them while they were hot,' 'Ay, they were a' on the ran-dan
 last nicht!  Hout! they're fine lads, and they'll be nane the waur of it.
 Forby Farbes's coat.  I dinna see wha's to get the creish off that!' she
 added, with a sigh; in which, identifying Forbes as the torch-bearer, I
 mentally joined.
 
 It was a brave morning when I took the road; the sun shone, spring seemed
 in the air, it smelt like April or May, and some over-venturous birds
 sang in the coppices as I went by.  I had plenty to think of, plenty to
 be grateful for, that gallant morning; and yet I had a twitter at my
 heart.  To enter the city by daylight might be compared to marching on a
 battery; every face that I confronted would threaten me like the muzzle
 of a gun; and it came into my head suddenly with how much better a
 countenance I should be able to do it if I could but improvise a
 companion.  Hard by Merchiston I was so fortunate as to observe a bulky
 gentleman in broadcloth and gaiters, stooping with his head almost
 between his knees, before a stone wall.  Seizing occasion by the
 forelock, I drew up as I came alongside and inquired what he had found to
 interest him.
 
 He turned upon me a countenance not much less broad than his back.
 
 'Why, sir,' he replied, 'I was even marvelling at my own indefeasible
 stupeedity: that I should walk this way every week of my life, weather
 permitting, and should never before have _notticed_ that stone,' touching
 it at the same time with a goodly oak staff.
 
 I followed the indication.  The stone, which had been built sideways into
 the wall, offered traces of heraldic sculpture.  At once there came a
 wild idea into my mind: his appearance tallied with Flora's description
 of Mr. Robbie; a knowledge of heraldry would go far to clinch the proof;
 and what could be more desirable than to scrape an informal acquaintance
 with the man whom I must approach next day with my tale of the drovers,
 and whom I yet wished to please?  I stooped in turn.
 
 'A chevron,' I said; 'on a chief three mullets?  Looks like Douglas, does
 it not?'
 
 'Yes, sir, it does; you are right,' said he: 'it _does_ look like
 Douglas; though, without the tinctures, and the whole thing being so
 battered and broken up, who shall venture an opinion?  But allow me to be
 more personal, sir.  In these degenerate days I am astonished you should
 display so much proficiency.'
 
 'O, I was well grounded in my youth by an old gentleman, a friend of my
 family, and I may say my guardian,' said I; 'but I have forgotten it
 since.  God forbid I should delude you into thinking me a herald, sir!  I
 am only an ungrammatical amateur.'
 
 'And a little modesty does no harm even in a herald,' says my new
 acquaintance graciously.
 
 In short, we fell together on our onward way, and maintained very
 amicable discourse along what remained of the country road, past the
 suburbs, and on into the streets of the New Town, which was as deserted
 and silent as a city of the dead.  The shops were closed, no vehicle ran,
 cats sported in the midst of the sunny causeway; and our steps and voices
 re-echoed from the quiet houses.  It was the high-water, full and
 strange, of that weekly trance to which the city of Edinburgh is
 subjected: the apotheosis of the _Sawbath_; and I confess the spectacle
 wanted not grandeur, however much it may have lacked cheerfulness.  There
 are few religious ceremonies more imposing.  As we thus walked and talked
 in a public seclusion the bells broke out ringing through all the bounds
 of the city, and the streets began immediately to be thronged with decent
 church-goers.
 
 'Ah!' said my companion, 'there are the bells!  Now, sir, as you are a
 stranger I must offer you the hospitality of my pew.  I do not know
 whether you are at all used with our Scottish form; but in case you are
 not I will find your places for you; and Dr. Henry Gray, of St. Mary's
 (under whom I sit), is as good a preacher as we have to show you.'
 
 This put me in a quandary.  It was a degree of risk I was scarce prepared
 for.  Dozens of people, who might pass me by in the street with no more
 than a second look, would go on from the second to the third, and from
 that to a final recognition, if I were set before them, immobilised in a
 pew, during the whole time of service.  An unlucky turn of the head would
 suffice to arrest their attention.  'Who is that?' they would think:
 'surely I should know him!' and, a church being the place in all the
 world where one has least to think of, it was ten to one they would end
 by remembering me before the benediction.  However, my mind was made up:
 I thanked my obliging friend, and placed myself at his disposal.
 
 Our way now led us into the north-east quarter of the town, among
 pleasant new faubourgs, to a decent new church of a good size, where I
 was soon seated by the side of my good Samaritan, and looked upon by a
 whole congregation of menacing faces.  At first the possibility of danger
 kept me awake; but by the time I had assured myself there was none to be
 apprehended, and the service was not in the least likely to be enlivened
 by the arrest of a French spy, I had to resign myself to the task of
 listening to Dr. Henry Gray.
 
 As we moved out, after this ordeal was over, my friend was at once
 surrounded and claimed by his acquaintances of the congregation; and I
 was rejoiced to hear him addressed by the expected name of Robbie.
 
 So soon as we were clear of the crowd--'Mr. Robbie?' said I, bowing.
 
 'The very same, sir,' said he.
 
 'If I mistake not, a lawyer?'
 
 'A writer to His Majesty's Signet, at your service.'
 
 'It seems we were predestined to be acquaintances!' I exclaimed.  'I have
 here a card in my pocket intended for you.  It is from my family lawyer.
 It was his last word, as I was leaving, to ask to be remembered kindly,
 and to trust you would pass over so informal an introduction.'
 
 And I offered him the card.
 
 'Ay, ay, my old friend Daniel!' says he, looking on the card.  'And how
 does my old friend Daniel?'
 
 I gave a favourable view of Mr. Romaine's health.
 
 'Well, this is certainly a whimsical incident,' he continued.  'And since
 we are thus met already--and so much to my advantage!--the simplest thing
 will be to prosecute the acquaintance instantly.  Let me propose a snack
 between sermons, a bottle of my particular green seal--and when nobody is
 looking we can talk blazons, Mr. Ducie!'--which was the name I then used
 and had already incidentally mentioned, in the vain hope of provoking a
 return in kind.
 
 'I beg your pardon, sir: do I understand you to invite me to your house?'
 said I.
 
 'That was the idea I was trying to convey,' said he.  'We have the name
 of hospitable people up here, and I would like you to try mine.'
 
 'Mr. Robbie, I shall hope to try it some day, but not yet,' I replied.
 'I hope you will not misunderstand me.  My business, which brings me to
 your city, is of a peculiar kind.  Till you shall have heard it, and,
 indeed, till its issue is known, I should feel as if I had stolen your
 invitation.'
 
 'Well, well,' said he, a little sobered, 'it must be as you wish, though
 you would hardly speak otherwise if you had committed homicide!  Mine is
 the loss.  I must eat alone; a very pernicious thing for a person of my
 habit of body, content myself with a pint of skinking claret, and
 meditate the discourse.  But about this business of yours: if it is so
 particular as all that, it will doubtless admit of no delay.'
 
 'I must confess, sir, it presses,' I acknowledged.
 
 'Then, let us say to-morrow at half-past eight in the morning,' said he;
 'and I hope, when your mind is at rest (and it does you much honour to
 take it as you do), that you will sit down with me to the postponed meal,
 not forgetting the bottle.  You have my address?' he added, and gave it
 me--which was the only thing I wanted.
 
 At last, at the level of York Place, we parted with mutual civilities,
 and I was free to pursue my way, through the mobs of people returning
 from church, to my lodgings in St. James' Square.
 
 Almost at the house door whom should I overtake but my landlady in a
 dress of gorgeous severity, and dragging a prize in her wake: no less
 than Rowley, with the cockade in his hat, and a smart pair of tops to his
 boots!  When I said he was in the lady's wake I spoke but in metaphor.
 As a matter of fact he was squiring her, with the utmost dignity, on his
 arm; and I followed them up the stairs, smiling to myself.
 
 Both were quick to salute me as soon as I was perceived, and Mrs.
 McRankine inquired where I had been.  I told her boastfully, giving her
 the name of the church and the divine, and ignorantly supposing I should
 have gained caste.  But she soon opened my eyes.  In the roots of the
 Scottish character there are knots and contortions that not only no
 stranger can understand, but no stranger can follow; he walks among
 explosives; and his best course is to throw himself upon their
 mercy--'Just as I am, without one plea,' a citation from one of the
 lady's favourite hymns.
 
 The sound she made was unmistakable in meaning, though it was impossible
 to be written down; and I at once executed the manoeuvre I have
 recommended.
 
 'You must remember I am a perfect stranger in your city,' said I.  'If I
 have done wrong, it was in mere ignorance, my dear lady; and this
 afternoon, if you will be so good as to take me, I shall accompany
 _you_.'
 
 But she was not to be pacified at the moment, and departed to her own
 quarters murmuring.
 
 'Well, Rowley,' said I; 'and have you been to church?'
 
 'If you please, sir,' he said.
 
 'Well, you have not been any less unlucky than I have,' I returned.  'And
 how did you get on with the Scottish form?'
 
 'Well, sir, it was pretty 'ard, the form was, and reether narrow,' he
 replied.  'I don't know w'y it is, but it seems to me like as if things
 were a good bit changed since William Wallace!  That was a main queer
 church she took me to, Mr. Anne!  I don't know as I could have sat it
 out, if she 'adn't 'a' give me peppermints.  She ain't a bad one at
 bottom, the old girl; she do pounce a bit, and she do worry, but, law
 bless you, Mr. Anne, it ain't nothink really--she don't _mean_ it.  W'y,
 she was down on me like a 'undredweight of bricks this morning.  You see,
 last night she 'ad me in to supper, and, I beg your pardon, sir, but I
 took the freedom of playing her a chune or two.  She didn't mind a bit;
 so this morning I began to play to myself, and she flounced in, and flew
 up, and carried on no end about Sunday!'
 
 'You see, Rowley,' said I, 'they're all mad up here, and you have to
 humour them.  See and don't quarrel with Mrs. McRankine; and, above all,
 don't argue with her, or you'll get the worst of it.  Whatever she says,
 touch your forelock and say, "If you please!" or "I beg pardon, ma'am."
 And let me tell you one thing: I am sorry, but you have to go to church
 with her again this afternoon.  That's duty, my boy!'
 
 As I had foreseen, the bells had scarce begun before Mrs. McRankine
 presented herself to be our escort, upon which I sprang up with readiness
 and offered her my arm.  Rowley followed behind.  I was beginning to grow
 accustomed to the risks of my stay in Edinburgh, and it even amused me to
 confront a new churchful.  I confess the amusement did not last until the
 end; for if Dr. Gray were long, Mr. McCraw was not only longer, but more
 incoherent, and the matter of his sermon (which was a direct attack,
 apparently, on all the Churches of the world, my own among the number),
 where it had not the tonic quality of personal insult, rather inclined me
 to slumber.  But I braced myself for my life, kept up Rowley with the end
 of a pin, and came through it awake, but no more.
 
 Bethiah was quite conquered by this 'mark of grace,' though, I am afraid,
 she was also moved by more worldly considerations.  The first is, the
 lady had not the least objection to go to church on the arm of an
 elegantly dressed young gentleman, and be followed by a spruce servant
 with a cockade in his hat.  I could see it by the way she took possession
 of us, found us the places in the Bible, whispered to me the name of the
 minister, passed us lozenges, which I (for my part) handed on to Rowley,
 and at each fresh attention stole a little glance about the church to
 make sure she was observed.  Rowley was a pretty boy; you will pardon me
 if I also remembered that I was a favourable-looking young man.  When we
 grow elderly, how the room brightens, and begins to look as it ought to
 look, on the entrance of youth, grace, health, and comeliness!  You do
 not want them for yourself, perhaps not even for your son, but you look
 on smiling; and when you recall their images--again, it is with a smile.
 I defy you to see or think of them and not smile with an infinite and
 intimate, but quite impersonal, pleasure.  Well, either I know nothing of
 women, or that was the case with Bethiah McRankine.  She had been to
 church with a cockade behind her, on the one hand; on the other, her
 house was brightened by the presence of a pair of good-looking young
 fellows of the other sex, who were always pleased and deferential in her
 society and accepted her views as final.
 
 These were sentiments to be encouraged; and, on the way home from
 church--if church it could be called--I adopted a most insidious device
 to magnify her interest.  I took her into the confidence, that is, of my
 love affair, and I had no sooner mentioned a young lady with whom my
 affections were engaged than she turned upon me a face of awful gravity.
 
 'Is she bonny?' she inquired.
 
 I gave her full assurances upon that.
 
 'To what denoamination does she beloang?' came next, and was so
 unexpected as almost to deprive me of breath.
 
 'Upon my word, ma'am, I have never inquired,' cried I; 'I only know that
 she is a heartfelt Christian, and that is enough.'
 
 'Ay!' she sighed, 'if she has the root of the maitter!  There's a remnant
 practically in most of the denoaminations.  There's some in the
 McGlashanites, and some in the Glassites, and mony in the McMillanites,
 and there's a leeven even in the Estayblishment.'
 
 'I have known some very good Papists even, if you go to that,' said I.
 
 'Mr. Ducie, think shame to yoursel'!' she cried.
 
 'Why, my dear madam!  I only--' I began.
 
 'You shouldnae jest in sairious maitters,' she interrupted.
 
 On the whole, she entered into what I chose to tell her of our idyll with
 avidity, like a cat licking her whiskers over a dish of cream; and,
 strange to say--and so expansive a passion is that of love!--that I
 derived a perhaps equal satisfaction from confiding in that breast of
 iron.  It made an immediate bond: from that hour we seemed to be welded
 into a family-party; and I had little difficulty in persuading her to
 join us and to preside over our tea-table.  Surely there was never so
 ill-matched a trio as Rowley, Mrs. McRankine, and the Viscount Anne!  But
 I am of the Apostle's way, with a difference: all things to all women!
 When I cannot please a woman, hang me in my cravat!
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVIII--EVENTS OF MONDAY: THE LAWYER'S PARTY
 
 
 By half-past eight o'clock on the next morning, I was ringing the bell of
 the lawyer's office in Castle Street, where I found him ensconced at a
 business table, in a room surrounded by several tiers of green tin cases.
 He greeted me like an old friend.
 
 'Come away, sir, come away!' said he.  'Here is the dentist ready for
 you, and I think I can promise you that the operation will be practically
 painless.'
 
 'I am not so sure of that, Mr. Robbie,' I replied, as I shook hands with
 him.  'But at least there shall be no time lost with me.'
 
 I had to confess to having gone a-roving with a pair of drovers and their
 cattle, to having used a false name, to having murdered or half-murdered
 a fellow-creature in a scuffle on the moors, and to having suffered a
 couple of quite innocent men to lie some time in prison on a charge from
 which I could have immediately freed them.  All this I gave him first of
 all, to be done with the worst of it; and all this he took with gravity,
 but without the least appearance of surprise.
 
 'Now, sir,' I continued, 'I expect to have to pay for my unhappy frolic,
 but I would like very well if it could be managed without my personal
 appearance or even the mention of my real name.  I had so much wisdom as
 to sail under false colours in this foolish jaunt of mine; my family
 would be extremely concerned if they had wind of it; but at the same
 time, if the case of this Faa has terminated fatally, and there are
 proceedings against Todd and Candlish, I am not going to stand by and see
 them vexed, far less punished; and I authorise you to give me up for
 trial if you think that best--or, if you think it unnecessary, in the
 meanwhile to make preparations for their defence.  I hope, sir, that I am
 as little anxious to be Quixotic, as I am determined to be just.'
 
 'Very fairly spoken,' said Mr. Robbie.  'It is not much in my line, as
 doubtless your friend, Mr. Romaine, will have told you.  I rarely mix
 myself up with anything on the criminal side, or approaching it.
 However, for a young gentleman like you, I may stretch a point, and I
 dare say I may be able to accomplish more than perhaps another.  I will
 go at once to the Procurator Fiscal's office and inquire.'
 
 'Wait a moment, Mr. Robbie,' said I.  'You forget the chapter of
 expenses.  I had thought, for a beginning, of placing a thousand pounds
 in your hands.'
 
 'My dear sir, you will kindly wait until I render you my bill,' said Mr.
 Robbie severely.'
 
 'It seemed to me,' I protested, 'that coming to you almost as a stranger,
 and placing in your hands a piece of business so contrary to your habits,
 some substantial guarantee of my good faith--'
 
 'Not the way that we do business in Scotland, sir,' he interrupted, with
 an air of closing the dispute.
 
 'And yet, Mr. Robbie,' I continued, 'I must ask you to allow me to
 proceed.  I do not merely refer to the expenses of the case.  I have my
 eye besides on Todd and Candlish.  They are thoroughly deserving fellows;
 they have been subjected through me to a considerable term of
 imprisonment; and I suggest, sir, that you should not spare money for
 their indemnification.  This will explain,' I added smiling, 'my offer of
 the thousand pounds.  It was in the nature of a measure by which you
 should judge the scale on which I can afford to have this business
 carried through.'
 
 'I take you perfectly, Mr. Ducie,' said he.  'But the sooner I am off,
 the better this affair is like to be guided.  My clerk will show you into
 the waiting-room and give you the day's _Caledonian Mercury_ and the last
 _Register_ to amuse yourself with in the interval.'
 
 I believe Mr. Robbie was at least three hours gone.  I saw him descend
 from a cab at the door, and almost immediately after I was shown again
 into his study, where the solemnity of his manner led me to augur the
 worst.  For some time he had the inhumanity to read me a lecture as to
 the incredible silliness, 'not to say immorality,' of my behaviour.  'I
 have the satisfaction in telling you my opinion, because it appears that
 you are going to get off scot free,' he continued, where, indeed, I
 thought he might have begun.
 
 'The man, Faa, has been discharged cured; and the two men, Todd and
 Candlish, would have been leeberated lone ago if it had not been for
 their extraordinary loyalty to yourself, Mr. Ducie--or Mr. St. Ivey, as I
 believe I should now call you.  Never a word would either of the two old
 fools volunteer that in any manner pointed at the existence of such a
 person; and when they were confronted with Faa's version of the affair,
 they gave accounts so entirely discrepant with their own former
 declarations, as well as with each other, that the Fiscal was quite
 nonplussed, and imaigined there was something behind it.  You may believe
 I soon laughed him out of that!  And I had the satisfaction of seeing
 your two friends set free, and very glad to be on the causeway again.'
 
 'Oh, sir,' I cried, 'you should have brought them here.'
 
 'No instructions, Mr. Ducie!' said he.  'How did I know you wished to
 renew an acquaintance which you had just terminated so fortunately?  And,
 indeed, to be frank with you, I should have set my face against it, if
 you had!  Let them go!  They are paid and contented, and have the highest
 possible opinion of Mr. St. Ivey!  When I gave them fifty pounds
 apiece--which was rather more than enough, Mr. Ducie, whatever you may
 think--the man Todd, who has the only tongue of the party, struck his
 staff on the ground.  "Weel," says he, "I aye said he was a gentleman!"
 "Man, Todd," said I, "that was just what Mr St. Ivey said of yourself!"'
 
 'So it was a case of "Compliments fly when gentlefolk meet."'
 
 'No, no, Mr. Ducie, man Todd and man Candlish are gone out of your life,
 and a good riddance!  They are fine fellows in their way, but no proper
 associates for the like of yourself; and do you finally agree to be done
 with all eccentricity--take up with no more drovers, or tinkers, but
 enjoy the naitural pleesures for which your age, your wealth, your
 intelligence, and (if I may be allowed to say it) your appearance so
 completely fit you.  And the first of these,' quoth he, looking at his
 watch, 'will be to step through to my dining-room and share a bachelor's
 luncheon.'
 
 Over the meal, which was good, Mr. Robbie continued to develop the same
 theme.  'You're, no doubt, what they call a dancing-man?' said he.
 'Well, on Thursday night there is the Assembly Ball.  You must certainly
 go there, and you must permit me besides to do the honours of the ceety
 and send you a ticket.  I am a thorough believer in a young man being a
 young man--but no more drovers or rovers, if you love me!  Talking of
 which puts me in mind that you may be short of partners at the
 Assembly--oh, I have been young myself!--and if ye care to come to
 anything so portentiously tedious as a tea-party at the house of a
 bachelor lawyer, consisting mainly of his nieces and nephews, and his
 grand-nieces and grand-nephews, and his wards, and generally the whole
 clan of the descendants of his clients, you might drop in to-night
 towards seven o'clock.  I think I can show you one or two that are worth
 looking at, and you can dance with them later on at the Assembly.'
 
 He proceeded to give me a sketch of one or two eligible young ladies'
 whom I might expect to meet.  'And then there's my parteecular friend,
 Miss Flora,' said he.  'But I'll make no attempt of a description.  You
 shall see her for yourself.'
 
 It will be readily supposed that I accepted his invitation; and returned
 home to make a toilette worthy of her I was to meet and the good news of
 which I was the bearer.  The toilette, I have reason to believe, was a
 success.  Mr. Rowley dismissed me with a farewell: 'Crikey!  Mr. Anne,
 but you do look prime!'  Even the stony Bethiah was--how shall I
 say?--dazzled, but scandalised, by my appearance; and while, of course,
 she deplored the vanity that led to it, she could not wholly prevent
 herself from admiring the result.
 
 'Ay, Mr. Ducie, this is a poor employment for a wayfaring Christian man!'
 she said.  'Wi' Christ despised and rejectit in all pairts of the world
 and the flag of the Covenant flung doon, you will be muckle better on
 your knees!  However, I'll have to confess that it sets you weel.  And if
 it's the lassie ye're gaun to see the nicht, I suppose I'll just have to
 excuse ye!  Bairns maun be bairns!' she said, with a sigh.  'I mind when
 Mr. McRankine came courtin', and that's lang by-gane--I mind I had a
 green gown, passementit, that was thocht to become me to admiration.  I
 was nae just exactly what ye would ca' bonny; but I was pale,
 penetratin', and interestin'.'  And she leaned over the stair-rail with a
 candle to watch my descent as long as it should be possible.
 
 It was but a little party at Mr. Robbie's--by which, I do not so much
 mean that there were few people, for the rooms were crowded, as that
 there was very little attempted to entertain them.  In one apartment
 there were tables set out, where the elders were solemnly engaged upon
 whist; in the other and larger one, a great number of youth of both sexes
 entertained themselves languidly, the ladies sitting upon chairs to be
 courted, the gentlemen standing about in various attitudes of insinuation
 or indifference.  Conversation appeared the sole resource, except in so
 far as it was modified by a number of keepsakes and annuals which lay
 dispersed upon the tables, and of which the young beaux displayed the
 illustrations to the ladies.  Mr. Robbie himself was customarily in the
 card-room; only now and again, when he cut out, he made an incursion
 among the young folks, and rolled about jovially from one to another, the
 very picture of the general uncle.
 
 It chanced that Flora had met Mr. Robbie in the course of the afternoon.
 'Now, Miss Flora,' he had said, 'come early, for I have a Phoenix to show
 you--one Mr. Ducie, a new client of mine that, I vow, I have fallen in
 love with'; and he was so good as to add a word or two on my appearance,
 from which Flora conceived a suspicion of the truth.  She had come to the
 party, in consequence, on the knife-edge of anticipation and alarm; had
 chosen a place by the door, where I found her, on my arrival, surrounded
 by a posse of vapid youths; and, when I drew near, sprang up to meet me
 in the most natural manner in the world, and, obviously, with a prepared
 form of words.
 
 'How do you do, Mr. Ducie?' she said.  'It is quite an age since I have
 seen you!'
 
 'I have much to tell you, Miss Gilchrist,' I replied.  'May I sit down?'
 
 For the artful girl, by sitting near the door, and the judicious use of
 her shawl, had contrived to keep a chair empty by her side.
 
 She made room for me, as a matter of course, and the youths had the
 discretion to melt before us.  As soon as I was once seated her fan flew
 out, and she whispered behind it:
 
 'Are you mad?'
 
 'Madly in love,' I replied; 'but in no other sense.'
 
 'I have no patience!  You cannot understand what I am suffering!' she
 said.  'What are you to say to Ronald, to Major Chevenix, to my aunt?'
 
 Your aunt?' I cried, with a start.  '_Peccavi_! is she here?'
 
 'She is in the card-room at whist,' said Flora.
 
 'Where she will probably stay all the evening?' I suggested.
 
 'She may,' she admitted; 'she generally does!'
 
 'Well, then, I must avoid the card-room,' said I, 'which is very much
 what I had counted upon doing.  I did not come here to play cards, but to
 contemplate a certain young lady to my heart's content--if it can ever be
 contented!--and to tell her some good news.'
 
 'But there are still Ronald and the Major!' she persisted.  'They are not
 card-room fixtures!  Ronald will be coming and going.  And as for Mr.
 Chevenix, he--'
 
 'Always sits with Miss Flora?' I interrupted.  'And they talk of poor St.
 Ives?  I had gathered as much, my dear; and Mr. Ducie has come to prevent
 it!  But pray dismiss these fears!  I mind no one but your aunt.'
 
 'Why my aunt?'
 
 'Because your aunt is a lady, my dear, and a very clever lady, and, like
 all clever ladies, a very rash lady,' said I.  'You can never count upon
 them, unless you are sure of getting them in a corner, as I have got you,
 and talking them over rationally, as I am just engaged on with yourself!
 It would be quite the same to your aunt to make the worst kind of a
 scandal, with an equal indifference to my danger and to the feelings of
 our good host!'
 
 'Well,' she said, 'and what of Ronald, then?  Do you think _he_ is above
 making a scandal?  You must know him very little!'
 
 'On the other hand, it is my pretension that I know him very well!' I
 replied.  'I must speak to Ronald first--not Ronald to me--that is all!'
 
 'Then, please, go and speak to him at once!' she pleaded.  He is
 there--do you see?--at the upper end of the room, talking to that girl in
 pink.'
 
 'And so lose this seat before I have told you my good news?' I exclaimed.
 'Catch me!  And, besides, my dear one, think a little of me and my good
 news!  I thought the bearer of good news was always welcome!  I hoped he
 might be a little welcome for himself!  Consider!  I have but one friend;
 and let me stay by her!  And there is only one thing I care to hear; and
 let me hear it!'
 
 'Oh, Anne,' she sighed, 'if I did not love you, why should I be so
 uneasy?  I am turned into a coward, dear!  Think, if it were the other
 way round--if you were quite safe and I was in, oh, such danger!'
 
 She had no sooner said it than I was convicted of being a dullard.  'God
 forgive me, dear!'  I made haste to reply.  'I never saw before that
 there were two sides to this!'  And I told her my tale as briefly as I
 could, and rose to seek Ronald.  'You see, my dear, you are obeyed,' I
 said.
 
 She gave me a look that was a reward in itself; and as I turned away from
 her, with a strong sense of turning away from the sun, I carried that
 look in my bosom like a caress.  The girl in pink was an arch, ogling
 person, with a good deal of eyes and teeth, and a great play of shoulders
 and rattle of conversation.  There could be no doubt, from Mr. Ronald's
 attitude, that he worshipped the very chair she sat on.  But I was quite
 ruthless.  I laid my hand on his shoulder, as he was stooping over her
 like a hen over a chicken.
 
 'Excuse me for one moment, Mr. Gilchrist!' said I.
 
 He started and span about in answer to my touch, and exhibited a face of
 inarticulate wonder.
 
  'Yes!' I continued, 'it is even myself!  Pardon me for interrupting so
 agreeable a _tete-a-tete_, but you know, my good fellow, we owe a first
 duty to Mr. Robbie.  It would never do to risk making a scene in the
 man's drawing-room; so the first thing I had to attend to was to have you
 warned.  The name I go by is Ducie, too, in case of accidents.'
 
 'I--I say, you know!' cried Ronald.  'Deuce take it, what are you doing
 here?'
 
 'Hush, hush!' said I.  'Not the place, my dear fellow--not the place.
 Come to my rooms, if you like, to-night after the party, or to-morrow in
 the morning, and we can talk it out over a segar.  But here, you know, it
 really won't do at all.'
 
 Before he could collect his mind for an answer, I had given him my
 address in St. James Square, and had again mingled with the crowd.  Alas!
 I was not fated to get back to Flora so easily!  Mr. Robbie was in the
 path: he was insatiably loquacious; and as he continued to palaver I
 watched the insipid youths gather again about my idol, and cursed my fate
 and my host.  He remembered suddenly that I was to attend the Assembly
 Ball on Thursday, and had only attended to-night by way of a preparative.
 This put it into his head to present me to another young lady; but I
 managed this interview with so much art that, while I was scrupulously
 polite and even cordial to the fair one, I contrived to keep Robbie
 beside me all the time and to leave along with him when the ordeal was
 over.  We were just walking away arm in arm, when I spied my friend the
 Major approaching, stiff as a ramrod and, as usual, obtrusively clean.
 
 'Oh! there's a man I want to know,' said I, taking the bull by the horns.
 'Won't you introduce me to Major Chevenix?'
 
 'At a word, my dear fellow,' said Robbie; and 'Major!' he cried, 'come
 here and let me present to you my friend Mr. Ducie, who desires the
 honour of your acquaintance.'
 
 The Major flushed visibly, but otherwise preserved his composure.  He
 bowed very low.  'I'm not very sure,' he said: 'I have an idea we have
 met before?'
 
 'Informally,' I said, returning his bow; 'and I have long looked forward
 to the pleasure of regularising our acquaintance.'
 
 'You are very good, Mr. Ducie,' he returned.  'Perhaps you could aid my
 memory a little?  Where was it that I had the pleasure?'
 
 'Oh, that would be telling tales out of school,' said I, with a laugh,
 'and before my lawyer, too!'
 
 'I'll wager,' broke in Mr. Robbie, 'that, when you knew my client,
 Chevenix--the past of our friend Mr. Ducie is an obscure chapter full of
 horrid secrets--I'll wager, now, you knew him as St. Ivey,' says he,
 nudging me violently.
 
 'I think not, sir,' said the Major, with pinched lips.
 
 'Well, I wish he may prove all right!' continued the lawyer, with
 certainly the worst-inspired jocularity in the world.  'I know nothing by
 him!  He may be a swell mobsman for me with his aliases.  You must put
 your memory on the rack, Major, and when ye've remembered when and where
 ye met him, be sure ye tell me.'
 
 'I will not fail, sir,' said Chevenix.
 
 'Seek to him!' cried Robbie, waving his hand as he departed.
 
 The Major, as soon as we were alone, turned upon me his impassive
 countenance.
 
 'Well,' he said, 'you have courage.'
 
 'It is undoubted as your honour, sir,' I returned, bowing.
 
 'Did you expect to meet me, may I ask?' said he.
 
 'You saw, at least, that I courted the presentation,' said I.
 
 'And you were not afraid?' said Chevenix.
 
 'I was perfectly at ease.  I knew I was dealing with a gentleman.  Be
 that your epitaph.'
 
 'Well, there are some other people looking for you,' he said, 'who will
 make no bones about the point of honour.  The police, my dear sir, are
 simply agog about you.'
 
 'And I think that that was coarse,' said I.
 
 'You have seen Miss Gilchrist?' he inquired, changing the subject.
 
 'With whom, I am led to understand, we are on a footing of rivalry?' I
 asked.  'Yes, I have seen her.'
 
 'And I was just seeking her,' he replied.
 
 I was conscious of a certain thrill of temper; so, I suppose, was he.  We
 looked each other up and down.
 
 'The situation is original,' he resumed.
 
 'Quite,' said I.  'But let me tell you frankly you are blowing a cold
 coal.  I owe you so much for your kindness to the prisoner Champdivers.'
 
 'Meaning that the lady's affections are more advantageously disposed of?'
 he asked, with a sneer.  'Thank you, I am sure.  And, since you have
 given me a lead, just hear a word of good advice in your turn.  Is it
 fair, is it delicate, is it like a gentleman, to compromise the young
 lady by attentions which (as you know very well) can come to nothing?'
 
 I was utterly unable to find words in answer.
 
 'Excuse me if I cut this interview short,' he went on.  'It seems to me
 doomed to come to nothing, and there is more attractive metal.'
 
 'Yes,' I replied, 'as you say, it cannot amount to much.  You are
 impotent, bound hand and foot in honour.  You know me to be a man falsely
 accused, and even if you did not know it, from your position as my rival
 you have only the choice to stand quite still or to be infamous.'
 
 'I would not say that,' he returned, with another change of colour.  'I
 may hear it once too often.'
 
 With which he moved off straight for where Flora was sitting amidst her
 court of vapid youths, and I had no choice but to follow him, a bad
 second, and reading myself, as I went, a sharp lesson on the command of
 temper.
 
 It is a strange thing how young men in their teens go down at the mere
 wind of the coming of men of twenty-five and upwards!  The vapid ones
 fled without thought of resistance before the Major and me; a few dallied
 awhile in the neighbourhood--so to speak, with their fingers in their
 mouths--but presently these also followed the rout, and we remained face
 to face before Flora.  There was a draught in that corner by the door;
 she had thrown her pelisse over her bare arms and neck, and the dark fur
 of the trimming set them off.  She shone by contrast; the light played on
 her smooth skin to admiration, and the colour changed in her excited
 face.  For the least fraction of a second she looked from one to the
 other of her pair of rival swains, and seemed to hesitate.  Then she
 addressed Chevenix:--
 
 'You are coming to the Assembly, of course, Major Chevenix?' said she.
 
 'I fear not; I fear I shall be otherwise engaged,' he replied.  'Even the
 pleasure of dancing with you, Miss Flora, must give way to duty.'
 
 For awhile the talk ran harmlessly on the weather, and then branched off
 towards the war.  It seemed to be by no one's fault; it was in the air,
 and had to come.
 
 'Good news from the scene of operations,' said the Major.
 
 'Good news while it lasts,' I said.  'But will Miss Gilchrist tell us her
 private thought upon the war?  In her admiration for the victors, does
 not there mingle some pity for the vanquished?'
 
 'Indeed, sir,' she said, with animation, 'only too much of it!  War is a
 subject that I do not think should be talked of to a girl.  I am, I have
 to be--what do you call it?--a non-combatant?  And to remind me of what
 others have to do and suffer: no, it is not fair!'
 
 'Miss Gilchrist has the tender female heart,' said Chevenix.
 
 'Do not be too sure of that!' she cried.  'I would love to be allowed to
 fight myself!'
 
 'On which side?' I asked.
 
 'Can you ask?' she exclaimed.  'I am a Scottish girl!'
 
 'She is a Scottish girl!' repeated the Major, looking at me.  'And no one
 grudges you her pity!'
 
 'And I glory in every grain of it she has to spare,' said I.  'Pity is
 akin to love.'
 
 'Well, and let us put that question to Miss Gilchrist.  It is for her to
 decide, and for us to bow to the decision.  Is pity, Miss Flora, or is
 admiration, nearest love?'
 
 'Oh come,' said I, 'let us be more concrete.  Lay before the lady a
 complete case: describe your man, then I'll describe _mine_, and Miss
 Flora shall decide.'
 
 'I think I see your meaning,' said he, 'and I'll try.  You think that
 pity--and the kindred sentiments--have the greatest power upon the heart.
 I think more nobly of women.  To my view, the man they love will first of
 all command their respect; he will be steadfast--proud, if you please;
 dry, possibly--but of all things steadfast.  They will look at him in
 doubt; at last they will see that stern face which he presents to all the
 rest of the world soften to them alone.  First, trust, I say.  It is so
 that a woman loves who is worthy of heroes.'
 
 'Your man is very ambitious, sir,' said I, 'and very much of a hero!
 Mine is a humbler, and, I would fain think, a more human dog.  He is one
 with no particular trust in himself, with no superior steadfastness to be
 admired for, who sees a lady's face, who hears her voice, and, without
 any phrase about the matter, falls in love.  What does he ask for, then,
 but pity?--pity for his weakness, pity for his love, which is his life.
 You would make women always the inferiors, gaping up at your imaginary
 lover; he, like a marble statue, with his nose in the air!  But God has
 been wiser than you; and the most steadfast of your heroes may prove
 human, after all.  We appeal to the queen for judgment,' I added, turning
 and bowing before Flora.
 
 'And how shall the queen judge?' she asked.  'I must give you an answer
 that is no answer at all.  "The wind bloweth where it listeth": she goes
 where her heart goes.'
 
 Her face flushed as she said it; mine also, for I read in it a
 declaration, and my heart swelled for joy.  But Chevenix grew pale.
 
 'You make of life a very dreadful kind of lottery, ma'am,' said he.  'But
 I will not despair.  Honest and unornamental is still my choice.'
 
 And I must say he looked extremely handsome and very amusingly like the
 marble statue with its nose in the air to which I had compared him.
 
 'I cannot imagine how we got upon this subject,' said Flora.
 
 'Madame, it was through the war,' replied Chevenix.
 
 'All roads lead to Rome,' I commented.  'What else would you expect Mr.
 Chevenix and myself to talk of?'
 
 About this time I was conscious of a certain bustle and movement in the
 room behind me, but did not pay to it that degree of attention which
 perhaps would have been wise.  There came a certain change in Flora's
 face; she signalled repeatedly with her fan; her eyes appealed to me
 obsequiously; there could be no doubt that she wanted something--as well
 as I could make out, that I should go away and leave the field clear for
 my rival, which I had not the least idea of doing.  At last she rose from
 her chair with impatience.
 
 'I think it time you were saying good-night, Mr Ducie!' she said.
 
 I could not in the least see why, and said so.
 
 Whereupon she gave me this appalling answer, 'My aunt is coming out of
 the card-room.'
 
 In less time than it takes to tell, I had made my bow and my escape.
 Looking back from the doorway, I was privileged to see, for a moment, the
 august profile and gold eyeglasses of Miss Gilchrist issuing from the
 card-room; and the sight lent me wings.  I stood not on the order of my
 going; and a moment after, I was on the pavement of Castle Street, and
 the lighted windows shone down on me, and were crossed by ironical
 shadows of those who had remained behind.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIX--EVENTS OF TUESDAY: THE TOILS CLOSING
 
 
 This day began with a surprise.  I found a letter on my breakfast-table
 addressed to Edward Ducie, Esquire; and at first I was startled beyond
 measure.  'Conscience doth make cowards of us all!'  When I had opened
 it, it proved to be only a note from the lawyer, enclosing a card for the
 Assembly Ball on Thursday evening.  Shortly after, as I was composing my
 mind with a segar at one of the windows of the sitting-room, and Rowley,
 having finished the light share of work that fell to him, sat not far off
 tootling with great spirit and a marked preference for the upper octave,
 Ronald was suddenly shown in.  I got him a segar, drew in a chair to the
 side of the fire, and installed him there--I was going to say, at his
 ease, but no expression could be farther from the truth.  He was plainly
 on pins and needles, did not know whether to take or to refuse the segar,
 and, after he had taken it, did not know whether to light or to return
 it.  I saw he had something to say; I did not think it was his own
 something; and I was ready to offer a large bet it was really something
 of Major Chevenix's.
 
 'Well, and so here you are!' I observed, with pointless cordiality, for I
 was bound I should do nothing to help him out.  If he were, indeed, here
 running errands for my rival, he might have a fair field, but certainly
 no favour.
 
 'The fact is,' he began, 'I would rather see you alone.'
 
 'Why, certainly,' I replied.  'Rowley, you can step into the bedroom.  My
 dear fellow,' I continued, 'this sounds serious.  Nothing wrong, I
 trust.'
 
 'Well, I'll be quite honest,' said he.  'I _am_ a good deal bothered.'
 
 'And I bet I know why!' I exclaimed.  'And I bet I can put you to rights,
 too!'
 
 'What do you mean!' he asked.
 
 'You must be hard up,' said I, 'and all I can say is, you've come to the
 right place.  If you have the least use for a hundred pounds, or any such
 trifling sum as that, please mention it.  It's here, quite at your
 service.'
 
 'I am sure it is most kind of you,' said Ronald, 'and the truth is,
 though I can't think how you guessed it, that I really _am_ a little
 behind board.  But I haven't come to talk about that.'
 
 'No, I dare say!' cried I.  'Not worth talking about!  But remember,
 Ronald, you and I are on different sides of the business.  Remember that
 you did me one of those services that make men friends for ever.  And
 since I have had the fortune to come into a fair share of money, just
 oblige me, and consider so much of it as your own.'
 
 'No,' he said, 'I couldn't take it; I couldn't, really.  Besides, the
 fact is, I've come on a very different matter.  It's about my sister, St.
 Ives,' and he shook his head menacingly at me.
 
 'You're quite sure?' I persisted.  'It's here, at your service--up to
 five hundred pounds, if you like.  Well, all right; only remember where
 it is, when you do want it.'
 
 'Oh, please let me alone!' cried Ronald: 'I've come to say something
 unpleasant; and how on earth can I do it, if you don't give a fellow a
 chance?  It's about my sister, as I said.  You can see for yourself that
 it can't be allowed to go on.  It's compromising; it don't lead to
 anything; and you're not the kind of man (you must feel it yourself) that
 I can allow my female relatives to have anything to do with.  I hate
 saying this, St. Ives; it looks like hitting a man when he's down, you
 know; and I told the Major I very much disliked it from the first.
 However, it had to be said; and now it has been, and, between gentlemen,
 it shouldn't be necessary to refer to it again.'
 
 'It's compromising; it doesn't lead to anything; not the kind of man,' I
 repeated thoughtfully.  'Yes, I believe I understand, and shall make
 haste to put myself _en regle_.'  I stood up, and laid my segar down.
 'Mr. Gilchrist,' said I, with a bow, 'in answer to your very natural
 observations, I beg to offer myself as a suitor for your sister's hand.
 I am a man of title, of which we think lightly in France, but of ancient
 lineage, which is everywhere prized.  I can display thirty-two
 quarterings without a blot.  My expectations are certainly above the
 average: I believe my uncle's income averages about thirty thousand
 pounds, though I admit I was not careful to inform myself.  Put it
 anywhere between fifteen and fifty thousand; it is certainly not less.'
 
 'All this is very easy to say,' said Ronald, with a pitying smile.
 'Unfortunately, these things are in the air.'
 
 'Pardon me,--in Buckinghamshire,' said I, smiling.
 
 'Well, what I mean is, my dear St. Ives, that you _can't prove_ them,' he
 continued.  'They might just as well not be: do you follow me?  You can't
 bring us any third party to back you.'
 
 'Oh, come!' cried I, springing up and hurrying to the table.  'You must
 excuse me!'  I wrote Romaine's address.  'There is my reference, Mr.
 Gilchrist.  Until you have written to him, and received his negative
 answer, I have a right to be treated, and I shall see that you treat me,
 as a gentleman.'  He was brought up with a round turn at that.
 
 'I beg your pardon, St. Ives,' said he.  'Believe me, I had no wish to be
 offensive.  But there's the difficulty of this affair; I can't make any
 of my points without offence!  You must excuse me, it's not my fault.
 But, at any rate, you must see for yourself this proposal of marriage
 is--is merely impossible, my dear fellow.  It's nonsense!  Our countries
 are at war; you are a prisoner.'
 
 'My ancestor of the time of the Ligue,' I replied, 'married a Huguenot
 lady out of the Saintonge, riding two hundred miles through an enemy's
 country to bring off his bride; and it was a happy marriage.'
 
 'Well!' he began; and then looked down into the fire, and became silent.
 
 'Well?' I asked.
 
 'Well, there's this business of--Goguelat,' said he, still looking at the
 coals in the grate.
 
 'What!' I exclaimed, starting in my chair.  'What's that you say?'
 
 'This business about Goguelat,' he repeated.
 
 'Ronald,' said I, 'this is not your doing.  These are not your own words.
 I know where they came from: a coward put them in your mouth.'
 
 'St. Ives!' he cried, 'why do you make it so hard for me? and where's the
 use of insulting other people?  The plain English is, that I can't hear
 of any proposal of marriage from a man under a charge like that.  You
 must see it for yourself, man!  It's the most absurd thing I ever heard
 of!  And you go on forcing me to argue with you, too!'
 
 'Because I have had an affair of honour which terminated unhappily,
 you--a young soldier, or next-door to it--refuse my offer?  Do I
 understand you aright?' said I.
 
 'My dear fellow!' he wailed, 'of course you can twist my words, if you
 like.  You _say_ it was an affair of honour.  Well, I can't, of course,
 tell you that--I can't--I mean, you must see that that's just the point!
 Was it?  I don't know.'
 
 'I have the honour to inform you,' said I.
 
 'Well, other people say the reverse, you see!'
 
 'They lie, Ronald, and I will prove it in time.'
 
 'The short and the long of it is, that any man who is so unfortunate as
 to have such things said about him is not the man to be my
 brother-in-law!' he cried.
 
 'Do you know who will be my first witness at the court?  Arthur
 Chevenix!' said I.
 
 'I don't care!' he cried, rising from his chair and beginning to pace
 outrageously about the room.  'What do you mean, St. Ives?  What is this
 about?  It's like a dream, I declare!  You made an offer, and I have
 refused it.  I don't like it, I don't want it; and whatever I did, or
 didn't, wouldn't matter--my aunt wouldn't bear of it anyway!  Can't you
 take your answer, man?'
 
 'You must remember, Ronald, that we are playing with edged tools,' said
 I.  'An offer of marriage is a delicate subject to handle.  You have
 refused, and you have justified your refusal by several statements:
 first, that I was an impostor; second, that our countries were at war;
 and third-- No, I will speak,' said I; 'you can answer when I have
 done,--and third, that I had dishonourably killed--or was said to have
 done so--the man Goguelat.  Now, my dear fellow, these are very awkward
 grounds to be taking.  From any one else's lips I need scarce tell you
 how I should resent them; but my hands are tied.  I have so much
 gratitude to you, without talking of the love I bear your sister, that
 you insult me, when you do so, under the cover of a complete impunity.  I
 must feel the pain--and I do feel it acutely--I can do nothing to protect
 myself.'  He had been anxious enough to interrupt me in the beginning;
 but now, and after I had ceased, he stood a long while silent.
 
 'St. Ives,' he said at last, 'I think I had better go away.  This has
 been very irritating.  I never at all meant to say anything of the kind,
 and I apologise to you.  I have all the esteem for you that one gentleman
 should have for another.  I only meant to tell you--to show you what had
 influenced my mind; and that, in short, the thing was impossible.  One
 thing you may be quite sure of: I shall do nothing against you.  Will you
 shake hands before I go away?' he blurted out.
 
 'Yes,' said I, 'I agree with you--the interview has been irritating.  Let
 bygones be bygones.  Good-bye, Ronald.'
 
 'Good-bye, St. Ives!' he returned.  'I'm heartily sorry.'
 
 And with that he was gone.
 
 The windows of my own sitting-room looked towards the north; but the
 entrance passage drew its light from the direction of the square.  Hence
 I was able to observe Ronald's departure, his very disheartened gait, and
 the fact that he was joined, about half-way, by no less a man than Major
 Chevenix.  At this, I could scarce keep from smiling; so unpalatable an
 interview must be before the pair of them, and I could hear their voices,
 clashing like crossed swords, in that eternal antiphony of 'I told you,'
 and 'I told you not.'  Without doubt, they had gained very little by
 their visit; but then I had gained less than nothing, and had been
 bitterly dispirited into the bargain.  Ronald had stuck to his guns and
 refused me to the last.  It was no news; but, on the other hand, it could
 not be contorted into good news.  I was now certain that during my
 temporary absence in France, all irons would be put into the fire, and
 the world turned upside down, to make Flora disown the obtrusive
 Frenchman and accept Chevenix.  Without doubt she would resist these
 instances: but the thought of them did not please me, and I felt she
 should be warned and prepared for the battle.
 
 It was no use to try and see her now, but I promised myself early that
 evening to return to Swanston.  In the meantime I had to make all my
 preparations, and look the coming journey in the face.  Here in Edinburgh
 I was within four miles of the sea, yet the business of approaching
 random fishermen with my hat in the one hand and a knife in the other,
 appeared so desperate, that I saw nothing for it but to retrace my steps
 over the northern counties, and knock a second time at the doors of
 Birchell Fenn.  To do this, money would be necessary; and after leaving
 my paper in the hands of Flora I had still a balance of about fifteen
 hundred pounds.  Or rather I may say I had them and I had them not; for
 after my luncheon with Mr. Robbie I had placed the amount, all but thirty
 pounds of change, in a bank in George Street, on a deposit receipt in the
 name of Mr. Rowley.  This I had designed to be my gift to him, in case I
 must suddenly depart.  But now, thinking better of the arrangement, I
 despatched my little man, cockade and all, to lift the fifteen hundred.
 
 He was not long gone, and returned with a flushed face, and the deposit
 receipt still in his hand.
 
 'No go, Mr. Anne,' says he.
 
 'How's that?' I inquired,
 
 'Well, sir, I found the place all right, and no mistake,' said he.  'But
 I tell you what gave me a blue fright!  There was a customer standing by
 the door, and I reckonised him!  Who do you think it was, Mr. Anne?  W'y,
 that same Red-Breast--him I had breakfast with near Aylesbury.'
 
 'You are sure you are not mistaken?' I asked.
 
 'Certain sure,' he replied.  'Not Mr. Lavender, I don't mean, sir; I mean
 the other party.  "Wot's he doing here?' says I.  It don't look right."'
 
 'Not by any means,' I agreed.
 
 I walked to and fro in the apartment reflecting.  This particular Bow
 Street runner might be here by accident; but it was to imagine a singular
 play of coincidence that he, who had met Rowley and spoken with him in
 the 'Green Dragon,' hard by Aylesbury, should be now in Scotland, where
 he could have no legitimate business, and by the doors of the bank where
 Rowley kept his account.
 
 'Rowley,' said I, 'he didn't see you, did he?'
 
 'Never a fear,' quoth Rowley.  'W'y Mr. Anne, sir, if he 'ad, you
 wouldn't have seen _me_ any more!  I ain't a hass, sir!'
 
 'Well, my boy, you can put that receipt in your pocket.  You'll have no
 more use for it till you're quite clear of me.  Don't lose it, though;
 it's your share of the Christmas-box: fifteen hundred pounds all for
 yourself.'
 
 'Begging your pardon, Mr. Anne, sir, but wot for!' said Rowley.
 
 'To set up a public-house upon,' said I.
 
 'If you'll excuse me, sir, I ain't got any call to set up a public-house,
 sir,' he replied stoutly.  'And I tell you wot, sir, it seems to me I'm
 reether young for the billet.  I'm your body servant, Mr. Anne, or else
 I'm nothink.'
 
 'Well, Rowley,' I said, 'I'll tell you what it's for.  It's for the good
 service you have done me, of which I don't care--and don't dare--to
 speak.  It's for your loyalty and cheerfulness, my dear boy.  I had meant
 it for you; but to tell you the truth, it's past mending now--it has to
 be yours.  Since that man is waiting by the bank, the money can't be
 touched until I'm gone.'
 
 'Until you're gone, sir?' re-echoed Rowley.  'You don't go anywheres
 without me, I can tell you that, Mr. Anne, sir!'
 
 'Yes, my boy,' said I, 'we are going to part very soon now; probably
 to-morrow.  And it's for my sake, Rowley!  Depend upon it, if there was
 any reason at all for that Bow Street man being at the bank, he was not
 there to look out for you.  How they could have found out about the
 account so early is more than I can fathom; some strange coincidence must
 have played me false!  But there the fact is; and Rowley, I'll not only
 have to say farewell to you presently, I'll have to ask you to stay
 indoors until I can say it.  Remember, my boy, it's only so that you can
 serve me now.'
 
 'W'y, sir, you say the word, and of course I'll do it!' he cried.
 '"Nothink by 'alves," is my motto!  I'm your man, through thick and thin,
 live or die, I am!'
 
 In the meantime there was nothing to be done till towards sunset.  My
 only chance now was to come again as quickly as possible to speech of
 Flora, who was my only practicable banker; and not before evening was it
 worth while to think of that.  I might compose myself as well as I was
 able over the _Caledonian Mercury_, with its ill news of the campaign of
 France and belated documents about the retreat from Russia; and, as I sat
 there by the fire, I was sometimes all awake with anger and mortification
 at what I was reading, and sometimes again I would be three parts asleep
 as I dozed over the barren items of home intelligence.  'Lately
 arrived'--this is what I suddenly stumbled on--'at Dumbreck's Hotel, the
 Viscount of Saint-Yves.'
 
 'Rowley,' said I.
 
 'If you please, Mr. Anne, sir,' answered the obsequious, lowering his
 pipe.
 
 'Come and look at this, my boy,' said I, holding out the paper.
 
 'My crikey!' said he.  'That's 'im, sir, sure enough!'
 
 'Sure enough, Rowley,' said I.  'He's on the trail.  He has fairly caught
 up with us.  He and this Bow Street man have come together, I would
 swear.  And now here is the whole field, quarry, hounds and hunters, all
 together in this city of Edinburgh.'
 
 'And wot are you goin' to do now, sir?  Tell you wot, let me take it in
 'and, please!  Gimme a minute, and I'll disguise myself, and go out to
 this Dum--- to this hotel, leastways, sir--and see wot he's up to.  You
 put your trust in me, Mr. Anne: I'm fly, don't you make no mistake about
 it.  I'm all a-growing and a-blowing, I am.'
 
 'Not one foot of you,' said I.  'You are a prisoner, Rowley, and make up
 your mind to that.  So am I, or next door to it.  I showed it you for a
 caution; if you go on the streets, it spells death to me, Rowley.'
 
 'If you please, sir,' says Rowley.
 
 'Come to think of it,' I continued, 'you must take a cold, or something.
 No good of awakening Mrs. McRankine's suspicions.'
 
 'A cold?' he cried, recovering immediately from his depression.  'I can
 do it, Mr. Anne.'
 
 And he proceeded to sneeze and cough and blow his nose, till I could not
 restrain myself from smiling.
 
 'Oh, I tell you, I know a lot of them dodges,' he observed proudly.
 
 'Well, they come in very handy,' said I.
 
 'I'd better go at once and show it to the old gal, 'adn't I?' he asked.
 
 I told him, by all means; and he was gone upon the instant, gleeful as
 though to a game of football.
 
 I took up the paper and read carelessly on, my thoughts engaged with my
 immediate danger, till I struck on the next paragraph:--
 
     'In connection with the recent horrid murder in the Castle, we are
     desired to make public the following intelligence.  The soldier,
     Champdivers, is supposed to be in the neighbourhood of this city.  He
     is about the middle height or rather under, of a pleasing appearance
     and highly genteel address.  When last heard of he wore a fashionable
     suit of pearl-grey, and boots with fawn-coloured tops.  He is
     accompanied by a servant about sixteen years of age, speaks English
     without any accent, and passed under the _alias_ of Ramornie.  A
     reward is offered for his apprehension.'
 
 In a moment I was in the next room, stripping from me the pearl-coloured
 suit!
 
 I confess I was now a good deal agitated.  It is difficult to watch the
 toils closing slowly and surely about you, and to retain your composure;
 and I was glad that Rowley was not present to spy on my confusion.  I was
 flushed, my breath came thick; I cannot remember a time when I was more
 put out.
 
 And yet I must wait and do nothing, and partake of my meals, and
 entertain the ever-garrulous Rowley, as though I were entirely my own
 man.  And if I did not require to entertain Mrs. McRankine also, that was
 but another drop of bitterness in my cup!  For what ailed my landlady,
 that she should hold herself so severely aloof, that she should refuse
 conversation, that her eyes should be reddened, that I should so
 continually hear the voice of her private supplications sounding through
 the house?  I was much deceived, or she had read the insidious paragraph
 and recognised the comminated pearl-grey suit.  I remember now a certain
 air with which she had laid the paper on my table, and a certain sniff,
 between sympathy and defiance, with which she had announced it: 'There's
 your _Mercury_ for ye!'
 
 In this direction, at least, I saw no pressing danger; her tragic
 countenance betokened agitation; it was plain she was wrestling with her
 conscience, and the battle still hung dubious.  The question of what to
 do troubled me extremely.  I could not venture to touch such an intricate
 and mysterious piece of machinery as my landlady's spiritual nature: it
 might go off at a word, and in any direction, like a badly-made firework.
 And while I praised myself extremely for my wisdom in the past, that I
 had made so much a friend of her, I was all abroad as to my conduct in
 the present.  There seemed an equal danger in pressing and in neglecting
 the accustomed marks of familiarity.  The one extreme looked like
 impudence, and might annoy, the other was a practical confession of
 guilt.  Altogether, it was a good hour for me when the dusk began to fall
 in earnest on the streets of Edinburgh, and the voice of an early
 watchman bade me set forth.
 
 I reached the neighbourhood of the cottage before seven; and as I
 breasted the steep ascent which leads to the garden wall, I was struck
 with surprise to hear a dog.  Dogs I had heard before, but only from the
 hamlet on the hillside above.  Now, this dog was in the garden itself,
 where it roared aloud in paroxysms of fury, and I could hear it leaping
 and straining on the chain.  I waited some while, until the brute's fit
 of passion had roared itself out.  Then, with the utmost precaution, I
 drew near again; and finally approached the garden wall.  So soon as I
 had clapped my head above the level, however, the barking broke forth
 again with redoubled energy.  Almost at the same time, the door of the
 cottage opened, and Ronald and the Major appeared upon the threshold with
 a lantern.  As they so stood, they were almost immediately below me,
 strongly illuminated, and within easy earshot.  The Major pacified the
 dog, who took instead to low, uneasy growling intermingled with
 occasional yelps.
 
 'Good thing I brought Towzer!' said Chevenix.
 
 'Damn him, I wonder where he is!' said Ronald; and he moved the lantern
 up and down, and turned the night into a shifting puzzle-work of gleam
 and shadow.  'I think I'll make a sally.'
 
 'I don't think you will,' replied Chevenix.  'When I agreed to come out
 here and do sentry-go, it was on one condition, Master Ronald: don't you
 forget that!  Military discipline, my boy!  Our beat is this path close
 about the house.  Down, Towzer! good boy, good boy--gently, then!' he
 went on, caressing his confounded monster.
 
 'To think!  The beggar may be hearing us this minute!' cried Ronald.
 
 'Nothing more probable,' said the Major.  'You there, St. Ives?' he
 added, in a distinct but guarded voice.  'I only want to tell you, you
 had better go home.  Mr. Gilchrist and I take watch and watch.'
 
 The game was up.  '_Beaucoup de plaisir_!' I replied, in the same tones.
 '_Il fait un peu froid pour veiller_; _gardez-vous des engelures_!'
 
 I suppose it was done in a moment of ungovernable rage; but in spite of
 the excellent advice he had given to Ronald the moment before, Chevenix
 slipped the chain, and the dog sprang, straight as an arrow, up the bank.
 I stepped back, picked up a stone of about twelve pounds weight, and
 stood ready.  With a bound the beast landed on the cope-stone of the
 wall; and, almost in the same instant, my missile caught him fair in the
 face.  He gave a stifled cry, went tumbling back where he had come from,
 and I could hear the twelve-pounder accompany him in his fall.  Chevenix,
 at the same moment, broke out in a roaring voice: 'The hell-hound!  If
 he's killed my dog!' and I judged, upon all grounds, it was as well to be
 off.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXX--EVENTS OF WEDNESDAY; THE UNIVERSITY OF CRAMOND
 
 
 I awoke to much diffidence, even to a feeling that might be called the
 beginnings of panic, and lay for hours in my bed considering the
 situation.  Seek where I pleased, there was nothing to encourage me and
 plenty to appal.  They kept a close watch about the cottage; they had a
 beast of a watch-dog--at least, unless I had settled it; and if I had, I
 knew its bereaved master would only watch the more indefatigably for the
 loss.  In the pardonable ostentation of love I had given all the money I
 could spare to Flora; I had thought it glorious that the hunted exile
 should come down, like Jupiter, in a shower of gold, and pour thousands
 in the lap of the beloved.  Then I had in an hour of arrant folly buried
 what remained to me in a bank in George Street.  And now I must get back
 the one or the other; and which? and how?
 
 As I tossed in my bed, I could see three possible courses, all extremely
 perilous.  First, Rowley might have been mistaken; the bank might not be
 watched; it might still be possible for him to draw the money on the
 deposit receipt.  Second, I might apply again to Robbie.  Or, third, I
 might dare everything, go to the Assembly Ball, and speak with Flora
 under the eyes of all Edinburgh.  This last alternative, involving as it
 did the most horrid risks, and the delay of forty-eight hours, I did but
 glance at with an averted head, and turned again to the consideration of
 the others.  It was the likeliest thing in the world that Robbie had been
 warned to have no more to do with me. The whole policy of the Gilchrists
 was in the hands of Chevenix; and I thought this was a precaution so
 elementary that he was certain to have taken it.  If he had not, of
 course I was all right: Robbie would manage to communicate with Flora;
 and by four o'clock I might be on the south road and, I was going to say,
 a free man.  Lastly, I must assure myself with my own eyes whether the
 bank in George Street were beleaguered.
 
 I called to Rowley and questioned him tightly as to the appearance of the
 Bow Street officer.
 
 'What sort of looking man is he, Rowley?' I asked, as I began to dress.
 
 'Wot sort of a looking man he is?' repeated Rowley.  'Well, I don't very
 well know wot you would say, Mr. Anne.  He ain't a beauty, any'ow.'
 
 'Is he tall?'
 
 'Tall?  Well, no, I shouldn't say _tall_ Mr. Anne.'
 
 'Well, then, is he short?'
 
 'Short?  No, I don't think I would say he was what you would call
 _short_.  No, not piticular short, sir.'
 
 'Then, I suppose, he must be about the middle height?'
 
 'Well, you might say it, sir; but not remarkable so.'
 
 I smothered an oath.
 
 'Is he clean-shaved?' I tried him again.
 
 'Clean-shaved?' he repeated, with the same air of anxious candour.
 
 'Good heaven, man, don't repeat my words like a parrot!' I cried.  'Tell
 me what the man was like: it is of the first importance that I should be
 able to recognise him.'
 
 'I'm trying to, Mr. Anne.  But _clean-shaved_?  I don't seem to rightly
 get hold of that p'int.  Sometimes it might appear to me like as if he
 was; and sometimes like as if he wasn't.  No, it wouldn't surprise me now
 if you was to tell me he 'ad a bit o' whisker.'
 
 'Was the man red-faced?' I roared, dwelling on each syllable.
 
 'I don't think you need go for to get cross about it, Mr. Anne!' said he.
 'I'm tellin' you every blessed thing I see!  Red-faced?  Well, no, not as
 you would remark upon.'
 
 A dreadful calm fell upon me.
 
 'Was he anywise pale?' I asked.
 
 'Well, it don't seem to me as though he were.  But I tell you truly, I
 didn't take much heed to that.'
 
 'Did he look like a drinking man?'
 
 'Well, no.  If you please, sir, he looked more like an eating one.'
 
 'Oh, he was stout, was he?'
 
 'No, sir.  I couldn't go so far as that.  No, he wasn't not to say
 _stout_.  If anything, lean rather.'
 
 I need not go on with the infuriating interview.  It ended as it began,
 except that Rowley was in tears, and that I had acquired one fact.  The
 man was drawn for me as being of any height you like to mention, and of
 any degree of corpulence or leanness; clean-shaved or not, as the case
 might be; the colour of his hair Rowley 'could not take it upon himself
 to put a name on'; that of his eyes he thought to have been blue--nay, it
 was the one point on which he attained to a kind of tearful certainty.
 'I'll take my davy on it,' he asseverated.  They proved to have been as
 black as sloes, very little and very near together.  So much for the
 evidence of the artless!  And the fact, or rather the facts, acquired?
 Well, they had to do not with the person but with his clothing.  The man
 wore knee-breeches and white stockings; his coat was 'some kind of a
 lightish colour--or betwixt that and dark'; and he wore a 'mole-skin
 weskit.'  As if this were not enough, he presently haled me from my
 breakfast in a prodigious flutter, and showed me an honest and rather
 venerable citizen passing in the Square.
 
 'That's _him_, sir,' he cried, 'the very moral of him!  Well, this one is
 better dressed, and p'r'aps a trifler taller; and in the face he don't
 favour him noways at all, sir.  No, not when I come to look again, 'e
 don't seem to favour him noways.'
 
 'Jackass!' said I, and I think the greatest stickler for manners will
 admit the epithet to have been justified.
 
 Meanwhile the appearance of my landlady added a great load of anxiety to
 what I already suffered.  It was plain that she had not slept; equally
 plain that she had wept copiously.  She sighed, she groaned, she drew in
 her breath, she shook her head, as she waited on table.  In short, she
 seemed in so precarious a state, like a petard three times charged with
 hysteria, that I did not dare to address her; and stole out of the house
 on tiptoe, and actually ran downstairs, in the fear that she might call
 me back.  It was plain that this degree of tension could not last long.
 
 It was my first care to go to George Street, which I reached (by good
 luck) as a boy was taking down the bank shutters.  A man was conversing
 with him; he had white stockings and a moleskin waistcoat, and was as
 ill-looking a rogue as you would want to see in a day's journey.  This
 seemed to agree fairly well with Rowley's _signalement_: he had declared
 emphatically (if you remember), and had stuck to it besides, that the
 companion of the great Lavender was no beauty.
 
 Thence I made my way to Mr. Robbie's, where I rang the bell.  A servant
 answered the summons, and told me the lawyer was engaged, as I had half
 expected.
 
 'Wha shall I say was callin'?' she pursued; and when I had told her 'Mr.
 Ducie,' 'I think this'll be for you, then?' she added, and handed me a
 letter from the hall table.  It ran:
 
     'DEAR MR. DUCIE,
 
     'My single advice to you is to leave _quam primum_ for the South.
 
                                                         Yours, T. ROBBIE.'
 
 That was short and sweet.  It emphatically extinguished hope in one
 direction.  No more was to be gotten of Robbie; and I wondered, from my
 heart, how much had been told him.  Not too much, I hoped, for I liked
 the lawyer who had thus deserted me, and I placed a certain reliance in
 the discretion of Chevenix.  He would not be merciful; on the other hand,
 I did not think he would be cruel without cause.
 
 It was my next affair to go back along George Street, and assure myself
 whether the man in the moleskin vest was still on guard.  There was no
 sign of him on the pavement.  Spying the door of a common stair nearly
 opposite the bank, I took it in my head that this would be a good point
 of observation, crossed the street, entered with a businesslike air and
 fell immediately against the man in the moleskin vest.  I stopped and
 apologised to him; he replied in an unmistakable English accent, thus
 putting the matter almost beyond doubt.  After this encounter I must, of
 course, ascend to the top story, ring the bell of a suite of apartments,
 inquire for Mr. Vavasour, learn (with no great surprise) that he did not
 live there, come down again and, again politely saluting the man from Bow
 Street, make my escape at last into the street.
 
 I was now driven back upon the Assembly Ball.  Robbie had failed me.  The
 bank was watched; it would never do to risk Rowley in that neighbourhood.
 All I could do was to wait until the morrow evening, and present myself
 at the Assembly, let it end as it might.  But I must say I came to this
 decision with a good deal of genuine fright; and here I came for the
 first time to one of those places where my courage stuck.  I do not mean
 that my courage boggled and made a bit of a bother over it, as it did
 over the escape from the Castle; I mean, stuck, like a stopped watch or a
 dead man.  Certainly I would go to the ball; certainly I must see this
 morning about my clothes.  That was all decided.  But the most of the
 shops were on the other side of the valley, in the Old Town; and it was
 now my strange discovery that I was physically unable to cross the North
 Bridge!  It was as though a precipice had stood between us, or the deep
 sea had intervened.  Nearer to the Castle my legs refused to bear me.
 
 I told myself this was mere superstition; I made wagers with myself--and
 gained them; I went down on the esplanade of Princes Street, walked and
 stood there, alone and conspicuous, looking across the garden at the old
 grey bastions of the fortress, where all these troubles had begun.  I
 cocked my hat, set my hand on my hip, and swaggered on the pavement,
 confronting detection.  And I found I could do all this with a sense of
 exhilaration that was not unpleasing, and with a certain _cranerie_ of
 manner that raised me in my own esteem.  And yet there was one thing I
 could not bring my mind to face up to, or my limbs to execute; and that
 was to cross the valley into the Old Town.  It seemed to me I must be
 arrested immediately if I had done so; I must go straight into the
 twilight of a prison cell, and pass straight thence to the gross and
 final embraces of the nightcap and the halter.  And yet it was from no
 reasoned fear of the consequences that I could not go.  I was unable.  My
 horse baulked, and there was an end!
 
 My nerve was gone: here was a discovery for a man in such imminent peril,
 set down to so desperate a game, which I could only hope to win by
 continual luck and unflagging effrontery!  The strain had been too long
 continued, and my nerve was gone.  I fell into what they call panic fear,
 as I have seen soldiers do on the alarm of a night attack, and turned out
 of Princes Street at random as though the devil were at my heels.  In St.
 Andrew Square, I remember vaguely hearing some one call out.  I paid no
 heed, but pressed on blindly.  A moment after, a hand fell heavily on my
 shoulder, and I thought I had fainted.  Certainly the world went black
 about me for some seconds; and when that spasm passed I found myself
 standing face to face with the 'cheerful extravagant,' in what sort of
 disarray I really dare not imagine, dead white at least, shaking like an
 aspen, and mowing at the man with speechless lips.  And this was the
 soldier of Napoleon, and the gentleman who intended going next night to
 an Assembly Ball!  I am the more particular in telling of my breakdown,
 because it was my only experience of the sort; and it is a good tale for
 officers.  I will allow no man to call me coward; I have made my proofs;
 few men more.  And yet I (come of the best blood in France and inured to
 danger from a child) did, for some ten or twenty minutes, make this
 hideous exhibition of myself on the streets of the New Town of Edinburgh.
 
 With my first available breath I begged his pardon.  I was of an
 extremely nervous disposition, recently increased by late hours; I could
 not bear the slightest start.
 
 He seemed much concerned.  'You must be in a devil of a state!' said he;
 'though of course it was my fault--damnably silly, vulgar sort of thing
 to do!  A thousand apologies!  But you really must be run down; you
 should consult a medico.  My dear sir, a hair of the dog that bit you is
 clearly indicated.  A touch of Blue Ruin, now?  Or, come: it's early, but
 is man the slave of hours? what do you say to a chop and a bottle in
 Dumbreck's Hotel?'
 
 I refused all false comfort; but when he went on to remind me that this
 was the day when the University of Cramond met; and to propose a
 five-mile walk into the country and a dinner in the company of young
 asses like himself, I began to think otherwise.  I had to wait until
 to-morrow evening, at any rate; this might serve as well as anything else
 to bridge the dreary hours.  The country was the very place for me: and
 walking is an excellent sedative for the nerves.  Remembering poor
 Rowley, feigning a cold in our lodgings and immediately under the guns of
 the formidable and now doubtful Bethiah, I asked if I might bring my
 servant.  'Poor devil! it is dull for him,' I explained.
 
 'The merciful man is merciful to his ass,' observed my sententious
 friend.  'Bring him by all means!
 
     "The harp, his sole remaining joy,
     Was carried by an orphan boy;"
 
 and I have no doubt the orphan boy can get some cold victuals in the
 kitchen, while the Senatus dines.'
 
 Accordingly, being now quite recovered from my unmanly condition, except
 that nothing could yet induce me to cross the North Bridge, I arranged
 for my ball dress at a shop in Leith Street, where I was not served ill,
 cut out Rowley from his seclusion, and was ready along with him at the
 trysting-place, the corner of Duke Street and York Place, by a little
 after two.  The University was represented in force: eleven persons,
 including ourselves, Byfield the aeronaut, and the tall lad, Forbes, whom
 I had met on the Sunday morning, bedewed with tallow, at the 'Hunters'
 Rest.'  I was introduced; and we set off by way of Newhaven and the sea
 beach; at first through pleasant country roads, and afterwards along a
 succession of bays of a fairylike prettiness, to our destination--Cramond
 on the Almond--a little hamlet on a little river, embowered in woods, and
 looking forth over a great flat of quicksand to where a little islet
 stood planted in the sea.  It was miniature scenery, but charming of its
 kind.  The air of this good February afternoon was bracing, but not cold.
 All the way my companions were skylarking, jesting and making puns, and I
 felt as if a load had been taken off my lungs and spirits, and skylarked
 with the best of them.
 
 Byfield I observed, because I had heard of him before, and seen his
 advertisements, not at all because I was disposed to feel interest in the
 man.  He was dark and bilious and very silent; frigid in his manners, but
 burning internally with a great fire of excitement; and he was so good as
 to bestow a good deal of his company and conversation (such as it was)
 upon myself, who was not in the least grateful.  If I had known how I was
 to be connected with him in the immediate future, I might have taken more
 pains.
 
 In the hamlet of Cramond there is a hostelry of no very promising
 appearance, and here a room had been prepared for us, and we sat down to
 table.
 
 'Here you will find no guttling or gormandising, no turtle or
 nightingales' tongues,' said the extravagant, whose name, by the way, was
 Dalmahoy.  'The device, sir, of the University of Cramond is Plain Living
 and High Drinking.'
 
 Grace was said by the Professor of Divinity, in a macaronic Latin, which
 I could by no means follow, only I could hear it rhymed, and I guessed it
 to be more witty than reverent.  After which the _Senatus Academicus_ sat
 down to rough plenty in the shape of rizzar'd haddocks and mustard, a
 sheep's head, a haggis, and other delicacies of Scotland.  The dinner was
 washed down with brown stout in bottle, and as soon as the cloth was
 removed, glasses, boiling water, sugar, and whisky were set out for the
 manufacture of toddy.  I played a good knife and fork, did not shun the
 bowl, and took part, so far as I was able, in the continual fire of
 pleasantry with which the meal was seasoned.  Greatly daring, I ventured,
 before all these Scotsmen, to tell Sim's Tale of Tweedie's dog; and I was
 held to have done such extraordinary justice to the dialect, 'for a
 Southron,' that I was immediately voted into the Chair of Scots, and
 became, from that moment, a full member of the University of Cramond.  A
 little after, I found myself entertaining them with a song; and a little
 after--perhaps a little in consequence--it occurred to me that I had had
 enough, and would be very well inspired to take French leave.  It was not
 difficult to manage, for it was nobody's business to observe my
 movements, and conviviality had banished suspicion.
 
 I got easily forth of the chamber, which reverberated with the voices of
 these merry and learned gentlemen, and breathed a long breath.  I had
 passed an agreeable afternoon and evening, and I had apparently escaped
 scot free.  Alas! when I looked into the kitchen, there was my monkey,
 drunk as a lord, toppling on the edge of the dresser, and performing on
 the flageolet to an audience of the house lasses and some neighbouring
 ploughmen.
 
 I routed him promptly from his perch, stuck his hat on, put his
 instrument in his pocket, and set off with him for Edinburgh.
 
 His limbs were of paper, his mind quite in abeyance; I must uphold and
 guide him, prevent his frantic dives, and set him continually on his legs
 again.  At first he sang wildly, with occasional outbursts of causeless
 laughter.  Gradually an inarticulate melancholy succeeded; he wept gently
 at times; would stop in the middle of the road, say firmly 'No, no, no,'
 and then fall on his back: or else address me solemnly as 'M'lord' and
 fall on his face by way of variety.  I am afraid I was not always so
 gentle with the little pig as I might have been, but really the position
 was unbearable.  We made no headway at all, and I suppose we were scarce
 gotten a mile away from Cramond, when the whole _Senatus Academicus_ was
 heard hailing, and doubling the pace to overtake its.
 
 Some of them were fairly presentable; and they were all Christian martyrs
 compared to Rowley; but they were in a frolicsome and rollicking humour
 that promised danger as we approached the town.  They sang songs, they
 ran races, they fenced with their walking-sticks and umbrellas; and, in
 spite of this violent exercise, the fun grew only the more extravagant
 with the miles they traversed.  Their drunkenness was deep-seated and
 permanent, like fire in a peat; or rather--to be quite just to them--it
 was not so much to be called drunkenness at all, as the effect of youth
 and high spirits--a fine night, and the night young, a good road under
 foot, and the world before you!
 
 I had left them once somewhat unceremoniously; I could not attempt it a
 second time; and, burthened as I was with Mr. Rowley, I was really glad
 of assistance.  But I saw the lamps of Edinburgh draw near on their
 hill-top with a good deal of uneasiness, which increased, after we had
 entered the lighted streets, to positive alarm.  All the passers-by were
 addressed, some of them by name.  A worthy man was stopped by Forbes.
 'Sir,' said he, 'in the name of the Senatus of the University of Cramond,
 I confer upon you the degree of LL.D.,' and with the words he bonneted
 him.  Conceive the predicament of St. Ives, committed to the society of
 these outrageous youths, in a town where the police and his cousin were
 both looking for him!  So far, we had pursued our way unmolested,
 although raising a clamour fit to wake the dead; but at last, in
 Abercromby Place, I believe--at least it was a crescent of highly
 respectable houses fronting on a garden--Byfield and I, having fallen
 somewhat in the rear with Rowley, came to a simultaneous halt.  Our
 ruffians were beginning to wrench off bells and door-plates!
 
 'Oh, I say!' says Byfield, 'this is too much of a good thing!  Confound
 it, I'm a respectable man--a public character, by George!  I can't afford
 to get taken up by the police.'
 
 'My own case exactly,' said I.
 
 'Here, let's bilk them,' said he.
 
 And we turned back and took our way down hill again.
 
 It was none too soon: voices and alarm bells sounded; watchmen here and
 there began to spring their rattles; it was plain the University of
 Cramond would soon be at blows with the police of Edinburgh!  Byfield and
 I, running the semi-inanimate Rowley before us, made good despatch, and
 did not stop till we were several streets away, and the hubbub was
 already softened by distance.
 
 'Well, sir,' said he, 'we are well out of that!  Did ever any one see
 such a pack of young barbarians?'
 
 'We are properly punished, Mr. Byfield; we had no business there,' I
 replied.
 
 'No, indeed, sir, you may well say that!  Outrageous!  And my ascension
 announced for Friday, you know!' cried the aeronaut.  'A pretty scandal!
 Byfield the aeronaut at the police-court!  Tut-tut!  Will you be able to
 get your rascal home, sir?  Allow me to offer you my card.  I am staying
 at Walker and Poole's Hotel, sir, where I should be pleased to see you.'
 
 'The pleasure would be mutual, sir,' said I, but I must say my heart was
 not in my words, and as I watched Mr. Byfield departing I desired nothing
 less than to pursue the acquaintance
 
 One more ordeal remained for me to pass.  I carried my senseless load
 upstairs to our lodging, and was admitted by the landlady in a tall white
 nightcap and with an expression singularly grim.  She lighted us into the
 sitting-room; where, when I had seated Rowley in a chair, she dropped me
 a cast-iron courtesy.  I smelt gunpowder on the woman.  Her voice,
 tottered with emotion.
 
 'I give ye nottice, Mr. Ducie,' said she.  'Dacent folks' houses . . .'
 
 And at that apparently temper cut off her utterance, and she took herself
 off without more words.
 
 I looked about me at the room, the goggling Rowley, the extinguished
 fire; my mind reviewed the laughable incidents of the day and night; and
 I laughed out loud to myself--lonely and cheerless laughter!.......
 
                                 * * * * *
 
              [_At this point the Author's_ MS. _breaks off_]
 
 
 
 
 Footnotes
 
 
 {0}  This Project Gutenberg eText does not include the extra chapters.
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the 1905 Chatto and Windus Edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
 Island Nights Entertainments
 
 
 Contents:
 
 The Beach of Fales
    A south sea bridal
    The Ban
    The Missionary
    Devil-work
    Night in the bush
 The Bottle Imp
 The Isle of voices
 
 
 
 
 THE BEACH OF FALES.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.  A SOUTH SEA BRIDAL.
 
 
 I saw that island first when it was neither night nor morning.  The moon
 was to the west, setting, but still broad and bright.  To the east, and
 right amidships of the dawn, which was all pink, the daystar sparkled
 like a diamond.  The land breeze blew in our faces, and smelt strong of
 wild lime and vanilla: other things besides, but these were the most
 plain; and the chill of it set me sneezing.  I should say I had been for
 years on a low island near the line, living for the most part solitary
 among natives.  Here was a fresh experience: even the tongue would be
 quite strange to me; and the look of these woods and mountains, and the
 rare smell of them, renewed my blood.
 
 The captain blew out the binnacle lamp.
 
 There! said he, there goes a bit of smoke, Mr. Wiltshire, behind the
 break of the reef.  Thats Fales, where your station is, the last
 village to the east; nobody lives to windwardI dont know why.  Take my
 glass, and you can make the houses out.
 
 I took the glass; and the shores leaped nearer, and I saw the tangle of
 the woods and the breach of the surf, and the brown roofs and the black
 insides of houses peeped among the trees.
 
 Do you catch a bit of white there to the eastard? the captain
 continued.  Thats your house.  Coral built, stands high, verandah you
 could walk on three abreast; best station in the South Pacific.  When old
 Adams saw it, he took and shook me by the hand.  Ive dropped into a
 soft thing here, says he.So you have, says I, and time too!  Poor
 Johnny!  I never saw him again but the once, and then he had changed his
 tunecouldnt get on with the natives, or the whites, or something; and
 the next time we came round there he was dead and buried.  I took and put
 up a bit of a stick to him: John Adams, _obit_ eighteen and sixty-eight.
 Go thou and do likewise.  I missed that man.  I never could see much
 harm in Johnny.
 
 What did he die of? I inquired.
 
 Some kind of sickness, says the captain.  It appears it took him
 sudden.  Seems he got up in the night, and filled up on Pain-Killer and
 Kennedys Discovery.  No go: he was booked beyond Kennedy.  Then he had
 tried to open a case of gin.  No go again: not strong enough.  Then he
 must have turned to and run out on the verandah, and capsized over the
 rail.  When they found him, the next day, he was clean crazycarried on
 all the time about somebody watering his copra.  Poor John!
 
 Was it thought to be the island? I asked.
 
 Well, it was thought to be the island, or the trouble, or something, he
 replied.  I never could hear but what it was a healthy place.  Our last
 man, Vigours, never turned a hair.  He left because of the beachsaid he
 was afraid of Black Jack and Case and Whistling Jimmie, who was still
 alive at the time, but got drowned soon afterward when drunk.  As for old
 Captain Randall, hes been here any time since eighteen-forty,
 forty-five.  I never could see much harm in Billy, nor much change.
 Seems as if he might live to be Old Kafoozleum.  No, I guess its
 healthy.
 
 Theres a boat coming now, said I.  Shes right in the pass; looks to
 be a sixteen-foot whale; two white men in the stern sheets.
 
 Thats the boat that drowned Whistling Jimmie! cried the Captain;
 lets see the glass.  Yes, thats Case, sure enough, and the darkie.
 Theyve got a gallows bad reputation, but you know what a place the beach
 is for talking.  My belief, that Whistling Jimmie was the worst of the
 trouble; and hes gone to glory, you see.  Whatll you bet they aint
 after gin?  Lay you five to two they take six cases.
 
 When these two traders came aboard I was pleased with the looks of them
 at once, or, rather, with the looks of both, and the speech of one.  I
 was sick for white neighbours after my four years at the line, which I
 always counted years of prison; getting tabooed, and going down to the
 Speak House to see and get it taken off; buying gin and going on a break,
 and then repenting; sitting in the house at night with the lamp for
 company; or walking on the beach and wondering what kind of a fool to
 call myself for being where I was.  There were no other whites upon my
 island, and when I sailed to the next, rough customers made the most of
 the society.  Now to see these two when they came aboard was a pleasure.
 One was a negro, to be sure; but they were both rigged out smart in
 striped pyjamas and straw hats, and Case would have passed muster in a
 city.  He was yellow and smallish, had a hawks nose to his face, pale
 eyes, and his beard trimmed with scissors.  No man knew his country,
 beyond he was of English speech; and it was clear he came of a good
 family and was splendidly educated.  He was accomplished too; played the
 accordion first-rate; and give him a piece of string or a cork or a pack
 of cards, and he could show you tricks equal to any professional.  He
 could speak, when he chose, fit for a drawing-room; and when he chose he
 could blaspheme worse than a Yankee boatswain, and talk smart to sicken a
 Kanaka.  The way he thought would pay best at the moment, that was Cases
 way, and it always seemed to come natural, and like as if he was born to
 it.  He had the courage of a lion and the cunning of a rat; and if hes
 not in hell to-day, theres no such place.  I know but one good point to
 the man: that he was fond of his wife, and kind to her.  She was a Samoa
 woman, and dyed her hair red, Samoa style; and when he came to die (as I
 have to tell of) they found one strange thingthat he had made a will,
 like a Christian, and the widow got the lot: all his, they said, and all
 Black Jacks, and the most of Billy Randalls in the bargain, for it was
 Case that kept the books.  So she went off home in the schooner _Manua_,
 and does the lady to this day in her own place.
 
 But of all this on that first morning I knew no more than a fly.  Case
 used me like a gentleman and like a friend, made me welcome to Fales,
 and put his services at my disposal, which was the more helpful from my
 ignorance of the native.  All the better part of the day we sat drinking
 better acquaintance in the cabin, and I never heard a man talk more to
 the point.  There was no smarter trader, and none dodgier, in the
 islands.  I thought Fales seemed to be the right kind of a place; and
 the more I drank the lighter my heart.  Our last trader had fled the
 place at half an hours notice, taking a chance passage in a labour ship
 from up west.  The captain, when he came, had found the station closed,
 the keys left with the native pastor, and a letter from the runaway,
 confessing he was fairly frightened of his life.  Since then the firm had
 not been represented, and of course there was no cargo.  The wind,
 besides, was fair, the captain hoped he could make his next island by
 dawn, with a good tide, and the business of landing my trade was gone
 about lively.  There was no call for me to fool with it, Case said;
 nobody would touch my things, everyone was honest in Fales, only about
 chickens or an odd knife or an odd stick of tobacco; and the best I could
 do was to sit quiet till the vessel left, then come straight to his
 house, see old Captain Randall, the father of the beach, take pot-luck,
 and go home to sleep when it got dark.  So it was high noon, and the
 schooner was under way before I set my foot on shore at Fales.
 
 I had a glass or two on board; I was just off a long cruise, and the
 ground heaved under me like a ships deck.  The world was like all new
 painted; my foot went along to music; Fales might have been Fiddlers
 Green, if there is such a place, and mores the pity if there isnt!  It
 was good to foot the grass, to look aloft at the green mountains, to see
 the men with their green wreaths and the women in their bright dresses,
 red and blue.  On we went, in the strong sun and the cool shadow, liking
 both; and all the children in the town came trotting after with their
 shaven heads and their brown bodies, and raising a thin kind of a cheer
 in our wake, like crowing poultry.
 
 By-the-bye, says Case, we must get you a wife.
 
 Thats so, said I; I had forgotten.
 
 There was a crowd of girls about us, and I pulled myself up and looked
 among them like a Bashaw.  They were all dressed out for the sake of the
 ship being in; and the women of Fales are a handsome lot to see.  If
 they have a fault, they are a trifle broad in the beam; and I was just
 thinking so when Case touched me.
 
 Thats pretty, says he.
 
 I saw one coming on the other side alone.  She had been fishing; all she
 wore was a chemise, and it was wetted through.  She was young and very
 slender for an island maid, with a long face, a high forehead, and a shy,
 strange, blindish look, between a cats and a babys.
 
 Whos she? said I.  Shell do.
 
 Thats Uma, said Case, and he called her up and spoke to her in the
 native.  I didnt know what he said; but when he was in the midst she
 looked up at me quick and timid, like a child dodging a blow, then down
 again, and presently smiled.  She had a wide mouth, the lips and the chin
 cut like any statues; and the smile came out for a moment and was gone.
 Then she stood with her head bent, and heard Case to an end, spoke back
 in the pretty Polynesian voice, looking him full in the face, heard him
 again in answer, and then with an obeisance started off.  I had just a
 share of the bow, but never another shot of her eye, and there was no
 more word of smiling.
 
 I guess its all right, said Case.  I guess you can have her.  Ill
 make it square with the old lady.  You can have your pick of the lot for
 a plug of tobacco, he added, sneering.
 
 I suppose it was the smile stuck in my memory, for I spoke back sharp.
 She doesnt look that sort, I cried.
 
 I dont know that she is, said Case.  I believe shes as right as the
 mail.  Keeps to herself, dont go round with the gang, and that.  O no,
 dont you misunderstand meUmas on the square.  He spoke eager, I
 thought, and that surprised and pleased me.  Indeed, he went on, I
 shouldnt make so sure of getting her, only she cottoned to the cut of
 your jib.  All you have to do is to keep dark and let me work the mother
 my own way; and Ill bring the girl round to the captains for the
 marriage.
 
 I didnt care for the word marriage, and I said so.
 
 Oh, theres nothing to hurt in the marriage, says he.  Black Jacks
 the chaplain.
 
 By this time we had come in view of the house of these three white men;
 for a negro is counted a white man, and so is a Chinese! a strange idea,
 but common in the islands.  It was a board house with a strip of rickety
 verandah.  The store was to the front, with a counter, scales, and the
 poorest possible display of trade: a case or two of tinned meats; a
 barrel of hard bread; a few bolts of cotton stuff, not to be compared
 with mine; the only thing well represented being the contraband, firearms
 and liquor.  If these are my only rivals, thinks I, I should do well
 in Fales.  Indeed, there was only the one way they could touch me, and
 that was with the guns and drink.
 
 In the back room was old Captain Randall, squatting on the floor native
 fashion, fat and pale, naked to the waist, grey as a badger, and his eyes
 set with drink.  His body was covered with grey hair and crawled over by
 flies; one was in the corner of his eyehe never heeded; and the
 mosquitoes hummed about the man like bees.  Any clean-minded man would
 have had the creature out at once and buried him; and to see him, and
 think he was seventy, and remember he had once commanded a ship, and come
 ashore in his smart togs, and talked big in bars and consulates, and sat
 in club verandahs, turned me sick and sober.
 
 He tried to get up when I came in, but that was hopeless; so he reached
 me a hand instead, and stumbled out some salutation.
 
 Papas {1} pretty full this morning, observed Case.  Weve had an
 epidemic here; and Captain Randall takes gin for a prophylacticdont
 you, Papa?
 
 Never took such a thing in my life! cried the captain indignantly.
 Take gin for my healths sake, Mr. Whas-ever-your-names a
 precautionary measure.
 
 Thats all right, Papa, said Case.  But youll have to brace up.
 Theres going to be a marriageMr. Wiltshire here is going to get
 spliced.
 
 The old man asked to whom.
 
 To Uma, said Case.
 
 Uma! cried the captain.  Whas he want Uma for?  s he come here for
 his health, anyway?  Wha n hells he want Uma for?
 
 Dry up, Papa, said Case.  Taint you thats to marry her.  I guess
 youre not her godfather and godmother.  I guess Mr. Wiltshires going to
 please himself.
 
 With that he made an excuse to me that he must move about the marriage,
 and left me alone with the poor wretch that was his partner and (to speak
 truth) his gull.  Trade and station belonged both to Randall; Case and
 the negro were parasites; they crawled and fed upon him like the flies,
 he none the wiser.  Indeed, I have no harm to say of Billy Randall beyond
 the fact that my gorge rose at him, and the time I now passed in his
 company was like a nightmare.
 
 The room was stifling hot and full of flies; for the house was dirty and
 low and small, and stood in a bad place, behind the village, in the
 borders of the bush, and sheltered from the trade.  The three mens beds
 were on the floor, and a litter of pans and dishes.  There was no
 standing furniture; Randall, when he was violent, tearing it to laths.
 There I sat and had a meal which was served us by Cases wife; and there
 I was entertained all day by that remains of man, his tongue stumbling
 among low old jokes and long old stories, and his own wheezy laughter
 always ready, so that he had no sense of my depression.  He was nipping
 gin all the while.  Sometimes he fell asleep, and awoke again, whimpering
 and shivering, and every now and again he would ask me why I wanted to
 marry Uma.  My friend, I was telling myself all day, you must not come
 to be an old gentleman like this.
 
 It might be four in the afternoon, perhaps, when the back door was thrust
 slowly open, and a strange old native woman crawled into the house almost
 on her belly.  She was swathed in black stuff to her heels; her hair was
 grey in swatches; her face was tattooed, which was not the practice in
 that island; her eyes big and bright and crazy.  These she fixed upon me
 with a rapt expression that I saw to be part acting.  She said no plain
 word, but smacked and mumbled with her lips, and hummed aloud, like a
 child over its Christmas pudding.  She came straight across the house,
 heading for me, and, as soon as she was alongside, caught up my hand and
 purred and crooned over it like a great cat.  From this she slipped into
 a kind of song.
 
 Who the devils this? cried I, for the thing startled me.
 
 Its Faavao, says Randall; and I saw he had hitched along the floor
 into the farthest corner.
 
 You aint afraid of her? I cried.
 
 Me fraid! cried the captain.  My dear friend, I defy her!  I dont
 let her put her foot in here, only I suppose s different to-day, for the
 marriage.  s Umas mother.
 
 Well, suppose it is; whats she carrying on about?  I asked, more
 irritated, perhaps more frightened, than I cared to show; and the captain
 told me she was making up a quantity of poetry in my praise because I was
 to marry Uma.  All right, old lady, says I, with rather a failure of a
 laugh, anything to oblige.  But when youre done with my hand, you might
 let me know.
 
 She did as though she understood; the song rose into a cry, and stopped;
 the woman crouched out of the house the same way that she came in, and
 must have plunged straight into the bush, for when I followed her to the
 door she had already vanished.
 
 These are rum manners, said I.
 
 s a rum crowd, said the captain, and, to my surprise, he made the sign
 of the cross on his bare bosom.
 
 Hillo! says I, are you a Papist?
 
 He repudiated the idea with contempt.  Hard-shell Baptis, said he.
 But, my dear friend, the Papists got some good ideas too; and tha s
 one of em.  You take my advice, and whenever you come across Uma or
 Faavao or Vigours, or any of that crowd, you take a leaf out o the
 priests, and do what I do.  Savvy? says he, repeated the sign, and
 winked his dim eye at me.  No, _sir_! he broke out again, no Papists
 here! and for a long time entertained me with his religious opinions.
 
 I must have been taken with Uma from the first, or I should certainly
 have fled from that house, and got into the clean air, and the clean sea,
 or some convenient riverthough, its true, I was committed to Case; and,
 besides, I could never have held my head up in that island if I had run
 from a girl upon my wedding-night.
 
 The sun was down, the sky all on fire, and the lamp had been some time
 lighted, when Case came back with Uma and the negro.  She was dressed and
 scented; her kilt was of fine tapa, looking richer in the folds than any
 silk; her bust, which was of the colour of dark honey, she wore bare only
 for some half a dozen necklaces of seeds and flowers; and behind her ears
 and in her hair she had the scarlet flowers of the hibiscus.  She showed
 the best bearing for a bride conceivable, serious and still; and I
 thought shame to stand up with her in that mean house and before that
 grinning negro.  I thought shame, I say; for the mountebank was dressed
 with a big paper collar, the book he made believe to read from was an odd
 volume of a novel, and the words of his service not fit to be set down.
 My conscience smote me when we joined hands; and when she got her
 certificate I was tempted to throw up the bargain and confess.  Here is
 the document.  It was Case that wrote it, signatures and all, in a leaf
 out of the ledger:
 
     This is to certify that Uma, daughter of Faavao of Fales, Island of
     ---, is illegally married to Mr. John Wiltshire for one week, and Mr.
     John Wiltshire is at liberty to send her to hell when he pleases.
 
                                                           JOHN BLACKAMOAR.
                                                     Chaplain to the hulks.
 
     Extracted from the Register
     by William T. Randall,
     Master Mariner.
 
 A nice paper to put in a girls hand and see her hide away like gold.  A
 man might easily feel cheap for less.  But it was the practice in these
 parts, and (as I told myself) not the least the fault of us white men,
 but of the missionaries.  If they had let the natives be, I had never
 needed this deception, but taken all the wives I wished, and left them
 when I pleased, with a clear conscience.
 
 The more ashamed I was, the more hurry I was in to be gone; and our
 desires thus jumping together, I made the less remark of a change in the
 traders.  Case had been all eagerness to keep me; now, as though he had
 attained a purpose, he seemed all eagerness to have me go.  Uma, he said,
 could show me to my house, and the three bade us farewell indoors.
 
 The night was nearly come; the village smelt of trees and flowers and the
 sea and bread-fruit-cooking; there came a fine roll of sea from the reef,
 and from a distance, among the woods and houses, many pretty sounds of
 men and children.  It did me good to breathe free air; it did me good to
 be done with the captain and see, instead, the creature at my side.  I
 felt for all the world as though she were some girl at home in the Old
 Country, and, forgetting myself for the minute, took her hand to walk
 with.  Her fingers nestled into mine, I heard her breathe deep and quick,
 and all at once she caught my hand to her face and pressed it there.
 You good! she cried, and ran ahead of me, and stopped and looked back
 and smiled, and ran ahead of me again, thus guiding me through the edge
 of the bush, and by a quiet way to my own house.
 
 The truth is, Case had done the courting for me in styletold her I was
 mad to have her, and cared nothing for the consequence; and the poor
 soul, knowing that which I was still ignorant of, believed it, every
 word, and had her head nigh turned with vanity and gratitude.  Now, of
 all this I had no guess; I was one of those most opposed to any nonsense
 about native women, having seen so many whites eaten up by their wives
 relatives, and made fools of in the bargain; and I told myself I must
 make a stand at once, and bring her to her bearings.  But she looked so
 quaint and pretty as she ran away and then awaited me, and the thing was
 done so like a child or a kind dog, that the best I could do was just to
 follow her whenever she went on, to listen for the fall of her bare feet,
 and to watch in the dusk for the shining of her body.  And there was
 another thought came in my head.  She played kitten with me now when we
 were alone; but in the house she had carried it the way a countess might,
 so proud and humble.  And what with her dressfor all there was so little
 of it, and that native enoughwhat with her fine tapa and fine scents,
 and her red flowers and seeds, that were quite as bright as jewels, only
 largerit came over me she was a kind of countess really, dressed to hear
 great singers at a concert, and no even mate for a poor trader like
 myself.
 
 She was the first in the house; and while I was still without I saw a
 match flash and the lamplight kindle in the windows.  The station was a
 wonderful fine place, coral built, with quite a wide verandah, and the
 main room high and wide.  My chests and cases had been piled in, and made
 rather of a mess; and there, in the thick of the confusion, stood Uma by
 the table, awaiting me.  Her shadow went all the way up behind her into
 the hollow of the iron roof; she stood against it bright, the lamplight
 shining on her skin.  I stopped in the door, and she looked at me, not
 speaking, with eyes that were eager and yet daunted; then she touched
 herself on the bosom.
 
 Meyour wifie, she said.  It had never taken me like that before; but
 the want of her took and shook all through me, like the wind in the luff
 of a sail.
 
 I could not speak if I had wanted; and if I could, I would not.  I was
 ashamed to be so much moved about a native, ashamed of the marriage too,
 and the certificate she had treasured in her kilt; and I turned aside and
 made believe to rummage among my cases.  The first thing I lighted on was
 a case of gin, the only one that I had brought; and, partly for the
 girls sake, and partly for horror of the recollections of old Randall,
 took a sudden resolve.  I prized the lid off.  One by one I drew the
 bottles with a pocket corkscrew, and sent Uma out to pour the stuff from
 the verandah.
 
 She came back after the last, and looked at me puzzled like.
 
 No good, said I, for I was now a little better master of my tongue.
 Man he drink, he no good.
 
 She agreed with this, but kept considering.  Why you bring him? she
 asked presently.  Suppose you no want drink, you no bring him, I think.
 
 Thats all right, said I.  One time I want drink too much; now no
 want.  You see, I no savvy I get one little wifie.  Suppose I drink gin,
 my little wifie he fraid.
 
 To speak to her kindly was about more than I was fit for; I had made my
 vow I would never let on to weakness with a native, and I had nothing for
 it but to stop.
 
 She stood looking gravely down at me where I sat by the open case.  I
 think you good man, she said.  And suddenly she had fallen before me on
 the floor.  I belong you all-e-same pig! she cried.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.  THE BAN.
 
 
 I came on the verandah just before the sun rose on the morrow.  My house
 was the last on the east; there was a cape of woods and cliffs behind
 that hid the sunrise.  To the west, a swift cold river ran down, and
 beyond was the green of the village, dotted with cocoa-palms and
 breadfruits and houses.  The shutters were some of them down and some
 open; I saw the mosquito bars still stretched, with shadows of people
 new-awakened sitting up inside; and all over the green others were
 stalking silent, wrapped in their many-coloured sleeping clothes like
 Bedouins in Bible pictures.  It was mortal still and solemn and chilly,
 and the light of the dawn on the lagoon was like the shining of a fire.
 
 But the thing that troubled me was nearer hand.  Some dozen young men and
 children made a piece of a half-circle, flanking my house: the river
 divided them, some were on the near side, some on the far, and one on a
 boulder in the midst; and they all sat silent, wrapped in their sheets,
 and stared at me and my house as straight as pointer dogs.  I thought it
 strange as I went out.  When I had bathed and come back again, and found
 them all there, and two or three more along with them, I thought it
 stranger still.  What could they see to gaze at in my house, I wondered,
 and went in.
 
 But the thought of these starers stuck in my mind, and presently I came
 out again.  The sun was now up, but it was still behind the cape of
 woods.  Say a quarter of an hour had come and gone.  The crowd was
 greatly increased, the far bank of the river was lined for quite a
 wayperhaps thirty grown folk, and of children twice as many, some
 standing, some squatted on the ground, and all staring at my house.  I
 have seen a house in a South Sea village thus surrounded, but then a
 trader was thrashing his wife inside, and she singing out.  Here was
 nothing: the stove was alight, the smoke going up in a Christian manner;
 all was shipshape and Bristol fashion.  To be sure, there was a stranger
 come, but they had a chance to see that stranger yesterday, and took it
 quiet enough.  What ailed them now?  I leaned my arms on the rail and
 stared back.  Devil a wink they had in them!  Now and then I could see
 the children chatter, but they spoke so low not even the hum of their
 speaking came my length.  The rest were like graven images: they stared
 at me, dumb and sorrowful, with their bright eyes; and it came upon me
 things would look not much different if I were on the platform of the
 gallows, and these good folk had come to see me hanged.
 
 I felt I was getting daunted, and began to be afraid I looked it, which
 would never do.  Up I stood, made believe to stretch myself, came down
 the verandah stair, and strolled towards the river.  There went a short
 buzz from one to the other, like what you hear in theatres when the
 curtain goes up; and some of the nearest gave back the matter of a pace.
 I saw a girl lay one hand on a young man and make a gesture upward with
 the other; at the same time she said something in the native with a
 gasping voice.  Three little boys sat beside my path, where, I must pass
 within three feet of them.  Wrapped in their sheets, with their shaved
 heads and bits of top-knots, and queer faces, they looked like figures on
 a chimney-piece.  Awhile they sat their ground, solemn as judges.  I came
 up hand over fist, doing my five knots, like a man that meant business;
 and I thought I saw a sort of a wink and gulp in the three faces.  Then
 one jumped up (he was the farthest off) and ran for his mammy.  The other
 two, trying to follow suit, got foul, came to ground together bawling,
 wriggled right out of their sheets mother-naked, and in a moment there
 were all three of them scampering for their lives and singing out like
 pigs.  The natives, who would never let a joke slip, even at a burial,
 laughed and let up, as short as a dogs bark.
 
 They say it scares a man to be alone.  No such thing.  What scares him in
 the dark or the high bush is that he cant make sure, and there might be
 an army at his elbow.  What scares him worst is to be right in the midst
 of a crowd, and have no guess of what theyre driving at.  When that
 laugh stopped, I stopped too.  The boys had not yet made their offing,
 they were still on the full stretch going the one way, when I had already
 gone about ship and was sheering off the other.  Like a fool I had come
 out, doing my five knots; like a fool I went back again.  It must have
 been the funniest thing to see, and what knocked me silly, this time no
 one laughed; only one old woman gave a kind of pious moan, the way you
 have heard Dissenters in their chapels at the sermon.
 
 I never saw such fools of Kanakas as your people here, I said once to
 Uma, glancing out of the window at the starers.
 
 Savvy nothing, says Uma, with a kind of disgusted air that she was good
 at.
 
 And that was all the talk we had upon the matter, for I was put out, and
 Uma took the thing so much as a matter of course that I was fairly
 ashamed.
 
 All day, off and on, now fewer and now more, the fools sat about the west
 end of my house and across the river, waiting for the show, whatever that
 wasfire to come down from heaven, I suppose, and consume me, bones and
 baggage.  But by evening, like real islanders, they had wearied of the
 business, and got away, and had a dance instead in the big house of the
 village, where I heard them singing and clapping hands till, maybe, ten
 at night, and the next day it seemed they had forgotten I existed.  If
 fire had come down from heaven or the earth opened and swallowed me,
 there would have been nobody to see the sport or take the lesson, or
 whatever you like to call it.  But I was to find they hadnt forgot
 either, and kept an eye lifting for phenomena over my way.
 
 I was hard at it both these days getting my trade in order and taking
 stock of what Vigours had left.  This was a job that made me pretty sick,
 and kept me from thinking on much else.  Ben had taken stock the trip
 beforeI knew I could trust Benbut it was plain somebody had been making
 free in the meantime.  I found I was out by what might easily cover six
 months salary and profit, and I could have kicked myself all round the
 village to have been such a blamed ass, sitting boozing with that Case
 instead of attending to my own affairs and taking stock.
 
 However, theres no use crying over spilt milk.  It was done now, and
 couldnt be undone.  All I could do was to get what was left of it, and
 my new stuff (my own choice) in order, to go round and get after the rats
 and cockroaches, and to fix up that store regular Sydney style.  A fine
 show I made of it; and the third morning when I had lit my pipe and stood
 in the door-way and looked in, and turned and looked far up the mountain
 and saw the cocoanuts waving and posted up the tons of copra, and over
 the village green and saw the island dandies and reckoned up the yards of
 print they wanted for their kilts and dresses, I felt as if I was in the
 right place to make a fortune, and go home again and start a
 public-house.  There was I, sitting in that verandah, in as handsome a
 piece of scenery as you could find, a splendid sun, and a fine fresh
 healthy trade that stirred up a mans blood like sea-bathing; and the
 whole thing was clean gone from me, and I was dreaming England, which is,
 after all, a nasty, cold, muddy hole, with not enough light to see to
 read by; and dreaming the looks of my public, by a cant of a broad
 high-road like an avenue, and with the sign on a green tree.
 
 So much for the morning, but the day passed and the devil anyone looked
 near me, and from all I knew of natives in other islands I thought this
 strange.  People laughed a little at our firm and their fine stations,
 and at this station of Fales in particular; all the copra in the
 district wouldnt pay for it (I had heard them say) in fifty years, which
 I supposed was an exaggeration.  But when the day went, and no business
 came at all, I began to get downhearted; and, about three in the
 afternoon, I went out for a stroll to cheer me up.  On the green I saw a
 white man coming with a cassock on, by which and by the face of him I
 knew he was a priest.  He was a good-natured old soul to look at, gone a
 little grizzled, and so dirty you could have written with him on a piece
 of paper.
 
 Good day, sir, said I.
 
 He answered me eagerly in native.
 
 Dont you speak any English? said I.
 
 French, says he.
 
 Well, said I, Im sorry, but I cant do anything there.
 
 He tried me awhile in the French, and then again in native, which he
 seemed to think was the best chance.  I made out he was after more than
 passing the time of day with me, but had something to communicate, and I
 listened the harder.  I heard the names of Adams and Case and of
 RandallRandall the oftenestand the word poison, or something like it,
 and a native word that he said very often.  I went home, repeating it to
 myself.
 
 What does fussy-ocky mean? I asked of Uma, for that was as near as I
 could come to it.
 
 Make dead, said she.
 
 The devil it does! says I.  Did ever you hear that Case had poisoned
 Johnnie Adams?
 
 Every man he savvy that, says Uma, scornful-like.  Give him white
 sandbad sand.  He got the bottle still.  Suppose he give you gin, you no
 take him.
 
 Now I had heard much the same sort of story in other islands, and the
 same white powder always to the front, which made me think the less of
 it.  For all that, I went over to Randalls place to see what I could
 pick up, and found Case on the doorstep, cleaning a gun.
 
 Good shooting here? says I.
 
 A 1, says he.  The bush is full of all kinds of birds.  I wish copra
 was as plenty, says heI thought, slylybut there dont seem anything
 doing.
 
 I could see Black Jack in the store, serving a customer.
 
 That looks like business, though, said I.
 
 Thats the first sale weve made in three weeks, said he.
 
 You dont tell me? says I.  Three weeks?  Well, well.
 
 If you dont believe me, he cries, a little hot, you can go and look
 at the copra-house.  Its half empty to this blessed hour.
 
 I shouldnt be much the better for that, you see, says I.  For all I
 can tell, it might have been whole empty yesterday.
 
 Thats so, says he, with a bit of a laugh.
 
 By-the-bye, I said, what sort of a party is that priest?  Seems rather
 a friendly sort.
 
 At this Case laughed right out loud.  Ah! says he, I see what ails you
 now.  Galuchets been at you._Father Galoshes_ was the name he went by
 most, but Case always gave it the French quirk, which was another reason
 we had for thinking him above the common.
 
 Yes, I have seen him, I says.  I made out he didnt think much of your
 Captain Randall.
 
 That he dont! says Case.  It was the trouble about poor Adams.  The
 last day, when he lay dying, there was young Buncombe round.  Ever met
 Buncombe?
 
 I told him no.
 
 Hes a cure, is Buncombe! laughs Case.  Well, Buncombe took it in his
 head that, as there was no other clergyman about, bar Kanaka pastors, we
 ought to call in Father Galuchet, and have the old man administered and
 take the sacrament.  It was all the same to me, you may suppose; but I
 said I thought Adams was the fellow to consult.  He was jawing away about
 watered copra and a sight of foolery.  Look here, I said, youre
 pretty sick.  Would you like to see Galoshes?  He sat right up on his
 elbow.  Get the priest, says he, get the priest; dont let me die here
 like a dog!  He spoke kind of fierce and eager, but sensible enough.
 There was nothing to say against that, so we sent and asked Galuchet if
 he would come.  You bet he would.  He jumped in his dirty linen at the
 thought of it.  But we had reckoned without Papa.  Hes a hard-shell
 Baptist, is Papa; no Papists need apply.  And he took and locked the
 door.  Buncombe told him he was bigoted, and I thought he would have had
 a fit.  Bigoted! he says.  Me bigoted?  Have I lived to hear it from a
 jackanapes like you?  And he made for Buncombe, and I had to hold them
 apart; and there was Adams in the middle, gone luny again, and carrying
 on about copra like a born fool.  It was good as the play, and I was
 about knocked out of time with laughing, when all of a sudden Adams sat
 up, clapped his hands to his chest, and went into the horrors.  He died
 hard, did John Adams, says Case, with a kind of a sudden sternness.
 
 And what became of the priest? I asked.
 
 The priest? says Case.  O! he was hammering on the door outside, and
 crying on the natives to come and beat it in, and singing out it was a
 soul he wished to save, and that.  He was in a rare taking, was the
 priest.  But what would you have?  Johnny had slipped his cable; no more
 Johnny in the market; and the administration racket clean played out.
 Next thing, word came to Randall the priest was praying upon Johnnys
 grave.  Papa was pretty full, and got a club, and lit out straight for
 the place, and there was Galoshes on his knees, and a lot of natives
 looking on.  You wouldnt think Papa caredthat much about anything,
 unless it was liquor; but he and the priest stuck to it two hours,
 slanging each other in native, and every time Galoshes tried to kneel
 down Papa went for him with the club.  There never were such larks in
 Fales.  The end of it was that Captain Randall knocked over with some
 kind of a fit or stroke, and the priest got in his goods after all.  But
 he was the angriest priest you ever heard of, and complained to the
 chiefs about the outrage, as he called it.  That was no account, for our
 chiefs are Protestant here; and, anyway, he had been making trouble about
 the drum for morning school, and they were glad to give him a wipe.  Now
 he swears old Randall gave Adams poison or something, and when the two
 meet they grin at each other like baboons.
 
 He told this story as natural as could be, and like a man that enjoyed
 the fun; though, now I come to think of it after so long, it seems rather
 a sickening yarn.  However, Case never set up to be soft, only to be
 square and hearty, and a man all round; and, to tell the truth, he
 puzzled me entirely.
 
 I went home and asked Uma if she were a Popey, which I had made out to be
 the native word for Catholics.
 
 _E le ai_! says she.  She always used the native when she meant no
 more than usually strong, and, indeed, theres more of it.  No good
 Popey, she added.
 
 Then I asked her about Adams and the priest, and she told me much the
 same yarn in her own way.  So that I was left not much farther on, but
 inclined, upon the whole, to think the bottom of the matter was the row
 about the sacrament, and the poisoning only talk.
 
 The next day was a Sunday, when there was no business to be looked for.
 Uma asked me in the morning if I was going to pray; I told her she bet
 not, and she stopped home herself with no more words.  I thought this
 seemed unlike a native, and a native woman, and a woman that had new
 clothes to show off; however, it suited me to the ground, and I made the
 less of it.  The queer thing was that I came next door to going to church
 after all, a thing Im little likely to forget.  I had turned out for a
 stroll, and heard the hymn tune up.  You know how it is.  If you hear
 folk singing, it seems to draw you; and pretty soon I found myself
 alongside the church.  It was a little long low place, coral built,
 rounded off at both ends like a whale-boat, a big native roof on the top
 of it, windows without sashes and doorways without doors.  I stuck my
 head into one of the windows, and the sight was so new to mefor things
 went quite different in the islands I was acquainted withthat I stayed
 and looked on.  The congregation sat on the floor on mats, the women on
 one side, the men on the other, all rigged out to killthe women with
 dresses and trade hats, the men in white jackets and shirts.  The hymn
 was over; the pastor, a big buck Kanaka, was in the pulpit, preaching for
 his life; and by the way he wagged his hand, and worked his voice, and
 made his points, and seemed to argue with the folk, I made out he was a
 gun at the business.  Well, he looked up suddenly and caught my eye, and
 I give you my word he staggered in the pulpit; his eyes bulged out of his
 head, his hand rose and pointed at me like as if against his will, and
 the sermon stopped right there.
 
 It isnt a fine thing to say for yourself, but I ran away; and if the
 same kind of a shock was given me, I should run away again to-morrow.  To
 see that palavering Kanaka struck all of a heap at the mere sight of me
 gave me a feeling as if the bottom had dropped out of the world.  I went
 right home, and stayed there, and said nothing.  You might think I would
 tell Uma, but that was against my system.  You might have thought I would
 have gone over and consulted Case; but the truth was I was ashamed to
 speak of such a thing, I thought everyone would blurt out laughing in my
 face.  So I held my tongue, and thought all the more; and the more I
 thought, the less I liked the business.
 
 By Monday night I got it clearly in my head I must be tabooed.  A new
 store to stand open two days in a village and not a man or woman come to
 see the trade was past believing.
 
 Uma, said I, I think Im tabooed.
 
 I think so, said she.
 
 I thought awhile whether I should ask her more, but its a bad idea to
 set natives up with any notion of consulting them, so I went to Case.  It
 was dark, and he was sitting alone, as he did mostly, smoking on the
 stairs.
 
 Case, said I, heres a queer thing.  Im tabooed.
 
 O, fudge! says he; taint the practice in these islands.
 
 That may be, or it maynt, said I.  Its the practice where I was
 before.  You can bet I know what its like; and I tell it you for a fact,
 Im tabooed.
 
 Well, said he, what have you been doing?
 
 Thats what I want to find out, said I.
 
 O, you cant be, said he; it aint possible.  However, Ill tell you
 what Ill do.  Just to put your mind at rest, Ill go round and find out
 for sure.  Just you waltz in and talk to Papa.
 
 Thank you, I said, Id rather stay right out here on the verandah.
 Your house is so close.
 
 Ill call Papa out here, then, says he.
 
 My dear fellow, I says, I wish you wouldnt.  The fact is, I dont
 take to Mr. Randall.
 
 Case laughed, took a lantern from the store, and set out into the
 village.  He was gone perhaps a quarter of an hour, and he looked mighty
 serious when he came back.
 
 Well, said he, clapping down the lantern on the verandah steps, I
 would never have believed it.  I dont know where the impudence of these
 Kanakas ll go next; they seem to have lost all idea of respect for
 whites.  What we want is a man-of-wara German, if we couldthey know how
 to manage Kanakas.
 
 I _am_ tabooed, then? I cried.
 
 Something of the sort, said he.  Its the worst thing of the kind Ive
 heard of yet.  But Ill stand by you, Wiltshire, man to man.  You come
 round here to-morrow about nine, and well have it out with the chiefs.
 Theyre afraid of me, or they used to be; but their heads are so big by
 now, I dont know what to think.  Understand me, Wiltshire; I dont count
 this your quarrel, he went on, with a great deal of resolution, I count
 it all of our quarrel, I count it the White Mans Quarrel, and Ill stand
 to it through thick and thin, and theres my hand on it.
 
 Have you found out whats the reason? I asked.
 
 Not yet, said Case.  But well fix them down to-morrow.
 
 Altogether I was pretty well pleased with his attitude, and almost more
 the next day, when we met to go before the chiefs, to see him so stern
 and resolved.  The chiefs awaited us in one of their big oval houses,
 which was marked out to us from a long way off by the crowd about the
 eaves, a hundred strong if there was onemen, women, and children.  Many
 of the men were on their way to work and wore green wreaths, and it put
 me in thoughts of the 1st of May at home.  This crowd opened and buzzed
 about the pair of us as we went in, with a sudden angry animation.  Five
 chiefs were there; four mighty stately men, the fifth old and puckered.
 They sat on mats in their white kilts and jackets; they had fans in their
 hands, like fine ladies; and two of the younger ones wore Catholic
 medals, which gave me matter of reflection.  Our place was set, and the
 mats laid for us over against these grandees, on the near side of the
 house; the midst was empty; the crowd, close at our backs, murmured and
 craned and jostled to look on, and the shadows of them tossed in front of
 us on the clean pebbles of the floor.  I was just a hair put out by the
 excitement of the commons, but the quiet civil appearance of the chiefs
 reassured me, all the more when their spokesman began and made a long
 speech in a low tone of voice, sometimes waving his hand towards Case,
 sometimes toward me, and sometimes knocking with his knuckles on the mat.
 One thing was clear: there was no sign of anger in the chiefs.
 
 Whats he been saying? I asked, when he had done.
 
 O, just that theyre glad to see you, and they understand by me you wish
 to make some kind of complaint, and youre to fire away, and theyll do
 the square thing.
 
 It took a precious long time to say that, said I.
 
 O, the rest was sawder and _bonjour_ and that, said Case.  You know
 what Kanakas are.
 
 Well, they dont get much _bonjour_ out of me, said I.  You tell them
 who I am.  Im a white man, and a British subject, and no end of a big
 chief at home; and Ive come here to do them good, and bring them
 civilisation; and no sooner have I got my trade sorted out than they go
 and taboo me, and no one dare come near my place!  Tell them I dont mean
 to fly in the face of anything legal; and if what they wants a present,
 Ill do whats fair.  I dont blame any man looking out for himself, tell
 them, for thats human nature; but if they think theyre going to come
 any of their native ideas over me, theyll find themselves mistaken.  And
 tell them plain that I demand the reason of this treatment as a white man
 and a British subject.
 
 That was my speech.  I know how to deal with Kanakas: give them plain
 sense and fair dealing, andIll do them that much justicethey knuckle
 under every time.  They havent any real government or any real law,
 thats what youve got to knock into their heads; and even if they had,
 it would be a good joke if it was to apply to a white man.  It would be a
 strange thing if we came all this way and couldnt do what we pleased.
 The mere idea has always put my monkey up, and I rapped my speech out
 pretty big.  Then Case translated itor made believe to, ratherand the
 first chief replied, and then a second, and a third, all in the same
 style, easy and genteel, but solemn underneath.  Once a question was put
 to Case, and he answered it, and all hands (both chiefs and commons)
 laughed out aloud, and looked at me.  Last of all, the puckered old
 fellow and the big young chief that spoke first started in to put Case
 through a kind of catechism.  Sometimes I made out that Case was trying
 to fence, and they stuck to him like hounds, and the sweat ran down his
 face, which was no very pleasant sight to me, and at some of his answers
 the crowd moaned and murmured, which was a worse hearing.  Its a cruel
 shame I knew no native, for (as I now believe) they were asking Case
 about my marriage, and he must have had a tough job of it to clear his
 feet.  But leave Case alone; he had the brains to run a parliament.
 
 Well, is that all? I asked, when a pause came.
 
 Come along, says he, mopping his face; Ill tell you outside.
 
 Do you mean they wont take the taboo off?  I cried.
 
 Its something queer, said he.  Ill tell you outside.  Better come
 away.
 
 I wont take it at their hands, cried I.  I aint that kind of a man.
 You dont find me turn my back on a parcel of Kanakas.
 
 Youd better, said Case.
 
 He looked at me with a signal in his eye; and the five chiefs looked at
 me civilly enough, but kind of pointed; and the people looked at me and
 craned and jostled.  I remembered the folks that watched my house, and
 how the pastor had jumped in his pulpit at the bare sight of me; and the
 whole business seemed so out of the way that I rose and followed Case.
 The crowd opened again to let us through, but wider than before, the
 children on the skirts running and singing out, and as we two white men
 walked away they all stood and watched us.
 
 And now, said I, what is all this about?
 
 The truth is I cant rightly make it out myself.  They have a down on
 you, says Case.
 
 Taboo a man because they have a down on him! I cried.  I never heard
 the like.
 
 Its worse than that, you see, said Case.  You aint tabooedI told
 you that couldnt be.  The people wont go near you, Wiltshire, and
 theres where it is.
 
 They wont go near me?  What do you mean by that?  Why wont they go
 near me? I cried.
 
 Case hesitated.  Seems theyre frightened, says he, in a low, voice.
 
 I stopped dead short.  Frightened? I repeated.  Are you gone crazy,
 Case?  What are they frightened of?
 
 I wish I could make out, Case answered, shaking his head.  Appears
 like one of their tomfool superstitions.  Thats what I dont cotton to,
 he said.  Its like the business about Vigours.
 
 Id like to know what you mean by that, and Ill trouble you to tell
 me, says I.
 
 Well, you know, Vigours lit out and left all standing, said he.  It
 was some superstition businessI never got the hang of it but it began to
 look bad before the end.
 
 Ive heard a different story about that, said I, and I had better tell
 you so.  I heard he ran away because of you.
 
 O! well, I suppose he was ashamed to tell the truth, says Case; I
 guess he thought it silly.  And its a fact that I packed him off.  What
 would you do, old man? says he.  Get, says I, and not think twice
 about it.  I was the gladdest kind of man to see him clear away.  It
 aint my notion to turn my back on a mate when hes in a tight place, but
 there was that much trouble in the village that I couldnt see where it
 might likely end.  I was a fool to be so much about with Vigours.  They
 cast it up to me to-day.  Didnt you hear Maeathats the young chief,
 the big oneripping out about Vika?  That was him they were after.
 They dont seem to forget it, somehow.
 
 This is all very well, said I, but it dont tell me whats wrong; it
 dont tell me what theyre afraid ofwhat their idea is.
 
 Well, I wish I knew, said Case.  I cant say fairer than that.
 
 You might have asked, I think, says I.
 
 And so I did, says he.  But you must have seen for yourself, unless
 youre blind, that the asking got the other way.  Ill go as far as I
 dare for another white man; but when I find Im in the scrape myself, I
 think first of my own bacon.  The loss of me is Im too good-natured.
 And Ill take the freedom of telling you you show a queer kind of
 gratitude to a man whos got into all this mess along of your affairs.
 
 Theres a thing I am thinking of, said I.  You were a fool to be so
 much about with Vigours.  One comfort, you havent been much about with
 me.  I notice youve never been inside my house.  Own up now; you had
 word of this before?
 
 Its a fact I havent been, said he.  It was an oversight, and I am
 sorry for it, Wiltshire.  But about coming now, Ill be quite plain.
 
 You mean you wont? I asked.
 
 Awfully sorry, old man, but thats the size of it, says Case.
 
 In short, youre afraid? says I.
 
 In short, Im afraid, says he.
 
 And Im still to be tabooed for nothing? I asked
 
 I tell you youre not tabooed, said he.  The Kanakas wont go near
 you, thats all.  And whos to make em?  We traders have a lot of gall,
 I must say; we make these poor Kanakas take back their laws, and take up
 their taboos, and that, whenever it happens to suit us.  But you dont
 mean to say you expect a law obliging people to deal in your store
 whether they want to or not?  You dont mean to tell me youve got the
 gall for that?  And if you had, it would be a queer thing to propose to
 me.  I would just like to point out to you, Wiltshire, that Im a trader
 myself.
 
 I dont think I would talk of gall if I was you, said I.  Heres about
 what it comes to, as well as I can make out: None of the people are to
 trade with me, and theyre all to trade with you.  Youre to have the
 copra, and Im to go to the devil and shake myself.  And I dont know any
 native, and youre the only man here worth mention that speaks English,
 and you have the gall to up and hint to me my lifes in danger, and all
 youve got to tell me is you dont know why!
 
 Well, it _is_ all I have to tell you, said he.  I dont knowI wish I
 did.
 
 And so you turn your back and leave me to myself!  Is that the
 position? says I.
 
 If you like to put it nasty, says he.  I dont put it so.  I say
 merely, Im going to keep clear of you; or, if I dont, Ill get in
 danger for myself.
 
 Well, says I, youre a nice kind of a white man!
 
 O, I understand; youre riled, said he.  I would be myself.  I can
 make excuses.
 
 All right, I said, go and make excuses somewhere else.  Heres my way,
 theres yours!
 
 With that we parted, and I went straight home, in a hot temper, and found
 Uma trying on a lot of trade goods like a baby.
 
 Here, I said, you quit that foolery!  Heres a pretty mess to have
 made, as if I wasnt bothered enough anyway!  And I thought I told you to
 get dinner!
 
 And then I believe I gave her a bit of the rough side of my tongue, as
 she deserved.  She stood up at once, like a sentry to his officer; for I
 must say she was always well brought up, and had a great respect for
 whites.
 
 And now, says I, you belong round here, youre bound to understand
 this.  What am I tabooed for, anyway?  Or, if I aint tabooed, what makes
 the folks afraid of me?
 
 She stood and looked at me with eyes like saucers.
 
 You no savvy? she gasps at last.
 
 No, said I.  How would you expect me to?  We dont have any such
 craziness where I come from.
 
 Ese no tell you? she asked again.
 
 (_Ese_ was the name the natives had for Case; it may mean foreign, or
 extraordinary; or it might mean a mummy apple; but most like it was only
 his own name misheard and put in a Kanaka spelling.)
 
 Not much, said I.
 
 D-n Ese! she cried.
 
 You might think it funny to hear this Kanaka girl come out with a big
 swear.  No such thing.  There was no swearing in herno, nor anger; she
 was beyond anger, and meant the word simple and serious.  She stood there
 straight as she said it.  I cannot justly say that I ever saw a woman
 look like that before or after, and it struck me mum.  Then she made a
 kind of an obeisance, but it was the proudest kind, and threw her hands
 out open.
 
 I shamed, she said.  I think you savvy.  Ese he tell me you savvy, he
 tell me you no mind, tell me you love me too much.  Taboo belong me, she
 said, touching herself on the bosom, as she had done upon our
 wedding-night.  Now I go way, taboo he go way too.  Then you get too
 much copra.  You like more better, I think.  _Tof_, _alii_, says she in
 the nativeFarewell, chief!
 
 Hold on! I cried.  Dont be in such a hurry.
 
 She looked at me sidelong with a smile.  You see, you get copra, she
 said, the same as you might offer candies to a child.
 
 Uma, said I, hear reason.  I didnt know, and thats a fact; and Case
 seems to have played it pretty mean upon the pair of us.  But I do know
 now, and I dont mind; I love you too much.  You no go way, you no leave
 me, I too much sorry.
 
 You no love, me, she cried, you talk me bad words!  And she threw
 herself in a corner of the floor, and began to cry.
 
 Well, Im no scholar, but I wasnt born yesterday, and I thought the
 worst of that trouble was over.  However, there she layher back turned,
 her face to the walland shook with sobbing like a little child, so that
 her feet jumped with it.  Its strange how it hits a man when hes in
 love; for theres no use mincing thingsKanaka and all, I was in love
 with her, or just as good.  I tried to take her hand, but she would none
 of that.  Uma, I said, theres no sense in carrying on like this.  I
 want you stop here, I want my little wifie, I tell you true.
 
 No tell me true, she sobbed.
 
 All right, says I, Ill wait till youre through with this.  And I
 sat right down beside her on the floor, and set to smooth her hair with
 my hand.  At first she wriggled away when I touched her; then she seemed
 to notice me no more; then her sobs grew gradually less, and presently
 stopped; and the next thing I knew, she raised her face to mime.
 
 You tell me true?  You like me stop? she asked.
 
 Uma, I said, I would rather have you than all the copra in the South
 Seas, which was a very big expression, and the strangest thing was that
 I meant it.
 
 She threw her arms about me, sprang close up, and pressed her face to
 mine in the island way of kissing, so that I was all wetted with her
 tears, and my heart went out to her wholly.  I never had anything so near
 me as this little brown bit of a girl.  Many things went together, and
 all helped to turn my head.  She was pretty enough to eat; it seemed she
 was my only friend in that queer place; I was ashamed that I had spoken
 rough to her: and she was a woman, and my wife, and a kind of a baby
 besides that I was sorry for; and the salt of her tears was in my mouth.
 And I forgot Case and the natives; and I forgot that I knew nothing of
 the story, or only remembered it to banish the remembrance; and I forgot
 that I was to get no copra, and so could make no livelihood; and I forgot
 my employers, and the strange kind of service I was doing them, when I
 preferred my fancy to their business; and I forgot even that Uma was no
 true wife of mine, but just a maid beguiled, and that in a pretty shabby
 style.  But that is to look too far on.  I will come to that part of it
 next.
 
 It was late before we thought of getting dinner.  The stove was out, and
 gone stone-cold; but we fired up after a while, and cooked each a dish,
 helping and hindering each other, and making a play of it like children.
 I was so greedy of her nearness that I sat down to dinner with my lass
 upon my knee, made sure of her with one hand, and ate with the other.
 Ay, and more than that.  She was the worst cook I suppose God made; the
 things she set her hand to it would have sickened an honest horse to eat
 of; yet I made my meal that day on Umas cookery, and can never call to
 mind to have been better pleased.
 
 I didnt pretend to myself, and I didnt pretend to her.  I saw I was
 clean gone; and if she was to make a fool of me, she must.  And I suppose
 it was this that set her talking, for now she made sure that we were
 friends.  A lot she told me, sitting in my lap and eating my dish, as I
 ate hers, from foolerya lot about herself and her mother and Case, all
 which would be very tedious, and fill sheets if I set it down in Beach de
 Mar, but which I must give a hint of in plain English, and one thing
 about myself which had a very big effect on my concerns, as you are soon
 to hear.
 
 It seems she was born in one of the Line Islands; had been only two or
 three years in these parts, where she had come with a white man, who was
 married to her mother and then died; and only the one year in Fales.
 Before that they had been a good deal on the move, trekking about after
 the white man, who was one of those rolling stones that keep going round
 after a soft job.  They talk about looking for gold at the end of a
 rainbow; but if a man wants an employment thatll last him till he dies,
 let him start out on the soft-job hunt.  Theres meat and drink in it
 too, and beer and skittles, for you never hear of them starving, and
 rarely see them sober; and as for steady sport, cock-fighting isnt in
 the same county with it.  Anyway, this beachcomber carried the woman and
 her daughter all over the shop, but mostly to out-of-the-way islands,
 where there were no police, and he thought, perhaps, the soft job hung
 out.  Ive my own view of this old party; but I was just as glad he had
 kept Uma clear of Apia and Papeete and these flash towns.  At last he
 struck Fale-alii on this island, got some tradethe Lord knows
 how!muddled it all away in the usual style, and died worth next to
 nothing, bar a bit of land at Fales that he had got for a bad debt,
 which was what put it in the minds of the mother and daughter to come
 there and live.  It seems Case encouraged them all he could, and helped
 to get their house built.  He was very kind those days, and gave Uma
 trade, and there is no doubt he had his eye on her from the beginning.
 However, they had scarce settled, when up turned a young man, a native,
 and wanted to marry her.  He was a small chief, and had some fine mats
 and old songs in his family, and was very pretty, Uma said; and,
 altogether, it was an extraordinary match for a penniless girl and an
 out-islander.
 
 At the first word of this I got downright sick with jealousy.
 
 And you mean to say you would have married him? I cried.
 
 _Ioe_, yes, said she.  I like too much!
 
 Well! I said.  And suppose I had come round after?
 
 I like you more better now, said she.  But, suppose I marry Ioane, I
 one good wife.  I no common Kanaka.  Good girl! says she.
 
 Well, I had to be pleased with that; but I promise you I didnt care
 about the business one little bit.  And I liked the end of that yarn no
 better than the beginning.  For it seems this proposal of marriage was
 the start of all the trouble.  It seems, before that, Uma and her mother
 had been looked down upon, of course, for kinless folk and out-islanders,
 but nothing to hurt; and, even when Ioane came forward, there was less
 trouble at first than might have been looked for.  And then, all of a
 sudden, about six months before my coming, Ioane backed out and left that
 part of the island, and from that day to this Uma and her mother had
 found themselves alone.  None called at their house, none spoke to them
 on the roads.  If they went to church, the other women drew their mats
 away and left them in a clear place by themselves.  It was a regular
 excommunication, like what you read of in the Middle Ages; and the cause
 or sense of it beyond guessing.  It was some _tala pepelo_, Uma said,
 some lie, some calumny; and all she knew of it was that the girls who had
 been jealous of her luck with Ioane used to twit her with his desertion,
 and cry out, when they met her alone in the woods, that she would never
 be married.  They tell me no man he marry me.  He too much fraid, she
 said.
 
 The only soul that came about them after this desertion was Master Case.
 Even he was chary of showing himself, and turned up mostly by night; and
 pretty soon he began to table his cards and make up to Uma.  I was still
 sore about Ioane, and when Case turned up in the same line of business I
 cut up downright rough.
 
 Well, I said, sneering, and I suppose you thought Case very pretty
 and liked too much?
 
 Now you talk silly, said she.  White man, he come here, I marry him
 all-e-same Kanaka; very well then, he marry me all-e-same white woman.
 Suppose he no marry, he go way, woman he stop.  All-e-same thief, empty
 hand, Tonga-heartno can love!  Now you come marry me.  You big heartyou
 no shamed island-girl.  That thing I love you for too much.  I proud.
 
 I dont know that ever I felt sicker all the days of my life.  I laid
 down my fork, and I put away the island-girl; I didnt seem somehow to
 have any use for either, and I went and walked up and down in the house,
 and Uma followed me with her eyes, for she was troubled, and small
 wonder!  But troubled was no word for it with me.  I so wanted, and so
 feared, to make a clean breast of the sweep that I had been.
 
 And just then there came a sound of singing out of the sea; it sprang up
 suddenly clear and near, as the boat turned the headland, and Uma,
 running to the window, cried out it was Misi come upon his rounds.
 
 I thought it was a strange thing I should be glad to have a missionary;
 but, if it was strange, it was still true.
 
 Uma, said I, you stop here in this room, and dont budge a foot out of
 it till I come back.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.  THE MISSIONARY.
 
 
 As I came out on the verandah, the mission-boat was shooting for the
 mouth of the river.  She was a long whale-boat painted white; a bit of an
 awning astern; a native pastor crouched on the wedge of the poop,
 steering; some four-and-twenty paddles flashing and dipping, true to the
 boat-song; and the missionary under the awning, in his white clothes,
 reading in a book, and set him up!  It was pretty to see and hear;
 theres no smarter sight in the islands than a missionary boat with a
 good crew and a good pipe to them; and I considered it for half a minute,
 with a bit of envy perhaps, and then strolled down towards the river.
 
 From the opposite side there was another man aiming for the same place,
 but he ran and got there first.  It was Case; doubtless his idea was to
 keep me apart from the missionary, who might serve me as interpreter; but
 my mind was upon other things.  I was thinking how he had jockeyed us
 about the marriage, and tried his hand on Uma before; and at the sight of
 him rage flew into my nostrils.
 
 Get out of that, you low, swindling thief!  I cried.
 
 Whats that you say? says he.
 
 I gave him the word again, and rammed it down with a good oath.  And if
 ever I catch you within six fathoms of my house, I cried, Ill clap a
 bullet in your measly carcase.
 
 You must do as you like about your house, said he, where I told you I
 have no thought of going; but this is a public place.
 
 Its a place where I have private business, said I.  I have no idea of
 a hound like you eavesdropping, and I give you notice to clear out.
 
 I dont take it, though, says Case.
 
 Ill show you, then, said I.
 
 Well have to see about that, said he.
 
 He was quick with his hands, but he had neither the height nor the
 weight, being a flimsy creature alongside a man like me, and, besides, I
 was blazing to that height of wrath that I could have bit into a chisel.
 I gave him first the one and then the other, so that I could hear his
 head rattle and crack, and he went down straight.
 
 Have you had enough? cried I.  But he only looked up white and blank,
 and the blood spread upon his face like wine upon a napkin.  Have you
 had enough? I cried again.  Speak up, and dont lie malingering there,
 or Ill take my feet to you.
 
 He sat up at that, and held his headby the look of him you could see it
 was spinningand the blood poured on his pyjamas.
 
 Ive had enough for this time, says he, and he got up staggering, and
 went off by the way that he had come.
 
 The boat was close in; I saw the missionary had laid his book to one
 side, and I smiled to myself.  Hell know Im a man, anyway, thinks I.
 
 This was the first time, in all my years in the Pacific, I had ever
 exchanged two words with any missionary, let alone asked one for a
 favour.  I didnt like the lot, no trader does; they look down upon us,
 and make no concealment; and, besides, theyre partly Kanakaised, and
 suck up with natives instead of with other white men like themselves.  I
 had on a rig of clean striped pyjamasfor, of course, I had dressed
 decent to go before the chiefs; but when I saw the missionary step out of
 this boat in the regular uniform, white duck clothes, pith helmet, white
 shirt and tie, and yellow boots to his feet, I could have bunged stones
 at him.  As he came nearer, queering me pretty curious (because of the
 fight, I suppose), I saw he looked mortal sick, for the truth was he had
 a fever on, and had just had a chill in the boat.
 
 Mr. Tarleton, I believe? says I, for I had got his name.
 
 And you, I suppose, are the new trader? says he.
 
 I want to tell you first that I dont hold with missions, I went on,
 and that I think you and the likes of you do a sight of harm, filling up
 the natives with old wives tales and bumptiousness.
 
 You are perfectly entitled to your opinions, says he, looking a bit
 ugly, but I have no call to hear them.
 
 It so happens that youve got to hear them, I said.  Im no
 missionary, nor missionary lover; Im no Kanaka, nor favourer of
 KanakasIm just a trader; Im just a common, low-down, God-damned white
 man and British subject, the sort you would like to wipe your boots on.
 I hope thats plain!
 
 Yes, my man, said he.  Its more plain than creditable.  When you are
 sober, youll be sorry for this.
 
 He tried to pass on, but I stopped him with my hand.  The Kanakas were
 beginning to growl.  Guess they didnt like my tone, for I spoke to that
 man as free as I would to you.
 
 Now, you cant say Ive deceived you, said I, and I can go on.  I want
 a serviceI want two services, in fact; and, if you care to give me them,
 Ill perhaps take more stock in what you call your Christianity.
 
 He was silent for a moment.  Then he smiled.  You are rather a strange
 sort of man, says he.
 
 Im the sort of man God made me, says I.  I dont set up to be a
 gentleman, I said.
 
 I am not quite so sure, said he.  And what can I do for you, Mr.?
 
 Wiltshire, I says, though Im mostly called Welsher; but Wiltshire is
 the way its spelt, if the people on the beach could only get their
 tongues about it.  And what do I want?  Well, Ill tell you the first
 thing.  Im what you call a sinnerwhat I call a sweepand I want you to
 help me make it up to a person Ive deceived.
 
 He turned and spoke to his crew in the native.  And now I am at your
 service, said he, but only for the time my crew are dining.  I must be
 much farther down the coast before night.  I was delayed at Papa-Malulu
 till this morning, and I have an engagement in Fale-alii to-morrow
 night.
 
 I led the way to my house in silence, and rather pleased with myself for
 the way I had managed the talk, for I like a man to keep his
 self-respect.
 
 I was sorry to see you fighting, says he.
 
 O, thats part of the yarn I want to tell you, I said.  Thats service
 number two.  After youve heard it youll let me know whether youre
 sorry or not.
 
 We walked right in through the store, and I was surprised to find Uma had
 cleared away the dinner things.  This was so unlike her ways that I saw
 she had done it out of gratitude, and liked her the better.  She and Mr.
 Tarleton called each other by name, and he was very civil to her
 seemingly.  But I thought little of that; they can always find civility
 for a Kanaka, its us white men they lord it over.  Besides, I didnt
 want much Tarleton just them.  I was going to do my pitch.
 
 Uma, said I, give us your marriage certificate.  She looked put out.
 Come, said I, you can trust me.  Hand it up.
 
 She had it about her person, as usual; I believe she thought it was a
 pass to heaven, and if she died without having it handy she would go to
 hell.  I couldnt see where she put it the first time, I couldnt see now
 where she took it from; it seemed to jump into her hand like that
 Blavatsky business in the papers.  But its the same way with all island
 women, and I guess theyre taught it when young.
 
 Now, said I, with the certificate in my hand, I was married to this
 girl by Black Jack the negro.  The certificate was wrote by Case, and
 its a dandy piece of literature, I promise you.  Since then Ive found
 that theres a kind of cry in the place against this wife of mine, and so
 long as I keep her I cannot trade.  Now, what would any man do in my
 place, if he was a man? I said.  The first thing he would do is this, I
 guess.  And I took and tore up the certificate and bunged the pieces on
 the floor.
 
 _Au_! {2} cried Uma, and began to clap her hands; but I caught one of
 them in mine.
 
 And the second thing that he would do, said I, if he was what I would
 call a man and you would call a man, Mr. Tarleton, is to bring the girl
 right before you or any other missionary, and to up and say: I was wrong
 married to this wife of mine, but I think a heap of her, and now I want
 to be married to her right.  Fire away, Mr. Tarleton.  And I guess youd
 better do it in native; itll please the old lady, I said, giving her
 the proper name of a mans wife upon the spot.
 
 So we had in two of the crew for to witness, and were spliced in our own
 house; and the parson prayed a good bit, I must saybut not so long as
 someand shook hands with the pair of us.
 
 Mr. Wiltshire, he says, when he had made out the lines and packed off
 the witnesses, I have to thank you for a very lively pleasure.  I have
 rarely performed the marriage ceremony with more grateful emotions.
 
 That was what you would call talking.  He was going on, besides, with
 more of it, and I was ready for as much taffy as he had in stock, for I
 felt good.  But Uma had been taken up with something half through the
 marriage, and cut straight in.
 
 How your hand he get hurt? she asked.
 
 You ask Cases head, old lady, says I.
 
 She jumped with joy, and sang out.
 
 You havent made much of a Christian of this one, says I to Mr.
 Tarleton.
 
 We didnt think her one of our worst, says he, when she was at
 Fale-alii; and if Uma bears malice I shall be tempted to fancy she has
 good cause.
 
 Well, there we are at service number two, said I.  I want to tell you
 our yarn, and see if you can let a little daylight in.
 
 Is it long? he asked.
 
 Yes, I cried; its a goodish bit of a yarn!
 
 Well, Ill give you all the time I can spare, says he, looking at his
 watch.  But I must tell you fairly, I havent eaten since five this
 morning, and, unless you can let me have something I am not likely to eat
 again before seven or eight to-night.
 
 By God, well give you dinner! I cried.
 
 I was a little caught up at my swearing, just when all was going
 straight; and so was the missionary, I suppose, but he made believe to
 look out of the window, and thanked us.
 
 So we ran him up a bit of a meal.  I was bound to let the old lady have a
 hand in it, to show off, so I deputised her to brew the tea.  I dont
 think I ever met such tea as she turned out.  But that was not the worst,
 for she got round with the salt-box, which she considered an extra
 European touch, and turned my stew into sea-water.  Altogether, Mr.
 Tarleton had a devil of a dinner of it; but he had plenty entertainment
 by the way, for all the while that we were cooking, and afterwards, when
 he was making believe to eat, I kept posting him up on Master Case and
 the beach of Fales, and he putting questions that showed he was
 following close.
 
 Well, said he at last, I am afraid you have a dangerous enemy.  This
 man Case is very clever and seems really wicked.  I must tell you I have
 had my eye on him for nearly a year, and have rather had the worst of our
 encounters.  About the time when the last representative of your firm ran
 so suddenly away, I had a letter from Namu, the native pastor, begging me
 to come to Fales at my earliest convenience, as his flock were all
 adopting Catholic practices.  I had great confidence in Namu; I fear it
 only shows how easily we are deceived.  No one could hear him preach and
 not be persuaded he was a man of extraordinary parts.  All our islanders
 easily acquire a kind of eloquence, and can roll out and illustrate, with
 a great deal of vigour and fancy, second-hand sermons; but Namus sermons
 are his own, and I cannot deny that I have found them means of grace.
 Moreover, he has a keen curiosity in secular things, does not fear work,
 is clever at carpentering, and has made himself so much respected among
 the neighbouring pastors that we call him, in a jest which is half
 serious, the Bishop of the East.  In short, I was proud of the man; all
 the more puzzled by his letter, and took an occasion to come this way.
 The morning before my arrival, Vigours had been sent on board the _Lion_,
 and Namu was perfectly at his ease, apparently ashamed of his letter, and
 quite unwilling to explain it.  This, of course, I could not allow, and
 he ended by confessing that he had been much concerned to find his people
 using the sign of the cross, but since he had learned the explanation his
 mind was satisfied.  For Vigours had the Evil Eye, a common thing in a
 country of Europe called Italy, where men were often struck dead by that
 kind of devil, and it appeared the sign of the cross was a charm against
 its power.
 
 And I explain it, Misi, said Namu, in this way: The country in Europe
 is a Popey country, and the devil of the Evil Eye may be a Catholic
 devil, or, at least, used to Catholic ways.  So then I reasoned thus: if
 this sign of the cross were used in a Popey manner it would be sinful,
 but when it is used only to protect men from a devil, which is a thing
 harmless in itself, the sign too must be, as a bottle is neither good nor
 bad, harmless.  For the sign is neither good nor bad.  But if the bottle
 be full of gin, the gin is bad; and if the sign be made in idolatry bad,
 so is the idolatry.  And, very like a native pastor, he had a text
 apposite about the casting out of devils.
 
 And who has been telling you about the Evil Eye? I asked.
 
 He admitted it was Case.  Now, I am afraid you will think me very
 narrow, Mr. Wiltshire, but I must tell you I was displeased, and cannot
 think a trader at all a good man to advise or have an influence upon my
 pastors.  And, besides, there had been some flying talk in the country of
 old Adams and his being poisoned, to which I had paid no great heed; but
 it came back to me at the moment.
 
 And is this Case a man of a sanctified life? I asked.
 
 He admitted he was not; for, though he did not drink, he was profligate
 with women, and had no religion.
 
 Then, said I, I think the less you have to do with him the better.
 
 But it is not easy to have the last word with a man like Namu.  He was
 ready in a moment with an illustration.  Misi, said he, you have told
 me there were wise men, not pastors, not even holy, who knew many things
 useful to be taughtabout trees for instance, and beasts, and to print
 books, and about the stones that are burned to make knives of.  Such men
 teach you in your college, and you learn from them, but take care not to
 learn to be unholy.  Misi, Case is my college.
 
 I knew not what to say.  Mr. Vigours had evidently been driven out of
 Fales by the machinations of Case and with something not very unlike the
 collusion of my pastor.  I called to mind it was Namu who had reassured
 me about Adams and traced the rumour to the ill-will of the priest.  And
 I saw I must inform myself more thoroughly from an impartial source.
 There is an old rascal of a chief here, Faiaso, whom I dare say you saw
 to-day at the council; he has been all his life turbulent and sly, a
 great fomenter of rebellions, and a thorn in the side of the mission and
 the island.  For all that he is very shrewd, and, except in politics or
 about his own misdemeanours, a teller of the truth.  I went to his house,
 told him what I had heard, and besought him to be frank.  I do not think
 I had ever a more painful interview.  Perhaps you will understand me, Mr.
 Wiltshire, if I tell you that I am perfectly serious in these old wives
 tales with which you reproached me, and as anxious to do well for these
 islands as you can be to please and to protect your pretty wife.  And you
 are to remember that I thought Namu a paragon, and was proud of the man
 as one of the first ripe fruits of the mission.  And now I was informed
 that he had fallen in a sort of dependence upon Case.  The beginning of
 it was not corrupt; it began, doubtless, in fear and respect, produced by
 trickery and pretence; but I was shocked to find that another element had
 been lately added, that Namu helped himself in the store, and was
 believed to be deep in Cases debt.  Whatever the trader said, that Namu
 believed with trembling.  He was not alone in this; many in the village
 lived in a similar subjection; but Namus case was the most influential,
 it was through Namu Case had wrought most evil; and with a certain
 following among the chiefs, and the pastor in his pocket, the man was as
 good as master of the village.  You know something of Vigours and Adams,
 but perhaps you have never heard of old Underhill, Adams predecessor.
 He was a quiet, mild old fellow, I remember, and we were told he had died
 suddenly: white men die very suddenly in Fales.  The truth, as I now
 heard it, made my blood run cold.  It seems he was struck with a general
 palsy, all of him dead but one eye, which he continually winked.  Word
 was started that the helpless old man was now a devil, and this vile
 fellow Case worked upon the natives fears, which he professed to share,
 and pretended he durst not go into the house alone.  At last a grave was
 dug, and the living body buried at the far end of the village.  Namu, my
 pastor, whom I had helped to educate, offered up a prayer at the hateful
 scene.
 
 I felt myself in a very difficult position.  Perhaps it was my duty to
 have denounced Namu and had him deposed.  Perhaps I think so now, but at
 the time it seemed less clear.  He had a great influence, it might prove
 greater than mine.  The natives are prone to superstition; perhaps by
 stirring them up I might but ingrain and spread these dangerous fancies.
 And Namu besides, apart from this novel and accursed influence, was a
 good pastor, an able man, and spiritually minded.  Where should I look
 for a better?  How was I to find as good?  At that moment, with Namus
 failure fresh in my view, the work of my life appeared a mockery; hope
 was dead in me.  I would rather repair such tools as I had than go abroad
 in quest of others that must certainly prove worse; and a scandal is, at
 the best, a thing to be avoided when humanly possible.  Right or wrong,
 then, I determined on a quiet course.  All that night I denounced and
 reasoned with the erring pastor, twitted him with his ignorance and want
 of faith, twitted him with his wretched attitude, making clean the
 outside of the cup and platter, callously helping at a murder, childishly
 flying in excitement about a few childish, unnecessary, and inconvenient
 gestures; and long before day I had him on his knees and bathed in the
 tears of what seemed a genuine repentance.  On Sunday I took the pulpit
 in the morning, and preached from First Kings, nineteenth, on the fire,
 the earthquake, and the voice, distinguishing the true spiritual power,
 and referring with such plainness as I dared to recent events in Fales.
 The effect produced was great, and it was much increased when Namu rose
 in his turn and confessed that he had been wanting in faith and conduct,
 and was convinced of sin.  So far, then, all was well; but there was one
 unfortunate circumstance.  It was nearing the time of our May in the
 island, when the native contributions to the missions are received; it
 fell in my duty to make a notification on the subject, and this gave my
 enemy his chance, by which he was not slow to profit.
 
 News of the whole proceedings must have been carried to Case as soon as
 church was over, and the same afternoon he made an occasion to meet me in
 the midst of the village.  He came up with so much intentness and
 animosity that I felt it would be damaging to avoid him.
 
 So, says he, in native, here is the holy man.  He has been preaching
 against me, but that was not in his heart.  He has been preaching upon
 the love of God; but that was not in his heart, it was between his teeth.
 Will you know what was in his heart?cries he.  I will show it you!
 And, making a snatch at my head, he made believe to pluck out a dollar,
 and held it in the air.
 
 There went that rumour through the crowd with which Polynesians receive
 a prodigy.  As for myself, I stood amazed.  The thing was a common
 conjuring trick which I have seen performed at home a score of times; but
 how was I to convince the villagers of that?  I wished I had learned
 legerdemain instead of Hebrew, that I might have paid the fellow out with
 his own coin.  But there I was; I could not stand there silent, and the
 best I could find to say was weak.
 
 I will trouble you not to lay hands on me again, said I.
 
 I have no such thought, said he, nor will I deprive you of your
 dollar.  Here it is, he said, and flung it at my feet.  I am told it lay
 where it fell three days.
 
 I must say it was well played, said I.
 
 O! he is clever, said Mr. Tarleton, and you can now see for yourself
 how dangerous.  He was a party to the horrid death of the paralytic; he
 is accused of poisoning Adams; he drove Vigours out of the place by lies
 that might have led to murder; and there is no question but he has now
 made up his mind to rid himself of you.  How he means to try we have no
 guess; only be sure, its something new.  There is no end to his
 readiness and invention.
 
 He gives himself a sight of trouble, says I.  And after all, what
 for?
 
 Why, how many tons of copra may they make in this district? asked the
 missionary.
 
 I daresay as much as sixty tons, says I.
 
 And what is the profit to the local trader? he asked.
 
 You may call it, three pounds, said I.
 
 Then you can reckon for yourself how much he does it for, said Mr.
 Tarleton.  But the more important thing is to defeat him.  It is clear
 he spread some report against Uma, in order to isolate and have his
 wicked will of her.  Failing of that, and seeing a new rival come upon
 the scene, he used her in a different way.  Now, the first point to find
 out is about Namu.  Uma, when people began to leave you and your mother
 alone, what did Namu do?
 
 Stop away all-e-same, says Uma.
 
 I fear the dog has returned to his vomit, said Mr. Tarleton.  And now
 what am I to do for you?  I will speak to Namu, I will warn him he is
 observed; it will be strange if he allow anything to go on amiss when he
 is put upon his guard.  At the same time, this precaution may fail, and
 then you must turn elsewhere.  You have two people at hand to whom you
 might apply.  There is, first of all, the priest, who might protect you
 by the Catholic interest; they are a wretchedly small body, but they
 count two chiefs.  And then there is old Faiaso.  Ah! if it had been some
 years ago you would have needed no one else; but his influence is much
 reduced, it has gone into Maeas hands, and Maea, I fear, is one of
 Cases jackals.  In fine, if the worst comes to the worst, you must send
 up or come yourself to Fale-alii, and, though I am not due at this end of
 the island for a month, I will just see what can be done.
 
 So Mr. Tarleton said farewell; and half an hour later the crew were
 singing and the paddles flashing in the missionary-boat.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.  DEVIL-WORK.
 
 
 Near a month went by without much doing.  The same night of our marriage
 Galoshes called round, and made himself mighty civil, and got into a
 habit of dropping in about dark and smoking his pipe with the family.  He
 could talk to Uma, of course, and started to teach me native and French
 at the same time.  He was a kind old buffer, though the dirtiest you
 would wish to see, and he muddled me up with foreign languages worse than
 the tower of Babel.
 
 That was one employment we had, and it made me feel less lonesome; but
 there was no profit in the thing, for though the priest came and sat and
 yarned, none of his folks could be enticed into my store; and if it
 hadnt been for the other occupation I struck out, there wouldnt have
 been a pound of copra in the house.  This was the idea: Faavao (Umas
 mother) had a score of bearing trees.  Of course we could get no labour,
 being all as good as tabooed, and the two women and I turned to and made
 copra with our own hands.  It was copra to make your mouth water when it
 was doneI never understood how much the natives cheated me till I had
 made that four hundred pounds of my own handand it weighed so light I
 felt inclined to take and water it myself.
 
 When we were at the job a good many Kanakas used to put in the best of
 the day looking on, and once that nigger turned up.  He stood back with
 the natives and laughed and did the big don and the funny dog, till I
 began to get riled.
 
 Here, you nigger! says I.
 
 I dont address myself to you, Sah, says the nigger.  Only speak to
 genleum.
 
 I know, says I, but it happens I was addressing myself to you, Mr.
 Black Jack.  And all I want to know is just this: did you see Cases
 figurehead about a week ago?
 
 No, Sah, says he.
 
 Thats all right, then, says I; for Ill show you the own brother to
 it, only black, in the inside of about two minutes.
 
 And I began to walk towards him, quite slow, and my hands down; only
 there was trouble in my eye, if anybody took the pains to look.
 
 Youre a low, obstropulous fellow, Sah, says he.
 
 You bet! says I.
 
 By that time he thought I was about as near as convenient, and lit out so
 it would have done your heart good to see him travel.  And that was all I
 saw of that precious gang until what I am about to tell you.
 
 It was one of my chief employments these days to go pot-hunting in the
 woods, which I found (as Case had told me) very rich in game.  I have
 spoken of the cape which shut up the village and my station from the
 east.  A path went about the end of it, and led into the next bay.  A
 strong wind blew here daily, and as the line of the barrier reef stopped
 at the end of the cape, a heavy surf ran on the shores of the bay.  A
 little cliffy hill cut the valley in two parts, and stood close on the
 beach; and at high water the sea broke right on the face of it, so that
 all passage was stopped.  Woody mountains hemmed the place all round; the
 barrier to the east was particularly steep and leafy, the lower parts of
 it, along the sea, falling in sheer black cliffs streaked with cinnabar;
 the upper part lumpy with the tops of the great trees.  Some of the trees
 were bright green, and some red, and the sand of the beach as black as
 your shoes.  Many birds hovered round the bay, some of them snow-white;
 and the flying-fox (or vampire) flew there in broad daylight, gnashing
 its teeth.
 
 For a long while I came as far as this shooting, and went no farther.
 There was no sign of any path beyond, and the cocoa-palms in the front of
 the foot of the valley were the last this way.  For the whole eye of
 the island, as natives call the windward end, lay desert.  From Fales
 round about to Papa-malulu, there was neither house, nor man, nor planted
 fruit-tree; and the reef being mostly absent, and the shores bluff, the
 sea beat direct among crags, and there was scarce a landing-place.
 
 I should tell you that after I began to go in the woods, although no one
 offered to come near my store, I found people willing enough to pass the
 time of day with me where nobody could see them; and as I had begun to
 pick up native, and most of them had a word or two of English, I began to
 hold little odds and ends of conversation, not to much purpose to be
 sure, but they took off the worst of the feeling, for its a miserable
 thing to be made a leper of.
 
 It chanced one day towards the end of the month, that I was sitting in
 this bay in the edge of the bush, looking east, with a Kanaka.  I had
 given him a fill of tobacco, and we were making out to talk as best we
 could; indeed, he had more English than most.
 
 I asked him if there was no road going eastward.
 
 One time one road, said he.  Now he dead.
 
 Nobody he go there? I asked.
 
 No good, said he.  Too much devil he stop there.
 
 Oho! says I, got-um plenty devil, that bush?
 
 Man devil, woman devil; too much devil, said my friend.  Stop there
 all-e-time.  Man he go there, no come back.
 
 I thought if this fellow was so well posted on devils and spoke of them
 so free, which is not common, I had better fish for a little information
 about myself and Uma.
 
 You think me one devil? I asked.
 
 No think devil, said he soothingly.  Think all-e-same fool.
 
 Uma, she devil? I asked again.
 
 No, no; no devil.  Devil stop bush, said the young man.
 
 I was looking in front of me across the bay, and I saw the hanging front
 of the woods pushed suddenly open, and Case, with a gun in his hand, step
 forth into the sunshine on the black beach.  He was got up in light
 pyjamas, near white, his gun sparkled, he looked mighty conspicuous; and
 the land-crabs scuttled from all round him to their holes.
 
 Hullo, my friend! says I, you no talk all-e-same true.  Ese he go, he
 come back.
 
 Ese no all-e-same; Ese _Tiapolo_, says my friend; and, with a
 Good-bye, slunk off among the trees.
 
 I watched Case all round the beach, where the tide was low; and let him
 pass me on the homeward way to Fales.  He was in deep thought, and the
 birds seemed to know it, trotting quite near him on the sand, or wheeling
 and calling in his ears.  When he passed me I could see by the working of
 his lips that he was talking to himself, and what pleased me mightily, he
 had still my trade mark on his brow, I tell you the plain truth: I had a
 mind to give him a gunful in his ugly mug, but I thought better of it.
 
 All this time, and all the time I was following home, I kept repeating
 that native word, which I remembered by Polly, put the kettle on and
 make us all some tea, tea-a-pollo.
 
 Uma, says I, when I got back, what does _Tiapolo_ mean?
 
 Devil, says she.
 
 I thought _aitu_ was the word for that, I said.
 
 _Aitu_ nother kind of devil, said she; stop bush, eat Kanaka.
 Tiapolo big chief devil, stop home; all-e-same Christian devil.
 
 Well then, said I, Im no farther forward.  How can Case be Tiapolo?
 
 No all-e-same, said she.  Ese belong Tiapolo; Tiapolo too much like;
 Ese all-e-same his son.  Suppose Ese he wish something, Tiapolo he make
 him.
 
 Thats mighty convenient for Ese, says I.  And what kind of things
 does he make for him?
 
 Well, out came a rigmarole of all sorts of stories, many of which (like
 the dollar he took from Mr. Tarletons head) were plain enough to me, but
 others I could make nothing of; and the thing that most surprised the
 Kanakas was what surprised me leastnamely, that he would go in the
 desert among all the _aitus_.  Some of the boldest, however, had
 accompanied him, and had heard him speak with the dead and give them
 orders, and, safe in his protection, had returned unscathed.  Some said
 he had a church there, where he worshipped Tiapolo, and Tiapolo appeared
 to him; others swore that there was no sorcery at all, that he performed
 his miracles by the power of prayer, and the church was no church, but a
 prison, in which he had confined a dangerous _aitu_.  Namu had been in
 the bush with him once, and returned glorifying God for these wonders.
 Altogether, I began to have a glimmer of the mans position, and the
 means by which he had acquired it, and, though I saw he was a tough nut
 to crack, I was noways cast down.
 
 Very well, said I, Ill have a look at Master Cases place of worship
 myself, and well see about the glorifying.
 
 At this Uma fell in a terrible taking; if I went in the high bush I
 should never return; none could go there but by the protection of
 Tiapolo.
 
 Ill chance it on Gods, said I.  Im a good sort of a fellow, Uma, as
 fellows go, and I guess Godll con me through.
 
 She was silent for a while.  I think, said she, mighty solemnand then,
 presentlyVictoreea, he big chief?
 
 You bet! said I.
 
 He like you too much? she asked again.
 
 I told her, with a grin, I believed the old lady was rather partial to
 me.
 
 All right, said she.  Victoreea he big chief, like you too much.  No
 can help you here in Fales; no can dotoo far off.  Maea he small
 chiefstop here.  Suppose he like youmake you all right.  All-e-same God
 and Tiapolo.  God he big chiefgot too much work.  Tiapolo he small
 chiefhe like too much make-see, work very hard.
 
 Ill have to hand you over to Mr. Tarleton, said I.  Your theologys
 out of its bearings, Uma.
 
 However, we stuck to this business all the evening, and, with the stories
 she told me of the desert and its dangers, she came near frightening
 herself into a fit.  I dont remember half a quarter of them, of course,
 for I paid little heed; but two come back to me kind of clear.
 
 About six miles up the coast there is a sheltered cove they call
 _Fanga-anaana_the haven full of caves.  Ive seen it from the sea
 myself, as near as I could get my boys to venture in; and its a little
 strip of yellow sand.  Black cliffs overhang it, full of the black mouths
 of caves; great trees overhang the cliffs, and dangle-down lianas; and in
 one place, about the middle, a big brook pours over in a cascade.  Well,
 there was a boat going by here, with six young men of Fales, all very
 pretty, Uma said, which was the loss of them.  It blew strong, there was
 a heavy head sea, and by the time they opened Fanga-anaana, and saw the
 white cascade and the shady beach, they were all tired and thirsty, and
 their water had run out.  One proposed to land and get a drink, and,
 being reckless fellows, they were all of the same mind except the
 youngest.  Lotu was his name; he was a very good young gentleman, and
 very wise; and he held out that they were crazy, telling them the place
 was given over to spirits and devils and the dead, and there were no
 living folk nearer than six miles the one way, and maybe twelve the
 other.  But they laughed at his words, and, being five to one, pulled in,
 beached the boat, and landed.  It was a wonderful pleasant place, Lotu
 said, and the water excellent.  They walked round the beach, but could
 see nowhere any way to mount the cliffs, which made them easier in their
 mind; and at last they sat down to make a meal on the food they had
 brought with them.  They were scarce set, when there came out of the
 mouth of one of the black caves six of the most beautiful ladies ever
 seen: they had flowers in their hair, and the most beautiful breasts, and
 necklaces of scarlet seeds; and began to jest with these young gentlemen,
 and the young gentlemen to jest back with them, all but Lotu.  As for
 Lotu, he saw there could be no living woman in such a place, and ran, and
 flung himself in the bottom of the boat, and covered his face, and
 prayed.  All the time the business lasted Lotu made one clean break of
 prayer, and that was all he knew of it, until his friends came back, and
 made him sit up, and they put to sea again out of the bay, which was now
 quite desert, and no word of the six ladies.  But, what frightened Lotu
 most, not one of the five remembered anything of what had passed, but
 they were all like drunken men, and sang and laughed in the boat, and
 skylarked.  The wind freshened and came squally, and the sea rose
 extraordinary high; it was such weather as any man in the islands would
 have turned his back to and fled home to Fales; but these five were like
 crazy folk, and cracked on all sail and drove their boat into the seas.
 Lotu went to the bailing; none of the others thought to help him, but
 sang and skylarked and carried on, and spoke singular things beyond a
 mans comprehension, and laughed out loud when they said them.  So the
 rest of the day Lotu bailed for his life in the bottom of the boat, and
 was all drenched with sweat and cold sea-water; and none heeded him.
 Against all expectation, they came safe in a dreadful tempest to
 Papa-malulu, where the palms were singing out, and the cocoa-nuts flying
 like cannon-balls about the village green; and the same night the five
 young gentlemen sickened, and spoke never a reasonable word until they
 died.
 
 And do you mean to tell me you can swallow a yarn like that? I asked.
 
 She told me the thing was well known, and with handsome young men alone
 it was even common; but this was the only case where five had been slain
 the same day and in a company by the love of the women-devils; and it had
 made a great stir in the island, and she would be crazy if she doubted.
 
 Well, anyway, says I, you neednt be frightened about me.  Ive no use
 for the women-devils.  Youre all the women I want, and all the devil
 too, old lady.
 
 To this she answered there were other sorts, and she had seen one with
 her own eyes.  She had gone one day alone to the next bay, and, perhaps,
 got too near the margin of the bad place.  The boughs of the high bush
 overshadowed her from the cant of the hill, but she herself was outside
 on a flat place, very stony and growing full of young mummy-apples four
 and five feet high.  It was a dark day in the rainy season, and now there
 came squalls that tore off the leaves and sent them flying, and now it
 was all still as in a house.  It was in one of these still times that a
 whole gang of birds and flying foxes came pegging out of the bush like
 creatures frightened.  Presently after she heard a rustle nearer hand,
 and saw, coming out of the margin of the trees, among the mummy-apples,
 the appearance of a lean grey old boar.  It seemed to think as it came,
 like a person; and all of a sudden, as she looked at it coming, she was
 aware it was no boar but a thing that was a man with a mans thoughts.
 At that she ran, and the pig after her, and as the pig ran it hollad
 aloud, so that the place rang with it.
 
 I wish I had been there with my gun, said I.  I guess that pig would
 have hollad so as to surprise himself.
 
 But she told me a gun was of no use with the like of these, which were
 the spirits of the dead.
 
 Well, this kind of talk put in the evening, which was the best of it; but
 of course it didnt change my notion, and the next day, with my gun and a
 good knife, I set off upon a voyage of discovery.  I made, as near as I
 could, for the place where I had seen Case come out; for if it was true
 he had some kind of establishment in the bush I reckoned I should find a
 path.  The beginning of the desert was marked off by a wall, to call it
 so, for it was more of a long mound of stones.  They say it reaches right
 across the island, but how they know it is another question, for I doubt
 if anyone has made the journey in a hundred years, the natives sticking
 chiefly to the sea and their little colonies along the coast, and that
 part being mortal high and steep and full of cliffs.  Up to the west side
 of the wall, the ground has been cleared, and there are cocoa palms and
 mummy-apples and guavas, and lots of sensitive plants.  Just across, the
 bush begins outright; high bush at that, trees going up like the masts of
 ships, and ropes of liana hanging down like a ships rigging, and nasty
 orchids growing in the forks like funguses.  The ground where there was
 no underwood looked to be a heap of boulders.  I saw many green pigeons
 which I might have shot, only I was there with a different idea.  A
 number of butterflies flopped up and down along the ground like dead
 leaves; sometimes I would hear a bird calling, sometimes the wind
 overhead, and always the sea along the coast.
 
 But the queerness of the place its more difficult to tell of, unless to
 one who has been alone in the high bush himself.  The brightest kind of a
 day it is always dim down there.  A man can see to the end of nothing;
 whichever way he looks the wood shuts up, one bough folding with another
 like the fingers of your hand; and whenever he listens he hears always
 something newmen talking, children laughing, the strokes of an axe a far
 way ahead of him, and sometimes a sort of a quick, stealthy scurry near
 at hand that makes him jump and look to his weapons.  Its all very well
 for him to tell himself that hes alone, bar trees and birds; he cant
 make out to believe it; whichever way he turns the whole place seems to
 be alive and looking on.  Dont think it was Umas yarns that put me out;
 I dont value native talk a fourpenny-piece; its a thing thats natural
 in the bush, and thats the end of it.
 
 As I got near the top of the hill, for the ground of the wood goes up in
 this place steep as a ladder, the wind began to sound straight on, and
 the leaves to toss and switch open and let in the sun.  This suited me
 better; it was the same noise all the time, and nothing to startle.
 Well, I had got to a place where there was an underwood of what they call
 wild cocoanutmighty pretty with its scarlet fruitwhen there came a
 sound of singing in the wind that I thought I had never heard the like
 of.  It was all very fine to tell myself it was the branches; I knew
 better.  It was all very fine to tell myself it was a bird; I knew never
 a bird that sang like that.  It rose and swelled, and died away and
 swelled again; and now I thought it was like someone weeping, only
 prettier; and now I thought it was like harps; and there was one thing I
 made sure of, it was a sight too sweet to be wholesome in a place like
 that.  You may laugh if you like; but I declare I called to mind the six
 young ladies that came, with their scarlet necklaces, out of the cave at
 Fanga-anaana, and wondered if they sang like that.  We laugh at the
 natives and their superstitions; but see how many traders take them up,
 splendidly educated white men, that have been book-keepers (some of them)
 and clerks in the old country.  Its my belief a superstition grows up in
 a place like the different kind of weeds; and as I stood there and
 listened to that wailing I twittered in my shoes.
 
 You may call me a coward to be frightened; I thought myself brave enough
 to go on ahead.  But I went mighty carefully, with my gun cocked, spying
 all about me like a hunter, fully expecting to see a handsome young woman
 sitting somewhere in the bush, and fully determined (if I did) to try her
 with a charge of duck-shot.  And sure enough, I had not gone far when I
 met with a queer thing.  The wind came on the top of the wood in a strong
 puff, the leaves in front of me burst open, and I saw for a second
 something hanging in a tree.  It was gone in a wink, the puff blowing by
 and the leaves closing.  I tell you the truth: I had made up my mind to
 see an _aitu_; and if the thing had looked like a pig or a woman, it
 wouldnt have given me the same turn.  The trouble was that it seemed
 kind of square, and the idea of a square thing that was alive and sang
 knocked me sick and silly.  I must have stood quite a while; and I made
 pretty certain it was right out of the same tree that the singing came.
 Then I began to come to myself a bit.
 
 Well, says I, if this is really so, if this is a place where there are
 square things that sing, Im gone up anyway.  Lets have my fun for my
 money.
 
 But I thought I might as well take the off chance of a prayer being any
 good; so I plumped on my knees and prayed out loud; and all the time I
 was praying the strange sounds came out of the tree, and went up and
 down, and changed, for all the world like music, only you could see it
 wasnt humanthere was nothing there that you could whistle.
 
 As soon as I had made an end in proper style, I laid down my gun, stuck
 my knife between my teeth, walked right up to that tree, and began to
 climb.  I tell you my heart was like ice.  But presently, as I went up, I
 caught another glimpse of the thing, and that relieved me, for I thought
 it seemed like a box; and when I had got right up to it I near fell out
 of the tree with laughing.
 
 A box it was, sure enough, and a candle-box at that, with the brand upon
 the side of it; and it had banjo strings stretched so as to sound when
 the wind blew.  I believe they call the thing a Tyrolean {3} harp,
 whatever that may mean.
 
 Well, Mr. Case, said I, youve frightened me once, but I defy you to
 frighten me again, I says, and slipped down the tree, and set out again
 to find my enemys head office, which I guessed would not be far away.
 
 The undergrowth was thick in this part; I couldnt see before my nose,
 and must burst my way through by main force and ply the knife as I went,
 slicing the cords of the lianas and slashing down whole trees at a blow.
 I call them trees for the bigness, but in truth they were just big weeds,
 and sappy to cut through like carrot.  From all this crowd and kind of
 vegetation, I was just thinking to myself, the place might have once been
 cleared, when I came on my nose over a pile of stones, and saw in a
 moment it was some kind of a work of man.  The Lord knows when it was
 made or when deserted, for this part of the island has lain undisturbed
 since long before the whites came.  A few steps beyond I hit into the
 path I had been always looking for.  It was narrow, but well beaten, and
 I saw that Case had plenty of disciples.  It seems, indeed, it was a
 piece of fashionable boldness to venture up here with the trader, and a
 young man scarce reckoned himself grown till he had got his breech
 tattooed, for one thing, and seen Cases devils for another.  This is
 mighty like Kanakas; but, if you look at it another way, its mighty like
 white folks too.
 
 A bit along the path I was brought to a clear stand, and had to rub my
 eyes.  There was a wall in front of me, the path passing it by a gap; it
 was tumbledown and plainly very old, but built of big stones very well
 laid; and there is no native alive to-day upon that island that could
 dream of such a piece of building.  Along all the top of it was a line of
 queer figures, idols or scarecrows, or what not.  They had carved and
 painted faces ugly to view, their eyes and teeth were of shell, their
 hair and their bright clothes blew in the wind, and some of them worked
 with the tugging.  There are islands up west where they make these kind
 of figures till to-day; but if ever they were made in this island, the
 practice and the very recollection of it are now long forgotten.  And the
 singular thing was that all these bogies were as fresh as toys out of a
 shop.
 
 Then it came in my mind that Case had let out to me the first day that he
 was a good forger of island curiosities, a thing by which so many traders
 turn an honest penny.  And with that I saw the whole business, and how
 this display served the man a double purpose: first of all, to season his
 curiosities, and then to frighten those that came to visit him.
 
 But I should tell you (what made the thing more curious) that all the
 time the Tyrolean harps were harping round me in the trees, and even
 while I looked, a green-and-yellow bird (that, I suppose, was building)
 began to tear the hair off the head of one of the figures.
 
 A little farther on I found the best curiosity of the museum.  The first
 I saw of it was a longish mound of earth with a twist to it.  Digging off
 the earth with my hands, I found underneath tarpaulin stretched on
 boards, so that this was plainly the roof of a cellar.  It stood right on
 the top of the hill, and the entrance was on the far side, between two
 rocks, like the entrance to a cave.  I went as far in as the bend, and,
 looking round the corner, saw a shining face.  It was big and ugly, like
 a pantomime mask, and the brightness of it waxed and dwindled, and at
 times it smoked.
 
 Oho! says I, luminous paint!
 
 And I must say I rather admired the mans ingenuity.  With a box of tools
 and a few mighty simple contrivances he had made out to have a devil of a
 temple.  Any poor Kanaka brought up here in the dark, with the harps
 whining all round him, and shown that smoking face in the bottom of a
 hole, would make no kind of doubt but he had seen and heard enough devils
 for a lifetime.  Its easy to find out what Kanakas think.  Just go back
 to yourself any way round from ten to fifteen years old, and theres an
 average Kanaka.  There are some pious, just as there are pious boys; and
 the most of them, like the boys again, are middling honest and yet think
 it rather larks to steal, and are easy scared and rather like to be so.
 I remember a boy I was at school with at home who played the Case
 business.  He didnt know anything, that boy; he couldnt do anything; he
 had no luminous paint and no Tyrolean harps; he just boldly said he was a
 sorcerer, and frightened us out of our boots, and we loved it.  And then
 it came in my mind how the master had once flogged that boy, and the
 surprise we were all in to see the sorcerer catch it and bum like anybody
 else.  Thinks I to myself, I must find some way of fixing it so for
 Master Case.  And the next moment I had my idea.
 
 I went back by the path, which, when once you had found it, was quite
 plain and easy walking; and when I stepped out on the black sands, who
 should I see but Master Case himself.  I cocked my gun and held it handy,
 and we marched up and passed without a word, each keeping the tail of his
 eye on the other; and no sooner had we passed than we each wheeled round
 like fellows drilling, and stood face to face.  We had each taken the
 same notion in his head, you see, that the other fellow might give him
 the load of his gun in the stern.
 
 Youve shot nothing, says Case.
 
 Im not on the shoot to-day, said I.
 
 Well, the devil go with you for me, says he.
 
 The same to you, says I.
 
 But we stuck just the way we were; no fear of either of us moving.
 
 Case laughed.  We cant stop here all day, though, said he.
 
 Dont let me detain you, says I.
 
 He laughed again.  Look here, Wiltshire, do you think me a fool? he
 asked.
 
 More of a knave, if you want to know, says I.
 
 Well, do you think it would better me to shoot you here, on this open
 beach? said he.  Because I dont.  Folks come fishing every day.  There
 may be a score of them up the valley now, making copra; there might be
 half a dozen on the hill behind you, after pigeons; they might be
 watching us this minute, and I shouldnt wonder.  I give you my word I
 dont want to shoot you.  Why should I?  You dont hinder me any.  You
 havent got one pound of copra but what you made with your own hands,
 like a negro slave.  Youre vegetatingthats what I call itand I dont
 care where you vegetate, nor yet how long.  Give me your word you dont
 mean to shoot me, and Ill give you a lead and walk away.
 
 Well, said I, Youre frank and pleasant, aint you?  And Ill be the
 same.  I dont mean to shoot you to-day.  Why should I?  This business is
 beginning; it aint done yet, Mr. Case.  Ive given you one turn already;
 I can see the marks of my knuckles on your head to this blooming hour,
 and Ive more cooking for you.  Im not a paralee, like Underhill.  My
 name aint Adams, and it aint Vigours; and I mean to show you that
 youve met your match.
 
 This is a silly way to talk, said he.  This is not the talk to make me
 move on with.
 
 All right, said I, stay where you are.  I aint in any hurry, and you
 know it.  I can put in a day on this beach and never mind.  I aint got
 any copra to bother with.  I aint got any luminous paint to see to.
 
 I was sorry I said that last, but it whipped out before I knew.  I could
 see it took the wind out of his sails, and he stood and stared at me with
 his brow drawn up.  Then I suppose he made up his mind he must get to the
 bottom of this.
 
 I take you at your word, says he, and turned his back, and walked right
 into the devils bush.
 
 I let him go, of course, for I had passed my word.  But I watched him as
 long as he was in sight, and after he was gone lit out for cover as
 lively as you would want to see, and went the rest of the way home under
 the bush, for I didnt trust him sixpence-worth.  One thing I saw, I had
 been ass enough to give him warning, and that which I meant to do I must
 do at once.
 
 You would think I had had about enough excitement for one morning, but
 there was another turn waiting me.  As soon as I got far enough round the
 cape to see my house I made out there were strangers there; a little
 farther, and no doubt about it.  There was a couple of armed sentinels
 squatting at my door.  I could only suppose the trouble about Uma must
 have come to a head, and the station been seized.  For aught I could
 think, Uma was taken up already, and these armed men were waiting to do
 the like with me.
 
 However, as I came nearer, which I did at top speed, I saw there was a
 third native sitting on the verandah like a guest, and Uma was talking
 with him like a hostess.  Nearer still I made out it was the big young
 chief, Maea, and that he was smiling away and smoking.  And what was he
 smoking?  None of your European cigarettes fit for a cat, not even the
 genuine big, knock-me-down native article that a fellow can really put in
 the time with if his pipe is brokebut a cigar, and one of my Mexicans at
 that, that I could swear to.  At sight of this my heart started beating,
 and I took a wild hope in my head that the trouble was over, and Maea had
 come round.
 
 Uma pointed me out to him as I came up, and he met me at the head of my
 own stairs like a thorough gentleman.
 
 Vilivili, said he, which was the best they could make of my name, I
 pleased.
 
 There is no doubt when an island chief wants to be civil he can do it.  I
 saw the way things were from the word go.  There was no call for Uma to
 say to me: He no fraid Ese now, come bring copra.  I tell you I shook
 hands with that Kanaka like as if he was the best white man in Europe.
 
 The fact was, Case and he had got after the same girl; or Maea suspected
 it, and concluded to make hay of the trader on the chance.  He had
 dressed himself up, got a couple of his retainers cleaned and armed to
 kind of make the thing more public, and, just waiting till Case was clear
 of the village, came round to put the whole of his business my way.  He
 was rich as well as powerful.  I suppose that man was worth fifty
 thousand nuts per annum.  I gave him the price of the beach and a quarter
 cent better, and as for credit, I would have advanced him the inside of
 the store and the fittings besides, I was so pleased to see him.  I must
 say he bought like a gentleman: rice and tins and biscuits enough for a
 weeks feast, and stuffs by the bolt.  He was agreeable besides; he had
 plenty fun to him; and we cracked jests together, mostly through the
 interpreter, because he had mighty little English, and my native was
 still off colour.  One thing I made out: he could never really have
 thought much harm of Uma; he could never have been really frightened, and
 must just have made believe from dodginess, and because he thought Case
 had a strong pull in the village and could help him on.
 
 This set me thinking that both he and I were in a tightish place.  What
 he had done was to fly in the face of the whole village, and the thing
 might cost him his authority.  More than that, after my talk with Case on
 the beach, I thought it might very well cost me my life.  Case had as
 good as said he would pot me if ever I got any copra; he would come home
 to find the best business in the village had changed hands; and the best
 thing I thought I could do was to get in first with the potting.
 
 See here, Uma, says I, tell him Im sorry I made him wait, but I was
 up looking at Cases Tiapolo store in the bush.
 
 He want savvy if you no fraid? translated Uma.
 
 I laughed out.  Not much! says I.  Tell him the place is a blooming
 toy-shop!  Tell him in England we give these things to the kids to play
 with.
 
 He want savvy if you hear devil sing? she asked next.
 
 Look here, I said, I cant do it now because Ive got no banjo-strings
 in stock; but the next time the ship comes round Ill have one of these
 same contraptions right here in my verandah, and he can see for himself
 how much devil there is to it.  Tell him, as soon as I can get the
 strings Ill make one for his picaninnies.  The name of the concern is a
 Tyrolean harp; and you can tell him the name means in English that nobody
 but dam-fools give a cent for it.
 
 This time he was so pleased he had to try his English again.  You talk
 true? says he.
 
 Rather! said I.  Talk all-e-same Bible.  Bring out a Bible here, Uma,
 if youve got such a thing, and Ill kiss it.  Or, Ill tell you whats
 better still, says I, taking a header, ask him if hes afraid to go up
 there himself by day.
 
 It appeared he wasnt; he could venture as far as that by day and in
 company.
 
 Thats the ticket, then! said I.  Tell him the mans a fraud and the
 place foolishness, and if hell go up there to-morrow hell see all
 thats left of it.  But tell him this, Uma, and mind he understands it:
 If he gets talking, its bound to come to Case, and Im a dead man!  Im
 playing his game, tell him, and if he says one word my blood will be at
 his door and be the damnation of him here and after.
 
 She told him, and he shook hands with me up to the hilt, and, says he:
 No talk.  Go up to-morrow.  You my friend?
 
 No sir, says I, no such foolishness.  Ive come here to trade, tell
 him, and not to make friends.  But, as to Case, Ill send that man to
 glory!
 
 So off Maea went, pretty well pleased, as I could see.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.  NIGHT IN THE BUSH.
 
 
 Well, I was committed now; Tiapolo had to be smashed up before next day,
 and my hands were pretty full, not only with preparations, but with
 argument.  My house was like a mechanics debating society: Uma was so
 made up that I shouldnt go into the bush by night, or that, if I did, I
 was never to come back again.  You know her style of arguing: youve had
 a specimen about Queen Victoria and the devil; and I leave you to fancy
 if I was tired of it before dark.
 
 At last I had a good idea.  What was the use of casting my pearls before
 her?  I thought; some of her own chopped hay would be likelier to do the
 business.
 
 Ill tell you what, then, said I.  You fish out your Bible, and Ill
 take that up along with me.  Thatll make me right.
 
 She swore a Bible was no use.
 
 Thats just your Kanaka ignorance, said I.  Bring the Bible out.
 
 She brought it, and I turned to the title-page, where I thought there
 would likely be some English, and so there was.  There! said I.  Look
 at that!  _London_: _Printed for the British and Foreign Bible Society_,
 _Blackfriars_, and the date, which I cant read, owing to its being in
 these Xs.  Theres no devil in hell can look near the Bible Society,
 Blackfriars.  Why, you silly!  I said, how do you suppose we get along
 with our own _aitus_ at home?  All Bible Society!
 
 I think you no got any, said she.  White man, he tell me you no got.
 
 Sounds likely, dont it? I asked.  Why would these islands all be
 chock full of them and none in Europe?
 
 Well, you no got breadfruit, said she.
 
 I could have torn my hair.  Now look here, old lady, said I, you dry
 up, for Im tired of you.  Ill take the Bible, whichll put me as
 straight as the mail, and thats the last word Ive got to say.
 
 The night fell extraordinary dark, clouds coming up with sundown and
 overspreading all; not a star showed; there was only an end of a moon,
 and that not due before the small hours.  Round the village, what with
 the lights and the fires in the open houses, and the torches of many
 fishers moving on the reef, it kept as gay as an illumination; but the
 sea and the mountains and woods were all clean gone.  I suppose it might
 be eight oclock when I took the road, laden like a donkey.  First there
 was that Bible, a book as big as your head, which I had let myself in for
 by my own tomfoolery.  Then there was my gun, and knife, and lantern, and
 patent matches, all necessary.  And then there was the real plant of the
 affair in hand, a mortal weight of gunpowder, a pair of dynamite
 fishing-bombs, and two or three pieces of slow match that I had hauled
 out of the tin cases and spliced together the best way I could; for the
 match was only trade stuff, and a man would be crazy that trusted it.
 Altogether, you see, I had the materials of a pretty good blow-up!
 Expense was nothing to me; I wanted that thing done right.
 
 As long as I was in the open, and had the lamp in my house to steer by, I
 did well.  But when I got to the path, it fell so dark I could make no
 headway, walking into trees and swearing there, like a man looking for
 the matches in his bed-room.  I knew it was risky to light up, for my
 lantern would be visible all the way to the point of the cape, and as no
 one went there after dark, it would be talked about, and come to Cases
 ears.  But what was I to do?  I had either to give the business over and
 lose caste with Maea, or light up, take my chance, and get through the
 thing the smartest I was able.
 
 As long as I was on the path I walked hard, but when I came to the black
 beach I had to run.  For the tide was now nearly flowed; and to get
 through with my powder dry between the surf and the steep hill, took all
 the quickness I possessed.  As it was, even, the wash caught me to the
 knees, and I came near falling on a stone.  All this time the hurry I was
 in, and the free air and smell of the sea, kept my spirits lively; but
 when I was once in the bush and began to climb the path I took it easier.
 The fearsomeness of the wood had been a good bit rubbed off for me by
 Master Cases banjo-strings and graven images, yet I thought it was a
 dreary walk, and guessed, when the disciples went up there, they must be
 badly scared.  The light of the lantern, striking among all these trunks
 and forked branches and twisted rope-ends of lianas, made the whole
 place, or all that you could see of it, a kind of a puzzle of turning
 shadows.  They came to meet you, solid and quick like giants, and then
 span off and vanished; they hove up over your head like clubs, and flew
 away into the night like birds.  The floor of the bush glimmered with
 dead wood, the way the match-box used to shine after you had struck a
 lucifer.  Big, cold drops fell on me from the branches overhead like
 sweat.  There was no wind to mention; only a little icy breath of a
 land-breeze that stirred nothing; and the harps were silent.
 
 The first landfall I made was when I got through the bush of wild
 cocoanuts, and came in view of the bogies on the wall.  Mighty queer they
 looked by the shining of the lantern, with their painted faces and shell
 eyes, and their clothes and their hair hanging.  One after another I
 pulled them all up and piled them in a bundle on the cellar roof, so as
 they might go to glory with the rest.  Then I chose a place behind one of
 the big stones at the entrance, buried my powder and the two shells, and
 arranged my match along the passage.  And then I had a look at the
 smoking head, just for good-bye.  It was doing fine.
 
 Cheer up, says I.  Youre booked.
 
 It was my first idea to light up and be getting homeward; for the
 darkness and the glimmer of the dead wood and the shadows of the lantern
 made me lonely.  But I knew where one of the harps hung; it seemed a pity
 it shouldnt go with the rest; and at the same time I couldnt help
 letting on to myself that I was mortal tired of my employment, and would
 like best to be at home and have the door shut.  I stepped out of the
 cellar and argued it fore and back.  There was a sound of the sea far
 down below me on the coast; nearer hand not a leaf stirred; I might have
 been the only living creature this side of Cape Horn.  Well, as I stood
 there thinking, it seemed the bush woke and became full of little noises.
 Little noises they were, and nothing to hurta bit of a crackle, a bit of
 a rushbut the breath jumped right out of me and my throat went as dry as
 a biscuit.  It wasnt Case I was afraid of, which would have been
 common-sense; I never thought of Case; what took me, as sharp as the
 colic, was the old wives tales, the devil-women and the man-pigs.  It
 was the toss of a penny whether I should run: but I got a purchase on
 myself, and stepped out, and held up the lantern (like a fool) and looked
 all round.
 
 In the direction of the village and the path there was nothing to be
 seen; but when I turned inland its a wonder to me I didnt drop.  There,
 coming right up out of the desert and the bad bushthere, sure enough,
 was a devil-woman, just as the way I had figured she would look.  I saw
 the light shine on her bare arms and her bright eyes, and there went out
 of me a yell so big that I thought it was my death.
 
 Ah!  No sing out! says the devil-woman, in a kind of a high whisper.
 Why you talk big voice?  Put out light!  Ese he come.
 
 My God Almighty, Uma, is that you? says I.
 
 _Ioe_, {4} says she.  I come quick.  Ese here soon.
 
 You come alone? I asked.  You no fraid?
 
 Ah, too much fraid! she whispered, clutching me.  I think die.
 
 Well, says I, with a kind of a weak grin, Im not the one to laugh at
 you, Mrs. Wiltshire, for Im about the worst scared man in the South
 Pacific myself.
 
 She told me in two words what brought her.  I was scarce gone, it seems,
 when Faavao came in, and the old woman had met Black Jack running as
 hard as he was fit from our house to Cases.  Uma neither spoke nor
 stopped, but lit right out to come and warn me.  She was so close at my
 heels that the lantern was her guide across the beach, and afterwards, by
 the glimmer of it in the trees, she got her line up hill.  It was only
 when I had got to the top or was in the cellar that she wandered Lord
 knows where! and lost a sight of precious time, afraid to call out lest
 Case was at the heels of her, and falling in the bush, so that she was
 all knocked and bruised.  That must have been when she got too far to the
 southward, and how she came to take me in the flank at last and frighten
 me beyond what Ive got the words to tell of.
 
 Well, anything was better than a devil-woman, but I thought her yarn
 serious enough.  Black Jack had no call to be about my house, unless he
 was set there to watch; and it looked to me as if my tomfool word about
 the paint, and perhaps some chatter of Maeas, had got us all in a clove
 hitch.  One thing was clear: Uma and I were here for the night; we
 darent try to go home before day, and even then it would be safer to
 strike round up the mountain and come in by the back of the village, or
 we might walk into an ambuscade.  It was plain, too, that the mine should
 be sprung immediately, or Case might be in time to stop it.
 
 I marched into the tunnel, Uma keeping tight hold of me, opened my
 lantern and lit the match.  The first length of it burned like a spill of
 paper, and I stood stupid, watching it burn, and thinking we were going
 aloft with Tiapolo, which was none of my views.  The second took to a
 better rate, though faster than I cared about; and at that I got my wits
 again, hauled Uma clear of the passage, blew out and dropped the lantern,
 and the pair of us groped our way into the bush until I thought it might
 be safe, and lay down together by a tree.
 
 Old lady, I said, I wont forget this night.  Youre a trump, and
 thats whats wrong with you.
 
 She humped herself close up to me.  She had run out the way she was, with
 nothing on her but her kilt; and she was all wet with the dews and the
 sea on the black beach, and shook straight on with cold and the terror of
 the dark and the devils.
 
 Too much fraid, was all she said.
 
 The far side of Cases hill goes down near as steep as a precipice into
 the next valley.  We were on the very edge of it, and I could see the
 dead wood shine and hear the sea sound far below.  I didnt care about
 the position, which left me no retreat, but I was afraid to change.  Then
 I saw I had made a worse mistake about the lantern, which I should have
 left lighted, so that I could have had a crack at Case when he stepped
 into the shine of it.  And even if I hadnt had the wit to do that, it
 seemed a senseless thing to leave the good lantern to blow up with the
 graven images.  The thing belonged to me, after all, and was worth money,
 and might come in handy.  If I could have trusted the match, I might have
 run in still and rescued it.  But who was going to trust the match?  You
 know what trade is.  The stuff was good enough for Kanakas to go fishing
 with, where theyve got to look lively anyway, and the most they risk is
 only to have their hand blown off.  But for anyone that wanted to fool
 around a blow-up like mine that match was rubbish.
 
 Altogether the best I could do was to lie still, see my shot-gun handy,
 and wait for the explosion.  But it was a solemn kind of a business.  The
 blackness of the night was like solid; the only thing you could see was
 the nasty bogy glimmer of the dead wood, and that showed you nothing but
 itself; and as for sounds, I stretched my ears till I thought I could
 have heard the match burn in the tunnel, and that bush was as silent as a
 coffin.  Now and then there was a bit of a crack; but whether it was near
 or far, whether it was Case stubbing his toes within a few yards of me,
 or a tree breaking miles away, I knew no more than the babe unborn.
 
 And then, all of a sudden, Vesuvius went off.  It was a long time coming;
 but when it came (though I say it that shouldnt) no man could ask to see
 a better.  At first it was just a son of a gun of a row, and a spout of
 fire, and the wood lighted up so that you could see to read.  And then
 the trouble began.  Uma and I were half buried under a wagonful of earth,
 and glad it was no worse, for one of the rocks at the entrance of the
 tunnel was fired clean into the air, fell within a couple of fathoms of
 where we lay, and bounded over the edge of the hill, and went pounding
 down into the next valley.  I saw I had rather undercalculated our
 distance, or over-done the dynamite and powder, which you please.
 
 And presently I saw I had made another slip.  The noise of the thing
 began to die off, shaking the island; the dazzle was over; and yet the
 night didnt come back the way I expected.  For the whole wood was
 scattered with red coals and brands from the explosion; they were all
 round me on the flat; some had fallen below in the valley, and some stuck
 and flared in the tree-tops.  I had no fear of fire, for these forests
 are too wet to kindle.  But the trouble was that the place was all lit
 up-not very bright, but good enough to get a shot by; and the way the
 coals were scattered, it was just as likely Case might have the advantage
 as myself.  I looked all round for his white face, you may be sure; but
 there was not a sign of him.  As for Uma, the life seemed to have been
 knocked right out of her by the bang and blaze of it.
 
 There was one bad point in my game.  One of the blessed graven images had
 come down all afire, hair and clothes and body, not four yards away from
 me.  I cast a mighty noticing glance all round; there was still no Case,
 and I made up my mind I must get rid of that burning stick before he
 came, or I should be shot there like a dog.
 
 It was my first idea to have crawled, and then I thought speed was the
 main thing, and stood half up to make a rush.  The same moment from
 somewhere between me and the sea there came a flash and a report, and a
 rifle bullet screeched in my ear.  I swung straight round and up with my
 gun, but the brute had a Winchester, and before I could as much as see
 him his second shot knocked me over like a nine-pin.  I seemed to fly in
 the air, then came down by the run and lay half a minute, silly; and then
 I found my hands empty, and my gun had flown over my head as I fell.  It
 makes a man mighty wide awake to be in the kind of box that I was in.  I
 scarcely knew where I was hurt, or whether I was hurt or not, but turned
 right over on my face to crawl after my weapon.  Unless you have tried to
 get about with a smashed leg you dont know what pain is, and I let out a
 howl like a bullocks.
 
 This was the unluckiest noise that ever I made in my life.  Up to then
 Uma had stuck to her tree like a sensible woman, knowing she would be
 only in the way; but as soon as she heard me sing out, she ran forward.
 The Winchester cracked again, and down she went.
 
 I had sat up, leg and all, to stop her; but when I saw her tumble I
 clapped down again where I was, lay still, and felt the handle of my
 knife.  I had been scurried and put out before.  No more of that for me.
 He had knocked over my girl, I had got to fix him for it; and I lay there
 and gritted my teeth, and footed up the chances.  My leg was broke, my
 gun was gone.  Case had still ten shots in his Winchester.  It looked a
 kind of hopeless business.  But I never despaired nor thought upon
 despairing: that man had got to go.
 
 For a goodish bit not one of us let on.  Then I heard Case begin to move
 nearer in the bush, but mighty careful.  The image had burned out; there
 were only a few coals left here and there, and the wood was main dark,
 but had a kind of a low glow in it like a fire on its last legs.  It was
 by this that I made out Cases head looking at me over a big tuft of
 ferns, and at the same time the brute saw me and shouldered his
 Winchester.  I lay quite still, and as good as looked into the barrel: it
 was my last chance, but I thought my heart would have come right out of
 its bearings.  Then he fired.  Lucky for me it was no shot-gun, for the
 bullet struck within an inch of me and knocked the dirt in my eyes.
 
 Just you try and see if you can lie quiet, and let a man take a sitting
 shot at you and miss you by a hair.  But I did, and lucky too.  A while
 Case stood with the Winchester at the port-arms; then he gave a little
 laugh to himself, and stepped round the ferns.
 
 Laugh! thought I.  If you had the wit of a louse you would be
 praying!
 
 I was all as taut as a ships hawser or the spring of a watch, and as
 soon as he came within reach of me I had him by the ankle, plucked the
 feet right out from under him, laid him out, and was upon the top of him,
 broken leg and all, before he breathed.  His Winchester had gone the same
 road as my shot-gun; it was nothing to meI defied him now.  Im a pretty
 strong man anyway, but I never knew what strength was till I got hold of
 Case.  He was knocked out of time by the rattle he came down with, and
 threw up his hands together, more like a frightened woman, so that I
 caught both of them with my left.  This wakened him up, and he fastened
 his teeth in my forearm like a weasel.  Much I cared.  My leg gave me all
 the pain I had any use for, and I drew my knife and got it in the place.
 
 Now, said I, Ive got you; and youre gone up, and a good job too!  Do
 you feel the point of that?  Thats for Underhill!  And theres for
 Adams!  And now heres for Uma, and thats going to knock your blooming
 soul right out of you!
 
 With that I gave him the cold steel for all I was worth.  His body kicked
 under me like a spring sofa; he gave a dreadful kind of a long moan, and
 lay still.
 
 I wonder if youre dead?  I hope so! I thought, for my head was
 swimming.  But I wasnt going to take chances; I had his own example too
 close before me for that; and I tried to draw the knife out to give it
 him again.  The blood came over my hands, I remember, hot as tea; and
 with that I fainted clean away, and fell with my head on the mans mouth.
 
 When I came to myself it was pitch dark; the cinders had burned out;
 there was nothing to be seen but the shine of the dead wood, and I
 couldnt remember where I was nor why I was in such pain nor what I was
 all wetted with.  Then it came back, and the first thing I attended to
 was to give him the knife again a half-a-dozen times up to the handle.  I
 believe he was dead already, but it did him no harm and did me good.
 
 I bet youre dead now, I said, and then I called to Uma.
 
 Nothing answered, and I made a move to go and grope for her, fouled my
 broken leg, and fainted again.
 
 When I came to myself the second time the clouds had all cleared away,
 except a few that sailed there, white as cotton.  The moon was upa
 tropic moon.  The moon at home turns a wood black, but even this old
 butt-end of a one showed up that forest, as green as by day.  The night
 birdsor, rather, theyre a kind of early morning birdsang out with
 their long, falling notes like nightingales.  And I could see the dead
 man, that I was still half resting on, looking right up into the sky with
 his open eyes, no paler than when he was alive; and a little way off Uma
 tumbled on her side.  I got over to her the best way I was able, and when
 I got there she was broad awake, and crying and sobbing to herself with
 no more noise than an insect.  It appears she was afraid to cry out loud,
 because of the _aitus_.  Altogether she was not much hurt, but scared
 beyond belief; she had come to her senses a long while ago, cried out to
 me, heard nothing in reply, made out we were both dead, and had lain
 there ever since, afraid to budge a finger.  The ball had ploughed up her
 shoulder, and she had lost a main quantity of blood; but I soon had that
 tied up the way it ought to be with the tail of my shirt and a scarf I
 had on, got her head on my sound knee and my back against a trunk, and
 settled down to wait for morning.  Uma was for neither use nor ornament,
 and could only clutch hold of me and shake and cry.  I dont suppose
 there was ever anybody worse scared, and, to do her justice, she had had
 a lively night of it.  As for me, I was in a good bit of pain and fever,
 but not so bad when I sat still; and every time I looked over to Case I
 could have sung and whistled.  Talk about meat and drink!  To see that
 man lying there dead as a herring filled me full.
 
 The night birds stopped after a while; and then the light began to
 change, the east came orange, the whole wood began to whirr with singing
 like a musical box, and there was the broad day.
 
 I didnt expect Maea for a long while yet; and, indeed, I thought there
 was an off-chance he might go back on the whole idea and not come at all.
 I was the better pleased when, about an hour after daylight, I heard
 sticks smashing and a lot of Kanakas laughing, and singing out to keep
 their courage up.  Uma sat up quite brisk at the first word of it; and
 presently we saw a party come stringing out of the path, Maea in front,
 and behind him a white man in a pith helmet.  It was Mr. Tarleton, who
 had turned up late last night in Fales, having left his boat and walked
 the last stage with a lantern.
 
 They buried Case upon the field of glory, right in the hole where he had
 kept the smoking head.  I waited till the thing was done; and Mr.
 Tarleton prayed, which I thought tomfoolery, but Im bound to say he gave
 a pretty sick view of the dear departeds prospects, and seemed to have
 his own ideas of hell.  I had it out with him afterwards, told him he had
 scamped his duty, and what he had ought to have done was to up like a man
 and tell the Kanakas plainly Case was damned, and a good riddance; but I
 never could get him to see it my way.  Then they made me a litter of
 poles and carried me down to the station.  Mr. Tarleton set my leg, and
 made a regular missionary splice of it, so that I limp to this day.  That
 done, he took down my evidence, and Umas, and Maeas, wrote it all out
 fine, and had us sign it; and then he got the chiefs and marched over to
 Papa Randalls to seize Cases papers.
 
 All they found was a bit of a diary, kept for a good many years, and all
 about the price of copra, and chickens being stolen, and that; and the
 books of the business and the will I told you of in the beginning, by
 both of which the whole thing (stock, lock, and barrel) appeared to
 belong to the Samoa woman.  It was I that bought her out at a mighty
 reasonable figure, for she was in a hurry to get home.  As for Randall
 and the black, they had to tramp; got into some kind of a station on the
 Papa-malulu side; did very bad business, for the truth is neither of the
 pair was fit for it, and lived mostly on fish, which was the means of
 Randalls death.  It seems there was a nice shoal in one day, and papa
 went after them with the dynamite; either the match burned too fast, or
 papa was full, or both, but the shell went off (in the usual way) before
 he threw it, and where was papas hand?  Well, theres nothing to hurt in
 that; the islands up north are all full of one-handed men, like the
 parties in the Arabian Nights; but either Randall was too old, or he
 drank too much, and the short and the long of it was that he died.
 Pretty soon after, the nigger was turned out of the island for stealing
 from white men, and went off to the west, where he found men of his own
 colour, in case he liked that, and the men of his own colour took and ate
 him at some kind of a corroborree, and Im sure I hope he was to their
 fancy!
 
 So there was I, left alone in my glory at Fales; and when the schooner
 came round I filled her up, and gave her a deck-cargo half as high as the
 house.  I must say Mr. Tarleton did the right thing by us; but he took a
 meanish kind of a revenge.
 
 Now, Mr. Wiltshire, said he, Ive put you all square with everybody
 here.  It wasnt difficult to do, Case being gone; but I have done it,
 and given my pledge besides that you will deal fairly with the natives.
 I must ask you to keep my word.
 
 Well, so I did.  I used to be bothered about my balances, but I reasoned
 it out this way: We all have queerish balances; and the natives all know
 it, and water their copra in a proportion so that its fair all round;
 but the truth is, it did use to bother me, and, though I did well in
 Fales, I was half glad when the firm moved me on to another station,
 where I was under no kind of a pledge and could look my balances in the
 face.
 
 As for the old lady, you know her as well as I do.  Shes only the one
 fault.  If you dont keep your eye lifting she would give away the roof
 off the station.  Well, it seems its natural in Kanakas.  Shes turned a
 powerful big woman now, and could throw a London bobby over her shoulder.
 But thats natural in Kanakas too, and theres no manner of doubt that
 shes an A 1 wife.
 
 Mr. Tarletons gone home, his trick being over.  He was the best
 missionary I ever struck, and now, it seems, hes parsonising down
 Somerset way.  Well, thats best for him; hell have no Kanakas there to
 get luny over.
 
 My public-house?  Not a bit of it, nor ever likely.  Im stuck here, I
 fancy.  I dont like to leave the kids, you see: andtheres no use
 talkingtheyre better here than what they would be in a white mans
 country, though Ben took the eldest up to Auckland, where hes being
 schooled with the best.  But what bothers me is the girls.  Theyre only
 half-castes, of course; I know that as well as you do, and theres nobody
 thinks less of half-castes than I do; but theyre mine, and about all
 Ive got.  I cant reconcile my mind to their taking up with Kanakas, and
 Id like to know where Im to find the whites?
 
 
 
 
 THE BOTTLE IMP.
 
 
 Note.Any student of that very unliterary product, the English drama of
 the early part of the century, will here recognise the name and the root
 idea of a piece once rendered popular by the redoubtable O. Smith.  The
 root idea is there and identical, and yet I hope I have made it a new
 thing.  And the fact that the tale has been designed and written for a
 Polynesian audience may lend it some extraneous interest nearer home.R.
 L. S.
 
 There was a man of the Island of Hawaii, whom I shall call Keawe; for the
 truth is, he still lives, and his name must be kept secret; but the place
 of his birth was not far from Honaunau, where the bones of Keawe the
 Great lie hidden in a cave.  This man was poor, brave, and active; he
 could read and write like a schoolmaster; he was a first-rate mariner
 besides, sailed for some time in the island steamers, and steered a
 whaleboat on the Hamakua coast.  At length it came in Keawes mind to
 have a sight of the great world and foreign cities, and he shipped on a
 vessel bound to San Francisco.
 
 This is a fine town, with a fine harbour, and rich people uncountable;
 and, in particular, there is one hill which is covered with palaces.
 Upon this hill Keawe was one day taking a walk with his pocket full of
 money, viewing the great houses upon either hand with pleasure, What
 fine houses these are! he was thinking, and how happy must those people
 be who dwell in them, and take no care for the morrow!  The thought was
 in his mind when he came abreast of a house that was smaller than some
 others, but all finished and beautified like a toy; the steps of that
 house shone like silver, and the borders of the garden bloomed like
 garlands, and the windows were bright like diamond; and Keawe stopped and
 wondered at the excellence of all he saw.  So stopping, he was aware of a
 man that looked forth upon him through a window so clear that Keawe could
 see him as you see a fish in a pool upon the reef.  The man was elderly,
 with a bald head and a black beard; and his face was heavy with sorrow,
 and he bitterly sighed.  And the truth of it is, that as Keawe looked in
 upon the man, and the man looked out upon Keawe, each envied the other.
 
 All of a sudden, the man smiled and nodded, and beckoned Keawe to enter,
 and met him at the door of the house.
 
 This is a fine house of mine, said the man, and bitterly sighed.
 Would you not care to view the chambers?
 
 So he led Keawe all over it, from the cellar to the roof, and there was
 nothing there that was not perfect of its kind, and Keawe was astonished.
 
 Truly, said Keawe, this is a beautiful house; if I lived in the like
 of it, I should be laughing all day long.  How comes it, then, that you
 should be sighing?
 
 There is no reason, said the man, why you should not have a house in
 all points similar to this, and finer, if you wish.  You have some money,
 I suppose?
 
 I have fifty dollars, said Keawe; but a house like this will cost more
 than fifty dollars.
 
 The man made a computation.  I am sorry you have no more, said he, for
 it may raise you trouble in the future; but it shall be yours at fifty
 dollars.
 
 The house? asked Keawe.
 
 No, not the house, replied the man; but the bottle.  For, I must tell
 you, although I appear to you so rich and fortunate, all my fortune, and
 this house itself and its garden, came out of a bottle not much bigger
 than a pint.  This is it.
 
 And he opened a lockfast place, and took out a round-bellied bottle with
 a long neck; the glass of it was white like milk, with changing rainbow
 colours in the grain.  Withinsides something obscurely moved, like a
 shadow and a fire.
 
 This is the bottle, said the man; and, when Keawe laughed, You do not
 believe me? he added.  Try, then, for yourself.  See if you can break
 it.
 
 So Keawe took the bottle up and dashed it on the floor till he was weary;
 but it jumped on the floor like a childs ball, and was not injured.
 
 This is a strange thing, said Keawe.  For by the touch of it, as well
 as by the look, the bottle should be of glass.
 
 Of glass it is, replied the man, sighing more heavily than ever; but
 the glass of it was tempered in the flames of hell.  An imp lives in it,
 and that is the shadow we behold there moving: or so I suppose.  If any
 man buy this bottle the imp is at his command; all that he desireslove,
 fame, money, houses like this house, ay, or a city like this cityall are
 his at the word uttered.  Napoleon had this bottle, and by it he grew to
 be the king of the world; but he sold it at the last, and fell.  Captain
 Cook had this bottle, and by it he found his way to so many islands; but
 he, too, sold it, and was slain upon Hawaii.  For, once it is sold, the
 power goes and the protection; and unless a man remain content with what
 he has, ill will befall him.
 
 And yet you talk of selling it yourself?  Keawe said.
 
 I have all I wish, and I am growing elderly, replied the man.  There
 is one thing the imp cannot dohe cannot prolong life; and, it would not
 be fair to conceal from you, there is a drawback to the bottle; for if a
 man die before he sells it, he must burn in hell forever.
 
 To be sure, that is a drawback and no mistake, cried Keawe.  I would
 not meddle with the thing.  I can do without a house, thank God; but
 there is one thing I could not be doing with one particle, and that is to
 be damned.
 
 Dear me, you must not run away with things, returned the man.  All you
 have to do is to use the power of the imp in moderation, and then sell it
 to someone else, as I do to you, and finish your life in comfort.
 
 Well, I observe two things, said Keawe.  All the time you keep sighing
 like a maid in love, that is one; and, for the other, you sell this
 bottle very cheap.
 
 I have told you already why I sigh, said the man.  It is because I
 fear my health is breaking up; and, as you said yourself, to die and go
 to the devil is a pity for anyone.  As for why I sell so cheap, I must
 explain to you there is a peculiarity about the bottle.  Long ago, when
 the devil brought it first upon earth, it was extremely expensive, and
 was sold first of all to Prester John for many millions of dollars; but
 it cannot be sold at all, unless sold at a loss.  If you sell it for as
 much as you paid for it, back it comes to you again like a homing pigeon.
 It follows that the price has kept falling in these centuries, and the
 bottle is now remarkably cheap.  I bought it myself from one of my great
 neighbours on this hill, and the price I paid was only ninety dollars.  I
 could sell it for as high as eighty-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents,
 but not a penny dearer, or back the thing must come to me.  Now, about
 this there are two bothers.  First, when you offer a bottle so singular
 for eighty odd dollars, people suppose you to be jesting.  And secondbut
 there is no hurry about thatand I need not go into it.  Only remember it
 must be coined money that you sell it for.
 
 How am I to know that this is all true? asked Keawe.
 
 Some of it you can try at once, replied the man.  Give me your fifty
 dollars, take the bottle, and wish your fifty dollars back into your
 pocket.  If that does not happen, I pledge you my honour I will cry off
 the bargain and restore your money.
 
 You are not deceiving me? said Keawe.
 
 The man bound himself with a great oath.
 
 Well, I will risk that much, said Keawe, for that can do no harm.
 And he paid over his money to the man, and the man handed him the bottle.
 
 Imp of the bottle, said Keawe, I want my fifty dollars back.  And
 sure enough he had scarce said the word before his pocket was as heavy as
 ever.
 
 To be sure this is a wonderful bottle, said Keawe.
 
 And now good-morning to you, my fine fellow, and the devil go with you
 for me! said the man.
 
 Hold on, said Keawe, I dont want any more of this fun.  Here, take
 your bottle back.
 
 You have bought it for less than I paid for it, replied the man,
 rubbing his hands.  It is yours now; and, for my part, I am only
 concerned to see the back of you.  And with that he rang for his Chinese
 servant, and had Keawe shown out of the house.
 
 Now, when Keawe was in the street, with the bottle under his arm, he
 began to think.  If all is true about this bottle, I may have made a
 losing bargain, thinks he.  But perhaps the man was only fooling me.
 The first thing he did was to count his money; the sum was
 exactforty-nine dollars American money, and one Chili piece.  That
 looks like the truth, said Keawe.  Now I will try another part.
 
 The streets in that part of the city were as clean as a ships decks, and
 though it was noon, there were no passengers.  Keawe set the bottle in
 the gutter and walked away.  Twice he looked back, and there was the
 milky, round-bellied bottle where he left it.  A third time he looked
 back, and turned a corner; but he had scarce done so, when something
 knocked upon his elbow, and behold! it was the long neck sticking up; and
 as for the round belly, it was jammed into the pocket of his pilot-coat.
 
 And that looks like the truth, said Keawe.
 
 The next thing he did was to buy a cork-screw in a shop, and go apart
 into a secret place in the fields.  And there he tried to draw the cork,
 but as often as he put the screw in, out it came again, and the cork as
 whole as ever.
 
 This is some new sort of cork, said Keawe, and all at once he began to
 shake and sweat, for he was afraid of that bottle.
 
 On his way back to the port-side, he saw a shop where a man sold shells
 and clubs from the wild islands, old heathen deities, old coined money,
 pictures from China and Japan, and all manner of things that sailors
 bring in their sea-chests.  And here he had an idea.  So he went in and
 offered the bottle for a hundred dollars.  The man of the shop laughed at
 him at the first, and offered him five; but, indeed, it was a curious
 bottlesuch glass was never blown in any human glassworks, so prettily
 the colours shone under the milky white, and so strangely the shadow
 hovered in the midst; so, after he had disputed awhile after the manner
 of his kind, the shop-man gave Keawe sixty silver dollars for the thing,
 and set it on a shelf in the midst of his window.
 
 Now, said Keawe, I have sold that for sixty which I bought for
 fiftyor, to say truth, a little less, because one of my dollars was from
 Chili.  Now I shall know the truth upon another point.
 
 So he went back on board his ship, and, when he opened his chest, there
 was the bottle, and had come more quickly than himself.  Now Keawe had a
 mate on board whose name was Lopaka.
 
 What ails you? said Lopaka, that you stare in your chest?
 
 They were alone in the ships forecastle, and Keawe bound him to secrecy,
 and told all.
 
 This is a very strange affair, said Lopaka; and I fear you will be in
 trouble about this bottle.  But there is one point very clearthat you
 are sure of the trouble, and you had better have the profit in the
 bargain.  Make up your mind what you want with it; give the order, and if
 it is done as you desire, I will buy the bottle myself; for I have an
 idea of my own to get a schooner, and go trading through the islands.
 
 That is not my idea, said Keawe; but to have a beautiful house and
 garden on the Kona Coast, where I was born, the sun shining in at the
 door, flowers in the garden, glass in the windows, pictures on the walls,
 and toys and fine carpets on the tables, for all the world like the house
 I was in this dayonly a storey higher, and with balconies all about like
 the Kings palace; and to live there without care and make merry with my
 friends and relatives.
 
 Well, said Lopaka, let us carry it back with us to Hawaii; and if all
 comes true, as you suppose, I will buy the bottle, as I said, and ask a
 schooner.
 
 Upon that they were agreed, and it was not long before the ship returned
 to Honolulu, carrying Keawe and Lopaka, and the bottle.  They were scarce
 come ashore when they met a friend upon the beach, who began at once to
 condole with Keawe.
 
 I do not know what I am to be condoled about, said Keawe.
 
 Is it possible you have not heard, said the friend, your unclethat
 good old manis dead, and your cousinthat beautiful boywas drowned at
 sea?
 
 Keawe was filled with sorrow, and, beginning to weep and to lament, he
 forgot about the bottle.  But Lopaka was thinking to himself, and
 presently, when Keawes grief was a little abated, I have been
 thinking, said Lopaka.  Had not your uncle lands in Hawaii, in the
 district of Kau?
 
 No, said Keawe, not in Kau; they are on the mountain-sidea little way
 south of Hookena.
 
 These lands will now be yours? asked Lopaka.
 
 And so they will, says Keawe, and began again to lament for his
 relatives.
 
 No, said Lopaka, do not lament at present.  I have a thought in my
 mind.  How if this should be the doing of the bottle?  For here is the
 place ready for your house.
 
 If this be so, cried Keawe, it is a very ill way to serve me by
 killing my relatives.  But it may be, indeed; for it was in just such a
 station that I saw the house with my minds eye.
 
 The house, however, is not yet built, said Lopaka.
 
 No, nor like to be! said Keawe; for though my uncle has some coffee
 and ava and bananas, it will not be more than will keep me in comfort;
 and the rest of that land is the black lava.
 
 Let us go to the lawyer, said Lopaka; I have still this idea in my
 mind.
 
 Now, when they came to the lawyers, it appeared Keawes uncle had grown
 monstrous rich in the last days, and there was a fund of money.
 
 And here is the money for the house! cried Lopaka.
 
 If you are thinking of a new house, said the lawyer, here is the card
 of a new architect, of whom they tell me great things.
 
 Better and better! cried Lopaka.  Here is all made plain for us.  Let
 us continue to obey orders.
 
 So they went to the architect, and he had drawings of houses on his
 table.
 
 You want something out of the way, said the architect.  How do you
 like this? and he handed a drawing to Keawe.
 
 Now, when Keawe set eyes on the drawing, he cried out aloud, for it was
 the picture of his thought exactly drawn.
 
 I am in for this house, thought he.  Little as I like the way it comes
 to me, I am in for it now, and I may as well take the good along with the
 evil.
 
 So he told the architect all that he wished, and how he would have that
 house furnished, and about the pictures on the wall and the knick-knacks
 on the tables; and he asked the man plainly for how much he would
 undertake the whole affair.
 
 The architect put many questions, and took his pen and made a
 computation; and when he had done he named the very sum that Keawe had
 inherited.
 
 Lopaka and Keawe looked at one another and nodded.
 
 It is quite clear, thought Keawe, that I am to have this house,
 whether or no.  It comes from the devil, and I fear I will get little
 good by that; and of one thing I am sure, I will make no more wishes as
 long as I have this bottle.  But with the house I am saddled, and I may
 as well take the good along with the evil.
 
 So he made his terms with the architect, and they signed a paper; and
 Keawe and Lopaka took ship again and sailed to Australia; for it was
 concluded between them they should not interfere at all, but leave the
 architect and the bottle imp to build and to adorn that house at their
 own pleasure.
 
 The voyage was a good voyage, only all the time Keawe was holding in his
 breath, for he had sworn he would utter no more wishes, and take no more
 favours from the devil.  The time was up when they got back.  The
 architect told them that the house was ready, and Keawe and Lopaka took a
 passage in the _Hall_, and went down Kona way to view the house, and see
 if all had been done fitly according to the thought that was in Keawes
 mind.
 
 Now the house stood on the mountain side, visible to ships.  Above, the
 forest ran up into the clouds of rain; below, the black lava fell in
 cliffs, where the kings of old lay buried.  A garden bloomed about that
 house with every hue of flowers; and there was an orchard of papaia on
 the one hand and an orchard of breadfruit on the other, and right in
 front, toward the sea, a ships mast had been rigged up and bore a flag.
 As for the house, it was three storeys high, with great chambers and
 broad balconies on each.  The windows were of glass, so excellent that it
 was as clear as water and as bright as day.  All manner of furniture
 adorned the chambers.  Pictures hung upon the wall in golden frames:
 pictures of ships, and men fighting, and of the most beautiful women, and
 of singular places; nowhere in the world are there pictures of so bright
 a colour as those Keawe found hanging in his house.  As for the
 knick-knacks, they were extraordinary fine; chiming clocks and musical
 boxes, little men with nodding heads, books filled with pictures, weapons
 of price from all quarters of the world, and the most elegant puzzles to
 entertain the leisure of a solitary man.  And as no one would care to
 live in such chambers, only to walk through and view them, the balconies
 were made so broad that a whole town might have lived upon them in
 delight; and Keawe knew not which to prefer, whether the back porch,
 where you got the land breeze, and looked upon the orchards and the
 flowers, or the front balcony, where you could drink the wind of the sea,
 and look down the steep wall of the mountain and see the _Hall_ going by
 once a week or so between Hookena and the hills of Pele, or the schooners
 plying up the coast for wood and ava and bananas.
 
 When they had viewed all, Keawe and Lopaka sat on the porch.
 
 Well, asked Lopaka, is it all as you designed?
 
 Words cannot utter it, said Keawe.  It is better than I dreamed, and I
 am sick with satisfaction.
 
 There is but one thing to consider, said Lopaka; all this may be quite
 natural, and the bottle imp have nothing whatever to say to it.  If I
 were to buy the bottle, and got no schooner after all, I should have put
 my hand in the fire for nothing.  I gave you my word, I know; but yet I
 think you would not grudge me one more proof.
 
 I have sworn I would take no more favours, said Keawe.  I have gone
 already deep enough.
 
 This is no favour I am thinking of, replied Lopaka.  It is only to see
 the imp himself.  There is nothing to be gained by that, and so nothing
 to be ashamed of; and yet, if I once saw him, I should be sure of the
 whole matter.  So indulge me so far, and let me see the imp; and, after
 that, here is the money in my hand, and I will buy it.
 
 There is only one thing I am afraid of, said Keawe.  The imp may be
 very ugly to view; and if you once set eyes upon him you might be very
 undesirous of the bottle.
 
 I am a man of my word, said Lopaka.  And here is the money betwixt
 us.
 
 Very well, replied Keawe.  I have a curiosity myself.  So come, let us
 have one look at you, Mr. Imp.
 
 Now as soon as that was said, the imp looked out of the bottle, and in
 again, swift as a lizard; and there sat Keawe and Lopaka turned to stone.
 The night had quite come, before either found a thought to say or voice
 to say it with; and then Lopaka pushed the money over and took the
 bottle.
 
 I am a man of my word, said he, and had need to be so, or I would not
 touch this bottle with my foot.  Well, I shall get my schooner and a
 dollar or two for my pocket; and then I will be rid of this devil as fast
 as I can.  For to tell you the plain truth, the look of him has cast me
 down.
 
 Lopaka, said Keawe, do not you think any worse of me than you can
 help; I know it is night, and the roads bad, and the pass by the tombs an
 ill place to go by so late, but I declare since I have seen that little
 face, I cannot eat or sleep or pray till it is gone from me.  I will give
 you a lantern and a basket to put the bottle in, and any picture or fine
 thing in all my house that takes your fancy;and be gone at once, and go
 sleep at Hookena with Nahinu.
 
 Keawe, said Lopaka, many a man would take this ill; above all, when I
 am doing you a turn so friendly, as to keep my word and buy the bottle;
 and for that matter, the night and the dark, and the way by the tombs,
 must be all tenfold more dangerous to a man with such a sin upon his
 conscience, and such a bottle under his arm.  But for my part, I am so
 extremely terrified myself, I have not the heart to blame you.  Here I go
 then; and I pray God you may be happy in your house, and I fortunate with
 my schooner, and both get to heaven in the end in spite of the devil and
 his bottle.
 
 So Lopaka went down the mountain; and Keawe stood in his front balcony,
 and listened to the clink of the horses shoes, and watched the lantern
 go shining down the path, and along the cliff of caves where the old dead
 are buried; and all the time he trembled and clasped his hands, and
 prayed for his friend, and gave glory to God that he himself was escaped
 out of that trouble.
 
 But the next day came very brightly, and that new house of his was so
 delightful to behold that he forgot his terrors.  One day followed
 another, and Keawe dwelt there in perpetual joy.  He had his place on the
 back porch; it was there he ate and lived, and read the stories in the
 Honolulu newspapers; but when anyone came by they would go in and view
 the chambers and the pictures.  And the fame of the house went far and
 wide; it was called _Ka-Hale Nui_the Great Housein all Kona; and
 sometimes the Bright House, for Keawe kept a Chinaman, who was all day
 dusting and furbishing; and the glass, and the gilt, and the fine stuffs,
 and the pictures, shone as bright as the morning.  As for Keawe himself,
 he could not walk in the chambers without singing, his heart was so
 enlarged; and when ships sailed by upon the sea, he would fly his colours
 on the mast.
 
 So time went by, until one day Keawe went upon a visit as far as Kailua
 to certain of his friends.  There he was well feasted; and left as soon
 as he could the next morning, and rode hard, for he was impatient to
 behold his beautiful house; and, besides, the night then coming on was
 the night in which the dead of old days go abroad in the sides of Kona;
 and having already meddled with the devil, he was the more chary of
 meeting with the dead.  A little beyond Honaunau, looking far ahead, he
 was aware of a woman bathing in the edge of the sea; and she seemed a
 well-grown girl, but he thought no more of it.  Then he saw her white
 shift flutter as she put it on, and then her red holoku; and by the time
 he came abreast of her she was done with her toilet, and had come up from
 the sea, and stood by the track-side in her red holoku, and she was all
 freshened with the bath, and her eyes shone and were kind.  Now Keawe no
 sooner beheld her than he drew rein.
 
 I thought I knew everyone in this country, said he.  How comes it that
 I do not know you?
 
 I am Kokua, daughter of Kiano, said the girl, and I have just returned
 from Oahu.  Who are you?
 
 I will tell you who I am in a little, said Keawe, dismounting from his
 horse, but not now.  For I have a thought in my mind, and if you knew
 who I was, you might have heard of me, and would not give me a true
 answer.  But tell me, first of all, one thing: Are you married?
 
 At this Kokua laughed out aloud.  It is you who ask questions, she
 said.  Are you married yourself?
 
 Indeed, Kokua, I am not, replied Keawe, and never thought to be until
 this hour.  But here is the plain truth.  I have met you here at the
 roadside, and I saw your eyes, which are like the stars, and my heart
 went to you as swift as a bird.  And so now, if you want none of me, say
 so, and I will go on to my own place; but if you think me no worse than
 any other young man, say so, too, and I will turn aside to your fathers
 for the night, and to-morrow I will talk with the good man.
 
 Kokua said never a word, but she looked at the sea and laughed.
 
 Kokua, said Keawe, if you say nothing, I will take that for the good
 answer; so let us be stepping to your fathers door.
 
 She went on ahead of him, still without speech; only sometimes she
 glanced back and glanced away again, and she kept the strings of her hat
 in her mouth.
 
 Now, when they had come to the door, Kiano came out on his verandah, and
 cried out and welcomed Keawe by name.  At that the girl looked over, for
 the fame of the great house had come to her ears; and, to be sure, it was
 a great temptation.  All that evening they were very merry together; and
 the girl was as bold as brass under the eyes of her parents, and made a
 mock of Keawe, for she had a quick wit.  The next day he had a word with
 Kiano, and found the girl alone.
 
 Kokua, said he, you made a mock of me all the evening; and it is still
 time to bid me go.  I would not tell you who I was, because I have so
 fine a house, and I feared you would think too much of that house and too
 little of the man that loves you.  Now you know all, and if you wish to
 have seen the last of me, say so at once.
 
 No, said Kokua; but this time she did not laugh, nor did Keawe ask for
 more.
 
 This was the wooing of Keawe; things had gone quickly; but so an arrow
 goes, and the ball of a rifle swifter still, and yet both may strike the
 target.  Things had gone fast, but they had gone far also, and the
 thought of Keawe rang in the maidens head; she heard his voice in the
 breach of the surf upon the lava, and for this young man that she had
 seen but twice she would have left father and mother and her native
 islands.  As for Keawe himself, his horse flew up the path of the
 mountain under the cliff of tombs, and the sound of the hoofs, and the
 sound of Keawe singing to himself for pleasure, echoed in the caverns of
 the dead.  He came to the Bright House, and still he was singing.  He sat
 and ate in the broad balcony, and the Chinaman wondered at his master, to
 hear how he sang between the mouthfuls.  The sun went down into the sea,
 and the night came; and Keawe walked the balconies by lamplight, high on
 the mountains, and the voice of his singing startled men on ships.
 
 Here am I now upon my high place, he said to himself.  Life may be no
 better; this is the mountain top; and all shelves about me toward the
 worse.  For the first time I will light up the chambers, and bathe in my
 fine bath with the hot water and the cold, and sleep alone in the bed of
 my bridal chamber.
 
 So the Chinaman had word, and he must rise from sleep and light the
 furnaces; and as he wrought below, beside the boilers, he heard his
 master singing and rejoicing above him in the lighted chambers.  When the
 water began to be hot the Chinaman cried to his master; and Keawe went
 into the bathroom; and the Chinaman heard him sing as he filled the
 marble basin; and heard him sing, and the singing broken, as he
 undressed; until of a sudden, the song ceased.  The Chinaman listened,
 and listened; he called up the house to Keawe to ask if all were well,
 and Keawe answered him Yes, and bade him go to bed; but there was no
 more singing in the Bright House; and all night long, the Chinaman heard
 his masters feet go round and round the balconies without repose.
 
 Now the truth of it was this: as Keawe undressed for his bath, he spied
 upon his flesh a patch like a patch of lichen on a rock, and it was then
 that he stopped singing.  For he knew the likeness of that patch, and
 knew that he was fallen in the Chinese Evil. {5}
 
 Now, it is a sad thing for any man to fall into this sickness.  And it
 would be a sad thing for anyone to leave a house so beautiful and so
 commodious, and depart from all his friends to the north coast of Molokai
 between the mighty cliff and the sea-breakers.  But what was that to the
 case of the man Keawe, he who had met his love but yesterday, and won her
 but that morning, and now saw all his hopes break, in a moment, like a
 piece of glass?
 
 Awhile he sat upon the edge of the bath; then sprang, with a cry, and ran
 outside; and to and fro, to and fro, along the balcony, like one
 despairing.
 
 Very willingly could I leave Hawaii, the home of my fathers, Keawe was
 thinking.  Very lightly could I leave my house, the high-placed, the
 many-windowed, here upon the mountains.  Very bravely could I go to
 Molokai, to Kalaupapa by the cliffs, to live with the smitten and to
 sleep there, far from my fathers.  But what wrong have I done, what sin
 lies upon my soul, that I should have encountered Kokua coming cool from
 the sea-water in the evening?  Kokua, the soul ensnarer!  Kokua, the
 light of my life!  Her may I never wed, her may I look upon no longer,
 her may I no more handle with my loving hand; and it is for this, it is
 for you, O Kokua! that I pour my lamentations!
 
 Now you are to observe what sort of a man Keawe was, for he might have
 dwelt there in the Bright House for years, and no one been the wiser of
 his sickness; but he reckoned nothing of that, if he must lose Kokua.
 And again, he might have wed Kokua even as he was; and so many would have
 done, because they have the souls of pigs; but Keawe loved the maid
 manfully, and he would do her no hurt and bring her in no danger.
 
 A little beyond the midst of the night, there came in his mind the
 recollection of that bottle.  He went round to the back porch, and called
 to memory the day when the devil had looked forth; and at the thought ice
 ran in his veins.
 
 A dreadful thing is the bottle, thought Keawe, and dreadful is the
 imp, and it is a dreadful thing to risk the flames of hell.  But what
 other hope have I to cure my sickness or to wed Kokua?  What! he
 thought, would I beard the devil once, only to get me a house, and not
 face him again to win Kokua?
 
 Thereupon he called to mind it was the next day the _Hall_ went by on her
 return to Honolulu.  There must I go first, he thought, and see
 Lopaka.  For the best hope that I have now is to find that same bottle I
 was so pleased to be rid of.
 
 Never a wink could he sleep; the food stuck in his throat; but he sent a
 letter to Kiano, and about the time when the steamer would be coming,
 rode down beside the cliff of the tombs.  It rained; his horse went
 heavily; he looked up at the black mouths of the caves, and he envied the
 dead that slept there and were done with trouble; and called to mind how
 he had galloped by the day before, and was astonished.  So he came down
 to Hookena, and there was all the country gathered for the steamer as
 usual.  In the shed before the store they sat and jested and passed the
 news; but there was no matter of speech in Keawes bosom, and he sat in
 their midst and looked without on the rain falling on the houses, and the
 surf beating among the rocks, and the sighs arose in his throat.
 
 Keawe of the Bright House is out of spirits, said one to another.
 Indeed, and so he was, and little wonder.
 
 Then the _Hall_ came, and the whaleboat carried him on board.  The
 after-part of the ship was full of Haoles {6} who had been to visit the
 volcano, as their custom is; and the midst was crowded with Kanakas, and
 the forepart with wild bulls from Hilo and horses from Kau; but Keawe sat
 apart from all in his sorrow, and watched for the house of Kiano.  There
 it sat, low upon the shore in the black rocks, and shaded by the cocoa
 palms, and there by the door was a red holoku, no greater than a fly, and
 going to and fro with a flys busyness.  Ah, queen of my heart, he
 cried, Ill venture my dear soul to win you!
 
 Soon after, darkness fell, and the cabins were lit up, and the Haoles sat
 and played at the cards and drank whiskey as their custom is; but Keawe
 walked the deck all night; and all the next day, as they steamed under
 the lee of Maui or of Molokai, he was still pacing to and fro like a wild
 animal in a menagerie.
 
 Towards evening they passed Diamond Head, and came to the pier of
 Honolulu.  Keawe stepped out among the crowd and began to ask for Lopaka.
 It seemed he had become the owner of a schoonernone better in the
 islandsand was gone upon an adventure as far as Pola-Pola or Kahiki; so
 there was no help to be looked for from Lopaka.  Keawe called to mind a
 friend of his, a lawyer in the town (I must not tell his name), and
 inquired of him.  They said he was grown suddenly rich, and had a fine
 new house upon Waikiki shore; and this put a thought in Keawes head, and
 he called a hack and drove to the lawyers house.
 
 The house was all brand new, and the trees in the garden no greater than
 walking-sticks, and the lawyer, when he came, had the air of a man well
 pleased.
 
 What can I do to serve you? said the lawyer.
 
 You are a friend of Lopakas, replied Keawe, and Lopaka purchased from
 me a certain piece of goods that I thought you might enable me to trace.
 
 The lawyers face became very dark.  I do not profess to misunderstand
 you, Mr. Keawe, said he, though this is an ugly business to be stirring
 in.  You may be sure I know nothing, but yet I have a guess, and if you
 would apply in a certain quarter I think you might have news.
 
 And he named the name of a man, which, again, I had better not repeat.
 So it was for days, and Keawe went from one to another, finding
 everywhere new clothes and carriages, and fine new houses and men
 everywhere in great contentment, although, to be sure, when he hinted at
 his business their faces would cloud over.
 
 No doubt I am upon the track, thought Keawe.  These new clothes and
 carriages are all the gifts of the little imp, and these glad faces are
 the faces of men who have taken their profit and got rid of the accursed
 thing in safety.  When I see pale cheeks and hear sighing, I shall know
 that I am near the bottle.
 
 So it befell at last that he was recommended to a Haole in Beritania
 Street.  When he came to the door, about the hour of the evening meal,
 there were the usual marks of the new house, and the young garden, and
 the electric light shining in the windows; but when the owner came, a
 shock of hope and fear ran through Keawe; for here was a young man, white
 as a corpse, and black about the eyes, the hair shedding from his head,
 and such a look in his countenance as a man may have when he is waiting
 for the gallows.
 
 Here it is, to be sure, thought Keawe, and so with this man he noways
 veiled his errand.  I am come to buy the bottle, said he.
 
 At the word, the young Haole of Beritania Street reeled against the wall.
 
 The bottle! he gasped.  To buy the bottle!  Then he seemed to choke,
 and seizing Keawe by the arm carried him into a room and poured out wine
 in two glasses.
 
 Here is my respects, said Keawe, who had been much about with Haoles in
 his time.  Yes, he added, I am come to buy the bottle.  What is the
 price by now?
 
 At that word the young man let his glass slip through his fingers, and
 looked upon Keawe like a ghost.
 
 The price, says he; the price!  You do not know the price?
 
 It is for that I am asking you, returned Keawe.  But why are you so
 much concerned?  Is there anything wrong about the price?
 
 It has dropped a great deal in value since your time, Mr. Keawe, said
 the young man stammering.
 
 Well, well, I shall have the less to pay for it, says Keawe.  How much
 did it cost you?
 
 The young man was as white as a sheet.  Two cents, said he.
 
 What? cried Keawe, two cents?  Why, then, you can only sell it for
 one.  And he who buys it  The words died upon Keawes tongue; he who
 bought it could never sell it again, the bottle and the bottle imp must
 abide with him until he died, and when he died must carry him to the red
 end of hell.
 
 The young man of Beritania Street fell upon his knees.  For Gods sake
 buy it! he cried.  You can have all my fortune in the bargain.  I was
 mad when I bought it at that price.  I had embezzled money at my store; I
 was lost else; I must have gone to jail.
 
 Poor creature, said Keawe, you would risk your soul upon so desperate
 an adventure, and to avoid the proper punishment of your own disgrace;
 and you think I could hesitate with love in front of me.  Give me the
 bottle, and the change which I make sure you have all ready.  Here is a
 five-cent piece.
 
 It was as Keawe supposed; the young man had the change ready in a drawer;
 the bottle changed hands, and Keawes fingers were no sooner clasped upon
 the stalk than he had breathed his wish to be a clean man.  And, sure
 enough, when he got home to his room, and stripped himself before a
 glass, his flesh was whole like an infants.  And here was the strange
 thing: he had no sooner seen this miracle, than his mind was changed
 within him, and he cared naught for the Chinese Evil, and little enough
 for Kokua; and had but the one thought, that here he was bound to the
 bottle imp for time and for eternity, and had no better hope but to be a
 cinder for ever in the flames of hell.  Away ahead of him he saw them
 blaze with his minds eye, and his soul shrank, and darkness fell upon
 the light.
 
 When Keawe came to himself a little, he was aware it was the night when
 the band played at the hotel.  Thither he went, because he feared to be
 alone; and there, among happy faces, walked to and fro, and heard the
 tunes go up and down, and saw Berger beat the measure, and all the while
 he heard the flames crackle, and saw the red fire burning in the
 bottomless pit.  Of a sudden the band played _Hiki-ao-ao_; that was a
 song that he had sung with Kokua, and at the strain courage returned to
 him.
 
 It is done now, he thought, and once more let me take the good along
 with the evil.
 
 So it befell that he returned to Hawaii by the first steamer, and as soon
 as it could be managed he was wedded to Kokua, and carried her up the
 mountain side to the Bright House.
 
 Now it was so with these two, that when they were together, Keawes heart
 was stilled; but so soon as he was alone he fell into a brooding horror,
 and heard the flames crackle, and saw the red fire burn in the bottomless
 pit.  The girl, indeed, had come to him wholly; her heart leapt in her
 side at sight of him, her hand clung to his; and she was so fashioned
 from the hair upon her head to the nails upon her toes that none could
 see her without joy.  She was pleasant in her nature.  She had the good
 word always.  Full of song she was, and went to and fro in the Bright
 House, the brightest thing in its three storeys, carolling like the
 birds.  And Keawe beheld and heard her with delight, and then must shrink
 upon one side, and weep and groan to think upon the price that he had
 paid for her; and then he must dry his eyes, and wash his face, and go
 and sit with her on the broad balconies, joining in her songs, and, with
 a sick spirit, answering her smiles.
 
 There came a day when her feet began to be heavy and her songs more rare;
 and now it was not Keawe only that would weep apart, but each would
 sunder from the other and sit in opposite balconies with the whole width
 of the Bright House betwixt.  Keawe was so sunk in his despair, he scarce
 observed the change, and was only glad he had more hours to sit alone and
 brood upon his destiny, and was not so frequently condemned to pull a
 smiling face on a sick heart.  But one day, coming softly through the
 house, he heard the sound of a child sobbing, and there was Kokua rolling
 her face upon the balcony floor, and weeping like the lost.
 
 You do well to weep in this house, Kokua, he said.  And yet I would
 give the head off my body that you (at least) might have been happy.
 
 Happy! she cried.  Keawe, when you lived alone in your Bright House,
 you were the word of the island for a happy man; laughter and song were
 in your mouth, and your face was as bright as the sunrise.  Then you
 wedded poor Kokua; and the good God knows what is amiss in herbut from
 that day you have not smiled.  Oh! she cried, what ails me?  I thought
 I was pretty, and I knew I loved him.  What ails me that I throw this
 cloud upon my husband?
 
 Poor Kokua, said Keawe.  He sat down by her side, and sought to take
 her hand; but that she plucked away.  Poor Kokua, he said, again.  My
 poor childmy pretty.  And I had thought all this while to spare you!
 Well, you shall know all.  Then, at least, you will pity poor Keawe; then
 you will understand how much he loved you in the pastthat he dared hell
 for your possessionand how much he loves you still (the poor condemned
 one), that he can yet call up a smile when he beholds you.
 
 With that, he told her all, even from the beginning.
 
 You have done this for me? she cried Ah, well, then what do I
 care!and she clasped and wept upon him.
 
 Ah, child! said Keawe, and yet, when I consider of the fire of hell, I
 care a good deal!
 
 Never tell me, said she; no man can be lost because he loved Kokua,
 and no other fault.  I tell you, Keawe, I shall save you with these
 hands, or perish in your company.  What! you loved me, and gave your
 soul, and you think I will not die to save you in return?
 
 Ah, my dear! you might die a hundred times, and what difference would
 that make? he cried, except to leave me lonely till the time comes of
 my damnation?
 
 You know nothing, said she.  I was educated in a school in Honolulu; I
 am no common girl.  And I tell you, I shall save my lover.  What is this
 you say about a cent?  But all the world is not American.  In England
 they have a piece they call a farthing, which is about half a cent.  Ah!
 sorrow! she cried, that makes it scarcely better, for the buyer must be
 lost, and we shall find none so brave as my Keawe!  But, then, there is
 France; they have a small coin there which they call a centime, and these
 go five to the cent or there-about.  We could not do better.  Come,
 Keawe, let us go to the French islands; let us go to Tahiti, as fast as
 ships can bear us.  There we have four centimes, three centimes, two
 centimes, one centime; four possible sales to come and go on; and two of
 us to push the bargain.  Come, my Keawe! kiss me, and banish care.  Kokua
 will defend you.
 
 Gift of God! he cried.  I cannot think that God will punish me for
 desiring aught so good!  Be it as you will, then; take me where you
 please: I put my life and my salvation in your hands.
 
 Early the next day Kokua was about her preparations.  She took Keawes
 chest that he went with sailoring; and first she put the bottle in a
 corner; and then packed it with the richest of their clothes and the
 bravest of the knick-knacks in the house.  For, said she, we must seem
 to be rich folks, or who will believe in the bottle?  All the time of
 her preparation she was as gay as a bird; only when she looked upon
 Keawe, the tears would spring in her eye, and she must run and kiss him.
 As for Keawe, a weight was off his soul; now that he had his secret
 shared, and some hope in front of him, he seemed like a new man, his feet
 went lightly on the earth, and his breath was good to him again.  Yet was
 terror still at his elbow; and ever and again, as the wind blows out a
 taper, hope died in him, and he saw the flames toss and the red fire burn
 in hell.
 
 It was given out in the country they were gone pleasuring to the States,
 which was thought a strange thing, and yet not so strange as the truth,
 if any could have guessed it.  So they went to Honolulu in the _Hall_,
 and thence in the _Umatilla_ to San Francisco with a crowd of Haoles, and
 at San Francisco took their passage by the mail brigantine, the _Tropic
 Bird_, for Papeete, the chief place of the French in the south islands.
 Thither they came, after a pleasant voyage, on a fair day of the Trade
 Wind, and saw the reef with the surf breaking, and Motuiti with its
 palms, and the schooner riding within-side, and the white houses of the
 town low down along the shore among green trees, and overhead the
 mountains and the clouds of Tahiti, the wise island.
 
 It was judged the most wise to hire a house, which they did accordingly,
 opposite the British Consuls, to make a great parade of money, and
 themselves conspicuous with carriages and horses.  This it was very easy
 to do, so long as they had the bottle in their possession; for Kokua was
 more bold than Keawe, and, whenever she had a mind, called on the imp for
 twenty or a hundred dollars.  At this rate they soon grew to be remarked
 in the town; and the strangers from Hawaii, their riding and their
 driving, the fine holokus and the rich lace of Kokua, became the matter
 of much talk.
 
 They got on well after the first with the Tahitian language, which is
 indeed like to the Hawaiian, with a change of certain letters; and as
 soon as they had any freedom of speech, began to push the bottle.  You
 are to consider it was not an easy subject to introduce; it was not easy
 to persuade people you were in earnest, when you offered to sell them for
 four centimes the spring of health and riches inexhaustible.  It was
 necessary besides to explain the dangers of the bottle; and either people
 disbelieved the whole thing and laughed, or they thought the more of the
 darker part, became overcast with gravity, and drew away from Keawe and
 Kokua, as from persons who had dealings with the devil.  So far from
 gaining ground, these two began to find they were avoided in the town;
 the children ran away from them screaming, a thing intolerable to Kokua;
 Catholics crossed themselves as they went by; and all persons began with
 one accord to disengage themselves from their advances.
 
 Depression fell upon their spirits.  They would sit at night in their new
 house, after a days weariness, and not exchange one word, or the silence
 would be broken by Kokua bursting suddenly into sobs.  Sometimes they
 would pray together; sometimes they would have the bottle out upon the
 floor, and sit all evening watching how the shadow hovered in the midst.
 At such times they would be afraid to go to rest.  It was long ere
 slumber came to them, and, if either dozed off, it would be to wake and
 find the other silently weeping in the dark, or, perhaps, to wake alone,
 the other having fled from the house and the neighbourhood of that
 bottle, to pace under the bananas in the little garden, or to wander on
 the beach by moonlight.
 
 One night it was so when Kokua awoke.  Keawe was gone.  She felt in the
 bed and his place was cold.  Then fear fell upon her, and she sat up in
 bed.  A little moonshine filtered through the shutters.  The room was
 bright, and she could spy the bottle on the floor.  Outside it blew high,
 the great trees of the avenue cried aloud, and the fallen leaves rattled
 in the verandah.  In the midst of this Kokua was aware of another sound;
 whether of a beast or of a man she could scarce tell, but it was as sad
 as death, and cut her to the soul.  Softly she arose, set the door ajar,
 and looked forth into the moonlit yard.  There, under the bananas, lay
 Keawe, his mouth in the dust, and as he lay he moaned.
 
 It was Kokuas first thought to run forward and console him; her second
 potently withheld her.  Keawe had borne himself before his wife like a
 brave man; it became her little in the hour of weakness to intrude upon
 his shame.  With the thought she drew back into the house.
 
 Heaven! she thought, how careless have I beenhow weak!  It is he, not
 I, that stands in this eternal peril; it was he, not I, that took the
 curse upon his soul.  It is for my sake, and for the love of a creature
 of so little worth and such poor help, that he now beholds so close to
 him the flames of hellay, and smells the smoke of it, lying without
 there in the wind and moonlight.  Am I so dull of spirit that never till
 now I have surmised my duty, or have I seen it before and turned aside?
 But now, at least, I take up my soul in both the hands of my affection;
 now I say farewell to the white steps of heaven and the waiting faces of
 my friends.  A love for a love, and let mine be equalled with Keawes!  A
 soul for a soul, and be it mine to perish!
 
 She was a deft woman with her hands, and was soon apparelled.  She took
 in her hands the changethe precious centimes they kept ever at their
 side; for this coin is little used, and they had made provision at a
 Government office.  When she was forth in the avenue clouds came on the
 wind, and the moon was blackened.  The town slept, and she knew not
 whither to turn till she heard one coughing in the shadow of the trees.
 
 Old man, said Kokua, what do you here abroad in the cold night?
 
 The old man could scarce express himself for coughing, but she made out
 that he was old and poor, and a stranger in the island.
 
 Will you do me a service? said Kokua.  As one stranger to another, and
 as an old man to a young woman, will you help a daughter of Hawaii?
 
 Ah, said the old man.  So you are the witch from the eight islands,
 and even my old soul you seek to entangle.  But I have heard of you, and
 defy your wickedness.
 
 Sit down here, said Kokua, and let me tell you a tale.  And she told
 him the story of Keawe from the beginning to the end.
 
 And now, said she, I am his wife, whom he bought with his souls
 welfare.  And what should I do?  If I went to him myself and offered to
 buy it, he would refuse.  But if you go, he will sell it eagerly; I will
 await you here; you will buy it for four centimes, and I will buy it
 again for three.  And the Lord strengthen a poor girl!
 
 If you meant falsely, said the old man, I think God would strike you
 dead.
 
 He would! cried Kokua.  Be sure he would.  I could not be so
 treacherousGod would not suffer it.
 
 Give me the four centimes and await me here, said the old man.
 
 Now, when Kokua stood alone in the street, her spirit died.  The wind
 roared in the trees, and it seemed to her the rushing of the flames of
 hell; the shadows tossed in the light of the street lamp, and they seemed
 to her the snatching hands of evil ones.  If she had had the strength,
 she must have run away, and if she had had the breath she must have
 screamed aloud; but, in truth, she could do neither, and stood and
 trembled in the avenue, like an affrighted child.
 
 Then she saw the old man returning, and he had the bottle in his hand.
 
 I have done your bidding, said he.  I left your husband weeping like a
 child; to-night he will sleep easy.  And he held the bottle forth.
 
 Before you give it me, Kokua panted, take the good with the evilask
 to be delivered from your cough.
 
 I am an old man, replied the other, and too near the gate of the grave
 to take a favour from the devil.  But what is this?  Why do you not take
 the bottle?  Do you hesitate?
 
 Not hesitate! cried Kokua.  I am only weak.  Give me a moment.  It is
 my hand resists, my flesh shrinks back from the accursed thing.  One
 moment only!
 
 The old man looked upon Kokua kindly.  Poor child! said he, you fear;
 your soul misgives you.  Well, let me keep it.  I am old, and can never
 more be happy in this world, and as for the next
 
 Give it me! gasped Kokua.  There is your money.  Do you think I am so
 base as that?  Give me the bottle.
 
 God bless you, child, said the old man.
 
 Kokua concealed the bottle under her holoku, said farewell to the old
 man, and walked off along the avenue, she cared not whither.  For all
 roads were now the same to her, and led equally to hell.  Sometimes she
 walked, and sometimes ran; sometimes she screamed out loud in the night,
 and sometimes lay by the wayside in the dust and wept.  All that she had
 heard of hell came back to her; she saw the flames blaze, and she smelt
 the smoke, and her flesh withered on the coals.
 
 Near day she came to her mind again, and returned to the house.  It was
 even as the old man saidKeawe slumbered like a child.  Kokua stood and
 gazed upon his face.
 
 Now, my husband, said she, it is your turn to sleep.  When you wake it
 will be your turn to sing and laugh.  But for poor Kokua, alas! that
 meant no evilfor poor Kokua no more sleep, no more singing, no more
 delight, whether in earth or heaven.
 
 With that she lay down in the bed by his side, and her misery was so
 extreme that she fell in a deep slumber instantly.
 
 Late in the morning her husband woke her and gave her the good news.  It
 seemed he was silly with delight, for he paid no heed to her distress,
 ill though she dissembled it.  The words stuck in her mouth, it mattered
 not; Keawe did the speaking.  She ate not a bite, but who was to observe
 it? for Keawe cleared the dish.  Kokua saw and heard him, like some
 strange thing in a dream; there were times when she forgot or doubted,
 and put her hands to her brow; to know herself doomed and hear her
 husband babble, seemed so monstrous.
 
 All the while Keawe was eating and talking, and planning the time of
 their return, and thanking her for saving him, and fondling her, and
 calling her the true helper after all.  He laughed at the old man that
 was fool enough to buy that bottle.
 
 A worthy old man he seemed, Keawe said.  But no one can judge by
 appearances.  For why did the old reprobate require the bottle?
 
 My husband, said Kokua, humbly, his purpose may have been good.
 
 Keawe laughed like an angry man.
 
 Fiddle-de-dee! cried Keawe.  An old rogue, I tell you; and an old ass
 to boot.  For the bottle was hard enough to sell at four centimes; and at
 three it will be quite impossible.  The margin is not broad enough, the
 thing begins to smell of scorchingbrrr! said he, and shuddered.  It is
 true I bought it myself at a cent, when I knew not there were smaller
 coins.  I was a fool for my pains; there will never be found another: and
 whoever has that bottle now will carry it to the pit.
 
 O my husband! said Kokua.  Is it not a terrible thing to save oneself
 by the eternal ruin of another?  It seems to me I could not laugh.  I
 would be humbled.  I would be filled with melancholy.  I would pray for
 the poor holder.
 
 Then Keawe, because he felt the truth of what she said, grew the more
 angry.  Heighty-teighty! cried he.  You may be filled with melancholy
 if you please.  It is not the mind of a good wife.  If you thought at all
 of me, you would sit shamed.
 
 Thereupon he went out, and Kokua was alone.
 
 What chance had she to sell that bottle at two centimes?  None, she
 perceived.  And if she had any, here was her husband hurrying her away to
 a country where there was nothing lower than a cent.  And hereon the
 morrow of her sacrificewas her husband leaving her and blaming her.
 
 She would not even try to profit by what time she had, but sat in the
 house, and now had the bottle out and viewed it with unutterable fear,
 and now, with loathing, hid it out of sight.
 
 By-and-by, Keawe came back, and would have her take a drive.
 
 My husband, I am ill, she said.  I am out of heart.  Excuse me, I can
 take no pleasure.
 
 Then was Keawe more wroth than ever.  With her, because he thought she
 was brooding over the case of the old man; and with himself, because he
 thought she was right, and was ashamed to be so happy.
 
 This is your truth, cried he, and this your affection!  Your husband
 is just saved from eternal ruin, which he encountered for the love of
 youand you can take no pleasure!  Kokua, you have a disloyal heart.
 
 He went forth again furious, and wandered in the town all day.  He met
 friends, and drank with them; they hired a carriage and drove into the
 country, and there drank again.  All the time Keawe was ill at ease,
 because he was taking this pastime while his wife was sad, and because he
 knew in his heart that she was more right than he; and the knowledge made
 him drink the deeper.
 
 Now there was an old brutal Haole drinking with him, one that had been a
 boatswain of a whaler, a runaway, a digger in gold mines, a convict in
 prisons.  He had a low mind and a foul mouth; he loved to drink and to
 see others drunken; and he pressed the glass upon Keawe.  Soon there was
 no more money in the company.
 
 Here, you! says the boatswain, you are rich, you have been always
 saying.  You have a bottle or some foolishness.
 
 Yes, says Keawe, I am rich; I will go back and get some money from my
 wife, who keeps it.
 
 Thats a bad idea, mate, said the boatswain.  Never you trust a
 petticoat with dollars.  Theyre all as false as water; you keep an eye
 on her.
 
 Now, this word struck in Keawes mind; for he was muddled with what he
 had been drinking.
 
 I should not wonder but she was false, indeed, thought he.  Why else
 should she be so cast down at my release?  But I will show her I am not
 the man to be fooled.  I will catch her in the act.
 
 Accordingly, when they were back in town, Keawe bade the boatswain wait
 for him at the corner, by the old calaboose, and went forward up the
 avenue alone to the door of his house.  The night had come again; there
 was a light within, but never a sound; and Keawe crept about the corner,
 opened the back door softly, and looked in.
 
 There was Kokua on the floor, the lamp at her side; before her was a
 milk-white bottle, with a round belly and a long neck; and as she viewed
 it, Kokua wrung her hands.
 
 A long time Keawe stood and looked in the doorway.  At first he was
 struck stupid; and then fear fell upon him that the bargain had been made
 amiss, and the bottle had come back to him as it came at San Francisco;
 and at that his knees were loosened, and the fumes of the wine departed
 from his head like mists off a river in the morning.  And then he had
 another thought; and it was a strange one, that made his cheeks to burn.
 
 I must make sure of this, thought he.
 
 So he closed the door, and went softly round the corner again, and then
 came noisily in, as though he were but now returned.  And, lo! by the
 time he opened the front door no bottle was to be seen; and Kokua sat in
 a chair and started up like one awakened out of sleep.
 
 I have been drinking all day and making merry, said Keawe.  I have
 been with good companions, and now I only come back for money, and return
 to drink and carouse with them again.
 
 Both his face and voice were as stern as judgment, but Kokua was too
 troubled to observe.
 
 You do well to use your own, my husband, said she, and her words
 trembled.
 
 O, I do well in all things, said Keawe, and he went straight to the
 chest and took out money.  But he looked besides in the corner where they
 kept the bottle, and there was no bottle there.
 
 At that the chest heaved upon the floor like a sea-billow, and the house
 span about him like a wreath of smoke, for he saw he was lost now, and
 there was no escape.  It is what I feared, he thought.  It is she who
 has bought it.
 
 And then he came to himself a little and rose up; but the sweat streamed
 on his face as thick as the rain and as cold as the well-water.
 
 Kokua, said he, I said to you to-day what ill became me.  Now I return
 to carouse with my jolly companions, and at that he laughed a little
 quietly.  I will take more pleasure in the cup if you forgive me.
 
 She clasped his knees in a moment; she kissed his knees with flowing
 tears.
 
 O, she cried, I asked but a kind word!
 
 Let us never one think hardly of the other, said Keawe, and was gone
 out of the house.
 
 Now, the money that Keawe had taken was only some of that store of
 centime pieces they had laid in at their arrival.  It was very sure he
 had no mind to be drinking.  His wife had given her soul for him, now he
 must give his for hers; no other thought was in the world with him.
 
 At the corner, by the old calaboose, there was the boatswain waiting.
 
 My wife has the bottle, said Keawe, and, unless you help me to recover
 it, there can be no more money and no more liquor to-night.
 
 You do not mean to say you are serious about that bottle? cried the
 boatswain.
 
 There is the lamp, said Keawe.  Do I look as if I was jesting?
 
 That is so, said the boatswain.  You look as serious as a ghost.
 
 Well, then, said Keawe, here are two centimes; you must go to my wife
 in the house, and offer her these for the bottle, which (if I am not much
 mistaken) she will give you instantly.  Bring it to me here, and I will
 buy it back from you for one; for that is the law with this bottle, that
 it still must be sold for a less sum.  But whatever you do, never breathe
 a word to her that you have come from me.
 
 Mate, I wonder are you making a fool of me? asked the boatswain.
 
 It will do you no harm if I am, returned Keawe.
 
 That is so, mate, said the boatswain.
 
 And if you doubt me, added Keawe, you can try.  As soon as you are
 clear of the house, wish to have your pocket full of money, or a bottle
 of the best rum, or what you please, and you will see the virtue of the
 thing.
 
 Very well, Kanaka, says the boatswain.  I will try; but if you are
 having your fun out of me, I will take my fun out of you with a belaying
 pin.
 
 So the whaler-man went off up the avenue; and Keawe stood and waited.  It
 was near the same spot where Kokua had waited the night before; but Keawe
 was more resolved, and never faltered in his purpose; only his soul was
 bitter with despair.
 
 It seemed a long time he had to wait before he heard a voice singing in
 the darkness of the avenue.  He knew the voice to be the boatswains; but
 it was strange how drunken it appeared upon a sudden.
 
 Next, the man himself came stumbling into the light of the lamp.  He had
 the devils bottle buttoned in his coat; another bottle was in his hand;
 and even as he came in view he raised it to his mouth and drank.
 
 You have it, said Keawe.  I see that.
 
 Hands off! cried the boatswain, jumping back.  Take a step near me,
 and Ill smash your mouth.  You thought you could make a cats-paw of me,
 did you?
 
 What do you mean? cried Keawe.
 
 Mean? cried the boatswain.  This is a pretty good bottle, this is;
 thats what I mean.  How I got it for two centimes I cant make out; but
 Im sure you shant have it for one.
 
 You mean you wont sell? gasped Keawe.
 
 No, _sir_! cried the boatswain.  But Ill give you a drink of the rum,
 if you like.
 
 I tell you, said Keawe, the man who has that bottle goes to hell.
 
 I reckon Im going anyway, returned the sailor; and this bottles the
 best thing to go with Ive struck yet.  No, sir! he cried again, this
 is my bottle now, and you can go and fish for another.
 
 Can this be true? Keawe cried.  For your own sake, I beseech you, sell
 it me!
 
 I dont value any of your talk, replied the boatswain.  You thought I
 was a flat; now you see Im not; and theres an end.  If you wont have a
 swallow of the rum, Ill have one myself.  Heres your health, and
 good-night to you!
 
 So off he went down the avenue towards town, and there goes the bottle
 out of the story.
 
 But Keawe ran to Kokua light as the wind; and great was their joy that
 night; and great, since then, has been the peace of all their days in the
 Bright House.
 
 
 
 THE ISLE OF VOICES.
 
 
 Keola was married with Lehua, daughter of Kalamake, the wise man of
 Molokai, and he kept his dwelling with the father of his wife.  There was
 no man more cunning than that prophet; he read the stars, he could divine
 by the bodies of the dead, and by the means of evil creatures: he could
 go alone into the highest parts of the mountain, into the region of the
 hobgoblins, and there he would lay snares to entrap the spirits of the
 ancient.
 
 For this reason no man was more consulted in all the Kingdom of Hawaii.
 Prudent people bought, and sold, and married, and laid out their lives by
 his counsels; and the King had him twice to Kona to seek the treasures of
 Kamehameha.  Neither was any man more feared: of his enemies, some had
 dwindled in sickness by the virtue of his incantations, and some had been
 spirited away, the life and the clay both, so that folk looked in vain
 for so much as a bone of their bodies.  It was rumoured that he had the
 art or the gift of the old heroes.  Men had seen him at night upon the
 mountains, stepping from one cliff to the next; they had seen him walking
 in the high forest, and his head and shoulders were above the trees.
 
 This Kalamake was a strange man to see.  He was come of the best blood in
 Molokai and Maui, of a pure descent; and yet he was more white to look
 upon than any foreigner: his hair the colour of dry grass, and his eyes
 red and very blind, so that Blind as Kalamake, that can see across
 to-morrow, was a byword in the islands.
 
 Of all these doings of his father-in-law, Keola knew a little by the
 common repute, a little more he suspected, and the rest he ignored.  But
 there was one thing troubled him.  Kalamake was a man that spared for
 nothing, whether to eat or to drink, or to wear; and for all he paid in
 bright new dollars.  Bright as Kalamakes dollars, was another saying
 in the Eight Isles.  Yet he neither sold, nor planted, nor took hireonly
 now and then from his sorceriesand there was no source conceivable for
 so much silver coin.
 
 It chanced one day Keolas wife was gone upon a visit to Kaunakakai, on
 the lee side of the island, and the men were forth at the sea-fishing.
 But Keola was an idle dog, and he lay in the verandah and watched the
 surf beat on the shore and the birds fly about the cliff.  It was a chief
 thought with him alwaysthe thought of the bright dollars.  When he lay
 down to bed he would be wondering why they were so many, and when he woke
 at morn he would be wondering why they were all new; and the thing was
 never absent from his mind.  But this day of all days he made sure in his
 heart of some discovery.  For it seems he had observed the place where
 Kalamake kept his treasure, which was a lock-fast desk against the
 parlour wall, under the print of Kamehameha the Fifth, and a photograph
 of Queen Victoria with her crown; and it seems again that, no later than
 the night before, he found occasion to look in, and behold! the bag lay
 there empty.  And this was the day of the steamer; he could see her smoke
 off Kalaupapa; and she must soon arrive with a months goods, tinned
 salmon and gin, and all manner of rare luxuries for Kalamake.
 
 Now if he can pay for his goods to-day, Keola thought, I shall know
 for certain that the man is a warlock, and the dollars come out of the
 Devils pocket.
 
 While he was so thinking, there was his father-in-law behind him, looking
 vexed.
 
 Is that the steamer? he asked.
 
 Yes, said Keola.  She has but to call at Pelekunu, and then she will
 be here.
 
 There is no help for it then, returned Kalamake, and I must take you
 in my confidence, Keola, for the lack of anyone better.  Come here within
 the house.
 
 So they stepped together into the parlour, which was a very fine room,
 papered and hung with prints, and furnished with a rocking-chair, and a
 table and a sofa in the European style.  There was a shelf of books
 besides, and a family Bible in the midst of the table, and the lock-fast
 writing desk against the wall; so that anyone could see it was the house
 of a man of substance.
 
 Kalamake made Keola close the shutters of the windows, while he himself
 locked all the doors and set open the lid of the desk.  From this he
 brought forth a pair of necklaces hung with charms and shells, a bundle
 of dried herbs, and the dried leaves of trees, and a green branch of
 palm.
 
 What I am about, said he, is a thing beyond wonder.  The men of old
 were wise; they wrought marvels, and this among the rest; but that was at
 night, in the dark, under the fit stars and in the desert.  The same will
 I do here in my own house and under the plain eye of day.
 
 So saying, he put the bible under the cushion of the sofa so that it was
 all covered, brought out from the same place a mat of a wonderfully fine
 texture, and heaped the herbs and leaves on sand in a tin pan.  And then
 he and Keola put on the necklaces and took their stand upon the opposite
 corners of the mat.
 
 The time comes, said the warlock; be not afraid.
 
 With that he set flame to the herbs, and began to mutter and wave the
 branch of palm.  At first the light was dim because of the closed
 shutters; but the herbs caught strongly afire, and the flames beat upon
 Keola, and the room glowed with the burning; and next the smoke rose and
 made his head swim and his eyes darken, and the sound of Kalamake
 muttering ran in his ears.  And suddenly, to the mat on which they were
 standing came a snatch or twitch, that seemed to be more swift than
 lightning.  In the same wink the room was gone and the house, the breath
 all beaten from Keolas body.  Volumes of light rolled upon his eyes and
 head, and he found himself transported to a beach of the sea under a
 strong sun, with a great surf roaring: he and the warlock standing there
 on the same mat, speechless, gasping and grasping at one another, and
 passing their hands before their eyes.
 
 What was this? cried Keola, who came to himself the first, because he
 was the younger.  The pang of it was like death.
 
 It matters not, panted Kalamake.  It is now done.
 
 And, in the name of God, where are we? cried Keola.
 
 That is not the question, replied the sorcerer.  Being here, we have
 matter in our hands, and that we must attend to.  Go, while I recover my
 breath, into the borders of the wood, and bring me the leaves of such and
 such a herb, and such and such a tree, which you will find to grow there
 plentifullythree handfuls of each.  And be speedy.  We must be home
 again before the steamer comes; it would seem strange if we had
 disappeared.  And he sat on the sand and panted.
 
 Keola went up the beach, which was of shining sand and coral, strewn with
 singular shells; and he thought in his heart
 
 How do I not know this beach?  I will come here again and gather
 shells.
 
 In front of him was a line of palms against the sky; not like the palms
 of the Eight Islands, but tall and fresh and beautiful, and hanging out
 withered fans like gold among the green, and he thought in his heart
 
 It is strange I should not have found this grove.  I will come here
 again, when it is warm, to sleep.  And he thought, How warm it has
 grown suddenly!  For it was winter in Hawaii, and the day had been
 chill.  And he thought also, Where are the grey mountains?  And where is
 the high cliff with the hanging forest and the wheeling birds?  And the
 more he considered, the less he might conceive in what quarter of the
 islands he was fallen.
 
 In the border of the grove, where it met the beach, the herb was growing,
 but the tree further back.  Now, as Keola went toward the tree, he was
 aware of a young woman who had nothing on her body but a belt of leaves.
 
 Well! thought Keola, they are not very particular about their dress in
 this part of the country.  And he paused, supposing she would observe
 him and escape; and seeing that she still looked before her, stood and
 hummed aloud.  Up she leaped at the sound.  Her face was ashen; she
 looked this way and that, and her mouth gaped with the terror of her
 soul.  But it was a strange thing that her eyes did not rest upon Keola.
 
 Good day, said he.  You need not be so frightened; I will not eat
 you.  And he had scarce opened his mouth before the young woman fled
 into the bush.
 
 These are strange manners, thought Keola.  And, not thinking what he
 did, ran after her.
 
 As she ran, the girl kept crying in some speech that was not practised in
 Hawaii, yet some of the words were the same, and he knew she kept calling
 and warning others.  And presently he saw more people runningmen, women
 and children, one with another, all running and crying like people at a
 fire.  And with that he began to grow afraid himself, and returned to
 Kalamake bringing the leaves.  Him he told what he had seen.
 
 You must pay no heed, said Kalamake.  All this is like a dream and
 shadows.  All will disappear and be forgotten.
 
 It seemed none saw me, said Keola.
 
 And none did, replied the sorcerer.  We walk here in the broad sun
 invisible by reason of these charms.  Yet they hear us; and therefore it
 is well to speak softly, as I do.
 
 With that he made a circle round the mat with stones, and in the midst he
 set the leaves.
 
 It will be your part, said he, to keep the leaves alight, and feed the
 fire slowly.  While they blaze (which is but for a little moment) I must
 do my errand; and before the ashes blacken, the same power that brought
 us carries us away.  Be ready now with the match; and do you call me in
 good time lest the flames burn out and I be left.
 
 As soon as the leaves caught, the sorcerer leaped like a deer out of the
 circle, and began to race along the beach like a hound that has been
 bathing.  As he ran, he kept stooping to snatch shells; and it seemed to
 Keola that they glittered as he took them.  The leaves blazed with a
 clear flame that consumed them swiftly; and presently Keola had but a
 handful left, and the sorcerer was far off, running and stopping.
 
 Back! cried Keola.  Back!  The leaves are near done.
 
 At that Kalamake turned, and if he had run before, now he flew.  But fast
 as he ran, the leaves burned faster.  The flame was ready to expire when,
 with a great leap, he bounded on the mat.  The wind of his leaping blew
 it out; and with that the beach was gone, and the sun and the sea, and
 they stood once more in the dimness of the shuttered parlour, and were
 once more shaken and blinded; and on the mat betwixt them lay a pile of
 shining dollars.  Keola ran to the shutters; and there was the steamer
 tossing in the swell close in.
 
 The same night Kalamake took his son-in-law apart, and gave him five
 dollars in his hand.
 
 Keola, said he, if you are a wise man (which I am doubtful of) you
 will think you slept this afternoon on the verandah, and dreamed as you
 were sleeping.  I am a man of few words, and I have for my helpers people
 of short memories.
 
 Never a word more said Kalamake, nor referred again to that affair.  But
 it ran all the while in Keolas headif he were lazy before, he would now
 do nothing.
 
 Why should I work, thought he, when I have a father-in-law who makes
 dollars of sea-shells?
 
 Presently his share was spent.  He spent it all upon fine clothes.  And
 then he was sorry:
 
 For, thought he, I had done better to have bought a concertina, with
 which I might have entertained myself all day long.  And then he began
 to grow vexed with Kalamake.
 
 This man has the soul of a dog, thought he.  He can gather dollars
 when he pleases on the beach, and he leaves me to pine for a concertina!
 Let him beware: I am no child, I am as cunning as he, and hold his
 secret.  With that he spoke to his wife Lehua, and complained of her
 fathers manners.
 
 I would let my father be, said Lehua.  He is a dangerous man to
 cross.
 
 I care that for him! cried Keola; and snapped his fingers.  I have him
 by the nose.  I can make him do what I please.  And he told Lehua the
 story.
 
 But she shook her head.
 
 You may do what you like, said she; but as sure as you thwart my
 father, you will be no more heard of.  Think of this person, and that
 person; think of Hua, who was a noble of the House of Representatives,
 and went to Honolulu every year; and not a bone or a hair of him was
 found.  Remember Kamau, and how he wasted to a thread, so that his wife
 lifted him with one hand.  Keola, you are a baby in my fathers hands; he
 will take you with his thumb and finger and eat you like a shrimp.
 
 Now Keola was truly afraid of Kalamake, but he was vain too; and these
 words of his wifes incensed him.
 
 Very well, said he, if that is what you think of me, I will show how
 much you are deceived.  And he went straight to where his father-in-law
 was sitting in the parlour.
 
 Kalamake, said he, I want a concertina.
 
 Do you, indeed? said Kalamake.
 
 Yes, said he, and I may as well tell you plainly, I mean to have it.
 A man who picks up dollars on the beach can certainly afford a
 concertina.
 
 I had no idea you had so much spirit, replied the sorcerer.  I thought
 you were a timid, useless lad, and I cannot describe how much pleased I
 am to find I was mistaken.  Now I begin to think I may have found an
 assistant and successor in my difficult business.  A concertina?  You
 shall have the best in Honolulu.  And to-night, as soon as it is dark,
 you and I will go and find the money.
 
 Shall we return to the beach? asked Keola.
 
 No, no! replied Kalamake; you must begin to learn more of my secrets.
 Last time I taught you to pick shells; this time I shall teach you to
 catch fish.  Are you strong enough to launch Pilis boat?
 
 I think I am, returned Keola.  But why should we not take your own,
 which is afloat already?
 
 I have a reason which you will understand thoroughly before to-morrow,
 said Kalamake.  Pilis boat is the better suited for my purpose.  So, if
 you please, let us meet there as soon as it is dark; and in the
 meanwhile, let us keep our own counsel, for there is no cause to let the
 family into our business.
 
 Honey is not more sweet than was the voice of Kalamake, and Keola could
 scarce contain his satisfaction.
 
 I might have had my concertina weeks ago, thought he, and there is
 nothing needed in this world but a little courage.
 
 Presently after he spied Lehua weeping, and was half in a mind to tell
 her all was well.
 
 But no, thinks he; I shall wait till I can show her the concertina; we
 shall see what the chit will do then.  Perhaps she will understand in the
 future that her husband is a man of some intelligence.
 
 As soon as it was dark father and son-in-law launched Pilis boat and set
 the sail.  There was a great sea, and it blew strong from the leeward;
 but the boat was swift and light and dry, and skimmed the waves.  The
 wizard had a lantern, which he lit and held with his finger through the
 ring; and the two sat in the stern and smoked cigars, of which Kalamake
 had always a provision, and spoke like friends of magic and the great
 sums of money which they could make by its exercise, and what they should
 buy first, and what second; and Kalamake talked like a father.
 
 Presently he looked all about, and above him at the stars, and back at
 the island, which was already three parts sunk under the sea, and he
 seemed to consider ripely his position.
 
 Look! says he, there is Molokai already far behind us, and Maui like a
 cloud; and by the bearing of these three stars I know I am come where I
 desire.  This part of the sea is called the Sea of the Dead.  It is in
 this place extraordinarily deep, and the floor is all covered with the
 bones of men, and in the holes of this part gods and goblins keep their
 habitation.  The flow of the sea is to the north, stronger than a shark
 can swim, and any man who shall here be thrown out of a ship it bears
 away like a wild horse into the uttermost ocean.  Presently he is spent
 and goes down, and his bones are scattered with the rest, and the gods
 devour his spirit.
 
 Fear came on Keola at the words, and he looked, and by the light of the
 stars and the lantern, the warlock seemed to change.
 
 What ails you? cried Keola, quick and sharp.
 
 It is not I who am ailing, said the wizard; but there is one here very
 sick.
 
 With that he changed his grasp upon the lantern, and, behold I as he drew
 his finger from the ring, the finger stuck and the ring was burst, and
 his hand was grown to be of the bigness of three.
 
 At that sight Keola screamed and covered his face.
 
 But Kalamake held up the lantern.  Look rather at my face! said heand
 his head was huge as a barrel; and still he grew and grew as a cloud
 grows on a mountain, and Keola sat before him screaming, and the boat
 raced on the great seas.
 
 And now, said the wizard, what do you think about that concertina? and
 are you sure you would not rather have a flute?  No? says he; that is
 well, for I do not like my family to be changeable of purpose.  But I
 begin to think I had better get out of this paltry boat, for my bulk
 swells to a very unusual degree, and if we are not the more careful, she
 will presently be swamped.
 
 With that he threw his legs over the side.  Even as he did so, the
 greatness of the man grew thirty-fold and forty-fold as swift as sight or
 thinking, so that he stood in the deep seas to the armpits, and his head
 and shoulders rose like a high isle, and the swell beat and burst upon
 his bosom, as it beats and breaks against a cliff.  The boat ran still to
 the north, but he reached out his hand, and took the gunwale by the
 finger and thumb, and broke the side like a biscuit, and Keola was
 spilled into the sea.  And the pieces of the boat the sorcerer crushed in
 the hollow of his hand and flung miles away into the night.
 
 Excuse me taking the lantern, said he; for I have a long wade before
 me, and the land is far, and the bottom of the sea uneven, and I feel the
 bones under my toes.
 
 And he turned and went off walking with great strides; and as often as
 Keola sank in the trough he could see him no longer; but as often as he
 was heaved upon the crest, there he was striding and dwindling, and he
 held the lamp high over his head, and the waves broke white about him as
 he went.
 
 Since first the islands were fished out of the sea, there was never a man
 so terrified as this Keola.  He swam indeed, but he swam as puppies swim
 when they are cast in to drown, and knew not wherefore.  He could but
 think of the hugeness of the swelling of the warlock, of that face which
 was great as a mountain, of those shoulders that were broad as an isle,
 and of the seas that beat on them in vain.  He thought, too, of the
 concertina, and shame took hold upon him; and of the dead mens bones,
 and fear shook him.
 
 Of a sudden he was aware of something dark against the stars that tossed,
 and a light below, and a brightness of the cloven sea; and he heard
 speech of men.  He cried out aloud and a voice answered; and in a
 twinkling the bows of a ship hung above him on a wave like a thing
 balanced, and swooped down.  He caught with his two hands in the chains
 of her, and the next moment was buried in the rushing seas, and the next
 hauled on board by seamen.
 
 They gave him gin and biscuit and dry clothes, and asked him how he came
 where they found him, and whether the light which they had seen was the
 lighthouse, Lae o Ka Laau.  But Keola knew white men are like children
 and only believe their own stories; so about himself he told them what he
 pleased, and as for the light (which was Kalamakes lantern) he vowed he
 had seen none.
 
 This ship was a schooner bound for Honolulu, and then to trade in the low
 islands; and by a very good chance for Keola she had lost a man off the
 bowsprit in a squall.  It was no use talking.  Keola durst not stay in
 the Eight Islands.  Word goes so quickly, and all men are so fond to talk
 and carry news, that if he hid in the north end of Kauai or in the south
 end of Kau, the wizard would have wind of it before a month, and he must
 perish.  So he did what seemed the most prudent, and shipped sailor in
 the place of the man who had been drowned.
 
 In some ways the ship was a good place.  The food was extraordinarily
 rich and plenty, with biscuits and salt beef every day, and pea-soup and
 puddings made of flour and suet twice a week, so that Keola grew fat.
 The captain also was a good man, and the crew no worse than other whites.
 The trouble was the mate, who was the most difficult man to please Keola
 had ever met with, and beat and cursed him daily, both for what he did
 and what he did not.  The blows that he dealt were very sore, for he was
 strong; and the words he used were very unpalatable, for Keola was come
 of a good family and accustomed to respect.  And what was the worst of
 all, whenever Keola found a chance to sleep, there was the mate awake and
 stirring him up with a ropes end.  Keola saw it would never do; and he
 made up his mind to run away.
 
 They were about a month out from Honolulu when they made the land.  It
 was a fine starry night, the sea was smooth as well as the sky fair; it
 blew a steady trade; and there was the island on their weather bow, a
 ribbon of palm trees lying flat along the sea.  The captain and the mate
 looked at it with the night glass, and named the name of it, and talked
 of it, beside the wheel where Keola was steering.  It seemed it was an
 isle where no traders came.  By the captains way, it was an isle besides
 where no man dwelt; but the mate thought otherwise.
 
 I dont give a cent for the directory, said he, Ive been past here
 one night in the schooner _Eugenie_; it was just such a night as this;
 they were fishing with torches, and the beach was thick with lights like
 a town.
 
 Well, well, says the captain, its steep-to, thats the great point;
 and there aint any outlying dangers by the chart, so well just hug the
 lee side of it.  Keep her romping full, dont I tell you! he cried to
 Keola, who was listening so hard that he forgot to steer.
 
 And the mate cursed him, and swore that Kanaka was for no use in the
 world, and if he got started after him with a belaying pin, it would be a
 cold day for Keola.
 
 And so the captain and mate lay down on the house together, and Keola was
 left to himself.
 
 This island will do very well for me, he thought; if no traders deal
 there, the mate will never come.  And as for Kalamake, it is not possible
 he can ever get as far as this.
 
 With that he kept edging the schooner nearer in.  He had to do this
 quietly, for it was the trouble with these white men, and above all with
 the mate, that you could never be sure of them; they would all be
 sleeping sound, or else pretending, and if a sail shook, they would jump
 to their feet and fall on you with a ropes end.  So Keola edged her up
 little by little, and kept all drawing.  And presently the land was close
 on board, and the sound of the sea on the sides of it grew loud.
 
 With that, the mate sat up suddenly upon the house.
 
 What are you doing? he roars.  Youll have the ship ashore!
 
 And he made one bound for Keola, and Keola made another clean over the
 rail and plump into the starry sea.  When he came up again, the schooner
 had payed off on her true course, and the mate stood by the wheel
 himself, and Keola heard him cursing.  The sea was smooth under the lee
 of the island; it was warm besides, and Keola had his sailors knife, so
 he had no fear of sharks.  A little way before him the trees stopped;
 there was a break in the line of the land like the mouth of a harbour;
 and the tide, which was then flowing, took him up and carried him
 through.  One minute he was without, and the next within: had floated
 there in a wide shallow water, bright with ten thousand stars, and all
 about him was the ring of the land, with its string of palm trees.  And
 he was amazed, because this was a kind of island he had never heard of.
 
 The time of Keola in that place was in two periodsthe period when he was
 alone, and the period when he was there with the tribe.  At first he
 sought everywhere and found no man; only some houses standing in a
 hamlet, and the marks of fires.  But the ashes of the fires were cold and
 the rains had washed them away; and the winds had blown, and some of the
 huts were overthrown.  It was here he took his dwelling, and he made a
 fire drill, and a shell hook, and fished and cooked his fish, and climbed
 after green cocoanuts, the juice of which he drank, for in all the isle
 there was no water.  The days were long to him, and the nights
 terrifying.  He made a lamp of cocoa-shell, and drew the oil of the ripe
 nuts, and made a wick of fibre; and when evening came he closed up his
 hut, and lit his lamp, and lay and trembled till morning.  Many a time he
 thought in his heart he would have been better in the bottom of the sea,
 his bones rolling there with the others.
 
 All this while he kept by the inside of the island, for the huts were on
 the shore of the lagoon, and it was there the palms grew best, and the
 lagoon itself abounded with good fish.  And to the outer slide he went
 once only, and he looked but the once at the beach of the ocean, and came
 away shaking.  For the look of it, with its bright sand, and strewn
 shells, and strong sun and surf, went sore against his inclination.
 
 It cannot be, he thought, and yet it is very like.  And how do I know?
 These white men, although they pretend to know where they are sailing,
 must take their chance like other people.  So that after all we may have
 sailed in a circle, and I may be quite near to Molokai, and this may be
 the very beach where my father-in-law gathers his dollars.
 
 So after that he was prudent, and kept to the land side.
 
 It was perhaps a month later, when the people of the place arrivedthe
 fill of six great boats.  They were a fine race of men, and spoke a
 tongue that sounded very different from the tongue of Hawaii, but so many
 of the words were the same that it was not difficult to understand.  The
 men besides were very courteous, and the women very towardly; and they
 made Keola welcome, and built him a house, and gave him a wife; and what
 surprised him the most, he was never sent to work with the young men.
 
 And now Keola had three periods.  First he had a period of being very
 sad, and then he had a period when he was pretty merry.  Last of all came
 the third, when he was the most terrified man in the four oceans.
 
 The cause of the first period was the girl he had to wife.  He was in
 doubt about the island, and he might have been in doubt about the speech,
 of which he had heard so little when he came there with the wizard on the
 mat.  But about his wife there was no mistake conceivable, for she was
 the same girl that ran from him crying in the wood.  So he had sailed all
 this way, and might as well have stayed in Molokai; and had left home and
 wife and all his friends for no other cause but to escape his enemy, and
 the place he had come to was that wizards hunting ground, and the shore
 where he walked invisible.  It was at this period when he kept the most
 close to the lagoon side, and as far as he dared, abode in the cover of
 his hut.
 
 The cause of the second period was talk he heard from his wife and the
 chief islanders.  Keola himself said little.  He was never so sure of his
 new friends, for he judged they were too civil to be wholesome, and since
 he had grown better acquainted with his father-in-law the man had grown
 more cautious.  So he told them nothing of himself, but only his name and
 descent, and that he came from the Eight Islands, and what fine islands
 they were; and about the kings palace in Honolulu, and how he was a
 chief friend of the king and the missionaries.  But he put many questions
 and learned much.  The island where he was was called the Isle of Voices;
 it belonged to the tribe, but they made their home upon another, three
 hours sail to the southward.  There they lived and had their permanent
 houses, and it was a rich island, where were eggs and chickens and pigs,
 and ships came trading with rum and tobacco.  It was there the schooner
 had gone after Keola deserted; there, too, the mate had died, like the
 fool of a white man as he was.  It seems, when the ship came, it was the
 beginning of the sickly season in that isle, when the fish of the lagoon
 are poisonous, and all who eat of them swell up and die.  The mate was
 told of it; he saw the boats preparing, because in that season the people
 leave that island and sail to the Isle of Voices; but he was a fool of a
 white man, who would believe no stories but his own, and he caught one of
 these fish, cooked it and ate it, and swelled up and died, which was good
 news to Keola.  As for the Isle of Voices, it lay solitary the most part
 of the year; only now and then a boats crew came for copra, and in the
 bad season, when the fish at the main isle were poisonous, the tribe
 dwelt there in a body.  It had its name from a marvel, for it seemed the
 seaside of it was all beset with invisible devils; day and night you
 heard them talking one with another in strange tongues; day and night
 little fires blazed up and were extinguished on the beach; and what was
 the cause of these doings no man might conceive.  Keola asked them if it
 were the same in their own island where they stayed, and they told him
 no, not there; nor yet in any other of some hundred isles that lay all
 about them in that sea; but it was a thing peculiar to the Isle of
 Voices.  They told him also that these fires and voices were ever on the
 seaside and in the seaward fringes of the wood, and a man might dwell by
 the lagoon two thousand years (if he could live so long) and never be any
 way troubled; and even on the seaside the devils did no harm if let
 alone.  Only once a chief had cast a spear at one of the voices, and the
 same night he fell out of a cocoanut palm and was killed.
 
 Keola thought a good bit with himself.  He saw he would be all right when
 the tribe returned to the main island, and right enough where he was, if
 he kept by the lagoon, yet he had a mind to make things righter if he
 could.  So he told the high chief he had once been in an isle that was
 pestered the same way, and the folk had found a means to cure that
 trouble.
 
 There was a tree growing in the bush there, says he, and it seems
 these devils came to get the leaves of it.  So the people of the isle cut
 down the tree wherever it was found, and the devils came no more.
 
 They asked what kind of tree this was, and he showed them the tree of
 which Kalamake burned the leaves.  They found it hard to believe, yet the
 idea tickled them.  Night after night the old men debated it in their
 councils, but the high chief (though he was a brave man) was afraid of
 the matter, and reminded them daily of the chief who cast a spear against
 the voices and was killed, and the thought of that brought all to a stand
 again.
 
 Though he could not yet bring about the destruction of the trees, Keola
 was well enough pleased, and began to look about him and take pleasure in
 his days; and, among other things, he was the kinder to his wife, so that
 the girl began to love him greatly.  One day he came to the hut, and she
 lay on the ground lamenting.
 
 Why, said Keola, what is wrong with you now?
 
 She declared it was nothing.
 
 The same night she woke him.  The lamp burned very low, but he saw by her
 face she was in sorrow.
 
 Keola, she said, put your ear to my mouth that I may whisper, for no
 one must hear us.  Two days before the boats begin to be got ready, go
 you to the sea-side of the isle and lie in a thicket.  We shall choose
 that place before-hand, you and I; and hide food; and every night I shall
 come near by there singing.  So when a night comes and you do not hear
 me, you shall know we are clean gone out of the island, and you may come
 forth again in safety.
 
 The soul of Keola died within him.
 
 What is this? he cried.  I cannot live among devils.  I will not be
 left behind upon this isle.  I am dying to leave it.
 
 You will never leave it alive, my poor Keola, said the girl; for to
 tell you the truth, my people are eaters of men; but this they keep
 secret.  And the reason they will kill you before we leave is because in
 our island ships come, and Donat-Kimaran comes and talks for the French,
 and there is a white trader there in a house with a verandah, and a
 catechist.  Oh, that is a fine place indeed!  The trader has barrels
 filled with flour, and a French warship once came in the lagoon and gave
 everybody wine and biscuit.  Ah, my poor Keola, I wish I could take you
 there, for great is my love to you, and it is the finest place in the
 seas except Papeete.
 
 So now Keola was the most terrified man in the four oceans.  He had heard
 tell of eaters of men in the south islands, and the thing had always been
 a fear to him; and here it was knocking at his door.  He had heard
 besides, by travellers, of their practices, and how when they are in a
 mind to eat a man, they cherish and fondle him like a mother with a
 favourite baby.  And he saw this must be his own case; and that was why
 he had been housed, and fed, and wived, and liberated from all work; and
 why the old men and the chiefs discoursed with him like a person of
 weight.  So he lay on his bed and railed upon his destiny; and the flesh
 curdled on his bones.
 
 The next day the people of the tribe were very civil, as their way was.
 They were elegant speakers, and they made beautiful poetry, and jested at
 meals, so that a missionary must have died laughing.  It was little
 enough Keola cared for their fine ways; all he saw was the white teeth
 shining in their mouths, and his gorge rose at the sight; and when they
 were done eating, he went and lay in the bush like a dead man.
 
 The next day it was the same, and then his wife followed him.
 
 Keola, she said, if you do not eat, I tell you plainly you will be
 killed and cooked to-morrow.  Some of the old chiefs are murmuring
 already.  They think you are fallen sick and must lose flesh.
 
 With that Keola got to his feet, and anger burned in him.
 
 It is little I care one way or the other, said he.  I am between the
 devil and the deep sea.  Since die I must, let me die the quickest way;
 and since I must be eaten at the best of it, let me rather be eaten by
 hobgoblins than by men.  Farewell, said he, and he left her standing,
 and walked to the sea-side of that island.
 
 It was all bare in the strong sun; there was no sign of man, only the
 beach was trodden, and all about him as he went, the voices talked and
 whispered, and the little fires sprang up and burned down.  All tongues
 of the earth were spoken there; the French, the Dutch, the Russian, the
 Tamil, the Chinese.  Whatever land knew sorcery, there were some of its
 people whispering in Keolas ear.  That beach was thick as a cried fair,
 yet no man seen; and as he walked he saw the shells vanish before him,
 and no man to pick them up.  I think the devil would have been afraid to
 be alone in such a company; but Keola was past fear and courted death.
 When the fires sprang up, he charged for them like a bull.  Bodiless
 voices called to and fro; unseen hands poured sand upon the flames; and
 they were gone from the beach before he reached them.
 
 It is plain Kalamake is not here, he thought, or I must have been
 killed long since.
 
 With that he sat him down in the margin of the wood, for he was tired,
 and put his chin upon his hands.  The business before his eyes continued:
 the beach babbled with voices, and the fires sprang up and sank, and the
 shells vanished and were renewed again even while he looked.
 
 It was a by-day when I was here before, he thought, for it was nothing
 to this.
 
 And his head was dizzy with the thought of these millions and millions of
 dollars, and all these hundreds and hundreds of persons culling them upon
 the beach and flying in the air higher and swifter than eagles.
 
 And to think how they have fooled me with their talk of mints, says he,
 and that money was made there, when it is clear that all the new coin in
 all the world is gathered on these sands!  But I will know better the
 next time! said he.
 
 And at last, he knew not very well how or when, sleep feel on Keola, and
 he forgot the island and all his sorrows.
 
 Early the next day, before the sun was yet up, a bustle woke him.  He
 awoke in fear, for he thought the tribe had caught him napping: but it
 was no such matter.  Only, on the beach in front of him, the bodiless
 voices called and shouted one upon another, and it seemed they all passed
 and swept beside him up the coast of the island.
 
 What is afoot now? thinks Keola.  And it was plain to him it was
 something beyond ordinary, for the fires were not lighted nor the shells
 taken, but the bodiless voices kept posting up the beach, and hailing and
 dying away; and others following, and by the sound of them these wizards
 should be angry.
 
 It is not me they are angry at, thought Keola, for they pass me
 close.
 
 As when hounds go by, or horses in a race, or city folk coursing to a
 fire, and all men join and follow after, so it was now with Keola; and he
 knew not what he did, nor why he did it, but there, lo and behold! he was
 running with the voices.
 
 So he turned one point of the island, and this brought him in view of a
 second; and there he remembered the wizard trees to have been growing by
 the score together in a wood.  From this point there went up a hubbub of
 men crying not to be described; and by the sound of them, those that he
 ran with shaped their course for the same quarter.  A little nearer, and
 there began to mingle with the outcry the crash of many axes.  And at
 this a thought came at last into his mind that the high chief had
 consented; that the men of the tribe had set-to cutting down these trees;
 that word had gone about the isle from sorcerer to sorcerer, and these
 were all now assembling to defend their trees.  Desire of strange things
 swept him on.  He posted with the voices, crossed the beach, and came
 into the borders of the wood, and stood astonished.  One tree had fallen,
 others were part hewed away.  There was the tribe clustered.  They were
 back to back, and bodies lay, and blood flowed among their feet.  The hue
 of fear was on all their faces; their voices went up to heaven shrill as
 a weasels cry.
 
 Have you seen a child when he is all alone and has a wooden sword, and
 fights, leaping and hewing with the empty air?  Even so the man-eaters
 huddled back to back, and heaved up their axes, and laid on, and screamed
 as they laid on, and behold! no man to contend with them! only here and
 there Keola saw an axe swinging over against them without hands; and time
 and again a man of the tribe would fall before it, clove in twain or
 burst asunder, and his soul sped howling.
 
 For awhile Keola looked upon this prodigy like one that dreams, and then
 fear took him by the midst as sharp as death, that he should behold such
 doings.  Even in that same flash the high chief of the clan espied him
 standing, and pointed and called out his name.  Thereat the whole tribe
 saw him also, and their eyes flashed, and their teeth clashed.
 
 I am too long here, thought Keola, and ran further out of the wood and
 down the beach, not caring whither.
 
 Keola! said, a voice close by upon the empty sand.
 
 Lehua! is that you? he cried, and gasped, and looked in vain for her;
 but by the eyesight he was stark alone.
 
 I saw you pass before, the voice answered: but you would not hear me.
 Quick! get the leaves and the herbs, and let us free.
 
 You are there with the mat? he asked.
 
 Here, at your side; said she.  And he felt her arms about him.  Quick!
 the leaves and the herbs, before my father can get back!
 
 So Keola ran for his life, and fetched the wizard fuel; and Lehua guided
 him back, and set his feet upon the mat, and made the fire.  All the time
 of its burning, the sound of the battle towered out of the wood; the
 wizards and the man-eaters hard at fight; the wizards, the viewless ones,
 roaring out aloud like bulls upon a mountain, and the men of the tribe
 replying shrill and savage out of the terror of their souls.  And all the
 time of the burning, Keola stood there and listened, and shook, and
 watched how the unseen hands of Lehua poured the leaves.  She poured them
 fast, and the flame burned high, and scorched Keolas hands; and she
 speeded and blew the burning with her breath.  The last leaf was eaten,
 the flame fell, and the shock followed, and there were Keola and Lehua in
 the room at home.
 
 Now, when Keola could see his wife at last he was mighty pleased, and he
 was mighty pleased to be home again in Molokai and sit down beside a bowl
 of poifor they make no poi on board ships, and there was none in the
 Isle of Voicesand he was out of the body with pleasure to be clean
 escaped out of the hands of the eaters of men.  But there was another
 matter not so clear, and Lehua and Keola talked of it all night and were
 troubled.  There was Kalamake left upon the isle.  If, by the blessing of
 God, he could but stick there, all were well; but should he escape and
 return to Molokai, it would be an ill day for his daughter and her
 husband.  They spoke of his gift of swelling, and whether he could wade
 that distance in the seas.  But Keola knew by this time where that island
 wasand that is to say, in the Low or Dangerous Archipelago.  So they
 fetched the atlas and looked upon the distance in the map, and by what
 they could make of it, it seemed a far way for an old gentleman to walk.
 Still, it would not do to make too sure of a warlock like Kalamake, and
 they determined at last to take counsel of a white missionary.
 
 So the first one that came by, Keola told him everything.  And the
 missionary was very sharp on him for taking the second wife in the low
 island; but for all the rest, he vowed he could make neither head nor
 tail of it.
 
 However, says he, if you think this money of your fathers ill gotten,
 my advice to you would be, give some of it to the lepers and some to the
 missionary fund.  And as for this extraordinary rigmarole, you cannot do
 better than keep it to yourselves.
 
 But he warned the police at Honolulu that, by all he could make out,
 Kalamake and Keola had been coining false money, and it would not be
 amiss to watch them.
 
 Keola and Lehua took his advice, and gave many dollars to the lepers and
 the fund.  And no doubt the advice must have been good, for from that day
 to this, Kalamake has never more been heard of.  But whether he was slain
 in the battle by the trees, or whether he is still kicking his heels upon
 the Isle of Voices, who shall say?
 
 Footnotes:
 
 {1}  Please pronounce _pappa_ throughout.
 
 {2}  Alas!
 
 {3}  Aeolian
 
 {4}  Yes.
 
 {5}  Leprosy.
 
 {6}  Whites.
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Juliet Sutherland, Anne Grieve and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BLACK ARROW
 
 A TALE OF THE TWO ROSES
 
 
 ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATED BY N. C. WYETH
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 NEW YORK
 
 CHARLES SCRIBNER'S SONS
 
 MCMXXXIII
 
 
 
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1916, BY
 
 CHARLES SCRIBNER'S SONS
 
 Printed in the United States of America
 
 _All rights reserved._
 
 _No part of this book may be reproduced in any form without
 the permission of Charles Scribner's Sons._
 
 
 
 
 CRITIC ON THE HEARTH:
 
 
 No one but myself knows what I have suffered, nor what my books have
 gained, by your unsleeping watchfulness and admirable pertinacity. And
 now here is a volume that goes into the world and lacks your
 _imprimatur_: a strange thing in our joint lives; and the reason of it
 stranger still! I have watched with interest, with pain, and at length
 with amusement, your unavailing attempts to peruse _The Black Arrow_;
 and I think I should lack humour indeed, if I let the occasion slip and
 did not place your name in the fly-leaf of the only book of mine that
 you have never read--and never will read.
 
 That others may display more constancy is still my hope. The tale was
 written years ago for a particular audience and (I may say) in rivalry
 with a particular author; I think I should do well to name him, Mr.
 Alfred R. Phillips. It was not without its reward at the time. I could
 not, indeed, displace Mr. Phillips from his well-won priority; but in
 the eyes of readers who thought less than nothing of _Treasure Island_,
 _The Black Arrow_ was supposed to mark a clear advance. Those who read
 volumes and those who read story papers belong to different worlds. The
 verdict on _Treasure Island_ was reversed in the other court; I wonder,
 will it be the same with its successor?
 
                                                                R. L. S.
 
     SARANAC LAKE, April 8, 1888
 
 
 
 
 
   CONTENTS
 
 
   PROLOGUE
 
                                                               PAGE
 
   JOHN AMEND-ALL                                                 3
 
 
   BOOK I
 
   THE TWO LADS
 
   CHAPTER
 
   I. AT THE SIGN OF THE SUN IN KETTLEY                          25
 
   II. IN THE FEN                                                36
 
   III. THE FEN FERRY                                            44
 
   IV. A GREENWOOD COMPANY                                       54
 
   V. "BLOODY AS THE HUNTER"                                     64
 
   VI. TO THE DAY'S END                                          75
 
   VII. THE HOODED FACE                                          84
 
 
   BOOK II
 
   THE MOAT HOUSE
 
   I. DICK ASKS QUESTIONS                                        97
 
   II. THE TWO OATHS                                            108
 
   III. THE ROOM OVER THE CHAPEL                                118
 
   IV. THE PASSAGE                                              127
 
   V. HOW DICK CHANGED SIDES                                    133
 
 
   BOOK III
 
   MY LORD FOXHAM
 
   I. THE HOUSE BY THE SHORE                                    147
 
   II. A SKIRMISH IN THE DARK                                   156
 
   III. ST. BRIDE'S CROSS                                       164
 
   IV. THE "GOOD HOPE"                                          169
 
   V. THE "GOOD HOPE" (_Continued_)                             180
 
   VI. THE "GOOD HOPE" (_Concluded_)                            188
 
 
   BOOK IV
 
   THE DISGUISE
 
   I. THE DEN                                                   197
 
   II. "IN MINE ENEMIES' HOUSE"                                 206
 
   III. THE DEAD SPY                                            218
 
   IV. IN THE ABBEY CHURCH                                      228
 
   V. EARL RISINGHAM                                            240
 
   VI. ARBLASTER AGAIN                                          245
 
 
   BOOK V
 
   CROOKBACK
 
   I. THE SHRILL TRUMPET                                        261
 
   II. THE BATTLE OF SHOREBY                                    270
 
   III. THE BATTLE OF SHOREBY (_Concluded_)                     279
 
   IV. THE SACK OF SHOREBY                                      285
 
   V. NIGHT IN THE WOODS: ALICIA RISINGHAM                      298
 
   VI. NIGHT IN THE WOODS (_Concluded_): DICK AND JOAN          308
 
   VII. DICK'S REVENGE                                          320
 
   VIII. CONCLUSION                                             325
 
 
 
 
   ILLUSTRATIONS
 
                                                        FACING PAGE
 
   "Now, mark me, mine host," Sir Daniel said, "follow but mine
   orders and I shall be your good lord ever"                    26
 
   In the fork, like a mastheaded seaman, there stood a man in a
   green tabard, spying far and wide                             56
 
   Lastly, a little before dawn, a spearman had come staggering to
   the moat side, pierced by arrows                              98
 
   "We must be in the dungeons," Dick remarked                  128
 
   The little cockle dipped into the swell and staggered under
   every gust of wind                                           174
 
   And Lawless, keeping half a step in front of his companion and
   holding his head forward like a hunting-dog upon the scent, ...
   studied out their path                                       198
 
   First came the bride, a sorry sight, as pale as the winter,
   clinging to Sir Daniel's arm                                 234
 
   There were seven or eight assailants, and but one to keep head
   against them                                                 262
 
   "But be at rest; the Black Arrow flieth nevermore"           324
 
 
 
 
 
 PROLOGUE
 
 
 
 
 PROLOGUE
 
 JOHN AMEND-ALL
 
 
 On a certain afternoon, in the late springtime, the bell upon Tunstall
 Moat House was heard ringing at an unaccustomed hour. Far and near, in
 the forest and in the fields along the river, people began to desert
 their labours and hurry towards the sound; and in Tunstall hamlet a
 group of poor countryfolk stood wondering at the summons.
 
 Tunstall hamlet at that period, in the reign of old King Henry VI., wore
 much the same appearance as it wears to-day. A score or so of houses,
 heavily framed with oak, stood scattered in a long green valley
 ascending from the river. At the foot, the road crossed a bridge, and
 mounting on the other side, disappeared into the fringes of the forest
 on its way to the Moat House, and further forth to Holywood Abbey.
 Half-way up the village, the church stood among yews. On every side the
 slopes were crowned and the view bounded by the green elms and greening
 oak-trees of the forest.
 
 Hard by the bridge, there was a stone cross upon a knoll, and here the
 group had collected--half-a-dozen women and one tall fellow in a russet
 smock--discussing what the bell betided. An express had gone through the
 hamlet half an hour before, and drunk a pot of ale in the saddle, not
 daring to dismount for the hurry of his errand; but he had been ignorant
 himself of what was forward, and only bore sealed letters from Sir
 Daniel Brackley to Sir Oliver Oates, the parson, who kept the Moat House
 in the master's absence.
 
 But now there was the noise of a horse; and soon, out of the edge of the
 wood and over the echoing bridge, there rode up young Master Richard
 Shelton, Sir Daniel's ward. He, at the least, would know, and they
 hailed him and begged him to explain. He drew bridle willingly enough--a
 young fellow not yet eighteen, sun-browned and grey-eyed, in a jacket of
 deer's leather, with a black velvet collar, a green hood upon his head,
 and a steel cross-bow at his back. The express, it appeared, had brought
 great news. A battle was impending. Sir Daniel had sent for every man
 that could draw a bow or carry a bill to go post-haste to Kettley, under
 pain of his severe displeasure; but for whom they were to fight, or of
 where the battle was expected, Dick knew nothing. Sir Oliver would come
 shortly himself, and Bennet Hatch was arming at that moment, for he it
 was who should lead the party.
 
 "It is the ruin of this kind land," a woman said. "If the barons live at
 war, ploughfolk must eat roots."
 
 "Nay," said Dick, "every man that follows shall have sixpence a day, and
 archers twelve."
 
 "If they live," returned the woman, "that may very well be; but how if
 they die, my master?"
 
 "They cannot better die than for their natural lord," said Dick.
 
 "No natural lord of mine," said the man in the smock. "I followed the
 Walsinghams; so we all did down Brierly way, till two years ago, come
 Candlemas. And now I must side with Brackley! It was the law that did
 it; call ye that natural? But now, what with Sir Daniel and what with
 Sir Oliver--that knows more of law than honesty--I have no natural lord
 but poor King Harry the Sixt, God bless him!--the poor innocent that
 cannot tell his right hand from his left."
 
 "Ye speak with an ill tongue, friend," answered Dick, "to miscall your
 good master and my lord the king in the same libel. But King
 Harry--praised be the saints!--has come again into his right mind, and
 will have all things peaceably ordained. And as for Sir Daniel, y'are
 very brave behind his back. But I will be no tale-bearer; and let that
 suffice."
 
 "I say no harm of you, Master Richard," returned the peasant. "Y'are a
 lad; but when ye come to a man's inches, ye will find ye have an empty
 pocket. I say no more: the saints help Sir Daniel's neighbours, and the
 Blessed Maid protect his wards!"
 
 "Clipsby," said Richard, "you speak what I cannot hear with honour. Sir
 Daniel is my good master, and my guardian."
 
 "Come, now, will ye read me a riddle?" returned Clipsby. "On whose side
 is Sir Daniel?"
 
 "I know not," said Dick, colouring a little; for his guardian had
 changed sides continually in the troubles of that period, and every
 change had brought him some increase of fortune.
 
 "Ay," returned Clipsby, "you, nor no man. For, indeed, he is one that
 goes to bed Lancaster and gets up York."
 
 Just then the bridge rang under horse-shoe iron, and the party turned
 and saw Bennet Hatch come galloping--a brown-faced, grizzled fellow,
 heavy of hand and grim of mien, armed with sword and spear, a steel
 salet on his head, a leather jack upon his body. He was a great man in
 these parts; Sir Daniel's right hand in peace and war, and at that time,
 by his master's interest, bailiff of the hundred.
 
 "Clipsby," he shouted, "off to the Moat House, and send all other
 laggards the same gate. Bowyer will give you jack and salet. We must
 ride before curfew. Look to it: he that is last at the lych-gate Sir
 Daniel shall reward. Look to it right well! I know you for a man of
 naught. Nance," he added, to one of the women, "is old Appleyard up
 town?"
 
 "I'll warrant you," replied the woman. "In his field, for sure."
 
 So the group dispersed, and while Clipsby walked leisurely over the
 bridge, Bennet and young Shelton rode up the road together, through the
 village and past the church.
 
 "Ye will see the old shrew," said Bennet. "He will waste more time
 grumbling and prating of Harry the Fift than would serve a man to shoe a
 horse. And all because he has been to the French wars!"
 
 The house to which they were bound was the last in the village, standing
 alone among lilacs; and beyond it, on three sides, there was open meadow
 rising towards the borders of the wood.
 
 Hatch dismounted, threw his rein over the fence, and walked down the
 field, Dick keeping close at his elbow, to where the old soldier was
 digging, knee-deep in his cabbages, and now and again, in a cracked
 voice, singing a snatch of song. He was all dressed in leather, only his
 hood and tippet were of black frieze, and tied with scarlet; his face
 was like a walnut-shell, both for colour and wrinkles; but his old grey
 eye was still clear enough, and his sight unabated. Perhaps he was deaf;
 perhaps he thought it unworthy of an old archer of Agincourt to pay any
 heed to such disturbances; but neither the surly notes of the alarm
 bell, nor the near approach of Bennet and the lad, appeared at all to
 move him; and he continued obstinately digging, and piped up, very thin
 and shaky:
 
     "Now, dear lady, if thy will be,
      I pray you that you will rue on me."
 
 "Nick Appleyard," said Hatch, "Sir Oliver commends him to you, and bids
 that ye shall come within this hour to the Moat House, there to take
 command."
 
 The old fellow looked up.
 
 "Save you, my masters!" he said, grinning. "And where goeth Master
 Hatch?"
 
 "Master Hatch is off to Kettley, with every man that we can horse,"
 returned Bennet. "There is a fight toward, it seems, and my lord stays a
 reinforcement."
 
 "Ay, verily," returned Appleyard. "And what will ye leave me to garrison
 withal?"
 
 "I leave you six good men, and Sir Oliver to boot," answered Hatch.
 
 "It'll not hold the place," said Appleyard; "the number sufficeth not.
 It would take two-score to make it good."
 
 "Why, it's for that we came to you, old shrew!" replied the other. "Who
 else is there but you that could do aught in such a house with such a
 garrison?"
 
 "Ay! when the pinch comes, ye remember the old shoe," returned Nick.
 "There is not a man of you can back a horse or hold a bill; and as for
 archery--St. Michael! if old Harry the Fift were back again, he would
 stand and let ye shoot at him for a farthen a shoot!"
 
 "Nay, Nick, there's some can draw a good bow yet," said Bennet.
 
 "Draw a good bow!" cried Appleyard. "Yes! But who'll shoot me a good
 shoot? It's there the eye comes in, and the head between your shoulders.
 Now, what might you call a long shoot, Bennet Hatch?"
 
 "Well," said Bennet, looking about him, "it would be a long shoot from
 here into the forest."
 
 "Ay, it would be a longish shoot," said the old fellow, turning to look
 over his shoulder; and then he put up his hand over his eyes, and stood
 staring.
 
 "Why, what are you looking at?" asked Bennet, with a chuckle. "Do you
 see Harry the Fift?"
 
 The veteran continued looking up the hill in silence. The sun shone
 broadly over the shelving meadows; a few white sheep wandered browsing;
 all was still but the distant jangle of the bell.
 
 "What is it, Appleyard?" asked Dick.
 
 "Why, the birds," said Appleyard.
 
 And, sure enough, over the top of the forest, where it ran down in a
 tongue among the meadows, and ended in a pair of goodly green elms,
 about a bowshot from the field where they were standing, a flight of
 birds was skimming to and fro, in evident disorder.
 
 "What of the birds?" said Bennet.
 
 "Ay!" returned Appleyard, "y'are a wise man to go to war, Master Bennet.
 Birds are a good sentry; in forest places they be the first line of
 battle. Look you, now, if we lay here in camp, there might be archers
 skulking down to get the wind of us; and here would you be, none the
 wiser!"
 
 "Why, old shrew," said Hatch, "there be no men nearer us than Sir
 Daniel's, at Kettley; y'are as safe as in London Tower; and ye raise
 scares upon a man for a few chaffinches and sparrows!"
 
 "Hear him!" grinned Appleyard. "How many a rogue would give his two crop
 ears to have a shoot at either of us? St. Michael, man! they hate us
 like two polecats!"
 
 "Well, sooth it is, they hate Sir Daniel," answered Hatch, a little
 sobered.
 
 "Ay, they hate Sir Daniel, and they hate every man that serves with
 him," said Appleyard; "and in the first order of hating, they hate
 Bennet Hatch and old Nicholas the bow-man. See ye here: if there was a
 stout fellow yonder in the wood-edge, and you and I stood fair for
 him--as, by St. George, we stand!--which, think ye, would he choose?"
 
 "You, for a good wager," answered Hatch.
 
 "My surcoat to a leather belt, it would be you!" cried the old archer.
 "Ye burned Grimstone, Bennet--they'll ne'er forgive you that, my
 master. And as for me, I'll soon be in a good place, God grant, and out
 of bow-shoot--ay, and cannon-shoot--of all their malices. I am an old
 man, and draw fast to homeward, where the bed is ready. But for you,
 Bennet, y'are to remain behind here at your own peril, and if ye come to
 my years unhanged, the old true-blue English spirit will be dead."
 
 "Y'are the shrewishest old dolt in Tunstall Forest," returned Hatch,
 visibly ruffled by these threats. "Get ye to your arms before Sir Oliver
 come, and leave prating for one good while. An' ye had talked so much
 with Harry the Fift, his ears would ha' been richer than his pocket."
 
 An arrow sang in the air, like a huge hornet; it struck old Appleyard
 between the shoulder-blades, and pierced him clean through, and he fell
 forward on his face among the cabbages. Hatch, with a broken cry, leapt
 into the air; then, stooping double, he ran for the cover of the house.
 And in the meanwhile Dick Shelton had dropped behind a lilac, and had
 his cross-bow bent and shouldered, covering the point of the forest.
 
 Not a leaf stirred. The sheep were patiently browsing; the birds had
 settled. But there lay the old man, with a cloth-yard arrow standing in
 his back; and there were Hatch holding to the gable, and Dick crouching
 and ready behind the lilac bush.
 
 "D'ye see aught?" cried Hatch.
 
 "Not a twig stirs," said Dick.
 
 "I think shame to leave him lying," said Bennet, coming forward once
 more with hesitating steps and a very pale countenance. "Keep a good
 eye on the wood, Master Shelton--keep a clear eye on the wood. The
 saints assoil us! here was a good shoot!"
 
 Bennet raised the old archer on his knee. He was not yet dead; his face
 worked, and his eyes shut and opened like machinery, and he had a most
 horrible, ugly look of one in pain.
 
 "Can ye hear, old Nick?" asked Hatch. "Have ye a last wish before ye
 wend, old brother?"
 
 "Pluck out the shaft, and let me pass, a' Mary's name!" gasped
 Appleyard. "I be done with Old England. Pluck it out!"
 
 "Master Dick," said Bennet, "come hither, and pull me a good pull upon
 the arrow. He would fain pass, the poor sinner."
 
 Dick laid down his cross-bow, and pulling hard upon the arrow, drew it
 forth. A gush of blood followed; the old archer scrambled half upon his
 feet, called once upon the name of God, and then fell dead. Hatch, upon
 his knees among the cabbages, prayed fervently for the welfare of the
 passing spirit. But even as he prayed, it was plain that his mind was
 still divided, and he kept ever an eye upon the corner of the wood from
 which the shot had come. When he had done, he got to his feet again,
 drew off one of his mailed gauntlets, and wiped his pale face, which was
 all wet with terror.
 
 "Ay," he said, "it'll be my turn next."
 
 "Who hath done this, Bennet?" Richard asked, still holding the arrow in
 his hand.
 
 "Nay, the saints know," said Hatch. "Here are a good two-score Christian
 souls that we have hunted out of house and holding, he and I. He has
 paid his shot, poor shrew, nor will it be long, mayhap, ere I pay mine.
 Sir Daniel driveth overhard."
 
 "This is a strange shaft," said the lad, looking at the arrow in his
 hand.
 
 "Ay, by my faith!" cried Bennet. "Black, and black-feathered. Here is an
 ill-favoured shaft, by my sooth! for black, they say, bodes burial. And
 here be words written. Wipe the blood away. What read ye?"
 
 "'_Appulyaird fro Jon Amend-All,_'" read Shelton. "What should this
 betoken?"
 
 "Nay, I like it not," returned the retainer, shaking his head. "John
 Amend-All! Here is a rogue's name for those that be up in the world! But
 why stand we here to make a mark? Take him by the knees, good Master
 Shelton, while I lift him by the shoulders, and let us lay him in his
 house. This will be a rare shog to poor Sir Oliver; he will turn paper
 colour; he will pray like a windmill."
 
 They took up the old archer, and carried him between them into his
 house, where he had dwelt alone. And there they laid him on the floor,
 out of regard for the mattress and sought, as best they might, to
 straighten and compose his limbs.
 
 Appleyard's house was clean and bare. There was a bed, with a blue
 cover, a cupboard, a great chest, a pair of joint-stools, a hinged table
 in the chimney-corner, and hung upon the wall the old soldier's armoury
 of bows and defensive armour. Hatch began to look about him curiously.
 
 "Nick had money," he said. "He may have had three-score pounds put by. I
 would I could light upon't! When ye lose an old friend, Master Richard,
 the best consolation is to heir him. See, now, this chest. I would go a
 mighty wager there is a bushel of gold therein. He had a strong hand to
 get, and a hard hand to keep withal, had Appleyard the archer. Now may
 God rest his spirit! Near eighty year he was afoot and about, and ever
 getting; but now he's on the broad of his back, poor shrew, and no more
 lacketh; and if his chattels came to a good friend, he would be merrier,
 methinks, in heaven."
 
 "Come, Hatch," said Dick, "respect his stone-blind eyes. Would ye rob
 the man before his body? Nay, he would walk!"
 
 Hatch made several signs of the cross; but by this time his natural
 complexion had returned, and he was not easily to be dashed from any
 purpose. It would have gone hard with the chest had not the gate
 sounded, and presently after the door of the house opened and admitted a
 tall, portly, ruddy, black-eyed man of near fifty, in a surplice and
 black robe.
 
 "Appleyard--" the newcomer was saying, as he entered; but he stopped
 dead. "Ave Maria!" he cried. "Saints be our shield! What cheer is this?"
 
 "Cold cheer with Appleyard, sir parson," answered Hatch, with perfect
 cheerfulness. "Shot at his own door, and alighteth even now at purgatory
 gates. Ay! there, if tales be true, he shall lack neither coal nor
 candle."
 
 Sir Oliver groped his way to a joint-stool, and sat down upon it, sick
 and white.
 
 "This is a judgment! O, a great stroke!" he sobbed, and rattled off a
 leash of prayers.
 
 Hatch meanwhile reverently doffed his salet and knelt down.
 
 "Ay, Bennet," said the priest, somewhat recovering, "and what may this
 be? What enemy hath done this?"
 
 "Here, Sir Oliver, is the arrow. See, it is written upon with words,"
 said Dick.
 
 "Nay," cried the priest, "this is a foul hearing! John Amend-All! A
 right Lollardy word. And black of hue, as for an omen! Sirs, this knave
 arrow likes me not. But it importeth rather to take counsel. Who should
 this be? Bethink you, Bennet. Of so many black ill-willers, which should
 he be that doth so hardily outface us? Simnel? I do much question it.
 The Walsinghams? Nay, they are not yet so broken; they still think to
 have the law over us, when times change. There was Simon Malmesbury,
 too. How think ye, Bennet?"
 
 "What think ye, sir," returned Hatch, "of Ellis Duckworth?"
 
 "Nay, Bennet, never. Nay, not he," said the priest. "There cometh never
 any rising, Bennet, from below--so all judicious chroniclers concord in
 their opinion; but rebellion travelleth ever downward from above; and
 when Dick, Tom, and Harry take them to their bills, look ever narrowly
 to see what lord is profited thereby. Now, Sir Daniel, having once more
 joined him to the Queen's party, is in ill odour with the Yorkist
 lords. Thence, Bennet, comes the blow--by what procuring, I yet seek;
 but therein lies the nerve of this discomfiture."
 
 "An't please you, Sir Oliver," said Bennet, "the axles are so hot in
 this country that I have long been smelling fire. So did this poor
 sinner, Appleyard. And, by your leave, men's spirits are so foully
 inclined to all of us, that it needs neither York nor Lancaster to spur
 them on. Hear my plain thoughts: You, that are a clerk, and Sir Daniel,
 that sails on any wind, ye have taken many men's goods, and beaten and
 hanged not a few. Y'are called to count for this; in the end, I wot not
 how, ye have ever the uppermost at law, and ye think all patched. But
 give me leave, Sir Oliver: the man that ye have dispossessed and beaten
 is but the angrier, and some day, when the black devil is by, he will up
 with his bow and clout me a yard of arrow through your inwards."
 
 "Nay, Bennet, y'are in the wrong. Bennet, ye should be glad to be
 corrected," said Sir Oliver. "Y'are a prater, Bennet, a talker, a
 babbler; your mouth is wider than your two ears. Mend it, Bennet, mend
 it."
 
 "Nay, I say no more. Have it as ye list," said the retainer.
 
 The priest now rose from the stool, and from the writing-case that hung
 about his neck took forth wax and a taper, and a flint and steel. With
 these he sealed up the chest and the cupboard with Sir Daniel's arms,
 Hatch looking on disconsolate; and then the whole party proceeded,
 somewhat timorously, to sally from the house and get to horse.
 
 "'Tis time we were on the road, Sir Oliver," said Hatch, as he held the
 priest's stirrup while he mounted.
 
 "Ay; but, Bennet, things are changed," returned the parson. "There is
 now no Appleyard--rest his soul!--to keep the garrison. I shall keep
 you, Bennet. I must have a good man to rest me on in this day of black
 arrows. 'The arrow that flieth by day,' saith the evangel; I have no
 mind of the context; nay, I am a sluggard priest, I am too deep in men's
 affairs. Well, let us ride forth, Master Hatch. The jackmen should be at
 the church by now."
 
 So they rode forward down the road, with the wind after them, blowing
 the tails of the parson's cloak; and behind them, as they went, clouds
 began to arise and blot out the sinking sun. They had passed three of
 the scattered houses that make up Tunstall hamlet, when, coming to a
 turn, they saw the church before them. Ten or a dozen houses clustered
 immediately round it; but to the back the churchyard was next the
 meadows. At the lych-gate, near a score of men were gathered, some in
 the saddle, some standing by their horses' heads. They were variously
 armed and mounted; some with spears, some with bills, some with bows,
 and some bestriding plough-horses, still splashed with the mire of the
 furrow; for these were the very dregs of the country, and all the better
 men and the fair equipments were already with Sir Daniel in the field.
 
 "We have not done amiss, praised be the cross of Holywood! Sir Daniel
 will be right well content," observed the priest, inwardly numbering the
 troop.
 
 "Who goes? Stand! if ye be true!" shouted Bennet.
 
 A man was seen slipping through the churchyard among the yews; and at
 the sound of this summons he discarded all concealment, and fairly took
 to his heels for the forest. The men at the gate, who had been hitherto
 unaware of the stranger's presence, woke and scattered. Those who had
 dismounted began scrambling into the saddle; the rest rode in pursuit;
 but they had to make the circuit of the consecrated ground, and it was
 plain their quarry would escape them. Hatch, roaring an oath, put his
 horse at the hedge, to head him off; but the beast refused, and sent his
 rider sprawling in the dust. And though he was up again in a moment, and
 had caught the bridle, the time had gone by, and the fugitive had gained
 too great a lead for any hope of capture.
 
 The wisest of all had been Dick Shelton. Instead of starting in a vain
 pursuit, he had whipped his cross-bow from his back, bent it, and set a
 quarrel to the string; and now, when the others had desisted, he turned
 to Bennet and asked if he should shoot.
 
 "Shoot! shoot!" cried the priest, with sanguinary violence.
 
 "Cover him, Master Dick," said Bennet. "Bring me him down like a ripe
 apple."
 
 The fugitive was now within but a few leaps of safety; but this last
 part of the meadow ran very steeply up-hill; and the man ran slower in
 proportion. What with the greyness of the falling night, and the uneven
 movements of the runner, it was no easy aim; and as Dick levelled his
 bow, he felt a kind of pity, and a half desire that he might miss. The
 quarrel sped.
 
 The man stumbled and fell, and a great cheer arose from Hatch and the
 pursuers. But they were counting their corn before the harvest. The man
 fell lightly; he was lightly afoot again, turned and waved his cap in a
 bravado, and was out of sight next moment in the margin of the wood.
 
 "And the plague go with him!" cried Bennet. "He has thieves' heels; he
 can run, by St. Banbury! But you touched him, Master Shelton; he has
 stolen your quarrel, may he never have good I grudge him less!"
 
 "Nay, but what made he by the church?" asked Sir Oliver. "I am shrewdly
 afeared there has been mischief here. Clipsby, good fellow, get ye down
 from your horse, and search thoroughly among the yews."
 
 Clipsby was gone but a little while ere he returned, carrying a paper.
 
 "This writing was pinned to the church door," he said, handing it to the
 parson. "I found naught else, sir parson."
 
 "Now, by the power of Mother Church," cried Sir Oliver, "but this runs
 hard on sacrilege! For the king's good pleasure, or the lord of the
 manor--well! But that every run-the-hedge in a green jerkin should
 fasten papers to the chancel door--nay, it runs hard on sacrilege, hard;
 and men have burned for matters of less weight. But what have we here?
 The light falls apace. Good Master Richard, y' have young eyes. Read me,
 I pray, this libel."
 
 Dick Shelton took the paper in his hand and read it aloud. It contained
 some lines of very rugged doggerel, hardly even rhyming, written in a
 gross character, and most uncouthly spelt. With the spelling somewhat
 bettered, this is how they ran:
 
     "I had four blak arrows under my belt,
      Four for the greefs that I have felt,
      Four for the nomber of ill menne
      That have opressid me now and then.
 
      One is gone; one is wele sped;
      Old Apulyaird is ded.
 
      One is for Maister Bennet Hatch,
      That burned Grimstone, walls and thatch.
 
      One for Sir Oliver Oates,
      That cut Sir Harry Shelton's throat.
 
      Sir Daniel, ye shull have the fourt;
      We shall think it fair sport.
 
      Ye shull each have your own part,
      A blak arrow in each blak heart.
      Get ye to your knees for to pray:
      Ye are ded theeves, by yea and nay!
 
                                               "JON AMEND-ALL
                                                  of the Green Wood,
                                             And his jolly fellaweship.
 
     "Item, we have mo arrowes and goode hempen cord for otheres of your
      following."
 
 "Now, well-a-day for charity and the Christian graces!" cried Sir
 Oliver, lamentably. "Sirs, this is an ill world, and groweth daily
 worse. I will swear upon the cross of Holywood I am as innocent of that
 good knight's hurt, whether in act or purpose, as the babe
 unchristened. Neither was his throat cut; for therein they are again in
 error, as there still live credible witnesses to show."
 
 "It boots not, sir parson," said Bennet. "Here is unseasonable talk."
 
 "Nay, Master Bennet, not so. Keep ye in your due place, good Bennet,"
 answered the priest. "I shall make mine innocence appear. I will, upon
 no consideration, lose my poor life in error. I take all men to witness
 that I am clear of this matter. I was not even in the Moat House. I was
 sent of an errand before nine upon the clock----"
 
 "Sir Oliver," said Hatch, interrupting, "since it please you not to stop
 this sermon, I will take other means. Goffe, sound to horse."
 
 And while the tucket was sounding, Bennet moved close to the bewildered
 parson, and whispered violently in his ear.
 
 Dick Shelton saw the priest's eye turned upon him for an instant in a
 startled glance. He had some cause for thought; for this Sir Harry
 Shelton was his own natural father. But he said never a word, and kept
 his countenance unmoved.
 
 Hatch and Sir Oliver discussed together for awhile their altered
 situation; ten men, it was decided between them, should be reserved, not
 only to garrison the Moat House, but to escort the priest across the
 wood. In the meantime, as Bennet was to remain behind, the command of
 the reinforcement was given to Master Shelton. Indeed, there was no
 choice; the men were loutish fellows, dull and unskilled in war, while
 Dick was not only popular, but resolute and grave beyond his age.
 Although his youth had been spent in these rough, country places, the
 lad had been well taught in letters by Sir Oliver, and Hatch himself had
 shown him the management of arms and the first principles of command.
 Bennet had always been kind and helpful; he was one of those who are
 cruel as the grave to those they call their enemies, but ruggedly
 faithful and well willing to their friends; and now, while Sir Oliver
 entered the next house to write, in his swift, exquisite penmanship, a
 memorandum of the last occurrences to his master, Sir Daniel Brackley,
 Bennet came up to his pupil to wish him God-speed upon his enterprise.
 
 "Ye must go the long way about, Master Shelton," he said; "round by the
 bridge, for your life! Keep a sure man fifty paces afore you, to draw
 shots; and go softly till y'are past the wood. If the rogues fall upon
 you, ride for't; ye will do naught by standing. And keep ever forward,
 Master Shelton; turn me not back again, an ye love your life; there is
 no help in Tunstall, mind ye that. And now, since ye go to the great
 wars about the king, and I continue to dwell here in extreme jeopardy of
 my life, and the saints alone can certify if we shall meet again below,
 I give you my last counsels now at your riding. Keep an eye on Sir
 Daniel; he is unsure. Put not your trust in the jack-priest; he
 intendeth not amiss, but doth the will of others; it is a hand-gun for
 Sir Daniel! Get your good lordship where ye go; make you strong friends;
 look to it. And think ever a paternoster while on Bennet Hatch. There
 are worse rogues afoot than Bennet. So, God-speed!"
 
 "And Heaven be with you, Bennet!" returned Dick. "Ye were a good friend
 to meward, and so I shall say ever."
 
 "And, look ye, master," added Hatch, with a certain embarrassment, "if
 this Amend-All should get a shaft into me, ye might, mayhap, lay out a
 gold mark or mayhap a pound for my poor soul; for it is like to go stiff
 with me in purgatory."
 
 "Ye shall have your will of it, Bennet," answered Dick. "But, what
 cheer, man! we shall meet again, where ye shall have more need of ale
 than masses."
 
 "The saints so grant it, Master Dick!" returned the other. "But here
 comes Sir Oliver. An he were as quick with the long-bow as with the pen,
 he would be a brave man-at-arms."
 
 Sir Oliver gave Dick a sealed packet, with this superscription: "To my
 ryght worchypful master. Sir Daniel Brackley, knyght, be thys delyvered
 in haste."
 
 And Dick, putting it in the bosom of his jacket, gave the word and set
 forth westward up the village.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK I
 
 THE TWO LADS
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 AT THE SIGN OF THE SUN IN KETTLEY
 
 
 Sir Daniel and his men lay in and about Kettley that night, warmly
 quartered and well patrolled. But the Knight of Tunstall was one who
 never rested from money-getting; and even now, when he was on the brink
 of an adventure which should make or mar him, he was up an hour after
 midnight to squeeze poor neighbours. He was one who trafficked greatly
 in disputed inheritances; it was his way to buy out the most unlikely
 claimant, and then, by the favour he curried with great lords about the
 king, procure unjust decisions in his favour; or, if that was too
 roundabout, to seize the disputed manor by force of arms, and rely on
 his influence and Sir Oliver's cunning in the law to hold what he had
 snatched. Kettley was one such place; it had come very lately into his
 clutches; he still met with opposition from the tenants; and it was to
 overawe discontent that he had led his troops that way.
 
 By two in the morning, Sir Daniel sat in the inn room, close by the
 fireside, for it was cold at that hour among the fens of Kettley. By his
 elbow stood a pottle of spiced ale. He had taken off his visored
 headpiece, and sat with his bald head and thin, dark visage resting on
 one hand, wrapped warmly in a sanguine-coloured cloak. At the lower end
 of the room about a dozen of his men stood sentry over the door or lay
 asleep on benches; and somewhat nearer hand, a young lad, apparently of
 twelve or thirteen, was stretched in a mantle on the floor. The host of
 the Sun stood before the great man.
 
 "Now, mark me, mine host," Sir Daniel said, "follow but mine orders, and
 I shall be your good lord ever. I must have good men for head boroughs,
 and I will have Adam-a-More high constable; see to it narrowly. If other
 men be chosen, it shall avail you nothing; rather it shall be found to
 your sore cost. For those that have paid rent to Walsingham I shall take
 good measure--you among the rest, mine host."
 
 "Good knight," said the host, "I will swear upon the cross of Holywood I
 did but pay to Walsingham upon compulsion. Nay, bully knight, I love not
 the rogue Walsinghams; they were as poor as thieves, bully knight. Give
 me a great lord like you. Nay; ask me among the neighbours, I am stout
 for Brackley."
 
 "It may be," said Sir Daniel, drily. "Ye shall then pay twice."
 
 The innkeeper made a horrid grimace; but this was a piece of bad luck
 that might readily befall a tenant in these unruly times, and he was
 perhaps glad to make his peace so easily.
 
 "Bring up yon fellow, Selden!" cried the knight.
 
 And one of his retainers led up a poor, cringing old man, as pale as a
 candle, and all shaking with the fen fever.
 
 "Sirrah," said Sir Daniel, "your name?"
 
 [Illustration: _"Now, mark me, mine host," Sir Daniel said, "follow but
 mine orders, and I shall be your good lord ever"_]
 
 "An't please your worship," replied the man, "my name is
 Condall--Condall of Shoreby, at your good worship's pleasure."
 
 "I have heard you ill reported on," returned the knight. "Ye deal in
 treason, rogue; ye trudge the country leasing; y'are heavily suspicioned
 of the death of severals. How, fellow, are ye so bold? But I will bring
 you down."
 
 "Right honourable and my reverend lord," the man cried, "here is some
 hodge-podge, saving your good presence. I am but a poor private man, and
 have hurt none."
 
 "The under-sheriff did report of you most vilely," said the knight.
 "'Seize me,' saith he, 'that Tyndal of Shoreby.'"
 
 "Condall, my good lord; Condall is my poor name," said the unfortunate.
 
 "Condall or Tyndal, it is all one," replied Sir Daniel, coolly. "For, by
 my sooth, y'are here, and I do mightily suspect your honesty. If ye
 would save your neck, write me swiftly an obligation for twenty pound."
 
 "For twenty pound, my good lord!" cried Condall. "Here is midsummer
 madness! My whole estate amounteth not to seventy shillings."
 
 "Condall or Tyndal," returned Sir Daniel, grinning, "I will run my peril
 of that loss. Write me down twenty, and when I have recovered all I may,
 I will be good lord to you, and pardon you the rest."
 
 "Alas! my good lord, it may not be; I have no skill to write," said
 Condall.
 
 "Well-a-day!" returned the knight. "Here, then, is no remedy. Yet I
 would fain have spared you, Tyndal, had my conscience suffered. Selden,
 take me this old shrew softly to the nearest elm, and hang me him
 tenderly by the neck, where I may see him at my riding. Fare ye well,
 good Master Condall, dear Master Tyndal; y'are post-haste for Paradise;
 fare ye then well!"
 
 "Nay, my right pleasant lord," replied Condall, forcing an obsequious
 smile, "an ye be so masterful, as doth right well become you, I will
 even, with all my poor skill, do your good bidding."
 
 "Friend," quoth Sir Daniel, "ye will now write two-score. Go to! y'are
 too cunning for a livelihood of seventy shillings. Selden, see him write
 me this in good form, and have it duly witnessed."
 
 And Sir Daniel, who was a very merry knight, none merrier in England,
 took a drink of his mulled ale, and lay back, smiling.
 
 Meanwhile, the boy upon the floor began to stir, and presently sat up
 and looked about him with a scare.
 
 "Hither," said Sir Daniel; and as the other rose at his command and came
 slowly towards him, he leaned back and laughed outright. "By the rood!"
 he cried, "a sturdy boy!"
 
 The lad flushed crimson with anger, and darted a look of hate out of his
 dark eyes. Now that he was on his legs, it was more difficult to make
 certain of his age. His face looked somewhat older in expression, but it
 was as smooth as a young child's; and in bone and body he was unusually
 slender, and somewhat awkward of gait.
 
 "Ye have called me, Sir Daniel," he said. "Was it to laugh at my poor
 plight?"
 
 "Nay, now, let laugh," said the knight. "Good shrew, let laugh, I pray
 you. An ye could see yourself, I warrant ye would laugh the first."
 
 "Well," cried the lad, flushing, "ye shall answer this when ye answer
 for the other. Laugh while yet ye may!"
 
 "Nay, now, good cousin," replied Sir Daniel, with some earnestness,
 "think not that I mock at you, except in mirth, as between kinsfolk and
 singular friends. I will make you a marriage of a thousand pounds, go
 to! and cherish you exceedingly. I took you, indeed, roughly, as the
 time demanded; but from henceforth I shall ungrudgingly maintain and
 cheerfully serve you. Ye shall be Mrs. Shelton--Lady Shelton, by my
 troth! for the lad promiseth bravely. Tut! ye will not shy for honest
 laughter; it purgeth melancholy. They are no rogues who laugh, good
 cousin. Good mine host, lay me a meal now for my cousin, Master John.
 Sit ye down, sweetheart, and eat."
 
 "Nay," said Master John, "I will break no bread. Since ye force me to
 this sin, I will fast for my soul's interest. But, good mine host, I
 pray you of courtesy give me a cup of fair water; I shall be much
 beholden to your courtesy indeed."
 
 "Ye shall have a dispensation, go to!" cried the knight. "Shalt be well
 shriven, by my faith! Content you, then, and eat."
 
 But the lad was obstinate, drank a cup of water, and, once more wrapping
 himself closely in his mantle, sat in a far corner, brooding.
 
 In an hour or two, there rose a stir in the village of sentries
 challenging and the clatter of arms and horses; and then a troop drew up
 by the inn door, and Richard Shelton, splashed with mud, presented
 himself upon the threshold.
 
 "Save you, Sir Daniel," he said.
 
 "How! Dickie Shelton!" cried the knight; and at the mention of Dick's
 name the other lad looked curiously across. "What maketh Bennet Hatch?"
 
 "Please you, sir knight, to take cognisance of this packet from Sir
 Oliver, wherein are all things fully stated," answered Richard,
 presenting the priest's letter. "And please you farther, ye were best
 make all speed to Risingham; for on the way hither we encountered one
 riding furiously with letters, and by his report, my Lord of Risingham
 was sore bested, and lacked exceedingly your presence."
 
 "How say you? Sore bested?" returned the knight. "Nay, then, we will
 make speed sitting down, good Richard. As the world goes in this poor
 realm of England, he that rides softliest rides surest. Delay, they say,
 begetteth peril; but it is rather this itch of doing that undoes men;
 mark it, Dick. But let me see, first, what cattle ye have brought.
 Selden, a link here at the door!"
 
 And Sir Daniel strode forth into the village street, and, by the red
 glow of a torch, inspected his new troops. He was an unpopular neighbour
 and an unpopular master; but as a leader in war he was well beloved by
 those who rode behind his pennant. His dash, his proved courage, his
 forethought for the soldiers' comfort, even his rough gibes, were all to
 the taste of the bold blades in jack and salet.
 
 "Nay, by the rood!" he cried, "what poor dogs are these? Here be some
 as crooked as a bow, and some as lean as a spear. Friends, ye shall ride
 in the front of the battle; I can spare you, friends. Mark me this old
 villain on the piebald! A two-year mutton riding on a hog would look
 more soldierly! Ha! Clipsby, are ye there, old rat? Y'are a man I could
 lose with a good heart; ye shall go in front of all, with a bull's eye
 painted on your jack, to be the better butt for archery; sirrah, ye
 shall show me the way."
 
 "I will show you any way, Sir Daniel, but the way to change sides,"
 returned Clipsby, sturdily.
 
 Sir Daniel laughed a guffaw.
 
 "Why, well said!" he cried. "Hast a shrewd tongue in thy mouth, go to! I
 will forgive you for that merry word. Selden, see them fed, both man and
 brute."
 
 The knight re-entered the inn.
 
 "Now, friend Dick," he said, "fall to. Here is good ale and bacon. Eat,
 while that I read."
 
 Sir Daniel opened the packet, and as he read his brow darkened. When he
 had done he sat a little, musing. Then he looked sharply at his ward.
 
 "Dick," said he, "y' have seen this penny rhyme?"
 
 The lad replied in the affirmative.
 
 "It bears your father's name," continued the knight; "and our poor shrew
 of a parson is, by some mad soul, accused of slaying him."
 
 "He did most eagerly deny it," answered Dick.
 
 "He did?" cried the knight, very sharply. "Heed him not. He has a loose
 tongue; he babbles like a jack-sparrow. Some day, when I may find the
 leisure, Dick, I will myself more fully inform you of these matters.
 There was one Duckworth shrewdly blamed for it; but the times were
 troubled, and there was no justice to be got."
 
 "It befell at the Moat House?" Dick ventured, with a beating at his
 heart.
 
 "It befell between the Moat House and Holywood," replied Sir Daniel,
 calmly; but he shot a covert glance, black with suspicion, at Dick's
 face. "And now," added the knight, "speed you with your meal; ye shall
 return to Tunstall with a line from me."
 
 Dick's face fell sorely.
 
 "Prithee, Sir Daniel," he cried, "send one of the villains! I beseech
 you let me to the battle. I can strike a stroke, I promise you."
 
 "I misdoubt it not," replied Sir Daniel, sitting down to write. "But
 here, Dick, is no honour to be won. I lie in Kettley till I have sure
 tidings of the war, and then ride to join me with the conqueror. Cry not
 on cowardice; it is but wisdom, Dick; for this poor realm so tosseth
 with rebellion, and the king's name and custody so changeth hands, that
 no man may be certain of the morrow. Toss-pot and Shuttle-wit run in,
 but my Lord Good-Counsel sits o' one side, waiting."
 
 With that, Sir Daniel, turning his back to Dick, and quite at the
 farther end of the long table, began to write his letter, with his mouth
 on one side, for this business of the Black Arrow stuck sorely in his
 throat.
 
 Meanwhile, young Shelton was going on heartily enough with his
 breakfast, when he felt a touch upon his arm, and a very soft voice
 whispering in his ear.
 
 "Make not a sign, I do beseech you," said the voice, "but of your
 charity tell me the straight way to Holywood. Beseech you, now, good
 boy, comfort a poor soul in peril and extreme distress, and set me so
 far forth upon the way to my repose."
 
 "Take the path by the windmill," answered Dick, in the same tone; "it
 will bring you to Till Ferry; there inquire again."
 
 And without turning his head, he fell again to eating. But with the tail
 of his eye he caught a glimpse of the young lad called Master John
 stealthily creeping from the room.
 
 "Why," thought Dick, "he is as young as I. 'Good boy' doth he call me?
 An I had known, I should have seen the varlet hanged ere I had told him.
 Well, if he goes through the fen, I may come up with him and pull his
 ears."
 
 Half an hour later, Sir Daniel gave Dick the letter, and bade him speed
 to the Moat House. And, again, some half an hour after Dick's departure,
 a messenger came, in hot haste, from my Lord of Risingham.
 
 "Sir Daniel," the messenger said, "ye lose great honour, by my sooth!
 The fight began again this morning ere the dawn, and we have beaten
 their van and scattered their right wing. Only the main battle standeth
 fast. An we had your fresh men, we should tilt you them all into the
 river. What, sir knight! Will ye be the last? It stands not with your
 good credit."
 
 "Nay," cried the knight, "I was but now upon the march. Selden, sound me
 the tucket. Sir, I am with you on the instant. It is not two hours since
 the more part of my command came in, sir messenger. What would ye have?
 Spurring is good meat, but yet it killed the charger. Bustle, boys!"
 
 By this time the tucket was sounding cheerily in the morning, and from
 all sides Sir Daniel's men poured into the main street and formed before
 the inn. They had slept upon their arms, with chargers saddled, and in
 ten minutes five-score men-at-arms and archers, cleanly equipped and
 briskly disciplined, stood ranked and ready. The chief part were in Sir
 Daniel's livery, murrey and blue, which gave the greater show to their
 array. The best armed rode first; and away out of sight, at the tail of
 the column, came the sorry reinforcement of the night before. Sir Daniel
 looked with pride along the line.
 
 "Here be the lads to serve you in a pinch," he said.
 
 "They are pretty men, indeed," replied the messenger. "It but augments
 my sorrow that ye had not marched the earlier."
 
 "Well," said the knight, "what would ye? The beginning of a feast and
 the end of a fray, sir messenger"; and he mounted into his saddle. "Why!
 how now!" he cried. "John! Joanna! Nay, by the sacred rood! where is
 she? Host, where is that girl?"
 
 "Girl, Sir Daniel?" cried the landlord. "Nay, sir, I saw no girl."
 
 "Boy, then, dotard!" cried the knight. "Could ye not see it was a wench?
 She in the murrey-coloured mantle--she that broke her fast with water,
 rogue--where is she?"
 
 "Nay, the saints bless us! Master John, ye called him," said the host.
 "Well, I thought none evil. He is gone. I saw him--her--I saw her in the
 stable a good hour agone; 'a was saddling a grey horse."
 
 "Now, by the rood!" cried Sir Daniel, "the wench was worth five hundred
 pound to me and more."
 
 "Sir knight," observed the messenger, with bitterness, "while that ye
 are here, roaring for five hundred pounds, the realm of England is
 elsewhere being lost and won."
 
 "It is well said," replied Sir Daniel. "Selden, fall me out with six
 cross-bowmen; hunt me her down. I care not what it cost; but, at my
 returning, let me find her at the Moat House. Be it upon your head. And
 now, sir messenger, we march."
 
 And the troop broke into a good trot, and Selden and his six men were
 left behind upon the street of Kettley, with the staring villagers.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 IN THE FEN
 
 
 It was near six in the May morning when Dick began to ride down into the
 fen upon his homeward way. The sky was all blue; the jolly wind blew
 loud and steady; the windmill sails were spinning; and the willows over
 all the fen rippling and whitening like a field of corn. He had been all
 night in the saddle, but his heart was good and his body sound, and he
 rode right merrily.
 
 The path went down and down into the marsh, till he lost sight of all
 the neighbouring landmarks but Kettley windmill on the knoll behind him,
 and the extreme top of Tunstall Forest far before. On either hand there
 were great fields of blowing reeds and willows, pools of water shaking
 in the wind, and treacherous bogs, as green as emerald, to tempt and to
 betray the traveller. The path lay almost straight through the morass.
 It was already very ancient; its foundation had been laid by Roman
 soldiery; in the lapse of ages much of it had sunk, and every here and
 there, for a few hundred yards, it lay submerged below the stagnant
 waters of the fen.
 
 About a mile from Kettley, Dick came to one such break in the plain line
 of causeway, where the reeds and willows grew dispersedly like little
 islands and confused the eye. The gap, besides, was more than usually
 long; it was a place where any stranger might come readily to mischief;
 and Dick bethought him, with something like a pang, of the lad whom he
 had so imperfectly directed. As for himself, one look backward to where
 the windmill sails were turning black against the blue of heaven--one
 look forward to the high ground of Tunstall Forest, and he was
 sufficiently directed and held straight on, the water washing to his
 horse's knees, as safe as on a highway.
 
 Half-way across, and when he had already sighted the path rising high
 and dry upon the farther side, he was aware of a great splashing on his
 right, and saw a grey horse, sunk to its belly in the mud, and still
 spasmodically struggling. Instantly, as though it had divined the
 neighbourhood of help, the poor beast began to neigh most piercingly. It
 rolled, meanwhile, a bloodshot eye, insane with terror; and as it
 sprawled wallowing in the quag, clouds of stinging insects rose and
 buzzed about it in the air.
 
 "Alack!" thought Dick, "can the poor lad have perished? There is his
 horse, for certain--a brave grey! Nay, comrade, if thou criest to me so
 piteously, I will do all man can to help thee. Shalt not lie there to
 drown by inches!"
 
 And he made ready his cross-bow, and put a quarrel through the
 creature's head.
 
 Dick rode on after this act of rugged mercy, somewhat sobered in spirit,
 and looking closely about him for any sign of his less happy predecessor
 in the way.
 
 "I would I had dared to tell him further," he thought; "for I fear he
 has miscarried in the slough."
 
 And just as he was so thinking, a voice cried upon his name from the
 causeway-side, and, looking over his shoulder, he saw the lad's face
 peering from a clump of reeds.
 
 "Are ye there?" he said, reining in. "Ye lay so close among the reeds
 that I had passed you by. I saw your horse bemired, and put him from his
 agony; which, by my sooth! an ye had been a more merciful rider, ye had
 done yourself. But come forth out of your hiding. Here be none to
 trouble you."
 
 "Nay, good boy, I have no arms, nor skill to use them if I had," replied
 the other, stepping forth upon the pathway.
 
 "Why call me 'boy'?" cried Dick. "Y'are not, I trow, the elder of us
 twain."
 
 "Good Master Shelton," said the other, "prithee forgive me. I have none
 the least intention to offend. Rather I would in every way beseech your
 gentleness and favour, for I am now worse bested than ever, having lost
 my way, my cloak, and my poor horse. To have a riding-rod and spurs, and
 never a horse to sit upon! And before all," he added, looking ruefully
 upon his clothes--"before all, to be so sorrily besmirched!"
 
 "Tut!" cried Dick. "Would ye mind a ducking? Blood of wound or dust of
 travel--that's a man's adornment."
 
 "Nay, then, I like him better plain," observed the lad. "But, prithee,
 how shall I do? Prithee, good Master Richard, help me with your good
 counsel. If I come not safe to Holywood, I am undone."
 
 "Nay," said Dick, dismounting, "I will give more than counsel. Take my
 horse, and I will run awhile, and when I am weary we shall change
 again, that so, riding and running, both may go the speedier."
 
 So the change was made, and they went forward as briskly as they durst
 on the uneven causeway, Dick with his hand upon the other's knee.
 
 "How call ye your name?" asked Dick.
 
 "Call me John Matcham," replied the lad.
 
 "And what make ye to Holywood?" Dick continued.
 
 "I seek sanctuary from a man that would oppress me," was the answer.
 "The good Abbot of Holywood is a strong pillar to the weak."
 
 "And how came ye with Sir Daniel, Master Matcham?" pursued Dick.
 
 "Nay," cried the other, "by the abuse of force! He hath taken me by
 violence from my own place; dressed me in these weeds; ridden with me
 till my heart was sick; gibed me till I could 'a' wept; and when certain
 of my friends pursued, thinking to have me back, claps me in the rear to
 stand their shot! I was even grazed in the right foot, and walk but
 lamely. Nay, there shall come a day between us; he shall smart for all!"
 
 "Would ye shoot at the moon with a hand-gun?" said Dick. "'Tis a valiant
 knight, and hath a hand of iron. An he guessed I had made or meddled
 with your flight, it would go sore with me."
 
 "Ay, poor boy," returned the other, "y'are his ward, I know it. By the
 same token, so am I, or so he saith; or else he hath bought my
 marriage--I wot not rightly which; but it is some handle to oppress me
 by."
 
 "Boy again!" said Dick.
 
 "Nay, then, shall I call you girl, good Richard?" asked Matcham.
 
 "Never a girl for me," returned Dick. "I do abjure the crew of them!"
 
 "Ye speak boyishly," said the other. "Ye think more of them than ye
 pretend."
 
 "Not I," said Dick, stoutly. "They come not in my mind. A plague of
 them, say I! Give me to hunt and to fight and to feast, and to live with
 jolly foresters. I never heard of a maid yet that was for any service,
 save one only; and she, poor shrew, was burned for a witch and the
 wearing of men's clothes in spite of nature."
 
 Master Matcham crossed himself with fervour, and appeared to pray.
 
 "What make ye?" Dick inquired.
 
 "I pray for her spirit," answered the other, with a somewhat troubled
 voice.
 
 "For a witch's spirit?" Dick cried. "But pray for her, an ye list; she
 was the best wench in Europe, was this Joan of Arc. Old Appleyard the
 archer ran from her, he said, as if she had been Mahoun. Nay, she was a
 brave wench."
 
 "Well, but, good Master Richard," resumed Matcham, "an ye like maids so
 little, y'are no true natural man; for God made them twain by intention,
 and brought true love into the world, to be man's hope and woman's
 comfort."
 
 "Faugh!" said Dick. "Y'are a milk-sopping baby, so to harp on women. An
 ye think I be no true man, get down upon the path, and whether at
 fists, backsword, or bow and arrow, I will prove my manhood on your
 body."
 
 "Nay, I am no fighter," said Matcham, eagerly. "I mean no tittle of
 offence. I meant but pleasantry. And if I talk of women, it is because I
 heard ye were to marry."
 
 "I to marry!" Dick exclaimed. "Well, it is the first I hear of it. And
 with whom was I to marry?"
 
 "One Joan Sedley," replied Matcham, colouring. "It was Sir Daniel's
 doing; he hath money to gain upon both sides; and, indeed, I have heard
 the poor wench bemoaning herself pitifully of the match. It seems she is
 of your mind, or else distasted to the bridegroom."
 
 "Well! marriage is like death, it comes to all," said Dick, with
 resignation. "And she bemoaned herself? I pray ye now, see there how
 shuttle-witted are these girls: to bemoan herself before that she had
 seen me! Do I bemoan myself? Not I. An I be to marry, I will marry
 dry-eyed! But if ye know her, prithee, of what favour is she? fair or
 foul? And is she shrewish or pleasant?"
 
 "Nay, what matters it?" said Matcham. "An y'are to marry, ye can but
 marry. What matters foul or fair? These be but toys. Y'are no milksop,
 Master Richard; ye will wed with dry eyes, anyhow."
 
 "It is well said," replied Shelton. "Little I reck."
 
 "Your lady wife is like to have a pleasant lord," said Matcham.
 
 "She shall have the lord Heaven made her for," returned Dick. "I trow
 there be worse as well as better."
 
 "Ah, the poor wench!" cried the other.
 
 "And why so poor?" asked Dick.
 
 "To wed a man of wood," replied his companion. "O me, for a wooden
 husband!"
 
 "I think I be a man of wood, indeed," said Dick, "to trudge afoot the
 while you ride my horse; but it is good wood, I trow."
 
 "Good Dick, forgive me," cried the other. "Nay, y'are the best heart in
 England; I but laughed. Forgive me now, sweet Dick."
 
 "Nay, no fool words," returned Dick, a little embarrassed by his
 companion's warmth. "No harm is done. I am not touchy, praise the
 saints."
 
 And at that moment the wind, which was blowing straight behind them as
 they went, brought them the rough flourish of Sir Daniel's trumpeter.
 
 "Hark!" said Dick, "the tucket soundeth."
 
 "Ay," said Matcham, "they have found my flight, and now I am unhorsed!"
 and he became pale as death.
 
 "Nay, what cheer!" returned Dick. "Y' have a long start, and we are near
 the ferry. And it is I, methinks, that am unhorsed."
 
 "Alack, I shall be taken!" cried the fugitive. "Dick, kind Dick, beseech
 ye help me but a little!"
 
 "Why, now, what aileth thee?" said Dick. "Methinks I help you very
 patently. But my heart is sorry for so spiritless a fellow! And see ye
 here, John Matcham--sith John Matcham is your name--I, Richard Shelton,
 tide what betideth, come what may, will see you safe in Holywood. The
 saints so do to me again if I default you. Come, pick me up a good
 heart, Sir Whiteface. The way betters here; spur me the horse. Go
 faster! faster! Nay, mind not for me; I can run like a deer."
 
 So, with the horse trotting hard, and Dick running easily alongside,
 they crossed the remainer of the fen, and came out upon the banks of the
 river by the ferryman's hut.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 THE FEN FERRY
 
 
 The river Till was a wide, sluggish, clayey water, oozing out of fens,
 and in this part of its course it strained among some score of
 willow-covered, marshy islets.
 
 It was a dingy stream; but upon this bright, spirited morning everything
 was become beautiful. The wind and the martens broke it up into
 innumerable dimples; and the reflection of the sky was scattered over
 all the surface in crumbs of smiling blue.
 
 A creek ran up to meet the path, and close under the bank the ferryman's
 hut lay snugly. It was of wattle and clay, and the grass grew green upon
 the roof.
 
 Dick went to the door and opened it. Within, upon a foul old russet
 cloak, the ferryman lay stretched and shivering; a great hulk of a man,
 but lean and shaken by the country fever.
 
 "Hey, Master Shelton," he said, "be ye for the ferry? Ill times, ill
 times! Look to yourself. There is a fellowship abroad. Ye were better
 turn round on your two heels and try the bridge."
 
 "Nay; time's in the saddle," answered Dick. "Time will ride, Hugh
 Ferryman. I am hot in haste."
 
 "A wilful man!" returned the ferryman, rising. "An ye win safe to the
 Moat House, y' have done lucky; but I say no more." And then catching
 sight of Matcham, "Who be this?" he asked, as he paused, blinking, on
 the threshold of his cabin.
 
 "It is my kinsman, Master Matcham," answered Dick.
 
 "Give ye good day, good ferryman," said Matcham, who had dismounted, and
 now came forward, leading the horse. "Launch me your boat, I prithee; we
 are sore in haste."
 
 The gaunt ferryman continued staring.
 
 "By the mass!" he cried at length, and laughed with open throat.
 
 Matcham coloured to his neck and winced; and Dick, with an angry
 countenance, put his hand on the lout's shoulder.
 
 "How now, churl!" he cried. "Fall to thy business, and leave mocking thy
 betters."
 
 Hugh Ferryman grumblingly undid his boat, and shoved it a little forth
 into the deep water. Then Dick led in the horse, and Matcham followed.
 
 "Ye be mortal small made, master," said Hugh, with a wide grin;
 "something o' the wrong model, belike. Nay, Master Shelton, I am for
 you," he added, getting to his oars. "A cat may look at a king. I did
 but take a shot of the eye at Master Matcham."
 
 "Sirrah, no more words," said Dick. "Bend me your back."
 
 They were by that time at the mouth of the creek, and the view opened up
 and down the river. Everywhere it was enclosed with islands. Clay banks
 were falling in, willows nodding, reeds waving, martens dipping and
 piping. There was no sign of man in the labyrinth of waters.
 
 "My master," said the ferryman, keeping the boat steady with one oar, "I
 have a shrew guess that John-a-Fenne is on the island. He bears me a
 black grudge to all Sir Daniel's. How if I turned me up stream and
 landed you an arrow-flight above the path? Ye were best not meddle with
 John Fenne."
 
 "How, then, is he of this company?" asked Dick.
 
 "Nay, mum is the word," said Hugh. "But I would go up water, Dick. How
 if Master Matcham came by an arrow?" and he laughed again.
 
 "Be it so, Hugh," answered Dick.
 
 "Look ye, then," pursued Hugh. "Sith it shall so be, unsling me your
 cross-bow--so: now make it ready--good; place me a quarrel. Ay, keep it
 so, and look upon me grimly."
 
 "What meaneth this?" asked Dick.
 
 "Why, my master, if I steal you across, it must be under force or fear,"
 replied the ferryman; "for else, if John Fenne got wind of it, he were
 like to prove my most distressful neighbour."
 
 "Do these churls ride so roughly?" Dick inquired. "Do they command Sir
 Daniel's own ferry?"
 
 "Nay," whispered the ferryman, winking. "Mark me! Sir Daniel shall down.
 His time is out. He shall down. Mum!" And he bent over his oars.
 
 They pulled a long way up the river, turned the tail of an island, and
 came softly down a narrow channel next the opposite bank. Then Hugh held
 water in mid-stream.
 
 "I must land you here among the willows," he said.
 
 "Here is no path but willow swamps and quagmires," answered Dick.
 
 "Master Shelton," replied Hugh, "I dare not take ye nearer down, for
 your own sake now. He watcheth me the ferry, lying on his bow. All that
 go by and owe Sir Daniel good-will, he shooteth down like rabbits. I
 heard him swear it by the rood. An I had not known you of old days--ay,
 and from so high upward--I would 'a' let you go on; but for old days'
 remembrance, and because ye had this toy with you that's not fit for
 wounds or warfare, I did risk my two poor ears to have you over whole.
 Content you; I can no more, on my salvation!"
 
 Hugh was still speaking, lying on his oars, when there came a great
 shout from among the willows on the island, and sounds followed as of a
 strong man breasting roughly through the wood.
 
 "A murrain!" cried Hugh. "He was on the upper island all the while!" He
 pulled straight for shore. "Threat me with your bow, good Dick; threat
 me with it plain," he added. "I have tried to save your skins, save you
 mine!"
 
 The boat ran into a tough thicket of willows with a crash. Matcham,
 pale, but steady and alert, at a sign from Dick, ran along the thwarts
 and leaped ashore; Dick, taking the horse by the bridle, sought to
 follow, but what with the animal's bulk, and what with the closeness of
 the thicket, both stuck fast. The horse neighed and trampled; and the
 boat, which was swinging in an eddy, came on and off and pitched with
 violence.
 
 "It may not be, Hugh; here is no landing," cried Dick; but he still
 struggled valiantly with the obstinate thicket and the startled animal.
 
 A tall man appeared upon the shore of the island, a long-bow in his
 hand. Dick saw him for an instant, with the corner of his eye, bending
 the bow with a great effort, his face crimson with hurry.
 
 "Who goes?" he shouted. "Hugh, who goes?"
 
 "'Tis Master Shelton, John," replied the ferryman.
 
 "Stand, Dick Shelton!" bawled the man upon the island. "Ye shall have no
 hurt, upon the rood! Stand! Back out, Hugh Ferryman."
 
 Dick cried a taunting answer.
 
 "Nay, then, ye shall go afoot," returned the man; and he let drive an
 arrow.
 
 The horse, struck by the shaft, lashed out in agony and terror; the boat
 capsized, and the next moment all were struggling in the eddies of the
 river.
 
 When Dick came up, he was within a yard of the bank; and before his eyes
 were clear, his hand had closed on something firm and strong that
 instantly began to drag him forward. It was the riding-rod, that
 Matcham, crawling forth upon an overhanging willow, had opportunely
 thrust into his grasp.
 
 "By the mass!" cried Dick, as he was helped ashore, "that makes a life I
 owe you. I swim like a cannon-ball." And he turned instantly towards the
 island.
 
 Midway over, Hugh Ferryman was swimming with his upturned boat, while
 John-a-Fenne, furious at the ill-fortune of his shot, bawled to him to
 hurry.
 
 "Come, Jack," said Shelton, "run for it! Ere Hugh can hale his barge
 across, or the pair of 'em can get it righted, we may be out of cry."
 
 And adding example to his words, he began to run, dodging among the
 willows, and in marshy places leaping from tussock to tussock. He had no
 time to look for his direction; all he could do was to turn his back
 upon the river, and put all his heart to running.
 
 Presently, however, the ground began to rise, which showed him he was
 still in the right way, and soon after they came forth upon a slope of
 solid turf, where elms began to mingle with the willows.
 
 But here Matcham, who had been dragging far into the rear, threw himself
 fairly down.
 
 "Leave me, Dick!" he cried, pantingly; "I can no more."
 
 Dick turned, and came back to where his companion lay.
 
 "Nay, Jack, leave thee!" he cried. "That were a knave's trick, to be
 sure, when ye risked a shot and a ducking, ay, and a drowning too, to
 save my life. Drowning, in sooth; for why I did not pull you in along
 with me, the saints alone can tell!"
 
 "Nay," said Matcham, "I would 'a' saved us both, good Dick, for I can
 swim."
 
 "Can ye so?" cried Dick, with open eyes. It was the one manly
 accomplishment of which he was himself incapable. In the order of the
 things that he admired, next to having killed a man in single fight came
 swimming. "Well," he said, "here is a lesson to despise no man. I
 promised to care for you as far as Holywood, and, by the rood, Jack,
 y'are more capable to care for me."
 
 "Well, Dick, we're friends now," said Matcham.
 
 "Nay, I never was unfriends," answered Dick. "Y'are a brave lad in your
 way, albeit something of a milksop, too. I never met your like before
 this day. But, prithee, fetch back your breath, and let us on. Here is
 no place for chatter."
 
 "My foot hurts shrewdly," said Matcham.
 
 "Nay, I had forgot your foot," returned Dick. "Well, we must go the
 gentlier. I would I knew rightly where we were. I have clean lost the
 path; yet that may be for the better, too. An they watch the ferry, they
 watch the path, belike, as well. I would Sir Daniel were back with
 two-score men; he would sweep me these rascals as the wind sweeps
 leaves. Come, Jack, lean ye on my shoulder, ye poor shrew. Nay, y'are
 not tall enough. What age are ye, for a wager?--twelve?"
 
 "Nay, I am sixteen," said Matcham.
 
 "Y'are poorly grown to height, then," answered Dick. "But take my hand.
 We shall go softly, never fear. I owe you a life; I am a good repayer,
 Jack, of good or evil."
 
 They began to go forward up the slope.
 
 "We must hit the road, early or late," continued Dick; "and then for a
 fresh start. By the mass! but y' 'ave a rickety hand, Jack. If I had a
 hand like that, I would think shame. I tell you," he went on, with a
 sudden chuckle, "I swear by the mass I believe Hugh Ferryman took you
 for a maid."
 
 "Nay, never!" cried the other, colouring high.
 
 "A' did, though, for a wager!" Dick exclaimed. "Small blame to him. Ye
 look liker maid than man; and I tell you more--y'are a strange-looking
 rogue for a boy; but for a hussy, Jack, ye would be right fair--ye
 would. Ye would be well favoured for a wench."
 
 "Well," said Matcham, "ye know right well that I am none."
 
 "Nay, I know that; I do but jest," said Dick. "Ye'll be a man before
 your mother, Jack. What cheer, my bully! Ye shall strike shrewd strokes.
 Now, which, I marvel, of you or me, shall be first knighted, Jack? for
 knighted I shall be, or die for't. 'Sir Richard Shelton, Knight': it
 soundeth bravely. But 'Sir John Matcham' soundeth not amiss."
 
 "Prithee, Dick, stop till I drink," said the other, pausing where a
 little clear spring welled out of the slope into a gravelled basin no
 bigger than a pocket. "And O, Dick, if I might come by anything to
 eat!--my very heart aches with hunger."
 
 "Why, fool, did ye not eat at Kettley?" asked Dick.
 
 "I had made a vow--it was a sin I had been led into," stammered Matcham;
 "but now, if it were but dry bread, I would eat it greedily."
 
 "Sit ye, then, and eat," said Dick, "while that I scout a little forward
 for the road." And he took a wallet from his girdle, wherein were bread
 and pieces of dry bacon, and, while Matcham fell heartily to, struck
 farther forth among the trees.
 
 A little beyond there was a dip in the ground, where a streamlet soaked
 among dead leaves; and beyond that, again, the trees were better grown
 and stood wider, and oak and beech began to take the place of willow and
 elm. The continued tossing and pouring of the wind among the leaves
 sufficiently concealed the sounds of his footsteps on the mast; it was
 for the ear what a moonless night is to the eye; but for all that Dick
 went cautiously, slipping from one big trunk to another, and looking
 sharply about him as he went. Suddenly a doe passed like a shadow
 through the underwood in front of him, and he paused, disgusted at the
 chance. This part of the wood had been certainly deserted, but now that
 the poor deer had run, she was like a messenger he should have sent
 before him to announce his coming; and instead of pushing farther, he
 turned him to the nearest well-grown tree, and rapidly began to climb.
 
 Luck had served him well. The oak on which he had mounted was one of the
 tallest in that quarter of the wood, and easily out-topped its
 neighbours by a fathom and a half; and when Dick had clambered into the
 topmost fork and clung there, swinging dizzily in the great wind, he saw
 behind him the whole fenny plain as far as Kettley, and the Till
 wandering among woody islets, and in front of him, the white line of
 highroad winding through the forest. The boat had been righted--it was
 even now midway on the ferry. Beyond that there was no sign of man, nor
 aught moving but the wind. He was about to descend, when, taking a last
 view, his eye lit upon a string of moving points about the middle of the
 fen. Plainly a small troop was threading the causeway, and that at a
 good pace; and this gave him some concern as he shinned vigorously down
 the trunk and returned across the wood for his companion.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 A GREENWOOD COMPANY
 
 
 Matcham was well rested and revived; and the two lads, winged by what
 Dick had seen, hurried through the remainder of the outwood, crossed the
 road in safety, and began to mount into the high ground of Tunstall
 Forest. The trees grew more and more in groves, with healthy places in
 between, sandy, gorsy, and dotted with old yews. The ground became more
 and more uneven, full of pits and hillocks. And with every step of the
 ascent the wind still blew the shriller, and the trees bent before the
 gusts like fishing-rods.
 
 They had just entered one of the clearings, when Dick suddenly clapped
 down upon his face among the brambles, and began to crawl slowly
 backward towards the shelter of the grove. Matcham, in great
 bewilderment, for he could see no reason for this flight, still imitated
 his companion's course; and it was not until they had gained the harbour
 of a thicket that he turned and begged him to explain.
 
 For all reply, Dick pointed with his finger.
 
 At the far end of the clearing, a fir grew high above the neighbouring
 wood, and planted its black shock of foliage clear against the sky. For
 about fifty feet above the ground the trunk grew straight and solid like
 a column. At that level, it split into two massive boughs; and in the
 fork, like a mastheaded seaman, there stood a man in a green tabard,
 spying far and wide. The sun glistened upon his hair; with one hand he
 shaded his eyes to look abroad, and he kept slowly rolling his head from
 side to side, with the regularity of a machine.
 
 The lads exchanged glances.
 
 "Let us try to the left," said Dick. "We had near fallen foully, Jack."
 
 Ten minutes afterwards they struck into a beaten path.
 
 "Here is a piece of forest that I know not," Dick remarked. "Where goeth
 me this track?"
 
 "Let us even try," said Matcham.
 
 A few yards farther, the path came to the top of a ridge and began to go
 down abruptly into a cup-shaped hollow. At the foot, out of a thick wood
 of flowering hawthorn, two or three roofless gables, blackened as if by
 fire, and a single tall chimney marked the ruins of a house.
 
 "What may this be?" whispered Matcham.
 
 "Nay, by the mass, I know not," answered Dick. "I am all at sea. Let us
 go warily."
 
 With beating hearts, they descended through the hawthorns. Here and
 there, they passed signs of recent cultivation; fruit trees and pot
 herbs ran wild among the thicket; a sun-dial had fallen in the grass; it
 seemed they were treading what once had been a garden. Yet a little
 farther and they came forth before the ruins of the house.
 
 It had been a pleasant mansion and a strong. A dry ditch was dug deep
 about it; but it was now choked with masonry, and bridged by a fallen
 rafter. The two farther walls still stood, the sun shining through their
 empty windows; but the remainder of the building had collapsed, and now
 lay in a great cairn of ruin, grimed with fire. Already in the interior
 a few plants were springing green among the chinks.
 
 "Now I bethink me," whispered Dick, "this must be Grimstone. It was a
 hold of one Simon Malmesbury; Sir Daniel was his bane! 'Twas Bennet
 Hatch that burned it, now five years agone. In sooth, 'twas pity, for it
 was a fair house."
 
 Down in the hollow, where no wind blew, it was both warm and still; and
 Matcham, laying one hand upon Dick's arm, held up a warning finger.
 
 "Hist!" he said.
 
 Then came a strange sound, breaking on the quiet. It was twice repeated
 ere they recognised its nature. It was the sound of a big man clearing
 his throat; and just then a hoarse, untuneful voice broke into singing.
 
   "Then up and spake the master, the king of the outlaws:
    'What make ye here, my merry men, among the greenwood shaws?'
    And Gamelyn made answer--he looked never adown:
    'O, they must need to walk in wood that may not walk in town!'"
 
 The singer paused, a faint clink of iron followed, and then silence.
 
 [Illustration: _In the fork, like a mastheaded seaman, there stood a man
 in a green tabard, spying far and wide_]
 
 The two lads stood looking at each other. Whoever he might be, their
 invisible neighbour was just beyond the ruin. And suddenly the colour
 came into Matcham's face, and next moment he had crossed the fallen
 rafter, and was climbing cautiously on the huge pile of lumber that
 filled the interior of the roofless house. Dick would have withheld him,
 had he been in time; as it was, he was fain to follow.
 
 Right in the corner of the ruin, two rafters had fallen crosswise, and
 protected a clear space no larger than a pew in church. Into this the
 lads silently lowered themselves. There they were perfectly concealed,
 and through an arrow-loophole commanded a view upon the farther side.
 
 Peering through this, they were struck stiff with terror at their
 predicament. To retreat was impossible; they scarce dared to breathe.
 Upon the very margin of the ditch, not thirty feet from where they
 crouched, an iron caldron bubbled and steamed above a glowing fire; and
 close by, in an attitude of listening, as though he had caught some
 sound of their clambering among the ruins, a tall, red-faced,
 battered-looking man stood poised, an iron spoon in his right hand, a
 horn and a formidable dagger at his belt. Plainly this was the singer;
 plainly he had been stirring the caldron, when some incautious step
 among the lumber had fallen upon his ear. A little farther off, another
 man lay slumbering, rolled in a brown cloak, with a butterfly hovering
 above his face. All this was in a clearing white with daisies; and at
 the extreme verge, a bow, a sheaf of arrows, and part of a deer's
 carcase hung upon a flowering hawthorn.
 
 Presently the fellow relaxed from his attitude of attention, raised the
 spoon to his mouth, tasted its contents, nodded, and then fell again to
 stirring and singing.
 
 "'O, they must need to walk in wood that may not walk in town,'" he
 croaked, taking up his song where he had left it.
 
   "O, sir, we walk not here at all an evil thing to do.
    But if we meet with the good king's deer to shoot a shaft into."
 
 Still as he sang, he took from time to time another spoonful of the
 broth, blew upon it, and tasted it, with all the airs of an experienced
 cook. At length, apparently, he judged the mess was ready; for taking
 the horn from his girdle, he blew three modulated calls.
 
 The other fellow awoke, rolled over, brushed away the butterfly, and
 looked about him.
 
 "How now, brother?" he said. "Dinner?"
 
 "Ay, sot," replied the cook, "dinner it is, and a dry dinner, too, with
 neither ale nor bread. But there is little pleasure in the greenwood
 now; time was when a good fellow could live here like a mitred abbot,
 set aside the rain and the white frosts; he had his heart's desire both
 of ale and wine. But now are men's spirits dead; and this John
 Amend-All, save us and guard us! but a stuffed booby to scare crows
 withal."
 
 "Nay," returned the other, "y'are too set on meat and drinking, Lawless.
 Bide ye a bit; the good time cometh."
 
 "Look ye," returned the cook, "I have even waited for this good time
 sith that I was so high. I have been a Grey Friar; I have been a king's
 archer; I have been a shipman, and sailed the salt seas; and I have been
 in greenwood before this, forsooth! and shot the king's deer. What
 cometh of it? Naught! I were better to have bided in the cloister. John
 Abbot availeth more than John Amend-All. By 'r Lady! here they come."
 
 One after another, tall, likely fellows began to stroll into the lawn.
 Each as he came produced a knife and a horn cup, helped himself from the
 caldron, and sat down upon the grass to eat. They were very variously
 equipped and armed; some in rusty smocks, and with nothing but a knife
 and an old bow; others in the height of forest gallantry, all in Lincoln
 green, both hood and jerkin, with dainty peacock arrows in their belts,
 a horn upon a baldrick, and a sword and dagger at their sides. They came
 in the silence of hunger, and scarce growled a salutation, but fell
 instantly to meat.
 
 There were, perhaps, a score of them already gathered, when a sound of
 suppressed cheering arose close by among the hawthorns, and immediately
 after five or six woodmen carrying a stretcher debouched upon the lawn.
 A tall, lusty fellow, somewhat grizzled, and as brown as a smoked ham,
 walked before them with an air of some authority, his bow at his back, a
 bright boar-spear in his hand.
 
 "Lads!" he cried, "good fellows all, and my right merry friends, y' have
 sung this while on a dry whistle and lived at little ease. But what said
 I ever? Abide Fortune constantly; she turneth, turneth swift. And lo!
 here is her little firstling--even that good creature, ale!"
 
 There was a murmur of applause as the bearers set down the stretcher and
 displayed a goodly cask.
 
 "And now haste ye, boys," the man continued. "There is work toward. A
 handful of archers are but now come to the ferry; murrey and blue is
 their wear; they are our butts--they shall all taste arrows--no man of
 them shall struggle through this wood. For, lads, we are here some fifty
 strong, each man of us most foully wronged; for some they have lost
 lands, and some friends; and some they have been outlawed--all
 oppressed! Who, then, hath done this evil? Sir Daniel, by the rood!
 Shall he then profit? shall he sit snug in our houses? shall he till our
 fields? shall he suck the bone he robbed us of? I trow not. He getteth
 him strength at law; he gaineth cases; nay, there is one case he shall
 not gain--I have a writ here at my belt that, please the saints, shall
 conquer him."
 
 Lawless the cook was by this time already at his second horn of ale. He
 raised it, as if to pledge the speaker.
 
 "Master Ellis," he said, "y'are for vengeance--well it becometh
 you!--but your poor brother o' the greenwood, that had never lands to
 lose nor friends to think upon, looketh rather, for his poor part, to
 the profit of the thing. He had liever a gold noble and a pottle of
 canary wine than all the vengeances in purgatory."
 
 "Lawless," replied the other, "to reach the Moat House, Sir Daniel must
 pass the forest. We shall make that passage dearer, pardy, than any
 battle. Then, when he hath got to earth with such ragged handful as
 escapeth us--all his great friends fallen and fled away, and none to
 give him aid--we shall beleaguer that old fox about, and great shall be
 the fall of him. 'Tis a fat buck; he will make a dinner for us all."
 
 "Ay," returned Lawless, "I have eaten many of these dinners beforehand;
 but the cooking of them is hot work, good Master Ellis. And meanwhile
 what do we? We make black arrows, we write rhymes, and we drink fair
 cold water, that discomfortable drink."
 
 "Y'are untrue, Will Lawless. Ye still smell of the Grey Friars' buttery;
 greed is your undoing," answered Ellis. "We took twenty pounds from
 Appleyard. We took seven marks from the messenger last night. A day ago
 we had fifty from the merchant."
 
 "And to-day," said one of the men, "I stopped a fat pardoner riding
 apace for Holywood. Here is his purse."
 
 Ellis counted the contents.
 
 "Five-score shillings!" he grumbled. "Fool, he had more in his sandal,
 or stitched into his tippet. Y'are but a child, Tom Cuckow; ye have lost
 the fish."
 
 But, for all that, Ellis pocketed the purse with nonchalance. He stood
 leaning on his boar-spear, and looked round upon the rest. They, in
 various attitudes, took greedily of the venison pottage, and liberally
 washed it down with ale. This was a good day; they were in luck; but
 business pressed, and they were speedy in their eating. The first-comers
 had by this time even despatched their dinner. Some lay down upon the
 grass and fell instantly asleep, like boa-constrictors; others talked
 together, or overhauled their weapons; and one, whose humour was
 particularly gay, holding forth an ale-horn, began to sing:
 
     "Here is no law in good green shaw,
        Here is no lack of meat;
      'Tis merry and quiet, with deer for our diet,
        In summer, when all is sweet.
 
     "Come winter again, with wind and rain--
        Come winter, with snow and sleet,
      Get home to your places, with hoods on your faces,
        And sit by the fire and eat."
 
 All this while the two lads had listened and lain close; only Richard
 had unslung his cross-bow, and held ready in one hand the windac, or
 grappling-iron that he used to bend it. Otherwise they had not dared to
 stir; and this scene of forest life had gone on before their eyes like a
 scene upon a theatre. But now there came a strange interruption. The
 tall chimney which overtopped the remainder of the ruins rose right
 above their hiding-place. There came a whistle in the air, and then a
 sounding smack, and the fragments of a broken arrow fell about their
 ears. Some one from the upper quarters of the wood, perhaps the very
 sentinel they saw posted in the fir, had shot an arrow at the
 chimney-top.
 
 Matcham could not restrain a little cry, which he instantly stifled, and
 even Dick started with surprise, and dropped the windac from his
 fingers. But to the fellows on the lawn, this shaft was an expected
 signal. They were all afoot together, tightening their belts, testing
 their bow-strings, loosening sword and dagger in the sheath. Ellis held
 up his hand; his face had suddenly assumed a look of savage energy; the
 white of his eyes shone in his sun-brown face.
 
 "Lads," he said, "ye know your places. Let not one man's soul escape
 you. Appleyard was a whet before a meal; but now we go to table. I have
 three men whom I will bitterly avenge--Harry Shelton, Simon Malmesbury,
 and"--striking his broad bosom--"and Ellis Duckworth, by the mass!"
 
 Another man came, red with hurry, through the thorns.
 
 "'Tis not Sir Daniel!" he panted. "They are but seven. Is the arrow
 gone?"
 
 "It struck but now," replied Ellis.
 
 "A murrain!" cried the messenger. "Methought I heard it whistle. And I
 go dinnerless!"
 
 In the space of a minute, some running, some walking sharply, according
 as their stations were nearer or farther away, the men of the Black
 Arrow had all disappeared from the neighbourhood of the ruined house;
 and the caldron, and the fire, which was now burning low, and the dead
 deer's carcase on the hawthorn, remained alone to testify they had been
 there.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 "BLOODY AS THE HUNTER"
 
 
 The lads lay quiet till the last footstep had melted on the wind. Then
 they arose, and with many an ache, for they were weary with constraint,
 clambered through the ruins, and recrossed the ditch upon the rafter.
 Matcham had picked up the windac and went first, Dick following stiffly,
 with his cross-bow on his arm.
 
 "And now," said Matcham, "forth to Holywood."
 
 "To Holywood!" cried Dick, "when good fellows stand shot? Not I! I would
 see you hanged first, Jack!"
 
 "Ye would leave me, would ye?" Matcham asked.
 
 "Ay, by my sooth!" returned Dick. "An I be not in time to warn these
 lads, I will go die with them. What! would ye have me leave my own men
 that I have lived among? I trow not! Give me my windac."
 
 But there was nothing further from Matcham's mind.
 
 "Dick," he said, "ye sware before the saints that ye would see me safe
 to Holywood. Would ye be forsworn? Would you desert me--a perjurer?"
 
 "Nay, I sware for the best," returned Dick. "I meant it too; but now!
 But look ye, Jack, turn again with me. Let me but warn these men, and,
 if needs must, stand shot with them; then shall all be clear, and I will
 on again to Holywood and purge mine oath."
 
 "Ye but deride me," answered Matcham. "These men ye go to succour are
 the same that hunt me to my ruin."
 
 Dick scratched his head.
 
 "I cannot help it, Jack," he said. "Here is no remedy. What would ye? Ye
 run no great peril, man; and these are in the way of death. Death!" he
 added. "Think of it! What a murrain do ye keep me here for? Give me the
 windac. St. George! shall they all die?"
 
 "Richard Shelton," said Matcham, looking him squarely in the face,
 "would ye, then, join party with Sir Daniel? Have ye not ears? Heard ye
 not this Ellis, what he said? or have ye no heart for your own kindly
 blood and the father that men slew? 'Harry Shelton,' he said; and Sir
 Harry Shelton was your father, as the sun shines in heaven."
 
 "What would ye?" Dick cried again. "Would ye have me credit thieves?"
 
 "Nay, I have heard it before now," returned Matcham. "The fame goeth
 currently, it was Sir Daniel slew him. He slew him under oath; in his
 own house he shed the innocent blood. Heaven wearies for the avenging
 on't; and you--the man's son--ye go about to comfort and defend the
 murderer!"
 
 "Jack," cried the lad, "I know not. It may be; what know I? But, see
 here: This man hath bred me up and fostered me, and his men I have
 hunted with and played among; and to leave them in the hour of peril--O,
 man, if I did that, I were stark dead to honour! Nay, Jack, ye would not
 ask it; ye would not wish me to be base."
 
 "But your father, Dick?" said Matcham, somewhat wavering. "Your father?
 and your oath to me? Ye took the saints to witness."
 
 "My father?" cried Shelton. "Nay, he would have me go! If Sir Daniel
 slew him, when the hour comes this hand shall slay Sir Daniel; but
 neither him nor his will I desert in peril. And for mine oath, good
 Jack, ye shall absolve me of it here. For the lives' sake of many men
 that hurt you not, and for mine honour, ye shall set me free."
 
 "I, Dick? Never!" returned Matcham. "An ye leave me, y'are forsworn, and
 so I shall declare it."
 
 "My blood heats," said Dick. "Give me the windac! Give it me!"
 
 "I'll not," said Matcham. "I'll save you in your teeth."
 
 "Not?" cried Dick. "I'll make you!"
 
 "Try it," said the other.
 
 They stood, looking in each other's eyes, each ready for a spring. Then
 Dick leaped; and though Matcham turned instantly and fled, in two bounds
 he was overtaken, the windac was twisted from his grasp, he was thrown
 roughly to the ground, and Dick stood across him, flushed and menacing,
 with doubled fist. Matcham lay where he had fallen, with his face in the
 grass, not thinking of resistance.
 
 Dick bent his bow.
 
 "I'll teach you!" he cried, fiercely. "Oath or no oath, ye may go hang
 for me!"
 
 And he turned and began to run. Matcham was on his feet at once, and
 began running after him.
 
 "What d'ye want?" cried Dick, stopping. "What make ye after me? Stand
 off!"
 
 "I will follow an I please," said Matcham. "This wood is free to me."
 
 "Stand back, by 'r Lady!" returned Dick, raising his bow.
 
 "Ah, y'are a brave boy!" retorted Matcham. "Shoot!"
 
 Dick lowered his weapon in some confusion.
 
 "See here," he said. "Y' have done me ill enough. Go, then. Go your way
 in fair wise; or, whether I will or not, I must even drive you to it."
 
 "Well," said Matcham, doggedly, "y'are the stronger. Do your worst. I
 shall not leave to follow thee, Dick, unless thou makest me," he added.
 
 Dick was almost beside himself. It went against his heart to beat a
 creature so defenceless; and, for the life of him, he knew no other way
 to rid himself of this unwelcome and, as he began to think, perhaps
 untrue companion.
 
 "Y'are mad, I think," he cried. "Fool-fellow, I am hasting to your foes;
 as fast as foot can carry me, go I thither."
 
 "I care not, Dick," replied the lad. "If y'are bound to die, Dick, I'll
 die too. I would liever go with you to prison than to go free without
 you."
 
 "Well," returned the other, "I may stand no longer prating. Follow me,
 if ye must; but if ye play me false, it shall but little advance you,
 mark ye that. Shalt have a quarrel in thine inwards, boy."
 
 So saying, Dick took once more to his heels, keeping in the margin of
 the thicket and looking briskly about him as he went. At a good pace he
 rattled out of the dell, and came again into the more open quarters of
 the wood. To the left a little eminence appeared, spotted with golden
 gorse, and crowned with a black tuft of firs.
 
 "I shall see from there," he thought, and struck for it across a heathy
 clearing.
 
 He had gone but a few yards, when Matcham touched him on the arm, and
 pointed. To the eastward of the summit there was a dip, and, as it were,
 a valley passing to the other side; the heath was not yet out; all the
 ground was rusty, like an unscoured buckler, and dotted sparingly with
 yews; and there, one following another, Dick saw half a score green
 jerkins mounting the ascent, and marching at their head, conspicuous by
 his boar-spear, Ellis Duckworth in person. One after another gained the
 top, showed for a moment against the sky, and then dipped upon the
 farther side, until the last was gone.
 
 Dick looked at Matcham with a kindlier eye.
 
 "So y'are to be true to me, Jack?" he asked. "I thought ye were of the
 other party."
 
 Matcham began to sob.
 
 "What cheer!" cried Dick. "Now the saints behold us! would ye snivel for
 a word?"
 
 "Ye hurt me," sobbed Matcham. "Ye hurt me when ye threw me down. Y'are a
 coward to abuse your strength."
 
 "Nay, that is fool's talk," said Dick, roughly. "Y' had no title to my
 windac, Master John. I would 'a' done right to have well basted you. If
 ye go with me, ye must obey me; and so, come."
 
 Matcham had half a thought to stay behind; but, seeing that Dick
 continued to scour full-tilt towards the eminence and not so much as
 looked across his shoulder, he soon thought better of that, and began to
 run in turn. But the ground was very difficult and steep; Dick had
 already a long start, and had, at any rate, the lighter heels, and he
 had long since come to the summit, crawled forward through the firs, and
 ensconced himself in a thick tuft of gorse, before Matcham, panting like
 a deer, rejoined him, and lay down in silence by his side.
 
 Below, in the bottom of a considerable valley, the short cut from
 Tunstall hamlet wound downwards to the ferry. It was well beaten, and
 the eye followed it easily from point to point. Here it was bordered by
 open glades; there the forest closed upon it; every hundred yards it ran
 beside an ambush. Far down the path, the sun shone on seven steel
 salets, and from time to time, as the trees opened, Selden and his men
 could be seen riding briskly, still bent upon Sir Daniel's mission. The
 wind had somewhat fallen, but still tussled merrily with the trees, and,
 perhaps, had Appleyard been there, he would have drawn a warning from
 the troubled conduct of the birds.
 
 "Now, mark," Dick whispered. "They be already well advanced into the
 wood; their safety lieth rather in continuing forward. But see ye where
 this wide glade runneth down before us, and in the midst of it, these
 two-score trees make like an island? There were their safety. An they
 but come sound as far as that, I will make shift to warn them. But my
 heart misgiveth me; they are but seven against so many, and they but
 carry cross-bows. The long-bow, Jack, will have the uppermost ever."
 
 Meanwhile, Selden and his men still wound up the path, ignorant of their
 danger, and momently drew nearer hand. Once, indeed, they paused, drew
 into a group, and seemed to point and listen. But it was something from
 far away across the plain that had arrested their attention--a hollow
 growl of cannon that came, from time to time, upon the wind, and told of
 the great battle. It was worth a thought, to be sure; for if the voice
 of the big guns were thus become audible in Tunstall Forest, the fight
 must have rolled ever eastward, and the day, by consequence, gone sore
 against Sir Daniel and the lords of the dark rose.
 
 But presently the little troop began again to move forward, and came
 next to a very open, heathy portion of the way, where but a single
 tongue of forest ran down to join the road. They were but just abreast
 of this, when an arrow shone flying. One of the men threw up his arms,
 his horse reared, and both fell and struggled together in a mass. Even
 from where the boys lay they could hear the rumour of the men's voices
 crying out; they could see the startled horses prancing, and, presently,
 as the troop began to recover from their first surprise, one fellow
 beginning to dismount. A second arrow from somewhat farther off glanced
 in a wide arch; a second rider bit the dust. The man who was dismounting
 lost hold upon the rein, and his horse fled galloping, and dragged him
 by the foot along the road, bumping from stone to stone, and battered by
 the fleeing hoofs. The four who still kept the saddle instantly broke
 and scattered; one wheeled and rode, shrieking, towards the ferry; the
 other three, with loose rein and flying raiment, came galloping up the
 road from Tunstall. From every clump they passed an arrow sped. Soon a
 horse fell, but the rider found his feet and continued to pursue his
 comrades till a second shot despatched him. Another man fell; then
 another horse; out of the whole troop there was but one fellow left, and
 he on foot; only, in different directions, the noise of the galloping of
 three riderless horses was dying fast into the distance.
 
 All this time not one of the assailants had for a moment shown himself.
 Here and there along the path, horse or man rolled, undespatched, in his
 agony; but no merciful enemy broke cover to put them from their pain.
 
 The solitary survivor stood bewildered in the road beside his fallen
 charger. He had come the length of that broad glade, with the island of
 timber, pointed out by Dick. He was not, perhaps, five hundred yards
 from where the boys lay hidden; and they could see him plainly, looking
 to and fro in deadly expectation. But nothing came; and the man began to
 pluck up his courage, and suddenly unslung and bent his bow. At the same
 time, by something in his action, Dick recognised Selden.
 
 At this offer of resistance, from all about him in the covert of the
 woods there went up the sound of laughter. A score of men, at least, for
 this was the very thickest of the ambush, joined in this cruel and
 untimely mirth. Then an arrow glanced over Selden's shoulder; and he
 leaped and ran a little back. Another dart struck quivering at his heel.
 He made for the cover. A third shaft leaped out right in his face, and
 fell short in front of him. And then the laughter was repeated loudly,
 rising and re-echoing from different thickets.
 
 It was plain that his assailants were but baiting him, as men, in those
 days, baited the poor bull, or as the cat still trifles with the mouse.
 The skirmish was well over; farther down the road, a fellow in green was
 already calmly gathering the arrows; and now, in the evil pleasure of
 their hearts, they gave themselves the spectacle of their poor
 fellow-sinner in his torture.
 
 Selden began to understand; he uttered a roar of anger, shouldered his
 cross-bow, and sent a quarrel at a venture into the wood. Chance
 favoured him, for a slight cry responded. Then, throwing down his
 weapon, Selden began to run before him up the glade, and almost in a
 straight line for Dick and Matcham.
 
 The companions of the Black Arrow now began to shoot in earnest. But
 they were properly served; their chance had past; most of them had now
 to shoot against the sun; and Selden, as he ran, bounded from side to
 side to baffle and deceive their aim. Best of all, by turning up the
 glade he had defeated their preparations; there were no marksmen posted
 higher up than the one whom he had just killed or wounded; and the
 confusion of the foresters' counsels soon became apparent. A whistle
 sounded thrice, and then again twice. It was repeated from another
 quarter. The woods on either side became full of the sound of people
 bursting through the underwood; and a bewildered deer ran out into the
 open, stood for a second on three feet, with nose in air, and then
 plunged again into the thicket.
 
 Selden still ran, bounding; ever and again an arrow followed him, but
 still would miss. It began to appear as if he might escape. Dick had his
 bow armed, ready to support him; even Matcham, forgetful of his
 interest, took sides at heart for the poor fugitive; and both lads
 glowed and trembled in the ardour of their hearts.
 
 He was within fifty yards of them, when an arrow struck him and he fell.
 He was up again, indeed, upon the instant; but now he ran staggering,
 and, like a blind man, turned aside from his direction.
 
 Dick leaped to his feet and waved to him.
 
 "Here!" he cried. "This way! here is help! Nay, run, fellow--run!"
 
 But just then a second arrow struck Selden in the shoulder, between the
 plates of his brigandine, and, piercing through his jack, brought him,
 like a stone, to earth.
 
 "O, the poor heart!" cried Matcham, with clasped hands.
 
 And Dick stood petrified upon the hill, a mark for archery.
 
 Ten to one he had speedily been shot--for the foresters were furious
 with themselves, and taken unawares by Dick's appearance in the rear of
 their position--but instantly, out of a quarter of the wood surprisingly
 near to the two lads, a stentorian voice arose, the voice of Ellis
 Duckworth.
 
 "Hold!" it roared. "Shoot not! Take him alive! It is young
 Shelton--Harry's son."
 
 And immediately after a shrill whistle sounded several times, and was
 again taken up and repeated farther off. The whistle, it appeared, was
 John Amend-All's battle trumpet, by which he published his directions.
 
 "Ah, foul fortune!" cried Dick. "We are undone. Swiftly, Jack, come
 swiftly!"
 
 And the pair turned and ran back through the open pine clump that
 covered the summit of the hill.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 TO THE DAY'S END
 
 
 It was, indeed, high time for them to run. On every side the company of
 the Black Arrow was making for the hill. Some, being better runners, or
 having open ground to run upon, had far outstripped the others, and were
 already close upon the goal; some, following valleys, had spread out to
 right and left, and outflanked the lads on either side.
 
 Dick plunged into the nearest cover. It was a tall grove of oaks, firm
 underfoot and clear of underbrush, and as it lay down-hill, they made
 good speed. There followed next a piece of open, which Dick avoided,
 holding to his left. Two minutes after, and the same obstacle arising,
 the lads followed the same course. Thus it followed that, while the
 lads, bending continually to the left, drew nearer and nearer to the
 highroad and the river which they had crossed an hour or two before, the
 great bulk of their pursuers were leaning to the other hand, and running
 towards Tunstall.
 
 The lads paused to breathe. There was no sound of pursuit. Dick put his
 ear to the ground, and still there was nothing; but the wind, to be
 sure, still made a turmoil in the trees, and it was hard to make
 certain.
 
 "On again," said Dick; and, tired as they were, and Matcham limping
 with his injured foot, they pulled themselves together, and once more
 pelted down the hill.
 
 Three minutes later, they were breasting through a low thicket of
 evergreen. High overhead, the tall trees made a continuous roof of
 foliage. It was a pillared grove, as high as a cathedral, and except for
 the hollies among which the lads were struggling, open and smoothly
 swarded.
 
 On the other side, pushing through the last fringe of evergreen, they
 blundered forth again into the open twilight of the grove.
 
 "Stand!" cried a voice.
 
 And there, between the huge stems, not fifty feet before them, they
 beheld a stout fellow in green, sore blown with running, who instantly
 drew an arrow to the head and covered them. Matcham stopped with a cry;
 but Dick, without a pause, ran straight upon the forester, drawing his
 dagger as he went. The other, whether he was startled by the daring of
 the onslaught, or whether he was hampered by his orders, did not shoot;
 he stood wavering; and before he had time to come to himself, Dick
 bounded at his throat, and sent him sprawling backward on the turf. The
 arrow went one way and the bow another with a sounding twang. The
 disarmed forester grappled his assailant; but the dagger shone and
 descended twice. Then came a couple of groans, and then Dick rose to his
 feet again, and the man lay motionless, stabbed to the heart.
 
 "On!" said Dick; and he once more pelted forward, Matcham trailing in
 the rear. To say truth, they made but poor speed of it by now, labouring
 dismally as they ran, and catching for their breath like fish. Matcham
 had a cruel stitch, and his head swam; and as for Dick, his knees were
 like lead. But they kept up the form of running with undiminished
 courage.
 
 Presently they came to the end of the grove. It stopped abruptly; and
 there, a few yards before them, was the highroad from Risingham to
 Shoreby, lying, at this point, between two even walls of forest.
 
 At the sight Dick paused; and as soon as he stopped running, he became
 aware of a confused noise, which rapidly grew louder. It was at first
 like the rush of a very high gust of wind, but soon it became more
 definite, and resolved itself into the galloping of horses; and then, in
 a flash, a whole company of men-at-arms came driving round the corner,
 swept before the lads, and were gone again upon the instant. They rode
 as for their lives, in complete disorder; some of them were wounded;
 riderless horses galloped at their side with bloody saddles. They were
 plainly fugitives from the great battle.
 
 The noise of their passage had scarce begun to die away towards Shoreby,
 before fresh hoofs came echoing in their wake, and another deserter
 clattered down the road; this time a single rider and, by his splendid
 armour, a man of high degree. Close after him there followed several
 baggage-waggons, fleeing at an ungainly canter, the drivers flailing at
 the horses as if for life. These must have run early in the day; but
 their cowardice was not to save them. For just before they came abreast
 of where the lads stood wondering, a man in hacked armour, and seemingly
 beside himself with fury, overtook the waggons, and with the truncheon
 of a sword, began to cut the drivers down. Some leaped from their places
 and plunged into the wood; the others he sabred as they sat, cursing
 them the while for cowards in a voice that was scarce human.
 
 All this time the noise in the distance had continued to increase; the
 rumble of carts, the clatter of horses, the cries of men, a great,
 confused rumour, came swelling on the wind; and it was plain that the
 rout of a whole army was pouring, like an inundation, down the road.
 
 Dick stood sombre. He had meant to follow the highway till the turn for
 Holywood, and now he had to change his plan. But above all, he had
 recognised the colours of Earl Risingham, and he knew that the battle
 had gone finally against the rose of Lancaster. Had Sir Daniel joined,
 and was he now a fugitive and ruined? or had he deserted to the side of
 York, and was he forfeit to honour? It was an ugly choice.
 
 "Come," he said, sternly; and, turning on his heel, he began to walk
 forward through the grove, with Matcham limping in his rear.
 
 For some time they continued to thread the forest in silence. It was now
 growing late; the sun was setting in the plain beyond Kettley; the
 tree-tops overhead glowed golden; but the shadows had begun to grow
 darker and the chill of the night to fall.
 
 "If there were anything to eat!" cried Dick, suddenly, pausing as he
 spoke.
 
 Matcham sat down and began to weep.
 
 "Ye can weep for your own supper, but when it was to save men's lives,
 your heart was hard enough," said Dick, contemptuously. "Y' 'ave seven
 deaths upon your conscience, Master John; I'll ne'er forgive you that."
 
 "Conscience!" cried Matcham, looking fiercely up. "Mine! And ye have the
 man's red blood upon your dagger! And wherefore did ye slay him, the
 poor soul? He drew his arrow, but he let not fly; he held you in his
 hand, and spared you! 'Tis as brave to kill a kitten, as a man that not
 defends himself."
 
 Dick was struck dumb.
 
 "I slew him fair. I ran me in upon his bow," he cried.
 
 "It was a coward blow," returned Matcham. "Y'are but a lout and bully,
 Master Dick; ye but abuse advantages; let there come a stronger, we will
 see you truckle at his boot! Ye care not for vengeance, neither--for
 your father's death that goes unpaid, and his poor ghost that clamoureth
 for justice. But if there come but a poor creature in your hands that
 lacketh skill and strength, and would befriend you, down she shall go!"
 
 Dick was too furious to observe that "she."
 
 "Marry!" he cried, "and here is news! Of any two the one will still be
 stronger. The better man throweth the worse, and the worse is well
 served. Ye deserve a belting, Master Matcham, for your ill-guidance and
 unthankfulness to meward; and what ye deserve ye shall have."
 
 And Dick, who, even in his angriest temper, still preserved the
 appearance of composure, began to unbuckle his belt.
 
 "Here shall be your supper," he said, grimly.
 
 Matcham had stopped his tears; he was as white as a sheet, but he looked
 Dick steadily in the face, and never moved. Dick took a step, swinging
 the belt. Then he paused, embarrassed by the large eyes and the thin,
 weary face of his companion. His courage began to subside.
 
 "Say ye were in the wrong, then," he said, lamely.
 
 "Nay," said Matcham, "I was in the right. Come, cruel! I be lame; I be
 weary; I resist not; I ne'er did thee hurt; come, beat me--coward!"
 
 Dick raised the belt at this last provocation; but Matcham winced and
 drew himself together with so cruel an apprehension, that his heart
 failed him yet again. The strap fell by his side, and he stood
 irresolute, feeling like a fool.
 
 "A plague upon thee, shrew!" he said. "An ye be so feeble of hand, ye
 should keep the closer guard upon your tongue. But I'll be hanged before
 I beat you!" and he put on his belt again. "Beat you I will not," he
 continued; "but forgive you?--never. I knew ye not; ye were my master's
 enemy; I lent you my horse; my dinner ye have eaten; y' 'ave called me a
 man o' wood, a coward, and a bully. Nay, by the mass! the measure is
 filled, and runneth over. 'Tis a great thing to be weak, I trow: ye can
 do your worst, yet shall none punish you; ye may steal a man's weapons
 in the hour of need, yet may the man not take his own again;--y'are
 weak, forsooth! Nay, then, if one cometh charging at you with a lance,
 and crieth he is weak, ye must let him pierce your body through! Tut!
 fool words!"
 
 "And yet ye beat me not," returned Matcham.
 
 "Let be," said Dick--"let be. I will instruct you. Y' 'ave been
 ill-nurtured, methinks, and yet ye have the makings of some good, and,
 beyond all question, saved me from the river. Nay, I had forgotten it; I
 am as thankless as thyself. But, come, let us on. An we be for Holywood
 this night, ay, or to-morrow early, we had best set forward speedily."
 
 But though Dick had talked himself back into his usual good-humour,
 Matcham had forgiven him nothing. His violence, the recollection of the
 forester whom he had slain--above all, the vision of the upraised belt,
 were things not easily to be forgotten.
 
 "I will thank you, for the form's sake," said Matcham. "But, in sooth,
 good Master Shelton, I had liever find my way alone. Here is a wide
 wood; prithee, let each choose his path; I owe you a dinner and a
 lesson. Fare ye well!"
 
 "Nay," cried Dick, "if that be your tune, so be it, and a plague be with
 you!"
 
 Each turned aside, and they began walking off severally, with no thought
 of the direction, intent solely on their quarrel. But Dick had not gone
 ten paces ere his name was called, and Matcham came running after.
 
 "Dick," he said, "it were unmannerly to part so coldly. Here is my hand,
 and my heart with it. For all that wherein you have so excellently
 served and helped me--not for the form, but from the heart, I thank you.
 Fare ye right well."
 
 "Well, lad," returned Dick, taking the hand which was offered him, "good
 speed to you, if speed you may. But I misdoubt it shrewdly. Y'are too
 disputatious."
 
 So then they separated for the second time; and presently it was Dick
 who was running after Matcham.
 
 "Here," he said, "take my cross-bow; shalt not go unarmed."
 
 "A cross-bow!" said Matcham. "Nay, boy, I have neither the strength to
 bend nor yet the skill to aim with it. It were no help to me, good boy.
 But yet I thank you."
 
 The night had now fallen, and under the trees they could no longer read
 each other's face.
 
 "I will go some little way with you," said Dick. "The night is dark. I
 would fain leave you on a path, at least. My mind misgiveth me, y'are
 likely to be lost."
 
 Without any more words, he began to walk forward, and the other once
 more followed him. The blackness grew thicker and thicker. Only here and
 there, in open places, they saw the sky, dotted with small stars. In the
 distance, the noise of the rout of the Lancastrian army still continued
 to be faintly audible; but with every step they left it farther in the
 rear.
 
 At the end of half an hour of silent progress they came forth upon a
 broad patch of heathy open. It glimmered in the light of the stars,
 shaggy with fern and islanded with clumps of yew. And here they paused
 and looked upon each other.
 
 "Y'are weary?" Dick said.
 
 "Nay, I am so weary," answered Matcham, "that methinks I could lie down
 and die."
 
 "I hear the chiding of a river," returned Dick. "Let us go so far forth,
 for I am sore athirst."
 
 The ground sloped down gently; and, sure enough, in the bottom, they
 found a little murmuring river, running among willows. Here they threw
 themselves down together by the brink; and putting their mouths to the
 level of a starry pool, they drank their fill.
 
 "Dick," said Matcham, "it may not be. I can no more."
 
 "I saw a pit as we came down," said Dick. "Let us lie down therein and
 sleep."
 
 "Nay, but with all my heart!" cried Matcham.
 
 The pit was sandy and dry; a shock of brambles hung upon one hedge, and
 made a partial shelter; and there the two lads lay down, keeping close
 together for the sake of warmth, their quarrel all forgotten. And soon
 sleep fell upon them like a cloud, and under the dew and stars they
 rested peacefully.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 THE HOODED FACE
 
 
 They awoke in the grey of the morning; the birds were not yet in full
 song, but twittered here and there among the woods; the sun was not yet
 up, but the eastern sky was barred with solemn colours. Half starved and
 over-weary as they were, they lay without moving, sunk in a delightful
 lassitude. And as they thus lay, the clang of a bell fell suddenly upon
 their ears.
 
 "A bell!" said Dick, sitting up. "Can we be, then, so near to Holywood?"
 
 A little after, the bell clanged again, but this time somewhat nearer
 hand; and from that time forth, and still drawing nearer and nearer, it
 continued to sound brokenly abroad in the silence of the morning.
 
 "Nay, what should this betoken?" said Dick, who was now broad awake.
 
 "It is some one walking," returned Matcham, "and the bell tolleth ever
 as he moves."
 
 "I see that well," said Dick. "But wherefore? What maketh he in Tunstall
 Woods? Jack," he added, "laugh at me an ye will, but I like not the
 hollow sound of it."
 
 "Nay," said Matcham, with a shiver, "it hath a doleful note. An the day
 were not come----"
 
 But just then the bell, quickening its pace, began to ring thick and
 hurried, and then it gave a single hammering jangle, and was silent for
 a space.
 
 "It is as though the bearer had run for a paternoster while, and then
 leaped the river," Dick observed.
 
 "And now beginneth he again to pace soberly forward," added Matcham.
 
 "Nay," returned Dick--"nay, not so soberly, Jack. 'Tis a man that
 walketh you right speedily. 'Tis a man in some fear of his life, or
 about some hurried business. See ye not how swift the beating draweth
 near?"
 
 "It is now close by," said Matcham.
 
 They were now on the edge of the pit; and as the pit itself was on a
 certain eminence, they commanded a view over the greater proportion of
 the clearing, up to the thick woods that closed it in.
 
 The daylight, which was very clear and grey, showed them a riband of
 white foot-path wandering among the gorse. It passed some hundred yards
 from the pit, and ran the whole length of the clearing, east and west.
 By the line of its course, Dick judged it should lead more or less
 directly to the Moat House.
 
 Upon this path, stepping forth from the margin of the wood, a white
 figure now appeared. It paused a little, and seemed to look about; and
 then, at a slow pace, and bent almost double, it began to draw near
 across the heath. At every step the bell clanked. Face, it had none; a
 white hood, not even pierced with eye-holes, veiled the head; and as the
 creature moved, it seemed to feel its way with the tapping of a stick.
 Fear fell upon the lads, as cold as death.
 
 "A leper!" said Dick, hoarsely.
 
 "His touch is death," said Matcham. "Let us run."
 
 "Not so," returned Dick. "See ye not?--he is stone blind. He guideth him
 with a staff. Let us lie still; the wind bloweth towards the path, and
 he will go by and hurt us not. Alas, poor soul, and we should rather
 pity him!"
 
 "I will pity him when he is by," replied Matcham.
 
 The blind leper was now about half-way towards them, and just then the
 sun rose and shone full on his veiled face. He had been a tall man
 before he was bowed by his disgusting sickness, and even now he walked
 with a vigorous step. The dismal beating of his bell, the pattering of
 the stick, the eyeless screen before his countenance, and the knowledge
 that he was not only doomed to death and suffering, but shut out for
 ever from the touch of his fellow-men, filled the lads' bosoms with
 dismay; and at every step that brought him nearer, their courage and
 strength seemed to desert them.
 
 As he came about level with the pit, he paused, and turned his face full
 upon the lads.
 
 "Mary be my shield! He sees us!" said Matcham, faintly.
 
 "Hush!" whispered Dick. "He doth but hearken. He is blind, fool!"
 
 The leper looked or listened, whichever he was really doing, for some
 seconds. Then he began to move on again, but presently paused once more,
 and again turned and seemed to gaze upon the lads. Even Dick became
 dead-white and closed his eyes, as if by the mere sight he might become
 infected. But soon the bell sounded, and this time, without any further
 hesitation, the leper crossed the remainder of the little heath and
 disappeared into the covert of the woods.
 
 "He saw us," said Matcham. "I could swear it!"
 
 "Tut!" returned Dick, recovering some sparks of courage. "He but heard
 us. He was in fear, poor soul! An ye were blind, and walked in a
 perpetual night, ye would start yourself, if ever a twig rustled or a
 bird cried 'Peep.'"
 
 "Dick, good Dick, he saw us," repeated Matcham. "When a man hearkeneth,
 he doth not as this man; he doth otherwise, Dick. This was seeing; it
 was not hearing. He means foully. Hark, else, if his bell be not
 stopped!"
 
 Such was the case. The bell rang no longer.
 
 "Nay," said Dick, "I like not that. Nay," he cried again, "I like that
 little. What may this betoken? Let us go, by the mass!"
 
 "He hath gone east," added Matcham. "Good Dick, let us go westward
 straight; I shall not breathe till I have my back turned upon that
 leper."
 
 "Jack, y'are too cowardly," replied Dick. "We shall go fair for
 Holywood, or as fair, at least, as I can guide you, and that will be due
 north."
 
 They were afoot at once, passed the stream upon some stepping-stones,
 and began to mount on the other side, which was steeper, towards the
 margin of the wood. The ground became very uneven, full of knolls and
 hollows; trees grew scattered or in clumps; it became difficult to
 choose a path, and the lads somewhat wandered. They were weary,
 besides, with yesterday's exertions and the lack of food, and they moved
 but heavily and dragged their feet among the sand.
 
 Presently, coming to the top of a knoll, they were aware of the leper,
 some hundred feet in front of them, crossing the line of their march by
 a hollow. His bell was silent, his staff no longer tapped the ground,
 and he went before him with the swift and assured footsteps of a man who
 sees. Next moment he had disappeared into a little thicket.
 
 The lads, at the first glimpse, had crouched behind a tuft of gorse;
 there they lay, horror-struck.
 
 "Certain, he pursueth us," said Dick--"certain! He held the clapper of
 his bell in one hand, saw ye? that it should not sound. Now may the
 saints aid and guide us, for I have no strength to combat pestilence!"
 
 "What maketh he?" cried Matcham. "What doth he want? Who ever heard the
 like, that a leper, out of mere malice, should pursue unfortunates? Hath
 he not his bell to that very end, that people may avoid him? Dick, there
 is below this something deeper."
 
 "Nay, I care not," moaned Dick; "the strength is gone out of me; my legs
 are like water. The saints be mine assistance!"
 
 "Would ye lie there idle?" cried Matcham. "Let us back into the open. We
 have the better chance; he cannot steal upon us unawares."
 
 "Not I," said Dick. "My time is come, and peradventure he may pass us
 by."
 
 "Bend me, then, your bow!" cried the other. "What! will ye be a man?"
 
 Dick crossed himself. "Would ye have me shoot upon a leper?" he cried.
 "The hand would fail me. Nay, now," he added--"nay, now, let be! With
 sound men I will fight, but not with ghosts and lepers. Which this is I
 wot not. One or other, Heaven be our protection!"
 
 "Now," said Matcham, "if this be man's courage, what a poor thing is
 man! But sith ye will do naught, let us lie close."
 
 Then came a single, broken jangle on the bell.
 
 "He hath missed his hold upon the clapper," whispered Matcham. "Saints!
 how near he is!"
 
 But Dick answered never a word; his teeth were near chattering.
 
 Soon they saw a piece of the white robe between some bushes; then the
 leper's head was thrust forth from behind a trunk, and he seemed
 narrowly to scan the neighbourhood before he once again withdrew. To
 their stretched senses, the whole bush appeared alive with rustlings and
 the creak of twigs; and they heard the beating of each other's heart.
 
 Suddenly, with a cry, the leper sprang into the open close by, and ran
 straight upon the lads. They, shrieking aloud, separated and began to
 run different ways. But their horrible enemy fastened upon Matcham, ran
 him swiftly down, and had him almost instantly a prisoner. The lad gave
 one scream that echoed high and far over the forest, he had one spasm of
 struggling, and then all his limbs relaxed, and he fell limp into his
 captor's arms.
 
 Dick heard the cry and turned. He saw Matcham fall; and on the instant
 his spirit and his strength revived. With a cry of pity and anger, he
 unslung and bent his arblast. But ere he had time to shoot, the leper
 held up his hand.
 
 "Hold your shot, Dickon!" cried a familiar voice. "Hold your shot, mad
 wag! Know ye not a friend?"
 
 And then laying down Matcham on the turf, he undid the hood from off his
 face, and disclosed the features of Sir Daniel Brackley.
 
 "Sir Daniel!" cried Dick.
 
 "Ay, by the mass, Sir Daniel!" returned the knight. "Would ye shoot upon
 your guardian, rogue? But here is this----" And there he broke off, and
 pointing to Matcham, asked: "How call ye him, Dick?"
 
 "Nay," said Dick, "I call him Master Matcham. Know ye him not? He said
 ye knew him!"
 
 "Ay," replied Sir Daniel, "I know the lad"; and he chuckled. "But he has
 fainted; and, by my sooth, he might have had less to faint for! Hey,
 Dick? Did I put the fear of death upon you?"
 
 "Indeed, Sir Daniel, ye did that," said Dick, and sighed again at the
 mere recollection. "Nay, sir, saving your respect, I had as lief 'a' met
 the devil in person; and to speak truth, I am yet all a-quake. But what
 made ye, sir, in such a guise?"
 
 Sir Daniel's brow grew suddenly black with anger.
 
 "What made I?" he said. "Ye do well to mind me of it! What? I skulked
 for my poor life in my own wood of Tunstall, Dick. We were ill sped at
 the battle; we but got there to be swept among the rout. Where be all
 my good men-at-arms? Dick, by the mass, I know not! We were swept down;
 the shot fell thick among us; I have not seen one man in my own colours
 since I saw three fall. For myself, I came sound to Shoreby, and being
 mindful of the Black Arrow, got me this gown and bell, and came softly
 by the path for the Moat House. There is no disguise to be compared with
 it; the jingle of this bell would scare me the stoutest outlaw in the
 forest; they would all turn pale to hear it. At length I came by you and
 Matcham. I could see but evilly through this same hood, and was not sure
 of you, being chiefly, and for many a good cause, astonished at the
 finding you together. Moreover, in the open, where I had to go slowly
 and tap with my staff, I feared to disclose myself. But see," he added,
 "this poor shrew begins a little to revive. A little good canary will
 comfort me the heart of it."
 
 The knight, from under his long dress, produced a stout bottle, and
 began to rub the temples and wet the lips of the patient, who returned
 gradually to consciousness, and began to roll dim eyes from one to
 another.
 
 "What cheer, Jack!" said Dick. "It was no leper, after all; it was Sir
 Daniel! See!"
 
 "Swallow me a good draught of this," said the knight. "This will give
 you manhood. Thereafter, I will give you both a meal, and we shall all
 three on to Tunstall. For, Dick," he continued, laying forth bread and
 meat upon the grass, "I will avow to you, in all good conscience, it
 irks me sorely to be safe between four walls. Not since I backed a horse
 have I been pressed so hard; peril of life, jeopardy of land and
 livelihood, and to sum up, all these losels in the wood to hunt me down.
 But I be not yet shent. Some of my lads will pick me their way home.
 Hatch hath ten fellows; Selden, he had six. Nay, we shall soon be strong
 again; and if I can but buy my peace with my right fortunate and
 undeserving Lord of York, why, Dick, we'll be a man again and go
 a-horseback!"
 
 And so saying, the knight filled himself a horn of canary, and pledged
 his ward in dumb show.
 
 "Selden," Dick faltered--"Selden--" And he paused again.
 
 Sir Daniel put down the wine untasted.
 
 "How!" he cried, in a changed voice. "Selden? Speak! What of Selden?"
 
 Dick stammered forth the tale of the ambush and the massacre.
 
 The knight heard in silence; but as he listened, his countenance became
 convulsed with rage and grief.
 
 "Now here," he cried, "on my right hand, I swear to avenge it! If that I
 fail, if that I spill not ten men's souls for each, may this hand wither
 from my body! I broke this Duckworth like a rush; I beggared him to his
 door; I burned the thatch above his head; I drove him from this country;
 and now, cometh he back to beard me? Nay, but, Duckworth, this time it
 shall go bitter hard!"
 
 He was silent for some time, his face working.
 
 "Eat!" he cried, suddenly. "And you here," he added to Matcham, "swear
 me an oath to follow straight to the Moat House."
 
 "I will pledge mine honour," replied Matcham.
 
 "What make I with your honour?" cried the knight. "Swear me upon your
 mother's welfare!"
 
 Matcham gave the required oath; and Sir Daniel readjusted the hood over
 his face, and prepared his bell and staff. To see him once more in that
 appalling travesty somewhat revived the horror of his two companions.
 But the knight was soon upon his feet.
 
 "Eat with despatch," he said, "and follow me yarely to mine house."
 
 And with that he set forth again into the woods; and presently after the
 bell began to sound, numbering his steps, and the two lads sat by their
 untasted meal, and heard it die slowly away up-hill into the distance.
 
 "And so ye go to Tunstall?" Dick inquired.
 
 "Yea, verily," said Matcham, "when needs must! I am braver behind Sir
 Daniel's back than to his face."
 
 They ate hastily, and set forth along the path through the airy upper
 levels of the forest, where great beeches stood apart among green lawns,
 and the birds and squirrels made merry on the boughs. Two hours later,
 they began to descend upon the other side, and already, among the
 tree-tops, saw before them the red walls and roofs of Tunstall House.
 
 "Here," said Matcham, pausing, "ye shall take your leave of your friend
 Jack, whom y'are to see no more. Come, Dick, forgive him what he did
 amiss, as he, for his part, cheerfully and lovingly forgiveth you."
 
 "And wherefore so?" asked Dick. "An we both go to Tunstall, I shall see
 you yet again, I trow, and that right often."
 
 "Ye'll never again see poor Jack Matcham," replied the other, "that was
 so fearful and burthensome, and yet plucked you from the river; ye'll
 not see him more, Dick, by mine honour!" He held his arms open, and the
 lads embraced and kissed. "And, Dick," continued Matcham, "my spirit
 bodeth ill. Y'are now to see a new Sir Daniel; for heretofore hath all
 prospered in his hands exceedingly, and fortune followed him; but now,
 methinks, when his fate hath come upon him, and he runs the adventure of
 his life, he will prove but a foul lord to both of us. He may be brave
 in battle, but he hath the liar's eye; there is fear in his eye, Dick,
 and fear is as cruel as the wolf! We go down into that house, St. Mary
 guide us forth again!"
 
 And so they continued their descent in silence, and came out at last
 before Sir Daniel's forest stronghold, where it stood, low and shady,
 flanked with round towers and stained with moss and lichen, in the
 lilied waters of the moat. Even as they appeared, the doors were opened,
 the bridge lowered, and Sir Daniel himself, with Hatch and the parson at
 his side, stood ready to receive them.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK II
 
 THE MOAT HOUSE
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 DICK ASKS QUESTIONS
 
 
 The Moat House stood not far from the rough forest road. Externally, it
 was a compact rectangle of red stone, flanked at each corner by a round
 tower, pierced for archery and battlemented at the top. Within, it
 enclosed a narrow court. The moat was perhaps twelve feet wide, crossed
 by a single drawbridge. It was supplied with water by a trench, leading
 to a forest pool and commanded, through its whole length, from the
 battlements of the two southern towers. Except that one or two tall and
 thick trees had been suffered to remain within half a bowshot of the
 walls, the house was in a good posture for defence.
 
 In the court, Dick found a part of the garrison, busy with preparations
 for defence, and gloomily discussing the chances of a siege. Some were
 making arrows, some sharpening swords that had long been disused; but
 even as they worked, they shook their heads.
 
 Twelve of Sir Daniel's party had escaped the battle, run the gauntlet
 through the wood, and come alive to the Moat House. But out of this
 dozen, three had been gravely wounded: two at Risingham in the disorder
 of the rout, one by John Amend-All's marksmen as he crossed the forest.
 
 This raised the force of the garrison, counting Hatch, Sir Daniel, and
 young Shelton, to twenty-two effective men. And more might be
 continually expected to arrive. The danger lay not therefore in the lack
 of men.
 
 It was the terror of the Black Arrow that oppressed the spirits of the
 garrison. For their open foes of the party of York, in these most
 changing times, they felt but a far-away concern. "The world," as people
 said in those days, "might change again" before harm came. But for their
 neighbours in the wood, they trembled. It was not Sir Daniel alone who
 was a mark for hatred. His men, conscious of impunity, had carried
 themselves cruelly through all the country. Harsh commands had been
 harshly executed; and of the little band that now sat talking in the
 court, there was not one but had been guilty of some act of oppression
 or barbarity. And now, by the fortune of war, Sir Daniel had become
 powerless to protect his instruments; now, by the issue of some hours of
 battle, at which many of them had not been present, they had all become
 punishable traitors to the State, outside the buckler of the law, a
 shrunken company in a poor fortress that was hardly tenable, and exposed
 upon all sides to the just resentment of their victims. Nor had there
 been lacking grisly advertisements of what they might expect.
 
 [Illustration: _Lastly, a little before dawn, a spearman had come
 staggering to the moat side, pierced by arrows_]
 
 At different periods of the evening and the night, no fewer than seven
 riderless horses had come neighing in terror to the gate. Two were from
 Selden's troop; five belonged to men who had ridden with Sir Daniel to
 the field. Lastly, a little before dawn, a spearman had come staggering
 to the moat side, pierced by three arrows; even as they carried him
 in, his spirit had departed; but by the words that he uttered in his
 agony, he must have been the last survivor of a considerable company of
 men.
 
 Hatch himself showed, under his sun-brown, the pallor of anxiety; and
 when he had taken Dick aside and learned the fate of Selden, he fell on
 a stone bench and fairly wept. The others, from where they sat on stools
 or doorsteps in the sunny angle of the court, looked at him with wonder
 and alarm, but none ventured to inquire the cause of his emotion.
 
 "Nay, Master Shelton," said Hatch, at last--"nay, but what said I? We
 shall all go. Selden was a man of his hands; he was like a brother to
 me. Well, he has gone second; well, we shall all follow! For what said
 their knave rhyme?--'A black arrow in each black heart.' Was it not so
 it went? Appleyard, Selden, Smith, old Humphrey gone; and there lieth
 poor John Carter, crying, poor sinner, for the priest."
 
 Dick gave ear. Out of a low window, hard by where they were talking,
 groans and murmurs came to his ear.
 
 "Lieth he there?" he asked.
 
 "Ay, in the second porter's chamber," answered Hatch. "We could not bear
 him further, soul and body were so bitterly at odds. At every step we
 lifted him, he thought to wend. But now, methinks, it is the soul that
 suffereth. Ever for the priest he crieth, and Sir Oliver, I wot not why,
 still cometh not. 'Twill be a long shrift; but poor Appleyard and poor
 Selden, they had none."
 
 Dick stooped to the window and looked in. The little cell was low and
 dark, but he could make out the wounded soldier lying moaning on his
 pallet.
 
 "Carter, poor friend, how goeth it?" he asked.
 
 "Master Shelton," returned the man, in an excited whisper, "for the dear
 light of heaven, bring the priest. Alack, I am sped; I am brought very
 low down; my hurt is to the death. Ye may do me no more service; this
 shall be the last. Now, for my poor soul's interest, and as a loyal
 gentleman, bestir you; for I have that matter on my conscience that
 shall drag me deep."
 
 He groaned, and Dick heard the grating of his teeth, whether in pain or
 terror.
 
 Just then Sir Daniel appeared upon the threshold of the hall. He had a
 letter in one hand.
 
 "Lads," he said, "we have had a shog, we have had a tumble; wherefore,
 then, deny it? Rather it imputeth to get speedily again to saddle. This
 old Harry the Sixt has had the undermost. Wash we, then, our hands of
 him. I have a good friend that rideth next the duke, the Lord of
 Wensleydale. Well, I have writ a letter to my friend, praying his good
 lordship, and offering large satisfaction for the past and reasonable
 surety for the future. Doubt not but he will lend a favourable ear. A
 prayer without gifts is like a song without music: I surfeit him with
 promises, boys--I spare not to promise. What, then, is lacking? Nay, a
 great thing--wherefore should I deceive you?--a great thing and a
 difficult: a messenger to bear it. The woods--y'are not ignorant of
 that--lie thick with our ill-willers. Haste is most needful; but without
 sleight and caution all is naught. Which, then, of this company will
 take me this letter, bear me it to my Lord of Wensleydale, and bring me
 the answer back?"
 
 One man instantly arose.
 
 "I will, an't like you," said he. "I will even risk my carcase."
 
 "Nay, Dicky Bowyer, not so," returned the knight. "It likes me not.
 Y'are sly indeed, but not speedy. Ye were a laggard ever."
 
 "An't be so, Sir Daniel, here am I," cried another.
 
 "The saints forfend!" said the knight. "Y'are speedy, but not sly. Ye
 would blunder me head-foremost into John Amend-All's camp. I thank you
 both for your good courage; but, in sooth, it may not be."
 
 Then Hatch offered himself, and he also was refused.
 
 "I want you here, good Bennet; y'are my right hand, indeed," returned
 the knight; and then several coming forward in a group, Sir Daniel at
 length selected one and gave him the letter.
 
 "Now," he said, "upon your good speed and better discretion we do all
 depend. Bring me a good answer back, and before three weeks, I will have
 purged my forest of these vagabonds that brave us to our faces. But mark
 it well, Throgmorton: the matter is not easy. Ye must steal forth under
 night, and go like a fox; and how ye are to cross Till I know not,
 neither by the bridge nor ferry."
 
 "I can swim," returned Throgmorton. "I will come soundly, fear not."
 
 "Well, friend, get ye to the buttery," replied Sir Daniel. "Ye shall
 swim first of all in nut-brown ale." And with that he turned back into
 the hall.
 
 "Sir Daniel hath a wise tongue," said Hatch, aside, to Dick. "See, now,
 where many a lesser man had glossed the matter over, he speaketh it out
 plainly to his company. Here is a danger, 'a saith, and here difficulty;
 and jesteth in the very saying. Nay, by St. Barbary, he is a born
 captain! Not a man but he is some deal heartened up! See how they fall
 again to work."
 
 This praise of Sir Daniel put a thought in the lad's head.
 
 "Bennet," he said, "how came my father by his end?"
 
 "Ask me not that," replied Hatch. "I had no hand nor knowledge in it;
 furthermore, I will even be silent, Master Dick. For look you, in a
 man's own business there he may speak; but of hearsay matters and of
 common talk, not so. Ask me Sir Oliver--ay, or Carter, if ye will; not
 me."
 
 And Hatch set off to make the rounds, leaving Dick in a muse.
 
 "Wherefore would he not tell me?" thought the lad. "And wherefore named
 he Carter? Carter--nay, then Carter had a hand in it, perchance."
 
 He entered the house, and passing some little way along a flagged and
 vaulted passage, came to the door of the cell where the hurt man lay
 groaning. At his entrance Carter started eagerly.
 
 "Have ye brought the priest?" he cried.
 
 "Not yet awhile," returned Dick. "Y' 'ave a word to tell me first. How
 came my father, Harry Shelton, by his death?"
 
 The man's face altered instantly.
 
 "I know not," he replied, doggedly.
 
 "Nay, ye know well," returned Dick. "Seek not to put me by."
 
 "I tell you I know not," repeated Carter.
 
 "Then," said Dick, "ye shall die unshriven. Here am I, and here shall
 stay. There shall no priest come near you, rest assured. For of what
 avail is penitence, an ye have no mind to right those wrongs ye had a
 hand in? and without penitence, confession is but mockery."
 
 "Ye say what ye mean not, Master Dick," said Carter, composedly. "It is
 ill threatening the dying, and becometh you (to speak truth) little. And
 for as little as it commends you, it shall serve you less. Stay, an ye
 please. Ye will condemn my soul--ye shall learn nothing! There is my
 last word to you." And the wounded man turned upon the other side.
 
 Now, Dick, to say truth, had spoken hastily, and was ashamed of his
 threat. But he made one more effort.
 
 "Carter," he said, "mistake me not. I know ye were but an instrument in
 the hands of others; a churl must obey his lord; I would not bear
 heavily on such an one. But I begin to learn upon many sides that this
 great duty lieth on my youth and ignorance, to avenge my father.
 Prithee, then, good Carter, set aside the memory of my threatenings, and
 in pure good-will and honest penitence give me a word of help."
 
 The wounded man lay silent; nor, say what Dick pleased, could he extract
 another word from him.
 
 "Well," said Dick, "I will go call the priest to you as ye desired; for
 howsoever ye be in fault to me or mine, I would not be willingly in
 fault to any, least of all to one upon the last change."
 
 Again the old soldier heard him without speech or motion; even his
 groans he had suppressed; and as Dick turned and left the room, he was
 filled with admiration for that rugged fortitude.
 
 "And yet," he thought, "of what use is courage without wit? Had his
 hands been clean, he would have spoken; his silence did confess the
 secret louder than words. Nay, upon all sides, proof floweth on me. Sir
 Daniel, he or his men, hath done this thing."
 
 Dick paused in the stone passage with a heavy heart. At that hour, in
 the ebb of Sir Daniel's fortune, when he was beleaguered by the archers
 of the Black Arrow and proscribed by the victorious Yorkists, was Dick,
 also, to turn upon the man who had nourished and taught him, who had
 severely punished, indeed, but yet unwearyingly protected his youth? The
 necessity, if it should prove to be one, was cruel.
 
 "Pray Heaven he be innocent!" he said.
 
 And then steps sounded on the flagging, and Sir Oliver came gravely
 towards the lad.
 
 "One seeketh you earnestly," said Dick.
 
 "I am upon the way, good Richard," said the priest. "It is this poor
 Carter. Alack, he is beyond cure."
 
 "And yet his soul is sicker than his body," answered Dick.
 
 "Have ye seen him?" asked Sir Oliver, with a manifest start.
 
 "I do but come from him," replied Dick.
 
 "What said he? what said he?" snapped the priest, with extraordinary
 eagerness.
 
 "He but cried for you the more piteously, Sir Oliver. It were well done
 to go the faster, for his hurt is grievous," returned the lad.
 
 "I am straight for him," was the reply. "Well, we have all our sins. We
 must all come to our latter day, good Richard."
 
 "Ay, sir; and it were well if we all came fairly," answered Dick.
 
 The priest dropped his eyes, and with an inaudible benediction hurried
 on.
 
 "He, too!" thought Dick--"he, that taught me in piety! Nay, then, what a
 world is this, if all that care for me be blood-guilty of my father's
 death? Vengeance! Alas! what a sore fate is mine, if I must be avenged
 upon my friends!"
 
 The thought put Matcham in his head. He smiled at the remembrance of his
 strange companion, and then wondered where he was. Ever since they had
 come together to the doors of the Moat House the younger lad had
 disappeared, and Dick began to weary for a word with him.
 
 About an hour after, mass being somewhat hastily run through by Sir
 Oliver, the company gathered in the hall for dinner. It was a long, low
 apartment, strewn with green rushes, and the walls hung with arras in a
 design of savage men and questioning bloodhounds; here and there hung
 spears and bows and bucklers; a fire blazed in the big chimney; there
 were arras-covered benches round the wall, and in the midst the table,
 fairly spread, awaited the arrival of the diners. Neither Sir Daniel nor
 his lady made their appearance. Sir Oliver himself was absent, and here
 again there was no word of Matcham. Dick began to grow alarmed, to
 recall his companion's melancholy forebodings, and to wonder to himself
 if any foul play had befallen him in that house.
 
 After dinner he found Goody Hatch, who was hurrying to my Lady Brackley.
 
 "Goody," he said, "where is Master Matcham, I prithee? I saw ye go in
 with him when we arrived."
 
 The old woman laughed aloud.
 
 "Ah, Master Dick," she said, "y' have a famous bright eye in your head,
 to be sure!" and laughed again.
 
 "Nay, but where is he, indeed?" persisted Dick.
 
 "Ye will never see him more," she returned--"never. It is sure."
 
 "An I do not," returned the lad, "I will know the reason why. He came
 not hither of his full free will; such as I am, I am his best protector,
 and I will see him justly used. There be too many mysteries; I do begin
 to weary of the game!"
 
 But as Dick was speaking, a heavy hand fell on his shoulder. It was
 Bennet Hatch that had come unperceived behind him. With a jerk of his
 thumb, the retainer dismissed his wife.
 
 "Friend Dick," he said, as soon as they were alone, "are ye a
 moon-struck natural? An ye leave not certain things in peace, ye were
 better in the salt sea than here in Tunstall Moat House. Y' have
 questioned me; y' have baited Carter; y' have frighted the jack-priest
 with hints. Bear ye more wisely, fool; and even now, when Sir Daniel
 calleth you, show me a smooth face for the love of wisdom. Y'are to be
 sharply questioned. Look to your answers."
 
 "Hatch," returned Dick, "in all this I smell a guilty conscience."
 
 "An ye go not the wiser, ye will soon smell blood," replied Bennet. "I
 do but warn you. And here cometh one to call you."
 
 And indeed, at that very moment, a messenger came across the court to
 summon Dick into the presence of Sir Daniel.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 THE TWO OATHS
 
 
 Sir Daniel was in the hall; there he paced angrily before the fire,
 awaiting Dick's arrival. None was by except Sir Oliver, and he sat
 discreetly backward, thumbing and muttering over his breviary.
 
 "Y' have sent for me, Sir Daniel?" said young Shelton.
 
 "I have sent for you, indeed," replied the knight. "For what cometh to
 mine ears? Have I been to you so heavy a guardian that ye make haste to
 credit ill of me? Or sith that ye see me, for the nonce, some worsted,
 do ye think to quit my party? By the mass, your father was not so! Those
 he was near, those he stood by, come wind or weather. But you, Dick,
 y'are a fair-day friend, it seemeth, and now seek to clear yourself of
 your allegiance."
 
 "An't please you, Sir Daniel, not so," returned Dick, firmly. "I am
 grateful and faithful, where gratitude and faith are due. And before
 more is said, I thank you, and I thank Sir Oliver; y' have great claims
 upon me both--none can have more; I were a hound if I forgot them."
 
 "It is well," said Sir Daniel; and then, rising into anger: "Gratitude
 and faith are words, Dick Shelton," he continued; "but I look to deeds.
 In this hour of my peril, when my name is attainted, when my lands are
 forfeit, when this wood is full of men that hunger and thirst for my
 destruction, what doth gratitude? what doth faith? I have but a little
 company remaining; is it grateful or faithful to poison me their hearts
 with your insidious whisperings? Save me from such gratitude! But, come,
 now, what is it ye wish? Speak; we are here to answer. If ye have aught
 against me, stand forth and say it."
 
 "Sir," replied Dick, "my father fell when I was yet a child. It hath
 come to mine ears that he was foully done by. It hath come to mine
 ears--for I will not dissemble--that ye had a hand in his undoing. And
 in all verity, I shall not be at peace in mine own mind, nor very clear
 to help you, till I have certain resolution of these doubts."
 
 Sir Daniel sat down in a deep settle. He took his chin in his hand and
 looked at Dick fixedly.
 
 "And ye think I would be guardian to the man's son that I had murdered?"
 he asked.
 
 "Nay," said Dick, "pardon me if I answer churlishly; but indeed ye know
 right well a wardship is most profitable. All these years have ye not
 enjoyed my revenues, and led my men? Have ye not still my marriage? I
 wot not what it may be worth--it is worth something. Pardon me again;
 but if ye were base enough to slay a man under trust, here were,
 perhaps, reasons enough to move you to the lesser baseness."
 
 "When I was a lad of your years," returned Sir Daniel, sternly, "my mind
 had not so turned upon suspicions. And Sir Oliver here," he added, "why
 should he, a priest, be guilty of this act?"
 
 "Nay, Sir Daniel," said Dick, "but where the master biddeth there will
 the dog go. It is well known this priest is but your instrument. I speak
 very freely; the time is not for courtesies. Even as I speak, so would I
 be answered. And answer get I none! Ye but put more questions. I rede ye
 be ware, Sir Daniel; for in this way ye will but nourish and not satisfy
 my doubts."
 
 "I will answer you fairly, Master Richard," said the knight. "Were I to
 pretend ye have not stirred my wrath, I were no honest man. But I will
 be just even in anger. Come to me with these words when y'are grown and
 come to man's estate, and I am no longer your guardian, and so helpless
 to resent them. Come to me then, and I will answer you as ye merit, with
 a buffet in the mouth. Till then ye have two courses: either swallow me
 down these insults, keep a silent tongue, and fight in the meanwhile for
 the man that fed and fought for your infancy; or else--the door standeth
 open, the woods are full of mine enemies--go."
 
 The spirit with which these words were uttered, the looks with which
 they were accompanied, staggered Dick; and yet he could not but observe
 that he had got no answer.
 
 "I desire nothing more earnestly, Sir Daniel, than to believe you," he
 replied. "Assure me ye are free from this."
 
 "Will ye take my word of honour, Dick?" inquired the knight.
 
 "That would I," answered the lad.
 
 "I give it you," returned Sir Daniel. "Upon my word of honour, upon the
 eternal welfare of my spirit, and as I shall answer for my deeds
 hereafter, I had no hand nor portion in your father's death."
 
 He extended his hand, and Dick took it eagerly. Neither of them observed
 the priest, who, at the pronunciation of that solemn and false oath, had
 half arisen from his seat in an agony of horror and remorse.
 
 "Ah," cried Dick, "ye must find it in your great-heartedness to pardon
 me! I was a churl, indeed, to doubt of you. But ye have my hand upon it;
 I will doubt no more."
 
 "Nay, Dick," replied Sir Daniel, "y'are forgiven. Ye know not the world
 and its calumnious nature."
 
 "I was the more to blame," added Dick, "in that the rogues pointed, not
 directly at yourself, but at Sir Oliver."
 
 As he spoke, he turned towards the priest, and paused in the middle of
 the last word. This tall, ruddy, corpulent, high-stepping man had
 fallen, you might say, to pieces; his colour was gone, his limbs were
 relaxed, his lips stammered prayers; and now, when Dick's eyes were
 fixed upon him suddenly, he cried out aloud, like some wild animal, and
 buried his face in his hands.
 
 Sir Daniel was by him in two strides, and shook him fiercely by the
 shoulder. At the same moment Dick's suspicions reawakened.
 
 "Nay," he said, "Sir Oliver may swear also. 'Twas him they accused."
 
 "He shall swear," said the knight.
 
 Sir Oliver speechlessly waved his arms.
 
 "Ay, by the mass! but ye shall swear," cried Sir Daniel, beside himself
 with fury. "Here, upon this book, ye shall swear," he continued,
 picking up the breviary, which had fallen to the ground. "What! Ye make
 me doubt you! Swear, I say; swear!"
 
 But the priest was still incapable of speech. His terror of Sir Daniel,
 his terror of perjury, risen to about an equal height, strangled him.
 
 And just then, through the high, stained-glass window of the hall, a
 black arrow crashed, and struck, and stuck quivering, in the midst of
 the long table.
 
 Sir Oliver, with a loud scream, fell fainting on the rushes; while the
 knight, followed by Dick, dashed into the court and up the nearest
 corkscrew stair to the battlements. The sentries were all on the alert.
 The sun shone quietly on green lawns dotted with trees, and on the
 wooded hills of the forest which enclosed the view. There was no sign of
 a besieger.
 
 "Whence came that shot?" asked the knight.
 
 "From yonder clump, Sir Daniel," returned a sentinel.
 
 The knight stood a little, musing. Then he turned to Dick. "Dick," he
 said, "keep me an eye upon these men; I leave you in charge here. As for
 the priest, he shall clear himself, or I will know the reason why. I do
 almost begin to share in your suspicions. He shall swear, trust me, or
 we shall prove him guilty."
 
 Dick answered somewhat coldly, and the knight, giving him a piercing
 glance, hurriedly returned to the hall. His first glance was for the
 arrow. It was the first of these missiles he had seen, and as he turned
 it to and fro, the dark hue of it touched him with some fear. Again
 there was some writing: one word--"Earthed."
 
 "Ay," he broke out, "they know I am home, then. Earthed! Ay, but there
 is not a dog among them fit to dig me out."
 
 Sir Oliver had come to himself, and now scrambled to his feet.
 
 "Alack, Sir Daniel!" he moaned, "y' 'ave sworn a dread oath; y'are
 doomed to the end of time."
 
 "Ay," returned the knight, "I have sworn an oath, indeed, thou
 chucklehead; but thyself shalt swear a greater. It shall be on the
 blessed cross of Holywood. Look to it; get the words ready. It shall be
 sworn to-night."
 
 "Now, may Heaven lighten you!" replied the priest; "may Heaven incline
 your heart from this iniquity!"
 
 "Look you, my good father," said Sir Daniel, "if y'are for piety, I say
 no more; ye begin late, that is all. But if y'are in any sense bent
 upon wisdom, hear me. This lad beginneth to irk me like a wasp. I have a
 need for him, for I would sell his marriage. But I tell you, in all
 plainness, if that he continue to weary me, he shall go join his father.
 I give orders now to change him to the chamber above the chapel. If that
 ye can swear your innocency with a good, solid oath and an assured
 countenance, it is well; the lad will be at peace a little, and I will
 spare him. If that ye stammer or blench, or anyways boggle at the
 swearing, he will not believe you; and by the mass, he shall die. There
 is for your thinking on."
 
 "The chamber above the chapel!" gasped the priest.
 
 "That same," replied the knight. "So if ye desire to save him, save him;
 and if ye desire not, prithee, go to, and let me be at peace! For an I
 had been a hasty man, I would already have put my sword through you, for
 your intolerable cowardice and folly. Have ye chosen? Say!"
 
 "I have chosen," said the priest. "Heaven pardon me, I will do evil for
 good. I will swear for the lad's sake."
 
 "So is it best!" said Sir Daniel. "Send for him, then, speedily. Ye
 shall see him alone. Yet I shall have an eye on you. I shall be here in
 the panel room."
 
 The knight raised the arras and let it fall again behind him. There was
 the sound of a spring opening; then followed the creaking of trod
 stairs.
 
 Sir Oliver, left alone, cast a timorous glance upward at the
 arras-covered wall, and crossed himself with every appearance of terror
 and contrition.
 
 "Nay, if he is in the chapel room," the priest murmured, "were it at my
 soul's cost, I must save him."
 
 Three minutes later, Dick, who had been summoned by another messenger,
 found Sir Oliver standing by the hall table, resolute and pale.
 
 "Richard Shelton," he said, "ye have required an oath from me. I might
 complain, I might deny you; but my heart is moved towards you for the
 past, and I will even content you as ye choose. By the true cross of
 Holywood, I did not slay your father."
 
 "Sir Oliver," returned Dick, "when first we read John Amend-All's paper,
 I was convinced of so much. But suffer me to put two questions. Ye did
 not slay him; granted. But had ye no hand in it?"
 
 "None," said Sir Oliver. And at the same time he began to contort his
 face, and signal with his mouth and eyebrows, like one who desired to
 convey a warning, yet dared not utter a sound.
 
 Dick regarded him in wonder; then he turned and looked all about him at
 the empty hall.
 
 "What make ye?" he inquired.
 
 "Why, naught," returned the priest, hastily smoothing his countenance.
 "I make naught; I do but suffer; I am sick. I--I--prithee, Dick, I must
 begone. On the true cross of Holywood, I am clean innocent alike of
 violence or treachery. Content ye, good lad. Farewell!"
 
 And he made his escape from the apartment with unusual alacrity.
 
 Dick remained rooted to the spot, his eyes wandering about the room, his
 face a changing picture of various emotions, wonder, doubt, suspicion,
 and amusement. Gradually, as his mind grew clearer, suspicion took the
 upper hand, and was succeeded by certainty of the worst. He raised his
 head, and, as he did so, violently started. High upon the wall there was
 the figure of a savage hunter woven in the tapestry. With one hand he
 held a horn to his mouth; in the other he brandished a stout spear. His
 face was dark, for he was meant to represent an African.
 
 Now, here was what had startled Richard Shelton. The sun had moved away
 from the hall windows, and at the same time the fire had blazed up high
 on the wide hearth, and shed a changeful glow upon the roof and
 hangings. In this light the figure of the black hunter had winked at him
 with a white eyelid.
 
 He continued staring at the eye. The light shone upon it like a gem; it
 was liquid, it was alive. Again the white eyelid closed upon it for a
 fraction of a second, and the next moment it was gone.
 
 There could be no mistake. The live eye that had been watching him
 through a hole in the tapestry was gone. The firelight no longer shone
 on a reflecting surface.
 
 And instantly Dick awoke to the terrors of his position. Hatch's
 warning, the mute signals of the priest, this eye that had observed him
 from the wall, ran together in his mind. He saw he had been put upon his
 trial, that he had once more betrayed his suspicions, and that, short of
 some miracle, he was lost.
 
 "If I cannot get me forth out of this house," he thought, "I am dead
 man! And this poor Matcham, too--to what a cockatrice's nest have I not
 led him!"
 
 He was still so thinking, when there came one in haste, to bid him help
 in changing his arms, his clothing, and his two or three books, to a new
 chamber.
 
 "A new chamber?" he repeated. "Wherefore so? What chamber?"
 
 "'Tis one above the chapel," answered the messenger.
 
 "It hath stood long empty," said Dick, musing. "What manner of room is
 it?"
 
 "Nay, a brave room," returned the man. "But yet"--lowering his
 voice--"they call it haunted."
 
 "Haunted?" repeated Dick, with a chill. "I have not heard of it. Nay,
 then, and by whom?"
 
 The messenger looked about him; and then, in a low whisper, "By the
 sacrist of St. John's," he said. "They had him there to sleep one night,
 and in the morning--whew!--he was gone. The devil had taken him, they
 said; the more betoken, he had drunk late the night before."
 
 Dick followed the man with black forebodings.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 THE ROOM OVER THE CHAPEL
 
 
 From the battlements nothing further was observed. The sun journeyed
 westward, and at last went down; but, to the eyes of all these eager
 sentinels, no living thing appeared in the neighbourhood of Tunstall
 House.
 
 When the night was at length fairly come, Throgmorton was led to a room
 overlooking an angle of the moat. Thence he was lowered with every
 precaution; the ripple of his swimming was audible for a brief period;
 then a black figure was observed to land by the branches of a willow and
 crawl away among the grass. For some half-hour Sir Daniel and Hatch
 stood eagerly giving ear; but all remained quiet. The messenger had got
 away in safety.
 
 Sir Daniel's brow grew clearer. He turned to Hatch.
 
 "Bennet," he said, "this John Amend-All is no more than a man, ye see.
 He sleepeth. We will make a good end of him, go to!"
 
 All the afternoon and evening, Dick had been ordered hither and thither,
 one command following another, till he was bewildered with the number
 and the hurry of commissions. All that time he had seen no more of Sir
 Oliver, and nothing of Matcham; and yet both the priest and the young
 lad ran continually in his mind. It was now his chief purpose to escape
 from Tunstall Moat House as speedily as might be; and yet, before he
 went, he desired a word with both of these.
 
 At length, with a lamp in one hand, he mounted to his new apartment. It
 was large, low, and somewhat dark. The window looked upon the moat, and
 although it was so high up, it was heavily barred. The bed was
 luxurious, with one pillow of down and one of lavender, and a red
 coverlet worked in a pattern of roses. All about the walls were
 cupboards, locked and padlocked, and concealed from view by hangings of
 dark-coloured arras. Dick made the round, lifting the arras, sounding
 the panels, seeking vainly to open the cupboards. He assured himself
 that the door was strong and the bolt solid; then he set down his lamp
 upon a bracket, and once more looked all around.
 
 For what reason had he been given this chamber? It was larger and finer
 than his own. Could it conceal a snare? Was there a secret entrance? Was
 it, indeed, haunted? His blood ran a little chilly in his veins.
 
 Immediately over him the heavy foot of a sentry trod the leads. Below
 him, he knew, was the arched roof of the chapel; and next to the chapel
 was the hall. Certainly there was a secret passage in the hall; the eye
 that had watched him from the arras gave him proof of that. Was it not
 more than probable that the passage extended to the chapel, and, if so,
 that it had an opening in his room?
 
 To sleep in such a place, he felt, would be foolhardy. He made his
 weapons ready, and took his position in a corner of the room behind the
 door. If ill was intended, he would sell his life dear.
 
 The sound of many feet, the challenge, and the password sounded overhead
 along the battlements; the watch was being changed.
 
 And just then there came a scratching at the door of the chamber; it
 grew a little louder; then a whisper:
 
 "Dick, Dick, it is I!"
 
 Dick ran to the door, drew the bolt, and admitted Matcham. He was very
 pale, and carried a lamp in one hand and a drawn dagger in the other.
 
 "Shut me the door," he whispered. "Swift, Dick! This house is full of
 spies; I hear their feet follow me in the corridors; I hear them breathe
 behind the arras."
 
 "Well, content you," returned Dick, "it is closed. We are safe for this
 while, if there be safety anywhere within these walls. But my heart is
 glad to see you. By the mass, lad, I thought ye were sped! Where hid
 ye?"
 
 "It matters not," returned Matcham. "Since we be met, it matters not.
 But, Dick, are your eyes open? Have they told you of to-morrow's
 doings?"
 
 "Not they," replied Dick. "What make they to-morrow?"
 
 "To-morrow, or to-night, I know not," said the other, "but one time or
 other, Dick, they do intend upon your life. I had the proof of it; I
 have heard them whisper; nay, they as good as told me."
 
 "Ay," returned Dick, "is it so? I had thought as much."
 
 And he told him the day's occurrences at length.
 
 When it was done, Matcham arose and began, in turn, to examine the
 apartment.
 
 "No," he said, "there is no entrance visible. Yet 'tis a pure certainty
 there is one. Dick, I will stay by you. An y'are to die, I will die with
 you. And I can help--look! I have stolen a dagger--I will do my best!
 And meanwhile, an ye know of any issue, any sally-port we could get
 opened, or any window that we might descend by, I will most joyfully
 face any jeopardy to flee with you."
 
 "Jack," said Dick, "by the mass, Jack, y'are the best soul, and the
 truest, and the bravest in all England! Give me your hand, Jack."
 
 And he grasped the other's hand in silence.
 
 "I will tell you," he resumed. "There is a window, out of which the
 messenger descended; the rope should still be in the chamber. 'Tis a
 hope."
 
 "Hist!" said Matcham.
 
 Both gave ear. There was a sound below the floor; then it paused, and
 then began again.
 
 "Some one walketh in the room below," whispered Matcham.
 
 "Nay," returned Dick, "there is no room below; we are above the chapel.
 It is my murderer in the secret passage. Well, let him come; it shall go
 hard with him"; and he ground his teeth.
 
 "Blow me the lights out," said the other. "Perchance he will betray
 himself."
 
 They blew out both the lamps and lay still as death. The footfalls
 underneath were very soft, but they were clearly audible. Several times
 they came and went; and then there was a loud jar of a key turning in a
 lock, followed by a considerable silence.
 
 Presently the steps began again, and then, all of a sudden, a chink of
 light appeared in the planking of the room in a far corner. It widened;
 a trap-door was being opened, letting in a gush of light. They could see
 the strong hand pushing it up; and Dick raised his cross-bow, waiting
 for the head to follow.
 
 But now there came an interruption. From a distant corner of the Moat
 House shouts began to be heard, and first one voice, and then several,
 crying aloud upon a name. This noise had plainly disconcerted the
 murderer, for the trap-door was silently lowered to its place, and the
 steps hurriedly returned, passed once more close below the lads, and
 died away in the distance.
 
 Here was a moment's respite. Dick breathed deep, and then, and not till
 then, he gave ear to the disturbance which had interrupted the attack,
 and which was now rather increasing than diminishing. All about the Moat
 House feet were running, doors were opening and slamming, and still the
 voice of Sir Daniel towered above all this bustle, shouting for
 "Joanna."
 
 "Joanna!" repeated Dick. "Why, who the murrain should this be? Here is
 no Joanna, nor ever hath been. What meaneth it?"
 
 Matcham was silent. He seemed to have drawn further away. But only a
 little faint starlight entered by the window, and at the far end of the
 apartment, where the pair were, the darkness was complete.
 
 "Jack," said Dick, "I wot not where ye were all day. Saw ye this
 Joanna?"
 
 "Nay," returned Matcham, "I saw her not."
 
 "Nor heard tell of her?" he pursued.
 
 The steps drew nearer. Sir Daniel was still roaring the name of Joanna
 from the courtyard.
 
 "Did ye hear of her?" repeated Dick.
 
 "I heard of her," said Matcham.
 
 "How your voice twitters! What aileth you?" said Dick. "'Tis a most
 excellent good fortune, this Joanna; it will take their minds from us."
 
 "Dick," cried Matcham, "I am lost; we are both lost. Let us flee if
 there be yet time. They will not rest till they have found me. Or, see!
 let me go forth; when they have found me, ye may flee. Let me forth,
 Dick--good Dick, let me away!"
 
 She was groping for the bolt, when Dick at last comprehended.
 
 "By the mass!" he cried, "y'are no Jack; y'are Joanna Sedley; y'are the
 maid that would not marry me!"
 
 The girl paused, and stood silent and motionless. Dick, too, was silent
 for a little; then he spoke again.
 
 "Joanna," he said, "y' 'ave saved my life, and I have saved yours; and
 we have seen blood flow, and been friends and enemies--ay, and I took my
 belt to thrash you; and all that time I thought ye were a boy. But now
 death has me, and my time's out, and before I die I must say this: Y'
 are the best maid and the bravest under heaven, and, if only I could
 live, I would marry you blithely; and, live or die, I love you."
 
 She answered nothing.
 
 "Come," he said, "speak up, Jack. Come, be a good maid, and say ye love
 me!"
 
 "Why, Dick," she cried, "would I be here?"
 
 "Well, see ye here," continued Dick, "an we but escape whole we'll
 marry; and an we're to die, we die, and there's an end on't. But now
 that I think, how found ye my chamber?"
 
 "I asked it of Dame Hatch," she answered.
 
 "Well, the dame's staunch," he answered; "she'll not tell upon you. We
 have time before us."
 
 And just then, as if to contradict his words, feet came down the
 corridor, and a fist beat roughly on the door.
 
 "Here!" cried a voice. "Open, Master Dick; open!"
 
 Dick neither moved nor answered.
 
 "It is all over," said the girl; and she put her arms about Dick's neck.
 
 One after another, men came trooping to the door. Then Sir Daniel
 arrived himself, and there was a sudden cessation of the noise.
 
 "Dick," cried the knight, "be not an ass. The Seven Sleepers had been
 awake ere now. We know she is within there. Open, then, the door, man."
 
 Dick was again silent.
 
 "Down with it," said Sir Daniel. And immediately his followers fell
 savagely upon the door with foot and fist. Solid as it was, and strongly
 bolted, it would soon have given way; but once more fortune interfered.
 Over the thunder-storm of blows the cry of a sentinel was heard; it was
 followed by another; shouts ran along the battlements, shouts answered
 out of the wood. In the first moment of alarm it sounded as if the
 foresters were carrying the Moat House by assault. And Sir Daniel and
 his men, desisting instantly from their attack upon Dick's chamber,
 hurried to defend the walls.
 
 "Now," cried Dick, "we are saved."
 
 He seized the great old bedstead with both hands, and bent himself in
 vain to move it.
 
 "Help me, Jack. For your life's sake, help me stoutly!" he cried.
 
 Between them, with a huge effort, they dragged the big frame of oak
 across the room, and thrust it endwise to the chamber door.
 
 "Ye do but make things worse," said Joanna, sadly. "He will then enter
 by the trap."
 
 "Not so," replied Dick. "He durst not tell his secret to so many. It is
 by the trap that we shall flee. Hark! The attack is over. Nay, it was
 none!"
 
 It had, indeed, been no attack; it was the arrival of another party of
 stragglers from the defeat of Risingham that had disturbed Sir Daniel.
 They had run the gauntlet under cover of the darkness; they had been
 admitted by the great gate; and now, with a great stamping of hoofs and
 jingle of accoutrements and arms, they were dismounting in the court.
 
 "He will return anon," said Dick. "To the trap!"
 
 He lighted a lamp, and they went together into the corner of the room.
 The open chink through which some light still glittered was easily
 discovered, and, taking a stout sword from his small armoury, Dick
 thrust it deep into the seam, and weighed strenuously on the hilt. The
 trap moved, gaped a little, and at length came widely open. Seizing it
 with their hands, the two young folk threw it back. It disclosed a few
 steps descending, and at the foot of them, where the would-be murderer
 had left it, a burning lamp.
 
 "Now," said Dick, "go first and take the lamp. I will follow to close
 the trap."
 
 So they descended one after the other, and as Dick lowered the trap, the
 blows began once again to thunder on the panels of the door.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE PASSAGE
 
 
 The passage in which Dick and Joanna now found themselves was narrow,
 dirty, and short. At the other end of it, a door stood partly open; the
 same door, without doubt, that they had heard the man unlocking. Heavy
 cobwebs hung from the roof; and the paved flooring echoed hollow under
 the lightest tread.
 
 Beyond the door there were two branches, at right angles. Dick chose one
 of them at random, and the pair hurried, with echoing footsteps, along
 the hollow of the chapel roof. The top of the arched ceiling rose like a
 whale's back in the dim glimmer of the lamp. Here and there were
 spy-holes, concealed, on the other side, by the carving of the cornice;
 and looking down through one of these, Dick saw the paved floor of the
 chapel--the altar, with its burning tapers--and stretched before it on
 the steps, the figure of Sir Oliver praying with uplifted hands.
 
 At the other end, they descended a few steps. The passage grew narrower;
 the wall upon one hand was now of wood; the noise of people talking, and
 a faint flickering of lights, came through the interstices; and
 presently they came to a round hole about the size of a man's eye, and
 Dick, looking down through it, beheld the interior of the hall, and some
 half-a-dozen men sitting, in their jacks, about the table, drinking
 deep and demolishing a venison pie. These were certainly some of the
 late arrivals.
 
 "Here is no help," said Dick. "Let us try back."
 
 "Nay," said Joanna; "maybe the passage goeth farther."
 
 And she pushed on. But a few yards farther the passage ended at the top
 of a short flight of steps; and it became plain that, as long as the
 soldiers occupied the hall, escape was impossible upon that side.
 
 They retraced their steps with all imaginable speed, and set forward to
 explore the other branch. It was exceedingly narrow, scarce wide enough
 for a large man; and it led them continually up and down by little
 breakneck stairs, until even Dick had lost all notion of his
 whereabouts.
 
 At length it grew both narrower and lower; the stairs continued to
 descend; the walls on either hand became damp and slimy to the touch;
 and far in front of them they heard the squeaking and scuttling of the
 rats.
 
 "We must be in the dungeons," Dick remarked.
 
 "And still there is no outlet," added Joanna.
 
 "Nay, but an outlet there must be!" Dick answered.
 
 Presently, sure enough, they came to a sharp angle, and then the passage
 ended in a flight of steps. On the top of that there was a solid flag of
 stone by way of trap, and to this they both set their backs. It was
 immovable.
 
 "Some one holdeth it," suggested Joanna.
 
 [Illustration: _"We must be in the dungeons," Dick remarked_]
 
 "Not so," said Dick; "for were a man strong as ten, he must still yield
 a little. But this resisteth like dead rock. There is a weight upon the
 trap. Here is no issue; and, by my sooth, good Jack, we are here as
 fairly prisoners as though the gyves were on our ankle bones. Sit ye
 then down, and let us talk. After awhile we shall return, when perchance
 they shall be less carefully upon their guard; and, who knoweth? we may
 break out and stand a chance. But, in my poor opinion, we are as good as
 shent."
 
 "Dick!" she cried, "alas the day that ever ye should have seen me! For
 like a most unhappy and unthankful maid, it is I have led you hither."
 
 "What cheer!" returned Dick. "It was all written, and that which is
 written, willy nilly, cometh still to pass. But tell me a little what
 manner of a maid ye are, and how ye came into Sir Daniel's hands; that
 will do better than to bemoan yourself, whether for your sake or mine."
 
 "I am an orphan, like yourself, of father and mother," said Joanna; "and
 for my great misfortune, Dick, and hitherto for yours, I am a rich
 marriage. My Lord Foxham had me to ward; yet it appears Sir Daniel
 bought the marriage of me from the king, and a right dear price he paid
 for it. So here was I, poor babe, with two great and rich men fighting
 which should marry me, and I still at nurse! Well, then the world
 changed, and there was a new chancellor, and Sir Daniel bought the
 warding of me over the Lord Foxham's head. And then the world changed
 again, and Lord Foxham bought my marriage over Sir Daniel's; and from
 then to now it went on ill betwixt the two of them. But still Lord
 Foxham kept me in his hands, and was a good lord to me. And at last I
 was to be married--or sold, if ye like it better. Five hundred pounds
 Lord Foxham was to get for me. Hamley was the groom's name, and
 to-morrow, Dick, of all days in the year, was I to be betrothed. Had it
 not come to Sir Daniel, I had been wedded, sure--and never seen thee,
 Dick--dear Dick!"
 
 And here she took his hand, and kissed it, with the prettiest grace; and
 Dick drew her hand to him and did the like.
 
 "Well," she went on, "Sir Daniel took me unawares in the garden, and
 made me dress in these men's clothes, which is a deadly sin for a woman;
 and, besides, they fit me not. He rode with me to Kettley, as ye saw,
 telling me I was to marry you; but I, in my heart, made sure I would
 marry Hamley in his teeth."
 
 "Ay!" cried Dick, "and so ye loved this Hamley!"
 
 "Nay," replied Joanna, "not I. I did but hate Sir Daniel. And then,
 Dick, ye helped me, and ye were right kind, and very bold, and my heart
 turned towards you in mine own despite; and now, if we can in any way
 compass it, I would marry you with right good-will. And if, by cruel
 destiny, it may not be, still ye'll be dear to me. While my heart beats,
 it'll be true to you."
 
 "And I," said Dick, "that never cared a straw for any manner of woman
 until now, I took to you when I thought ye were a boy. I had a pity to
 you, and knew not why. When I would have belted you, the hand failed me.
 But when ye owned ye were a maid, Jack--for still I will call you
 Jack--I made sure ye were the maid for me. Hark!" he said, breaking
 off--"one cometh."
 
 And indeed a heavy tread was now audible in the echoing passage, and the
 rats again fled in armies.
 
 Dick reconnoitred his position. The sudden turn gave him a post of
 vantage. He could thus shoot in safety from the cover of the wall. But
 it was plain the light was too near him, and, running some way forward,
 he set down the lamp in the middle of the passage, and then returned to
 watch.
 
 Presently, at the far end of the passage, Bennet hove in sight. He
 seemed to be alone, and he carried in his hand a burning torch, which
 made him the better mark.
 
 "Stand, Bennet!" cried Dick. "Another step, and y'are dead."
 
 "So here ye are," returned Hatch, peering forward into the darkness. "I
 see you not. Aha! y' 'ave done wisely, Dick; y' 'ave put your lamp
 before you. By my sooth, but, though it was done to shoot my own knave
 body, I do rejoice to see ye profit of my lessons! And now, what make
 ye? what seek ye here? Why would ye shoot upon an old, kind friend? And
 have ye the young gentlewoman there?"
 
 "Nay, Bennet, it is I should question and you answer," replied Dick.
 "Why am I in this jeopardy of my life? Why do men come privily to slay
 me in my bed? Why am I now fleeing in mine own guardian's strong house,
 and from the friends that I have lived among and never injured?"
 
 "Master Dick, Master Dick," said Bennet, "what told I you? Y'are brave,
 but the most uncrafty lad that I can think upon!"
 
 "Well," returned Dick, "I see ye know all, and that I am doomed indeed.
 It is well. Here, where I am, I stay. Let Sir Daniel get me out if he be
 able!"
 
 Hatch was silent for a space.
 
 "Hark ye," he began, "I return to Sir Daniel, to tell him where ye are,
 and how posted; for, in truth, it was to that end he sent me. But you,
 if ye are no fool, had best be gone ere I return."
 
 "Be gone!" repeated Dick. "I would be gone already, an I wist how. I
 cannot move the trap."
 
 "Put me your hand into the corner, and see what ye find there," replied
 Bennet. "Throgmorton's rope is still in the brown chamber. Fare ye
 well."
 
 And Hatch, turning upon his heel, disappeared again into the windings of
 the passage.
 
 Dick instantly returned for his lamp, and proceeded to act upon the
 hint. At one corner of the trap there was a deep cavity in the wall.
 Pushing his arm into the aperture, Dick found an iron bar, which he
 thrust vigorously upwards. There followed a snapping noise, and the slab
 of stone instantly started in its bed.
 
 They were free of the passage. A little exercise of strength easily
 raised the trap; and they came forth into a vaulted chamber, opening on
 one hand upon the court, where one or two fellows, with bare arms, were
 rubbing down the horses of the last arrivals. A torch or two, each stuck
 in an iron ring against the wall, changefully lit up the scene.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 HOW DICK CHANGED SIDES
 
 
 Dick, blowing out his lamp lest it should attract attention, led the way
 up-stairs and along the corridor. In the brown chamber the rope had been
 made fast to the frame of an exceeding heavy and ancient bed. It had not
 been detached, and Dick, taking the coil to the window, began to lower
 it slowly and cautiously into the darkness of the night. Joan stood by;
 but as the rope lengthened, and still Dick continued to pay it out,
 extreme fear began to conquer her resolution.
 
 "Dick," she said, "is it so deep? I may not essay it. I should
 infallibly fall, good Dick."
 
 It was just at the delicate moment of the operations that she spoke.
 Dick started; the remainder of the coil slipped from his grasp, and the
 end fell with a splash into the moat. Instantly, from the battlement
 above, the voice of a sentinel cried, "Who goes?"
 
 "A murrain!" cried Dick. "We are paid now! Down with you--take the
 rope."
 
 "I cannot," she cried, recoiling.
 
 "An ye cannot, no more can I," said Shelton. "How can I swim the moat
 without you? Do you desert me, then?"
 
 "Dick," she gasped, "I cannot. The strength is gone from me."
 
 "By the mass, then, we are all shent!" he shouted, stamping with his
 foot; and then, hearing steps, he ran to the room door and sought to
 close it.
 
 Before he could shoot the bolt, strong arms were thrusting it back upon
 him from the other side. He struggled for a second; then, feeling
 himself overpowered, ran back to the window. The girl had fallen against
 the wall in the embrasure of the window; she was more than half
 insensible; and when he tried to raise her in his arms, her body was
 limp and unresponsive.
 
 At the same moment the men who had forced the door against him laid hold
 upon him. The first he poniarded at a blow, and the others falling back
 for a second in some disorder, he profited by the chance, bestrode the
 window-sill, seized the cord in both hands, and let his body slip.
 
 The cord was knotted, which made it the easier to descend; but so
 furious was Dick's hurry, and so small his experience of such
 gymnastics, that he span round and round in mid-air like a criminal upon
 a gibbet, and now beat his head, and now bruised his hands, against the
 rugged stonework of the wall. The air roared in his ears; he saw the
 stars overhead, and the reflected stars below him in the moat, whirling
 like dead leaves before the tempest. And then he lost hold, and fell,
 and soused head over ears into the icy water.
 
 When he came to the surface his hand encountered the rope, which, newly
 lightened of his weight, was swinging wildly to and fro. There was a
 red glow overhead, and looking up, he saw, by the light of several
 torches and a cresset full of burning coals, the battlements lined with
 faces. He saw the men's eyes turning hither and thither in quest of him;
 but he was too far below, the light reached him not, and they looked in
 vain.
 
 And now he perceived that the rope was considerably too long, and he
 began to struggle as well as he could towards the other side of the
 moat, still keeping his head above water. In this way he got much more
 than half-way over; indeed the bank was almost within reach, before the
 rope began to draw him back by its own weight. Taking his courage in
 both hands, he left go and made a leap for the trailing sprays of willow
 that had already, that same evening, helped Sir Daniel's messenger to
 land. He went down, rose again, sank a second time, and then his hand
 caught a branch, and with the speed of thought he had dragged himself
 into the thick of the tree and clung there, dripping and panting, and
 still half uncertain of his escape.
 
 But all this had not been done without a considerable splashing, which
 had so far indicated his position to the men along the battlements.
 Arrows and quarrels fell thick around him in the darkness, thick like
 driving hail; and suddenly a torch was thrown down--flared through the
 air in its swift passage--stuck for a moment on the edge of the bank,
 where it burned high and lit up its whole surroundings like a
 bonfire--and then, in a good hour for Dick, slipped off, plumped into
 the moat, and was instantly extinguished.
 
 It had served its purpose. The marksmen had had time to see the willow,
 and Dick ensconced among its boughs; and though the lad instantly sprang
 higher up the bank, and ran for his life, he was yet not quick enough to
 escape a shot. An arrow struck him in the shoulder, another grazed his
 head.
 
 The pain of his wounds lent him wings; and he had no sooner got upon the
 level than he took to his heels and ran straight before him in the dark,
 without a thought for the direction of his flight.
 
 For a few steps missiles followed him, but these soon ceased; and when
 at length he came to a halt and looked behind, he was already a good way
 from the Moat House, though he could still see the torches moving to and
 fro along its battlements.
 
 He leaned against a tree, streaming with blood and water, bruised,
 wounded, alone, and unarmed. For all that, he had saved his life for
 that bout; and though Joanna remained behind in the power of Sir Daniel,
 he neither blamed himself for an accident that it had been beyond his
 power to prevent, nor did he augur any fatal consequences to the girl
 herself. Sir Daniel was cruel, but he was not likely to be cruel to a
 young gentlewoman who had other protectors, willing and able to bring
 him to account. It was more probable he would make haste to marry her to
 some friend of his own.
 
 "Well," thought Dick, "between then and now I will find me the means to
 bring that traitor under; for I think, by the mass, that I be now
 absolved from any gratitude or obligation; and when war is open, there
 is a fair chance for all."
 
 In the meanwhile, here he was in a sore plight.
 
 For some little way farther he struggled forward through the forest; but
 what with the pain of his wounds, the darkness of the night, and the
 extreme uneasiness and confusion of his mind, he soon became equally
 unable to guide himself or to continue to push through the close
 undergrowth, and he was fain at length to sit down and lean his back
 against a tree.
 
 When he awoke from something betwixt sleep and swooning, the grey of the
 morning had begun to take the place of night. A little chilly breeze was
 bustling among the trees, and as he still sat staring before him, only
 half awake, he became aware of something dark that swung to and fro
 among the branches, some hundred yards in front of him. The progressive
 brightening of the day and the return of his own senses at last enabled
 him to recognise the object. It was a man hanging from the bough of a
 tall oak. His head had fallen forward on his breast; but at every
 stronger puff of wind his body span round and round, and his legs and
 arms tossed, like some ridiculous plaything.
 
 Dick clambered to his feet, and, staggering and leaning on the
 tree-trunks as he went, drew near to this grim object.
 
 The bough was perhaps twenty feet above the ground, and the poor fellow
 had been drawn up so high by his executioners that his boots swung clear
 above Dick's reach; and as his hood had been drawn over his face, it was
 impossible to recognise the man.
 
 Dick looked about him right and left; and at last he perceived that the
 other end of the cord had been made fast to the trunk of a little
 hawthorn which grew, thick with blossom, under the lofty arcade of the
 oak. With his dagger, which alone remained to him of all his arms, young
 Shelton severed the rope, and instantly, with a dead thump, the corpse
 fell in a heap upon the ground.
 
 Dick raised the hood; it was Throgmorton, Sir Daniel's messenger. He had
 not gone far upon his errand. A paper, which had apparently escaped the
 notice of the men of the Black Arrow, stuck from the bosom of his
 doublet, and Dick, pulling it forth, found it was Sir Daniel's letter to
 Lord Wensleydale.
 
 "Come," thought he, "if the world changes yet again, I may have here the
 wherewithal to shame Sir Daniel--nay, and perchance to bring him to the
 block."
 
 And he put the paper in his own bosom, said a prayer over the dead man,
 and set forth again through the woods.
 
 His fatigue and weakness increased; his ears sang, his steps faltered,
 his mind at intervals failed him, so low had he been brought by loss of
 blood. Doubtless he made many deviations from his true path, but at last
 he came out upon the highroad, not very far from Tunstall hamlet.
 
 A rough voice bid him stand.
 
 "Stand?" repeated Dick. "By the mass, but I am nearer falling."
 
 And he suited the action to the word, and fell all his length upon the
 road.
 
 Two men came forth out of the thicket, each in green forest jerkin, each
 with long-bow and quiver and short sword.
 
 "Why, Lawless," said the younger of the two, "it is young Shelton."
 
 "Ay, this will be as good as bread to John Amend-All," returned the
 other. "Though, faith, he hath been to the wars. Here is a tear in his
 scalp that must 'a' cost him many a good ounce of blood."
 
 "And here," added Greensheve, "is a hole in his shoulder that must have
 pricked him well. Who hath done this, think ye? If it be one of ours, he
 may all to prayer; Ellis will give him a short shrift and a long rope."
 
 "Up with the cub," said Lawless. "Clap him on my back."
 
 And then, when Dick had been hoisted to his shoulders, and he had taken
 the lad's arms about his neck, and got a firm hold of him, the ex-Grey
 Friar added:
 
 "Keep ye the post, brother Greensheve. I will on with him by myself."
 
 So Greensheve returned to his ambush on the wayside, and Lawless trudged
 down the hill, whistling as he went, with Dick, still in a dead faint,
 comfortably settled on his shoulders.
 
 The sun rose as he came out of the skirts of the wood and saw Tunstall
 hamlet straggling up the opposite hill. All seemed quiet, but a strong
 post of some half a score of archers lay close by the bridge on either
 side of the road, and, as soon as they perceived Lawless with his
 burthen, began to bestir themselves and set arrow to string like
 vigilant sentries.
 
 "Who goes?" cried the man in command.
 
 "Will Lawless, by the rood--ye know me as well as your own hand,"
 returned the outlaw, contemptuously.
 
 "Give the word, Lawless," returned the other.
 
 "Now, Heaven lighten thee, thou great fool," replied Lawless. "Did I not
 tell it thee myself? But ye are all mad for this playing at soldiers.
 When I am in the greenwood, give me greenwood ways; and my word for this
 tide is: 'A fig for all mock soldiery!'"
 
 "Lawless, ye but show an ill example; give us the word, fool jester,"
 said the commander of the post.
 
 "And if I had forgotten it?" asked the other.
 
 "An ye had forgotten it--as I know y' 'ave not--by the mass, I would
 clap an arrow into your big body," returned the first.
 
 "Nay, an y'are so ill a jester," said Lawless, "ye shall have your word
 for me. 'Duckworth and Shelton' is the word; and here, to the
 illustration, is Shelton on my shoulders, and to Duckworth do I carry
 him."
 
 "Pass, Lawless," said the sentry.
 
 "And where is John?" asked the Grey Friar.
 
 "He holdeth a court, by the mass, and taketh rents as to the manner
 born!" cried another of the company.
 
 So it proved. When Lawless got as far up the village as the little inn,
 he found Ellis Duckworth surrounded by Sir Daniel's tenants, and, by the
 right of his good company of archers, coolly taking rents, and giving
 written receipts in return for them. By the faces of the tenants, it was
 plain how little this proceeding pleased them; for they argued very
 rightly that they would simply have to pay them twice.
 
 As soon as he knew what had brought Lawless, Ellis dismissed the
 remainder of the tenants, and, with every mark of interest and
 apprehension, conducted Dick into an inner chamber of the inn. There the
 lad's hurts were looked to; and he was recalled, by simple remedies, to
 consciousness.
 
 "Dear lad," said Ellis, pressing his hand, "y'are in a friend's hands
 that loved your father, and loves you for his sake. Rest ye a little
 quietly, for ye are somewhat out of case. Then shall ye tell me your
 story, and betwixt the two of us we shall find a remedy for all."
 
 A little later in the day, and after Dick had awakened from a
 comfortable slumber to find himself still very weak, but clearer in mind
 and easier in body, Ellis returned, and sitting down by the bedside,
 begged him, in the name of his father, to relate the circumstance of his
 escape from Tunstall Moat House. There was something in the strength of
 Duckworth's frame, in the honesty of his brown face, in the clearness
 and shrewdness of his eyes, that moved Dick to obey him; and from first
 to last the lad told him the story of his two days' adventures.
 
 "Well," said Ellis, when he had done, "see what the kind saints have
 done for you, Dick Shelton, not alone to save your body in so numerous
 and deadly perils, but to bring you into my hands that have no dearer
 wish than to assist your father's son. Be but true to me--and I see
 y'are true--and betwixt you and me, we shall bring that false-heart
 traitor to the death."
 
 "Will ye assault the house?" asked Dick.
 
 "I were mad, indeed, to think of it," returned Ellis. "He hath too much
 power; his men gather to him; those that gave me the slip last night,
 and by the mass came in so handily for you--those have made him safe.
 Nay, Dick, to the contrary, thou and I and my brave bowmen, we must all
 slip from this forest speedily, and leave Sir Daniel free."
 
 "My mind misgiveth me for Jack," said the lad.
 
 "For Jack!" repeated Duckworth. "O, I see, for the wench! Nay, Dick, I
 promise you, if there come talk of any marriage we shall act at once;
 till then, or till the time is ripe, we shall all disappear, even like
 shadows at morning; Sir Daniel shall look east and west, and see none
 enemies; he shall think, by the mass, that he hath dreamed awhile, and
 hath now awakened in his bed. But our four eyes, Dick, shall follow him
 right close, and our four hands--so help us all the army of the
 saints!--shall bring that traitor low!"
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Two days later Sir Daniel's garrison had grown to such a strength that
 he ventured on a sally, and at the head of some two-score horsemen,
 pushed without opposition as far as Tunstall hamlet. Not an arrow flew,
 not a man stirred in the thicket; the bridge was no longer guarded, but
 stood open to all comers; and as Sir Daniel crossed it, he saw the
 villagers looking timidly from their doors.
 
 Presently one of them, taking heart of grace, came forward, and with the
 lowliest salutations, presented a letter to the knight.
 
 His face darkened as he read the contents. It ran thus:
 
      _To the most untrue and cruel gentylman, Sir Daniel Brackley,
      Knyght, These:_
 
      I fynde ye were untrue and unkynd fro the first. Ye have my
      father's blood upon your hands; let be, it will not wasshe. Some
      day ye shall perish by my procurement, so much I let you to wytte;
      and I let you to wytte farther, that if ye seek to wed to any other
      the gentylwoman, Mistresse Joan Sedley, whom that I am bound upon a
      great oath to wed myself, the blow will be very swift. The first
      step therinne will be thy first step to the grave.
 
                                                          RIC. SHELTON.
 
 
 
 
 
 BOOK III
 
 MY LORD FOXHAM
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 THE HOUSE BY THE SHORE
 
 
 Months had passed away since Richard Shelton made his escape from the
 hands of his guardian. These months had been eventful for England. The
 party of Lancaster, which was then in the very article of death, had
 once more raised its head. The Yorkists defeated and dispersed, their
 leader butchered on the field, it seemed, for a very brief season in the
 winter following upon the events already recorded, as if the House of
 Lancaster had finally triumphed over its foes.
 
 The small town of Shoreby-on-the-Till was full of the Lancastrian nobles
 of the neighbourhood. Earl Risingham was there, with three hundred
 men-at-arms; Lord Shoreby, with two hundred; Sir Daniel himself, high in
 favour and once more growing rich on confiscations, lay in a house of
 his own, on the main street, with three-score men. The world had changed
 indeed.
 
 It was a black, bitter cold evening in the first week of January, with a
 hard frost, a high wind, and every likelihood of snow before the
 morning.
 
 In an obscure alehouse in a by-street near the harbour, three or four
 men sat drinking ale and eating a hasty mess of eggs. They were all
 likely, lusty, weather-beaten fellows, hard of hand, bold of eye; and
 though they wore plain tabards, like country ploughmen, even a drunken
 soldier might have looked twice before he sought a quarrel in such
 company.
 
 A little apart before the huge fire sat a younger man, almost a boy,
 dressed in much the same fashion, though it was easy to see by his looks
 that he was better born, and might have worn a sword, had the time
 suited.
 
 "Nay," said one of the men at the table, "I like it not. Ill will come
 of it. This is no place for jolly fellows. A jolly fellow loveth open
 country, good cover, and scarce foes; but here we are shut in a town,
 girt about with enemies; and, for the bull's-eye of misfortune, see if
 it snow not ere the morning."
 
 "'Tis for Master Shelton there," said another, nodding his head towards
 the lad before the fire.
 
 "I will do much for Master Shelton," returned the first; "but to come to
 the gallows for any man--nay, brothers, not that!"
 
 The door of the inn opened, and another man entered hastily and
 approached the youth before the fire.
 
 "Master Shelton," he said, "Sir Daniel goeth forth with a pair of links
 and four archers."
 
 Dick (for this was our young friend) rose instantly to his feet.
 
 "Lawless," he said, "ye will take John Capper's watch. Greensheve,
 follow with me. Capper, lead forward. We will follow him this time, an
 he go to York."
 
 The next moment they were outside in the dark street, and Capper, the
 man who had just come, pointed to where two torches flared in the wind
 at a little distance.
 
 The town was already sound asleep; no one moved upon the streets, and
 there was nothing easier than to follow the party without observation.
 The two link-bearers went first; next followed a single man, whose long
 cloak blew about him in the wind; and the rear was brought up by the
 four archers, each with his bow upon his arm. They moved at a brisk
 walk, threading the intricate lanes and drawing nearer to the shore.
 
 "He hath gone each night in this direction?" asked Dick, in a whisper.
 
 "This is the third night running, Master Shelton," returned Capper, "and
 still at the same hour and with the same small following, as though his
 end were secret."
 
 Sir Daniel and his six men were now come to the outskirts of the
 country. Shoreby was an open town, and though the Lancastrian lords who
 lay there kept a strong guard on the main roads, it was still possible
 to enter or depart unseen by any of the lesser streets or across the
 open country.
 
 The lane which Sir Daniel had been following came to an abrupt end.
 Before him there was a stretch of rough down, and the noise of the
 sea-surf was audible upon one hand. There were no guards in the
 neighbourhood, nor any light in that quarter of the town.
 
 Dick and his two outlaws drew a little closer to the object of their
 chase, and presently, as they came forth from between the houses and
 could see a little farther upon either hand, they were aware of another
 torch drawing near from another direction.
 
 "Hey," said Dick, "I smell treason."
 
 Meanwhile, Sir Daniel had come to a full halt. The torches were stuck
 into the sand, and the men lay down, as if to await the arrival of the
 other party.
 
 This drew near at a good rate. It consisted of four men only--a pair of
 archers, a varlet with a link, and a cloaked gentleman walking in their
 midst.
 
 "Is it you, my lord?" cried Sir Daniel.
 
 "It is I, indeed; and if ever true knight gave proof I am that man,"
 replied the leader of the second troop; "for who would not rather face
 giants, sorcerers, or pagans, than this pinching cold?"
 
 "My lord," returned Sir Daniel, "beauty will be the more beholden,
 misdoubt it not. But shall we forth? for the sooner ye have seen my
 merchandise, the sooner shall we both get home."
 
 "But why keep ye her here, good knight?" inquired the other. "An she be
 so young, and so fair, and so wealthy, why do ye not bring her forth
 among her mates? Ye would soon make her a good marriage, and no need to
 freeze your fingers and risk arrow-shots by going abroad at such
 untimely seasons in the dark."
 
 "I have told you, my lord," replied Sir Daniel, "the reason thereof
 concerneth me only. Neither do I purpose to explain it further. Suffice
 it, that if ye be weary of your old gossip, Daniel Brackley, publish it
 abroad that y'are to wed Joanna Sedley, and I give you my word ye will
 be quit of him right soon. Ye will find him with an arrow in his back."
 
 Meantime the two gentlemen were walking briskly forward over the down;
 the three torches going before them, stooping against the wind and
 scattering clouds of smoke and tufts of flame, and the rear brought up
 by the six archers.
 
 Close upon the heels of these, Dick followed. He had, of course, heard
 no word of this conversation; but he had recognised in the second of the
 speakers old Lord Shoreby himself, a man of an infamous reputation, whom
 even Sir Daniel affected, in public, to condemn.
 
 Presently they came close down upon the beach. The air smelt salt; the
 noise of the surf increased; and here, in a large walled garden, there
 stood a small house of two storeys, with stables and other offices.
 
 The foremost torch-bearer unlocked a door in the wall, and after the
 whole party had passed into the garden, again closed and locked it on
 the other side.
 
 Dick and his men were thus excluded from any farther following, unless
 they should scale the wall and thus put their necks in a trap.
 
 They sat down in a tuft of furze and waited. The red glow of the torches
 moved up and down and to and fro within the enclosure, as if the
 link-bearers steadily patrolled the garden.
 
 Twenty minutes passed, and then the whole party issued forth again upon
 the down; and Sir Daniel and the baron, after an elaborate salutation,
 separated and turned severally homeward, each with his own following of
 men and lights.
 
 As soon as the sound of their steps had been swallowed by the wind, Dick
 got to his feet as briskly as he was able, for he was stiff and aching
 with the cold.
 
 "Capper, ye will give me a back up," he said.
 
 They advanced, all three, to the wall; Capper stooped, and Dick, getting
 upon his shoulders, clambered on to the cope-stone.
 
 "Now, Greensheve," whispered Dick, "follow me up here; lie flat upon
 your face, that ye may be the less seen; and be ever ready to give me a
 hand if I fall foully on the other side."
 
 And so saying he dropped into the garden.
 
 It was all pitch dark; there was no light in the house. The wind
 whistled shrill among the poor shrubs, and the surf beat upon the beach;
 there was no other sound. Cautiously Dick footed it forth, stumbling
 among bushes, and groping with his hands; and presently the crisp noise
 of gravel underfoot told him that he had struck upon an alley.
 
 Here he paused, and taking his cross-bow from where he kept it concealed
 under his long tabard, he prepared it for instant action, and went
 forward once more with greater resolution and assurance. The path led
 him straight to the group of buildings.
 
 All seemed to be sorely dilapidated: the windows of the house were
 secured by crazy shutters; the stables were open and empty; there was no
 hay in the hay-loft, no corn in the corn-box. Any one would have
 supposed the place to be deserted. But Dick had good reason to think
 otherwise. He continued his inspection, visiting the offices, trying all
 the windows. At length he came round to the sea-side of the house, and
 there, sure enough, there burned a pale light in one of the upper
 windows.
 
 He stepped back a little way, till he thought he could see the movement
 of a shadow on the wall of the apartment. Then he remembered that, in
 the stable, his groping hand had rested for a moment on a ladder, and he
 returned with all despatch to bring it. The ladder was very short, but
 yet, by standing on the topmost round, he could bring his hands as high
 as the iron bars of the windows; and seizing these, he raised his body
 by main force until his eyes commanded the interior of the room.
 
 Two persons were within; the first he readily knew to be Dame Hatch; the
 second, a tall and beautiful and grave young lady, in a long,
 embroidered dress--could that be Joanna Sedley? his old wood-companion,
 Jack, whom he had thought to punish with a belt?
 
 He dropped back again to the top round of the ladder in a kind of
 amazement. He had never thought of his sweetheart as of so superior a
 being, and he was instantly taken with a feeling of diffidence. But he
 had little opportunity for thought. A low "Hist!" sounded from close by,
 and he hastened to descend the ladder.
 
 "Who goes?" he whispered.
 
 "Greensheve," came the reply, in tones similarly guarded.
 
 "What want ye?" asked Dick.
 
 "The house is watched, Master Shelton," returned the outlaw. "We are not
 alone to watch it; for even as I lay on my belly on the wall I saw men
 prowling in the dark, and heard them whistle softly one to the other."
 
 "By my sooth," said Dick, "but this is passing strange! Were they not
 men of Sir Daniel's?"
 
 "Nay, sir, that they were not," returned Greensheve; "for if I have eyes
 in my head, every man-Jack of them weareth me a white badge in his
 bonnet, something chequered with dark."
 
 "White, chequered with dark," repeated Dick. "Faith, 'tis a badge I know
 not. It is none of this country's badges. Well, an that be so, let us
 slip as quietly forth from this garden as we may; for here we are in an
 evil posture for defence. Beyond all question there are men of Sir
 Daniel's in that house, and to be taken between two shots is a
 beggarman's position. Take me this ladder; I must leave it where I found
 it."
 
 They returned the ladder to the stable, and groped their way to the
 place where they had entered.
 
 Capper had taken Greensheve's position on the cope, and now he leaned
 down his hand, and, first one and then the other, pulled them up.
 
 Cautiously and silently, they dropped again upon the other side; nor did
 they dare to speak until they had returned to their old ambush in the
 gorse.
 
 "Now, John Capper," said Dick, "back with you to Shoreby, even as for
 your life. Bring me instantly what men ye can collect. Here shall be the
 rendezvous; or if the men be scattered and the day be near at hand
 before they muster, let the place be something farther back, and by the
 entering in of the town. Greensheve and I lie here to watch. Speed ye,
 John Capper, and the saints aid you to despatch. And now, Greensheve,"
 he continued, as soon as Capper had departed, "let thou and I go round
 about the garden in a wide circuit. I would fain see whether thine eyes
 betrayed thee."
 
 Keeping well outwards from the wall, and profiting by every height and
 hollow, they passed about two sides, beholding nothing. On the third
 side the garden wall was built close upon the beach, and to preserve the
 distance necessary to their purpose, they had to go some way down upon
 the sands. Although the tide was still pretty far out, the surf was so
 high, and the sands so flat, that at each breaker a great sheet of froth
 and water came careering over the expanse, and Dick and Greensheve made
 this part of their inspection wading, now to the ankles, and now as deep
 as to the knees, in the salt and icy waters of the German Ocean.
 
 Suddenly, against the comparative whiteness of the garden wall, the
 figure of a man was seen, like a faint Chinese shadow, violently
 signalling with both arms. As he dropped again to the earth, another
 arose a little farther on and repeated the same performance. And so,
 like a silent watchword, these gesticulations made the round of the
 beleaguered garden.
 
 "They keep good watch," Dick whispered.
 
 "Let us back to land, good master," answered Greensheve. "We stand here
 too open; for, look ye, when the seas break heavy and white out there
 behind us, they shall see us plainly against the foam."
 
 "Ye speak sooth," returned Dick. "Ashore with us, right speedily."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 A SKIRMISH IN THE DARK
 
 
 Thoroughly drenched and chilled, the two adventurers returned to their
 position in the gorse.
 
 "I pray Heaven that Capper make good speed!" said Dick. "I vow a candle
 to St. Mary of Shoreby if he come before the hour!"
 
 "Y'are in a hurry, Master Dick?" asked Greensheve.
 
 "Ay, good fellow," answered Dick; "for in that house lieth my lady, whom
 I love, and who should these be that lie about her secretly by night?
 Unfriends, for sure!"
 
 "Well," returned Greensheve, "an John come speedily, we shall give a
 good account of them. They are not two-score at the outside--I judge so
 by the spacing of their sentries--and, taken where they are, lying so
 widely, one score would scatter them like sparrows. And yet, Master
 Dick, an she be in Sir Daniel's power already, it will little hurt that
 she should change into another's. Who should these be?"
 
 "I do suspect the Lord of Shoreby," Dick replied. "When came they?"
 
 "They began to come, Master Dick," said Greensheve, "about the time ye
 crossed the wall. I had not lain there the space of a minute ere I
 marked the first of the knaves crawling round the corner."
 
 The last light had been already extinguished in the little house when
 they were wading in the wash of the breakers, and it was impossible to
 predict at what moment the lurking men about the garden wall might make
 their onslaught. Of two evils, Dick preferred the least. He preferred
 that Joanna should remain under the guardianship of Sir Daniel rather
 than pass into the clutches of Lord Shoreby; and his mind was made up,
 if the house should be assaulted, to come at once to the relief of the
 besieged.
 
 But the time passed, and still there was no movement. From quarter of an
 hour to quarter of an hour the same signal passed about the garden wall,
 as if the leader desired to assure himself of the vigilance of his
 scattered followers; but in every other particular the neighbourhood of
 the little house lay undisturbed.
 
 Presently Dick's reinforcements began to arrive. The night was not yet
 old before nearly a score of men crouched beside him in the gorse.
 
 Separating these into two bodies, he took the command of the smaller
 himself, and entrusted the larger to the leadership of Greensheve.
 
 "Now, Kit," said he to this last, "take me your men to the near angle of
 the garden wall upon the beach. Post them strongly, and wait till that
 ye hear me falling on upon the other side. It is those upon the
 sea-front that I would fain make certain of, for there will be the
 leader. The rest will run; even let them. And now, lads, let no man draw
 an arrow; ye will but hurt friends. Take to the steel, and keep to the
 steel; and if we have the uppermost, I promise every man of you a gold
 noble when I come to mine estate."
 
 Out of the odd collection of broken men, thieves, murderers, and ruined
 peasantry, whom Duckworth had gathered together to serve the purposes of
 his revenge, some of the boldest and the most experienced in war had
 volunteered to follow Richard Shelton. The service of watching Sir
 Daniel's movements in the town of Shoreby had from the first been
 irksome to their temper, and they had of late begun to grumble loudly
 and threaten to disperse. The prospect of a sharp encounter and possible
 spoils restored them to good-humour, and they joyfully prepared for
 battle.
 
 Their long tabards thrown aside, they appeared, some in plain green
 jerkins, and some in stout leathern jacks; under their hoods many wore
 bonnets strengthened by iron plates; and, for offensive armour, swords,
 daggers, a few stout boar-spears, and a dozen of bright bills, put them
 in a posture to engage even regular feudal troops. The bows, quivers,
 and tabards were concealed among the gorse, and the two bands set
 resolutely forward.
 
 Dick, when he had reached the other side of the house, posted his six
 men in a line, about twenty yards from the garden wall, and took
 position himself a few paces in front. Then they all shouted with one
 voice, and closed upon the enemy.
 
 These, lying widely scattered, stiff with cold, and taken at unawares,
 sprang stupidly to their feet, and stood undecided. Before they had time
 to get their courage about them, or even to form an idea of the number
 and mettle of their assailants, a similar shout of onslaught sounded in
 their ears from the far side of the enclosure. Thereupon they gave
 themselves up for lost and ran.
 
 In this way the two small troops of the men of the Black Arrow closed
 upon the sea-front of the garden wall, and took a part of the strangers,
 as it were, between two fires; while the whole of the remainder ran for
 their lives in different directions, and were soon scattered in the
 darkness.
 
 For all that, the fight was but beginning. Dick's outlaws, although they
 had the advantage of the surprise, were still considerably outnumbered
 by the men they had surrounded. The tide had flowed, in the meanwhile;
 the beach was narrowed to a strip; and on this wet field, between the
 surf and the garden wall, there began, in the darkness, a doubtful,
 furious, and deadly contest.
 
 The strangers were well armed; they fell in silence upon their
 assailants; and the affray became a series of single combats. Dick, who
 had come first into the mellay, was engaged by three; the first he cut
 down at the first blow, but the other two coming upon him, hotly, he was
 fain to give ground before their onset. One of these two was a huge
 fellow, almost a giant for stature, and armed with a two-handed sword,
 which he brandished like a switch. Against this opponent, with his reach
 of arm and the length and weight of his weapon, Dick and his bill were
 quite defenceless; and had the other continued to join vigorously in the
 attack, the lad must have indubitably fallen. This second man, however,
 less in stature and slower in his movements, paused for a moment to peer
 about him in the darkness, and to give ear to the sounds of the battle.
 
 The giant still pursued his advantage, and still Dick fled before him,
 spying for his chance. Then the huge blade flashed and descended, and
 the lad, leaping on one side and running in, slashed sideways and
 upwards with his bill. A roar of agony responded, and, before the
 wounded man could raise his formidable weapon, Dick, twice repeating his
 blow, had brought him to the ground.
 
 The next moment he was engaged, upon more equal terms, with his second
 pursuer. Here there was no great difference in size, and though the man,
 fighting with sword and dagger against a bill, and being wary and quick
 of fence, had a certain superiority of arms, Dick more than made it up
 by his greater agility on foot. Neither at first gained any obvious
 advantage; but the older man was still insensibly profiting by the
 ardour of the younger to lead him where he would; and presently Dick
 found that they had crossed the whole width of the beach, and were now
 fighting above the knees in the spume and bubble of the breakers. Here
 his own superior activity was rendered useless; he found himself more or
 less at the discretion of his foe; yet a little, and he had his back
 turned upon his own men, and saw that this adroit and skilful adversary
 was bent upon drawing him farther and farther away.
 
 Dick ground his teeth. He determined to decide the combat instantly; and
 when the wash of the next wave had ebbed and left them dry, he rushed
 in, caught a blow upon his bill, and leaped right at the throat of his
 opponent. The man went down backwards, with Dick still upon the top of
 him; and the next wave, speedily succeeding to the last, buried him
 below a rush of water.
 
 While he was still submerged, Dick forced his dagger from his grasp, and
 rose to his feet, victorious.
 
 "Yield ye!" he said. "I give you life."
 
 "I yield me," said the other, getting to his knees. "Ye fight, like a
 young man, ignorantly and foolhardily; but, by the array of the saints,
 ye fight bravely!"
 
 Dick turned to the beach. The combat was still raging doubtfully in the
 night; over the hoarse roar of the breakers steel clanged upon steel,
 and cries of pain and the shout of battle resounded.
 
 "Lead me to your captain, youth," said the conquered knight. "It is fit
 this butchery should cease."
 
 "Sir," replied Dick, "so far as these brave fellows have a captain, the
 poor gentleman who here addresses you is he."
 
 "Call off your dogs, then, and I will bid my villains hold," returned
 the other.
 
 There was something noble both in the voice and manner of his late
 opponent, and Dick instantly dismissed all fears of treachery.
 
 "Lay down your arms, men!" cried the stranger knight. "I have yielded
 me, upon promise of life."
 
 The tone of the stranger was one of absolute command, and almost
 instantly the din and confusion of the mellay ceased.
 
 "Lawless," cried Dick, "are ye safe?"
 
 "Ay," cried Lawless, "safe and hearty."
 
 "Light me the lantern," said Dick.
 
 "Is not Sir Daniel here?" inquired the knight.
 
 "Sir Daniel?" echoed Dick. "Now, by the rood, I pray not. It would go
 ill with me if he were."
 
 "Ill with _you_, fair sir?" inquired the other. "Nay, then, if ye be
 not of Sir Daniel's party, I profess I comprehend no longer. Wherefore,
 then, fell ye upon mine ambush? in what quarrel, my young and very fiery
 friend? to what earthly purpose? and, to make a clear end of
 questioning, to what good gentleman have I surrendered?"
 
 But before Dick could answer, a voice spoke in the darkness from close
 by. Dick could see the speaker's black and white badge, and the
 respectful salute which he addressed to his superior.
 
 "My lord," said he, "if these gentlemen be unfriends to Sir Daniel, it
 is pity, indeed, we should have been at blows with them; but it were
 tenfold greater that either they or we should linger here. The watchers
 in the house----unless they be all dead or deaf----have heard our
 hammering this quarter-hour agone; instantly they will have signalled to
 the town; and unless we be the livelier in our departure, we are like to
 be taken, both of us, by a fresh foe."
 
 "Hawksley is in the right," added the lord. "How please ye, sir? Whither
 shall we march?"
 
 "Nay, my lord," said Dick, "go where ye will for me. I do begin to
 suspect we have some ground of friendship, and if, indeed, I began our
 acquaintance somewhat ruggedly, I would not churlishly continue. Let us,
 then, separate, my lord, you laying your right hand in mine; and at the
 hour and place that ye shall name, let us encounter and agree."
 
 "Y'are too trustful, boy," said the other; "but this time your trust is
 not misplaced. I will meet you at the point of day at St. Bride's Cross.
 Come, lads, follow!"
 
 The strangers disappeared from the scene with a rapidity that seemed
 suspicious; and while the outlaws fell to the congenial task of rifling
 the dead bodies, Dick made once more the circuit of the garden wall to
 examine the front of the house. In a little upper loophole of the roof
 he beheld a light set; and as it would certainly be visible in town from
 the back windows of Sir Daniel's mansion, he doubted not that this was
 the signal feared by Hawksley, and that ere long the lances of the
 Knight of Tunstall would arrive upon the scene.
 
 He put his ear to the ground, and it seemed to him as if he heard a
 jarring and hollow noise from townward. Back to the beach he went
 hurrying. But the work was already done; the last body was disarmed and
 stripped to the skin, and four fellows were already wading seaward to
 commit it to the mercies of the deep.
 
 A few minutes later, when there debouched out of the nearest lanes of
 Shoreby some two-score horsemen, hastily arrayed and moving at the
 gallop of their steeds, the neighbourhood of the house beside the sea
 was entirely silent and deserted.
 
 Meanwhile, Dick and his men had returned to the alehouse of the Goat and
 Bagpipes to snatch some hours of sleep before the morning tryst.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 ST. BRIDE'S CROSS
 
 
 St. Bride's Cross stood a little way back from Shoreby, on the skirts of
 Tunstall Forest. Two roads met: one, from Holywood across the forest;
 one, that road from Risingham down which we saw the wrecks of a
 Lancastrian army fleeing in disorder. Here the two joined issue, and
 went on together down the hill to Shoreby; and a little back from the
 point of junction, the summit of a little knoll was crowned by the
 ancient and weather-beaten cross.
 
 Here, then, about seven in the morning, Dick arrived. It was as cold as
 ever; the earth was all grey and silver with the hoar-frost, and the day
 began to break in the east with many colours of purple and orange.
 
 Dick set him down upon the lowest step of the cross, wrapped himself
 well in his tabard, and looked vigilantly upon all sides. He had not
 long to wait. Down the road from Holywood a gentleman in very rich and
 bright armour, and wearing over that a surcoat of the rarest furs, came
 pacing on a splendid charger. Twenty yards behind him followed a clump
 of lances; but these halted as soon as they came in view of the
 trysting-place, while the gentleman in the fur surcoat continued to
 advance alone.
 
 His visor was raised, and showed a countenance of great command and
 dignity, answerable to the richness of his attire and arms. And it was
 with some confusion of manner that Dick arose from the cross and stepped
 down the bank to meet his prisoner.
 
 "I thank you, my lord, for your exactitude," he said, louting very low.
 "Will it please your lordship to set foot to earth?"
 
 "Are ye here alone, young man?" inquired the other.
 
 "I was not so simple," answered Dick; "and, to be plain with your
 lordship, the woods upon either hand of this cross lie full of mine
 honest fellows lying on their weapons."
 
 "Y' 'ave done wisely," said the lord. "It pleaseth me the rather, since
 last night ye fought foolhardily, and more like a savage Saracen lunatic
 than any Christian warrior. But it becomes not me to complain that had
 the undermost."
 
 "Ye had the undermost indeed, my lord, since ye so fell," returned Dick;
 "but had the waves not holpen me, it was I that should have had the
 worst. Ye were pleased to make me yours with several dagger marks, which
 I still carry. And in fine, my lord, methinks I had all the danger, as
 well as all the profit, of that little blind-man's mellay on the beach."
 
 "Y'are shrewd enough to make light of it, I see," returned the stranger.
 
 "Nay, my lord, not shrewd," replied Dick, "in that I shoot at no
 advantage to myself. But when, by the light of this new day, I see how
 stout a knight hath yielded, not to my arms alone, but to fortune, and
 the darkness, and the surf--and how easily the battle had gone
 otherwise, with a soldier so untried and rustic as myself--think it not
 strange, my lord, if I feel confounded with my victory."
 
 "Ye speak well," said the stranger. "Your name?"
 
 "My name, an't like you, is Shelton," answered Dick.
 
 "Men call me the Lord Foxham," added the other.
 
 "Then, my lord, and under your good favour, ye are guardian to the
 sweetest maid in England," replied Dick; "and for your ransom, and the
 ransom of such as were taken with you on the beach, there will be no
 uncertainty of terms. I pray you, my lord, of your good-will and
 charity, yield me the hand of my mistress, Joan Sedley; and take ye,
 upon the other part, your liberty, the liberty of these your followers,
 and (if ye will have it) my gratitude and service till I die."
 
 "But are ye not ward to Sir Daniel? Methought, if y'are Harry Shelton's
 son, that I had heard it so reported," said Lord Foxham.
 
 "Will it please you, my lord, to alight? I would fain tell you fully who
 I am, how situate, and why so bold in my demands. Beseech you, my lord,
 take place upon these steps, hear me to a full end, and judge me with
 allowance."
 
 And so saying, Dick lent a hand to Lord Foxham to dismount; led him up
 the knoll to the cross; installed him in the place where he had himself
 been sitting; and standing respectfully before his noble prisoner,
 related the story of his fortunes up to the events of the evening
 before.
 
 Lord Foxham listened gravely, and when Dick had done, "Master Shelton,"
 he said, "ye are a most fortunate-unfortunate young gentleman; but what
 fortune y' 'ave had, that ye have amply merited; and what unfortune, ye
 have noways deserved. Be of a good cheer; for ye have made a friend who
 is devoid neither of power nor favour. For yourself, although it fits
 not for a person of your birth to herd with outlaws, I must own ye are
 both brave and honourable; very dangerous in battle, right courteous in
 peace; a youth of excellent disposition and brave bearing. For your
 estates, ye will never see them till the world shall change again; so
 long as Lancaster hath the strong hand, so long shall Sir Daniel enjoy
 them for his own. For my ward, it is another matter; I had promised her
 before to a gentleman a kinsman of my house, one Hamley; the promise is
 old----"
 
 "Ay, my lord, and now Sir Daniel hath promised her to my Lord Shoreby,"
 interrupted Dick. "And his promise, for all it is but young, is still
 the likelier to be made good."
 
 "'Tis the plain truth," returned his lordship. "And considering,
 moreover, that I am your prisoner, upon no better composition than my
 bare life, and over and above that, that the maiden is unhappily in
 other hands, I will so far consent. Aid me with your good fellows----"
 
 "My lord," cried Dick, "they are these same outlaws that ye blame me for
 consorting with."
 
 "Let them be what they will, they can fight," returned Lord Foxham.
 "Help me, then; and if between us we regain the maid, upon my knightly
 honour, she shall marry you!"
 
 Dick bent his knee before his prisoner; but he, leaping up lightly from
 the cross, caught the lad up and embraced him like a son.
 
 "Come," he said, "an y'are to marry Joan, we must be early friends."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE "GOOD HOPE"
 
 
 An hour thereafter, Dick was back at the Goat and Bagpipes, breaking his
 fast, and receiving the report of his messengers and sentries. Duckworth
 was still absent from Shoreby; and this was frequently the case, for he
 played many parts in the world, shared many different interests, and
 conducted many various affairs. He had founded that fellowship of the
 Black Arrow, as a ruined man longing for vengeance and money; and yet
 among those who knew him best, he was thought to be the agent and
 emissary of the great king-maker of England, Richard, Earl of Warwick.
 
 In his absence, at any rate, it fell upon Richard Shelton to command
 affairs in Shoreby; and, as he sat at meat, his mind was full of care,
 and his face heavy with consideration. It had been determined, between
 him and the Lord Foxham, to make one bold stroke that evening, and, by
 brute force, to set Joanna free. The obstacles, however, were many; and
 as one after another of his scouts arrived, each brought him more
 discomfortable news.
 
 Sir Daniel was alarmed by the skirmish of the night before. He had
 increased the garrison of the house in the garden; but not content with
 that, he had stationed horsemen in all the neighbouring lanes, so that
 he might have instant word of any movement. Meanwhile, in the court of
 his mansion, steeds stood saddled, and the riders, armed at every point,
 awaited but the signal to ride.
 
 The adventure of the night appeared more and more difficult of
 execution, till suddenly Dick's countenance lightened.
 
 "Lawless!" he cried, "you that were a shipman, can ye steal me a ship?"
 
 "Master Dick," replied Lawless, "if ye would back me, I would agree to
 steal York Minster."
 
 Presently after, these two set forth and descended to the harbour. It
 was a considerable basin, lying among sand-hills, and surrounded with
 patches of down, ancient ruinous lumber, and tumble-down slums of the
 town. Many decked ships and many open boats either lay there at anchor,
 or had been drawn up on the beach. A long duration of bad weather had
 driven them from the high seas into the shelter of the port; and the
 great trooping of black clouds, and the cold squalls that followed one
 another, now with a sprinkling of dry snow, now in a mere swoop of wind,
 promised no improvement but rather threatened a more serious storm in
 the immediate future.
 
 The seamen, in view of the cold and the wind, had for the most part
 slunk ashore, and were now roaring and singing in the shoreside taverns.
 Many of the ships already rode unguarded at their anchors; and as the
 day wore on, and the weather offered no appearance of improvement, the
 number was continually being augmented. It was to these deserted ships,
 and, above all, to those of them that lay far out, that Lawless directed
 his attention; while Dick, seated upon an anchor that was half embedded
 in the sand, and giving ear, now to the rude, potent, and boding voices
 of the gale, and now to the hoarse singing of the shipmen in a
 neighbouring tavern, soon forgot his immediate surroundings and concerns
 in the agreeable recollection of Lord Foxham's promise.
 
 He was disturbed by a touch upon his shoulder. It was Lawless, pointing
 to a small ship that lay somewhat by itself, and within but a little of
 the harbour mouth, where it heaved regularly and smoothly on the
 entering swell. A pale gleam of winter sunshine fell, at that moment, on
 the vessel's deck, relieving her against a bank of scowling cloud; and
 in this momentary glitter Dick could see a couple of men hauling the
 skiff alongside.
 
 "There, sir," said Lawless, "mark ye it well! There is the ship for
 to-night."
 
 Presently the skiff put out from the vessel's side, and the two men,
 keeping her head well to the wind, pulled lustily for shore, Lawless
 turned to a loiterer.
 
 "How call ye her?" he asked, pointing to the little vessel.
 
 "They call her the _Good Hope_, of Dartmouth," replied the loiterer.
 "Her captain, Arblaster by name. He pulleth the bow oar in yon skiff."
 
 This was all that Lawless wanted. Hurriedly thanking the man, he moved
 round the shore to a certain sandy creek, for which the skiff was
 heading. There he took up his position, and as soon as they were within
 earshot, opened fire on the sailors of the _Good Hope_.
 
 "What! Gossip Arblaster!" he cried. "Why, ye be well met; nay, gossip,
 ye be right well met, upon the rood! And is that the _Good Hope_? Ay, I
 would know her among ten thousand!--a sweet shear, a sweet boat! But
 marry come up, my gossip, will ye drink? I have come into mine estate
 which doubtless ye remember to have heard on. I am now rich; I have left
 to sail upon the sea; I do sail now, for the most part, upon spiced ale.
 Come, fellow; thy hand upon't! Come, drink with an old shipfellow!"
 
 Skipper Arblaster, a long-faced, elderly, weather-beaten man, with a
 knife hanging about his neck by a plaited cord, and for all the world
 like any modern seaman in his gait and bearing, had hung back in obvious
 amazement and distrust. But the name of an estate, and a certain air of
 tipsified simplicity and good-fellowship which Lawless very well
 affected, combined to conquer his suspicious jealousy; his countenance
 relaxed, and he at once extended his open hand and squeezed that of the
 outlaw in a formidable grasp.
 
 "Nay," he said, "I cannot mind you. But what o' that? I would drink with
 any man, gossip, and so would my man Tom. Man Tom," he added, addressing
 his follower, "here is my gossip, whose name I cannot mind, but no doubt
 a very good seaman. Let's go drink with him and his shore friend."
 
 Lawless led the way, and they were soon seated in an alehouse, which, as
 it was very new, and stood in an exposed and solitary station, was less
 crowded than those nearer to the centre of the port. It was but a shed
 of timber, much like a blockhouse in the backwoods of to-day, and was
 coarsely furnished with a press or two, a number of naked benches, and
 boards set upon barrels to play the part of tables. In the middle, and
 besieged by half a hundred violent draughts, a fire of wreck-wood blazed
 and vomited thick smoke.
 
 "Ay, now," said Lawless, "here is a shipman's joy--a good fire and a
 good stiff cup ashore, with foul weather without and an off-sea gale
 a-snoring in the roof! Here's to the _Good Hope_! May she ride easy!"
 
 "Ay," said Skipper Arblaster, "'tis good weather to be ashore in, that
 is sooth. Man Tom, how say ye to that? Gossip, ye speak well, though I
 can never think upon your name; but ye speak very well. May the _Good
 Hope_ ride easy! Amen!"
 
 "Friend Dickon," resumed Lawless, addressing his commander, "ye have
 certain matters on hand, unless I err? Well, prithee be about them
 incontinently. For here I be with the choice of all good company, two
 tough old shipmen; and till that ye return I will go warrant these brave
 fellows will bide here and drink me cup for cup. We are not like
 shore-men, we old, tough tarry-Johns!"
 
 "It is well meant," returned the skipper. "Ye can go, boy; for I will
 keep your good friend and my good gossip company till curfew--ay, and by
 St. Mary, till the sun get up again! For, look ye, when a man hath been
 long enough at sea, the salt getteth me into the clay upon his bones;
 and let him drink a draw-well, he will never be quenched."
 
 Thus encouraged upon all hands, Dick rose, saluted his company, and
 going forth again into the gusty afternoon, got him as speedily as he
 might to the Goat and Bagpipes. Thence he sent word to my Lord Foxham
 that, so soon as ever the evening closed, they would have a stout boat
 to keep the sea in. And then leading along with him a couple of outlaws
 who had some experience of the sea, he returned himself to the harbour
 and the little sandy creek.
 
 The skiff of the _Good Hope_ lay among many others, from which it was
 easily distinguished by its extreme smallness and fragility. Indeed,
 when Dick and his two men had taken their places, and begun to put forth
 out of the creek into the open harbour, the little cockle dipped into
 the swell and staggered under every gust of wind, like a thing upon the
 point of sinking.
 
 The _Good Hope_, as we have said, was anchored far out, where the swell
 was heaviest. No other vessel lay nearer than several cables' length;
 those that were the nearest were themselves entirely deserted; and as
 the skiff approached, a thick flurry of snow and a sudden darkening of
 the weather further concealed the movements of the outlaws from all
 possible espial. In a trice they had leaped upon the heaving deck, and
 the skiff was dancing at the stern. The _Good Hope_ was captured.
 
 [Illustration: _The little cockle dipped into the swell and staggered
 under every gust of wind_]
 
 She was a good stout boat, decked in the bows and amid-ships, but open
 in the stern. She carried one mast, and was rigged between a felucca and
 a lugger. It would seem that Skipper Arblaster had made an excellent
 venture, for the hold was full of pieces of French wine; and in the
 little cabin, besides the Virgin Mary in the bulkhead which proved
 the captain's piety, there were many lock-fast chests and cupboards,
 which showed him to be rich and careful.
 
 A dog, who was the sole occupant of the vessel, furiously barked and bit
 the heels of the boarders; but he was soon kicked into the cabin, and
 the door shut upon his just resentment. A lamp was lit and fixed in the
 shrouds to mark the vessel clearly from the shore; one of the wine
 pieces in the hold was broached, and a cup of excellent Gascony emptied
 to the adventure of the evening; and then, while one of the outlaws
 began to get ready his bow and arrows and prepare to hold the ship
 against all comers, the other hauled in the skiff and got overboard,
 where he held on, waiting for Dick.
 
 "Well, Jack, keep me a good watch," said the young commander, preparing
 to follow his subordinate. "Ye will do right well."
 
 "Why," returned Jack, "I shall do excellent well indeed, so long as we
 lie here; but once we put the nose of this poor ship outside the
 harbour--See, there she trembles! Nay, the poor shrew heard the words,
 and the heart misgave her in her oak-tree ribs. But look, Master Dick!
 how black the weather gathers!"
 
 The darkness ahead was, indeed, astonishing. Great billows heaved up out
 of the blackness, one after another; and one after another the _Good
 Hope_ buoyantly climbed, and giddily plunged upon the farther side. A
 thin sprinkle of snow and thin flakes of foam came flying, and powdered
 the deck; and the wind harped dismally among the rigging.
 
 "In sooth, it looketh evilly," said Dick, "But what cheer! 'Tis but a
 squall, and presently it will blow over." But, in spite of his words, he
 was depressingly affected by the bleak disorder of the sky and the
 wailing and fluting of the wind; and as he got over the side of the
 _Good Hope_ and made once more for the landing-creek with the best speed
 of oars, he crossed himself devoutly, and recommended to Heaven the
 lives of all who should adventure on the sea.
 
 At the landing-creek there had already gathered about a dozen of the
 outlaws. To these the skiff was left, and they were bidden embark
 without delay.
 
 A little farther up the beach Dick found Lord Foxham hurrying in quest
 of him, his face concealed with a dark hood, and his bright armour
 covered by a long russet mantle of a poor appearance.
 
 "Young Shelton," he said, "are ye for sea, then, truly?"
 
 "My lord," replied Richard, "they lie about the house with horsemen; it
 may not be reached from the land side without alarum; and Sir Daniel
 once advertised of our adventure, we can no more carry it to a good end
 than, saving your presence, we could ride upon the wind. Now, in going
 round by sea, we do run some peril by the elements; but, what much
 outweighteth all, we have a chance to make good our purpose and bear off
 the maid."
 
 "Well," returned Lord Foxham, "lead on. I will, in some sort, follow you
 for shame's sake; but I own I would I were in bed."
 
 "Here, then," said Dick. "Hither we go to fetch our pilot."
 
 And he led the way to the rude alehouse where he had given rendezvous
 to a portion of his men. Some of these he found lingering round the door
 outside; others had pushed more boldly in, and, choosing places as near
 as possible to where they saw their comrade, gathered close about
 Lawless and the two shipmen. These, to judge by the distempered
 countenance and cloudy eye, had long since gone beyond the boundaries of
 moderation; and as Richard entered, closely followed by Lord Foxham,
 they were all three tuning up an old, pitiful sea-ditty, to the chorus
 of the wailing of the gale.
 
 The young leader cast a rapid glance about the shed. The fire had just
 been replenished, and gave forth volumes of black smoke, so that it was
 difficult to see clearly in the farther corners. It was plain, however,
 that the outlaws very largely outnumbered the remainder of the guests.
 Satisfied upon this point, in case of any failure in the operation of
 his plan, Dick strode up to the table and resumed his place upon the
 bench.
 
 "Hey?" cried the skipper, tipsily, "who are ye, hey?"
 
 "I want a word with you without, Master Arblaster," returned Dick; "and
 here is what we shall talk of." And he showed him a gold noble in the
 glimmer of the firelight.
 
 The shipman's eyes burned, although he still failed to recognise our
 hero.
 
 "Ay, boy," he said, "I am with you. Gossip, I will be back anon. Drink
 fair, gossip"; and, taking Dick's arm to steady his uneven steps, he
 walked to the door of the alehouse.
 
 As soon as he was over the threshold, ten strong arms had seized and
 bound him; and in two minutes more, with his limbs trussed one to
 another, and a good gag in his mouth, he had been tumbled neck and crop
 into a neighbouring hay-barn. Presently, his man Tom, similarly secured,
 was tossed beside him, and the pair were left to their uncouth
 reflections for the night.
 
 And now, as the time for concealment had gone by, Lord Foxham's
 followers were summoned by a preconcerted signal, and the party, boldly
 taking possession of as many boats as their numbers required, pulled in
 a flotilla for the light in the rigging of the ship. Long before the
 last man had climbed to the deck of the _Good Hope_, the sound of
 furious shouting from the shore showed that a part, at least, of the
 seamen had discovered the loss of their skiffs.
 
 But it was now too late, whether for recovery or revenge. Out of some
 forty fighting men now mustered in the stolen ship, eight had been to
 sea, and could play the part of mariners. With the aid of these, a slice
 of sail was got upon her. The cable was cut. Lawless, vacillating on his
 feet, and still shouting the chorus of sea-ballads, took the long tiller
 in his hands: and the _Good Hope_ began to flit forward into the
 darkness of the night, and to face the great waves beyond the harbour
 bar.
 
 Richard took his place beside the weather rigging. Except for the ship's
 own lantern, and for some lights in Shoreby town, that were already
 fading to leeward, the whole world of air was as black as in a pit. Only
 from time to time, as the _Good Hope_ swooped dizzily down into the
 valley of the rollers, a crest would break--a great cataract of snowy
 foam would leap in one instant into being--and, in an instant more,
 would stream into the wake and vanish.
 
 Many of the men lay holding on and praying aloud; many more were sick,
 and had crept into the bottom, where they sprawled among the cargo. And
 what with the extreme violence of the motion, and the continued drunken
 bravado of Lawless, still shouting and singing at the helm, the stoutest
 heart on board may have nourished a shrewd misgiving as to the result.
 
 But Lawless, as if guided by an instinct, steered the ship across the
 breakers, struck the lee of a great sand-bank, where they sailed for
 awhile in smooth water, and presently after laid her alongside a rude
 stone pier, where she was hastily made fast, and lay ducking and
 grinding in the dark.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 THE "GOOD HOPE"
 
 (CONTINUED)
 
 
 The pier was not far distant from the house in which Joanna lay; it now
 only remained to get the men on shore, to surround the house with a
 strong party, burst in the door and carry off the captive. They might
 then regard themselves as done with the _Good Hope_; it had placed them
 on the rear of their enemies; and the retreat, whether they should
 succeed or fail in the main enterprise, would be directed with a greater
 measure of hope in the direction of the forest and my Lord Foxham's
 reserve.
 
 To get the men on shore, however, was no easy task; many had been sick,
 all were pierced with cold; the promiscuity and disorder on board had
 shaken their discipline; the movement of the ship and the darkness of
 the night had cowed their spirits. They made a rush upon the pier; my
 lord, with his sword drawn on his own retainers, must throw himself in
 front; and this impulse of rabblement was not restrained without a
 certain clamour of voices, highly to be regretted in the case.
 
 When some degree of order had been restored, Dick, with a few chosen
 men, set forth in advance. The darkness on shore, by contrast with the
 flashing of the surf, appeared before him like a solid body; and the
 howling and whistling of the gale drowned any lesser noise.
 
 He had scarce reached the end of the pier, however, when there fell a
 lull of the wind; and in this he seemed to hear on shore the hollow
 footing of horses and the clash of arms. Checking his immediate
 followers, he passed forward a step or two alone, even setting foot upon
 the down; and here he made sure he could detect the shape of men and
 horses moving. A strong discouragement assailed him. If their enemies
 were really on the watch, if they had beleaguered the shoreward end of
 the pier, he and Lord Foxham were taken in a posture of very poor
 defence, the sea behind, the men jostled in the dark upon a narrow
 causeway. He gave a cautious whistle, the signal previously agreed upon.
 
 It proved to be a signal far more than he desired. Instantly there fell,
 through the black night, a shower of arrows sent at a venture; and so
 close were the men huddled on the pier that more than one was hit, and
 the arrows were answered with cries of both fear and pain. In this first
 discharge, Lord Foxham was struck down; Hawksley had him carried on
 board again at once; and his men, during the brief remainder of the
 skirmish, fought (when they fought at all) without guidance. That was
 perhaps the chief cause of the disaster which made haste to follow.
 
 At the shore end of the pier, for perhaps a minute, Dick held his own
 with a handful; one or two were wounded upon either side; steel crossed
 steel; nor had there been the least signal of advantage, when in the
 twinkling of an eye the tide turned against the party from the ship.
 Some one cried out that all was lost; the men were in the very humour
 to lend an ear to a discomfortable counsel; the cry was taken up. "On
 board, lads, for your lives!" cried another. A third, with the true
 instinct of the coward, raised that inevitable report on all retreats:
 "We are betrayed!" And in a moment the whole mass of men went surging
 and jostling backward down the pier, turning their defenceless backs on
 their pursuers and piercing the night with craven outcry.
 
 One coward thrust off the ship's stern, while another still held her by
 the bows. The fugitives leaped, screaming, and were hauled on board, or
 fell back and perished in the sea. Some were cut down upon the pier by
 the pursuers. Many were injured on the ship's deck in the blind haste
 and terror of the moment, one man leaping upon another, and a third on
 both. At last, and whether by design or accident, the bows of the _Good
 Hope_ were liberated; and the ever-ready Lawless, who had maintained his
 place at the helm through all the hurly-burly by sheer strength of body
 and a liberal use of the cold steel, instantly clapped her on the proper
 tack. The ship began to move once more forward on the stormy sea, its
 scuppers running blood, its deck heaped with fallen men, sprawling and
 struggling in the dark.
 
 Thereupon, Lawless sheathed his dagger, and turning to his next
 neighbour, "I have left my mark on them, gossip," said he, "the yelping,
 coward hounds."
 
 Now, while they were all leaping and struggling for their lives, the men
 had not appeared to observe the rough shoves and cutting stabs with
 which Lawless had held his post in the confusion. But perhaps they had
 already begun to understand somewhat more clearly, or perhaps another
 ear had overheard, the helmsman's speech.
 
 Panic-stricken troops recover slowly, and men who have just disgraced
 themselves by cowardice, as if to wipe out the memory of their fault,
 will sometimes run straight into the opposite extreme of
 insubordination. So it was now; and the same men who had thrown away
 their weapons and been hauled, feet-foremost, into the _Good Hope_,
 began to cry out upon their leaders, and demand that some one should be
 punished.
 
 This growing ill-feeling turned upon Lawless.
 
 In order to get a proper offing, the old outlaw had put the head of the
 _Good Hope_ to seaward.
 
 "What!" bawled one of the grumblers, "he carrieth us to seaward!"
 
 "'Tis sooth," cried another. "Nay, we are betrayed for sure."
 
 And they all began to cry out in chorus that they were betrayed, and in
 shrill tones and with abominable oaths bade Lawless go about-ship and
 bring them speedily ashore. Lawless, grinding his teeth, continued in
 silence to steer the true course, guiding the _Good Hope_ among the
 formidable billows. To their empty terrors, as to their dishonourable
 threats, between drink and dignity he scorned to make reply. The
 malcontents drew together a little abaft the mast, and it was plain they
 were like barnyard cocks, "crowing for courage." Presently they would be
 fit for any extremity of injustice or ingratitude. Dick began to mount
 by the ladder, eager to interpose; but one of the outlaws, who was also
 something of a seaman, got beforehand.
 
 "Lads," he began, "y'are right wooden heads, I think. For to get back,
 by the mass, we must have an offing, must we not? And this old
 Lawless----"
 
 Some one struck the speaker on the mouth, and the next moment, as a fire
 springs among dry straw, he was felled upon the deck, trampled under the
 feet, and despatched by the daggers of his cowardly companions. At this
 the wrath of Lawless rose and broke.
 
 "Steer yourselves," he bellowed, with a curse; and, careless of the
 result, he left the helm.
 
 The _Good Hope_ was, at that moment, trembling on the summit of a swell.
 She subsided, with sickening velocity, upon the farther side. A wave,
 like a great black bulwark, hove immediately in front of her; and, with
 a staggering blow, she plunged head-foremost through that liquid hill.
 The green water passed right over her from stem to stern, as high as a
 man's knees; the sprays ran higher than the mast; and she rose again
 upon the other side, with an appalling, tremulous indecision, like a
 beast that has been deadly wounded.
 
 Six or seven of the malcontents had been carried bodily overboard; and
 as for the remainder, when they found their tongues again, it was to
 bellow to the saints and wail upon Lawless to come back and take the
 tiller.
 
 Nor did Lawless wait to be twice bidden. The terrible result of his
 fling of just resentment sobered him completely. He knew, better than
 any one on board, how nearly the _Good Hope_ had gone bodily down below
 their feet; and he could tell, by the laziness with which she met the
 sea, that the peril was by no means over.
 
 Dick, who had been thrown down by the concussion and half drowned, rose
 wading to his knees in the swamped well of the stern, and crept to the
 old helmsman's side.
 
 "Lawless," he said, "we do all depend on you; y'are a brave, steady man,
 indeed, and crafty in the management of ships; I shall put three sure
 men to watch upon your safety."
 
 "Bootless, my master, bootless," said the steersman, peering forward
 through the dark. "We come every moment somewhat clearer of these
 sand-banks; with every moment, then, the sea packeth upon us heavier,
 and for all these whimperers, they will presently be on their backs.
 For, my master, 'tis a right mystery, but true, there never yet was a
 bad man that was a good shipman. None but the honest and the bold can
 endure me this tossing of a ship."
 
 "Nay, Lawless," said Dick, laughing, "that is a right shipman's by-word,
 and hath no more of sense than the whistle of the wind. But, prithee,
 how go we? Do we lie well? Are we in good case?"
 
 "Master Shelton," replied Lawless, "I have been a Grey Friar--I praise
 fortune--an archer, a thief, and a shipman. Of all these coats, I had
 the best fancy to die in the Grey Friar's, as ye may readily conceive,
 and the least fancy to die in John Shipman's tarry jacket; and that for
 two excellent good reasons: first, that the death might take a man
 suddenly; and second, for the horror of that great, salt smother and
 welter under my foot here"--and Lawless stamped with his foot.
 "Howbeit," he went on, "an I die not a sailor's death, and that this
 night, I shall owe a tall candle to our Lady."
 
 "Is it so?" asked Dick.
 
 "It is right so," replied the outlaw. "Do ye not feel how heavy and dull
 she moves upon the waves? Do ye not hear the water washing in her hold?
 She will scarce mind the rudder even now. Bide till she has settled a
 bit lower; and she will either go down below your boots like a stone
 image, or drive ashore here, under our lee, and come all to pieces like
 a twist of string."
 
 "Ye speak with a good courage," returned Dick. "Ye are not then
 appalled?"
 
 "Why, master," answered Lawless, "if ever a man had an ill crew to come
 to port with, it is I--a renegade friar, a thief, and all the rest on't.
 Well, ye may wonder, but I keep a good hope in my wallet; and if that I
 be to drown, I will drown with a bright eye, Master Shelton, and a
 steady hand."
 
 Dick returned no answer; but he was surprised to find the old vagabond
 of so resolute a temper, and fearing some fresh violence or treachery,
 set forth upon his quest for three sure men. The great bulk of the men
 had now deserted the deck, which was continually wetted with the flying
 sprays, and where they lay exposed to the shrewdness of the winter wind.
 They had gathered, instead, into the hold of the merchandise, among the
 butts of wine, and lighted by two swinging lanterns.
 
 Here a few kept up the form of revelry, and toasted each other deep in
 Arblaster's Gascony wine. But as the _Good Hope_ continued to tear
 through the smoking waves, and toss her stem and stern alternately high
 in air and deep into white foam, the number of these jolly companions
 diminished with every moment and with every lurch. Many sat apart,
 tending their hurts, but the majority were already prostrated with
 sickness, and lay moaning in the bilge.
 
 Greensheve, Cuckow, and a young fellow of Lord Foxham's whom Dick had
 already remarked for his intelligence and spirit, were still, however,
 both fit to understand and willing to obey. These Dick set, as a
 body-guard, about the person of the steersman, and then, with a last
 look at the black sky and sea, he turned and went below into the cabin,
 whither Lord Foxham had been carried by his servants.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 THE "GOOD HOPE"
 
 (CONCLUDED)
 
 
 The moans of the wounded baron blended with the wailing of the ship's
 dog. The poor animal, whether he was merely sick at heart to be
 separated from his friends, or whether he indeed recognised some peril
 in the labouring of the ship, raised his cries, like minute-guns, above
 the roar of wave and weather; and the more superstitious of the men
 heard, in these sounds, the knell of the _Good Hope_.
 
 Lord Foxham had been laid in a berth upon a fur cloak. A little lamp
 burned dim before the Virgin in the bulkhead, and by its glimmer Dick
 could see the pale countenance and hollow eyes of the hurt man.
 
 "I am sore hurt," said he. "Come near to my side, young Shelton; let
 there be one by me who, at least, is gentle born; for after having lived
 nobly and richly all the days of my life, this is a sad pass that I
 should get my hurt in a little ferreting skirmish, and die here, in a
 foul, cold ship upon the sea, among broken men and churls."
 
 "Nay, my lord," said Dick, "I pray rather to the saints that ye will
 recover you of your hurt, and come soon and sound ashore."
 
 "How!" demanded his lordship. "Come sound ashore? There is, then, a
 question of it?"
 
 "The ship laboureth--the sea is grievous and contrary," replied the lad;
 "and by what I can learn of my fellow that steereth us, we shall do
 well, indeed, if we come dry-shod to land."
 
 "Ha!" said the baron, gloomily, "thus shall every terror attend upon the
 passage of my soul! Sir, pray rather to live hard, that ye may die easy,
 than to be fooled and fluted all through life, as to the pipe and
 tabour, and, in the last hour, be plunged among misfortunes! Howbeit, I
 have that upon my mind that must not be delayed. We have no priest
 aboard?"
 
 "None," replied Dick.
 
 "Here, then, to my secular interests," resumed Lord Foxham: "ye must be
 as good a friend to me dead, as I found you a gallant enemy when I was
 living. I fall in an evil hour for me, for England, and for them that
 trusted me. My men are being brought by Hamley--he that was your rival;
 they will rendezvous in the long holm at Holywood; this ring from off my
 finger will accredit you to represent mine orders; and I shall write,
 besides, two words upon this paper, bidding Hamley yield to you the
 damsel. Will he obey? I know not."
 
 "But, my lord, what orders?" inquired Dick.
 
 "Ay," quoth the baron, "ay--the orders"; and he looked upon Dick with
 hesitation. "Are ye Lancaster or York?" he asked, at length.
 
 "I shame to say it," answered Dick, "I can scarce clearly answer. But
 so much I think is certain: since I serve with Ellis Duckworth, I serve
 the house of York. Well, if that be so, I declare for York."
 
 "It is well," returned the other; "it is exceeding well. For, truly, had
 ye said Lancaster, I wot not for the world what I had done. But sith ye
 are for York, follow me. I came hither but to watch these lords at
 Shoreby, while mine excellent young lord, Richard of Gloucester,[1]
 prepareth a sufficient force to fall upon and scatter them. I have made
 me notes of their strength, what watch they keep, and how they lie; and
 these I was to deliver to my young lord on Sunday, an hour before noon,
 at St. Bride's Cross beside the forest. This tryst I am not like to
 keep, but I pray you, of courtesy, to keep it in my stead; and see that
 not pleasure, nor pain, tempest, wound, nor pestilence withhold you from
 the hour and place, for the welfare of England lieth upon this cast."
 
     [1] At the date of this story, Richard Crookback could not have been
     created Duke of Gloucester; but for clearness, with the reader's
     leave, he shall so be called.
 
 "I do soberly take this upon me," said Dick. "In so far as in me lieth,
 your purpose shall be done."
 
 "It is good," said the wounded man. "My lord duke shall order you
 further, and if ye obey him with spirit and good-will, then is your
 fortune made. Give me the lamp a little nearer to mine eyes, till that I
 write these words for you."
 
 He wrote a note "to his worshipful kinsman, Sir John Hamley"; and then a
 second, which he left without external superscripture.
 
 "This is for the duke," he said. "The word is 'England and Edward,' and
 the counter, 'England and York.'"
 
 "And Joanna, my lord?" asked Dick.
 
 "Nay, ye must get Joanna how ye can," replied the baron. "I have named
 you for my choice in both these letters; but ye must get her for
 yourself, boy. I have tried, as ye see here before you, and have lost my
 life. More could no man do."
 
 By this time the wounded man began to be very weary; and Dick, putting
 the precious papers in his bosom, bade him be of good cheer, and left
 him to repose.
 
 The day was beginning to break, cold and blue, with flying squalls of
 snow. Close under the lee of the _Good Hope_, the coast lay in alternate
 rocky headlands and sandy bays; and farther inland the wooded hill-tops
 of Tunstall showed along the sky. Both the wind and the sea had gone
 down; but the vessel wallowed deep, and scarce rose upon the waves.
 
 Lawless was still fixed at the rudder; and by this time nearly all the
 men had crawled on deck, and were now gazing, with blank faces, upon the
 inhospitable coast.
 
 "Are we going ashore?" asked Dick.
 
 "Ay," said Lawless, "unless we get first to the bottom."
 
 And just then the ship rose so languidly to meet a sea, and the water
 weltered so loudly in her hold, that Dick involuntarily seized the
 steersman by the arm.
 
 "By the mass!" cried Dick, as the bows of the _Good Hope_ reappeared
 above the foam, "I thought we had foundered, indeed; my heart was at my
 throat."
 
 In the waist, Greensheve, Hawksley, and the better men of both companies
 were busy breaking up the deck to build a raft; and to these Dick joined
 himself, working the harder to drown the memory of his predicament. But,
 even as he worked, every sea that struck the poor ship, and every one of
 her dull lurches, as she tumbled wallowing among the waves, recalled him
 with a horrid pang to the immediate proximity of death.
 
 Presently, looking up from his work, he saw that they were close in
 below a promontory; a piece of ruinous cliff, against the base of which
 the sea broke white and heavy, almost overplumbed the deck; and, above
 that, again, a house appeared, crowning a down.
 
 Inside the bay the seas ran gaily, raised the _Good Hope_ upon their
 foam-flecked shoulders, carried her beyond the control of the steersman,
 and in a moment dropped her, with a great concussion, on the sand, and
 began to break over her half-mast high, and roll her to and fro. Another
 great wave followed, raised her again, and carried her yet farther in;
 and then a third succeeded, and left her far inshore of the more
 dangerous breakers, wedged upon a bank.
 
 "Now, boys," cried Lawless, "the saints have had a care of us, indeed.
 The tide ebbs; let us but sit down and drink a cup of wine, and before
 half an hour ye may all march me ashore as safe as on a bridge."
 
 A barrel was broached, and, sitting in what shelter they could find from
 the flying snow and spray, the shipwrecked company handed the cup
 around, and sought to warm their bodies and restore their spirits.
 
 Dick, meanwhile, returned to Lord Foxham, who lay in great perplexity
 and fear, the floor of his cabin washing knee-deep in water, and the
 lamp, which had been his only light, broken and extinguished by the
 violence of the blow.
 
 "My lord," said young Shelton, "fear not at all; the saints are plainly
 for us; the seas have cast us high upon a shoal, and as soon as the tide
 hath somewhat ebbed, we may walk ashore upon our feet."
 
 It was nearly an hour before the vessel was sufficiently deserted by the
 ebbing sea, and they could set forth for the land, which appeared dimly
 before them through a veil of driving snow.
 
 Upon a hillock on one side of their way a party of men lay huddled
 together, suspiciously observing the movements of the new arrivals.
 
 "They might draw near and offer us some comfort," Dick remarked.
 
 "Well, an' they come not to us, let us even turn aside to them," said
 Hawksley. "The sooner we come to a good fire and a dry bed the better
 for my poor lord."
 
 But they had not moved far in the direction of the hillock, before the
 men, with one consent, rose suddenly to their feet, and poured a flight
 of well-directed arrows on the shipwrecked company.
 
 "Back! back!" cried his lordship. "Beware, in Heaven's name, that ye
 reply not."
 
 "Nay," cried Greensheve, pulling an arrow from his leather jack. "We are
 in no posture to fight, it is certain, being drenching wet, dog-weary,
 and three-parts frozen; but for the love of old England, what aileth
 them to shoot thus cruelly on their poor country people in distress?"
 
 "They take us to be French pirates," answered Lord Foxham. "In these
 most troublesome and degenerate days we cannot keep our own shores of
 England; but our old enemies, whom we once chased on sea and land, do
 now range at pleasure, robbing and slaughtering and burning. It is the
 pity and reproach of this poor land."
 
 The men upon the hillock lay, closely observing them, while they trailed
 upward from the beach and wound inland among desolate sand-hills; for a
 mile or so they even hung upon the rear of the march, ready, at a sign,
 to pour another volley on the weary and dispirited fugitives; and it was
 only when, striking at length upon a firm highroad, Dick began to call
 his men to some more martial order, that these jealous guardians of the
 coast of England silently disappeared among the snow. They had done what
 they desired; they had protected their own homes and farms, their own
 families and cattle; and their private interest being thus secured, it
 mattered not the weight of a straw to any one of them, although the
 Frenchmen should carry blood and fire to every other parish in the realm
 of England.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IV
 
 THE DISGUISE
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 THE DEN
 
 
 The place where Dick had struck the line of a highroad was not far from
 Holywood, and within nine or ten miles of Shoreby-on-the-Till; and here,
 after making sure that they were pursued no longer, the two bodies
 separated. Lord Foxham's followers departed, carrying their wounded
 master towards the comfort and security of the great abbey; and Dick, as
 he saw them wind away and disappear in the thick curtain of the falling
 snow, was left alone with near upon a dozen outlaws, the last remainder
 of his troop of volunteers.
 
 Some were wounded; one and all were furious at their ill-success and
 long exposure; and though they were now too cold and hungry to do more,
 they grumbled and cast sullen looks upon their leaders. Dick emptied his
 purse among them, leaving himself nothing; thanked them for the courage
 they had displayed, though he could have found it more readily in his
 heart to rate them for poltroonery; and having thus somewhat softened
 the effect of his prolonged misfortune, despatched them to find their
 way, either severally or in pairs, to Shoreby and the Goat and Bagpipes.
 
 For his own part, influenced by what he had seen on board of the _Good
 Hope_, he chose Lawless to be his companion on the walk. The snow was
 falling, without pause or variation, in one even, blinding cloud; the
 wind had been strangled, and now blew no longer; and the whole world was
 blotted out and sheeted down below that silent inundation. There was
 great danger of wandering by the way and perishing in drifts; and
 Lawless, keeping half a step in front of his companion, and holding his
 head forward like a hunting dog upon the scent, inquired his way of
 every tree, and studied out their path as though he were conning a ship
 among dangers.
 
 About a mile into the forest they came to a place where several ways
 met, under a grove of lofty and contorted oaks. Even in the narrow
 horizon of the falling snow, it was a spot that could not fail to be
 recognised; and Lawless evidently recognised it with particular delight.
 
 "Now, Master Richard," said he, "an y'are not too proud to be the guest
 of a man who is neither a gentleman by birth nor so much as a good
 Christian, I can offer you a cup of wine and a good fire to melt the
 marrow in your frozen bones."
 
 "Lead on, Will," answered Dick. "A cup of wine and a good fire! Nay, I
 would go a far way round to see them."
 
 Lawless turned aside under the bare branches of the grove, and, walking
 resolutely forward for some time, came to a steepish hollow or den, that
 had now drifted a quarter full of snow. On the verge, a great beech-tree
 hung, precariously rooted; and here the old outlaw, pulling aside some
 bushy underwood, bodily disappeared into the earth.
 
 [Illustration: _And Lawless, keeping half a step in front of his
 companion and holding his head forward like a hunting-dog upon the
 scent, ... studied out their path_]
 
 The beech had, in some violent gale, been half uprooted, and had torn
 up a considerable stretch of turf; and it was under this that old
 Lawless had dug out his forest hiding-place. The roots served him for
 rafters, the turf was his thatch; for walls and floor he had his mother
 the earth. Rude as it was, the hearth in one corner, blackened by fire,
 and the presence in another of a large oaken chest well fortified with
 iron, showed it at one glance to be the den of a man, and not the burrow
 of a digging beast.
 
 Though the snow had drifted at the mouth and sifted in upon the floor of
 this earth cavern, yet was the air much warmer than without; and when
 Lawless had struck a spark, and the dry furze bushes had begun to blaze
 and crackle on the hearth, the place assumed, even to the eye, an air of
 comfort and of home.
 
 With a sigh of great contentment, Lawless spread his broad hands before
 the fire, and seemed to breathe the smoke.
 
 "Here, then," he said, "is this old Lawless's rabbit-hole; pray Heaven
 there come no terrier! Far I have rolled hither and thither, and here
 and about, since that I was fourteen years of mine age and first ran
 away from mine abbey, with the sacrist's gold chain and a mass-book that
 I sold for four marks. I have been in England and France and Burgundy,
 and in Spain, too, on a pilgrimage for my poor soul; and upon the sea,
 which is no man's country. But here is my place, Master Shelton. This is
 my native land, this burrow in the earth! Come rain or wind--and whether
 it's April, and the birds all sing, and the blossoms fall about my
 bed--or whether it's winter, and I sit alone with my good gossip the
 fire, and robin redbreast twitters in the woods--here, is my church and
 market, and my wife and child. It's here I come back to, and it's here,
 so please the saints, that I would like to die."
 
 "'Tis a warm corner, to be sure," replied Dick, "and a pleasant, and a
 well hid."
 
 "It had need to be," returned Lawless, "for an they found it, Master
 Shelton, it would break my heart. But here," he added, burrowing with
 his stout fingers in the sandy floor, "here is my wine cellar; and ye
 shall have a flask of excellent strong stingo."
 
 Sure enough, after but a little digging, he produced a big leathern
 bottle of about a gallon, nearly three-parts full of a very heady and
 sweet wine; and when they had drunk to each other comradely, and the
 fire had been replenished and blazed up again, the pair lay at full
 length, thawing and steaming, and divinely warm.
 
 "Master Shelton," observed the outlaw, "y' 'ave had two mischances this
 last while, and y'are like to lose the maid--do I take it aright?"
 
 "Aright!" returned Dick, nodding his head.
 
 "Well, now," continued Lawless, "hear an old fool that hath been
 nigh-hand everything, and seen nigh-hand all! Ye go too much on other
 people's errands, Master Dick. Ye go on Ellis's; but he desireth rather
 the death of Sir Daniel. Ye go on Lord Foxham's; well--the saints
 preserve him!--doubtless he meaneth well. But go ye upon your own, good
 Dick. Come right to the maid's side. Court her, lest that she forget
 you. Be ready; and when the chance shall come, off with her at the
 saddle-bow."
 
 "Ay, but, Lawless, beyond doubt she is now in Sir Daniel's own mansion,"
 answered Dick.
 
 "Thither, then, go we," replied the outlaw.
 
 Dick stared at him.
 
 "Nay, I mean it," nodded Lawless. "And if y'are of so little faith, and
 stumble at a word, see here!"
 
 And the outlaw, taking a key from about his neck, opened the oak chest,
 and dipping and groping deep among its contents, produced first a
 friar's robe, and next a girdle of rope; and then a huge rosary of wood,
 heavy enough to be counted as a weapon.
 
 "Here," he said, "is for you. On with them!"
 
 And then, when Dick had clothed himself in this clerical disguise,
 Lawless produced some colours and a pencil, and proceeded, with the
 greatest cunning, to disguise his face. The eyebrows he thickened and
 produced; to the moustache, which was yet hardly visible, he rendered a
 little service; while, by a few lines around the eye, he changed the
 expression and increased the apparent age of this young monk.
 
 "Now," he resumed, "when I have done the like, we shall make as bonny a
 pair of friars as the eye could wish. Boldly to Sir Daniel's we shall
 go, and there be hospitably welcome for the love of Mother Church."
 
 "And how, dear Lawless," cried the lad, "shall I repay you?"
 
 "Tut, brother," replied the outlaw, "I do naught but for my pleasure.
 Mind not for me. I am one, by the mass, that mindeth for himself. When
 that I lack, I have a long tongue and a voice like the monastery
 bell--I do ask, my son; and where asking faileth, I do most usually
 take."
 
 The old rogue made a humorous grimace; and although Dick was displeased
 to lie under so great favours to so equivocal a personage, he was yet
 unable to restrain his mirth.
 
 With that, Lawless returned to the big chest, and was soon similarly
 disguised; but, below his gown, Dick wondered to observe him conceal a
 sheaf of black arrows.
 
 "Wherefore do ye that?" asked the lad. "Wherefore arrows, when ye take
 no bow?"
 
 "Nay," replied Lawless, lightly, "'tis like there will be heads
 broke--not to say backs--ere you and I win sound from where we're going
 to; and if any fall, I would our fellowship should come by the credit
 on't. A black arrow, Master Dick, is the seal of our abbey; it showeth
 you who writ the bill."
 
 "An ye prepare so carefully," said Dick, "I have here some papers that,
 for mine own sake, and the interest of those that trusted me, were
 better left behind than found upon my body. Where shall I conceal them,
 Will?"
 
 "Nay," replied Lawless, "I will go forth into the wood and whistle me
 three verses of a song; meanwhile, do you bury them where ye please, and
 smooth the sand upon the place."
 
 "Never!" cried Richard. "I trust you, man. I were base indeed if I not
 trusted you."
 
 "Brother, y'are but a child," replied the old outlaw, pausing and
 turning his face upon Dick from the threshold of the den. "I am a kind
 old Christian, and no traitor to men's blood, and no sparer of mine own
 in a friend's jeopardy. But, fool, child, I am a thief by trade and
 birth and habit. If my bottle were empty and my mouth dry, I would rob
 you, dear child, as sure as I love, honour, and admire your parts and
 person! Can it be clearer spoken? No."
 
 And he stumped forth through the bushes with a snap of his big fingers.
 
 Dick, thus left alone, after a wondering thought upon the
 inconsistencies of his companion's character, hastily produced,
 reviewed, and buried his papers. One only he reserved to carry along
 with him, since it in nowise compromised his friends, and yet might
 serve him, in a pinch, against Sir Daniel. That was the knight's own
 letter to Lord Wensleydale, sent by Throgmorton, on the morrow of the
 defeat at Risingham, and found next day by Dick upon the body of the
 messenger.
 
 Then, treading down the embers of the fire, Dick left the den, and
 rejoined the old outlaw, who stood awaiting him under the leafless oaks,
 and was already beginning to be powdered by the falling snow. Each
 looked upon the other, and each laughed, so thorough and so droll was
 the disguise.
 
 "Yet I would it were but summer and a clear day," grumbled the outlaw,
 "that I might see myself in the mirror of a pool. There be many of Sir
 Daniel's men that know me; and if we fell to be recognised, there might
 be two words for you, brother, but as for me, in a paternoster while, I
 should be kicking in a rope's-end."
 
 Thus they set forth together along the road to Shoreby, which, in this
 part of its course, kept near along the margin of the forest, coming
 forth, from time to time, in the open country, and passing beside poor
 folks' houses and small farms.
 
 Presently at sight of one of these, Lawless pulled up.
 
 "Brother Martin," he said, in a voice capitally disguised, and suited to
 his monkish robe, "let us enter and seek alms from these poor sinners.
 _Pax vobiscum!_ Ay," he added, in his own voice, "'tis as I feared; I
 have somewhat lost the whine of it; and by your leave, good Master
 Shelton, ye must suffer me to practise in these country places, before
 that I risk my fat neck by entering Sir Daniel's. But look ye a little,
 what an excellent thing it is to be a Jack-of-all-trades! An I had not
 been a shipman, ye had infallibly gone down in the _Good Hope_; an I had
 not been a thief, I could not have painted me your face; and but that I
 had been a Grey Friar, and sung loud in the choir, and ate hearty at the
 board, I could not have carried this disguise, but the very dogs would
 have spied us out and barked at us for shams."
 
 He was by this time close to the window of the farm, and he rose on his
 tip-toes and peeped in.
 
 "Nay," he cried, "better and better. We shall here try our false faces
 with a vengeance, and have a merry jest on Brother Capper to boot."
 
 And so saying, he opened the door and led the way into the house.
 
 Three of their own company sat at the table, greedily eating. Their
 daggers, stuck beside them in the board, and the black and menacing
 looks which they continued to shower upon the people of the house,
 proved that they owed their entertainment rather to force than favour.
 On the two monks, who now, with a sort of humble dignity, entered the
 kitchen of the farm, they seemed to turn with a particular resentment;
 and one--it was John Capper in person--who seemed to play the leading
 part, instantly and rudely ordered them away.
 
 "We want no beggars here!" he cried.
 
 But another--although he was as far from recognising Dick and
 Lawless--inclined to more moderate counsels.
 
 "Not so," he cried. "We be strong men, and take; these be weak, and
 crave; but in the latter end these shall be uppermost and we below. Mind
 him not, my father; but come, drink of my cup, and give me a
 benediction."
 
 "Y'are men of a light mind, carnal, and accursed," said the monk. "Now,
 may the saints forbid that ever I should drink with such companions! But
 here, for the pity I bear to sinners, here I do leave you a blessed
 relic, the which, for your souls' interest, I bid you kiss and cherish."
 
 So far Lawless thundered upon them like a preaching friar; but with
 these words he drew from under his robe a black arrow, tossed it on the
 board in front of the three startled outlaws, turned in the same
 instant, and, taking Dick along with him, was out of the room and out of
 sight among the falling snow before they had time to utter a word or
 move a finger.
 
 "So," he said, "we have proved our false faces, Master Shelton. I will
 now adventure my poor carcase where ye please."
 
 "Good!" returned Richard. "It irks me to be doing. Set we on for
 Shoreby!"
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 "IN MINE ENEMIES' HOUSE"
 
 
 Sir Daniel's residence in Shoreby was a tall, commodious, plastered
 mansion, framed in carven oak, and covered by a low-pitched roof of
 thatch. To the back there stretched a garden, full of fruit-trees,
 alleys, and thick arbours, and overlooked from the far end by the tower
 of the abbey church.
 
 The house might contain, upon a pinch, the retinue of a greater person
 than Sir Daniel; but even now it was filled with hubbub. The court rang
 with arms and horseshoe-iron; the kitchens roared with cookery like a
 bees'-hive; minstrels, and the players of instruments, and the cries of
 tumblers, sounded from the hall. Sir Daniel, in his profusion, in the
 gaiety and gallantry of his establishment, rivalled with Lord Shoreby,
 and eclipsed Lord Risingham.
 
 All guests were made welcome. Minstrels, tumblers, players of chess, the
 sellers of relics, medicines, perfumes, and enchantments, and along with
 these every sort of priest, friar, or pilgrim, were made welcome to the
 lower table, and slept together in the ample lofts, or on the bare
 boards of the long dining-hall.
 
 On the afternoon following the wreck of the _Good Hope_, the buttery,
 the kitchens, the stables, the covered cartshed that surrounded two
 sides of the court, were all crowded by idle people, partly belonging to
 Sir Daniel's establishment, and attired in his livery of murrey and
 blue, partly nondescript strangers attracted to the town by greed, and
 received by the knight through policy, and because it was the fashion of
 the time.
 
 The snow, which still fell without interruption, the extreme chill of
 the air, and the approach of night, combined to keep them under shelter.
 Wine, ale, and money were all plentiful; many sprawled gambling in the
 straw of the barn, many were still drunken from the noontide meal. To
 the eye of a modern it would have looked like the sack of a city; to the
 eye of a contemporary it was like any other rich and noble household at
 a festive season.
 
 Two monks--a young and an old--had arrived late, and were now warming
 themselves at a bonfire in a corner of the shed. A mixed crowd
 surrounded them--jugglers, mountebanks, and soldiers; and with these the
 elder of the two had soon engaged so brisk a conversation, and exchanged
 so many loud guffaws and country witticisms, that the group momentarily
 increased in number.
 
 The younger companion, in whom the reader has already recognised Dick
 Shelton, sat from the first somewhat backward, and gradually drew
 himself away. He listened, indeed, closely, but he opened not his mouth;
 and by the grave expression of his countenance, he made but little
 account of his companion's pleasantries.
 
 At last his eye, which travelled continually to and fro, and kept a
 guard upon all the entrances of the house, lit upon a little procession
 entering by the main gate and crossing the court in an oblique
 direction. Two ladies, muffled in thick furs, led the way, and were
 followed by a pair of waiting-women and four stout men-at-arms. The next
 moment they had disappeared within the house; and Dick, slipping through
 the crowd of loiterers in the shed, was already giving hot pursuit.
 
 "The taller of these twain was Lady Brackley," he thought; "and where
 Lady Brackley is, Joan will not be far."
 
 At the door of the house the four men-at-arms had ceased to follow, and
 the ladies were now mounting the stairway of polished oak, under no
 better escort than that of the two waiting-women. Dick followed close
 behind. It was already the dusk of the day; and in the house the
 darkness of the night had almost come. On the stair-landings, torches
 flared in iron holders; down the long, tapestried corridors, a lamp
 burned by every door. And where the door stood open, Dick could look in
 upon arras-covered walls and rush-bescattered floors, glowing in the
 light of the wood fires.
 
 Two floors were passed, and at every landing the younger and shorter of
 the two ladies had looked back keenly at the monk. He, keeping his eyes
 lowered, and affecting the demure manners that suited his disguise, had
 but seen her once, and was unaware that he had attracted her attention.
 And now, on the third floor, the party separated, the younger lady
 continuing to ascend alone, the other, followed by the Waiting-maids,
 descending the corridor to the right.
 
 Dick mounted with a swift foot, and holding to the corner, thrust forth
 his head and followed the three women with his eyes. Without turning or
 looking behind them, they continued to descend the corridor.
 
 "It is right well," thought Dick. "Let me but know my Lady Brackley's
 chamber, and it will go hard an I find not Dame Hatch upon an errand."
 
 And just then a hand was laid upon his shoulder, and, with a bound and a
 choked cry, he turned to grapple his assailant.
 
 He was somewhat abashed to find, in the person whom he had so roughly
 seized, the short young lady in the furs. She, on her part, was shocked
 and terrified beyond expression, and hung trembling in his grasp.
 
 "Madam," said Dick, releasing her, "I cry you a thousand pardons; but I
 have no eyes behind, and, by the mass, I could not tell ye were a maid."
 
 The girl continued to look at him, but, by this time, terror began to be
 succeeded by surprise, and surprise by suspicion. Dick, who could read
 these changes on her face, became alarmed for his own safety in that
 hostile house.
 
 "Fair maid," he said, affecting easiness, "suffer me to kiss your hand,
 in token ye forgive my roughness, and I will even go."
 
 "Y'are a strange monk, young sir," returned the young lady, looking him
 both boldly and shrewdly in the face; "and now that my first
 astonishment hath somewhat passed away, I can spy the layman in each
 word you utter. What do ye here? Why are ye thus sacrilegiously tricked
 out? Come ye in peace or war? And why spy ye after Lady Brackley like a
 thief?"
 
 "Madam," quoth Dick, "of one thing I pray you to be very sure: I am no
 thief. And even if I come here in war, as in some degree I do, I make no
 war upon fair maids, and I hereby entreat them to copy me so far, and to
 leave me be. For, indeed, fair mistress, cry out--if such be your
 pleasure--cry but once, and say what ye have seen, and the poor
 gentleman before you is merely a dead man. I cannot think ye would be
 cruel," added Dick; and taking the girl's hand gently in both of his, he
 looked at her with courteous admiration.
 
 "Are ye, then, a spy--a Yorkist?" asked the maid.
 
 "Madam," he replied, "I am indeed a Yorkist, and, in some sort, a spy.
 But that which bringeth me into this house, the same which will win for
 me the pity and interest of your kind heart, is neither of York nor
 Lancaster. I will wholly put my life in your discretion. I am a lover,
 and my name----"
 
 But here the young lady clapped her hand suddenly upon Dick's mouth,
 looked hastily up and down and east and west, and, seeing the coast
 clear, began to drag the young man, with great strength and vehemence,
 up-stairs.
 
 "Hush!" she said, "and come! Shalt talk hereafter."
 
 Somewhat bewildered, Dick suffered himself to be pulled up-stairs,
 bustled along a corridor, and thrust suddenly into a chamber, lit, like
 so many of the others, by a blazing log upon the hearth.
 
 "Now," said the young lady, forcing him down upon a stool, "sit ye there
 and attend my sovereign good pleasure. I have life and death over you,
 and I will not scruple to abuse my power. Look to yourself; y' 'ave
 cruelly mauled my arm. He knew not I was a maid, quoth he! Had he known
 I was a maid, he had ta'en his belt to me, forsooth!"
 
 And with these words, she whipped out of the room and left Dick gaping
 with wonder, and not very sure if he were dreaming or awake.
 
 "Ta'en my belt to her!" he repeated. "Ta'en my belt to her!" And the
 recollection of that evening in the forest flowed back upon his mind,
 and he once more saw Matcham's wincing body and beseeching eyes.
 
 And then he was recalled to the dangers of the present. In the next room
 he heard a stir, as of a person moving; then followed a sigh, which
 sounded strangely near; and then the rustle of skirts and tap of feet
 once more began. As he stood hearkening, he saw the arras wave along the
 wall; there was the sound of a door being opened, the hangings divided,
 and, lamp in hand, Joanna Sedley entered the apartment.
 
 She was attired in costly stuffs of deep and warm colours, such as befit
 the winter and the snow. Upon her head, her hair had been gathered
 together and became her as a crown. And she, who had seemed so little
 and so awkward in the attire of Matcham, was now tall like a young
 willow, and swam across the floor as though she scorned the drudgery of
 walking.
 
 Without a start, without a tremor, she raised her lamp and looked at the
 young monk.
 
 "What make ye here, good brother?" she inquired. "Ye are doubtless
 ill-directed. Whom do ye require?" And she set her lamp upon the
 bracket.
 
 "Joanna," said Dick; and then his voice failed him. "Joanna," he began
 again, "ye said ye loved me; and the more fool I, but I believed it!"
 
 "Dick!" she cried. "Dick!"
 
 And then, to the wonder of the lad, this beautiful and tall young lady
 made but one step of it, and threw her arms about his neck and gave him
 a hundred kisses all in one.
 
 "Oh, the fool fellow!" she cried. "Oh, dear Dick! Oh, if ye could see
 yourself! Alack!" she added, pausing. "I have spoilt you, Dick! I have
 knocked some of the paint off. But that can be mended. What cannot be
 mended, Dick--or I much fear it cannot!--is my marriage with Lord
 Shoreby."
 
 "Is it decided, then?" asked the lad.
 
 "To-morrow, before noon, Dick, in the abbey church," she answered, "John
 Matcham and Joanna Sedley both shall come to a right miserable end.
 There is no help in tears, or I could weep mine eyes out. I have not
 spared myself to pray, but Heaven frowns on my petition. And, dear
 Dick--good Dick--but that ye can get me forth of this house before the
 morning, we must even kiss and say good-bye."
 
 "Nay," said Dick, "not I; I will never say that word. 'Tis like despair;
 but while there's life, Joanna, there is hope. Yet will I hope. Ay, by
 the mass, and triumph! Look ye, now, when ye were but a name to me, did
 I not follow--did I not rouse good men--did I not stake my life upon the
 quarrel? And now that I have seen you for what ye are--the fairest maid
 and stateliest of England--think ye I would turn?--if the deep sea were
 there, I would straight through it; if the way were full of lions, I
 would scatter them like mice."
 
 "Ay," she said, drily, "ye make a great ado about a sky-blue robe!"
 
 "Nay, Joan," protested Dick, "'tis not alone the robe. But, lass, ye
 were disguised. Here am I disguised; and, to the proof, do I not cut a
 figure of fun--a right fool's figure?"
 
 "Ay, Dick, an' that ye do!" she answered, smiling.
 
 "Well, then!" he returned, triumphant. "So was it with you, poor
 Matcham, in the forest. In sooth, ye were a wench to laugh at. But now!"
 
 So they ran on, holding each other by both hands, exchanging smiles and
 lovely looks, and melting minutes into seconds; and so they might have
 continued all night long. But presently there was a noise behind them;
 and they were aware of the short young lady, with her finger on her
 lips.
 
 "Saints!" she cried, "but what a noise ye keep! Can ye not speak in
 compass? And now, Joanna, my fair maid of the woods, what will ye give
 your gossip for bringing you your sweetheart?"
 
 Joanna ran to her, by way of answer, and embraced her fierily.
 
 "And you, sir," added the young lady, "what do ye give me?"
 
 "Madam," said Dick, "I would fain offer to pay you in the same money."
 "Come, then," said the lady, "it is permitted you."
 
 But Dick, blushing like a peony, only kissed her hand.
 
 "What ails ye at my face, fair sir?" she inquired, curtseying to the
 very ground; and then, when Dick had at length and most tepidly embraced
 her, "Joanna," she added, "your sweetheart is very backwards under your
 eyes; but I warrant you, when first we met, he was more ready. I am all
 black and blue, wench; trust me never, if I be not black and blue! And
 now," she continued, "have ye said your sayings? for I must speedily
 dismiss the paladin."
 
 But at this they both cried out that they had said nothing, that the
 night was still very young, and that they would not be separated so
 early.
 
 "And supper?" asked the young lady. "Must we not go down to supper?"
 
 "Nay, to be sure!" cried Joan. "I had forgotten."
 
 "Hide me, then," said Dick, "put me behind the arras, shut me in a
 chest, or what ye will, so that I may be here on your return. Indeed,
 fair lady," he added, "bear this in mind, that we are sore bested, and
 may never look upon each other's face from this night forward till we
 die."
 
 At this the young lady melted; and when, a little after, the bell
 summoned Sir Daniel's household to the board, Dick was planted very
 stiffly against the wall, at a place where a division in the tapestry
 permitted him to breathe the more freely, and even to see into the room.
 
 He had not been long in this position, when he was somewhat strangely
 disturbed. The silence in that upper storey of the house, was only
 broken by the flickering of the flames and the hissing of a green log
 in the chimney; but presently, to Dick's strained hearing, there came
 the sound of some one walking with extreme precaution; and soon after
 the door opened, and a little black-faced, dwarfish fellow, in Lord
 Shoreby's colours, pushed first his head, and then his crooked body,
 into the chamber. His mouth was open, as though to hear the better; and
 his eyes, which were very bright, flitted restlessly and swiftly to and
 fro. He went round and round the room, striking here and there upon the
 hangings; but Dick, by a miracle, escaped his notice. Then he looked
 below the furniture, and examined the lamp; and, at last, with an air of
 cruel disappointment, was preparing to go away as silently as he had
 come, when down he dropped upon his knees, picked up something from
 among the rushes on the floor, examined it, and, with every signal of
 delight, concealed it in the wallet at his belt.
 
 Dick's heart sank, for the object in question was a tassel from his own
 girdle; and it was plain to him that this dwarfish spy, who took a
 malign delight in his employment, would lose no time in bearing it to
 his master, the baron. He was half tempted to throw aside the arras,
 fall upon the scoundrel, and, at the risk of his life, remove the
 tell-tale token. And while he was still hesitating, a new cause of
 concern was added. A voice, hoarse and broken by drink, began to be
 audible from the stair; and presently after, uneven, wandering, and
 heavy footsteps sounded without along the passage.
 
 "What make ye here, my merry men, among the greenwood shaws?" sang the
 voice. "What make ye here? Hey! sots, what make ye here?" it added,
 with a rattle of drunken laughter; and then, once more breaking into
 song:
 
     "If ye should drink the clary wine,
      Fat Friar John, ye friend o' mine--
      If I should eat, and ye should drink,
      Who shall sing the mass, d'ye think?"
 
 Lawless, alas! rolling drunk, was wandering the house, seeking for a
 corner wherein to slumber off the effect of his potations. Dick inwardly
 raged. The spy, at first terrified, had grown reassured as he found he
 had to deal with an intoxicated man, and now, with a movement of
 cat-like rapidity, slipped from the chamber, and was gone from Richard's
 eyes.
 
 What was to be done? If he lost touch of Lawless for the night, he was
 left impotent, whether to plan or carry forth Joanna's rescue. If, on
 the other hand, he dared to address the drunken outlaw, the spy might
 still be lingering within sight, and the most fatal consequences ensue.
 
 It was, nevertheless, upon this last hazard that Dick decided. Slipping
 from behind the tapestry, he stood ready in the doorway of the chamber,
 with a warning hand upraised. Lawless, flushed crimson, with his eyes
 injected, vacillating on his feet, drew still unsteadily nearer. At last
 he hazily caught sight of his commander, and, in despite of Dick's
 imperious signals, hailed him instantly and loudly by his name.
 
 Dick leaped upon and shook the drunkard furiously.
 
 "Beast!" he hissed--"beast and no man! It is worse than treachery to be
 so witless. We may all be shent for thy sotting."
 
 But Lawless only laughed and staggered, and tried to clap young Shelton
 on the back.
 
 And just then Dick's quick ear caught a rapid brushing in the arras. He
 leaped towards the sound, and the next moment a piece of the
 wall-hanging had been torn down, and Dick and the spy were sprawling
 together in its folds. Over and over they rolled, grappling for each
 other's throat, and still baffled by the arras, and still silent in
 their deadly fury. But Dick was by much the stronger, and soon the spy
 lay prostrate under his knee, and, with a single stroke of the long
 poniard, ceased to breathe.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 THE DEAD SPY
 
 
 Throughout this furious and rapid passage, Lawless had looked on
 helplessly, and even when all was over, and Dick, already re-arisen to
 his feet, was listening with the most passionate attention to the
 distant bustle in the lower storeys of the house, the old outlaw was
 still wavering on his legs like a shrub in a breeze of wind, and still
 stupidly staring on the face of the dead man.
 
 "It is well," said Dick, at length; "they have not heard us, praise the
 saints! But, now, what shall I do with this poor spy? At least, I will
 take my tassel from his wallet."
 
 So saying, Dick opened the wallet; within he found a few pieces of
 money, the tassel, and a letter addressed to Lord Wensleydale, and
 sealed with my Lord Shoreby's seal. The name awoke Dick's recollection;
 and he instantly broke the wax and read the contents of the letter. It
 was short, but, to Dick's delight, it gave evident proof that Lord
 Shoreby was treacherously corresponding with the House of York.
 
 The young fellow usually carried his ink-horn and implements about him,
 and so now, bending a knee beside the body of the dead spy, he was able
 to write these words upon a corner of the paper:
 
      My Lord of Shoreby, ye that writt the letter, wot ye why your man
      is ded? But let me rede you, marry not.
 
                                                         JON AMEND-ALL.
 
 He laid this paper on the breast of the corpse; and then Lawless, who
 had been looking on upon these last manoeuvres with some flickering
 returns of intelligence, suddenly drew a black arrow from below his
 robe, and therewith pinned the paper in its place. The sight of this
 disrespect, or, as it almost seemed, cruelty to the dead, drew a cry of
 horror from young Shelton; but the old outlaw only laughed.
 
 "Nay, I will have the credit for mine order," he hiccupped. "My jolly
 boys must have the credit on't--the credit, brother"; and then, shutting
 his eyes tight and opening his mouth like a precentor, he began to
 thunder, in a formidable voice:
 
     "If ye should drink the clary wine"--
 
 "Peace, sot!" cried Dick, and thrust him hard against the wall. "In two
 words--if so be that such a man can understand me who hath more wine
 than wit in him--in two words, and, a-Mary's name, begone out of this
 house, where, if ye continue to abide, ye will not only hang yourself,
 but me also! Faith, then, up foot! be yare, or, by the mass, I may
 forget that I am in some sort your captain and in some your debtor! Go!"
 
 The sham monk was now, in some degree, recovering the use of his
 intelligence; and the ring in Dick's voice, and the glitter in Dick's
 eye, stamped home the meaning of his words.
 
 "By the mass," cried Lawless, "an I be not wanted, I can go"; and he
 turned tipsily along the corridor and proceeded to flounder down-stairs,
 lurching against the wall.
 
 So soon as he was out of sight, Dick returned to his hiding-place,
 resolutely fixed to see the matter out. Wisdom, indeed, moved him to be
 gone; but love and curiosity were stronger.
 
 Time passed slowly for the young man, bolt upright behind the arras. The
 fire in the room began to die down, and the lamp to burn low and to
 smoke. And still there was no word of the return of any one to these
 upper quarters of the house; still the faint hum and clatter of the
 supper party sounded from far below; and still, under the thick fall of
 the snow, Shoreby town lay silent upon every side.
 
 At length, however, feet and voices began to draw near upon the stair;
 and presently after several of Sir Daniel's guests arrived upon the
 landing, and, turning down the corridor, beheld the torn arras and the
 body of the spy.
 
 Some ran forward and some back, and all together began to cry aloud.
 
 At the sound of their cries, guests, men-at-arms, ladies, servants, and,
 in a word, all the inhabitants of that great house, came flying from
 every direction, and began to join their voices to the tumult.
 
 Soon a way was cleared, and Sir Daniel came forth in person, followed by
 the bridegroom of the morrow, my Lord Shoreby.
 
 "My lord," said Sir Daniel, "have I not told you of this knave Black
 Arrow? To the proof, behold it! There it stands, and, by the rood, my
 gossip, in a man of yours, or one that stole your colours!"
 
 "In good sooth, it was a man of mine," replied Lord Shoreby, hanging
 back. "I would I had more such. He was keen as a beagle and secret as a
 mole."
 
 "Ay, gossip, truly?" asked Sir Daniel, keenly. "And what came he
 smelling up so many stairs in my poor mansion? But he will smell no
 more."
 
 "An't please you, Sir Daniel," said one, "here is a paper written upon
 with some matter, pinned upon his breast."
 
 "Give it me, arrow and all," said the knight. And when he had taken into
 his hand the shaft, he continued for some time to gaze upon it in a
 sullen musing. "Ay," he said, addressing Lord Shoreby, "here is a hate
 that followeth hard and close upon my heels. This black stick, or its
 just likeness, shall yet bring me down. And, gossip, suffer a plain
 knight to counsel you; and if these hounds begin to wind you, flee! 'Tis
 like a sickness--it still hangeth, hangeth upon the limbs. But let us
 see what they have written. It is as I thought, my lord; y'are marked,
 like an old oak, by the woodman; to-morrow or next day, by will come the
 axe. But what wrote ye in a letter?"
 
 Lord Shoreby snatched the paper from the arrow, read it, crumpled it
 between his hands, and overcoming the reluctance which had hitherto
 withheld him from approaching, threw himself on his knees beside the
 body and eagerly groped in the wallet.
 
 He rose to his feet with a somewhat unsettled countenance.
 
 "Gossip," he said, "I have indeed lost a letter here that much imported;
 and could I lay my hand upon the knave that took it, he should
 incontinently grace a halter. But let us, first of all, secure the
 issues of the house. Here is enough harm already, by St. George!"
 
 Sentinels were posted close around the house and garden; a sentinel on
 every landing of the stair, a whole troop in the main entrance-hall; and
 yet another about the bonfire in the shed. Sir Daniel's followers were
 supplemented by Lord Shoreby's; there was thus no lack of men or weapons
 to make the house secure, or to entrap a lurking enemy, should one be
 there.
 
 Meanwhile, the body of the spy was carried out through the falling snow
 and deposited in the abbey church.
 
 It was not until these dispositions had been taken, and all had returned
 to a decorous silence, that the two girls drew Richard Shelton from his
 place of concealment, and made a full report to him of what had passed.
 He, upon his side, recounted the visit of the spy, his dangerous
 discovery, and speedy end.
 
 Joanna leaned back very faint against the curtained wall.
 
 "It will avail but little," she said. "I shall be wed to-morrow, in the
 morning, after all!"
 
 "What!" cried her friend. "And here is our paladin that driveth lions
 like mice! Ye have little faith, of a surety. But come, friend
 lion-driver, give us some comfort; speak, and let us hear bold
 counsels."
 
 Dick was confounded to be thus outfaced with his own exaggerated words;
 but though he coloured, he still spoke stoutly.
 
 "Truly," said he, "we are in straits. Yet, could I but win out of this
 house for half an hour, I do honestly tell myself that all might still
 go well; and for the marriage, it should be prevented."
 
 "And for the lions," mimicked the girl, "they shall be driven."
 
 "I crave your excuse," said Dick. "I speak not now in any boasting
 humour, but rather as one inquiring after help or counsel; for if I get
 not forth of this house and through these sentinels, I can do less than
 naught. Take me, I pray you, rightly."
 
 "Why said ye he was rustic, Joan?" the girl inquired. "I warrant he hath
 a tongue in his head; ready, soft, and bold is his speech at pleasure.
 What would ye more?"
 
 "Nay," sighed Joanna, with a smile, "they have changed me my friend
 Dick, 'tis sure enough. When I beheld him, he was rough indeed. But it
 matters little; there is no help for my hard case, and I must still be
 Lady Shoreby!"
 
 "Nay, then," said Dick, "I will even make the adventure. A friar is not
 much regarded; and if I found a good fairy to lead me up, I may find
 another belike to carry me down. How call they the name of this spy?"
 
 "Rutter," said the young lady; "and an excellent good name to call him
 by. But how mean ye, lion-driver? What is in your mind to do?"
 
 "To offer boldly to go forth," returned Dick; "and if any stop me, to
 keep an unchanged countenance, and say I go to pray for Rutter. They
 will be praying over his poor clay even now."
 
 "The device is somewhat simple," replied the girl, "yet it may hold."
 
 "Nay," said young Shelton, "it is no device, but mere boldness, which
 serveth often better in great straits."
 
 "Ye say true," she said. "Well, go, a-Mary's name, and may Heaven speed
 you! Ye leave here a poor maid that loves you entirely, and another that
 is most heartily your friend. Be wary, for their sakes, and make not
 shipwreck of your safety."
 
 "Ay," added Joanna, "go, Dick. Ye run no more peril, whether ye go or
 stay. Go; ye take my heart with you; the saints defend you!"
 
 Dick passed the first sentry with so assured a countenance that the
 fellow merely fidgeted and stared; but at the second landing the man
 carried his spear across and bade him name his business.
 
 "_Pax vobiscum,_" answered Dick. "I go to pray over the body of this
 poor Rutter."
 
 "Like enough," returned the sentry; "but to go alone is not permitted
 you." He leaned over the oaken balusters and whistled shrill. "One
 cometh!" he cried; and then motioned Dick to pass.
 
 At the foot of the stair he found the guard afoot and awaiting his
 arrival; and when he had once more repeated his story, the commander of
 the post ordered four men out to accompany him to the church.
 
 "Let him not slip, my lads," he said. "Bring him to Sir Oliver, on your
 lives!"
 
 The door was then opened; one of the men took Dick by either arm,
 another marched ahead with a link, and the fourth, with bent bow and the
 arrow on the string, brought up the rear. In this order they proceeded
 through the garden, under the thick darkness of the night and the
 scattering snow, and drew near to the dimly illuminated windows of the
 abbey church.
 
 At the western portal a picket of archers stood, taking what shelter
 they could find in the hollow of the arched doorways, and all powdered
 with the snow; and it was not until Dick's conductors had exchanged a
 word with these, that they were suffered to pass forth and enter the
 nave of the sacred edifice.
 
 The church was doubtfully lighted by the tapers upon the great altar,
 and by a lamp or two that swung from the arched roof before the private
 chapels of illustrious families. In the midst of the choir the dead spy
 lay, his limbs piously composed, upon a bier.
 
 A hurried mutter of prayer sounded along the arches; cowled figures
 knelt in the stalls of the choir, and on the steps of the high altar a
 priest in pontifical vestments celebrated mass.
 
 Upon this fresh entrance, one of the cowled figures arose, and, coming
 down the steps which elevated the level of the choir above that of the
 nave, demanded from the leader of the four men what business brought him
 to the church. Out of respect for the service and the dead, they spoke
 in guarded tones; but the echoes of that huge, empty building caught up
 their words, and hollowly repeated and repeated them along the aisles.
 
 "A monk!" returned Sir Oliver (for he it was), when he had heard the
 report of the archer. "My brother, I looked not for your coming," he
 added, turning to young Shelton. "In all civility, who are ye? and at
 whose instance do ye join your supplications to ours?"
 
 Dick, keeping his cowl about his face, signed to Sir Oliver to move a
 pace or two aside from the archers; and, so soon as the priest had done
 so, "I cannot hope to deceive you, sir," he said. "My life is in your
 hands."
 
 Sir Oliver violently started; his stout cheeks grew pale, and for a
 space he was silent.
 
 "Richard," he said, "what brings you here, I know not; but I much
 misdoubt it to be evil. Nevertheless, for the kindness that was, I would
 not willingly deliver you to harm. Ye shall sit all night beside me in
 the stalls: ye shall sit there till my Lord of Shoreby be married, and
 the party gone safe home; and if all goeth well, and ye have planned no
 evil, in the end ye shall go whither ye will. But if your purpose be
 bloody, it shall return upon your head. Amen!"
 
 And the priest devoutly crossed himself, and turned and louted to the
 altar.
 
 With that, he spoke a few words more to the soldiers, and taking Dick by
 the hand, led him up to the choir, and placed him in the stall beside
 his own, where, for mere decency, the lad had instantly to kneel and
 appear to be busy with his devotions.
 
 His mind and his eyes, however, were continually wandering. Three of the
 soldiers, he observed, instead of returning to the house, had got them
 quietly into a point of vantage in the aisle; and he could not doubt
 that they had done so by Sir Oliver's command. Here, then, he was
 trapped. Here he must spend the night in the ghostly glimmer and shadow
 of the church, and looking on the pale face of him he slew; and here, in
 the morning, he must see his sweetheart married to another man before
 his eyes.
 
 But, for all that, he obtained a command upon his mind, and built
 himself up in patience to await the issue.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 IN THE ABBEY CHURCH
 
 
 In Shoreby Abbey Church the prayers were kept up all night without
 cessation, now with the singing of psalms, now with a note or two upon
 the bell.
 
 Rutter, the spy, was nobly waked. There he lay, meanwhile, as they had
 arranged him, his dead hands crossed upon his bosom, his dead eyes
 staring on the roof; and hard by, in the stall, the lad who had slain
 him waited, in sore disquietude, the coming of the morning.
 
 Once only, in the course of the hours, Sir Oliver leaned across to his
 captive.
 
 "Richard," he whispered, "my son, if ye mean me evil, I will certify, on
 my soul's welfare, ye design upon an innocent man. Sinful in the eye of
 Heaven I do declare myself; but sinful as against you I am not, neither
 have been ever."
 
 "My father," returned Dick, in the same tone of voice, "trust me, I
 design nothing; but as for your innocence, I may not forget that ye
 cleared yourself but lamely."
 
 "A man may be innocently guilty," replied the priest. "He may be set
 blindfolded upon a mission, ignorant of its true scope. So it was with
 me. I did decoy your father to his death; but as Heaven sees us in this
 sacred place, I knew not what I did."
 
 "It may be," returned Dick. "But see what a strange web ye have woven,
 that I should be, at this hour, at once your prisoner and your judge;
 that ye should both threaten my days and deprecate my anger. Methinks,
 if ye had been all your life a true man and good priest, ye would
 neither thus fear nor thus detest me. And now to your prayers. I do obey
 you, since needs must; but I will not be burthened with your company."
 
 The priest uttered a sigh so heavy that it had almost touched the lad
 into some sentiment of pity, and he bowed his head upon his hands like a
 man borne down below a weight of care. He joined no longer in the
 psalms; but Dick could hear the beads rattle though his fingers and the
 prayers a-pattering between his teeth.
 
 Yet a little, and the grey of the morning began to struggle through the
 painted casements of the church, and to put to shame the glimmer of the
 tapers. The light slowly broadened and brightened, and presently through
 the southeastern clerestories a flush of rosy sunlight flickered on the
 walls. The storm was over; the great clouds had disburthened their snow
 and fled farther on, and the new day was breaking on a merry winter
 landscape sheathed in white.
 
 A bustle of church officers followed; the bier was carried forth to the
 deadhouse, and the stains of blood were cleansed from off the tiles,
 that no such ill-omened spectacle should disgrace the marriage of Lord
 Shoreby. At the same time, the very ecclesiastics who had been so
 dismally engaged all night began to put on morning faces, to do honour
 to the merrier ceremony which was about to follow. And further to
 announce the coming of the day, the pious of the town began to assemble
 and fall to prayer before their favourite shrines, or wait their turn at
 the confessionals.
 
 Favoured by this stir, it was of course easily possible for any man to
 avoid the vigilance of Sir Daniel's sentries at the door; and presently
 Dick, looking about him wearily, caught the eye of no less a person than
 Will Lawless, still in his monk's habit.
 
 The outlaw, at the same moment, recognised his leader, and privily
 signed to him with hand and eye.
 
 Now, Dick was far from having forgiven the old rogue his most untimely
 drunkenness, but he had no desire to involve him in his own predicament;
 and he signalled back to him, as plain as he was able, to begone.
 
 Lawless, as though he had understood, disappeared at once behind a
 pillar, and Dick breathed again.
 
 What, then, was his dismay to feel himself plucked by the sleeve and to
 find the old robber installed beside him, upon the next seat, and, to
 all appearance, plunged in his devotions!
 
 Instantly Sir Oliver arose from his place, and, gliding behind the
 stalls, made for the soldiers in the aisle. If the priest's suspicions
 had been so lightly wakened, the harm was already done, and Lawless a
 prisoner in the church.
 
 "Move not," whispered Dick. "We are in the plaguiest pass, thanks,
 before all things, to thy swinishness of yestereven. When ye saw me
 here, so strangely seated where I have neither right nor interest, what
 a murrain! could ye not smell harm and get ye gone from evil?"
 
 "Nay," returned Lawless, "I thought ye had heard from Ellis, and were
 here on duty."
 
 "Ellis!" echoed Dick. "Is Ellis, then, returned?"
 
 "For sure," replied the outlaw. "He came last night, and belted me sore
 for being in wine--so there ye are avenged, my master. A furious man is
 Ellis Duckworth! He hath ridden me hot-spur from Craven to prevent this
 marriage; and, Master Dick, ye know the way of him--do so he will!"
 
 "Nay, then," returned Dick, with composure, "you and I, my poor brother,
 are dead men; for I sit here a prisoner upon suspicion, and my neck was
 to answer for this very marriage that he purposeth to mar. I had a fair
 choice, by the rood! to lose my sweetheart or else lose my life! Well,
 the cast is thrown--it is to be my life."
 
 "By the mass," cried Lawless, half arising, "I am gone!"
 
 But Dick had his hand at once upon his shoulder.
 
 "Friend Lawless, sit ye still," he said. "An ye have eyes, look yonder
 at the corner by the chancel arch; see ye not that, even upon the motion
 of your rising, yon armed men are up and ready to intercept you? Yield
 ye, friend. Ye were bold aboard ship, when ye thought to die a
 sea-death; be bold again, now that y'are to die presently upon the
 gallows."
 
 "Master Dick," gasped Lawless, "the thing hath come upon me somewhat of
 the suddenest. But give me a moment till I fetch my breath again; and,
 by the mass, I will be as stout-hearted as yourself."
 
 "Here is my bold fellow!" returned Dick. "And yet, Lawless, it goes
 hard against the grain with me to die; but where whining mendeth
 nothing, wherefore whine?"
 
 "Nay, that indeed!" chimed Lawless. "And a fig for death, at worst! It
 has to be done, my master, soon or late. And hanging in a good quarrel
 is an easy death, they say, though I could never hear of any that came
 back to say so."
 
 And so saying, the stout old rascal leaned back in his stall, folded his
 arms, and began to look about him with the greatest air of insolence and
 unconcern.
 
 "And for the matter of that," Dick added, "it is yet our best chance to
 keep quiet. We wot not yet what Duckworth purposes; and when all is
 said, and if the worst befall, we may yet clear our feet of it."
 
 Now that they ceased talking, they were aware of a very distant and thin
 strain of mirthful music which steadily drew nearer, louder, and
 merrier. The bells in the tower began to break forth into a doubling
 peal, and a greater and greater concourse of people to crowd into the
 church, shuffling the snow from off their feet, and clapping and blowing
 in their hands. The western door was flung wide open, showing a glimpse
 of sunlit, snowy street, and admitting in a great gust the shrewd air of
 the morning; and in short, it became plain by every sign that Lord
 Shoreby desired to be married very early in the day, and that the
 wedding-train was drawing near.
 
 Some of Lord Shoreby's men now cleared a passage down the middle aisle,
 forcing the people back with lance-stocks; and just then, outside the
 portal, the secular musicians could be descried drawing near over the
 frozen snow, the fifers and trumpeters scarlet in the face with lusty
 blowing, the drummers and the cymbalists beating as for a wager.
 
 These, as they drew near the door of the sacred building, filed off on
 either side, and, marking time to their own vigorous music, stood
 stamping in the snow. As they thus opened their ranks, the leaders of
 this noble bridal train appeared behind and between them; and such was
 the variety and gaiety of their attire, such the displays of silk and
 velvet, fur and satin, embroidery and lace, that the procession showed
 forth upon the snow like a flower-bed in a path or a painted window in a
 wall.
 
 First came the bride, a sorry sight, as pale as winter, clinging to Sir
 Daniel's arm, and attended, as bridesmaid, by the short young lady who
 had befriended Dick the night before. Close behind, in the most radiant
 toilet, followed the bridegroom, halting on a gouty foot; and as he
 passed the threshold of the sacred building and doffed his hat, his bald
 head was seen to be rosy with emotion.
 
 And now came the hour of Ellis Duckworth.
 
 Dick, who sat stunned among contrary emotions, grasping the desk in
 front of him, beheld a movement in the crowd, people jostling backward,
 and eyes and arms uplifted. Following these signs, he beheld three or
 four men with bent bows, leaning from the clerestory gallery. At the
 same instant they delivered their discharge, and before the clamour and
 cries of the astounded populace had time to swell fully upon the ear,
 they had flitted from their perch and disappeared.
 
 The nave was full of swaying heads and voices screaming; the
 ecclesiastics thronged in terror from their places; the music ceased,
 and though the bells overhead continued for some seconds to clang upon
 the air, some wind of the disaster seemed to find its way at last even
 to the chamber where the ringers were leaping on their ropes, and they
 also desisted from their merry labours.
 
 Right in the midst of the nave the bridegroom lay stone-dead, pierced by
 two black arrows. The bride had fainted. Sir Daniel stood, towering
 above the crowd in his surprise and anger, a cloth-yard shaft quivering
 in his left forearm, and his face streaming blood from another which had
 grazed his brow.
 
 Long before any search could be made for them, the authors of this
 tragic interruption had clattered down a turn-pike stair and decamped by
 a postern door.
 
 But Dick and Lawless still remained in pawn; they had, indeed, arisen on
 the first alarm, and pushed manfully to gain the door; but what with the
 narrowness of the stalls and the crowding of terrified priests and
 choristers, the attempt had been in vain, and they had stoically resumed
 their places.
 
 And now, pale with horror, Sir Oliver rose to his feet and called upon
 Sir Daniel, pointing with one hand to Dick.
 
 "Here," he cried, "is Richard Shelton--alas the hour!--blood guilty!
 Seize him!--bid him be seized! For all our lives' sakes, take him and
 bind him surely! He hath sworn our fall."
 
 Sir Daniel was blinded by anger--blinded by the hot blood that still
 streamed across his face.
 
 [Illustration: _First came the bride, a sorry sight, as pale as the
 winter, clinging to Sir Daniel's arm_]
 
 "Where?" he bellowed. "Hale him forth! By the cross of Holywood, but he
 shall rue this hour!"
 
 The crowd fell back, and a party of archers invaded the choir, laid
 rough hands on Dick, dragged him head-foremost from the stall, and
 thrust him by the shoulders down the chancel steps. Lawless, on his
 part, sat as still as a mouse.
 
 Sir Daniel, brushing the blood out of his eyes, stared blinkingly upon
 his captive.
 
 "Ay," he said, "treacherous and insolent, I have thee fast; and by all
 potent oaths, for every drop of blood that now trickles in mine eyes, I
 will wring a groan out of thy carcase. Away with him!" he added. "Here
 is no place! Off with him to my house. I will number every joint of thy
 body with a torture."
 
 But Dick, putting off his captors, uplifted his voice.
 
 "Sanctuary!" he shouted. "Sanctuary! Ho, there, my fathers! They would
 drag me from the church!"
 
 "From the church thou hast defiled with murder, boy," added a tall man,
 magnificently dressed.
 
 "On what probation?" cried Dick. "They do accuse me, indeed, of some
 complicity, but have not proved one tittle. I was, in truth, a suitor
 for this damsel's hand; and she, I will be bold to say it, repaid my
 suit with favour. But what then? To love a maid is no offence, I
 trow--nay, nor to gain her love. In all else, I stand here free from
 guiltiness."
 
 There was a murmur of approval among the bystanders, so boldly Dick
 declared his innocence; but at the same time a throng of accusers arose
 upon the other side, crying how he had been found last night in Sir
 Daniel's house, how he wore a sacrilegious disguise; and in the midst of
 the babel, Sir Oliver indicated Lawless, both by voice and gesture, as
 accomplice to the fact. He, in his turn, was dragged from his seat and
 set beside his leader. The feelings of the crowd rose high on either
 side, and while some dragged the prisoners to and fro to favour their
 escape, others cursed and struck them with their fists. Dick's ears rang
 and his brain swam dizzily, like a man struggling in the eddies of a
 furious river.
 
 But the tall man who had already answered Dick, by a prodigious exercise
 of voice restored silence and order in the mob.
 
 "Search them," he said, "for arms. We may so judge of their intentions."
 
 Upon Dick they found no weapon but his poniard, and this told in his
 favour, until one man officiously drew it from its sheath, and found it
 still uncleansed of the blood of Rutter. At this there was a great shout
 among Sir Daniel's followers, which the tall man suppressed by a gesture
 and an imperious glance. But when it came to the turn of Lawless, there
 was found under his gown a sheaf of arrows identical with those that had
 been shot.
 
 "How say ye now?" asked the tall man, frowningly, of Dick.
 
 "Sir," replied Dick, "I am here in sanctuary, is it not so? Well, sir, I
 see by your bearing that ye are high in station, and I read in your
 countenance the marks of piety and justice. To you, then, I will yield
 me prisoner, and that blithely, foregoing the advantage of this holy
 place. But rather than to be yielded into the discretion of that
 man--whom I do here accuse with a loud voice to be the murderer of my
 natural father and the unjust retainer of my lands and revenues--rather
 than that, I would beseech you, under favour, with your own gentle hand,
 to despatch me on the spot. Your own ears have heard him, how before
 that I was proven guilty he did threaten me with torments. It standeth
 not with your own honour to deliver me to my sworn enemy and old
 oppressor, but to try me fairly by the way of law, and, if that I be
 guilty indeed, to slay me mercifully."
 
 "My lord," cried Sir Daniel, "ye will not hearken to this wolf? His
 bloody dagger reeks him the lie into his face."
 
 "Nay, but suffer me, good knight," returned the tall stranger; "your own
 vehemence doth somewhat tell against yourself."
 
 And here the bride, who had come to herself some minutes past and looked
 wildly on upon this scene, broke loose from those that held her, and
 fell upon her knees before the last speaker.
 
 "My Lord of Risingham," she cried, "hear me, in justice. I am here in
 this man's custody by mere force, reft from mine own people. Since that
 day I had never pity, countenance, nor comfort from the face of man--but
 from him only--Richard Shelton--whom they now accuse and labour to undo.
 My lord, if he was yesternight in Sir Daniel's mansion, it was I that
 brought him there; he came but at my prayer, and thought to do no hurt.
 While yet Sir Daniel was a good lord to him, he fought with them of the
 Black Arrow loyally; but when his foul guardian sought his life by
 practices, and he fled by night, for his soul's sake, out of that bloody
 house, whither was he to turn--he, helpless and penniless? Or if he be
 fallen among ill company, whom should ye blame--the lad that was
 unjustly handled, or the guardian that did abuse his trust?"
 
 And then the short young lady fell on her knees by Joanna's side.
 
 "And I, my good lord and natural uncle," she added, "I can bear
 testimony, on my conscience and before the face of all, that what this
 maiden saith is true. It was I, unworthy, that did lead the young man
 in."
 
 Earl Risingham had heard in silence, and when the voices ceased, he
 still stood silent for a space. Then he gave Joanna his hand to arise,
 though it was to be observed that he did not offer the like courtesy to
 her who had called herself his niece.
 
 "Sir Daniel," he said, "here is a right intricate affair, the which,
 with your good leave, it shall be mine to examine and adjust. Content
 ye, then; your business is in careful hands; justice shall be done you;
 and in the meanwhile, get ye incontinently home, and have your hurts
 attended. The air is shrewd, and I would not ye took cold upon these
 scratches."
 
 He made a sign with his hand; it was passed down the nave by obsequious
 servants, who waited there upon his smallest gesture. Instantly, without
 the church, a tucket sounded shrill, and through the open portal archers
 and men-at-arms, uniformly arrayed in the colours and wearing the badge
 of Lord Risingham, began to file into the church, took Dick and Lawless
 from those who still detained them, and closing their files about the
 prisoners, marched forth again and disappeared.
 
 As they were passing, Joanna held both her hands to Dick and cried him
 her farewell; and the bridesmaid, nothing downcast by her uncle's
 evident displeasure, blew him a kiss, with a "Keep your heart up,
 lion-driver!" that for the first time since the accident called up a
 smile to the faces of the crowd.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 EARL RISINGHAM
 
 
 Earl Risingham, although by far the most important person then in
 Shoreby, was poorly lodged in the house of a private gentleman upon the
 extreme outskirts of the town. Nothing but the armed men at the doors,
 and the mounted messengers that kept arriving and departing, announced
 the temporary residence of a great lord.
 
 Thus it was that, from lack of space, Dick and Lawless were clapped into
 the same apartment.
 
 "Well spoken, Master Richard," said the outlaw; "it was excellently well
 spoken, and, for my part, I thank you cordially. Here we are in good
 hands; we shall be justly tried, and, some time this evening, decently
 hanged on the same tree."
 
 "Indeed, my poor friend, I do believe it," answered Dick.
 
 "Yet have we a string to our bow," returned Lawless. "Ellis Duckworth is
 a man out of ten thousand; he holdeth you right near his heart, both for
 your own and for your father's sake; and knowing you guiltless of this
 fact, he will stir earth and heaven to bear you clear."
 
 "It may not be," said Dick. "What can he do? He hath but a handful.
 Alack, if it were but to-morrow--could I but keep a certain tryst an
 hour before noon to-morrow--all were, I think, otherwise. But now there
 is no help."
 
 "Well," concluded Lawless, "an ye will stand to it for my innocence, I
 will stand to it for yours, and that stoutly. It shall naught avail us;
 but an I be to hang, it shall not be for lack of swearing."
 
 And then, while Dick gave himself over to his reflections, the old rogue
 curled himself down into a corner, pulled his monkish hood about his
 face, and composed himself to sleep. Soon he was loudly snoring, so
 utterly had his long life of hardship and adventure blunted the sense of
 apprehension.
 
 It was long after noon, and the day was already failing, before the door
 was opened and Dick taken forth and led up-stairs to where, in a warm
 cabinet, Earl Risingham sat musing over the fire.
 
 On his captive's entrance he looked up.
 
 "Sir," he said, "I knew your father, who was a man of honour, and this
 inclineth me to be the more lenient; but I may not hide from you that
 heavy charges lie against your character. Ye do consort with murderers
 and robbers; upon a clear probation ye have carried war against the
 king's peace; ye are suspected to have piratically seized upon a ship;
 ye are found skulking with a counterfeit presentment in your enemy's
 house; a man is slain that very evening----"
 
 "An it like you, my lord," Dick interposed, "I will at once avow my
 guilt, such as it is. I slew this fellow Rutter; and to the
 proof"--searching in his bosom--"here is a letter from his wallet."
 
 Lord Risingham took the letter, and opened and read it twice.
 
 "Ye have read this?" he inquired.
 
 "I have read it," answered Dick.
 
 "Are ye for York or Lancaster?" the earl demanded.
 
 "My lord, it was but a little while back that I was asked that question,
 and knew not how to answer it," said Dick; "but having answered once, I
 will not vary. My lord, I am for York."
 
 The earl nodded approvingly.
 
 "Honestly replied," he said. "But wherefore, then, deliver me this
 letter?"
 
 "Nay, but against traitors, my lord, are not all sides arrayed?" cried
 Dick.
 
 "I would they were, young gentleman," returned the earl; "and I do at
 least approve your saying. There is more youth than guile in you, I do
 perceive; and were not Sir Daniel a mighty man upon our side, I were
 half tempted to espouse your quarrel. For I have inquired, and it
 appears ye have been hardly dealt with, and have much excuse. But look
 ye, sir, I am, before all else, a leader in the Queen's interest; and
 though by nature a just man, as I believe, and leaning even to the
 excess of mercy, yet must I order my goings for my party's interest,
 and, to keep Sir Daniel, I would go far about."
 
 "My lord," returned Dick, "ye will think me very bold to counsel you;
 but do ye count upon Sir Daniel's faith? Methought he had changed sides
 intolerably often."
 
 "Nay, it is the way of England. What would ye have?" the earl demanded.
 "But ye are unjust to the knight of Tunstall; and as faith goes, in this
 unfaithful generation, he hath of late been honourably true to us of
 Lancaster. Even in our last reverses he stood firm."
 
 "An it pleased you, then," said Dick, "to cast your eye upon this
 letter, ye might somewhat change your thought of him"; and he handed to
 the earl Sir Daniel's letter to Lord Wensleydale.
 
 The effect upon the earl's countenance was instant; he lowered like an
 angry lion, and his hand, with a sudden movement, clutched at his
 dagger.
 
 "Ye have read this also?" he asked.
 
 "Even so," said Dick. "It is your lordship's own estate he offers to
 Lord Wensleydale?"
 
 "It is my own estate, even as ye say!" returned the earl. "I am your
 bedesman for this letter. It hath shown me a fox's hole. Command me,
 Master Shelton; I will not be backward in gratitude, and to begin with,
 York or Lancaster, true man or thief, I do now set you at freedom. Go,
 a-Mary's name! But judge it right that I retain and hang your fellow,
 Lawless. The crime hath been most open, and it were fitting that some
 open punishment should follow."
 
 "My lord, I make it my first suit to you to spare him also," pleaded
 Dick.
 
 "It is an old, condemned rogue, thief, and vagabond, Master Shelton,"
 said the earl. "He hath been gallows-ripe this score of years. And,
 whether for one thing or another, whether to-morrow or the day after,
 where is the great choice?"
 
 "Yet, my lord, it was through love to me that he came hither," answered
 Dick, "and I were churlish and thankless to desert him."
 
 "Master Shelton, ye are troublesome," replied the earl, severely. "It is
 an evil way to prosper in this world. Howbeit, and to be quit of your
 importunity, I will once more humour you. Go, then, together; but go
 warily, and get swiftly out of Shoreby town. For this Sir Daniel (whom
 may the saints confound!) thirsteth most greedily to have your blood."
 
 "My lord, I do now offer you in words my gratitude, trusting at some
 brief date to pay you some of it in service," replied Dick, as he turned
 from the apartment.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 ARBLASTER AGAIN
 
 
 When Dick and Lawless were suffered to steal, by a back way, out of the
 house where Lord Risingham held his garrison, the evening had already
 come.
 
 They paused in shelter of the garden wall to consult on their best
 course. The danger was extreme. If one of Sir Daniel's men caught sight
 of them and raised the view-hallo, they would be run down and butchered
 instantly. And not only was the town of Shoreby a mere net of peril for
 their lives, but to make for the open country was to run the risk of the
 patrols.
 
 A little way off, upon some open ground, they spied a windmill standing;
 and hard by that, a very large granary with open doors.
 
 "How if we lay there until the night fall?" Dick proposed.
 
 And Lawless having no better suggestion to offer, they made a straight
 push for the granary at a run, and concealed themselves behind the door
 among some straw. The daylight rapidly departed; and presently the moon
 was silvering the frozen snow. Now or never was their opportunity to
 gain the Goat and Bagpipes unobserved and change their tell-tale
 garments. Yet even then it was advisable to go round by the outskirts,
 and not run the gauntlet of the market-place, where, in the concourse of
 people, they stood the more imminent peril to be recognised and slain.
 
 This course was a long one. It took them not far from the house by the
 beach, now lying dark and silent, and brought them forth at last by the
 margin of the harbour. Many of the ships, as they could see by the clear
 moonshine, had weighed anchor, and, profiting by the calm sky, proceeded
 for more distant parts; answerably to this, the rude alehouses along the
 beach (although, in defiance of the curfew law, they still shone with
 fire and candle) were no longer thronged with customers, and no longer
 echoed to the chorus of sea-songs.
 
 Hastily, half running, with their monkish raiment kilted to the knee,
 they plunged through the deep snow and threaded the labyrinth of marine
 lumber; and they were already more than half-way round the harbour when,
 as they were passing close before an alehouse, the door suddenly opened
 and let out a gush of light upon their fleeting figures.
 
 Instantly they stopped, and made believe to be engaged in earnest
 conversation.
 
 Three men, one after another, came out of the alehouse, and the last
 closed the door behind him. All three were unsteady upon their feet, as
 if they had passed the day in deep potations, and they now stood
 wavering in the moonlight, like men who knew not what they would be
 after. The tallest of the three was talking in a loud, lamentable
 voice.
 
 "Seven pieces of as good Gascony as ever a tapster broached," he was
 saying, "the best ship out o' the port o' Dartmouth, a Virgin Mary
 parcel-gilt, thirteen pounds of good gold money----"
 
 "I have had losses, too," interrupted one of the others. "I have had
 losses of mine own, gossip Arblaster. I was robbed at Martinmas of five
 shillings and a leather wallet well worth ninepence farthing."
 
 Dick's heart smote him at what he heard. Until that moment he had not
 perhaps thought twice of the poor skipper who had been ruined by the
 loss of the _Good Hope_; so careless, in those days, were men who wore
 arms of the goods and interests of their inferiors. But this sudden
 encounter reminded him sharply of the high-handed manner and ill-ending
 of his enterprise; and both he and Lawless turned their heads the other
 way, to avoid the chance of recognition.
 
 The ship's dog had, however, made his escape from the wreck and found
 his way back again to Shoreby. He was now at Arblaster's heels, and
 suddenly sniffing and pricking his ears, he darted forward and began to
 bark furiously at the two sham friars.
 
 His master unsteadily followed him.
 
 "Hey, shipmates!" he cried. "Have ye ever a penny piece for a poor old
 shipman, clean destroyed by pirates? I am a man that would have paid for
 you both o' Thursday morning; and now here I be, o' Saturday night,
 begging for a flagon of ale! Ask my man Tom, if ye misdoubt me. Seven
 pieces of good Gascon wine, a ship that was mine own, and was my
 father's before me, a Blessed Mary of plane-tree wood and parcel-gilt,
 and thirteen pounds in gold and silver. Hey! what say ye? A man that
 fought the French, too; for I have fought the French; I have cut more
 French throats upon the high seas than ever a man that sails out of
 Dartmouth. Come, a penny piece."
 
 Neither Dick nor Lawless durst answer him a word, lest he should
 recognise their voices; and they stood there as helpless as a ship
 ashore, not knowing where to turn nor what to hope.
 
 "Are ye dumb, boy?" inquired the skipper. "Mates," he added, with a
 hiccup, "they be dumb. I like not this manner of discourtesy; for an a
 man be dumb, so be as he's courteous, he will still speak when he was
 spoken to, methinks."
 
 By this time the sailor, Tom, who was a man of great personal strength,
 seemed to have conceived some suspicion of these two speechless figures;
 and being soberer than his captain, stepped suddenly before him, took
 Lawless roughly by the shoulder, and asked him, with an oath, what ailed
 him that he held his tongue. To this the outlaw, thinking all was over,
 made answer by a wrestling feint that stretched the sailor on the sand,
 and, calling upon Dick to follow him, took to his heels among the
 lumber.
 
 The affair passed in a second. Before Dick could run at all, Arblaster
 had him in his arms; Tom, crawling on his face, had caught him by one
 foot, and the third man had a drawn cutlass brandishing above his head.
 
 It was not so much the danger, it was not so much the annoyance, that
 now bowed down the spirits of young Shelton; it was the profound
 humiliation to have escaped Sir Daniel, convinced Lord Risingham, and
 now fall helpless in the hands of this old, drunken sailor; and not
 merely helpless, but, as his conscience loudly told him when it was too
 late, actually guilty--actually the bankrupt debtor of the man whose
 ship he had stolen and lost.
 
 "Bring me him back into the alehouse, till I see his face," said
 Arblaster.
 
 "Nay, nay," returned Tom; "but let us first unload his wallet, lest the
 other lads cry share."
 
 But though he was searched from head to foot, not a penny was found upon
 him; nothing but Lord Foxham's signet, which they plucked savagely from
 his finger.
 
 "Turn me him to the moon," said the skipper; and taking Dick by the
 chin, he cruelly jerked his head into the air. "Blessed Virgin!" he
 cried, "it is the pirate!"
 
 "Hey!" cried Tom.
 
 "By the Virgin of Bordeaux, it is the man himself!" repeated Arblaster.
 "What, sea-thief, do I hold you?" he cried. "Where is my ship? Where is
 my wine? Hey! have I you in my hands? Tom, give me one end of a cord
 here; I will so truss me this sea-thief, hand and foot together, like a
 basting turkey--marry, I will so bind him up--and thereafter I will so
 beat--so beat him!"
 
 And so he ran on, winding the cord meanwhile about Dick's limbs with the
 dexterity peculiar to seamen, and at every turn and cross securing it
 with a knot, and tightening the whole fabric with a savage pull.
 
 When he had done, the lad was a mere package in his hands--as helpless
 as the dead. The skipper held him at arm's length, and laughed aloud.
 Then he fetched him a stunning buffet on the ear; and then turned him
 about, and furiously kicked and kicked him. Anger rose up in Dick's
 bosom like a storm; anger strangled him, and he thought to have died;
 but when the sailor, tired of this cruel play, dropped him all his
 length upon the sand and turned to consult with his companions, he
 instantly regained command of his temper. Here was a momentary respite;
 ere they began again to torture him, he might have found some method to
 escape from this degrading and fatal misadventure.
 
 Presently, sure enough, and while his captors were still discussing what
 to do with him, he took heart of grace, and, with a pretty steady voice,
 addressed them.
 
 "My masters," he began, "are ye gone clean foolish? Here hath Heaven put
 into your hands as pretty an occasion to grow rich as ever shipman
 had--such as ye might make thirty over-sea adventures and not find
 again--and, by the mass! what do ye? Beat me?--nay; so would an angry
 child! But for long-headed tarry-Johns, that fear not fire nor water,
 and that love gold as they love beef, methinks ye are not wise."
 
 "Ay," said Tom, "now y'are trussed ye would cozen us."
 
 "Cozen you!" repeated Dick. "Nay, if ye be fools, it would be easy. But
 if ye be shrewd fellows, as I trow ye are, ye can see plainly where your
 interest lies. When I took your ship from you, we were many, we were
 well clad and armed; but now, bethink you a little, who mustered that
 array? One incontestably that hath much gold. And if he, being already
 rich, continueth to hunt after more even in the face of storms--bethink
 you once more--shall there not be a treasure somewhere hidden?"
 
 "What meaneth he?" asked one of the men.
 
 "Why, if ye have lost an old skiff and a few jugs of vinegary wine,"
 continued Dick, "forget them, for the trash they are; and do ye rather
 buckle to an adventure worth the name, that shall, in twelve hours, make
 or mar you for ever. But take me up from where I lie, and let us go
 somewhere near at hand and talk across a flagon, for I am sore and
 frozen, and my mouth is half among the snow."
 
 "He seeks but to cozen us," said Tom, contemptuously.
 
 "Cozen! cozen!" cried the third man. "I would I could see the man that
 could cozen me! He were a cozener indeed! Nay, I was not born yesterday.
 I can see a church when it hath a steeple on it; and for my part, gossip
 Arblaster, methinks there is some sense in this young man. Shall we go
 hear him, indeed? Say, shall we go hear him?"
 
 "I would look gladly on a pottle of strong ale, good Master Pirret,"
 returned Arblaster. "How say ye, Tom? But then the wallet is empty."
 
 "I will pay," said the other--"I will pay. I would fain see this matter
 out; I do believe, upon my conscience, there is gold in it."
 
 "Nay, if ye get again to drinking, all is lost!" cried Tom.
 
 "Gossip Arblaster, ye suffer your fellow to have too much liberty,"
 returned Master Pirret. "Would ye be led by a hired man? Fy, fy!"
 
 "Peace, fellow!" said Arblaster, addressing Tom. "Will ye put your oar
 in? Truly a fine pass, when the crew is to correct the skipper!"
 
 "Well, then, go your way," said Tom; "I wash my hands of you."
 
 "Set him, then, upon his feet," said Master Pirret. "I know a privy
 place where we may drink and discourse."
 
 "If I am to walk, my friends, ye must set my feet at liberty," said
 Dick, when he had been once more planted upright like a post.
 
 "He saith true," laughed Pirret. "Truly, he could not walk accoutred as
 he is. Give it a slit--out with your knife and slit it, gossip."
 
 Even Arblaster paused at this proposal; but as his companion continued
 to insist, and Dick had the sense to keep the merest wooden indifference
 of expression, and only shrugged his shoulders over the delay, the
 skipper consented at last, and cut the cords which tied his prisoner's
 feet and legs. Not only did this enable Dick to walk; but the whole
 network of his bonds being proportionately loosened, he felt the arm
 behind his back begin to move more freely, and could hope, with time and
 trouble, to entirely disengage it. So much he owed already to the owlish
 silliness and greed of Master Pirret.
 
 That worthy now assumed the lead, and conducted them to the very same
 rude alehouse where Lawless had taken Arblaster on the day of the gale.
 It was now quite deserted; the fire was a pile of red embers, radiating
 the most ardent heat; and when they had chosen their places, and the
 landlord had set before them a measure of mulled ale, both Pirret and
 Arblaster stretched forth their legs and squared their elbows like men
 bent upon a pleasant hour.
 
 The table at which they sat, like all the others in the alehouse,
 consisted of a heavy, square board, set on a pair of barrels; and each
 of the four curiously-assorted cronies sat at one side of the square,
 Pirret facing Arblaster, and Dick opposite to the common sailor.
 
 "And now, young man," said Pirret, "to your tale. It doth appear,
 indeed, that ye have somewhat abused our gossip Arblaster; but what
 then? Make it up to him--show him but this chance to become wealthy--and
 I will go pledge he will forgive you."
 
 So far Dick had spoken pretty much at random; but it was now necessary,
 under the supervision of six eyes, to invent and tell some marvellous
 story, and, if it were possible, get back into his hands the
 all-important signet. To squander time was the first necessity. The
 longer his stay lasted, the more would his captors drink, and the surer
 should he be when he attempted his escape.
 
 Well, Dick was not much of an inventor, and what he told was pretty much
 the tale of Ali Baba, with Shoreby and Tunstall Forest substituted for
 the East, and the treasures of the cavern rather exaggerated than
 diminished. As the reader is aware, it is an excellent story, and has
 but one drawback--that it is not true; and so, as these three simple
 shipmen now heard it for the first time, their eyes stood out of their
 faces, and their mouths gaped like codfish at a fishmonger's.
 
 Pretty soon a second measure of mulled ale was called for; and while
 Dick was still artfully spinning out the incidents a third followed the
 second.
 
 Here was the position of the parties towards the end:
 
 Arblaster, three-parts drunk and one-half asleep, hung helpless on his
 stool. Even Tom had been much delighted with the tale, and his vigilance
 had abated in proportion. Meanwhile, Dick had gradually wormed his right
 arm clear of its bonds, and was ready to risk all.
 
 "And so," said Pirret, "y'are one of these?"
 
 "I was made so," replied Dick, "against my will; but an I could but get
 a sack or two of gold coin to my share, I should be a fool indeed to
 continue dwelling in a filthy cave, and standing shot and buffet like a
 soldier. Here be we four; good! Let us, then, go forth into the forest
 to-morrow ere the sun be up. Could we come honestly by a donkey, it were
 better; but an we cannot, we have our four strong backs, and I warrant
 me we shall come home staggering."
 
 Pirret licked his lips.
 
 "And this magic," he said--"this password, whereby the cave is
 opened--how call ye it, friend?"
 
 "Nay, none know the word but the three chiefs," returned Dick; "but here
 is your great good fortune, that, on this very evening, I should be the
 bearer of a spell to open it. It is a thing not trusted twice a year
 beyond the captain's wallet."
 
 "A spell!" said Arblaster, half awakening, and squinting upon Dick with
 one eye. "Aroint thee! no spells! I be a good Christian. Ask my man Tom,
 else."
 
 "Nay, but this is white magic," said Dick. "It doth naught with the
 devil; only the powers of numbers, herbs, and planets."
 
 "Ay, ay," said Pirret; "'tis but white magic, gossip. There is no sin
 therein, I do assure you. But proceed, good youth. This spell--in what
 should it consist?"
 
 "Nay, that I will incontinently show you," answered Dick. "Have ye there
 the ring ye took from my finger? Good! Now hold it forth before you by
 the extreme finger-ends, at the arm's length, and over against the
 shining of these embers. 'Tis so exactly. Thus, then, is the spell."
 
 With a haggard glance, Dick saw the coast was clear between him and the
 door. He put up an internal prayer. Then whipping forth his arm, he made
 but one snatch of the ring, and at the same instant, levering up the
 table, he sent it bodily over upon the seaman Tom. He, poor soul, went
 down bawling under the ruins; and before Arblaster understood that
 anything was wrong, or Pirret could collect his dazzled wits, Dick had
 run to the door and escaped into the moonlit night.
 
 The moon, which now rode in the mid-heavens, and the extreme whiteness
 of the snow, made the open ground about the harbour bright as day; and
 young Shelton leaping, with kilted robe, among the lumber, was a
 conspicuous figure from afar.
 
 Tom and Pirret followed him with shouts; from every drinking-shop they
 were joined by others whom their cries aroused; and presently a whole
 fleet of sailors was in full pursuit. But Jack ashore was a bad runner,
 even in the fifteenth century, and Dick, besides, had a start, which he
 rapidly improved, until, as he drew near the entrance of a narrow lane,
 he even paused and looked laughingly behind him.
 
 Upon the white floor of snow, all the shipmen of Shoreby came clustering
 in an inky mass, and tailing out rearward in isolated clumps. Every man
 was shouting or screaming; every man was gesticulating with both arms in
 air; some one was continually falling; and to complete the picture, when
 one fell, a dozen would fall upon the top of him.
 
 The confused mass of sound which they rolled up as high as to the moon
 was partly comical and partly terrifying to the fugitive whom they were
 hunting. In itself, it was impotent, for he made sure no seaman in the
 port could run him down. But the mere volume of noise, in so far as it
 must awake all the sleepers in Shoreby and bring all the skulking
 sentries to the street, did really threaten him with danger in the
 front. So, spying a dark doorway at a corner, he whipped briskly into
 it, and let the uncouth hunt go by him, still shouting and
 gesticulating, and all red with hurry and white with tumbles in the
 snow.
 
 It was a long while, indeed, before this great invasion of the town by
 the harbour came to an end, and it was long before silence was restored.
 For long, lost sailors were still to be heard pounding and shouting
 through the streets in all directions and in every quarter of the town.
 Quarrels followed, sometimes among themselves, sometimes with the men
 of the patrols; knives were drawn, blows given and received, and more
 than one dead body remained behind upon the snow.
 
 When, a full hour later, the last seaman returned grumblingly to the
 harbour side and his particular tavern, it may fairly be questioned if
 he had ever known what manner of man he was pursuing, but it was
 absolutely sure that he had now forgotten. By next morning there were
 many strange stories flying; and a little while after, the legend of the
 devil's nocturnal visit was an article of faith with all the lads of
 Shoreby.
 
 But the return of the last seaman did not, even yet, set free young
 Shelton from his cold imprisonment in the doorway.
 
 For some time after, there was a great activity of patrols; and special
 parties came forth to make the round of the place and report to one or
 other of the great lords, whose slumbers had been thus unusually broken.
 
 The night was already well spent before Dick ventured from his
 hiding-place and came, safe and sound, but aching with cold and bruises,
 to the door of the Goat and Bagpipes. As the law required, there was
 neither fire nor candle in the house; but he groped his way into a
 corner of the icy guest-room, found an end of a blanket, which he
 hitched around his shoulders, and creeping close to the nearest sleeper,
 was soon lost in slumber.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK V
 
 CROOKBACK
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 THE SHRILL TRUMPET
 
 
 Very early the next morning, before the first peep of the day, Dick
 arose, changed his garments, armed himself once more like a gentleman,
 and set forth for Lawless's den in the forest. There, it will be
 remembered, he had left Lord Foxham's papers; and to get these and be
 back in time for the tryst with the young Duke of Gloucester could only
 be managed by an early start and the most vigorous walking.
 
 The frost was more rigorous than ever; the air windless and dry, and
 stinging to the nostril. The moon had gone down, but the stars were
 still bright and numerous, and the reflection from the snow was clear
 and cheerful. There was no need for a lamp to walk by; nor, in that
 still but ringing air, the least temptation to delay.
 
 Dick had crossed the greater part of the open ground between Shoreby and
 the forest, and had reached the bottom of the little hill, some hundred
 yards below the Cross of St. Bride, when, through the stillness of the
 black morn, there rang forth the note of a trumpet, so shrill, clear,
 and piercing, that he thought he had never heard the match of it for
 audibility. It was blown once, and then hurriedly a second time; and
 then the clash of steel succeeded.
 
 At this young Shelton pricked his ears, and drawing his sword, ran
 forward up the hill.
 
 Presently he came in sight of the cross, and was aware of a most fierce
 encounter raging on the road before it. There were seven or eight
 assailants, and but one to keep head against them; but so active and
 dexterous was this one, so desperately did he charge and scatter his
 opponents, so deftly keep his footing on the ice, that already, before
 Dick could intervene, he had slain one, wounded another, and kept the
 whole in check.
 
 Still, it was by a miracle that he continued his defence, and at any
 moment, any accident, the least slip of foot or error of hand, his life
 would be a forfeit.
 
 "Hold ye well, sir! Here is help!" cried Richard; and forgetting that he
 was alone, and that the cry was somewhat irregular, "To the Arrow! to
 the Arrow!" he shouted, as he fell upon the rear of the assailants.
 
 These were stout fellows also, for they gave not an inch at this
 surprise, but faced about, and fell with astonishing fury upon Dick.
 Four against one, the steel flashed about him in the starlight; the
 sparks flew fiercely; one of the men opposed to him fell--in the stir of
 the fight he hardly knew why; then he himself was struck across the
 head, and though the steel cap below his hood protected him, the blow
 beat him down upon one knee, with a brain whirling like a windmill-sail.
 
 [Illustration: _There were seven or eight assailants, and but one to
 keep head against them_]
 
 Meanwhile the man whom he had come to rescue, instead of joining in the
 conflict, had, on the first sign of intervention, leaped aback and blown
 again, and yet more urgently and loudly, on that same shrill-voiced
 trumpet that began the alarm. Next moment, indeed, his foes were on him,
 and he was once more charging and fleeing, leaping, stabbing, dropping
 to his knee, and using indifferently sword and dagger, foot and hand,
 with the same unshaken courage and feverish energy and speed.
 
 But that ear-piercing summons had been heard at last. There was a
 muffled rushing in the snow; and in a good hour for Dick, who saw the
 sword-points glitter already at his throat, there poured forth out of
 the wood upon both sides a disorderly torrent of mounted men-at-arms,
 each cased in iron, and with visor lowered, each bearing his lance in
 rest, or his sword bared and raised, and each carrying, so to speak, a
 passenger, in the shape of an archer or page, who leaped one after
 another from their perches, and had presently doubled the array.
 
 The original assailants, seeing themselves outnumbered and surrounded,
 threw down their arms without a word.
 
 "Seize me these fellows!" said the hero of the trumpet; and when his
 order had been obeyed, he drew near to Dick and looked him in the face.
 
 Dick, returning this scrutiny, was surprised to find in one who had
 displayed such strength, skill, and energy, a lad no older than
 himself--slightly deformed, with one shoulder higher than the other, and
 of a pale, painful, and distorted countenance.[2] The eyes, however,
 were very clear and bold.
 
     [2] Richard Crookback would have been really far younger at this
     date.
 
 "Sir," said this lad, "ye came in good time for me, and none too early."
 
 "My lord," returned Dick, with a faint sense that he was in the presence
 of a great personage, "ye are yourself so marvellous a good swordsman
 that I believe ye had managed them single-handed. Howbeit, it was
 certainly well for me that your men delayed no longer than they did."
 
 "How knew ye who I was?" demanded the stranger.
 
 "Even now, my lord," Dick answered, "I am ignorant of whom I speak
 with."
 
 "Is it so?" asked the other. "And yet ye threw yourself head-first into
 this unequal battle."
 
 "I saw one man valiantly contending against many," replied Dick, "and I
 had thought myself dishonoured not to bear him aid."
 
 A singular sneer played about the young nobleman's mouth as he made
 answer:
 
 "These are very brave words. But to the more essential--are ye Lancaster
 or York?"
 
 "My lord, I make no secret; I am clear for York," Dick answered.
 
 "By the mass!" replied the other, "it is well for you."
 
 And so saying, he turned towards one of his followers.
 
 "Let me see," he continued, in the same sneering and cruel tones--"let
 me see a clean end of these brave gentlemen. Truss me them up."
 
 There were but five survivors of the attacking party. Archers seized
 them by the arms; they were hurried to the borders of the wood, and each
 placed below a tree of suitable dimension; the rope was adjusted; an
 archer, carrying the end of it, hastily clambered overhead; and before a
 minute was over, and without a word passing upon either hand, the five
 men were swinging by the neck.
 
 "And now," cried the deformed leader, "back to your posts, and when I
 summon you next, be readier to attend."
 
 "My lord duke," said one man, "beseech you, tarry not here alone. Keep
 but a handful of lances at your hand."
 
 "Fellow," said the duke, "I have forborne to chide you for your
 slowness. Cross me not, therefore. I trust my hand and arm, for all that
 I be crooked. Ye were backwards when the trumpet sounded; and ye are now
 too forward with your counsels. But it is ever so; last with the lance
 and first with tongue. Let it be reversed."
 
 And with a gesture that was not without a sort of dangerous nobility, he
 waved them off.
 
 The footmen climbed again to their seats behind the men-at-arms, and the
 whole party moved slowly away and disappeared in twenty different
 directions, under the cover of the forest.
 
 The day was by this time beginning to break, and the stars to fade. The
 first grey glimmer of dawn shone upon the countenances of the two young
 men, who now turned once more to face each other.
 
 "Here," said the duke, "ye have seen my vengeance, which is, like my
 blade, both sharp and ready. But I would not have you, for all
 Christendom, suppose me thankless. You that came to my aid with a good
 sword and a better courage--unless that ye recoil from my
 misshapeness--come to my heart."
 
 And so saying, the young leader held out his arms for an embrace.
 
 In the bottom of his heart Dick already entertained a great terror and
 some hatred for the man whom he had rescued; but the invitation was so
 worded that it would not have been merely discourteous, but cruel, to
 refuse or hesitate; and he hastened to comply.
 
 "And now, my lord duke," he said, when he had regained his freedom, "do
 I suppose aright? Are ye my Lord Duke of Gloucester?"
 
 "I am Richard of Gloucester," returned the other. "And you--how call
 they you?"
 
 Dick told him his name, and presented Lord Foxham's signet, which the
 duke immediately recognised.
 
 "Ye come too soon," he said; "but why should I complain? Ye are like me,
 that was here at watch two hours before the day. But this is the first
 sally of mine arms; upon this adventure, Master Shelton, shall I make or
 mar the quality of my renown. There lie mine enemies, under two old,
 skilled captains--Risingham and Brackley--well posted for strength, I do
 believe, but yet upon two sides without retreat, enclosed betwixt the
 sea, the harbour, and the river. Methinks, Shelton, here were a great
 blow to be stricken, an we could strike it silently and suddenly."
 
 "I do think so, indeed," cried Dick, warming.
 
 "Have ye my Lord Foxham's notes?" inquired the duke.
 
 And then, Dick, having explained how he was without them for the moment,
 made himself bold to offer information every jot as good, of his own
 knowledge.
 
 "And for mine own part, my lord duke," he added, "an ye had men enough,
 I would fall on even at this present. For, look ye, at the peep of day
 the watches of the night are over; but by day they keep neither watch
 nor ward--only scour the outskirts with horsemen. Now, then, when the
 night watch is already unarmed, and the rest are at their morning
 cup--now were the time to break them."
 
 "How many do ye count?" asked Gloucester.
 
 "They number not two thousand," Dick replied.
 
 "I have seven hundred in the woods behind us," said the duke; "seven
 hundred follow from Kettley, and will be here anon; behind these, and
 further, are four hundred more; and my Lord Foxham hath five hundred
 half a day from here, at Holywood. Shall we attend their coming, or fall
 on?"
 
 "My lord," said Dick, "when ye hanged these five poor rogues ye did
 decide the question. Churls although they were, in these uneasy times
 they will be lacked and looked for, and the alarm be given. Therefore,
 my lord, if ye do count upon the advantage of a surprise, ye have not,
 in my poor opinion, one whole hour in front of you."
 
 "I do think so indeed," returned Crookback. "Well, before an hour, ye
 shall be in the thick on't, winning spurs. A swift man to Holywood,
 carrying Lord Foxham's signet; another along the road to speed my
 laggards! Nay, Shelton, by the rood, it may be done!"
 
 Therewith he once more set his trumpet to his lips and blew.
 
 This time he was not long kept waiting. In a moment the open space
 about the cross was filled with horse and foot. Richard of Gloucester
 took his place upon the steps, and despatched messenger after messenger
 to hasten the concentration of the seven hundred men that lay hidden in
 the immediate neighbourhood among the woods; and before a quarter of an
 hour had passed, all his dispositions being taken, he put himself at
 their head, and began to move down the hill towards Shoreby.
 
 His plan was simple. He was to seize a quarter of the town of Shoreby
 lying on the right hand of the highroad and make his position good there
 in the narrow lanes until his reinforcements followed.
 
 If Lord Risingham chose to retreat, Richard would follow upon his rear,
 and take him between two fires; or, if he preferred to hold the town, he
 would be shut in a trap, there to be gradually overwhelmed by force of
 numbers.
 
 There was but one danger, but that was imminent and great--Gloucester's
 seven hundred might be rolled up and cut to pieces in the first
 encounter, and, to avoid this, it was needful to make the surprise of
 their arrival as complete as possible.
 
 The footmen, therefore, were all once more taken up behind the riders,
 and Dick had the signal honour meted out to him of mounting behind
 Gloucester himself. For as far as there was any cover the troops moved
 slowly, and when they came near the end of the trees that lined the
 highway, stopped to breathe and reconnoitre.
 
 The sun was now well up, shining with a frosty brightness out of a
 yellow halo, and right over against the luminary, Shoreby, a field of
 snowy roofs and ruddy gables, was rolling up its columns of morning
 smoke.
 
 Gloucester turned round to Dick.
 
 "In that poor place," he said, "where people are cooking breakfast,
 either you shall gain your spurs and I begin a life of mighty honour and
 glory in the world's eye, or both of us, as I conceive it, shall fall
 dead and be unheard of. Two Richards are we. Well, then, Richard
 Shelton, they shall be heard about, these two! Their swords shall not
 ring more loudly on men's helmets than their names shall ring in
 people's ears."
 
 Dick was astonished at so great a hunger after fame, expressed with so
 great vehemence of voice and language, and he answered very sensibly and
 quietly, that, for his part, he promised he would do his duty, and
 doubted not of victory if every one did the like.
 
 By this time the horses were well breathed, and the leader holding up
 his, sword and giving rein, the whole troop of chargers broke into the
 gallop and thundered, with their double load of fighting men, down the
 remainder of the hill and across the snow-covered plain that still
 divided them from Shoreby.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 THE BATTLE OF SHOREBY
 
 
 The whole distance to be crossed was not above a quarter of a mile. But
 they had no sooner debouched beyond the cover of the trees than they
 were aware of people fleeing and screaming in the snowy meadows upon
 either hand. Almost at the same moment a great rumour began to arise,
 and spread and grow continually louder in the town; and they were not
 yet half-way to the nearest house before the bells began to ring
 backwards from the steeple.
 
 The young duke ground his teeth together. By these so early signals of
 alarm he feared to find his enemies prepared; and if he failed to gain a
 footing in the town, he knew that his small party would soon be broken
 and exterminated in the open.
 
 In the town, however, the Lancastrians were far from being in so good a
 posture. It was as Dick had said. The night-guard had already doffed
 their harness; the rest were still hanging--unlatched, unbraced, all
 unprepared for battle--about their quarters; and in the whole of Shoreby
 there were not, perhaps, fifty men full armed, or fifty chargers ready
 to be mounted.
 
 The beating of the bells, the terrifying summons of men who ran about
 the streets crying and beating upon the doors, aroused in an incredibly
 short space at least two-score out of that half-hundred. These got
 speedily to horse, and, the alarm still flying wild and contrary,
 galloped in different directions.
 
 Thus it befell that, when Richard of Gloucester reached the first house
 of Shoreby, he was met in the mouth of the street by a mere handful of
 lances, whom he swept before his onset as the storm chases the bark.
 
 A hundred paces into the town, Dick Shelton touched the duke's arm; the
 duke, in answer, gathered his reins, put the shrill trumpet to his
 mouth, and blowing a concerted point, turned to the right hand out of
 the direct advance. Swerving like a single rider, his whole command
 turned after him, and, still at the full gallop of the chargers, swept
 up the narrow by-street. Only the last score of riders drew rein and
 faced about in the entrance; the footmen, whom they carried behind them,
 leapt at the same instant to the earth, and began, some to bend their
 bows, and others to break into and secure the houses upon either hand.
 
 Surprised at this sudden change of direction, and daunted by the firm
 front of the rear-guard, the few Lancastrians, after a momentary
 consultation, turned and rode farther into town to seek for
 reinforcements.
 
 The quarter of the town upon which, by the advice of Dick, Richard of
 Gloucester had now seized, consisted of five small streets of poor and
 ill-inhabited houses, occupying a very gentle eminence, and lying open
 towards the back.
 
 The five streets being each secured by a good guard, the reserve would
 thus occupy the centre, out of shot, and yet ready to carry aid wherever
 it was needed.
 
 Such was the poorness of the neighbourhood that none of the Lancastrian
 lords, and but few of their retainers, had been lodged therein; and the
 inhabitants, with one accord, deserted their houses and fled, squalling,
 along the streets or over garden walls.
 
 In the centre, where the five ways all met, a somewhat ill-favoured
 alehouse displayed the sign of the Chequers; and here the Duke of
 Gloucester chose his headquarters for the day.
 
 To Dick he assigned the guard of one of the five streets.
 
 "Go," he said, "win your spurs. Win glory for me: one Richard for
 another. I tell you, if I rise, ye shall rise by the same ladder. Go,"
 he added, shaking him by the hand.
 
 But, as soon as Dick was gone, he turned to a little shabby archer at
 his elbow.
 
 "Go, Dutton, and that right speedily," he added. "Follow that lad. If ye
 find him faithful, ye answer for his safety, a head for a head. Woe unto
 you, if ye return without him! But if he be faithless--or, for one
 instant, ye misdoubt him--stab him from behind."
 
 In the meanwhile Dick hastened to secure his post. The street he had to
 guard was very narrow, and closely lined with houses, which projected
 and overhung the roadway; but narrow and dark as it was, since it opened
 upon the market-place of the town, the main issue of the battle would
 probably fall to be decided on that spot.
 
 The market-place was full of townspeople fleeing in disorder; but there
 was as yet no sign of any foeman ready to attack, and Dick judged he had
 some time before him to make ready his defence.
 
 The two houses at the end stood deserted, with open doors, as the
 inhabitants had left them in their flight, and from these he had the
 furniture hastily tossed forth and piled into a barrier in the entry of
 the lane. A hundred men were placed at his disposal, and of these he
 threw the more part into the houses, where they might lie in shelter and
 deliver their arrows from the windows. With the rest, under his own
 immediate eye, he lined the barricade.
 
 Meanwhile the utmost uproar and confusion had continued to prevail
 throughout the town; and what with the hurried clashing of bells, the
 sounding of trumpets, the swift movement of bodies of horse, the cries
 of the commanders, and the shrieks of women, the noise was almost
 deafening to the ear. Presently, little by little, the tumult began to
 subside; and soon after, files of men in armour and bodies of archers
 began to assemble and form in line of battle in the market-place.
 
 A large portion of this body were in murrey and blue, and in the mounted
 knight who ordered their array Dick recognised Sir Daniel Brackley.
 
 Then there befell a long pause, which was followed by the almost
 simultaneous sounding of four trumpets from four different quarters of
 the town. A fifth rang in answer from the market-place, and at the same
 moment the files began to move, and a shower of arrows rattled about the
 barricade, and sounded like blows upon the walls of the two flanking
 houses.
 
 The attack had begun, by a common signal, on all the five issues of the
 quarter. Gloucester was beleaguered upon every side; and Dick judged, if
 he would make good his post, he must rely entirely on the hundred men of
 his command.
 
 Seven volleys of arrows followed one upon the other, and in the very
 thick of the discharges Dick was touched from behind upon the arm, and
 found a page holding out to him a leathern jack, strengthened with
 bright plates of mail.
 
 "It is from my Lord of Gloucester," said the page. "He hath observed,
 Sir Richard, that ye went unarmed."
 
 Dick, with a glow at his heart at being so addressed, got to his feet
 and, with the assistance of the page, donned the defensive coat. Even as
 he did so, two arrows rattled harmlessly upon the plates, and a third
 struck down the page, mortally wounded, at his feet.
 
 Meantime the whole body of the enemy had been steadily drawing nearer
 across the market-place; and by this time were so close at hand that
 Dick gave the order to return their shot. Immediately, from behind the
 barrier and from the windows of the houses, a counterblast of arrows
 sped, carrying death. But the Lancastrians, as if they had but waited
 for a signal, shouted loudly in answer; and began to close at a run upon
 the barrier, the horsemen still hanging back, with visors lowered.
 
 Then followed an obstinate and deadly struggle, hand to hand. The
 assailants, wielding their falchions with one hand, strove with the
 other to drag down the structure of the barricade. On the other side,
 the parts were reversed; and the defenders exposed themselves like
 madmen to protect their rampart. So for some minutes the contest raged
 almost in silence, friend and foe falling one upon another. But it is
 always the easier to destroy; and when a single note upon the tucket
 recalled the attacking party from this desperate service, much of the
 barricade had been removed piecemeal, and the whole fabric had sunk to
 half its height, and tottered to a general fall.
 
 And now the footmen in the market-place fell back, at a run, on every
 side. The horsemen, who had been standing in a line two deep, wheeled
 suddenly, and made their flank into their front; and as swift as a
 striking adder, the long, steel-clad column was launched upon the
 ruinous barricade.
 
 Of the first two horsemen, one fell, rider and steed, and was ridden
 down by his companions. The second leaped clean upon the summit of the
 rampart, transpiercing an archer with his lance. Almost in the same
 instant he was dragged from the saddle and his horse despatched.
 
 And then the full weight and impetus of the charge burst upon and
 scattered the defenders. The men-at-arms, surmounting their fallen
 comrades, and carried onward by the fury of their onslaught, dashed
 through Dick's broken line and poured thundering up the lane beyond, as
 a stream bestrides and pours across a broken dam.
 
 Yet was the fight not over. Still, in the narrow jaws of the entrance,
 Dick and a few survivors plied their bills like woodmen; and already,
 across the width of the passage, there had been formed a second, a
 higher, and a more effectual rampart of fallen men and disembowelled
 horses, lashing in the agonies of death.
 
 Baffled by this fresh obstacle, the remainder of the cavalry fell back;
 and as, at the sight of this movement, the flight of arrows redoubled
 from the casements of the houses, their retreat had, for a moment,
 almost degenerated into flight.
 
 Almost at the same time, those who had crossed the barricade and charged
 farther up the street, being met before the door of the Chequers by the
 formidable hunchback and the whole reserve of the Yorkists, began to
 come scattering backwards, in the excess of disarray and terror.
 
 Dick and his fellows faced about, fresh men poured out of the houses; a
 cruel blast of arrows met the fugitives full in the face, while
 Gloucester was already riding down their rear; in the inside of a minute
 and a half there was no living Lancastrian in the street.
 
 Then, and not till then, did Dick hold up his reeking blade and give the
 word to cheer.
 
 Meanwhile Gloucester dismounted from his horse and came forward to
 inspect the post. His face was as pale as linen; but his eyes shone in
 his head like some strange jewel, and his voice, when he spoke, was
 hoarse and broken with the exultation of battle and success. He looked
 at the rampart, which neither friend nor foe could now approach without
 precaution, so fiercely did the horses struggle in the throes of death,
 and at the sight of that great carnage he smiled upon one side.
 
 "Despatch these horses," he said; "they keep you from your vantage.
 Richard Shelton," he added, "ye have pleased me. Kneel."
 
 The Lancastrians had already resumed their archery, and the shafts fell
 thick in the mouth of the street; but the duke, minding them not at all,
 deliberately drew his sword and dubbed Richard a knight upon the spot.
 
 "And now, Sir Richard," he continued, "if that ye see Lord Risingham,
 send me an express upon the instant. Were it your last man, let me hear
 of it incontinently. I had rather venture the post than lose my stroke
 at him. For mark me, all of ye," he added, raising his voice, "if Earl
 Risingham fall by another hand than mine, I shall count this victory a
 defeat."
 
 "My lord duke," said one of his attendants, "is your grace not weary of
 exposing his dear life unneedfully? Why tarry we here?"
 
 "Catesby," returned the duke, "here is the battle, not elsewhere. The
 rest are but feigned onslaughts. Here must we vanquish. And for the
 exposure--if ye were an ugly hunchback, and the children gecked at you
 upon the street, ye would count your body cheaper, and an hour of glory
 worth a life. Howbeit, if ye will, let us ride on and visit the other
 posts. Sir Richard here, my namesake, he shall still hold this entry,
 where he wadeth to the ankles in hot blood. Him can we trust. But mark
 it, Sir Richard, ye are not yet done. The worst is yet to ward. Sleep
 not."
 
 He came right up to young Shelton, looking him hard in the eyes, and
 taking his hand in both of his, gave it so extreme a squeeze that the
 blood had nearly spurted. Dick quailed before his eyes. The insane
 excitement, the courage, and the cruelty that he read therein filled him
 with dismay about the future. This young duke's was indeed a gallant
 spirit, to ride foremost in the ranks of war; but after the battle, in
 the days of peace and in the circle of his trusted friends, that mind,
 it was to be dreaded, would continue to bring forth the fruits of
 death.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 THE BATTLE OF SHOREBY
 
 (CONCLUDED)
 
 
 Dick, once more left to his own counsels, began to look about him. The
 arrow-shot had somewhat slackened. On all sides the enemy were falling
 back; and the greater part of the market-place was now left empty, the
 snow here trampled into orange mud, there splashed with gore, scattered
 all over with dead men and horses, and bristling thick with feathered
 arrows.
 
 On his own side the loss had been cruel. The jaws of the little street
 and the ruins of the barricade were heaped with the dead and dying; and
 out of the hundred men with whom he had begun the battle, there were not
 seventy left who could still stand to arms.
 
 At the same time, the day was passing. The first reinforcements might be
 looked for to arrive at any moment; and the Lancastrians, already shaken
 by the result of their desperate but unsuccessful onslaught, were in an
 ill temper to support a fresh invader.
 
 There was a dial in the wall of one of the two flanking houses; and
 this, in the frosty winter sunshine, indicated ten of the forenoon.
 
 Dick turned to the man who was at his elbow, a little insignificant
 archer, binding a cut in his arm.
 
 "It was well fought," he said, "and, by my sooth, they will not charge
 us twice."
 
 "Sir," said the little archer, "ye have fought right well for York, and
 better for yourself. Never hath man in so brief space prevailed so
 greatly on the duke's affections. That he should have entrusted such a
 post to one he knew not is a marvel. But look to your head, Sir Richard!
 If ye be vanquished--ay, if ye give way one foot's breadth--axe or cord
 shall punish it; and I am set if ye do aught doubtful, I will tell you
 honestly, here to stab you from behind."
 
 Dick looked at the little man in amaze.
 
 "You!" he cried. "And from behind!"
 
 "It is right so," returned the archer; "and because I like not the
 affair I tell it you. Ye must make the post good, Sir Richard, at your
 peril. O, our Crookback is a bold blade and a good warrior; but, whether
 in cold blood or in hot, he will have all things done exact to his
 commandment. If any fail or hinder, they shall die the death."
 
 "Now, by the saints!" cried Richard, "is this so? And will men follow
 such a leader?"
 
 "Nay, they follow him gleefully," replied the other; "for if he be exact
 to punish, he is most open-handed to reward. And if he spare not the
 blood and sweat of others, he is ever liberal of his own, still in the
 first front of battle, still the last to sleep. He will go far, will
 Crookback Dick o' Gloucester!"
 
 The young knight, if he had before been brave and vigilant, was now all
 the more inclined to watchfulness and courage. His sudden favour, he
 began to perceive, had brought perils in its train. And he turned from
 the archer, and once more scanned anxiously the market-place. It lay
 empty as before.
 
 "I like not this quietude," he said. "Doubtless they prepare us some
 surprise."
 
 And, as if in answer to his remark, the archers began once more to
 advance against the barricade, and the arrows to fall thick. But there
 was something hesitating in the attack. They came not on roundly, but
 seemed rather to await a further signal.
 
 Dick looked uneasily about him, spying for a hidden danger. And sure
 enough, about half-way up the little street, a door was suddenly opened
 from within, and the house continued, for some seconds, and both by door
 and window, to disgorge a torrent of Lancastrian archers. These, as they
 leaped down, hurriedly stood to their ranks, bent their bows, and
 proceeded to pour upon Dick's rear a flight of arrows.
 
 At the same time, the assailants in the market-place redoubled their
 shot, and began to close in stoutly upon the barricade.
 
 Dick called down his whole command out of the houses, and facing them
 both ways, and encouraging their valour both by word and gesture,
 returned as best he could the double shower of shafts that fell about
 his post.
 
 Meanwhile house after house was opened in the street, and the
 Lancastrians continued to pour out of the doors and leap down from the
 windows, shouting victory, until the number of enemies upon Dick's rear
 was almost equal to the number in his face. It was plain that he could
 hold the post no longer; what was worse, even if he could have held it,
 it had now become useless; and the whole Yorkist army lay in a posture
 of helplessness upon the brink of a complete disaster.
 
 The men behind him formed the vital flaw in the general defence; and it
 was upon these that Dick turned, charging at the head of his men. So
 vigorous was the attack, that the Lancastrian archers gave ground and
 staggered, and, at last, breaking their ranks, began to crowd back into
 the houses from which they had so recently and so vain-gloriously
 sallied.
 
 Meanwhile the men from the market-place had swarmed across the
 undefended barricade, and fell on hotly upon the other side; and Dick
 must once again face about, and proceed to drive them back. Once again
 the spirit of his men prevailed; they cleared the street in a triumphant
 style, but even as they did so the others issued again out of the
 houses, and took them, a third time, upon the rear.
 
 The Yorkists began to be scattered; several times Dick found himself
 alone among his foes and plying his bright sword for life; several times
 he was conscious of a hurt. And meanwhile the fight swayed to and fro in
 the street without determinate result.
 
 Suddenly Dick was aware of a great trumpeting about the outskirts of the
 town. The war-cry of York began to be rolled up to heaven, as by many
 and triumphant voices. And at the same time the men in front of him
 began to give ground rapidly, streaming out of the street and back upon
 the market-place. Some one gave the word to fly. Trumpets were blown
 distractedly, some for a rally, some to charge. It was plain that a
 great blow had been struck, and the Lancastrians were thrown, at least
 for the moment, into full disorder, and some degree of panic.
 
 And then, like a theatre trick, there followed the last act of Shoreby
 Battle. The men in front of Richard turned tail, like a dog that has
 been whistled home, and fled like the wind. At the same moment there
 came through the market-place a storm of horsemen, fleeing and pursuing,
 the Lancastrians turning back to strike with the sword, the Yorkists
 riding them down at the point of the lance.
 
 Conspicuous in the mellay, Dick beheld the Crookback. He was already
 giving a foretaste of that furious valour and skill to cut his way
 across the ranks of war, which, years afterwards upon the field of
 Bosworth, and when he was stained with crimes, almost sufficed to change
 the fortunes of the day and the destiny of the English throne. Evading,
 striking, riding down, he so forced and so manoeuvred his strong horse,
 so aptly defended himself, and so liberally scattered death to his
 opponents, that he was now far ahead of the foremost of his knights,
 hewing his way, with the truncheon of a bloody sword, to where Lord
 Risingham was rallying the bravest. A moment more and they had met; the
 tall, splendid, and famous warrior against the deformed and sickly boy.
 
 Yet Shelton had never a doubt of the result; and when the fight next
 opened for a moment, the figure of the earl had disappeared; but still,
 in the first of the danger, Crookback Dick was launching his big horse
 and plying the truncheon of his sword.
 
 Thus, by Shelton's courage in holding the mouth of the street against
 the first attack, and by the opportune arrival of his seven hundred
 reinforcements, the lad, who was afterwards to be handed down to the
 execration of posterity under the name of Richard III., had won his
 first considerable fight.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE SACK OF SHOREBY
 
 
 There was not a foe left within striking distance; and Dick, as he
 looked ruefully about him on the remainder of his gallant force, began
 to count the cost of victory. He was himself, now that the danger was
 ended, so stiff and sore, so bruised and cut and broken, and, above all,
 so utterly exhausted by his desperate and unremitting labours in the
 fight, that he seemed incapable of any fresh exertion.
 
 But this was not yet the hour for repose. Shoreby had been taken by
 assault; and though an open town, and not in any manner to be charged
 with the resistance, it was plain that these rough fighters would be not
 less rough now that the fight was over, and that the more horrid part of
 war would fall to be enacted. Richard of Gloucester was not the captain
 to protect the citizens from his infuriated soldiery; and even if he had
 the will, it might be questioned if he had the power.
 
 It was, therefore, Dick's business to find and to protect Joanna; and
 with that end he looked about him at the faces of his men. The three or
 four who seemed likeliest to be obedient and to keep sober he drew
 aside; and promising them a rich reward and a special recommendation to
 the duke, led them across the market-place, now empty of horsemen, and
 into the streets upon the farther side.
 
 Every here and there small combats of from two to a dozen still raged
 upon the open street; here and there a house was being besieged, the
 defenders throwing out stools and tables on the heads of the assailants.
 The snow was strewn with arms and corpses; but except for these partial
 combats the streets were deserted, and the houses, some standing open,
 and some shuttered and barricaded, had for the most part ceased to give
 out smoke.
 
 Dick, threading the skirts of these skirmishers, led his followers
 briskly in the direction of the abbey church; but when he came the
 length of the main street, a cry of horror broke from his lips. Sir
 Daniel's great house had been carried by assault. The gates hung in
 splinters from the hinges, and a double throng kept pouring in and out
 through the entrance, seeking and carrying booty. Meanwhile, in the
 upper storeys, some resistance was still being offered to the pillagers;
 for just as Dick came within eyeshot of the building, a casement was
 burst open from within, and a poor wretch in murrey and blue, screaming
 and resisting, was forced through the embrasure and tossed into the
 street below.
 
 The most sickening apprehension fell upon Dick. He ran forward like one
 possessed, forced his way into the house among the foremost, and mounted
 without pause to the chamber on the third floor where he had last parted
 from Joanna. It was a mere wreck; the furniture had been overthrown, the
 cupboards broken open, and in one place a trailing corner of the arras
 lay smouldering on the embers of the fire.
 
 Dick, almost without thinking, trod out the incipient conflagration, and
 then stood bewildered. Sir Daniel, Sir Oliver, Joanna, all were gone;
 but whether butchered in the rout or safe escaped from Shoreby, who
 should say?
 
 He caught a passing archer by the tabard.
 
 "Fellow," he asked, "were ye here when this house was taken?"
 
 "Let be," said the archer. "A murrain! let be, or I strike."
 
 "Hark ye," returned Richard, "two can play at that. Stand and be plain."
 
 But the man, flushed with drink and battle, struck Dick upon the
 shoulder with one hand, while with the other he twitched away his
 garment. Thereupon the full wrath of the young leader burst from his
 control. He seized the fellow in his strong embrace, and crushed him on
 the plates of his mailed bosom like a child; then, holding him at arm's
 length, he bid him speak as he valued life.
 
 "I pray you mercy!" gasped the archer. "An I had thought ye were so
 angry I would 'a' been charier of crossing you. I was here indeed."
 
 "Know ye Sir Daniel?" pursued Dick.
 
 "Well do I know him," returned the man.
 
 "Was he in the mansion?"
 
 "Ay, sir, he was," answered the archer; "but even as we entered by the
 yard gate he rode forth by the garden."
 
 "Alone?" cried Dick.
 
 "He may 'a' had a score of lances with him," said the man.
 
 "Lances! No women, then?" asked Shelton.
 
 "Troth, I saw not," said the archer. "But there were none in the house,
 if that be your quest."
 
 "I thank you," said Dick. "Here is a piece for your pains." But groping
 in his wallet, Dick found nothing. "Inquire for me to-morrow," he
 added--"Richard Shelt--Sir Richard Shelton," he corrected, "and I will
 see you handsomely rewarded."
 
 And then an idea struck Dick. He hastily descended to the courtyard, ran
 with all his might across the garden, and came to the great door of the
 church. It stood wide open; within, every corner of the pavement was
 crowded with fugitive burghers, surrounded by their families and laden
 with the most precious of their possessions, while, at the high altar,
 priests in full canonicals were imploring the mercy of God. Even as Dick
 entered, the loud chorus began to thunder in the vaulted roofs.
 
 He hurried through the groups of refugees, and came to the door of the
 stair that led into the steeple. And here a tall churchman stepped
 before him and arrested his advance.
 
 "Whither, my son?" he asked, severely.
 
 "My father," answered Dick, "I am here upon an errand of expedition.
 Stay me not. I command here for my Lord of Gloucester."
 
 "For my Lord of Gloucester?" repeated the priest. "Hath, then, the
 battle gone so sore?"
 
 "The battle, father, is at an end, Lancaster clean sped, my Lord of
 Risingham--Heaven rest him!--left upon the field. And now, with your
 good leave, I follow mine affairs." And thrusting on one side the
 priest, who seemed stupefied at the news, Dick pushed open the door and
 rattled up the stairs four at a bound, and without pause or stumble,
 till he stepped upon the open platform at the top.
 
 Shoreby Church tower not only commanded the town, as in a map, but
 looked far, on both sides, over sea and land. It was now near upon noon;
 the day exceeding bright, the snow dazzling. And as Dick looked around
 him, he could measure the consequences of the battle.
 
 A confused, growling uproar reached him from the streets, and now and
 then, but very rarely, the clash of steel. Not a ship, not so much as a
 skiff remained in harbour; but the sea was dotted with sails and
 row-boats laden with fugitives. On shore, too, the surface of the snowy
 meadows was broken up with bands of horsemen, some cutting their way
 towards the borders of the forest, others, who were doubtless of the
 Yorkist side, stoutly interposing and beating them back upon the town.
 Over all the open ground there lay a prodigious quantity of fallen men
 and horses, clearly defined upon the snow.
 
 To complete the picture, those of the foot soldiers as had not found
 place upon a ship still kept up an archery combat on the borders of the
 port, and from the cover of the shoreside taverns. In that quarter,
 also, one or two houses had been fired, and the smoke towered high in
 the frosty sunlight, and blew off to sea in voluminous folds.
 
 Already close upon the margin of the woods, and somewhat in the line of
 Holywood, one particular clump of fleeing horsemen riveted the attention
 of the young watcher on the tower. It was fairly numerous; in no other
 quarter of the field did so many Lancastrians still hold together; thus
 they had left a wide, discoloured wake upon the snow, and Dick was able
 to trace them step by step from where they had left the town.
 
 While Dick stood watching them, they had gained, unopposed, the first
 fringe of the leafless forest, and, turning a little from their
 direction, the sun fell for a moment full on their array, as it was
 relieved against the dusky wood.
 
 "Murrey and blue!" cried Dick. "I swear it--murrey and blue!"
 
 The next moment he was descending the stairway.
 
 It was now his business to seek out the Duke of Gloucester, who alone,
 in the disorder of the forces, might be able to supply him with a
 sufficiency of men. The fighting in the main town was now practically at
 an end; and as Dick ran hither and thither, seeking the commander, the
 streets were thick with wandering soldiers, some laden with more booty
 than they could well stagger under, others shouting drunk. None of them,
 when questioned, had the least notion of the duke's whereabouts; and, at
 last, it was by sheer good fortune that Dick found him, where he sat in
 the saddle directing operations to dislodge the archers from the harbour
 side.
 
 "Sir Richard Shelton, ye are well found," he said. "I owe you one thing
 that I value little, my life; and one that I can never pay you for, this
 victory. Catesby, if I had ten such captains as Sir Richard, I would
 march forthright on London. But now, sir, claim your reward."
 
 "Freely, my lord," said Dick, "freely and loudly. One hath escaped to
 whom I owe some grudges, and taken with him one whom I owe love and
 service. Give me, then, fifty lances, that I may pursue; and for any
 obligation that your graciousness is pleased to allow, it shall be clean
 discharged."
 
 "How call ye him?" inquired the duke.
 
 "Sir Daniel Brackley," answered Richard.
 
 "Out upon him, double-face!" cried Gloucester. "Here is no reward, Sir
 Richard; here is fresh service offered, and, if that ye bring his head
 to me, a fresh debt upon my conscience. Catesby, get him these lances;
 and you, sir, bethink ye, in the meanwhile, what pleasure, honour, or
 profit it shall be mine to give you."
 
 Just then the Yorkist skirmishers carried one of the shoreside taverns,
 swarming in upon it on three sides, and driving out or taking its
 defenders. Crookback Dick was pleased to cheer the exploit, and pushing
 his horse a little nearer, called to see the prisoners.
 
 There were four or five of them--two men of my Lord Shoreby's and one of
 Lord Risingham's among the number, and last, but in Dick's eyes not
 least, a tall, shambling, grizzled old shipman, between drunk and sober,
 and with a dog whimpering and jumping at his heels.
 
 The young duke passed them for a moment under a severe review.
 
 "Good," he said. "Hang them."
 
 And he turned the other way to watch the progress of the fight.
 
 "My lord," said Dick, "so please you, I have found my reward. Grant me
 the life and liberty of yon old shipman."
 
 Gloucester turned and looked the speaker in the face.
 
 "Sir Richard," he said, "I make not war with peacock's feathers, but
 steel shafts. Those that are mine enemies I slay, and that without
 excuse or favour. For, bethink ye, in this realm of England, that is so
 torn in pieces, there is not a man of mine but hath a brother or a
 friend upon the other party. If, then, I did begin to grant these
 pardons, I might sheathe my sword."
 
 "It may be so, my lord; and yet I will be overbold, and, at the risk of
 your disfavour, recall your lordship's promise," replied Dick.
 
 Richard of Gloucester flushed.
 
 "Mark it right well," he said, harshly. "I love not mercy, nor yet
 mercymongers. Ye have this day laid the foundations of high fortune. If
 ye oppose to me my word, which I have plighted, I will yield. But, by
 the glory of heaven, there your favour dies!"
 
 "Mine is the loss," said Dick.
 
 "Give him his sailor," said the duke; and wheeling his horse, he turned
 his back upon young Shelton.
 
 Dick was nor glad nor sorry. He had seen too much of the young duke to
 set great store on his affection; and the origin and growth of his own
 favour had been too flimsy and too rapid to inspire much confidence. One
 thing alone he feared--that the vindictive leader might revoke the offer
 of the lances. But here he did justice neither to Gloucester's honour
 (such as it was) nor, above all, to his decision. If he had once judged
 Dick to be the right man to pursue Sir Daniel, he was not one to change;
 and he soon proved it by shouting after Catesby to be speedy, for the
 paladin was waiting.
 
 In the meanwhile, Dick turned to the old shipman, who had seemed equally
 indifferent to his condemnation and to his subsequent release.
 
 "Arblaster," said Dick, "I have done you ill; but now, by the rood, I
 think I have cleared the score."
 
 But the old skipper only looked upon him dully and held his peace.
 
 "Come," continued Dick, "a life is a life, old shrew, and it is more
 than ships or liquor. Say ye forgive me; for if your life be worth
 nothing to you, it hath cost me the beginnings of my fortune. Come, I
 have paid for it dearly; be not so churlish."
 
 "An I had had my ship," said Arblaster, "I would 'a' been forth and safe
 on the high seas--I and my man Tom. But ye took my ship, gossip, and I'm
 a beggar; and for my man Tom, a knave fellow in russet shot him down.
 'Murrain!' quoth he, and spake never again. 'Murrain' was the last of
 his words, and the poor spirit of him passed. 'A will never sail no
 more, will my Tom."
 
 Dick was seized with unavailing penitence and pity; he sought to take
 the skipper's hand, but Arblaster avoided his touch.
 
 "Nay," said he, "let be. Y' have played the devil with me, and let that
 content you."
 
 The words died in Richard's throat. He saw, through tears, the poor old
 man, bemused with liquor and sorrow, go shambling away, with bowed head,
 across the snow, and the unnoticed dog whimpering at his heels, and for
 the first time began to understand the desperate game that we play in
 life; and how a thing once done is not to be changed or remedied, by any
 penitence.
 
 But there was no time left to him for vain regret. Catesby had now
 collected the horsemen, and riding up to Dick he dismounted, and offered
 him his own horse.
 
 "This morning," he said, "I was somewhat jealous of your favour; it hath
 not been of a long growth; and now, Sir Richard, it is with a very good
 heart that I offer you this horse--to ride away with."
 
 "Suffer me yet a moment," replied Dick. "This favour of mine--whereupon
 was it founded?"
 
 "Upon your name," answered Catesby. "It is my lord's chief superstition.
 Were my name Richard, I should be an earl to-morrow."
 
 "Well, sir, I thank you," returned Dick; "and since I am little likely
 to follow these great fortunes, I will even say farewell. I will not
 pretend I was displeased to think myself upon the road to fortune; but I
 will not pretend, neither, that I am over-sorry to be done with it.
 Command and riches, they are brave things, to be sure; but a word in
 your ear--yon duke of yours, he is a fearsome lad."
 
 Catesby laughed.
 
 "Nay," said he, "of a verity he that rides with Crooked Dick will ride
 deep. Well, God keep us all from evil! Speed ye well."
 
 Thereupon Dick put himself at the head of his men, and giving the word
 of command, rode off.
 
 He made straight across the town, following what he supposed to be the
 route of Sir Daniel, and spying around for any signs that might decide
 if he were right.
 
 The streets were strewn with the dead and the wounded, whose fate, in
 the bitter frost, was far the more pitiable. Gangs of the victors went
 from house to house, pillaging and stabbing, and sometimes singing
 together as they went.
 
 From different quarters, as he rode on, the sounds of violence and
 outrage came to young Shelton's ears; now the blows of the sledge-hammer
 on some barricaded door, and now the miserable shrieks of women.
 
 Dick's heart had just been awakened. He had just seen the cruel
 consequences of his own behaviour; and the thought of the sum of misery
 that was now acting in the whole of Shoreby filled him with despair.
 
 At length he reached the outskirts, and there, sure enough, he saw
 straight before him the same broad, beaten track across the snow that he
 had marked from the summit of the church. Here, then, he went the faster
 on; but still, as he rode, he kept a bright eye upon the fallen men and
 horses that lay beside the track. Many of these, he was relieved to see,
 wore Sir Daniel's colours, and the faces of some, who lay upon their
 back, he even recognised.
 
 About half-way between the town and the forest, those whom he was
 following had plainly been assailed by archers; for the corpses lay
 pretty closely scattered, each pierced by an arrow. And here Dick spied
 among the rest the body of a very young lad, whose face was somehow
 hauntingly familiar to him.
 
 He halted his troop, dismounted, and raised the lad's head. As he did
 so, the hood fell back, and a profusion of long brown hair unrolled
 itself. At the same time the eyes opened.
 
 "Ah! lion driver!" said a feeble voice. "She is farther on. Ride--ride
 fast!"
 
 And then the poor young lady fainted once again.
 
 One of Dick's men carried a flask of some strong cordial, and with this
 Dick succeeded in reviving consciousness. Then he took Joanna's friend
 upon his saddle-bow, and once more pushed toward the forest.
 
 "Why do ye take me?" said the girl. "Ye but delay your speed."
 
 "Nay, Mistress Risingham," replied Dick. "Shoreby is full of blood and
 drunkenness and riot. Here ye are safe; content ye."
 
 "I will not be beholden to any of your faction," she cried; "set me
 down."
 
 "Madam, ye know not what ye say," returned Dick. "Y'are hurt----"
 
 "I am not," she said. "It was my horse was slain."
 
 "It matters not one jot," replied Richard. "Ye are here in the midst of
 open snow, and compassed about with enemies. Whether ye will or not, I
 carry you with me. Glad am I to have the occasion; for thus shall I
 repay some portion of our debt."
 
 For a little while she was silent. Then, very suddenly, she asked:
 
 "My uncle?"
 
 "My Lord Risingham?" returned Dick. "I would I had good news to give
 you, madam; but I have none. I saw him once in the battle, and once
 only. Let us hope the best."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 NIGHT IN THE WOODS: ALICIA RISINGHAM
 
 
 It was almost certain that Sir Daniel had made for the Moat House; but,
 considering the heavy snow, the lateness of the hour, and the necessity
 under which he would lie of avoiding the few roads and striking across
 the wood, it was equally certain that he could not hope to reach it ere
 the morrow.
 
 There were two courses open to Dick: either to continue to follow in the
 knight's trail, and, if he were able, to fall upon him that very night
 in camp, or to strike out a path of his own, and seek to place himself
 between Sir Daniel and his destination.
 
 Either scheme was open to serious objection, and Dick, who feared to
 expose Joanna to the hazards of a fight, had not yet decided between
 them when he reached the borders of the wood.
 
 At this point Sir Daniel had turned a little to his left, and then
 plunged straight under a grove of very lofty timber. His party had then
 formed to a narrower front, in order to pass between the trees, and the
 track was trod proportionally deeper in the snow. The eye followed it,
 under the leafless tracery of the oaks, running direct and narrow; the
 trees stood over it, with knotty joints and the great, uplifted forest
 of their boughs; there was no sound, whether of man or beast--not so
 much as the stirring of a robin; and over the field of snow the winter
 sun lay golden among netted shadows.
 
 "How say ye," asked Dick of one of the men, "to follow straight on, or
 strike across for Tunstall?"
 
 "Sir Richard," replied the man-at-arms, "I would follow the line until
 they scatter."
 
 "Ye are, doubtless, right," returned Dick; "but we came right hastily
 upon the errand, even as the time commanded. Here are no houses, neither
 for food nor shelter, and by the morrow's dawn we shall know both cold
 fingers and an empty belly. How say ye, lads? Will ye stand a pinch for
 expedition's sake, or shall we turn by Holywood and sup with Mother
 Church? The case being somewhat doubtful, I will drive no man; yet if ye
 would suffer me to lead you, ye would choose the first."
 
 The men answered, almost with one voice, that they would follow Sir
 Richard where he would.
 
 And Dick, setting spur to his horse, began once more to go forward.
 
 The snow in the trail had been trodden very hard, and the pursuers had
 thus a great advantage over the pursued. They pushed on, indeed, at a
 round trot, two hundred hoofs beating alternately on the dull pavement
 of the snow, and the jingle of weapons and the snorting of horses
 raising a warlike noise along the arches of the silent wood.
 
 Presently, the wide slot of the pursued came out upon the highroad from
 Holywood; it was there, for a moment, indistinguishable; and, where it
 once more plunged into the unbeaten snow upon the farther side, Dick was
 surprised to see it narrower and lighter trod. Plainly, profiting by the
 road, Sir Daniel had begun already to scatter his command.
 
 At all hazards, one chance being equal to another, Dick continued to
 pursue the straight trail; and that, after an hour's riding, in which it
 led into the very depths of the forest, suddenly split, like a bursting
 shell, into two dozen others, leading to every point of the compass.
 
 Dick drew bridle in despair. The short winter's day was near an end; the
 sun, a dull red orange, shorn of rays, swam low among the leafless
 thickets; the shadows were a mile long upon the snow; the frost bit
 cruelly at the finger-nails; and the breath and steam of the horses
 mounted in a cloud.
 
 "Well, we are outwitted," Dick confessed. "Strike we for Holywood, after
 all. It is still nearer us than Tunstall--or should be by the station of
 the sun."
 
 So they wheeled to their left, turning their backs on the red shield of
 sun, and made across country for the abbey. But now times were changed
 with them; they could no longer spank forth briskly on a path beaten
 firm by the passage of their foes, and for a goal to which that path
 itself conducted them. Now they must plough at a dull pace through the
 encumbering snow, continually pausing to decide their course,
 continually floundering in drifts. The sun soon left them; the glow of
 the west decayed; and presently they were wandering in a shadow of
 blackness, under frosty stars.
 
 Presently, indeed, the moon would clear the hill-tops, and they might
 resume their march. But till then, every random step might carry them
 wider of their march. There was nothing for it but to camp and wait.
 
 Sentries were posted; a spot of ground was cleared of snow, and, after
 some failures, a good fire blazed in the midst. The men-at-arms sat
 close about this forest hearth, sharing such provisions as they had, and
 passing about the flask; and Dick, having collected the most delicate of
 the rough and scanty fare, brought it to Lord Risingham's niece, where
 she sat apart from the soldiery against a tree.
 
 She sat upon one horse-cloth, wrapped in another, and stared straight
 before her at the firelit scene. At the offer of food she started, like
 one wakened from a dream, and then silently refused.
 
 "Madam," said Dick, "let me beseech you, punish me not so cruelly.
 Wherein I have offended you, I know not; I have, indeed, carried you
 away, but with a friendly violence; I have, indeed, exposed you to the
 inclemency of night, but the hurry that lies upon me hath for its end
 the preservation of another, who is no less frail and no less unfriended
 than yourself. At least, madam, punish not yourself; and eat, if not for
 hunger, then for strength."
 
 "I will eat nothing at the hands that slew my kinsman," she replied.
 
 "Dear madam," Dick cried, "I swear to you upon the rood I touched him
 not."
 
 "Swear to me that he still lives," she returned.
 
 "I will not palter with you," answered Dick. "Pity bids me to wound you.
 In my heart I do believe him dead."
 
 "And ye ask me to eat!" she cried. "Ay, and they call you 'sir'! Y' have
 won your spurs by my good kinsman's murder. And had I not been fool and
 traitor both, and saved you in your enemy's house, ye should have died
 the death, and he--he that was worth twelve of you--were living."
 
 "I did but my man's best, even as your kinsman did upon the other
 party," answered Dick. "Were he still living--as I vow to Heaven I wish
 it!--he would praise, not blame me."
 
 "Sir Daniel hath told me," she replied. "He marked you at the barricade.
 Upon you, he saith, their party foundered; it was you that won the
 battle. Well, then, it was you that killed my good Lord Risingham, as
 sure as though ye had strangled him. And ye would have me eat with
 you--and your hands not washed from killing? But Sir Daniel hath sworn
 your downfall. He 'tis that will avenge me!"
 
 The unfortunate Dick was plunged in gloom. Old Arblaster returned upon
 his mind, and he groaned aloud.
 
 "Do ye hold me so guilty?" he said; "you that defended me--you that are
 Joanna's friend?"
 
 "What made ye in the battle?" she retorted. "Y'are of no party; y'are
 but a lad--but legs and body, without government of wit or counsel!
 Wherefore did ye fight? For the love of hurt, pardy!"
 
 "Nay," cried Dick, "I know not. But as the realm of England goes, if
 that a poor gentleman fight not upon the one side, perforce he must
 fight upon the other. He may not stand alone; 'tis not in nature."
 
 "They that have no judgment should not draw the sword," replied the
 young lady. "Ye that fight but for a hazard, what are ye but a butcher?
 War is but noble by the cause, and y' have disgraced it."
 
 "Madam," said the miserable Dick, "I do partly see mine error. I have
 made too much haste; I have been busy before my time. Already I stole a
 ship--thinking, I do swear it, to do well--and thereby brought about the
 death of many innocent, and the grief and ruin of a poor old man whose
 face this very day hath stabbed me like a dagger. And for this morning,
 I did but design to do myself credit, and get fame to marry with, and,
 behold! I have brought about the death of your dear kinsman that was
 good to me. And what besides, I know not. For, alas! I may have set York
 upon the throne, and that may be the worser cause, and may do hurt to
 England. O, madam, I do see my sin. I am unfit for life. I will, for
 penance' sake and to avoid worse evil, once I have finished this
 adventure, get me to a cloister. I will forswear Joanna and the trade of
 arms. I will be a friar, and pray for your good kinsman's spirit all my
 days."
 
 It appeared to Dick, in this extremity of his humiliation and
 repentance, that the young lady had laughed.
 
 Raising his countenance, he found her looking down upon him, in the
 firelight, with a somewhat peculiar but not unkind expression.
 
 "Madam," he cried, thinking the laughter to have been an illusion of his
 hearing, but still, from her changed looks, hoping to have touched her
 heart, "madam, will not this content you? I give up all to undo what I
 have done amiss; I make heaven certain for Lord Risingham. And all this
 upon the very day that I have won my spurs, and thought myself the
 happiest young gentleman on ground."
 
 "O boy," she said--"good boy!"
 
 And then, to the extreme surprise of Dick, she first very tenderly wiped
 the tears away from his cheeks, and then, as if yielding to a sudden
 impulse, threw both her arms about his neck, drew up his face, and
 kissed him. A pitiful bewilderment came over simple-minded Dick.
 
 "But come," she said, with great cheerfulness, "you that are a captain,
 ye must eat. Why sup ye not?"
 
 "Dear Mistress Risingham," replied Dick, "I did but wait first upon my
 prisoner; but, to say truth, penitence will no longer suffer me to
 endure the sight of food. I were better to fast, dear lady, and to
 pray."
 
 "Call me Alicia," she said; "are we not old friends? And now, come, I
 will eat with you, bit for bit and sup for sup; so if ye eat not,
 neither will I; but if ye eat hearty, I will dine like a ploughman."
 
 So there and then she fell to; and Dick, who had an excellent stomach,
 proceeded to bear her company, at first with great reluctance, but
 gradually, as he entered into the spirit, with more and more vigour and
 devotion: until, at last, he forgot even to watch his model, and most
 heartily repaired the expenses of his day of labour and excitement.
 
 "Lion-driver," she said, at length, "ye do not admire a maid in a man's
 jerkin?"
 
 The moon was now up; and they were only waiting to repose the wearied
 horses. By the moon's light, the still penitent but now well-fed Richard
 beheld her looking somewhat coquettishly down upon him.
 
 "Madam--" he stammered, surprised at this new turn in her manners.
 
 "Nay," she interrupted, "it skills not to deny; Joanna hath told me, but
 come, sir lion-driver, look at me--am I so homely--come!"
 
 And she made bright eyes at him.
 
 "Ye are something smallish, indeed--" began Dick.
 
 And here again she interrupted him, this time with a ringing peal of
 laughter that completed his confusion and surprise.
 
 "Smallish!" she cried. "Nay, now, be honest as ye are bold; I am a
 dwarf, or little better; but for all that--come, tell me!--for all that,
 passably fair to look upon; is't not so?"
 
 "Nay, madam, exceedingly fair," said the distressed knight, pitifully
 trying to seem easy.
 
 "And a man would be right glad to wed me?" she pursued.
 
 "O, madam, right glad!" agreed Dick.
 
 "Call me Alicia," said she.
 
 "Alicia," quoth Sir Richard.
 
 "Well, then, lion-driver," she continued, "sith that ye slew my kinsman,
 and left me without stay, ye owe me, in honour, every reparation; do ye
 not?"
 
 "I do, madam," said Dick. "Although, upon my heart, I do hold me but
 partially guilty of that brave knight's blood."
 
 "Would ye evade me?" she cried.
 
 "Madam, not so. I have told you; at your bidding, I will even turn me a
 monk," said Richard.
 
 "Then, in honour, ye belong to me?" she concluded.
 
 "In honour, madam, I suppose--" began the young man.
 
 "Go to!" she interrupted; "ye are too full of catches. In honour do ye
 belong to me, till ye have paid the evil?"
 
 "In honour, I do," said Dick.
 
 "Hear, then," she continued. "Ye would make but a sad friar, methinks;
 and since I am to dispose of you at pleasure, I will even take you for
 my husband. Nay, now, no words!" cried she. "They will avail you
 nothing. For see how just it is, that you who deprived me of one home,
 should supply me with another. And as for Joanna, she will be the first,
 believe me, to commend the change; for, after all, as we be dear
 friends, what matters it with which of us ye wed? Not one whit!"
 
 "Madam," said Dick, "I will go into a cloister, an ye please to bid me;
 but to wed with any one in this big world besides Joanna Sedley is what
 I will consent to neither for man's force nor yet for lady's pleasure.
 Pardon me if I speak my plain thoughts plainly; but where a maid is very
 bold, a poor man must even be the bolder."
 
 "Dick," she said, "ye sweet boy, ye must come and kiss me for that word.
 Nay, fear not, ye shall kiss me for Joanna; and when we meet, I shall
 give it back to her, and say I stole it. And as for what ye owe me, why,
 dear simpleton, methinks ye were not alone in that great battle; and
 even if York be on the throne, it was not you that set him there. But
 for a good, sweet, honest heart, Dick, y'are all that; and if I could
 find it in my soul to envy your Joanna anything, I would even envy her
 your love."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 NIGHT IN THE WOODS (CONCLUDED): DICK AND JOAN
 
 
 The horses had by this time finished the small store of provender, and
 fully breathed from their fatigues. At Dick's command, the fire was
 smothered in snow; and while his men got once more wearily to saddle, he
 himself, remembering, somewhat late, true woodland caution, chose a tall
 oak and nimbly clambered to the topmost fork. Hence he could look far
 abroad on the moonlit and snow-paven forest. On the south-west, dark
 against the horizon, stood those upland, heathy quarters where he and
 Joanna had met with the terrifying misadventure of the leper. And there
 his eye was caught by a spot of ruddy brightness no bigger than a
 needle's eye.
 
 He blamed himself sharply for his previous neglect. Were that, as it
 appeared to be, the shining of Sir Daniel's camp-fire, he should long
 ago have seen and marched for it; above all, he should, for no
 consideration, have announced his neighbourhood by lighting a fire of
 his own. But now he must no longer squander valuable hours. The direct
 way to the uplands was about two miles in length; but it was crossed by
 a very deep, precipitous dingle, impassable to mounted men; and for the
 sake of speed, it seemed to Dick advisable to desert the horses and
 attempt the adventure on foot.
 
 Ten men were left to guard the horses; signals were agreed upon by which
 they could communicate in case of need; and Dick set forth at the head
 of the remainder, Alicia Risingham walking stoutly by his side.
 
 The men had freed themselves of heavy armour, and left behind their
 lances; and they now marched with a very good spirit in the frozen snow,
 and under the exhilarating lustre of the moon. The descent into the
 dingle, where a stream strained sobbing through the snow and ice, was
 effected with silence and order; and on the farther side, being then
 within a short half-mile of where Dick had seen the glimmer of the fire,
 the party halted to breathe before the attack.
 
 In the vast silence of the wood, the lightest sounds were audible from
 far; and Alicia, who was keen of hearing, held up her finger warningly
 and stooped to listen. All followed her example; but besides the groans
 of the choked brook in the dingle close behind, and the barking of a fox
 at a distance of many miles among the forest, to Dick's acutest
 hearkening, not a breath was audible.
 
 "But yet, for sure, I heard the clash of harness," whispered Alicia.
 
 "Madam," returned Dick, who was more afraid of that young lady than of
 ten stout warriors, "I would not hint ye were mistaken; but it might
 well have come from either of the camps."
 
 "It came not thence. It came from westward," she declared.
 
 "It may be what it will," returned Dick; "and it must be as Heaven
 please. Reck we not a jot, but push on the livelier, and put it to the
 touch. Up, friends--enough breathed."
 
 As they advanced, the snow became more and more trampled with
 hoof-marks, and it was plain that they were drawing near to the
 encampment of a considerable force of mounted men. Presently they could
 see the smoke pouring from among the trees, ruddily coloured on its
 lower edge and scattering bright sparks.
 
 And here, pursuant to Dick's orders, his men began to open out, creeping
 stealthily in the covert, to surround on every side the camp of their
 opponents. He himself, placing Alicia in the shelter of a bulky oak,
 stole straight forth in the direction of the fire.
 
 At last, through an opening of the wood, his eye embraced the scene of
 the encampment. The fire had been built upon a heathy hummock of the
 ground, surrounded on three sides by thicket, and it now burned very
 strong, roaring aloud and brandishing flames. Around it there sat not
 quite a dozen people, warmly cloaked; but though the neighbouring snow
 was trampled down as by a regiment, Dick looked in vain for any horse.
 He began to have a terrible misgiving that he was out-manoeuvred. At the
 same time, in a tall man with a steel salet, who was spreading his hands
 before the blaze, he recognised his old friend and still kindly enemy,
 Bennet Hatch; and in two others, sitting a little back, he made out,
 even in their male disguise, Joanna Sedley and Sir Daniel's wife.
 
 "Well," thought he to himself, "even if I lose my horses, let me get my
 Joanna, and why should I complain?"
 
 And then, from the farther side of the encampment, there came a little
 whistle, announcing that his men had joined, and the investment was
 complete.
 
 Bennet, at the sound, started to his feet; but ere he had time to spring
 upon his arms, Dick hailed him.
 
 "Bennet," he said--"Bennet, old friend, yield ye. Ye will but spill
 men's lives in vain, if ye resist."
 
 "'Tis Master Shelton, by St. Barbary!" cried Hatch. "Yield me? Ye ask
 much. What force have ye?"
 
 "I tell you, Bennet, ye are both outnumbered and begirt," said Dick.
 "Caesar and Charlemagne would cry for quarter. I have two-score men at my
 whistle, and with one shoot of arrows I could answer for you all."
 
 "Master Dick," said Bennet, "it goes against my heart; but I must do my
 duty. The saints help you!" And therewith he raised a little tucket to
 his mouth and wound a rousing call.
 
 Then followed a moment of confusion; for while Dick, fearing for the
 ladies, still hesitated to give the word to shoot, Hatch's little band
 sprang to their weapons and formed back to back as for a fierce
 resistance. In the hurry of their change of place, Joanna sprang from
 her seat and ran like an arrow to her lover's side.
 
 "Here, Dick!" she cried, as she clasped his hand in hers.
 
 But Dick still stood irresolute; he was yet young to the more deplorable
 necessities of war, and the thought of old Lady Brackley checked the
 command upon his tongue. His own men became restive. Some of them cried
 on him by name; others, of their own accord, began to shoot; and at the
 first discharge poor Bennet bit the dust. Then Dick awoke.
 
 "On!" he cried. "Shoot, boys, and keep to cover. England and York!"
 
 But just then the dull beat of many horses on the snow suddenly arose in
 the hollow ear of the night, and, with incredible swiftness, drew nearer
 and swelled louder. At the same time, answering tuckets repeated and
 repeated Hatch's call.
 
 "Rally, rally!" cried Dick. "Rally upon me! Rally for your lives!"
 
 But his men--afoot, scattered, taken in the hour when they had counted
 on an easy triumph--began instead to give ground severally, and either
 stood wavering or dispersed into the thickets. And when the first of the
 horsemen came charging through the open avenues and fiercely riding
 their steeds into the underwood, a few stragglers were overthrown or
 speared among the brush, but the bulk of Dick's command had simply
 melted at the rumour of their coming.
 
 Dick stood for a moment, bitterly recognising the fruits of his
 precipitate and unwise valour. Sir Daniel had seen the fire; he had
 moved out with his main force, whether to attack his pursuers or to take
 them in the rear if they should venture the assault. His had been
 throughout the part of a sagacious captain; Dick's the conduct of an
 eager boy. And here was the young knight, his sweetheart, indeed,
 holding him tightly by the hand, but otherwise alone, his whole command
 of men and horses dispersed in the night and the wide forest, like a
 paper of pins in a hay barn.
 
 "The saints enlighten me!" he thought. "It is well I was knighted for
 this morning's matter; this doth me little honour."
 
 And thereupon, still holding Joanna, he began to run.
 
 The silence of the night was now shattered by the shouts of the men of
 Tunstall, as they galloped hither and thither, hunting fugitives; and
 Dick broke boldly through the underwood and ran straight before him like
 a deer. The silver clearness of the moon upon the open snow increased,
 by contrast, the obscurity of the thickets; and the extreme dispersion
 of the vanquished led the pursuers into widely divergent paths. Hence,
 in but a little while, Dick and Joanna paused, in a close covert, and
 heard the sounds of the pursuit, scattering abroad, indeed, in all
 directions, but yet fainting already in the distance.
 
 "An I had but kept a reserve of them together," Dick cried, bitterly, "I
 could have turned the tables yet! Well, we live and learn; next time it
 shall go better, by the rood."
 
 "Nay, Dick," said Joanna, "what matters it? Here we are together once
 again."
 
 He looked at her, and there she was--John Matcham, as of yore, in hose
 and doublet. But now he knew her; now, even in that ungainly dress, she
 smiled upon him, bright with love; and his heart was transported with
 joy.
 
 "Sweetheart," he said, "if ye forgive this blunderer, what care I? Make
 we direct for Holywood; there lieth your good guardian and my better
 friend, Lord Foxham. There shall we be wed; and whether poor or wealthy,
 famous or unknown, what matters it? This day, dear love, I won my spurs;
 I was commended by great men for my valour; I thought myself the
 goodliest man of war in all broad England. Then, first, I fell out of my
 favour with the great; and now have I been well thrashed, and clean lost
 my soldiers. There was a downfall for conceit! But, dear, I care
 not--dear, if ye still love me and will wed, I would have my knighthood
 done away, and mind it not a jot."
 
 "My Dick!" she cried. "And did they knight you?"
 
 "Ay, dear, ye are my lady now," he answered, fondly; "or ye shall, ere
 noon to-morrow--will ye not?"
 
 "That will I, Dick, with a glad heart," she answered.
 
 "Ay, sir? Methought ye were to be a monk!" said a voice in their ears.
 
 "Alicia!" cried Joanna.
 
 "Even so," replied the young lady, coming forward. "Alicia, whom ye left
 for dead, and whom your lion-driver found, and brought to life again,
 and, by my sooth, made love to, if ye want to know!"
 
 "I'll not believe it," cried Joanna. "Dick!"
 
 "Dick!" mimicked Alicia. "Dick, indeed! Ay, fair sir, and ye desert poor
 damsels in distress," she continued, turning to the young knight. "Ye
 leave them planted behind oaks. But they say true--the age of chivalry
 is dead."
 
 "Madam," cried Dick, in despair, "upon my soul I had forgotten you
 outright. Madam, ye must try to pardon me. Ye see, I had new found
 Joanna!"
 
 "I did not suppose that ye had done it o' purpose," she retorted. "But I
 will be cruelly avenged. I will tell a secret to my Lady Shelton--she
 that is to be," she added, curtseying. "Joanna," she continued, "I
 believe, upon my soul, your sweetheart is a bold fellow in a fight, but
 he is, let me tell you plainly, the softest-hearted simpleton in
 England. Go to--ye may do your pleasure with him! And now, fool
 children, first kiss me, either one of you, for luck and kindness; and
 then kiss each other just one minute by the glass, and not one second
 longer; and then let us all three set forth for Holywood as fast as we
 can stir; for these woods, methinks, are full of peril and exceeding
 cold."
 
 "But did my Dick make love to you?" asked Joanna, clinging to her
 sweetheart's side.
 
 "Nay, fool girl," returned Alicia; "It was I made love to him. I offered
 to marry him, indeed; but he bade me go marry with my likes. These were
 his words. Nay, that I will say: he is more plain than pleasant. But
 now, children, for the sake of sense, set forward. Shall we go once more
 over the dingle, or push straight for Holywood?"
 
 "Why," said Dick, "I would like dearly to get upon a horse; for I have
 been sore mauled and beaten, one way and another, these last days, and
 my poor body is one bruise. But how think ye? If the men, upon the alarm
 of the fighting, had fled away, we should have gone about for nothing.
 'Tis but some three short miles to Holywood direct; the bell hath not
 beat nine; the snow is pretty firm to walk upon, the moon clear; how if
 we went even as we are?"
 
 "Agreed," cried Alicia; but Joanna only pressed upon Dick's arm.
 
 Forth, then, they went, through open leafless groves and down snow-clad
 alleys, under the white face of the winter moon; Dick and Joanna walking
 hand in hand and in a heaven of pleasure; and their light-minded
 companion, her own bereavements heartily forgotten, followed a pace or
 two behind, now rallying them upon their silence, and now drawing happy
 pictures of their future and united lives.
 
 Still, indeed, in the distance of the wood, the riders of Tunstall might
 be heard urging their pursuit; and from time to time cries or the clash
 of steel announced the shock of enemies. But in these young folk, bred
 among the alarms of war, and fresh from such a multiplicity of dangers,
 neither fear nor pity could be lightly wakened. Content to find the
 sounds still drawing farther and farther away, they gave up their hearts
 to the enjoyment of the hour, walking already, as Alicia put it, in a
 wedding procession; and neither the rude solitude of the forest, nor the
 cold of the freezing night, had any force to shadow or distract their
 happiness.
 
 At length, from a rising hill, they looked below them on the dell of
 Holywood. The great windows of the forest abbey shone with torch and
 candle; its high pinnacles and spires arose very clear and silent, and
 the gold rood upon the topmost summit glittered brightly in the moon.
 All about it, in the open glade, camp-fires were burning, and the ground
 was thick with huts; and across the midst of the picture the frozen
 river curved.
 
 "By the mass," said Richard, "there are Lord Foxham's fellows still
 encamped. The messenger hath certainly miscarried. Well, then, so
 better. We have power at hand to face Sir Daniel."
 
 But if Lord Foxham's men still lay encamped in the long holm at
 Holywood, it was from a different reason from the one supposed by Dick.
 They had marched, indeed, for Shoreby; but ere they were half-way
 thither, a second messenger met them, and bade them return to their
 morning's camp, to bar the road against Lancastrian fugitives, and to be
 so much nearer to the main army of York. For Richard of Gloucester,
 having finished the battle and stamped out his foes in that district,
 was already on the march to rejoin his brother; and not long after the
 return of my Lord Foxham's retainers, Crookback himself drew rein before
 the abbey door. It was in honour of this august visitor that the windows
 shone with lights; and at the hour of Dick's arrival with his sweetheart
 and her friend, the whole ducal party was being entertained in the
 refectory with the splendour of that powerful and luxurious monastery.
 
 Dick, not quite with his good-will, was brought before them. Gloucester,
 sick with fatigue, sat leaning upon one hand his white and terrifying
 countenance; Lord Foxham, half recovered from his wound, was in a place
 of honour on his left.
 
 "How, sir?" asked Richard. "Have ye brought me Sir Daniel's head?"
 
 "My lord duke," replied Dick, stoutly enough, but with a qualm at heart,
 "I have not even the good fortune to return with my command. I have
 been, so please your grace, well beaten."
 
 Gloucester looked upon him with a formidable frown.
 
 "I gave you fifty lances,[3] sir," he said.
 
     [3] Technically, the term "lance" included a not quite certain
     number of foot soldiers attached to the man-at-arms.
 
 "My lord duke, I had but fifty men-at-arms," replied the young knight.
 
 "How is this?" said Gloucester. "He did ask me fifty lances."
 
 "May it please your grace," replied Catesby, smoothly, "for a pursuit we
 gave him but the horsemen."
 
 "It is well," replied Richard, adding, "Shelton, ye may go."
 
 "Stay!" said Lord Foxham. "This young man likewise had a charge from me.
 It may be he hath better sped. Say, Master Shelton, have ye found the
 maid?"
 
 "I praise the saints, my lord," said Dick, "she is in this house."
 
 "Is it even so? Well, then, my lord the duke," resumed Lord Foxham,
 "with your good-will, to-morrow, before the army march, I do propose a
 marriage. This young squire----"
 
 "Young knight," interrupted Catesby.
 
 "Say ye so, Sir William?" cried Lord Foxham.
 
 "I did myself, and for good service, dub him knight," said Gloucester.
 "He hath twice manfully served me. It is not valour of hands, it is a
 man's mind of iron, that he lacks. He will not rise, Lord Foxham. 'Tis a
 fellow that will fight indeed bravely in a mellay, but hath a capon's
 heart. Howbeit, if he is to marry, marry him in the name of Mary, and be
 done!"
 
 "Nay, he is a brave lad--I know it," said Lord Foxham. "Content ye,
 then, Sir Richard. I have compounded this affair with Master Hamley, and
 to-morrow ye shall wed."
 
 Whereupon Dick judged it prudent to withdraw; but he was not yet clear
 of the refectory, when a man, but newly alighted at the gate, came
 running four stairs at a bound, and, brushing through the abbey
 servants, threw himself on one knee before the duke.
 
 "Victory, my lord," he cried.
 
 And before Dick had got to the chamber set apart for him as Lord
 Foxham's guest, the troops in the holm were cheering around their fires;
 for upon that same day, not twenty miles away, a second crushing blow
 had been dealt to the power of Lancaster.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 DICK'S REVENGE
 
 
 The next morning Dick was afoot before the sun, and having dressed
 himself to the best advantage with the aid of the Lord Foxham's baggage,
 and got good reports of Joan, he set forth on foot to walk away his
 impatience.
 
 For some while he made rounds among the soldiery, who were getting to
 arms in the wintry twilight of the dawn and by the red glow of torches;
 but gradually he strolled farther afield, and at length passed clean
 beyond the outposts, and walked alone in the frozen forest, waiting for
 the sun.
 
 His thoughts were both quiet and happy. His brief favour with the duke
 he could not find it in his heart to mourn; with Joan to wife, and my
 Lord Foxham for a faithful patron, he looked most happily upon the
 future; and in the past he found but little to regret.
 
 As he thus strolled and pondered, the solemn light of the morning grew
 more clear, the east was already coloured by the sun, and a little
 scathing wind blew up the frozen snow. He turned to go home; but even as
 he turned, his eye lit upon a figure behind a tree.
 
 "Stand!" he cried. "Who goes?"
 
 The figure stepped forth and waved its hand like a dumb person. It was
 arrayed like a pilgrim, the hood lowered over the face, but Dick, in an
 instant, recognised Sir Daniel.
 
 He strode up to him, drawing his sword; and the knight, putting his hand
 in his bosom, as if to seize a hidden weapon, steadfastly awaited his
 approach.
 
 "Well, Dickon," said Sir Daniel, "how is it to be? Do ye make war upon
 the fallen?"
 
 "I made no war upon your life," replied the lad; "I was your true friend
 until ye sought for mine; but ye have sought for it greedily."
 
 "Nay--self-defence," replied the knight. "And now, boy, the news of this
 battle, and the presence of yon crooked devil here in mine own wood,
 have broken me beyond all help. I go to Holywood for sanctuary; thence
 overseas, with what I can carry, and to begin life again in Burgundy or
 France."
 
 "Ye may not go to Holywood," said Dick.
 
 "How! May not?" asked the knight.
 
 "Look ye, Sir Daniel, this is my marriage morn," said Dick; "and yon sun
 that is to rise will make the brightest day that ever shone for me. Your
 life is forfeit--doubly forfeit, for my father's death and your own
 practices to meward. But I myself have done amiss; I have brought about
 men's deaths; and upon this glad day I will be neither judge nor
 hangman. An ye were the devil, I would not lay a hand on you. An ye were
 the devil, ye might go where ye will for me. Seek God's forgiveness;
 mine ye have freely. But to go on to Holywood is different. I carry arms
 for York, and I will suffer no spy within their lines. Hold it, then,
 for certain, if ye set one foot before another, I will uplift my voice
 and call the nearest post to seize you."
 
 "Ye mock me," said Sir Daniel. "I have no safety out of Holywood."
 
 "I care no more," returned Richard. "I let you go east, west, or south;
 north I will not. Holywood is shut against you. Go, and seek not to
 return. For, once ye are gone, I will warn every post about this army,
 and there will be so shrewd a watch upon all pilgrims that, once again,
 were ye the very devil, ye would find it ruin to make the essay."
 
 "Ye doom me," said Sir Daniel, gloomily.
 
 "I doom you not," returned Richard. "If it so please you to set your
 valour against mine, come on; and though I fear it be disloyal to my
 party, I will take the challenge openly and fully, fight you with mine
 own single strength, and call for none to help me. So shall I avenge my
 father, with a perfect conscience."
 
 "Ay," said Sir Daniel, "y' have a long sword against my dagger."
 
 "I rely upon Heaven only," answered Dick, casting his sword some way
 behind him on the snow. "Now, if your ill-fate bids you, come; and,
 under the pleasure of the Almighty, I make myself bold to feed your
 bones to foxes."
 
 "I did but try you, Dickon," returned the knight, with an uneasy
 semblance of a laugh. "I would not spill your blood."
 
 "Go, then, ere it be too late," replied Shelton. "In five minutes I will
 call the post. I do perceive that I am too long-suffering. Had but our
 places been reversed, I should have been bound hand and foot some
 minutes past."
 
 "Well, Dickon, I will go," replied Sir Daniel. "When we next meet, it
 shall repent you that ye were so harsh."
 
 And with these words, the knight turned and began to move off under the
 trees. Dick watched him with strangely-mingled feelings, as he went,
 swiftly and warily, and ever and again turning a wicked eye upon the lad
 who had spared him, and whom he still suspected.
 
 There was upon one side of where he went a thicket, strongly matted with
 green ivy, and, even in its winter state, impervious to the eye. Herein,
 all of a sudden, a bow sounded like a note of music. An arrow flew, and
 with a great, choked cry of agony and anger, the Knight of Tunstall
 threw up his hands and fell forward in the snow.
 
 Dick bounded to his side and raised him. His face desperately worked;
 his whole body was shaken by contorting spasms.
 
 "Is the arrow black?" he gasped.
 
 "It is black," replied Dick, gravely.
 
 And then, before he could add one word, a desperate seizure of pain
 shook the wounded man from head to foot, so that his body leaped in
 Dick's supporting arms, and with the extremity of that pang his spirit
 fled in silence.
 
 The young man laid him back gently on the snow and prayed for that
 unprepared and guilty spirit, and as he prayed the sun came up at a
 bound, and the robins began chirping in the ivy.
 
 When he rose to his feet, he found another man upon his knees but a few
 steps behind him, and, still with uncovered head, he waited until that
 prayer also should be over. It took long; the man, with his head bowed
 and his face covered with his hands, prayed like one in a great disorder
 or distress of mind; and by the bow that lay beside him, Dick judged
 that he was no other than the archer who had laid Sir Daniel low.
 
 At length he, also, rose, and showed the countenance of Ellis Duckworth.
 
 "Richard," he said, very gravely, "I heard you. Ye took the better part
 and pardoned; I took the worse, and there lies the clay of mine enemy.
 Pray for me."
 
 And he wrung him by the hand.
 
 "Sir," said Richard, "I will pray for you, indeed; though how I may
 prevail I wot not. But if ye have so long pursued revenge, and find it
 now of such a sorry flavour, bethink ye, were it not well to pardon
 others? Hatch--he is dead, poor shrew! I would have spared a better; and
 for Sir Daniel, here lies his body. But for the priest, if I might
 anywise prevail, I would have you let him go."
 
 A flash came into the eyes of Ellis Duckworth.
 
 "Nay," he said, "the devil is still strong within me. But be at rest;
 the Black Arrow flieth nevermore--the fellowship is broken. They that
 still live shall come to their quiet and ripe end, in Heaven's good
 time, for me; and for yourself, go where your better fortune calls you,
 and think no more of Ellis."
 
 [Illustration: _"But be at rest; the Black Arrow flieth nevermore"_]
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 CONCLUSION
 
 
 About nine in the morning, Lord Foxham was leading his ward, once more
 dressed as befitted her sex, and followed by Alicia Risingham, to the
 church of Holywood, when Richard Crookback, his brow already heavy with
 cares, crossed their path and paused.
 
 "Is this the maid?" he asked; and when Lord Foxham had replied in the
 affirmative, "Minion," he added, "hold up your face until I see its
 favour."
 
 He looked upon her sourly for a little.
 
 "Ye are fair," he said at last, "and, as they tell me, dowered. How if I
 offered you a brave marriage, as became your face and parentage?"
 
 "My lord duke," replied Joanna, "may it please your grace, I had rather
 wed with Sir Richard."
 
 "How so?" he asked, harshly. "Marry but the man I name to you, and he
 shall be my lord, and you my lady, before night. For Sir Richard, let me
 tell you plainly, he will die Sir Richard."
 
 "I ask no more of Heaven, my lord, than but to die Sir Richard's wife,"
 returned Joanna.
 
 "Look ye at that, my lord," said Gloucester, turning to Lord Foxham.
 "Here be a pair for you. The lad, when for good services I gave him his
 choice of my favour, chose but the grace of an old, drunken shipman. I
 did warn him freely, but he was stout in his besottedness. 'Here dieth
 your favour,' said I; and he, my lord, with a most assured impertinence,
 'Mine be the loss,' quoth he. It shall be so, by the rood!"
 
 "Said he so?" cried Alicia. "Then well said, lion-driver!"
 
 "Who is this?" asked the duke.
 
 "A prisoner of Sir Richard's," answered Lord Foxham; "Mistress Alicia
 Risingham."
 
 "See that she be married to a sure man," said the duke.
 
 "I had thought of my kinsman, Hamley, an it like your grace," returned
 Lord Foxham. "He hath well served the cause."
 
 "It likes me well," said Richard. "Let them be wedded speedily. Say,
 fair maid, will you wed?"
 
 "My lord duke," said Alicia, "so as the man is straight--" And there, in
 a perfect consternation, the voice died on her tongue.
 
 "He is straight, my mistress," replied Richard, calmly. "I am the only
 crookback of my party; we are else passably well shapen. Ladies, and
 you, my lord," he added, with a sudden change to grave courtesy, "judge
 me not too churlish if I leave you. A captain, in the time of war, hath
 not the ordering of his hours."
 
 And with a very handsome salutation he passed on, followed by his
 officers.
 
 "Alack," cried Alicia, "I am shent!"
 
 "Ye know him not," replied Lord Foxham. "It is but a trifle; he hath
 already clean forgot your words."
 
 "He is, then, the very flower of knighthood," said Alicia.
 
 "Nay, he but mindeth other things," returned Lord Foxham. "Tarry we no
 more."
 
 In the chancel they found Dick waiting, attended by a few young men; and
 there were he and Joan united. When they came forth again, happy and yet
 serious, into the frosty air and sunlight, the long files of the army
 were already winding forward up the road; already the Duke of
 Gloucester's banner was unfolded and began to move from before the abbey
 in a clump of spears; and behind it, girt by steel-clad knights, the
 bold, black-hearted, and ambitious hunchback moved on towards his brief
 kingdom and his lasting infamy. But the wedding party turned upon the
 other side, and sat down, with sober merriment, to breakfast. The father
 cellarer attended on their wants, and sat with them at table. Hamley,
 all jealousy forgotten, began to ply the nowise loth Alicia with
 courtship. And there, amid the sounding of tuckets and the clash of
 armoured soldiery and horses continually moving forth, Dick and Joan sat
 side by side, tenderly held hands, and looked, with ever growing
 affection, in each other's eyes.
 
 Thenceforth the dust and blood of that unruly epoch passed them by. They
 dwelt apart from alarms in the green forest where their love began.
 
 Two old men in the meanwhile enjoyed pensions in great prosperity and
 peace, and with perhaps a superfluity of ale and wine, in Tunstall
 hamlet. One had been all his life a shipman, and continued to the last
 to lament his man Tom. The other, who had been a bit of everything,
 turned in the end towards piety, and made a most religious death under
 the name of Brother Honestus in the neighbouring abbey. So Lawless had
 his will, and died a friar.
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 Transcriber's Notes
 
 Obvious typographical errors have been corrected, and hyphenation made
 consistent within the text. Common contractions have been closed up
 (e.g. 'tis rather than 't is). Where this would lead to two apostrophes
 together, the space has been retained (e.g. y' 'ave). The oe ligature
 has been replaced by oe. All other spelling and punctuation has been
 left as in the original text.
 
 Italics are marked with underscores _like this_.
 
 All illustrations in the text are marked with the caption "_Copyright by
 Charles Scribner's Sons_." For ease of reading, this has been removed and
 placed here. Where full-page illustrations fall within a paragraph, they
 have been moved to the end of the preceding paragraph.
 
 This text contains three footnotes, marked in the text as [1], [2] and
 [3]. The footnotes follow the paragraphs to which they refer.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 Transcribed from the 1901 Longmans, Green & Co. edition by David Price,
 email ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
 FABLES
 
 
 BY
 ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 
 
 
 I.--THE PERSONS OF THE TALE.
 
 
 After the 32nd chapter of _Treasure Island_, two of the puppets strolled
 out to have a pipe before business should begin again, and met in an open
 place not far from the story.
 
 "Good-morning, Cap'n," said the first, with a man-o'-war salute, and a
 beaming countenance.
 
 "Ah, Silver!" grunted the other.  "You're in a bad way, Silver."
 
 "Now, Cap'n Smollett," remonstrated Silver, "dooty is dooty, as I knows,
 and none better; but we're off dooty now; and I can't see no call to keep
 up the morality business."
 
 "You're a damned rogue, my man," said the Captain.
 
 "Come, come, Cap'n, be just," returned the other.  "There's no call to be
 angry with me in earnest.  I'm on'y a chara'ter in a sea story.  I don't
 really exist."
 
 "Well, I don't really exist either," says the Captain, "which seems to
 meet that."
 
 "I wouldn't set no limits to what a virtuous chara'ter might consider
 argument," responded Silver.  "But I'm the villain of this tale, I am;
 and speaking as one sea-faring man to another, what I want to know is,
 what's the odds?"
 
 "Were you never taught your catechism?" said the Captain.  "Don't you
 know there's such a thing as an Author?"
 
 "Such a thing as a Author?" returned John, derisively.  "And who better'n
 me?  And the p'int is, if the Author made you, he made Long John, and he
 made Hands, and Pew, and George Merry--not that George is up to much, for
 he's little more'n a name; and he made Flint, what there is of him; and
 he made this here mutiny, you keep such a work about; and he had Tom
 Redruth shot; and--well, if that's a Author, give me Pew!"
 
 "Don't you believe in a future state?" said Smollett.  "Do you think
 there's nothing but the present story-paper?"
 
 "I don't rightly know for that," said Silver; "and I don't see what it's
 got to do with it, anyway.  What I know is this: if there is sich a thing
 as a Author, I'm his favourite chara'ter.  He does me fathoms better'n he
 does you--fathoms, he does.  And he likes doing me.  He keeps me on deck
 mostly all the time, crutch and all; and he leaves you measling in the
 hold, where nobody can't see you, nor wants to, and you may lay to that!
 If there is a Author, by thunder, but he's on my side, and you may lay to
 it!"
 
 "I see he's giving you a long rope," said the Captain.  "But that can't
 change a man's convictions.  I know the Author respects me; I feel it in
 my bones; when you and I had that talk at the blockhouse door, who do you
 think he was for, my man?"
 
 "And don't he respect me?" cried Silver.  "Ah, you should 'a' heard me
 putting down my mutiny, George Merry and Morgan and that lot, no longer
 ago'n last chapter; you'd heard something then!  You'd 'a' seen what the
 Author thinks o' me!  But come now, do you consider yourself a virtuous
 chara'ter clean through?"
 
 "God forbid!" said Captain Smollett, solemnly.  "I am a man that tries to
 do his duty, and makes a mess of it as often as not.  I'm not a very
 popular man at home, Silver, I'm afraid!" and the Captain sighed.
 
 "Ah," says Silver.  "Then how about this sequel of yours?  Are you to be
 Cap'n Smollett just the same as ever, and not very popular at home, says
 you?  And if so, why, it's _Treasure Island_ over again, by thunder; and
 I'll be Long John, and Pew'll be Pew, and we'll have another mutiny, as
 like as not.  Or are you to be somebody else?  And if so, why, what the
 better are you? and what the worse am I?"
 
 "Why, look here, my man," returned the Captain, "I can't understand how
 this story comes about at all, can I?  I can't see how you and I, who
 don't exist, should get to speaking here, and smoke our pipes for all the
 world like reality?  Very well, then, who am I to pipe up with my
 opinions?  I know the Author's on the side of good; he tells me so, it
 runs out of his pen as he writes.  Well, that's all I need to know; I'll
 take my chance upon the rest."
 
 "It's a fact he seemed to be against George Merry," Silver admitted,
 musingly.  "But George is little more'n a name at the best of it," he
 added, brightening.  "And to get into soundings for once.  What is this
 good?  I made a mutiny, and I been a gentleman o' fortune; well, but by
 all stories, you ain't no such saint.  I'm a man that keeps company very
 easy; even by your own account, you ain't, and to my certain knowledge
 you're a devil to haze.  Which is which?  Which is good, and which bad?
 Ah, you tell me that!  Here we are in stays, and you may lay to it!"
 
 "We're none of us perfect," replied the Captain.  "That's a fact of
 religion, my man.  All I can say is, I try to do my duty; and if you try
 to do yours, I can't compliment you on your success."
 
 "And so you was the judge, was you?" said Silver, derisively.
 
 "I would be both judge and hangman for you, my man, and never turn a
 hair," returned the Captain.  "But I get beyond that: it mayn't be sound
 theology, but it's common sense, that what is good is useful too--or
 there and thereabout, for I don't set up to be a thinker.  Now, where
 would a story go to if there were no virtuous characters?"
 
 "If you go to that," replied Silver, "where would a story begin, if there
 wasn't no villains?"
 
 "Well, that's pretty much my thought," said Captain Smollett.  "The
 Author has to get a story; that's what he wants; and to get a story, and
 to have a man like the doctor (say) given a proper chance, he has to put
 in men like you and Hands.  But he's on the right side; and you mind your
 eye!  You're not through this story yet; there's trouble coming for you."
 
 "What'll you bet?" asked John.
 
 "Much I care if there ain't," returned the Captain.  "I'm glad enough to
 be Alexander Smollett, bad as he is; and I thank my stars upon my knees
 that I'm not Silver.  But there's the ink-bottle opening.  To quarters!"
 
 And indeed the Author was just then beginning to write the words:
 
    CHAPTER XXXIII.
 
 
 
 
 II.--THE SINKING SHIP.
 
 
 "Sir," said the first lieutenant, bursting into the Captain's cabin, "the
 ship is going down."
 
 "Very well, Mr. Spoker," said the Captain; "but that is no reason for
 going about half-shaved.  Exercise your mind a moment, Mr. Spoker, and
 you will see that to the philosophic eye there is nothing new in our
 position: the ship (if she is to go down at all) may be said to have been
 going down since she was launched."
 
 "She is settling fast," said the first lieutenant, as he returned from
 shaving.
 
 "Fast, Mr. Spoker?" asked the Captain.  "The expression is a strange one,
 for time (if you will think of it) is only relative."
 
 "Sir," said the lieutenant, "I think it is scarcely worth while to embark
 in such a discussion when we shall all be in Davy Jones's Locker in ten
 minutes."
 
 "By parity of reasoning," returned the Captain gently, "it would never be
 worth while to begin any inquiry of importance; the odds are always
 overwhelming that we must die before we shall have brought it to an end.
 You have not considered, Mr. Spoker, the situation of man," said the
 Captain, smiling, and shaking his head.
 
 "I am much more engaged in considering the position of the ship," said
 Mr. Spoker.
 
 "Spoken like a good officer," replied the Captain, laying his hand on the
 lieutenant's shoulder.
 
 On deck they found the men had broken into the spirit-room, and were fast
 getting drunk.
 
 "My men," said the Captain, "there is no sense in this.  The ship is
 going down, you will tell me, in ten minutes: well, and what then?  To
 the philosophic eye, there is nothing new in our position.  All our lives
 long, we may have been about to break a blood-vessel or to be struck by
 lightning, not merely in ten minutes, but in ten seconds; and that has
 not prevented us from eating dinner, no, nor from putting money in the
 Savings Bank.  I assure you, with my hand on my heart, I fail to
 comprehend your attitude."
 
 The men were already too far gone to pay much heed.
 
 "This is a very painful sight, Mr. Spoker," said the Captain.
 
 "And yet to the philosophic eye, or whatever it is," replied the first
 lieutenant, "they may be said to have been getting drunk since they came
 aboard."
 
 "I do not know if you always follow my thought, Mr. Spoker," returned the
 Captain gently.  "But let us proceed."
 
 In the powder magazine they found an old salt smoking his pipe.
 
 "Good God," cried the Captain, "what are you about?"
 
 "Well, sir," said the old salt, apologetically, "they told me as she were
 going down."
 
 "And suppose she were?" said the Captain.  "To the philosophic eye, there
 would be nothing new in our position.  Life, my old shipmate, life, at
 any moment and in any view, is as dangerous as a sinking ship; and yet it
 is man's handsome fashion to carry umbrellas, to wear indiarubber over-
 shoes, to begin vast works, and to conduct himself in every way as if he
 might hope to be eternal.  And for my own poor part I should despise the
 man who, even on board a sinking ship, should omit to take a pill or to
 wind up his watch.  That, my friend, would not be the human attitude."
 
 "I beg pardon, sir," said Mr. Spoker.  "But what is precisely the
 difference between shaving in a sinking ship and smoking in a powder
 magazine?"
 
 "Or doing anything at all in any conceivable circumstances?" cried the
 Captain.  "Perfectly conclusive; give me a cigar!"
 
 Two minutes afterwards the ship blew up with a glorious detonation.
 
 
 
 
 III--THE TWO MATCHES.
 
 
 One day there was a traveller in the woods in California, in the dry
 season, when the Trades were blowing strong.  He had ridden a long way,
 and he was tired and hungry, and dismounted from his horse to smoke a
 pipe.  But when he felt in his pocket he found but two matches.  He
 struck the first, and it would not light.
 
 "Here is a pretty state of things!" said the traveller.  "Dying for a
 smoke; only one match left; and that certain to miss fire!  Was there
 ever a creature so unfortunate?  And yet," thought the traveller,
 "suppose I light this match, and smoke my pipe, and shake out the dottle
 here in the grass--the grass might catch on fire, for it is dry like
 tinder; and while I snatch out the flames in front, they might evade and
 run behind me, and seize upon yon bush of poison oak; before I could
 reach it, that would have blazed up; over the bush I see a pine tree hung
 with moss; that too would fly in fire upon the instant to its topmost
 bough; and the flame of that long torch--how would the trade wind take
 and brandish that through the inflammable forest!  I hear this dell roar
 in a moment with the joint voice of wind and fire, I see myself gallop
 for my soul, and the flying conflagration chase and outflank me through
 the hills; I see this pleasant forest burn for days, and the cattle
 roasted, and the springs dried up, and the farmer ruined, and his
 children cast upon the world.  What a world hangs upon this moment!"
 
 With that he struck the match, and it missed fire.
 
 "Thank God!" said the traveller, and put his pipe in his pocket.
 
 
 
 
 IV.--THE SICK MAN AND THE FIREMAN.
 
 
 There was once a sick man in a burning house, to whom there entered a
 fireman.
 
 "Do not save me," said the sick man.  "Save those who are strong."
 
 "Will you kindly tell me why?" inquired the fireman, for he was a civil
 fellow.
 
 "Nothing could possibly be fairer," said the sick man.  "The strong
 should be preferred in all cases, because they are of more service in the
 world."
 
 The fireman pondered a while, for he was a man of some philosophy.
 "Granted," said he at last, as apart of the roof fell in; "but for the
 sake of conversation, what would you lay down as the proper service of
 the strong?"
 
 "Nothing can possibly be easier," returned the sick man; "the proper
 service of the strong is to help the weak."
 
 Again the fireman reflected, for there was nothing hasty about this
 excellent creature.  "I could forgive you being sick," he said at last,
 as a portion of the wall fell out, "but I cannot bear your being such a
 fool."  And with that he heaved up his fireman's axe, for he was
 eminently just, and clove the sick man to the bed.
 
 
 
 
 V.--THE DEVIL AND THE INNKEEPER.
 
 
 Once upon a time the devil stayed at an inn, where no one knew him, for
 they were people whose education had been neglected.  He was bent on
 mischief, and for a time kept everybody by the ears.  But at last the
 innkeeper set a watch upon the devil and took him in the fact.
 
 The innkeeper got a rope's end.
 
 "Now I am going to thrash you," said the innkeeper.
 
 "You have no right to be angry with me," said the devil.  "I am only the
 devil, and it is my nature to do wrong."
 
 "Is that so?" asked the innkeeper.
 
 "Fact, I assure you," said the devil.
 
 "You really cannot help doing ill?" asked the innkeeper.
 
 "Not in the smallest," said the devil; "it would be useless cruelty to
 thrash a thing like me."
 
 "It would indeed," said the innkeeper.
 
 And he made a noose and hanged the devil.
 
 "There!" said the innkeeper.
 
 
 
 
 VI.--THE PENITENT
 
 
 A man met a lad weeping.  "What do you weep for?" he asked.
 
 "I am weeping for my sins," said the lad.
 
 "You must have little to do," said the man.
 
 The next day they met again.  Once more the lad was weeping.  "Why do you
 weep now?" asked the man.
 
 "I am weeping because I have nothing to eat," said the lad.
 
 "I thought it would come to that," said the man.
 
 
 
 
 VII.--THE YELLOW PAINT.
 
 
 In a certain city there lived a physician who sold yellow paint.  This
 was of so singular a virtue that whoso was bedaubed with it from head to
 heel was set free from the dangers of life, and the bondage of sin, and
 the fear of death for ever.  So the physician said in his prospectus; and
 so said all the citizens in the city; and there was nothing more urgent
 in men's hearts than to be properly painted themselves, and nothing they
 took more delight in than to see others painted.  There was in the same
 city a young man of a very good family but of a somewhat reckless life,
 who had reached the age of manhood, and would have nothing to say to the
 paint: "To-morrow was soon enough," said he; and when the morrow came he
 would still put it off.  She might have continued to do until his death;
 only, he had a friend of about his own age and much of his own manners;
 and this youth, taking a walk in the public street, with not one fleck of
 paint upon his body, was suddenly run down by a water-cart and cut off in
 the heyday of his nakedness.  This shook the other to the soul; so that I
 never beheld a man more earnest to be painted; and on the very same
 evening, in the presence of all his family, to appropriate music, and
 himself weeping aloud, he received three complete coats and a touch of
 varnish on the top.  The physician (who was himself affected even to
 tears) protested he had never done a job so thorough.
 
 Some two months afterwards, the young man was carried on a stretcher to
 the physician's house.
 
 "What is the meaning of this?" he cried, as soon as the door was opened.
 "I was to be set free from all the dangers of life; and here have I been
 run down by that self-same water-cart, and my leg is broken."
 
 "Dear me!" said the physician.  "This is very sad.  But I perceive I must
 explain to you the action of my paint.  A broken bone is a mighty small
 affair at the worst of it; and it belongs to a class of accident to which
 my paint is quite inapplicable.  Sin, my dear young friend, sin is the
 sole calamity that a wise man should apprehend; it is against sin that I
 have fitted you out; and when you come to be tempted, you will give me
 news of my paint."
 
 "Oh!" said the young man, "I did not understand that, and it seems rather
 disappointing.  But I have no doubt all is for the best; and in the
 meanwhile, I shall be obliged to you if you will set my leg."
 
 "That is none of my business," said the physician; "but if your bearers
 will carry you round the corner to the surgeon's, I feel sure he will
 afford relief."
 
 Some three years later, the young man came running to the physician's
 house in a great perturbation.  "What is the meaning of this?" he cried.
 "Here was I to be set free from the bondage of sin; and I have just
 committed forgery, arson and murder."
 
 "Dear me," said the physician.  "This is very serious.  Off with your
 clothes at once."  And as soon as the young man had stripped, he examined
 him from head to foot.  "No," he cried with great relief, "there is not a
 flake broken.  Cheer up, my young friend, your paint is as good as new."
 
 "Good God!" cried the young man, "and what then can be the use of it?"
 
 "Why," said the physician, "I perceive I must explain to you the nature
 of the action of my paint.  It does not exactly prevent sin; it
 extenuates instead the painful consequences.  It is not so much for this
 world, as for the next; it is not against life; in short, it is against
 death that I have fitted you out.  And when you come to die, you will
 give me news of my paint."
 
 "Oh!" cried the young man, "I had not understood that, and it seems a
 little disappointing.  But there is no doubt all is for the best: and in
 the meanwhile, I shall be obliged if you will help me to undo the evil I
 have brought on innocent persons."
 
 "That is none of my business," said the physician; "but if you will go
 round the corner to the police office, I feel sure it will afford you
 relief to give yourself up."
 
 Six weeks later, the physician was called to the town gaol.
 
 "What is the meaning of this?" cried the young man.  "Here am I literally
 crusted with your paint; and I have broken my leg, and committed all the
 crimes in the calendar, and must be hanged to-morrow; and am in the
 meanwhile in a fear so extreme that I lack words to picture it."
 
 "Dear me," said the physician.  "This is really amazing.  Well, well;
 perhaps, if you had not been painted, you would have been more frightened
 still."
 
 
 
 
 VIII.--THE HOUSE OF ELD.
 
 
 So soon as the child began to speak, the gyve was riveted; and the boys
 and girls limped about their play like convicts.  Doubtless it was more
 pitiable to see and more painful to bear in youth; but even the grown
 folk, besides being very unhandy on their feet, were often sick with
 ulcers.
 
 About the time when Jack was ten years old, many strangers began to
 journey through that country.  These he beheld going lightly by on the
 long roads, and the thing amazed him.  "I wonder how it comes," he asked,
 "that all these strangers are so quick afoot, and we must drag about our
 fetter?"
 
 "My dear boy," said his uncle, the catechist, "do not complain about your
 fetter, for it is the only thing that makes life worth living.  None are
 happy, none are good, none are respectable, that are not gyved like us.
 And I must tell you, besides, it is very dangerous talk.  If you grumble
 of your iron, you will have no luck; if ever you take it off, you will be
 instantly smitten by a thunderbolt."
 
 "Are there no thunderbolts for these strangers?" asked Jack.
 
 "Jupiter is longsuffering to the benighted," returned the catechist.
 
 "Upon my word, I could wish I had been less fortunate," said Jack.  "For
 if I had been born benighted, I might now be going free; and it cannot be
 denied the iron is inconvenient, and the ulcer hurts."
 
 "Ah!" cried his uncle, "do not envy the heathen!  Theirs is a sad lot!
 Ah, poor souls, if they but knew the joys of being fettered!  Poor souls,
 my heart yearns for them.  But the truth is they are vile, odious,
 insolent, ill-conditioned, stinking brutes, not truly human--for what is
 a man without a fetter?--and you cannot be too particular not to touch or
 speak with them."
 
 After this talk, the child would never pass one of the unfettered on the
 road but what he spat at him and called him names, which was the practice
 of the children in that part.
 
 It chanced one day, when he was fifteen, he went into the woods, and the
 ulcer pained him.  It was a fair day, with a blue sky; all the birds were
 singing; but Jack nursed his foot.  Presently, another song began; it
 sounded like the singing of a person, only far more gay; at the same time
 there was a beating on the earth.  Jack put aside the leaves; and there
 was a lad of his own village, leaping, and dancing and singing to himself
 in a green dell; and on the grass beside him lay the dancer's iron.
 
 "Oh!" cried Jack, "you have your fetter off!"
 
 "For God's sake, don't tell your uncle!" cried the lad.
 
 "If you fear my uncle," returned Jack "why do you not fear the
 thunderbolt"?
 
 "That is only an old wives' tale," said the other.  "It is only told to
 children.  Scores of us come here among the woods and dance for nights
 together, and are none the worse."
 
 This put Jack in a thousand new thoughts.  He was a grave lad; he had no
 mind to dance himself; he wore his fetter manfully, and tended his ulcer
 without complaint.  But he loved the less to be deceived or to see others
 cheated.  He began to lie in wait for heathen travellers, at covert parts
 of the road, and in the dusk of the day, so that he might speak with them
 unseen; and these were greatly taken with their wayside questioner, and
 told him things of weight.  The wearing of gyves (they said) was no
 command of Jupiter's.  It was the contrivance of a white-faced thing, a
 sorcerer, that dwelt in that country in the Wood of Eld.  He was one like
 Glaucus that could change his shape, yet he could be always told; for
 when he was crossed, he gobbled like a turkey.  He had three lives; but
 the third smiting would make an end of him indeed; and with that his
 house of sorcery would vanish, the gyves fall, and the villagers take
 hands and dance like children.
 
 "And in your country?" Jack would ask.
 
 But at this the travellers, with one accord, would put him off; until
 Jack began to suppose there was no land entirely happy.  Or, if there
 were, it must be one that kept its folk at home; which was natural
 enough.
 
 But the case of the gyves weighed upon him.  The sight of the children
 limping stuck in his eyes; the groans of such as dressed their ulcers
 haunted him.  And it came at last in his mind that he was born to free
 them.
 
 There was in that village a sword of heavenly forgery, beaten upon
 Vulcan's anvil.  It was never used but in the temple, and then the flat
 of it only; and it hung on a nail by the catechist's chimney.  Early one
 night, Jack rose, and took the sword, and was gone out of the house and
 the village in the darkness.
 
 All night he walked at a venture; and when day came, he met strangers
 going to the fields.  Then he asked after the Wood of Eld and the house
 of sorcery; and one said north, and one south; until Jack saw that they
 deceived him.  So then, when he asked his way of any man, he showed the
 bright sword naked; and at that the gyve on the man's ankle rang, and
 answered in his stead; and the word was still _Straight on_.  But the
 man, when his gyve spoke, spat and struck at Jack, and threw stones at
 him as he went away; so that his head was broken.
 
 So he came to that wood, and entered in, and he was aware of a house in a
 low place, where funguses grew, and the trees met, and the steaming of
 the marsh arose about it like a smoke.  It was a fine house, and a very
 rambling; some parts of it were ancient like the hills, and some but of
 yesterday, and none finished; and all the ends of it were open, so that
 you could go in from every side.  Yet it was in good repair, and all the
 chimneys smoked.
 
 Jack went in through the gable; and there was one room after another, all
 bare, but all furnished in part, so that a man could dwell there; and in
 each there was a fire burning, where a man could warm himself, and a
 table spread where he might eat.  But Jack saw nowhere any living
 creature; only the bodies of some stuffed.
 
 "This is a hospitable house," said Jack; "but the ground must be quaggy
 underneath, for at every step the building quakes."
 
 He had gone some time in the house, when he began to be hungry.  Then he
 looked at the food, and at first he was afraid; but he bared the sword,
 and by the shining of the sword, it seemed the food was honest.  So he
 took the courage to sit down and eat, and he was refreshed in mind and
 body.
 
 "This is strange," thought he, "that in the house of sorcery there should
 be food so wholesome."
 
 As he was yet eating, there came into that room the appearance of his
 uncle, and Jack was afraid because he had taken the sword.  But his uncle
 was never more kind, and sat down to meat with him, and praised him
 because he had taken the sword.  Never had these two been more pleasantly
 together, and Jack was full of love to the man.
 
 "It was very well done," said his uncle, "to take the sword and come
 yourself into the House of Eld; a good thought and a brave deed.  But now
 you are satisfied; and we may go home to dinner arm in arm."
 
 "Oh, dear, no!" said Jack.  "I am not satisfied yet."
 
 "How!" cried his uncle.  "Are you not warmed by the fire?  Does not this
 food sustain you?"
 
 "I see the food to be wholesome," said Jack; "and still it is no proof
 that a man should wear a gyve on his right leg."
 
 Now at this the appearance of his uncle gobbled like a turkey.
 
 "Jupiter!" cried Jack, "is this the sorcerer?"
 
 His hand held back and his heart failed him for the love he bore his
 uncle; but he heaved up the sword and smote the appearance on the head;
 and it cried out aloud with the voice of his uncle; and fell to the
 ground; and a little bloodless white thing fled from the room.
 
 The cry rang in Jack's ears, and his knees smote together, and conscience
 cried upon him; and yet he was strengthened, and there woke in his bones
 the lust of that enchanter's blood.  "If the gyves are to fall," said he,
 "I must go through with this, and when I get home I shall find my uncle
 dancing."
 
 So he went on after the bloodless thing.  In the way, he met the
 appearance of his father; and his father was incensed, and railed upon
 him, and called to him upon his duty, and bade him be home, while there
 was yet time.  "For you can still," said he, "be home by sunset; and then
 all will be forgiven."
 
 "God knows," said Jack, "I fear your anger; but yet your anger does not
 prove that a man should wear a gyve on his right leg."
 
 And at that the appearance of his father gobbled like a turkey.
 
 "Ah, heaven," cried Jack, "the sorcerer again!"
 
 The blood ran backward in his body and his joints rebelled against him
 for the love he bore his father; but he heaved up the sword, and plunged
 it in the heart of the appearance; and the appearance cried out aloud
 with the voice of his father; and fell to the ground; and a little
 bloodless white thing fled from the room.
 
 The cry rang in Jack's ears, and his soul was darkened; but now rage came
 to him.  "I have done what I dare not think upon," said he.  "I will go
 to an end with it, or perish.  And when I get home, I pray God this may
 be a dream, and I may find my father dancing."
 
 So he went on after the bloodless thing that had escaped; and in the way
 he met the appearance of his mother, and she wept.  "What have you done?"
 she cried.  "What is this that you have done?  Oh, come home (where you
 may be by bedtime) ere you do more ill to me and mine; for it is enough
 to smite my brother and your father."
 
 "Dear mother, it is not these that I have smitten," said Jack; "it was
 but the enchanter in their shape.  And even if I had, it would not prove
 that a man should wear a gyve on his right leg."
 
 And at this the appearance gobbled like a turkey.
 
 He never knew how he did that; but he swung the sword on the one side,
 and clove the appearance through the midst; and it cried out aloud with
 the voice of his mother; and fell to the ground; and with the fall of it,
 the house was gone from over Jack's head, and he stood alone in the
 woods, and the gyve was loosened from his leg.
 
 "Well," said he, "the enchanter is now dead, and the fetter gone."  But
 the cries rang in his soul, and the day was like night to him.  "This has
 been a sore business," said he.  "Let me get forth out of the wood, and
 see the good that I have done to others."
 
 He thought to leave the fetter where it lay, but when he turned to go,
 his mind was otherwise.  So he stooped and put the gyve in his bosom; and
 the rough iron galled him as he went, and his bosom bled.
 
 Now when he was forth of the wood upon the highway, he met folk returning
 from the field; and those he met had no fetter on the right leg, but,
 behold! they had one upon the left.  Jack asked them what it signified;
 and they said, "that was the new wear, for the old was found to be a
 superstition".  Then he looked at them nearly; and there was a new ulcer
 on the left ankle, and the old one on the right was not yet healed.
 
 "Now, may God forgive me!" cried Jack.  "I would I were well home."
 
 And when he was home, there lay his uncle smitten on the head, and his
 father pierced through the heart, and his mother cloven through the
 midst.  And he sat in the lone house and wept beside the bodies.
 
 
 
 MORAL.
 
 
 Old is the tree and the fruit good,
 Very old and thick the wood.
 Woodman, is your courage stout?
 Beware! the root is wrapped about
 Your mother's heart, your father's bones;
 And like the mandrake comes with groans.
 
 
 
 
 IX.--THE FOUR REFORMERS.
 
 
 Four reformers met under a bramble bush.  They were all agreed the world
 must be changed.  "We must abolish property," said one.
 
 "We must abolish marriage," said the second.
 
 "We must abolish God," said the third.
 
 "I wish we could abolish work," said the fourth.
 
 "Do not let us get beyond practical politics," said the first.  "The
 first thing is to reduce men to a common level."
 
 "The first thing," said the second, "is to give freedom to the sexes."
 
 "The first thing," said the third, "is to find out how to do it."
 
 "The first step," said the first, "is to abolish the Bible."
 
 "The first thing," said the second, "is to abolish the laws."
 
 "The first thing," said the third, "is to abolish mankind."
 
 
 
 
 X.--THE MAN AND HIS FRIEND.
 
 
 A man quarrelled with his friend.
 
 "I have been much deceived in you," said the man.
 
 And the friend made a face at him and went away.
 
 A little after, they both died, and came together before the great white
 Justice of the Peace.  It began to look black for the friend, but the man
 for a while had a clear character and was getting in good spirits.
 
 "I find here some record of a quarrel," said the justice, looking in his
 notes.  "Which of you was in the wrong?"
 
 "He was," said the man.  "He spoke ill of me behind my back."
 
 "Did he so?" said the justice.  "And pray how did he speak about your
 neighbours?"
 
 "Oh, he had always a nasty tongue," said the man.
 
 "And you chose him for your friend?" cried the justice.  "My good fellow,
 we have no use here for fools."
 
 So the man was cast in the pit, and the friend laughed out aloud in the
 dark and remained to be tried on other charges.
 
 
 
 
 XI.--THE READER.
 
 
 "I never read such an impious book," said the reader, throwing it on the
 floor.
 
 "You need not hurt me," said the book; "you will only get less for me
 second hand, and I did not write myself."
 
 "That is true," said the reader.  "My quarrel is with your author."
 
 "Ah, well," said the book, "you need not buy his rant."
 
 "That is true," said the reader.  "But I thought him such a cheerful
 writer."
 
 "I find him so," said the book.
 
 "You must be differently made from me," said the reader.
 
 "Let me tell you a fable," said the book.  "There were two men wrecked
 upon a desert island; one of them made believe he was at home, the other
 admitted--"
 
 "Oh, I know your kind of fable," said the reader.  "They both died."
 
 "And so they did," said the book.  "No doubt of that.  And everybody
 else."
 
 "That is true," said the reader.  "Push it a little further for this
 once.  And when they were all dead?"
 
 "They were in God's hands, the same as before," said the book.
 
 "Not much to boast of, by your account," cried the reader.
 
 "Who is impious now?" said the book.
 
 And the reader put him on the fire.
 
    The coward crouches from the rod,
    And loathes the iron face of God.
 
 
 
 
 XII.--THE CITIZEN AND THE TRAVELLER.
 
 
 "Look round you," said the citizen.  "This is the largest market in the
 world."
 
 "Oh, surely not," said the traveller.
 
 "Well, perhaps not the largest," said the citizen, "but much the best."
 
 "You are certainly wrong there," said the traveller.  "I can tell you . .
 ."
 
 They buried the stranger at the dusk.
 
 
 
 
 XIII.--THE DISTINGUISHED STRANGER.
 
 
 Once upon a time there came to this earth a visitor from a neighbouring
 planet.  And he was met at the place of his descent by a great
 philosopher, who was to show him everything.
 
 First of all they came through a wood, and the stranger looked upon the
 trees.  "Whom have we here?" said he.
 
 "These are only vegetables," said the philosopher.  "They are alive, but
 not at all interesting."
 
 "I don't know about that," said the stranger.  "They seem to have very
 good manners.  Do they never speak?"
 
 "They lack the gift," said the philosopher.
 
 "Yet I think I hear them sing," said the other.
 
 "That is only the wind among the leaves," said the philosopher.  "I will
 explain to you the theory of winds: it is very interesting."
 
 "Well," said the stranger, "I wish I knew what they are thinking."
 
 "They cannot think," said the philosopher.
 
 "I don't know about that," returned the stranger: and then, laying his
 hand upon a trunk: "I like these people," said he.
 
 "They are not people at all," said the philosopher.  "Come along."
 
 Next they came through a meadow where there were cows.
 
 "These are very dirty people," said the stranger.
 
 "They are not people at all," said the philosopher; and he explained what
 a cow is in scientific words which I have forgotten.
 
 "That is all one to me," said the stranger.  "But why do they never look
 up?"
 
 "Because they are graminivorous," said the philosopher; "and to live upon
 grass, which is not highly nutritious, requires so close an attention to
 business that they have no time to think, or speak, or look at the
 scenery, or keep themselves clean."
 
 "Well," said the stranger, "that is one way to live, no doubt.  But I
 prefer the people with the green heads."
 
 Next they came into a city, and the streets were full of men and women.
 
 "These are very odd people," said the stranger.
 
 "They are the people of the greatest nation in the world," said the
 philosopher.
 
 "Are they indeed?" said the stranger.  "They scarcely look so."
 
 
 
 
 XIV.--THE CART-HORSES AND THE SADDLE-HORSE.
 
 
 Two cart-horses, a gelding and a mare, were brought to Samoa, and put in
 the same field with a saddle-horse to run free on the island.  They were
 rather afraid to go near him, for they saw he was a saddle-horse, and
 supposed he would not speak to them.  Now the saddle-horse had never seen
 creatures so big.  "These must be great chiefs," thought he, and he
 approached them civilly.  "Lady and gentleman," said he, "I understand
 you are from the colonies.  I offer you my affectionate compliments, and
 make you heartily welcome to the islands."
 
 The colonials looked at him askance, and consulted with each other.
 
 "Who can he be?" said the gelding.
 
 "He seems suspiciously civil," said the mare.
 
 "I do not think he can be much account," said the gelding.
 
 "Depend upon it he is only a Kanaka," said the mare.
 
 Then they turned to him.
 
 "Go to the devil!" said the gelding.
 
 "I wonder at your impudence, speaking to persons of our quality!" cried
 the mare.
 
 The saddle-horse went away by himself.  "I was right," said he, "they are
 great chiefs."
 
 
 
 
 XV.--THE TADPOLE AND THE FROG.
 
 
 "Be ashamed of yourself," said the frog.
 
 "When I was a tadpole, I had no tail."
 
 "Just what I thought!" said the tadpole.
 
 "You never were a tadpole."
 
 
 
 
 XVI.--SOMETHING IN IT.
 
 
 The natives told him many tales.  In particular, they warned him of the
 house of yellow reeds tied with black sinnet, how any one who touched it
 became instantly the prey of Akaanga, and was handed on to him by Miru
 the ruddy, and hocussed with the kava of the dead, and baked in the ovens
 and eaten by the eaters of the dead.
 
 "There is nothing in it," said the missionary.
 
 There was a bay upon that island, a very fair bay to look upon; but, by
 the native saying, it was death to bathe there.  "There is nothing in
 that," said the missionary; and he came to the bay, and went swimming.
 Presently an eddy took him and bore him towards the reef.  "Oho!" thought
 the missionary, "it seems there is something in it after all."  And he
 swam the harder, but the eddy carried him away.  "I do not care about
 this eddy," said the missionary; and even as he said it, he was aware of
 a house raised on piles above the sea; it was built of yellow reeds, one
 reed joined with another, and the whole bound with black sinnet; a ladder
 led to the door, and all about the house hung calabashes.  He had never
 seen such a house, nor yet such calabashes; and the eddy set for the
 ladder.  "This is singular," said the missionary, "but there can be
 nothing in it."  And he laid hold of the ladder and went up.  It was a
 fine house; but there was no man there; and when the missionary looked
 back he saw no island, only the heaving of the sea.  "It is strange about
 the island," said the missionary, "but who's afraid? my stories are the
 true ones."  And he laid hold of a calabash, for he was one that loved
 curiosities.  Now he had no sooner laid hand upon the calabash than that
 which he handled, and that which he saw and stood on, burst like a bubble
 and was gone; and night closed upon him, and the waters, and the meshes
 of the net; and he wallowed there like a fish.
 
 "A body would think there was something in this," said the missionary.
 "But if these tales are true, I wonder what about my tales!"
 
 Now the flaming of Akaanga's torch drew near in the night; and the
 misshapen hands groped in the meshes of the net; and they took the
 missionary between the finger and the thumb, and bore him dripping in the
 night and silence to the place of the ovens of Miru.  And there was Miru,
 ruddy in the glow of the ovens; and there sat her four daughters, and
 made the kava of the dead; and there sat the comers out of the islands of
 the living, dripping and lamenting.
 
 This was a dread place to reach for any of the sons of men.  But of all
 who ever came there, the missionary was the most concerned; and, to make
 things worse, the person next him was a convert of his own.
 
 "Aha," said the convert, "so you are here like your neighbours?  And how
 about all your stories?"
 
 "It seems," said the missionary, with bursting tears, "that there was
 nothing in them."
 
 By this the kava of the dead was ready, and the daughters of Miru began
 to intone in the old manner of singing.  "Gone are the green islands and
 the bright sea, the sun and the moon and the forty million stars, and
 life and love and hope.  Henceforth is no more, only to sit in the night
 and silence, and see your friends devoured; for life is a deceit, and the
 bandage is taken from your eyes."
 
 Now when the singing was done, one of the daughters came with the bowl.
 Desire of that kava rose in the missionary's bosom; he lusted for it like
 a swimmer for the land, or a bridegroom for his bride; and he reached out
 his hand, and took the bowl, and would have drunk.  And then he
 remembered, and put it back.
 
 "Drink!" sang the daughter of Miru.
 
 "There is no kava like the kava of the dead, and to drink of it once is
 the reward of living."
 
 "I thank you.  It smells excellent," said the missionary.  "But I am a
 blue-ribbon man myself; and though I am aware there is a difference of
 opinion even in our own confession, I have always held kava to be
 excluded."
 
 "What!" cried the convert.  "Are you going to respect a taboo at a time
 like this?  And you were always so opposed to taboos when you were
 alive!"
 
 "To other people's," said the missionary.  "Never to my own."
 
 "But yours have all proved wrong," said the convert.
 
 "It looks like it," said the missionary, "and I can't help that.  No
 reason why I should break my word."
 
 "I never heard the like of this!" cried the daughter of Miru.  "Pray,
 what do you expect to gain?"
 
 "That is not the point," said the missionary.  "I took this pledge for
 others, I am not going to break it for myself."
 
 The daughter of Miru was puzzled; she came and told her mother, and Miru
 was vexed; and they went and told Akaanga.  "I don't know what to do
 about this," said Akaanga; and he came and reasoned with the missionary.
 
 "But there _is_ such a thing as right and wrong," said the missionary;
 "and your ovens cannot alter that."
 
 "Give the kava to the rest," said Akaanga to the daughters of Miru.  "I
 must get rid of this sea-lawyer instantly, or worse will come of it."
 
 The next moment the missionary came up in the midst of the sea, and there
 before him were the palm trees of the island.  He swam to the shore
 gladly, and landed.  Much matter of thought was in that missionary's
 mind.
 
 "I seem to have been misinformed upon some points," said he.  "Perhaps
 there is not much in it, as I supposed; but there is something in it
 after all.  Let me be glad of that."
 
 And he rang the bell for service.
 
 
 
 MORAL.
 
 
 The sticks break, the stones crumble,
 The eternal altars tilt and tumble,
 Sanctions and tales dislimn like mist
 About the amazed evangelist.
 He stands unshook from age to youth
 Upon one pin-point of the truth.
 
 
 
 
 XVII.--FAITH, HALF FAITH AND NO FAITH AT ALL.
 
 
 In the ancient days there went three men upon pilgrimage; one was a
 priest, and one was a virtuous person, and the third was an old rover
 with his axe.
 
 As they went, the priest spoke about the grounds of faith.
 
 "We find the proofs of our religion in the works of nature," said he, and
 beat his breast.
 
 "That is true," said the virtuous person.
 
 "The peacock has a scrannel voice," said the priest, "as has been laid
 down always in our books.  How cheering!" he cried, in a voice like one
 that wept.  "How comforting!"
 
 "I require no such proofs," said the virtuous person.
 
 "Then you have no reasonable faith," said the priest.
 
 "Great is the right, and shall prevail!" cried the virtuous person.
 "There is loyalty in my soul; be sure, there is loyalty in the mind of
 Odin."
 
 "These are but playings upon words," returned the priest.  "A sackful of
 such trash is nothing to the peacock."
 
 Just then they passed a country farm, where there was a peacock seated on
 a rail; and the bird opened its mouth and sang with the voice of a
 nightingale.
 
 "Where are you now?" asked the virtuous person.  "And yet this shakes not
 me!  Great is the truth, and shall prevail!"
 
 "The devil fly away with that peacock!" said the priest; and he was
 downcast for a mile or two.
 
 But presently they came to a shrine, where a Fakeer performed miracles.
 
 "Ah!" said the priest, "here are the true grounds of faith.  The peacock
 was but an adminicle.  This is the base of our religion."
 
 And he beat upon his breast, and groaned like one with colic.
 
 "Now to me," said the virtuous person, "all this is as little to the
 purpose as the peacock.  I believe because I see the right is great and
 must prevail; and this Fakeer might carry on with his conjuring tricks
 till doomsday, and it would not play bluff upon a man like me."
 
 Now at this the Fakeer was so much incensed that his hand trembled; and,
 lo! in the midst of a miracle the cards fell from up his sleeve.
 
 "Where are you now?" asked the virtuous person.  "And yet it shakes not
 me!"
 
 "The devil fly away with the Fakeer!" cried the priest.  "I really do not
 see the good of going on with this pilgrimage."
 
 "Cheer up!" cried the virtuous person.  "Great is the right, and shall
 prevail!"
 
 "If you are quite sure it will prevail," says the priest.
 
 "I pledge my word for that," said the virtuous person.
 
 So the other began to go on again with a better heart.
 
 At last one came running, and told them all was lost: that the powers of
 darkness had besieged the Heavenly Mansions, that Odin was to die, and
 evil triumph.
 
 "I have been grossly deceived," cried the virtuous person.
 
 "All is lost now," said the priest.
 
 "I wonder if it is too late to make it up with the devil?" said the
 virtuous person.
 
 "Oh, I hope not," said the priest.  "And at any rate we can but try.  But
 what are you doing with your axe?" says he to the rover.
 
 "I am off to die with Odin," said the rover.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII.--THE TOUCHSTONE.
 
 
 The King was a man that stood well before the world; his smile was sweet
 as clover, but his soul withinsides was as little as a pea.  He had two
 sons; and the younger son was a boy after his heart, but the elder was
 one whom he feared.  It befell one morning that the drum sounded in the
 dun before it was yet day; and the King rode with his two sons, and a
 brave array behind them.  They rode two hours, and came to the foot of a
 brown mountain that was very steep.
 
 "Where do we ride?" said the elder son.
 
 "Across this brown mountain," said the King, and smiled to himself.
 
 "My father knows what he is doing," said the younger son.
 
 And they rode two hours more, and came to the sides of a black river that
 was wondrous deep.
 
 "And where do we ride?" asked the elder son.
 
 "Over this black river," said the King, and smiled to himself.
 
 "My father knows what he is doing," said the younger son.
 
 And they rode all that day, and about the time of the sunsetting came to
 the side of a lake, where was a great dun.
 
 "It is here we ride," said the King; "to a King's house, and a priest's,
 and a house where you will learn much."
 
 At the gates of the dun, the King who was a priest met them; and he was a
 grave man, and beside him stood his daughter, and she was as fair as the
 morn, and one that smiled and looked down.
 
 "These are my two sons," said the first King.
 
 "And here is my daughter," said the King who was a priest.
 
 "She is a wonderful fine maid," said the first King, "and I like her
 manner of smiling,"
 
 "They are wonderful well-grown lads," said the second, "and I like their
 gravity."
 
 And then the two Kings looked at each other, and said, "The thing may
 come about".
 
 And in the meanwhile the two lads looked upon the maid, and the one grew
 pale and the other red; and the maid looked upon the ground smiling.
 
 "Here is the maid that I shall marry," said the elder.  "For I think she
 smiled upon me."
 
 But the younger plucked his father by the sleeve.  "Father," said he, "a
 word in your ear.  If I find favour in your sight, might not I wed this
 maid, for I think she smiles upon me?"
 
 "A word in yours," said the King his father.  "Waiting is good hunting,
 and when the teeth are shut the tongue is at home."
 
 Now they were come into the dun, and feasted; and this was a great house,
 so that the lads were astonished; and the King that was a priest sat at
 the end of the board and was silent, so that the lads were filled with
 reverence; and the maid served them smiling with downcast eyes, so that
 their hearts were enlarged.
 
 Before it was day, the elder son arose, and he found the maid at her
 weaving, for she was a diligent girl.  "Maid," quoth he, "I would fain
 marry you."
 
 "You must speak with my father," said she, and she looked upon the ground
 smiling, and became like the rose.
 
 "Her heart is with me," said the elder son, and he went down to the lake
 and sang.
 
 A little after came the younger son.  "Maid," quoth he, "if our fathers
 were agreed, I would like well to marry you."
 
 "You can speak to my father," said she; and looked upon the ground, and
 smiled and grew like the rose.
 
 "She is a dutiful daughter," said the younger son, "she will make an
 obedient wife."  And then he thought, "What shall I do?" and he
 remembered the King her father was a priest; so he went into the temple,
 and sacrificed a weasel and a hare.
 
 Presently the news got about; and the two lads and the first King were
 called into the presence of the King who was a priest, where he sat upon
 the high seat.
 
 "Little I reck of gear," said the King who was a priest, "and little of
 power.  For we live here among the shadow of things, and the heart is
 sick of seeing them.  And we stay here in the wind like raiment drying,
 and the heart is weary of the wind.  But one thing I love, and that is
 truth; and for one thing will I give my daughter, and that is the trial
 stone.  For in the light of that stone the seeming goes, and the being
 shows, and all things besides are worthless.  Therefore, lads, if ye
 would wed my daughter, out foot, and bring me the stone of touch, for
 that is the price of her."
 
 "A word in your ear," said the younger son to his father.  "I think we do
 very well without this stone."
 
 "A word in yours," said the father.  "I am of your way of thinking; but
 when the teeth are shut the tongue is at home."  And he smiled to the
 King that was a priest.
 
 But the elder son got to his feet, and called the King that was a priest
 by the name of father.  "For whether I marry the maid or no, I will call
 you by that word for the love of your wisdom; and even now I will ride
 forth and search the world for the stone of touch."  So he said farewell,
 and rode into the world.
 
 "I think I will go, too," said the younger son, "if I can have your
 leave.  For my heart goes out to the maid."
 
 "You will ride home with me," said his father.
 
 So they rode home, and when they came to the dun, the King had his son
 into his treasury.  "Here," said he, "is the touchstone which shows
 truth; for there is no truth but plain truth; and if you will look in
 this, you will see yourself as you are."
 
 And the younger son looked in it, and saw his face as it were the face of
 a beardless youth, and he was well enough pleased; for the thing was a
 piece of a mirror.
 
 "Here is no such great thing to make a work about," said he; "but if it
 will get me the maid I shall never complain.  But what a fool is my
 brother to ride into the world, and the thing all the while at home!"
 
 So they rode back to the other dun, and showed the mirror to the King
 that was a priest; and when he had looked in it, and seen himself like a
 King, and his house like a King's house, and all things like themselves,
 he cried out and blessed God.  "For now I know," said he, "there is no
 truth but the plain truth; and I am a King indeed, although my heart
 misgave me."  And he pulled down his temple, and built a new one; and
 then the younger son was married to the maid.
 
 In the meantime the elder son rode into the world to find the touchstone
 of the trial of truth; and whenever he came to a place of habitation, he
 would ask the men if they had heard of it.  And in every place the men
 answered: "Not only have we heard of it, but we alone, of all men,
 possess the thing itself, and it hangs in the side of our chimney to this
 day".  Then would the elder son be glad, and beg for a sight of it.  And
 sometimes it would be a piece of mirror, that showed the seeming of
 things; and then he would say, "This can never be, for there should be
 more than seeming".  And sometimes it would be a lump of coal, which
 showed nothing; and then he would say, "This can never be, for at least
 there is the seeming".  And sometimes it would be a touchstone indeed,
 beautiful in hue, adorned with polishing, the light inhabiting its sides;
 and when he found this, he would beg the thing, and the persons of that
 place would give it him, for all men were very generous of that gift; so
 that at the last he had his wallet full of them, and they chinked
 together when he rode; and when he halted by the side of the way he would
 take them out and try them, till his head turned like the sails upon a
 windmill.
 
 "A murrain upon this business!" said the elder son, "for I perceive no
 end to it.  Here I have the red, and here the blue and the green; and to
 me they seem all excellent, and yet shame each other.  A murrain on the
 trade!  If it were not for the King that is a priest and whom I have
 called my father, and if it were not for the fair maid of the dun that
 makes my mouth to sing and my heart enlarge, I would even tumble them all
 into the salt sea, and go home and be a King like other folk."
 
 But he was like the hunter that has seen a stag upon a mountain, so that
 the night may fall, and the fire be kindled, and the lights shine in his
 house; but desire of that stag is single in his bosom.
 
 Now after many years the elder son came upon the sides of the salt sea;
 and it was night, and a savage place, and the clamour of the sea was
 loud.  There he was aware of a house, and a man that sat there by the
 light of a candle, for he had no fire.  Now the elder son came in to him,
 and the man gave him water to drink, for he had no bread; and wagged his
 head when he was spoken to, for he had no words.
 
 "Have you the touchstone of truth?" asked the elder son and when the man
 had wagged his head, "I might have known that," cried the elder son.  "I
 have here a wallet full of them!"  And with that he laughed, although his
 heart was weary.
 
 And with that the man laughed too, and with the fuff of his laughter the
 candle went out.
 
 "Sleep," said the man, "for now I think you have come far enough; and
 your quest is ended, and my candle is out."
 
 Now when the morning came, the man gave him a clear pebble in his hand,
 and it had no beauty and no colour; and the elder son looked upon it
 scornfully and shook his head; and he went away, for it seemed a small
 affair to him.
 
 All that day he rode, and his mind was quiet, and the desire of the chase
 allayed.  "How if this poor pebble be the touchstone, after all?" said
 he: and he got down from his horse, and emptied forth his wallet by the
 side of the way.  Now, in the light of each other, all the touchstones
 lost their hue and fire, and withered like stars at morning; but in the
 light of the pebble, their beauty remained, only the pebble was the most
 bright.  And the elder son smote upon his brow.  "How if this be the
 truth?" he cried, "that all are a little true?"  And he took the pebble,
 and turned its light upon the heavens, and they deepened about him like
 the pit; and he turned it on the hills, and the hills were cold and
 rugged, but life ran in their sides so that his own life bounded; and he
 turned it on the dust, and he beheld the dust with joy and terror; and he
 turned it on himself, and kneeled down and prayed.
 
 "Now, thanks be to God," said the elder son, "I have found the
 touchstone; and now I may turn my reins, and ride home to the King and to
 the maid of the dun that makes my mouth to sing and my heart enlarge."
 
 Now when he came to the dun, he saw children playing by the gate where
 the King had met him in the old days; and this stayed his pleasure, for
 he thought in his heart, "It is here my children should be playing".  And
 when he came into the hall, there was his brother on the high seat and
 the maid beside him; and at that his anger rose, for he thought in his
 heart, "It is I that should be sitting there, and the maid beside me".
 
 "Who are you?" said his brother.  "And what make you in the dun?"
 
 "I am your elder brother," he replied.  "And I am come to marry the maid,
 for I have brought the touchstone of truth."
 
 Then the younger brother laughed aloud.  "Why," said he, "I found the
 touchstone years ago, and married the maid, and there are our children
 playing at the gate."
 
 Now at this the elder brother grew as gray as the dawn.  "I pray you have
 dealt justly," said he, "for I perceive my life is lost."
 
 "Justly?" quoth the younger brother.  "It becomes you ill, that are a
 restless man and a runagate, to doubt my justice, or the King my
 father's, that are sedentary folk and known in the land."
 
 "Nay," said the elder brother, "you have all else, have patience also;
 and suffer me to say the world is full of touchstones, and it appears not
 easily which is true."
 
 "I have no shame of mine," said the younger brother.  "There it is, and
 look in it."
 
 So the elder brother looked in the mirror, and he was sore amazed; for he
 was an old man, and his hair was white upon his head; and he sat down in
 the hall and wept aloud.
 
 "Now," said the younger brother, "see what a fool's part you have played,
 that ran over all the world to seek what was lying in our father's
 treasury, and came back an old carle for the dogs to bark at, and without
 chick or child.  And I that was dutiful and wise sit here crowned with
 virtues and pleasures, and happy in the light of my hearth."
 
 "Methinks you have a cruel tongue," said the elder brother; and he pulled
 out the clear pebble and turned its light on his brother; and behold the
 man was lying, his soul was shrunk into the smallness of a pea, and his
 heart was a bag of little fears like scorpions, and love was dead in his
 bosom.  And at that the elder brother cried out aloud, and turned the
 light of the pebble on the maid, and, lo! she was but a mask of a woman,
 and withinside's she was quite dead, and she smiled as a clock ticks, and
 knew not wherefore.
 
 "Oh, well," said the elder brother, "I perceive there is both good and
 bad.  So fare ye all as well as ye may in the dun; but I will go forth
 into the world with my pebble in my pocket."
 
 
 
 
 XIX.--THE POOR THING.
 
 
 There was a man in the islands who fished for his bare bellyful, and took
 his life in his hands to go forth upon the sea between four planks.  But
 though he had much ado, he was merry of heart; and the gulls heard him
 laugh when the spray met him.  And though he had little lore, he was
 sound of spirit; and when the fish came to his hook in the mid-waters, he
 blessed God without weighing.  He was bitter poor in goods and bitter
 ugly of countenance, and he had no wife.
 
 It fell in the time of the fishing that the man awoke in his house about
 the midst of the afternoon.  The fire burned in the midst, and the smoke
 went up and the sun came down by the chimney.  And the man was aware of
 the likeness of one that warmed his hands at the red peats.
 
 "I greet you," said the man, "in the name of God."
 
 "I greet you," said he that warmed his hands, "but not in the name of
 God, for I am none of His; nor in the name of Hell, for I am not of Hell.
 For I am but a bloodless thing, less than wind and lighter than a sound,
 and the wind goes through me like a net, and I am broken by a sound and
 shaken by the cold."
 
 "Be plain with me," said the man, "and tell me your name and of your
 nature."
 
 "My name," quoth the other, "is not yet named, and my nature not yet
 sure.  For I am part of a man; and I was a part of your fathers, and went
 out to fish and fight with them in the ancient days.  But now is my turn
 not yet come; and I wait until you have a wife, and then shall I be in
 your son, and a brave part of him, rejoicing manfully to launch the boat
 into the surf, skilful to direct the helm, and a man of might where the
 ring closes and the blows are going."
 
 "This is a marvellous thing to hear," said the man; "and if you are
 indeed to be my son, I fear it will go ill with you; for I am bitter poor
 in goods and bitter ugly in face, and I shall never get me a wife if I
 live to the age of eagles."
 
 "All this hate I come to remedy, my Father," said the Poor Thing; "for we
 must go this night to the little isle of sheep, where our fathers lie in
 the dead-cairn, and to-morrow to the Earl's Hall, and there shall you
 find a wife by my providing."
 
 So the man rose and put forth his boat at the time of the sunsetting; and
 the Poor Thing sat in the prow, and the spray blew through his bones like
 snow, and the wind whistled in his teeth, and the boat dipped not with
 the weight of him.
 
 "I am fearful to see you, my son," said the man.  "For methinks you are
 no thing of God."
 
 "It is only the wind that whistles in my teeth," said the Poor Thing,
 "and there is no life in me to keep it out."
 
 So they came to the little isle of sheep, where the surf burst all about
 it in the midst of the sea, and it was all green with bracken, and all
 wet with dew, and the moon enlightened it.  They ran the boat into a
 cove, and set foot to land; and the man came heavily behind among the
 rocks in the deepness of the bracken, but the Poor Thing went before him
 like a smoke in the light of the moon.  So they came to the dead-cairn,
 and they laid their ears to the stones; and the dead complained
 withinsides like a swarm of bees: "Time was that marrow was in our bones,
 and strength in our sinews; and the thoughts of our head were clothed
 upon with acts and the words of men.  But now are we broken in sunder,
 and the bonds of our bones are loosed, and our thoughts lie in the dust."
 
 Then said the Poor Thing: "Charge them that they give you the virtue they
 withheld".
 
 And the man said: "Bones of my fathers, greeting! for I am sprung of your
 loins.  And now, behold, I break open the piled stones of your cairn, and
 I let in the noon between your ribs.  Count it well done, for it was to
 be; and give me what I come seeking in the name of blood and in the name
 of God."
 
 And the spirits of the dead stirred in the cairn like ants; and they
 spoke: "You have broken the roof of our cairn and let in the noon between
 our ribs; and you have the strength of the still-living.  But what virtue
 have we? what power? or what jewel here in the dust with us, that any
 living man should covet or receive it? for we are less than nothing.  But
 we tell you one thing, speaking with many voices like bees, that the way
 is plain before all like the grooves of launching: So forth into life and
 fear not, for so did we all in the ancient ages."  And their voices
 passed away like an eddy in a river.
 
 "Now," said the Poor Thing, "they have told you a lesson, but make them
 give you a gift.  Stoop your hand among the bones without drawback, and
 you shall find their treasure."
 
 So the man stooped his hand, and the dead laid hold upon it many and
 faint like ants; but he shook them off, and behold, what he brought up in
 his hand was the shoe of a horse, and it was rusty.
 
 "It is a thing of no price," quoth the man, "for it is rusty."
 
 "We shall see that," said the Poor Thing; "for in my thought it is a good
 thing to do what our fathers did, and to keep what they kept without
 question.  And in my thought one thing is as good as another in this
 world; and a shoe of a horse will do."
 
 Now they got into their boat with the horseshoe, and when the dawn was
 come they were aware of the smoke of the Earl's town and the bells of the
 Kirk that beat.  So they set foot to shore; and the man went up to the
 market among the fishers over against the palace and the Kirk; and he was
 bitter poor and bitter ugly, and he had never a fish to sell, but only a
 shoe of a horse in his creel, and it rusty.
 
 "Now," said the Poor Thing, "do so and so, and you shall find a wife and
 I a mother."
 
 It befell that the Earl's daughter came forth to go into the Kirk upon
 her prayers; and when she saw the poor man stand in the market with only
 the shoe of a horse, and it rusty, it came in her mind it should be a
 thing of price.
 
 "What is that?" quoth she.
 
 "It is a shoe of a horse," said the man.
 
 "And what is the use of it?" quoth the Earl's daughter.
 
 "It is for no use," said the man.
 
 "I may not believe that," said she; "else why should you carry it?"
 
 "I do so," said he, "because it was so my fathers did in the ancient
 ages; and I have neither a better reason nor a worse."
 
 Now the Earl's daughter could not find it in her mind to believe him.
 "Come," quoth she, "sell me this, for I am sure it is a thing of price."
 
 "Nay," said the man, "the thing is not for sale."
 
 "What!" cried the Earl's daughter.  "Then what make you here in the
 town's market, with the thing in your creel and nought beside?"
 
 "I sit here," says the man, "to get me a wife."
 
 "There is no sense in any of these answers," thought the Earl's daughter;
 "and I could find it in my heart to weep."
 
 By came the Earl upon that; and she called him and told him all.  And
 when he had heard, he was of his daughter's mind that this should be a
 thing of virtue; and charged the man to set a price upon the thing, or
 else be hanged upon the gallows; and that was near at hand, so that the
 man could see it.
 
 "The way of life is straight like the grooves of launching," quoth the
 man.  "And if I am to be hanged let me be hanged."
 
 "Why!" cried the Earl, "will you set your neck against a shoe of a horse,
 and it rusty?"
 
 "In my thought," said the man, "one thing is as good as another in this
 world and a shoe of a horse will do."
 
 "This can never be," thought the Earl; and he stood and looked upon the
 man, and bit his beard.
 
 And the man looked up at him and smiled.  "It was so my fathers did in
 the ancient ages," quoth he to the Earl, "and I have neither a better
 reason nor a worse."
 
 "There is no sense in any of this," thought the Earl, "and I must be
 growing old."  So he had his daughter on one side, and says he: "Many
 suitors have you denied, my child.  But here is a very strange matter
 that a man should cling so to a shoe of a horse, and it rusty; and that
 he should offer it like a thing on sale, and yet not sell it; and that he
 should sit there seeking a wife.  If I come not to the bottom of this
 thing, I shall have no more pleasure in bread; and I can see no way, but
 either I should hang or you should marry him."
 
 "By my troth, but he is bitter ugly," said the Earl's daughter.  "How if
 the gallows be so near at hand?"
 
 "It was not so," said the Earl, "that my fathers did in the ancient ages.
 I am like the man, and can give you neither a better reason nor a worse.
 But do you, prithee, speak with him again."
 
 So the Earl's daughter spoke to the man.  "If you were not so bitter
 ugly," quoth she, "my father the Earl would have us marry."
 
 "Bitter ugly am I," said the man, "and you as fair as May.  Bitter ugly I
 am, and what of that?  It was so my fathers--"
 
 "In the name of God," said the Earl's daughter, "let your fathers be!"
 
 "If I had done that," said the man, "you had never been chaffering with
 me here in the market, nor your father the Earl watching with the end of
 his eye."
 
 "But come," quoth the Earl's daughter, "this is a very strange thing,
 that you would have me wed for a shoe of a horse, and it rusty."
 
 "In my thought," quoth the man, "one thing is as good--"
 
 "Oh, spare me that," said the Earl's daughter, "and tell me why I should
 marry."
 
 
 "Listen and look," said the man.
 
 Now the wind blew through the Poor Thing like an infant crying, so that
 her heart was melted; and her eyes were unsealed, and she was aware of
 the thing as it were a babe unmothered, and she took it to her arms, and
 it melted in her arms like the air.
 
 "Come," said the man, "behold a vision of our children, the busy hearth,
 and the white heads.  And let that suffice, for it is all God offers."
 
 "I have no delight in it," said she; but with that she sighed.
 
 "The ways of life are straight like the grooves of launching," said the
 man; and he took her by the hand.
 
 "And what shall we do with the horseshoe?" quoth she.
 
 "I will give it to your father," said the man; "and he can make a kirk
 and a mill of it for me."
 
 
 It came to pass in time that the Poor Thing was born; but memory of these
 matters slept within him, and he knew not that which he had done.  But he
 was a part of the eldest son; rejoicing manfully to launch the boat into
 the surf, skilful to direct the helm, and a man of might where the ring
 closes and the blows are going.
 
 
 
 
 XX.--THE SONG OF THE MORROW.
 
 
 The King of Duntrine had a daughter when he was old, and she was the
 fairest King's daughter between two seas; her hair was like spun gold,
 and her eyes like pools in a river; and the King gave her a castle upon
 the sea beach, with a terrace, and a court of the hewn stone, and four
 towers at the four corners.  Here she dwelt and grew up, and had no care
 for the morrow, and no power upon the hour, after the manner of simple
 men.
 
 It befell that she walked one day by the beach of the sea, when it was
 autumn, and the wind blew from the place of rains; and upon the one hand
 of her the sea beat, and upon the other the dead leaves ran.  This was
 the loneliest beach between two seas, and strange things had been done
 there in the ancient ages.  Now the King's daughter was aware of a crone
 that sat upon the beach.  The sea foam ran to her feet, and the dead
 leaves swarmed about her back, and the rags blew about her face in the
 blowing of the wind.
 
 "Now," said the King's daughter, and she named a holy name, "this is the
 most unhappy old crone between two seas."
 
 "Daughter of a King," said the crone, "you dwell in a stone house, and
 your hair is like the gold: but what is your profit?  Life is not long,
 nor lives strong; and you live after the way of simple men, and have no
 thought for the morrow and no power upon the hour."
 
 "Thought for the morrow, that I have," said the King's daughter; "but
 power upon the hour, that have I not."  And she mused with herself.
 
 Then the crone smote her lean hands one within the other, and laughed
 like a sea-gull.  "Home!" cried she.  "O daughter of a King, home to your
 stone house; for the longing is come upon you now, nor can you live any
 more after the manner of simple men.  Home, and toil and suffer, till the
 gift come that will make you bare, and till the man come that will bring
 you care."
 
 The King's daughter made no more ado, but she turned about and went home
 to her house in silence.  And when she was come into her chamber she
 called for her nurse.
 
 "Nurse," said the King's daughter, "thought is come upon me for the
 morrow, so that I can live no more after the manner of simple men.  Tell
 me what I must do that I may have power upon the hour."
 
 Then the nurse moaned like a snow wind.  "Alas!" said she, "that this
 thing should be; but the thought is gone into your marrow, nor is there
 any cure against the thought.  Be it so, then, even as you will; though
 power is less than weakness, power shall you have; and though the thought
 is colder than winter, yet shall you think it to an end."
 
 So the King's daughter sat in her vaulted chamber in the masoned house,
 and she thought upon the thought.  Nine years she sat; and the sea beat
 upon the terrace, and the gulls cried about the turrets, and wind crooned
 in the chimneys of the house.  Nine years she came not abroad, nor tasted
 the clean air, neither saw God's sky.  Nine years she sat and looked
 neither to the right nor to the left, nor heard speech of any one, but
 thought upon the thought of the morrow.  And her nurse fed her in
 silence, and she took of the food with her left hand, and ate it without
 grace.
 
 Now when the nine years were out, it fell dusk in the autumn, and there
 came a sound in the wind like a sound of piping.  At that the nurse
 lifted up her finger in the vaulted house.
 
 "I hear a sound in the wind," said she, "that is like the sound of
 piping."
 
 "It is but a little sound," said the King's daughter, "but yet is it
 sound enough for me."
 
 So they went down in the dusk to the doors of the house, and along the
 beach of the sea.  And the waves beat upon the one hand, and upon the
 other the dead leaves ran; and the clouds raced in the sky, and the gulls
 flew widdershins.  And when they came to that part of the beach where
 strange things had been done in the ancient ages, lo, there was the
 crone, and she was dancing widdershins.
 
 "What makes you dance widdershins, old crone?" said the King's daughter;
 "here upon the bleak beach, between the waves and the dead leaves?"
 
 "I hear a sound in the wind that is like a sound of piping," quoth she.
 "And it is for that that I dance widdershins.  For the gift comes that
 will make you bare, and the man comes that must bring you care.  But for
 me the morrow is come that I have thought upon, and the hour of my
 power."
 
 "How comes it, crone," said the King's daughter, "that you waver like a
 rag, and pale like a dead leaf before my eyes?"
 
 "Because the morrow has come that I have thought upon, and the hour of my
 power," said the crone; and she fell on the beach, and, lo! she was but
 stalks of the sea tangle, and dust of the sea sand, and the sand lice
 hopped upon the place of her.
 
 "This is the strangest thing that befell between two seas," said the
 King's daughter of Duntrine.
 
 But the nurse broke out and moaned like an autumn gale.  "I am weary of
 the wind," quoth she; and she bewailed her day.
 
 The King's daughter was aware of a man upon the beach; he went hooded so
 that none might perceive his face, and a pipe was underneath his arm.  The
 sound of his pipe was like singing wasps, and like the wind that sings in
 windlestraw; and it took hold upon men's ears like the crying of gulls.
 
 "Are you the comer?" quoth the King's daughter of Duntrine.
 
 "I am the corner," said he, "and these are the pipes that a man may hear,
 and I have power upon the hour, and this is the song of the morrow."  And
 he piped the song of the morrow, and it was as long as years; and the
 nurse wept out aloud at the hearing of it.
 
 "This is true," said the King's daughter, "that you pipe the song of the
 morrow; but that ye have power upon the hour, how may I know that?  Show
 me a marvel here upon the beach, between the waves and the dead leaves."
 
 And the man said, "Upon whom?"
 
 "Here is my nurse," quoth the King's daughter.  "She is weary of the
 wind.  Show me a good marvel upon her."
 
 And, lo! the nurse fell upon the beach as it were two handfuls of dead
 leaves, and the wind whirled them widdershins, and the sand lice hopped
 between.
 
 "It is true," said the King's daughter of Duntrine, "you are the comer,
 and you have power upon the hour.  Come with me to my stone house."
 
 So they went by the sea margin, and the man piped the song of the morrow,
 and the leaves followed behind them as they went.
 
 Then they sat down together; and the sea beat on the terrace, and the
 gulls cried about the towers, and the wind crooned in the chimneys of the
 house.  Nine years they sat, and every year when it fell autumn, the man
 said, "This is the hour, and I have power in it"; and the daughter of the
 King said, "Nay, but pipe me the song of the morrow".  And he piped it,
 and it was long like years.
 
 Now when the nine years were gone, the King's daughter of Duntrine got
 her to her feet, like one that remembers; and she looked about her in the
 masoned house; and all her servants were gone; only the man that piped
 sat upon the terrace with the hand upon his face; and as he piped the
 leaves ran about the terrace and the sea beat along the wall.  Then she
 cried to him with a great voice, "This is the hour, and let me see the
 power in it".  And with that the wind blew off the hood from the man's
 face, and, lo! there was no man there, only the clothes and the hood and
 the pipes tumbled one upon another in a corner of the terrace, and the
 dead leaves ran over them.
 
 And the King's daughter of Duntrine got her to that part of the beach
 where strange things had been done in the ancient ages; and there she sat
 her down.  The sea foam ran to her feet, and the dead leaves swarmed
 about her back, and the veil blew about her face in the blowing of the
 wind.  And when she lifted up her eyes, there was the daughter of a King
 come walking on the beach.  Her hair was like the spun gold, and her eyes
 like pools in a river, and she had no thought for the morrow and no power
 upon the hour, after the manner of simple men.
 

 
 
 
 Transcribed from the 1904 edition Chatto & Windus edition by David Price,
 email ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
 THE MERRY MEN
 AND
 Other Tales and Fables
 
 
 BY
 ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 TENTH EDITION
 
 LONDON
 CHATTO & WINDUS
 1904
 
 Three of the following Tales have appeared in the _Cornhill Magazine_;
 one in _Longman's_; one in Mr. Henry Norman's Christmas Annual; and one
 in the _Court and Society Review_.  The Author desires to make proper
 acknowledgements to the Publishers concerned.
 
 
 
 
 Dedication
 
 
 _MY DEAR LADY TAYLOR_,
 
 _To your name_, _if I wrote on brass_, _I could add nothing_; _it has
 been already written higher than I could dream to reach_, _by a strong
 and dear hand_; _and if I now dedicate to you these tales_, _it is not as
 the writer who brings you his work_, _but as the friend who would remind
 you of his affection_.
 
 _ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON_
 
 SKERRYVORE, BOURNEMOUTH.
 
 
 
 
 Contents
 
 
 The Merry Men
 
     i.    Eilean Aros
 
     ii.   What the wreck had brought to Aros
 
     iii.  Land and sea in Sandag Bay
 
     iv.   The gale
 
     v.    A man out of the sea
 
 Will o' the Mill
 
 Markheim
 
 Thrawn Janet
 
 Olalla
 
 The Treasure of Franchard
 
     i.    By the dying Mountebank
 
     ii.   Morning tale
 
     iii.  The adoption
 
     iv.   The education of the philosopher
 
     v.    Treasure trove
 
     vi.   A criminal investigation, in two parts
 
     vii.  The fall of the House of Desprez
 
     viii. The wages of philosophy
 
 
 
 
 THE MERRY MEN
 
 
 CHAPTER I.  EILEAN AROS.
 
 
 It was a beautiful morning in the late July when I set forth on foot for
 the last time for Aros.  A boat had put me ashore the night before at
 Grisapol; I had such breakfast as the little inn afforded, and, leaving
 all my baggage till I had an occasion to come round for it by sea, struck
 right across the promontory with a cheerful heart.
 
 I was far from being a native of these parts, springing, as I did, from
 an unmixed lowland stock.  But an uncle of mine, Gordon Darnaway, after a
 poor, rough youth, and some years at sea, had married a young wife in the
 islands; Mary Maclean she was called, the last of her family; and when
 she died in giving birth to a daughter, Aros, the sea-girt farm, had
 remained in his possession.  It brought him in nothing but the means of
 life, as I was well aware; but he was a man whom ill-fortune had pursued;
 he feared, cumbered as he was with the young child, to make a fresh
 adventure upon life; and remained in Aros, biting his nails at destiny.
 Years passed over his head in that isolation, and brought neither help
 nor contentment.  Meantime our family was dying out in the lowlands;
 there is little luck for any of that race; and perhaps my father was the
 luckiest of all, for not only was he one of the last to die, but he left
 a son to his name and a little money to support it.  I was a student of
 Edinburgh University, living well enough at my own charges, but without
 kith or kin; when some news of me found its way to Uncle Gordon on the
 Ross of Grisapol; and he, as he was a man who held blood thicker than
 water, wrote to me the day he heard of my existence, and taught me to
 count Aros as my home.  Thus it was that I came to spend my vacations in
 that part of the country, so far from all society and comfort, between
 the codfish and the moorcocks; and thus it was that now, when I had done
 with my classes, I was returning thither with so light a heart that July
 day.
 
 The Ross, as we call it, is a promontory neither wide nor high, but as
 rough as God made it to this day; the deep sea on either hand of it, full
 of rugged isles and reefs most perilous to seamen--all overlooked from
 the eastward by some very high cliffs and the great peals of Ben Kyaw.
 _The Mountain of the Mist_, they say the words signify in the Gaelic
 tongue; and it is well named.  For that hill-top, which is more than
 three thousand feet in height, catches all the clouds that come blowing
 from the seaward; and, indeed, I used often to think that it must make
 them for itself; since when all heaven was clear to the sea level, there
 would ever be a streamer on Ben Kyaw.  It brought water, too, and was
 mossy {5} to the top in consequence.  I have seen us sitting in broad
 sunshine on the Ross, and the rain falling black like crape upon the
 mountain.  But the wetness of it made it often appear more beautiful to
 my eyes; for when the sun struck upon the hill sides, there were many wet
 rocks and watercourses that shone like jewels even as far as Aros,
 fifteen miles away.
 
 The road that I followed was a cattle-track.  It twisted so as nearly to
 double the length of my journey; it went over rough boulders so that a
 man had to leap from one to another, and through soft bottoms where the
 moss came nearly to the knee.  There was no cultivation anywhere, and not
 one house in the ten miles from Grisapol to Aros.  Houses of course there
 were--three at least; but they lay so far on the one side or the other
 that no stranger could have found them from the track.  A large part of
 the Ross is covered with big granite rocks, some of them larger than a
 two-roomed house, one beside another, with fern and deep heather in
 between them where the vipers breed.  Anyway the wind was, it was always
 sea air, as salt as on a ship; the gulls were as free as moorfowl over
 all the Ross; and whenever the way rose a little, your eye would kindle
 with the brightness of the sea.  From the very midst of the land, on a
 day of wind and a high spring, I have heard the Roost roaring, like a
 battle where it runs by Aros, and the great and fearful voices of the
 breakers that we call the Merry Men.
 
 Aros itself--Aros Jay, I have heard the natives call it, and they say it
 means _the House of God_--Aros itself was not properly a piece of the
 Ross, nor was it quite an islet.  It formed the south-west corner of the
 land, fitted close to it, and was in one place only separated from the
 coast by a little gut of the sea, not forty feet across the narrowest.
 When the tide was full, this was clear and still, like a pool on a land
 river; only there was a difference in the weeds and fishes, and the water
 itself was green instead of brown; but when the tide went out, in the
 bottom of the ebb, there was a day or two in every month when you could
 pass dryshod from Aros to the mainland.  There was some good pasture,
 where my uncle fed the sheep he lived on; perhaps the feed was better
 because the ground rose higher on the islet than the main level of the
 Ross, but this I am not skilled enough to settle.  The house was a good
 one for that country, two storeys high.  It looked westward over a bay,
 with a pier hard by for a boat, and from the door you could watch the
 vapours blowing on Ben Kyaw.
 
 On all this part of the coast, and especially near Aros, these great
 granite rocks that I have spoken of go down together in troops into the
 sea, like cattle on a summer's day.  There they stand, for all the world
 like their neighbours ashore; only the salt water sobbing between them
 instead of the quiet earth, and clots of sea-pink blooming on their sides
 instead of heather; and the great sea conger to wreathe about the base of
 them instead of the poisonous viper of the land.  On calm days you can go
 wandering between them in a boat for hours, echoes following you about
 the labyrinth; but when the sea is up, Heaven help the man that hears
 that cauldron boiling.
 
 Off the south-west end of Aros these blocks are very many, and much
 greater in size.  Indeed, they must grow monstrously bigger out to sea,
 for there must be ten sea miles of open water sown with them as thick as
 a country place with houses, some standing thirty feet above the tides,
 some covered, but all perilous to ships; so that on a clear, westerly
 blowing day, I have counted, from the top of Aros, the great rollers
 breaking white and heavy over as many as six-and-forty buried reefs.  But
 it is nearer in shore that the danger is worst; for the tide, here
 running like a mill race, makes a long belt of broken water--a _Roost_ we
 call it--at the tail of the land.  I have often been out there in a dead
 calm at the slack of the tide; and a strange place it is, with the sea
 swirling and combing up and boiling like the cauldrons of a linn, and now
 and again a little dancing mutter of sound as though the _Roost_ were
 talking to itself.  But when the tide begins to run again, and above all
 in heavy weather, there is no man could take a boat within half a mile of
 it, nor a ship afloat that could either steer or live in such a place.
 You can hear the roaring of it six miles away.  At the seaward end there
 comes the strongest of the bubble; and it's here that these big breakers
 dance together--the dance of death, it may be called--that have got the
 name, in these parts, of the Merry Men.  I have heard it said that they
 run fifty feet high; but that must be the green water only, for the spray
 runs twice as high as that.  Whether they got the name from their
 movements, which are swift and antic, or from the shouting they make
 about the turn of the tide, so that all Aros shakes with it, is more than
 I can tell.
 
 The truth is, that in a south-westerly wind, that part of our archipelago
 is no better than a trap.  If a ship got through the reefs, and weathered
 the Merry Men, it would be to come ashore on the south coast of Aros, in
 Sandag Bay, where so many dismal things befell our family, as I propose
 to tell.  The thought of all these dangers, in the place I knew so long,
 makes me particularly welcome the works now going forward to set lights
 upon the headlands and buoys along the channels of our iron-bound,
 inhospitable islands.
 
 The country people had many a story about Aros, as I used to hear from my
 uncle's man, Rorie, an old servant of the Macleans, who had transferred
 his services without afterthought on the occasion of the marriage.  There
 was some tale of an unlucky creature, a sea-kelpie, that dwelt and did
 business in some fearful manner of his own among the boiling breakers of
 the Roost.  A mermaid had once met a piper on Sandag beach, and there
 sang to him a long, bright midsummer's night, so that in the morning he
 was found stricken crazy, and from thenceforward, till the day he died,
 said only one form of words; what they were in the original Gaelic I
 cannot tell, but they were thus translated: 'Ah, the sweet singing out of
 the sea.'  Seals that haunted on that coast have been known to speak to
 man in his own tongue, presaging great disasters.  It was here that a
 certain saint first landed on his voyage out of Ireland to convert the
 Hebrideans.  And, indeed, I think he had some claim to be called saint;
 for, with the boats of that past age, to make so rough a passage, and
 land on such a ticklish coast, was surely not far short of the
 miraculous.  It was to him, or to some of his monkish underlings who had
 a cell there, that the islet owes its holy and beautiful name, the House
 of God.
 
 Among these old wives' stories there was one which I was inclined to hear
 with more credulity.  As I was told, in that tempest which scattered the
 ships of the Invincible Armada over all the north and west of Scotland,
 one great vessel came ashore on Aros, and before the eyes of some
 solitary people on a hill-top, went down in a moment with all hands, her
 colours flying even as she sank.  There was some likelihood in this tale;
 for another of that fleet lay sunk on the north side, twenty miles from
 Grisapol.  It was told, I thought, with more detail and gravity than its
 companion stories, and there was one particularity which went far to
 convince me of its truth: the name, that is, of the ship was still
 remembered, and sounded, in my ears, Spanishly.  The _Espirito Santo_
 they called it, a great ship of many decks of guns, laden with treasure
 and grandees of Spain, and fierce soldadoes, that now lay fathom deep to
 all eternity, done with her wars and voyages, in Sandag bay, upon the
 west of Aros.  No more salvos of ordnance for that tall ship, the 'Holy
 Spirit,' no more fair winds or happy ventures; only to rot there deep in
 the sea-tangle and hear the shoutings of the Merry Men as the tide ran
 high about the island.  It was a strange thought to me first and last,
 and only grew stranger as I learned the more of Spain, from which she had
 set sail with so proud a company, and King Philip, the wealthy king, that
 sent her on that voyage.
 
 And now I must tell you, as I walked from Grisapol that day, the
 _Espirito Santo_ was very much in my reflections.  I had been favourably
 remarked by our then Principal in Edinburgh College, that famous writer,
 Dr. Robertson, and by him had been set to work on some papers of an
 ancient date to rearrange and sift of what was worthless; and in one of
 these, to my great wonder, I found a note of this very ship, the
 _Espirito Santo_, with her captain's name, and how she carried a great
 part of the Spaniard's treasure, and had been lost upon the Ross of
 Grisapol; but in what particular spot, the wild tribes of that place and
 period would give no information to the king's inquiries.  Putting one
 thing with another, and taking our island tradition together with this
 note of old King Jamie's perquisitions after wealth, it had come strongly
 on my mind that the spot for which he sought in vain could be no other
 than the small bay of Sandag on my uncle's land; and being a fellow of a
 mechanical turn, I had ever since been plotting how to weigh that good
 ship up again with all her ingots, ounces, and doubloons, and bring back
 our house of Darnaway to its long-forgotten dignity and wealth.
 
 This was a design of which I soon had reason to repent.  My mind was
 sharply turned on different reflections; and since I became the witness
 of a strange judgment of God's, the thought of dead men's treasures has
 been intolerable to my conscience.  But even at that time I must acquit
 myself of sordid greed; for if I desired riches, it was not for their own
 sake, but for the sake of a person who was dear to my heart--my uncle's
 daughter, Mary Ellen.  She had been educated well, and had been a time to
 school upon the mainland; which, poor girl, she would have been happier
 without.  For Aros was no place for her, with old Rorie the servant, and
 her father, who was one of the unhappiest men in Scotland, plainly bred
 up in a country place among Cameronians, long a skipper sailing out of
 the Clyde about the islands, and now, with infinite discontent, managing
 his sheep and a little 'long shore fishing for the necessary bread.  If
 it was sometimes weariful to me, who was there but a month or two, you
 may fancy what it was to her who dwelt in that same desert all the year
 round, with the sheep and flying sea-gulls, and the Merry Men singing and
 dancing in the Roost!
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.  WHAT THE WRECK HAD BROUGHT TO AROS.
 
 
 It was half-flood when I got the length of Aros; and there was nothing
 for it but to stand on the far shore and whistle for Rorie with the boat.
 I had no need to repeat the signal.  At the first sound, Mary was at the
 door flying a handkerchief by way of answer, and the old long-legged
 serving-man was shambling down the gravel to the pier.  For all his
 hurry, it took him a long while to pull across the bay; and I observed
 him several times to pause, go into the stern, and look over curiously
 into the wake.  As he came nearer, he seemed to me aged and haggard, and
 I thought he avoided my eye.  The coble had been repaired, with two new
 thwarts and several patches of some rare and beautiful foreign wood, the
 name of it unknown to me.
 
 'Why, Rorie,' said I, as we began the return voyage, 'this is fine wood.
 How came you by that?'
 
 'It will be hard to cheesel,' Rorie opined reluctantly; and just then,
 dropping the oars, he made another of those dives into the stern which I
 had remarked as he came across to fetch me, and, leaning his hand on my
 shoulder, stared with an awful look into the waters of the bay.
 
 'What is wrong?' I asked, a good deal startled.
 
 'It will be a great feesh,' said the old man, returning to his oars; and
 nothing more could I get out of him, but strange glances and an ominous
 nodding of the head.  In spite of myself, I was infected with a measure
 of uneasiness; I turned also, and studied the wake.  The water was still
 and transparent, but, out here in the middle of the bay, exceeding deep.
 For some time I could see naught; but at last it did seem to me as if
 something dark--a great fish, or perhaps only a shadow--followed
 studiously in the track of the moving coble.  And then I remembered one
 of Rorie's superstitions: how in a ferry in Morven, in some great,
 exterminating feud among the clans; a fish, the like of it unknown in all
 our waters, followed for some years the passage of the ferry-boat, until
 no man dared to make the crossing.
 
 'He will be waiting for the right man,' said Rorie.
 
 Mary met me on the beach, and led me up the brae and into the house of
 Aros.  Outside and inside there were many changes.  The garden was fenced
 with the same wood that I had noted in the boat; there were chairs in the
 kitchen covered with strange brocade; curtains of brocade hung from the
 window; a clock stood silent on the dresser; a lamp of brass was swinging
 from the roof; the table was set for dinner with the finest of linen and
 silver; and all these new riches were displayed in the plain old kitchen
 that I knew so well, with the high-backed settle, and the stools, and the
 closet bed for Rorie; with the wide chimney the sun shone into, and the
 clear-smouldering peats; with the pipes on the mantelshelf and the three-
 cornered spittoons, filled with sea-shells instead of sand, on the floor;
 with the bare stone walls and the bare wooden floor, and the three
 patchwork rugs that were of yore its sole adornment--poor man's
 patchwork, the like of it unknown in cities, woven with homespun, and
 Sunday black, and sea-cloth polished on the bench of rowing.  The room,
 like the house, had been a sort of wonder in that country-side, it was so
 neat and habitable; and to see it now, shamed by these incongruous
 additions, filled me with indignation and a kind of anger.  In view of
 the errand I had come upon to Aros, the feeling was baseless and unjust;
 but it burned high, at the first moment, in my heart.
 
 'Mary, girl,' said I, 'this is the place I had learned to call my home,
 and I do not know it.'
 
 'It is my home by nature, not by the learning,' she replied; 'the place I
 was born and the place I'm like to die in; and I neither like these
 changes, nor the way they came, nor that which came with them.  I would
 have liked better, under God's pleasure, they had gone down into the sea,
 and the Merry Men were dancing on them now.'
 
 Mary was always serious; it was perhaps the only trait that she shared
 with her father; but the tone with which she uttered these words was even
 graver than of custom.
 
 'Ay,' said I, 'I feared it came by wreck, and that's by death; yet when
 my father died, I took his goods without remorse.'
 
 'Your father died a clean strae death, as the folk say,' said Mary.
 
 'True,' I returned; 'and a wreck is like a judgment.  What was she
 called?'
 
 'They ca'd her the _Christ-Anna_,' said a voice behind me; and, turning
 round, I saw my uncle standing in the doorway.
 
 He was a sour, small, bilious man, with a long face and very dark eyes;
 fifty-six years old, sound and active in body, and with an air somewhat
 between that of a shepherd and that of a man following the sea.  He never
 laughed, that I heard; read long at the Bible; prayed much, like the
 Cameronians he had been brought up among; and indeed, in many ways, used
 to remind me of one of the hill-preachers in the killing times before the
 Revolution.  But he never got much comfort, nor even, as I used to think,
 much guidance, by his piety.  He had his black fits when he was afraid of
 hell; but he had led a rough life, to which he would look back with envy,
 and was still a rough, cold, gloomy man.
 
 As he came in at the door out of the sunlight, with his bonnet on his
 head and a pipe hanging in his button-hole, he seemed, like Rorie, to
 have grown older and paler, the lines were deeplier ploughed upon his
 face, and the whites of his eyes were yellow, like old stained ivory, or
 the bones of the dead.
 
 'Ay' he repeated, dwelling upon the first part of the word, 'the _Christ-
 Anna_.  It's an awfu' name.'
 
 I made him my salutations, and complimented him upon his look of health;
 for I feared he had perhaps been ill.
 
 'I'm in the body,' he replied, ungraciously enough; 'aye in the body and
 the sins of the body, like yoursel'.  Denner,' he said abruptly to Mary,
 and then ran on to me: 'They're grand braws, thir that we hae gotten, are
 they no?  Yon's a bonny knock {15}, but it'll no gang; and the napery's
 by ordnar.  Bonny, bairnly braws; it's for the like o' them folk sells
 the peace of God that passeth understanding; it's for the like o' them,
 an' maybe no even sae muckle worth, folk daunton God to His face and burn
 in muckle hell; and it's for that reason the Scripture ca's them, as I
 read the passage, the accursed thing.  Mary, ye girzie,' he interrupted
 himself to cry with some asperity, 'what for hae ye no put out the twa
 candlesticks?'
 
 'Why should we need them at high noon?' she asked.
 
 But my uncle was not to be turned from his idea.  'We'll bruik {16} them
 while we may,' he said; and so two massive candlesticks of wrought silver
 were added to the table equipage, already so unsuited to that rough sea-
 side farm.
 
 'She cam' ashore Februar' 10, about ten at nicht,' he went on to me.
 'There was nae wind, and a sair run o' sea; and she was in the sook o'
 the Roost, as I jaloose.  We had seen her a' day, Rorie and me, beating
 to the wind.  She wasnae a handy craft, I'm thinking, that _Christ-Anna_;
 for she would neither steer nor stey wi' them.  A sair day they had of
 it; their hands was never aff the sheets, and it perishin' cauld--ower
 cauld to snaw; and aye they would get a bit nip o' wind, and awa' again,
 to pit the emp'y hope into them.  Eh, man! but they had a sair day for
 the last o't!  He would have had a prood, prood heart that won ashore
 upon the back o' that.'
 
 'And were all lost?' I cried.  'God held them!'
 
 'Wheesht!' he said sternly.  'Nane shall pray for the deid on my hearth-
 stane.'
 
 I disclaimed a Popish sense for my ejaculation; and he seemed to accept
 my disclaimer with unusual facility, and ran on once more upon what had
 evidently become a favourite subject.
 
 'We fand her in Sandag Bay, Rorie an' me, and a' thae braws in the inside
 of her.  There's a kittle bit, ye see, about Sandag; whiles the sook rins
 strong for the Merry Men; an' whiles again, when the tide's makin' hard
 an' ye can hear the Roost blawin' at the far-end of Aros, there comes a
 back-spang of current straucht into Sandag Bay.  Weel, there's the thing
 that got the grip on the _Christ-Anna_.  She but to have come in ram-stam
 an' stern forrit; for the bows of her are aften under, and the back-side
 of her is clear at hie-water o' neaps.  But, man! the dunt that she cam
 doon wi' when she struck!  Lord save us a'! but it's an unco life to be a
 sailor--a cauld, wanchancy life.  Mony's the gliff I got mysel' in the
 great deep; and why the Lord should hae made yon unco water is mair than
 ever I could win to understand.  He made the vales and the pastures, the
 bonny green yaird, the halesome, canty land--
 
    And now they shout and sing to Thee,
    For Thou hast made them glad,
 
 as the Psalms say in the metrical version.  No that I would preen my
 faith to that clink neither; but it's bonny, and easier to mind.  "Who go
 to sea in ships," they hae't again--
 
             And in
       Great waters trading be,
    Within the deep these men God's works
       And His great wonders see.
 
 Weel, it's easy sayin' sae.  Maybe Dauvit wasnae very weel acquant wi'
 the sea.  But, troth, if it wasnae prentit in the Bible, I wad whiles be
 temp'it to think it wasnae the Lord, but the muckle, black deil that made
 the sea.  There's naething good comes oot o't but the fish; an' the
 spentacle o' God riding on the tempest, to be shure, whilk would be what
 Dauvit was likely ettling at.  But, man, they were sair wonders that God
 showed to the _Christ-Anna_--wonders, do I ca' them?  Judgments, rather:
 judgments in the mirk nicht among the draygons o' the deep.  And their
 souls--to think o' that--their souls, man, maybe no prepared!  The sea--a
 muckle yett to hell!'
 
 I observed, as my uncle spoke, that his voice was unnaturally moved and
 his manner unwontedly demonstrative.  He leaned forward at these last
 words, for example, and touched me on the knee with his spread fingers,
 looking up into my face with a certain pallor, and I could see that his
 eyes shone with a deep-seated fire, and that the lines about his mouth
 were drawn and tremulous.
 
 Even the entrance of Rorie, and the beginning of our meal, did not detach
 him from his train of thought beyond a moment.  He condescended, indeed,
 to ask me some questions as to my success at college, but I thought it
 was with half his mind; and even in his extempore grace, which was, as
 usual, long and wandering, I could find the trace of his preoccupation,
 praying, as he did, that God would 'remember in mercy fower puir,
 feckless, fiddling, sinful creatures here by their lee-lane beside the
 great and dowie waters.'
 
 Soon there came an interchange of speeches between him and Rorie.
 
 'Was it there?' asked my uncle.
 
 'Ou, ay!' said Rorie.
 
 I observed that they both spoke in a manner of aside, and with some show
 of embarrassment, and that Mary herself appeared to colour, and looked
 down on her plate.  Partly to show my knowledge, and so relieve the party
 from an awkward strain, partly because I was curious, I pursued the
 subject.
 
 'You mean the fish?' I asked.
 
 'Whatten fish?' cried my uncle.  'Fish, quo' he!  Fish!  Your een are fu'
 o' fatness, man; your heid dozened wi' carnal leir.  Fish! it's a bogle!'
 
 He spoke with great vehemence, as though angry; and perhaps I was not
 very willing to be put down so shortly, for young men are disputatious.
 At least I remember I retorted hotly, crying out upon childish
 superstitions.
 
 'And ye come frae the College!' sneered Uncle Gordon.  'Gude kens what
 they learn folk there; it's no muckle service onyway.  Do ye think, man,
 that there's naething in a' yon saut wilderness o' a world oot wast
 there, wi' the sea grasses growin', an' the sea beasts fechtin', an' the
 sun glintin' down into it, day by day?  Na; the sea's like the land, but
 fearsomer.  If there's folk ashore, there's folk in the sea--deid they
 may be, but they're folk whatever; and as for deils, there's nane that's
 like the sea deils.  There's no sae muckle harm in the land deils, when
 a's said and done.  Lang syne, when I was a callant in the south country,
 I mind there was an auld, bald bogle in the Peewie Moss.  I got a glisk
 o' him mysel', sittin' on his hunkers in a hag, as gray's a tombstane.
 An', troth, he was a fearsome-like taed.  But he steered naebody.  Nae
 doobt, if ane that was a reprobate, ane the Lord hated, had gane by there
 wi' his sin still upon his stamach, nae doobt the creature would hae
 lowped upo' the likes o' him.  But there's deils in the deep sea would
 yoke on a communicant!  Eh, sirs, if ye had gane doon wi' the puir lads
 in the _Christ-Anna_, ye would ken by now the mercy o' the seas.  If ye
 had sailed it for as lang as me, ye would hate the thocht of it as I do.
 If ye had but used the een God gave ye, ye would hae learned the
 wickedness o' that fause, saut, cauld, bullering creature, and of a'
 that's in it by the Lord's permission: labsters an' partans, an' sic
 like, howking in the deid; muckle, gutsy, blawing whales; an' fish--the
 hale clan o' them--cauld-wamed, blind-eed uncanny ferlies.  O, sirs,' he
 cried, 'the horror--the horror o' the sea!'
 
 We were all somewhat staggered by this outburst; and the speaker himself,
 after that last hoarse apostrophe, appeared to sink gloomily into his own
 thoughts.  But Rorie, who was greedy of superstitious lore, recalled him
 to the subject by a question.
 
 'You will not ever have seen a teevil of the sea?' he asked.
 
 'No clearly,' replied the other.  'I misdoobt if a mere man could see ane
 clearly and conteenue in the body.  I hae sailed wi' a lad--they ca'd him
 Sandy Gabart; he saw ane, shure eneueh, an' shure eneueh it was the end
 of him.  We were seeven days oot frae the Clyde--a sair wark we had
 had--gaun north wi' seeds an' braws an' things for the Macleod.  We had
 got in ower near under the Cutchull'ns, an' had just gane about by soa,
 an' were off on a lang tack, we thocht would maybe hauld as far's
 Copnahow.  I mind the nicht weel; a mune smoored wi' mist; a fine gaun
 breeze upon the water, but no steedy; an'--what nane o' us likit to
 hear--anither wund gurlin' owerheid, amang thae fearsome, auld stane
 craigs o' the Cutchull'ns.  Weel, Sandy was forrit wi' the jib sheet; we
 couldnae see him for the mains'l, that had just begude to draw, when a'
 at ance he gied a skirl.  I luffed for my life, for I thocht we were ower
 near Soa; but na, it wasnae that, it was puir Sandy Gabart's deid
 skreigh, or near hand, for he was deid in half an hour.  A't he could
 tell was that a sea deil, or sea bogle, or sea spenster, or sic-like, had
 clum up by the bowsprit, an' gi'en him ae cauld, uncanny look.  An', or
 the life was oot o' Sandy's body, we kent weel what the thing betokened,
 and why the wund gurled in the taps o' the Cutchull'ns; for doon it
 cam'--a wund do I ca' it! it was the wund o' the Lord's anger--an' a'
 that nicht we foucht like men dementit, and the niest that we kenned we
 were ashore in Loch Uskevagh, an' the cocks were crawin' in Benbecula.'
 
 'It will have been a merman,' Rorie said.
 
 'A merman!' screamed my uncle with immeasurable scorn.  'Auld wives'
 clavers!  There's nae sic things as mermen.'
 
 'But what was the creature like?' I asked.
 
 'What like was it?  Gude forbid that we suld ken what like it was!  It
 had a kind of a heid upon it--man could say nae mair.'
 
 Then Rorie, smarting under the affront, told several tales of mermen,
 mermaids, and sea-horses that had come ashore upon the islands and
 attacked the crews of boats upon the sea; and my uncle, in spite of his
 incredulity, listened with uneasy interest.
 
 'Aweel, aweel,' he said, 'it may be sae; I may be wrang; but I find nae
 word o' mermen in the Scriptures.'
 
 'And you will find nae word of Aros Roost, maybe,' objected Rorie, and
 his argument appeared to carry weight.
 
 When dinner was over, my uncle carried me forth with him to a bank behind
 the house.  It was a very hot and quiet afternoon; scarce a ripple
 anywhere upon the sea, nor any voice but the familiar voice of sheep and
 gulls; and perhaps in consequence of this repose in nature, my kinsman
 showed himself more rational and tranquil than before.  He spoke evenly
 and almost cheerfully of my career, with every now and then a reference
 to the lost ship or the treasures it had brought to Aros.  For my part, I
 listened to him in a sort of trance, gazing with all my heart on that
 remembered scene, and drinking gladly the sea-air and the smoke of peats
 that had been lit by Mary.
 
 Perhaps an hour had passed when my uncle, who had all the while been
 covertly gazing on the surface of the little bay, rose to his feet and
 bade me follow his example.  Now I should say that the great run of tide
 at the south-west end of Aros exercises a perturbing influence round all
 the coast.  In Sandag Bay, to the south, a strong current runs at certain
 periods of the flood and ebb respectively; but in this northern bay--Aros
 Bay, as it is called--where the house stands and on which my uncle was
 now gazing, the only sign of disturbance is towards the end of the ebb,
 and even then it is too slight to be remarkable.  When there is any
 swell, nothing can be seen at all; but when it is calm, as it often is,
 there appear certain strange, undecipherable marks--sea-runes, as we may
 name them--on the glassy surface of the bay.  The like is common in a
 thousand places on the coast; and many a boy must have amused himself as
 I did, seeking to read in them some reference to himself or those he
 loved.  It was to these marks that my uncle now directed my attention,
 struggling, as he did so, with an evident reluctance.
 
 'Do ye see yon scart upo' the water?' he inquired; 'yon ane wast the gray
 stane?  Ay?  Weel, it'll no be like a letter, wull it?'
 
 'Certainly it is,' I replied.  'I have often remarked it.  It is like a
 C.'
 
 He heaved a sigh as if heavily disappointed with my answer, and then
 added below his breath: 'Ay, for the _Christ-Anna_.'
 
 'I used to suppose, sir, it was for myself,' said I; 'for my name is
 Charles.'
 
 'And so ye saw't afore?', he ran on, not heeding my remark.  'Weel, weel,
 but that's unco strange.  Maybe, it's been there waitin', as a man wad
 say, through a' the weary ages.  Man, but that's awfu'.'  And then,
 breaking off: 'Ye'll no see anither, will ye?' he asked.
 
 'Yes,' said I.  'I see another very plainly, near the Ross side, where
 the road comes down--an M.'
 
 'An M,' he repeated very low; and then, again after another pause: 'An'
 what wad ye make o' that?' he inquired.
 
 'I had always thought it to mean Mary, sir,' I answered, growing somewhat
 red, convinced as I was in my own mind that I was on the threshold of a
 decisive explanation.
 
 But we were each following his own train of thought to the exclusion of
 the other's.  My uncle once more paid no attention to my words; only hung
 his head and held his peace; and I might have been led to fancy that he
 had not heard me, if his next speech had not contained a kind of echo
 from my own.
 
 'I would say naething o' thae clavers to Mary,' he observed, and began to
 walk forward.
 
 There is a belt of turf along the side of Aros Bay, where walking is
 easy; and it was along this that I silently followed my silent kinsman.  I
 was perhaps a little disappointed at having lost so good an opportunity
 to declare my love; but I was at the same time far more deeply exercised
 at the change that had befallen my uncle.  He was never an ordinary,
 never, in the strict sense, an amiable, man; but there was nothing in
 even the worst that I had known of him before, to prepare me for so
 strange a transformation.  It was impossible to close the eyes against
 one fact; that he had, as the saying goes, something on his mind; and as
 I mentally ran over the different words which might be represented by the
 letter M--misery, mercy, marriage, money, and the like--I was arrested
 with a sort of start by the word murder.  I was still considering the
 ugly sound and fatal meaning of the word, when the direction of our walk
 brought us to a point from which a view was to be had to either side,
 back towards Aros Bay and homestead, and forward on the ocean, dotted to
 the north with isles, and lying to the southward blue and open to the
 sky.  There my guide came to a halt, and stood staring for awhile on that
 expanse.  Then he turned to me and laid a hand on my arm.
 
 'Ye think there's naething there?' he said, pointing with his pipe; and
 then cried out aloud, with a kind of exultation: 'I'll tell ye, man!  The
 deid are down there--thick like rattons!'
 
 He turned at once, and, without another word, we retraced our steps to
 the house of Aros.
 
 I was eager to be alone with Mary; yet it was not till after supper, and
 then but for a short while, that I could have a word with her.  I lost no
 time beating about the bush, but spoke out plainly what was on my mind.
 
 'Mary,' I said, 'I have not come to Aros without a hope.  If that should
 prove well founded, we may all leave and go somewhere else, secure of
 daily bread and comfort; secure, perhaps, of something far beyond that,
 which it would seem extravagant in me to promise.  But there's a hope
 that lies nearer to my heart than money.'  And at that I paused.  'You
 can guess fine what that is, Mary,' I said.  She looked away from me in
 silence, and that was small encouragement, but I was not to be put off.
 'All my days I have thought the world of you,' I continued; 'the time
 goes on and I think always the more of you; I could not think to be happy
 or hearty in my life without you: you are the apple of my eye.'  Still
 she looked away, and said never a word; but I thought I saw that her
 hands shook.  'Mary,' I cried in fear, 'do ye no like me?'
 
 'O, Charlie man,' she said, 'is this a time to speak of it?  Let me be, a
 while; let me be the way I am; it'll not be you that loses by the
 waiting!'
 
 I made out by her voice that she was nearly weeping, and this put me out
 of any thought but to compose her.  'Mary Ellen,' I said, 'say no more; I
 did not come to trouble you: your way shall be mine, and your time too;
 and you have told me all I wanted.  Only just this one thing more: what
 ails you?'
 
 She owned it was her father, but would enter into no particulars, only
 shook her head, and said he was not well and not like himself, and it was
 a great pity.  She knew nothing of the wreck.  'I havenae been near it,'
 said she.  'What for would I go near it, Charlie lad?  The poor souls are
 gone to their account long syne; and I would just have wished they had
 ta'en their gear with them--poor souls!'
 
 This was scarcely any great encouragement for me to tell her of the
 _Espirito Santo_; yet I did so, and at the very first word she cried out
 in surprise.  'There was a man at Grisapol,' she said, 'in the month of
 May--a little, yellow, black-avised body, they tell me, with gold rings
 upon his fingers, and a beard; and he was speiring high and low for that
 same ship.'
 
 It was towards the end of April that I had been given these papers to
 sort out by Dr. Robertson: and it came suddenly back upon my mind that
 they were thus prepared for a Spanish historian, or a man calling himself
 such, who had come with high recommendations to the Principal, on a
 mission of inquiry as to the dispersion of the great Armada.  Putting one
 thing with another, I fancied that the visitor 'with the gold rings upon
 his fingers' might be the same with Dr. Robertson's historian from
 Madrid.  If that were so, he would be more likely after treasure for
 himself than information for a learned society.  I made up my mind, I
 should lose no time over my undertaking; and if the ship lay sunk in
 Sandag Bay, as perhaps both he and I supposed, it should not be for the
 advantage of this ringed adventurer, but for Mary and myself, and for the
 good, old, honest, kindly family of the Darnaways.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.  LAND AND SEA IN SANDAG BAY.
 
 
 I was early afoot next morning; and as soon as I had a bite to eat, set
 forth upon a tour of exploration.  Something in my heart distinctly told
 me that I should find the ship of the Armada; and although I did not give
 way entirely to such hopeful thoughts, I was still very light in spirits
 and walked upon air.  Aros is a very rough islet, its surface strewn with
 great rocks and shaggy with fernland heather; and my way lay almost north
 and south across the highest knoll; and though the whole distance was
 inside of two miles it took more time and exertion than four upon a level
 road.  Upon the summit, I paused.  Although not very high--not three
 hundred feet, as I think--it yet outtops all the neighbouring lowlands of
 the Ross, and commands a great view of sea and islands.  The sun, which
 had been up some time, was already hot upon my neck; the air was listless
 and thundery, although purely clear; away over the north-west, where the
 isles lie thickliest congregated, some half-a-dozen small and ragged
 clouds hung together in a covey; and the head of Ben Kyaw wore, not
 merely a few streamers, but a solid hood of vapour.  There was a threat
 in the weather.  The sea, it is true, was smooth like glass: even the
 Roost was but a seam on that wide mirror, and the Merry Men no more than
 caps of foam; but to my eye and ear, so long familiar with these places,
 the sea also seemed to lie uneasily; a sound of it, like a long sigh,
 mounted to me where I stood; and, quiet as it was, the Roost itself
 appeared to be revolving mischief.  For I ought to say that all we
 dwellers in these parts attributed, if not prescience, at least a quality
 of warning, to that strange and dangerous creature of the tides.
 
 I hurried on, then, with the greater speed, and had soon descended the
 slope of Aros to the part that we call Sandag Bay.  It is a pretty large
 piece of water compared with the size of the isle; well sheltered from
 all but the prevailing wind; sandy and shoal and bounded by low
 sand-hills to the west, but to the eastward lying several fathoms deep
 along a ledge of rocks.  It is upon that side that, at a certain time
 each flood, the current mentioned by my uncle sets so strong into the
 bay; a little later, when the Roost begins to work higher, an undertow
 runs still more strongly in the reverse direction; and it is the action
 of this last, as I suppose, that has scoured that part so deep.  Nothing
 is to be seen out of Sandag Bay, but one small segment of the horizon
 and, in heavy weather, the breakers flying high over a deep sea reef.
 
 From half-way down the hill, I had perceived the wreck of February last,
 a brig of considerable tonnage, lying, with her back broken, high and dry
 on the east corner of the sands; and I was making directly towards it,
 and already almost on the margin of the turf, when my eyes were suddenly
 arrested by a spot, cleared of fern and heather, and marked by one of
 those long, low, and almost human-looking mounds that we see so commonly
 in graveyards.  I stopped like a man shot.  Nothing had been said to me
 of any dead man or interment on the island; Rorie, Mary, and my uncle had
 all equally held their peace; of her at least, I was certain that she
 must be ignorant; and yet here, before my eyes, was proof indubitable of
 the fact.  Here was a grave; and I had to ask myself, with a chill, what
 manner of man lay there in his last sleep, awaiting the signal of the
 Lord in that solitary, sea-beat resting-place?  My mind supplied no
 answer but what I feared to entertain.  Shipwrecked, at least, he must
 have been; perhaps, like the old Armada mariners, from some far and rich
 land over-sea; or perhaps one of my own race, perishing within eyesight
 of the smoke of home.  I stood awhile uncovered by his side, and I could
 have desired that it had lain in our religion to put up some prayer for
 that unhappy stranger, or, in the old classic way, outwardly to honour
 his misfortune.  I knew, although his bones lay there, a part of Aros,
 till the trumpet sounded, his imperishable soul was forth and far away,
 among the raptures of the everlasting Sabbath or the pangs of hell; and
 yet my mind misgave me even with a fear, that perhaps he was near me
 where I stood, guarding his sepulchre, and lingering on the scene of his
 unhappy fate.
 
 Certainly it was with a spirit somewhat over-shadowed that I turned away
 from the grave to the hardly less melancholy spectacle of the wreck.  Her
 stem was above the first arc of the flood; she was broken in two a little
 abaft the foremast--though indeed she had none, both masts having broken
 short in her disaster; and as the pitch of the beach was very sharp and
 sudden, and the bows lay many feet below the stern, the fracture gaped
 widely open, and you could see right through her poor hull upon the
 farther side.  Her name was much defaced, and I could not make out
 clearly whether she was called _Christiania_, after the Norwegian city,
 or _Christiana_, after the good woman, Christian's wife, in that old book
 the 'Pilgrim's Progress.'  By her build she was a foreign ship, but I was
 not certain of her nationality.  She had been painted green, but the
 colour was faded and weathered, and the paint peeling off in strips.  The
 wreck of the mainmast lay alongside, half buried in sand.  She was a
 forlorn sight, indeed, and I could not look without emotion at the bits
 of rope that still hung about her, so often handled of yore by shouting
 seamen; or the little scuttle where they had passed up and down to their
 affairs; or that poor noseless angel of a figure-head that had dipped
 into so many running billows.
 
 I do not know whether it came most from the ship or from the grave, but I
 fell into some melancholy scruples, as I stood there, leaning with one
 hand against the battered timbers.  The homelessness of men and even of
 inanimate vessels, cast away upon strange shores, came strongly in upon
 my mind.  To make a profit of such pitiful misadventures seemed an
 unmanly and a sordid act; and I began to think of my then quest as of
 something sacrilegious in its nature.  But when I remembered Mary, I took
 heart again.  My uncle would never consent to an imprudent marriage, nor
 would she, as I was persuaded, wed without his full approval.  It behoved
 me, then, to be up and doing for my wife; and I thought with a laugh how
 long it was since that great sea-castle, the _Espirito Santo_, had left
 her bones in Sandag Bay, and how weak it would be to consider rights so
 long extinguished and misfortunes so long forgotten in the process of
 time.
 
 I had my theory of where to seek for her remains.  The set of the current
 and the soundings both pointed to the east side of the bay under the
 ledge of rocks.  If she had been lost in Sandag Bay, and if, after these
 centuries, any portion of her held together, it was there that I should
 find it.  The water deepens, as I have said, with great rapidity, and
 even close along-side the rocks several fathoms may be found.  As I
 walked upon the edge I could see far and wide over the sandy bottom of
 the bay; the sun shone clear and green and steady in the deeps; the bay
 seemed rather like a great transparent crystal, as one sees them in a
 lapidary's shop; there was naught to show that it was water but an
 internal trembling, a hovering within of sun-glints and netted shadows,
 and now and then a faint lap and a dying bubble round the edge.  The
 shadows of the rocks lay out for some distance at their feet, so that my
 own shadow, moving, pausing, and stooping on the top of that, reached
 sometimes half across the bay.  It was above all in this belt of shadows
 that I hunted for the _Espirito Santo_; since it was there the undertow
 ran strongest, whether in or out.  Cool as the whole water seemed this
 broiling day, it looked, in that part, yet cooler, and had a mysterious
 invitation for the eyes.  Peer as I pleased, however, I could see nothing
 but a few fishes or a bush of sea-tangle, and here and there a lump of
 rock that had fallen from above and now lay separate on the sandy floor.
 Twice did I pass from one end to the other of the rocks, and in the whole
 distance I could see nothing of the wreck, nor any place but one where it
 was possible for it to be.  This was a large terrace in five fathoms of
 water, raised off the surface of the sand to a considerable height, and
 looking from above like a mere outgrowth of the rocks on which I walked.
 It was one mass of great sea-tangles like a grove, which prevented me
 judging of its nature, but in shape and size it bore some likeness to a
 vessel's hull.  At least it was my best chance.  If the _Espirito Santo_
 lay not there under the tangles, it lay nowhere at all in Sandag Bay; and
 I prepared to put the question to the proof, once and for all, and either
 go back to Aros a rich man or cured for ever of my dreams of wealth.
 
 I stripped to the skin, and stood on the extreme margin with my hands
 clasped, irresolute.  The bay at that time was utterly quiet; there was
 no sound but from a school of porpoises somewhere out of sight behind the
 point; yet a certain fear withheld me on the threshold of my venture.  Sad
 sea-feelings, scraps of my uncle's superstitions, thoughts of the dead,
 of the grave, of the old broken ships, drifted through my mind.  But the
 strong sun upon my shoulders warmed me to the heart, and I stooped
 forward and plunged into the sea.
 
 It was all that I could do to catch a trail of the sea-tangle that grew
 so thickly on the terrace; but once so far anchored I secured myself by
 grasping a whole armful of these thick and slimy stalks, and, planting my
 feet against the edge, I looked around me.  On all sides the clear sand
 stretched forth unbroken; it came to the foot of the rocks, scoured into
 the likeness of an alley in a garden by the action of the tides; and
 before me, for as far as I could see, nothing was visible but the same
 many-folded sand upon the sun-bright bottom of the bay.  Yet the terrace
 to which I was then holding was as thick with strong sea-growths as a
 tuft of heather, and the cliff from which it bulged hung draped below the
 water-line with brown lianas.  In this complexity of forms, all swaying
 together in the current, things were hard to be distinguished; and I was
 still uncertain whether my feet were pressed upon the natural rock or
 upon the timbers of the Armada treasure-ship, when the whole tuft of
 tangle came away in my hand, and in an instant I was on the surface, and
 the shores of the bay and the bright water swam before my eyes in a glory
 of crimson.
 
 I clambered back upon the rocks, and threw the plant of tangle at my
 feet.  Something at the same moment rang sharply, like a falling coin.  I
 stooped, and there, sure enough, crusted with the red rust, there lay an
 iron shoe-buckle.  The sight of this poor human relic thrilled me to the
 heart, but not with hope nor fear, only with a desolate melancholy.  I
 held it in my hand, and the thought of its owner appeared before me like
 the presence of an actual man.  His weather-beaten face, his sailor's
 hands, his sea-voice hoarse with singing at the capstan, the very foot
 that had once worn that buckle and trod so much along the swerving
 decks--the whole human fact of him, as a creature like myself, with hair
 and blood and seeing eyes, haunted me in that sunny, solitary place, not
 like a spectre, but like some friend whom I had basely injured.  Was the
 great treasure ship indeed below there, with her guns and chain and
 treasure, as she had sailed from Spain; her decks a garden for the
 seaweed, her cabin a breeding place for fish, soundless but for the
 dredging water, motionless but for the waving of the tangle upon her
 battlements--that old, populous, sea-riding castle, now a reef in Sandag
 Bay?  Or, as I thought it likelier, was this a waif from the disaster of
 the foreign brig--was this shoe-buckle bought but the other day and worn
 by a man of my own period in the world's history, hearing the same news
 from day to day, thinking the same thoughts, praying, perhaps, in the
 same temple with myself?  However it was, I was assailed with dreary
 thoughts; my uncle's words, 'the dead are down there,' echoed in my ears;
 and though I determined to dive once more, it was with a strong
 repugnance that I stepped forward to the margin of the rocks.
 
 A great change passed at that moment over the appearance of the bay.  It
 was no more that clear, visible interior, like a house roofed with glass,
 where the green, submarine sunshine slept so stilly.  A breeze, I
 suppose, had flawed the surface, and a sort of trouble and blackness
 filled its bosom, where flashes of light and clouds of shadow tossed
 confusedly together.  Even the terrace below obscurely rocked and
 quivered.  It seemed a graver thing to venture on this place of ambushes;
 and when I leaped into the sea the second time it was with a quaking in
 my soul.
 
 I secured myself as at first, and groped among the waving tangle.  All
 that met my touch was cold and soft and gluey.  The thicket was alive
 with crabs and lobsters, trundling to and fro lopsidedly, and I had to
 harden my heart against the horror of their carrion neighbourhood.  On
 all sides I could feel the grain and the clefts of hard, living stone; no
 planks, no iron, not a sign of any wreck; the _Espirito Santo_ was not
 there.  I remember I had almost a sense of relief in my disappointment,
 and I was about ready to leave go, when something happened that sent me
 to the surface with my heart in my mouth.  I had already stayed somewhat
 late over my explorations; the current was freshening with the change of
 the tide, and Sandag Bay was no longer a safe place for a single swimmer.
 Well, just at the last moment there came a sudden flush of current,
 dredging through the tangles like a wave.  I lost one hold, was flung
 sprawling on my side, and, instinctively grasping for a fresh support, my
 fingers closed on something hard and cold.  I think I knew at that moment
 what it was.  At least I instantly left hold of the tangle, leaped for
 the surface, and clambered out next moment on the friendly rocks with the
 bone of a man's leg in my grasp.
 
 Mankind is a material creature, slow to think and dull to perceive
 connections.  The grave, the wreck of the brig, and the rusty shoe-buckle
 were surely plain advertisements.  A child might have read their dismal
 story, and yet it was not until I touched that actual piece of mankind
 that the full horror of the charnel ocean burst upon my spirit.  I laid
 the bone beside the buckle, picked up my clothes, and ran as I was along
 the rocks towards the human shore.  I could not be far enough from the
 spot; no fortune was vast enough to tempt me back again.  The bones of
 the drowned dead should henceforth roll undisturbed by me, whether on
 tangle or minted gold.  But as soon as I trod the good earth again, and
 had covered my nakedness against the sun, I knelt down over against the
 ruins of the brig, and out of the fulness of my heart prayed long and
 passionately for all poor souls upon the sea.  A generous prayer is never
 presented in vain; the petition may be refused, but the petitioner is
 always, I believe, rewarded by some gracious visitation.  The horror, at
 least, was lifted from my mind; I could look with calm of spirit on that
 great bright creature, God's ocean; and as I set off homeward up the
 rough sides of Aros, nothing remained of my concern beyond a deep
 determination to meddle no more with the spoils of wrecked vessels or the
 treasures of the dead.
 
 I was already some way up the hill before I paused to breathe and look
 behind me.  The sight that met my eyes was doubly strange.
 
 For, first, the storm that I had foreseen was now advancing with almost
 tropical rapidity.  The whole surface of the sea had been dulled from its
 conspicuous brightness to an ugly hue of corrugated lead; already in the
 distance the white waves, the 'skipper's daughters,' had begun to flee
 before a breeze that was still insensible on Aros; and already along the
 curve of Sandag Bay there was a splashing run of sea that I could hear
 from where I stood.  The change upon the sky was even more remarkable.
 There had begun to arise out of the south-west a huge and solid continent
 of scowling cloud; here and there, through rents in its contexture, the
 sun still poured a sheaf of spreading rays; and here and there, from all
 its edges, vast inky streamers lay forth along the yet unclouded sky.  The
 menace was express and imminent.  Even as I gazed, the sun was blotted
 out.  At any moment the tempest might fall upon Aros in its might.
 
 The suddenness of this change of weather so fixed my eyes on heaven that
 it was some seconds before they alighted on the bay, mapped out below my
 feet, and robbed a moment later of the sun.  The knoll which I had just
 surmounted overflanked a little amphitheatre of lower hillocks sloping
 towards the sea, and beyond that the yellow arc of beach and the whole
 extent of Sandag Bay.  It was a scene on which I had often looked down,
 but where I had never before beheld a human figure.  I had but just
 turned my back upon it and left it empty, and my wonder may be fancied
 when I saw a boat and several men in that deserted spot.  The boat was
 lying by the rocks.  A pair of fellows, bareheaded, with their sleeves
 rolled up, and one with a boathook, kept her with difficulty to her
 moorings for the current was growing brisker every moment.  A little way
 off upon the ledge two men in black clothes, whom I judged to be superior
 in rank, laid their heads together over some task which at first I did
 not understand, but a second after I had made it out--they were taking
 bearings with the compass; and just then I saw one of them unroll a sheet
 of paper and lay his finger down, as though identifying features in a
 map.  Meanwhile a third was walking to and fro, polling among the rocks
 and peering over the edge into the water.  While I was still watching
 them with the stupefaction of surprise, my mind hardly yet able to work
 on what my eyes reported, this third person suddenly stooped and summoned
 his companions with a cry so loud that it reached my ears upon the hill.
 The others ran to him, even dropping the compass in their hurry, and I
 could see the bone and the shoe-buckle going from hand to hand, causing
 the most unusual gesticulations of surprise and interest.  Just then I
 could hear the seamen crying from the boat, and saw them point westward
 to that cloud continent which was ever the more rapidly unfurling its
 blackness over heaven.  The others seemed to consult; but the danger was
 too pressing to be braved, and they bundled into the boat carrying my
 relies with them, and set forth out of the bay with all speed of oars.
 
 I made no more ado about the matter, but turned and ran for the house.
 Whoever these men were, it was fit my uncle should be instantly informed.
 It was not then altogether too late in the day for a descent of the
 Jacobites; and may be Prince Charlie, whom I knew my uncle to detest, was
 one of the three superiors whom I had seen upon the rock.  Yet as I ran,
 leaping from rock to rock, and turned the matter loosely in my mind, this
 theory grew ever the longer the less welcome to my reason.  The compass,
 the map, the interest awakened by the buckle, and the conduct of that one
 among the strangers who had looked so often below him in the water, all
 seemed to point to a different explanation of their presence on that
 outlying, obscure islet of the western sea.  The Madrid historian, the
 search instituted by Dr. Robertson, the bearded stranger with the rings,
 my own fruitless search that very morning in the deep water of Sandag
 Bay, ran together, piece by piece, in my memory, and I made sure that
 these strangers must be Spaniards in quest of ancient treasure and the
 lost ship of the Armada.  But the people living in outlying islands, such
 as Aros, are answerable for their own security; there is none near by to
 protect or even to help them; and the presence in such a spot of a crew
 of foreign adventurers--poor, greedy, and most likely lawless--filled me
 with apprehensions for my uncle's money, and even for the safety of his
 daughter.  I was still wondering how we were to get rid of them when I
 came, all breathless, to the top of Aros.  The whole world was shadowed
 over; only in the extreme east, on a hill of the mainland, one last gleam
 of sunshine lingered like a jewel; rain had begun to fall, not heavily,
 but in great drops; the sea was rising with each moment, and already a
 band of white encircled Aros and the nearer coasts of Grisapol.  The boat
 was still pulling seaward, but I now became aware of what had been hidden
 from me lower down--a large, heavily sparred, handsome schooner, lying to
 at the south end of Aros.  Since I had not seen her in the morning when I
 had looked around so closely at the signs of the weather, and upon these
 lone waters where a sail was rarely visible, it was clear she must have
 lain last night behind the uninhabited Eilean Gour, and this proved
 conclusively that she was manned by strangers to our coast, for that
 anchorage, though good enough to look at, is little better than a trap
 for ships.  With such ignorant sailors upon so wild a coast, the coming
 gale was not unlikely to bring death upon its wings.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.  THE GALE.
 
 
 I found my uncle at the gable end, watching the signs of the weather,
 with a pipe in his fingers.
 
 'Uncle,' said I, 'there were men ashore at Sandag Bay--'
 
 I had no time to go further; indeed, I not only forgot my words, but even
 my weariness, so strange was the effect on Uncle Gordon.  He dropped his
 pipe and fell back against the end of the house with his jaw fallen, his
 eyes staring, and his long face as white as paper.  We must have looked
 at one another silently for a quarter of a minute, before he made answer
 in this extraordinary fashion: 'Had he a hair kep on?'
 
 I knew as well as if I had been there that the man who now lay buried at
 Sandag had worn a hairy cap, and that he had come ashore alive.  For the
 first and only time I lost toleration for the man who was my benefactor
 and the father of the woman I hoped to call my wife.
 
 'These were living men,' said I, 'perhaps Jacobites, perhaps the French,
 perhaps pirates, perhaps adventurers come here to seek the Spanish
 treasure ship; but, whatever they may be, dangerous at least to your
 daughter and my cousin.  As for your own guilty terrors, man, the dead
 sleeps well where you have laid him.  I stood this morning by his grave;
 he will not wake before the trump of doom.'
 
 My kinsman looked upon me, blinking, while I spoke; then he fixed his
 eyes for a little on the ground, and pulled his fingers foolishly; but it
 was plain that he was past the power of speech.
 
 'Come,' said I.  'You must think for others.  You must come up the hill
 with me, and see this ship.'
 
 He obeyed without a word or a look, following slowly after my impatient
 strides.  The spring seemed to have gone out of his body, and he
 scrambled heavily up and down the rocks, instead of leaping, as he was
 wont, from one to another.  Nor could I, for all my cries, induce him to
 make better haste.  Only once he replied to me complainingly, and like
 one in bodily pain: 'Ay, ay, man, I'm coming.'  Long before we had
 reached the top, I had no other thought for him but pity.  If the crime
 had been monstrous the punishment was in proportion.
 
 At last we emerged above the sky-line of the hill, and could see around
 us.  All was black and stormy to the eye; the last gleam of sun had
 vanished; a wind had sprung up, not yet high, but gusty and unsteady to
 the point; the rain, on the other hand, had ceased.  Short as was the
 interval, the sea already ran vastly higher than when I had stood there
 last; already it had begun to break over some of the outward reefs, and
 already it moaned aloud in the sea-caves of Aros.  I looked, at first, in
 vain for the schooner.
 
 'There she is,' I said at last.  But her new position, and the course she
 was now lying, puzzled me.  'They cannot mean to beat to sea,' I cried.
 
 'That's what they mean,' said my uncle, with something like joy; and just
 then the schooner went about and stood upon another tack, which put the
 question beyond the reach of doubt.  These strangers, seeing a gale on
 hand, had thought first of sea-room.  With the wind that threatened, in
 these reef-sown waters and contending against so violent a stream of
 tide, their course was certain death.
 
 'Good God!' said I, 'they are all lost.'
 
 'Ay,' returned my uncle, 'a'--a' lost.  They hadnae a chance but to rin
 for Kyle Dona.  The gate they're gaun the noo, they couldnae win through
 an the muckle deil were there to pilot them.  Eh, man,' he continued,
 touching me on the sleeve, 'it's a braw nicht for a shipwreck!  Twa in ae
 twalmonth!  Eh, but the Merry Men'll dance bonny!'
 
 I looked at him, and it was then that I began to fancy him no longer in
 his right mind.  He was peering up to me, as if for sympathy, a timid joy
 in his eyes.  All that had passed between us was already forgotten in the
 prospect of this fresh disaster.
 
 'If it were not too late,' I cried with indignation, 'I would take the
 coble and go out to warn them.'
 
 'Na, na,' he protested, 'ye maunnae interfere; ye maunnae meddle wi' the
 like o' that.  It's His'--doffing his bonnet--'His wull.  And, eh, man!
 but it's a braw nicht for't!'
 
 Something like fear began to creep into my soul and, reminding him that I
 had not yet dined, I proposed we should return to the house.  But no;
 nothing would tear him from his place of outlook.
 
 'I maun see the hail thing, man, Cherlie,' he explained--and then as the
 schooner went about a second time, 'Eh, but they han'le her bonny!' he
 cried.  'The _Christ-Anna_ was naething to this.'
 
 Already the men on board the schooner must have begun to realise some
 part, but not yet the twentieth, of the dangers that environed their
 doomed ship.  At every lull of the capricious wind they must have seen
 how fast the current swept them back.  Each tack was made shorter, as
 they saw how little it prevailed.  Every moment the rising swell began to
 boom and foam upon another sunken reef; and ever and again a breaker
 would fall in sounding ruin under the very bows of her, and the brown
 reef and streaming tangle appear in the hollow of the wave.  I tell you,
 they had to stand to their tackle: there was no idle men aboard that
 ship, God knows.  It was upon the progress of a scene so horrible to any
 human-hearted man that my misguided uncle now pored and gloated like a
 connoisseur.  As I turned to go down the hill, he was lying on his belly
 on the summit, with his hands stretched forth and clutching in the
 heather.  He seemed rejuvenated, mind and body.
 
 When I got back to the house already dismally affected, I was still more
 sadly downcast at the sight of Mary.  She had her sleeves rolled up over
 her strong arms, and was quietly making bread.  I got a bannock from the
 dresser and sat down to eat it in silence.
 
 'Are ye wearied, lad?' she asked after a while.
 
 'I am not so much wearied, Mary,' I replied, getting on my feet, 'as I am
 weary of delay, and perhaps of Aros too.  You know me well enough to
 judge me fairly, say what I like.  Well, Mary, you may be sure of this:
 you had better be anywhere but here.'
 
 'I'll be sure of one thing,' she returned: 'I'll be where my duty is.'
 
 'You forget, you have a duty to yourself,' I said.
 
 'Ay, man?' she replied, pounding at the dough; 'will you have found that
 in the Bible, now?'
 
 'Mary,' I said solemnly, 'you must not laugh at me just now.  God knows I
 am in no heart for laughing.  If we could get your father with us, it
 would be best; but with him or without him, I want you far away from
 here, my girl; for your own sake, and for mine, ay, and for your father's
 too, I want you far--far away from here.  I came with other thoughts; I
 came here as a man comes home; now it is all changed, and I have no
 desire nor hope but to flee--for that's the word--flee, like a bird out
 of the fowler's snare, from this accursed island.'
 
 She had stopped her work by this time.
 
 'And do you think, now,' said she, 'do you think, now, I have neither
 eyes nor ears?  Do ye think I havenae broken my heart to have these braws
 (as he calls them, God forgive him!) thrown into the sea?  Do ye think I
 have lived with him, day in, day out, and not seen what you saw in an
 hour or two?  No,' she said, 'I know there's wrong in it; what wrong, I
 neither know nor want to know.  There was never an ill thing made better
 by meddling, that I could hear of.  But, my lad, you must never ask me to
 leave my father.  While the breath is in his body, I'll be with him.  And
 he's not long for here, either: that I can tell you, Charlie--he's not
 long for here.  The mark is on his brow; and better so--maybe better so.'
 
 I was a while silent, not knowing what to say; and when I roused my head
 at last to speak, she got before me.
 
 'Charlie,' she said, 'what's right for me, neednae be right for you.
 There's sin upon this house and trouble; you are a stranger; take your
 things upon your back and go your ways to better places and to better
 folk, and if you were ever minded to come back, though it were twenty
 years syne, you would find me aye waiting.'
 
 'Mary Ellen,' I said, 'I asked you to be my wife, and you said as good as
 yes.  That's done for good.  Wherever you are, I am; as I shall answer to
 my God.'
 
 As I said the words, the wind suddenly burst out raving, and then seemed
 to stand still and shudder round the house of Aros.  It was the first
 squall, or prologue, of the coming tempest, and as we started and looked
 about us, we found that a gloom, like the approach of evening, had
 settled round the house.
 
 'God pity all poor folks at sea!' she said.  'We'll see no more of my
 father till the morrow's morning.'
 
 And then she told me, as we sat by the fire and hearkened to the rising
 gusts, of how this change had fallen upon my uncle.  All last winter he
 had been dark and fitful in his mind.  Whenever the Roost ran high, or,
 as Mary said, whenever the Merry Men were dancing, he would lie out for
 hours together on the Head, if it were at night, or on the top of Aros by
 day, watching the tumult of the sea, and sweeping the horizon for a sail.
 After February the tenth, when the wealth-bringing wreck was cast ashore
 at Sandag, he had been at first unnaturally gay, and his excitement had
 never fallen in degree, but only changed in kind from dark to darker.  He
 neglected his work, and kept Rorie idle.  They two would speak together
 by the hour at the gable end, in guarded tones and with an air of secrecy
 and almost of guilt; and if she questioned either, as at first she
 sometimes did, her inquiries were put aside with confusion.  Since Rorie
 had first remarked the fish that hung about the ferry, his master had
 never set foot but once upon the mainland of the Ross.  That once--it was
 in the height of the springs--he had passed dryshod while the tide was
 out; but, having lingered overlong on the far side, found himself cut off
 from Aros by the returning waters.  It was with a shriek of agony that he
 had leaped across the gut, and he had reached home thereafter in a fever-
 fit of fear.  A fear of the sea, a constant haunting thought of the sea,
 appeared in his talk and devotions, and even in his looks when he was
 silent.
 
 Rorie alone came in to supper; but a little later my uncle appeared, took
 a bottle under his arm, put some bread in his pocket, and set forth again
 to his outlook, followed this time by Rorie.  I heard that the schooner
 was losing ground, but the crew were still fighting every inch with
 hopeless ingenuity and course; and the news filled my mind with
 blackness.
 
 A little after sundown the full fury of the gale broke forth, such a gale
 as I have never seen in summer, nor, seeing how swiftly it had come, even
 in winter.  Mary and I sat in silence, the house quaking overhead, the
 tempest howling without, the fire between us sputtering with raindrops.
 Our thoughts were far away with the poor fellows on the schooner, or my
 not less unhappy uncle, houseless on the promontory; and yet ever and
 again we were startled back to ourselves, when the wind would rise and
 strike the gable like a solid body, or suddenly fall and draw away, so
 that the fire leaped into flame and our hearts bounded in our sides.  Now
 the storm in its might would seize and shake the four corners of the
 roof, roaring like Leviathan in anger.  Anon, in a lull, cold eddies of
 tempest moved shudderingly in the room, lifting the hair upon our heads
 and passing between us as we sat.  And again the wind would break forth
 in a chorus of melancholy sounds, hooting low in the chimney, wailing
 with flutelike softness round the house.
 
 It was perhaps eight o'clock when Rorie came in and pulled me
 mysteriously to the door.  My uncle, it appeared, had frightened even his
 constant comrade; and Rorie, uneasy at his extravagance, prayed me to
 come out and share the watch.  I hastened to do as I was asked; the more
 readily as, what with fear and horror, and the electrical tension of the
 night, I was myself restless and disposed for action.  I told Mary to be
 under no alarm, for I should be a safeguard on her father; and wrapping
 myself warmly in a plaid, I followed Rorie into the open air.
 
 The night, though we were so little past midsummer, was as dark as
 January.  Intervals of a groping twilight alternated with spells of utter
 blackness; and it was impossible to trace the reason of these changes in
 the flying horror of the sky.  The wind blew the breath out of a man's
 nostrils; all heaven seemed to thunder overhead like one huge sail; and
 when there fell a momentary lull on Aros, we could hear the gusts
 dismally sweeping in the distance.  Over all the lowlands of the Ross,
 the wind must have blown as fierce as on the open sea; and God only knows
 the uproar that was raging around the head of Ben Kyaw.  Sheets of
 mingled spray and rain were driven in our faces.  All round the isle of
 Aros the surf, with an incessant, hammering thunder, beat upon the reefs
 and beaches.  Now louder in one place, now lower in another, like the
 combinations of orchestral music, the constant mass of sound was hardly
 varied for a moment.  And loud above all this hurly-burly I could hear
 the changeful voices of the Roost and the intermittent roaring of the
 Merry Men.  At that hour, there flashed into my mind the reason of the
 name that they were called.  For the noise of them seemed almost
 mirthful, as it out-topped the other noises of the night; or if not
 mirthful, yet instinct with a portentous joviality.  Nay, and it seemed
 even human.  As when savage men have drunk away their reason, and,
 discarding speech, bawl together in their madness by the hour; so, to my
 ears, these deadly breakers shouted by Aros in the night.
 
 Arm in arm, and staggering against the wind, Rorie and I won every yard
 of ground with conscious effort.  We slipped on the wet sod, we fell
 together sprawling on the rocks.  Bruised, drenched, beaten, and
 breathless, it must have taken us near half an hour to get from the house
 down to the Head that overlooks the Roost.  There, it seemed, was my
 uncle's favourite observatory.  Right in the face of it, where the cliff
 is highest and most sheer, a hump of earth, like a parapet, makes a place
 of shelter from the common winds, where a man may sit in quiet and see
 the tide and the mad billows contending at his feet.  As he might look
 down from the window of a house upon some street disturbance, so, from
 this post, he looks down upon the tumbling of the Merry Men.  On such a
 night, of course, he peers upon a world of blackness, where the waters
 wheel and boil, where the waves joust together with the noise of an
 explosion, and the foam towers and vanishes in the twinkling of an eye.
 Never before had I seen the Merry Men thus violent.  The fury, height,
 and transiency of their spoutings was a thing to be seen and not
 recounted.  High over our heads on the cliff rose their white columns in
 the darkness; and the same instant, like phantoms, they were gone.
 Sometimes three at a time would thus aspire and vanish; sometimes a gust
 took them, and the spray would fall about us, heavy as a wave.  And yet
 the spectacle was rather maddening in its levity than impressive by its
 force.  Thought was beaten down by the confounding uproar--a gleeful
 vacancy possessed the brains of men, a state akin to madness; and I found
 myself at times following the dance of the Merry Men as it were a tune
 upon a jigging instrument.
 
 I first caught sight of my uncle when we were still some yards away in
 one of the flying glimpses of twilight that chequered the pitch darkness
 of the night.  He was standing up behind the parapet, his head thrown
 back and the bottle to his mouth.  As he put it down, he saw and
 recognised us with a toss of one hand fleeringly above his head.
 
 'Has he been drinking?' shouted I to Rorie.
 
 'He will aye be drunk when the wind blaws,' returned Rorie in the same
 high key, and it was all that I could do to hear him.
 
 'Then--was he so--in February?' I inquired.
 
 Rorie's 'Ay' was a cause of joy to me.  The murder, then, had not sprung
 in cold blood from calculation; it was an act of madness no more to be
 condemned than to be pardoned.  My uncle was a dangerous madman, if you
 will, but he was not cruel and base as I had feared.  Yet what a scene
 for a carouse, what an incredible vice, was this that the poor man had
 chosen!  I have always thought drunkenness a wild and almost fearful
 pleasure, rather demoniacal than human; but drunkenness, out here in the
 roaring blackness, on the edge of a cliff above that hell of waters, the
 man's head spinning like the Roost, his foot tottering on the edge of
 death, his ear watching for the signs of ship-wreck, surely that, if it
 were credible in any one, was morally impossible in a man like my uncle,
 whose mind was set upon a damnatory creed and haunted by the darkest
 superstitions.  Yet so it was; and, as we reached the bight of shelter
 and could breathe again, I saw the man's eyes shining in the night with
 an unholy glimmer.
 
 'Eh, Charlie, man, it's grand!' he cried.  'See to them!' he continued,
 dragging me to the edge of the abyss from whence arose that deafening
 clamour and those clouds of spray; 'see to them dancin', man!  Is that no
 wicked?'
 
 He pronounced the word with gusto, and I thought it suited with the
 scene.
 
 'They're yowlin' for thon schooner,' he went on, his thin, insane voice
 clearly audible in the shelter of the bank, 'an' she's comin' aye nearer,
 aye nearer, aye nearer an' nearer an' nearer; an' they ken't, the folk
 kens it, they ken wool it's by wi' them.  Charlie, lad, they're a' drunk
 in yon schooner, a' dozened wi' drink.  They were a' drunk in the _Christ-
 Anna_, at the hinder end.  There's nane could droon at sea wantin' the
 brandy.  Hoot awa, what do you ken?' with a sudden blast of anger.  'I
 tell ye, it cannae be; they droon withoot it.  Ha'e,' holding out the
 bottle, 'tak' a sowp.'
 
 I was about to refuse, but Rorie touched me as if in warning; and indeed
 I had already thought better of the movement.  I took the bottle,
 therefore, and not only drank freely myself, but contrived to spill even
 more as I was doing so.  It was pure spirit, and almost strangled me to
 swallow.  My kinsman did not observe the loss, but, once more throwing
 back his head, drained the remainder to the dregs.  Then, with a loud
 laugh, he cast the bottle forth among the Merry Men, who seemed to leap
 up, shouting to receive it.
 
 'Ha'e, bairns!' he cried, 'there's your han'sel.  Ye'll get bonnier nor
 that, or morning.'
 
 Suddenly, out in the black night before us, and not two hundred yards
 away, we heard, at a moment when the wind was silent, the clear note of a
 human voice.  Instantly the wind swept howling down upon the Head, and
 the Roost bellowed, and churned, and danced with a new fury.  But we had
 heard the sound, and we knew, with agony, that this was the doomed ship
 now close on ruin, and that what we had heard was the voice of her master
 issuing his last command.  Crouching together on the edge, we waited,
 straining every sense, for the inevitable end.  It was long, however, and
 to us it seemed like ages, ere the schooner suddenly appeared for one
 brief instant, relieved against a tower of glimmering foam.  I still see
 her reefed mainsail flapping loose, as the boom fell heavily across the
 deck; I still see the black outline of the hull, and still think I can
 distinguish the figure of a man stretched upon the tiller.  Yet the whole
 sight we had of her passed swifter than lightning; the very wave that
 disclosed her fell burying her for ever; the mingled cry of many voices
 at the point of death rose and was quenched in the roaring of the Merry
 Men.  And with that the tragedy was at an end.  The strong ship, with all
 her gear, and the lamp perhaps still burning in the cabin, the lives of
 so many men, precious surely to others, dear, at least, as heaven to
 themselves, had all, in that one moment, gone down into the surging
 waters.  They were gone like a dream.  And the wind still ran and
 shouted, and the senseless waters in the Roost still leaped and tumbled
 as before.
 
 How long we lay there together, we three, speechless and motionless, is
 more than I can tell, but it must have been for long.  At length, one by
 one, and almost mechanically, we crawled back into the shelter of the
 bank.  As I lay against the parapet, wholly wretched and not entirely
 master of my mind, I could hear my kinsman maundering to himself in an
 altered and melancholy mood.  Now he would repeat to himself with maudlin
 iteration, 'Sic a fecht as they had--sic a sair fecht as they had, puir
 lads, puir lads!' and anon he would bewail that 'a' the gear was as
 gude's tint,' because the ship had gone down among the Merry Men instead
 of stranding on the shore; and throughout, the name--the
 _Christ-Anna_--would come and go in his divagations, pronounced with
 shuddering awe.  The storm all this time was rapidly abating.  In half an
 hour the wind had fallen to a breeze, and the change was accompanied or
 caused by a heavy, cold, and plumping rain.  I must then have fallen
 asleep, and when I came to myself, drenched, stiff, and unrefreshed, day
 had already broken, grey, wet, discomfortable day; the wind blew in faint
 and shifting capfuls, the tide was out, the Roost was at its lowest, and
 only the strong beating surf round all the coasts of Aros remained to
 witness of the furies of the night.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.  A MAN OUT OF THE SEA.
 
 
 Rorie set out for the house in search of warmth and breakfast; but my
 uncle was bent upon examining the shores of Aros, and I felt it a part of
 duty to accompany him throughout.  He was now docile and quiet, but
 tremulous and weak in mind and body; and it was with the eagerness of a
 child that he pursued his exploration.  He climbed far down upon the
 rocks; on the beaches, he pursued the retreating breakers.  The merest
 broken plank or rag of cordage was a treasure in his eyes to be secured
 at the peril of his life.  To see him, with weak and stumbling footsteps,
 expose himself to the pursuit of the surf, or the snares and pitfalls of
 the weedy rock, kept me in a perpetual terror.  My arm was ready to
 support him, my hand clutched him by the skirt, I helped him to draw his
 pitiful discoveries beyond the reach of the returning wave; a nurse
 accompanying a child of seven would have had no different experience.
 
 Yet, weakened as he was by the reaction from his madness of the night
 before, the passions that smouldered in his nature were those of a strong
 man.  His terror of the sea, although conquered for the moment, was still
 undiminished; had the sea been a lake of living flames, he could not have
 shrunk more panically from its touch; and once, when his foot slipped and
 he plunged to the midleg into a pool of water, the shriek that came up
 out of his soul was like the cry of death.  He sat still for a while,
 panting like a dog, after that; but his desire for the spoils of
 shipwreck triumphed once more over his fears; once more he tottered among
 the curded foam; once more he crawled upon the rocks among the bursting
 bubbles; once more his whole heart seemed to be set on driftwood, fit, if
 it was fit for anything, to throw upon the fire.  Pleased as he was with
 what he found, he still incessantly grumbled at his ill-fortune.
 
 'Aros,' he said, 'is no a place for wrecks ava'--no ava'.  A' the years
 I've dwalt here, this ane maks the second; and the best o' the gear clean
 tint!'
 
 'Uncle,' said I, for we were now on a stretch of open sand, where there
 was nothing to divert his mind, 'I saw you last night, as I never thought
 to see you--you were drunk.'
 
 'Na, na,' he said, 'no as bad as that.  I had been drinking, though.  And
 to tell ye the God's truth, it's a thing I cannae mend.  There's nae
 soberer man than me in my ordnar; but when I hear the wind blaw in my
 lug, it's my belief that I gang gyte.'
 
 'You are a religious man,' I replied, 'and this is sin'.
 
 'Ou,' he returned, 'if it wasnae sin, I dinnae ken that I would care
 for't.  Ye see, man, it's defiance.  There's a sair spang o' the auld sin
 o' the warld in you sea; it's an unchristian business at the best o't;
 an' whiles when it gets up, an' the wind skreights--the wind an' her are
 a kind of sib, I'm thinkin'--an' thae Merry Men, the daft callants,
 blawin' and lauchin', and puir souls in the deid thraws warstlin' the
 leelang nicht wi' their bit ships--weel, it comes ower me like a glamour.
 I'm a deil, I ken't.  But I think naething o' the puir sailor lads; I'm
 wi' the sea, I'm just like ane o' her ain Merry Men.'
 
 I thought I should touch him in a joint of his harness.  I turned me
 towards the sea; the surf was running gaily, wave after wave, with their
 manes blowing behind them, riding one after another up the beach,
 towering, curving, falling one upon another on the trampled sand.
 Without, the salt air, the scared gulls, the widespread army of the sea-
 chargers, neighing to each other, as they gathered together to the
 assault of Aros; and close before us, that line on the flat sands that,
 with all their number and their fury, they might never pass.
 
 'Thus far shalt thou go,' said I, 'and no farther.'  And then I quoted as
 solemnly as I was able a verse that I had often before fitted to the
 chorus of the breakers:--
 
    But yet the Lord that is on high,
       Is more of might by far,
    Than noise of many waters is,
       As great sea billows are.
 
 'Ay,' said my kinsinan, 'at the hinder end, the Lord will triumph; I
 dinnae misdoobt that.  But here on earth, even silly men-folk daur Him to
 His face.  It is nae wise; I am nae sayin' that it's wise; but it's the
 pride of the eye, and it's the lust o' life, an' it's the wale o'
 pleesures.'
 
 I said no more, for we had now begun to cross a neck of land that lay
 between us and Sandag; and I withheld my last appeal to the man's better
 reason till we should stand upon the spot associated with his crime.  Nor
 did he pursue the subject; but he walked beside me with a firmer step.
 The call that I had made upon his mind acted like a stimulant, and I
 could see that he had forgotten his search for worthless jetsam, in a
 profound, gloomy, and yet stirring train of thought.  In three or four
 minutes we had topped the brae and begun to go down upon Sandag.  The
 wreck had been roughly handled by the sea; the stem had been spun round
 and dragged a little lower down; and perhaps the stern had been forced a
 little higher, for the two parts now lay entirely separate on the beach.
 When we came to the grave I stopped, uncovered my head in the thick rain,
 and, looking my kinsman in the face, addressed him.
 
 'A man,' said I, 'was in God's providence suffered to escape from mortal
 dangers; he was poor, he was naked, he was wet, he was weary, he was a
 stranger; he had every claim upon the bowels of your compassion; it may
 be that he was the salt of the earth, holy, helpful, and kind; it may be
 he was a man laden with iniquities to whom death was the beginning of
 torment.  I ask you in the sight of heaven: Gordon Darnaway, where is the
 man for whom Christ died?'
 
 He started visibly at the last words; but there came no answer, and his
 face expressed no feeling but a vague alarm.
 
 'You were my father's brother,' I continued; 'You, have taught me to
 count your house as if it were my father's house; and we are both sinful
 men walking before the Lord among the sins and dangers of this life.  It
 is by our evil that God leads us into good; we sin, I dare not say by His
 temptation, but I must say with His consent; and to any but the brutish
 man his sins are the beginning of wisdom.  God has warned you by this
 crime; He warns you still by the bloody grave between our feet; and if
 there shall follow no repentance, no improvement, no return to Him, what
 can we look for but the following of some memorable judgment?'
 
 Even as I spoke the words, the eyes of my uncle wandered from my face.  A
 change fell upon his looks that cannot be described; his features seemed
 to dwindle in size, the colour faded from his cheeks, one hand rose
 waveringly and pointed over my shoulder into the distance, and the oft-
 repeated name fell once more from his lips: 'The _Christ-Anna_!'
 
 I turned; and if I was not appalled to the same degree, as I return
 thanks to Heaven that I had not the cause, I was still startled by the
 sight that met my eyes.  The form of a man stood upright on the cabin-
 hutch of the wrecked ship; his back was towards us; he appeared to be
 scanning the offing with shaded eyes, and his figure was relieved to its
 full height, which was plainly very great, against the sea and sky.  I
 have said a thousand times that I am not superstitious; but at that
 moment, with my mind running upon death and sin, the unexplained
 appearance of a stranger on that sea-girt, solitary island filled me with
 a surprise that bordered close on terror.  It seemed scarce possible that
 any human soul should have come ashore alive in such a sea as had rated
 last night along the coasts of Aros; and the only vessel within miles had
 gone down before our eyes among the Merry Men.  I was assailed with
 doubts that made suspense unbearable, and, to put the matter to the touch
 at once, stepped forward and hailed the figure like a ship.
 
 He turned about, and I thought he started to behold us.  At this my
 courage instantly revived, and I called and signed to him to draw near,
 and he, on his part, dropped immediately to the sands, and began slowly
 to approach, with many stops and hesitations.  At each repeated mark of
 the man's uneasiness I grew the more confident myself; and I advanced
 another step, encouraging him as I did so with my head and hand.  It was
 plain the castaway had heard indifferent accounts of our island
 hospitality; and indeed, about this time, the people farther north had a
 sorry reputation.
 
 'Why,' I said, 'the man is black!'
 
 And just at that moment, in a voice that I could scarce have recognised,
 my kinsman began swearing and praying in a mingled stream.  I looked at
 him; he had fallen on his knees, his face was agonised; at each step of
 the castaway's the pitch of his voice rose, the volubility of his
 utterance and the fervour of his language redoubled.  I call it prayer,
 for it was addressed to God; but surely no such ranting incongruities
 were ever before addressed to the Creator by a creature: surely if prayer
 can be a sin, this mad harangue was sinful.  I ran to my kinsman, I
 seized him by the shoulders, I dragged him to his feet.
 
 'Silence, man,' said I, 'respect your God in words, if not in action.
 Here, on the very scene of your transgressions, He sends you an occasion
 of atonement.  Forward and embrace it; welcome like a father yon creature
 who comes trembling to your mercy.'
 
 With that, I tried to force him towards the black; but he felled me to
 the ground, burst from my grasp, leaving the shoulder of his jacket, and
 fled up the hillside towards the top of Aros like a deer.  I staggered to
 my feet again, bruised and somewhat stunned; the negro had paused in
 surprise, perhaps in terror, some halfway between me and the wreck; my
 uncle was already far away, bounding from rock to rock; and I thus found
 myself torn for a time between two duties.  But I judged, and I pray
 Heaven that I judged rightly, in favour of the poor wretch upon the
 sands; his misfortune was at least not plainly of his own creation; it
 was one, besides, that I could certainly relieve; and I had begun by that
 time to regard my uncle as an incurable and dismal lunatic.  I advanced
 accordingly towards the black, who now awaited my approach with folded
 arms, like one prepared for either destiny.  As I came nearer, he reached
 forth his hand with a great gesture, such as I had seen from the pulpit,
 and spoke to me in something of a pulpit voice, but not a word was
 comprehensible.  I tried him first in English, then in Gaelic, both in
 vain; so that it was clear we must rely upon the tongue of looks and
 gestures.  Thereupon I signed to him to follow me, which he did readily
 and with a grave obeisance like a fallen king; all the while there had
 come no shade of alteration in his face, neither of anxiety while he was
 still waiting, nor of relief now that he was reassured; if he were a
 slave, as I supposed, I could not but judge he must have fallen from some
 high place in his own country, and fallen as he was, I could not but
 admire his bearing.  As we passed the grave, I paused and raised my hands
 and eyes to heaven in token of respect and sorrow for the dead; and he,
 as if in answer, bowed low and spread his hands abroad; it was a strange
 motion, but done like a thing of common custom; and I supposed it was
 ceremonial in the land from which he came.  At the same time he pointed
 to my uncle, whom we could just see perched upon a knoll, and touched his
 head to indicate that he was mad.
 
 We took the long way round the shore, for I feared to excite my uncle if
 we struck across the island; and as we walked, I had time enough to
 mature the little dramatic exhibition by which I hoped to satisfy my
 doubts.  Accordingly, pausing on a rock, I proceeded to imitate before
 the negro the action of the man whom I had seen the day before taking
 bearings with the compass at Sandag.  He understood me at once, and,
 taking the imitation out of my hands, showed me where the boat was,
 pointed out seaward as if to indicate the position of the schooner, and
 then down along the edge of the rock with the words 'Espirito Santo,'
 strangely pronounced, but clear enough for recognition.  I had thus been
 right in my conjecture; the pretended historical inquiry had been but a
 cloak for treasure-hunting; the man who had played on Dr. Robertson was
 the same as the foreigner who visited Grisapol in spring, and now, with
 many others, lay dead under the Roost of Aros: there had their greed
 brought them, there should their bones be tossed for evermore.  In the
 meantime the black continued his imitation of the scene, now looking up
 skyward as though watching the approach of the storm now, in the
 character of a seaman, waving the rest to come aboard; now as an officer,
 running along the rock and entering the boat; and anon bending over
 imaginary oars with the air of a hurried boatman; but all with the same
 solemnity of manner, so that I was never even moved to smile.  Lastly, he
 indicated to me, by a pantomime not to be described in words, how he
 himself had gone up to examine the stranded wreck, and, to his grief and
 indignation, had been deserted by his comrades; and thereupon folded his
 arms once more, and stooped his head, like one accepting fate.
 
 The mystery of his presence being thus solved for me, I explained to him
 by means of a sketch the fate of the vessel and of all aboard her.  He
 showed no surprise nor sorrow, and, with a sudden lifting of his open
 hand, seemed to dismiss his former friends or masters (whichever they had
 been) into God's pleasure.  Respect came upon me and grew stronger, the
 more I observed him; I saw he had a powerful mind and a sober and severe
 character, such as I loved to commune with; and before we reached the
 house of Aros I had almost forgotten, and wholly forgiven him, his
 uncanny colour.
 
 To Mary I told all that had passed without suppression, though I own my
 heart failed me; but I did wrong to doubt her sense of justice.
 
 'You did the right,' she said.  'God's will be done.'  And she set out
 meat for us at once.
 
 As soon as I was satisfied, I bade Rorie keep an eye upon the castaway,
 who was still eating, and set forth again myself to find my uncle.  I had
 not gone far before I saw him sitting in the same place, upon the very
 topmost knoll, and seemingly in the same attitude as when I had last
 observed him.  From that point, as I have said, the most of Aros and the
 neighbouring Ross would be spread below him like a map; and it was plain
 that he kept a bright look-out in all directions, for my head had
 scarcely risen above the summit of the first ascent before he had leaped
 to his feet and turned as if to face me.  I hailed him at once, as well
 as I was able, in the same tones and words as I had often used before,
 when I had come to summon him to dinner.  He made not so much as a
 movement in reply.  I passed on a little farther, and again tried parley,
 with the same result.  But when I began a second time to advance, his
 insane fears blazed up again, and still in dead silence, but with
 incredible speed, he began to flee from before me along the rocky summit
 of the hill.  An hour before, he had been dead weary, and I had been
 comparatively active.  But now his strength was recruited by the fervour
 of insanity, and it would have been vain for me to dream of pursuit.  Nay,
 the very attempt, I thought, might have inflamed his terrors, and thus
 increased the miseries of our position.  And I had nothing left but to
 turn homeward and make my sad report to Mary.
 
 She heard it, as she had heard the first, with a concerned composure,
 and, bidding me lie down and take that rest of which I stood so much in
 need, set forth herself in quest of her misguided father.  At that age it
 would have been a strange thing that put me from either meat or sleep; I
 slept long and deep; and it was already long past noon before I awoke and
 came downstairs into the kitchen.  Mary, Rorie, and the black castaway
 were seated about the fire in silence; and I could see that Mary had been
 weeping.  There was cause enough, as I soon learned, for tears.  First
 she, and then Rorie, had been forth to seek my uncle; each in turn had
 found him perched upon the hill-top, and from each in turn he had
 silently and swiftly fled.  Rorie had tried to chase him, but in vain;
 madness lent a new vigour to his bounds; he sprang from rock to rock over
 the widest gullies; he scoured like the wind along the hill-tops; he
 doubled and twisted like a hare before the dogs; and Rorie at length gave
 in; and the last that he saw, my uncle was seated as before upon the
 crest of Aros.  Even during the hottest excitement of the chase, even
 when the fleet-footed servant had come, for a moment, very near to
 capture him, the poor lunatic had uttered not a sound.  He fled, and he
 was silent, like a beast; and this silence had terrified his pursuer.
 
 There was something heart-breaking in the situation.  How to capture the
 madman, how to feed him in the meanwhile, and what to do with him when he
 was captured, were the three difficulties that we had to solve.
 
 'The black,' said I, 'is the cause of this attack.  It may even be his
 presence in the house that keeps my uncle on the hill.  We have done the
 fair thing; he has been fed and warmed under this roof; now I propose
 that Rorie put him across the bay in the coble, and take him through the
 Ross as far as Grisapol.'
 
 In this proposal Mary heartily concurred; and bidding the black follow
 us, we all three descended to the pier.  Certainly, Heaven's will was
 declared against Gordon Darnaway; a thing had happened, never paralleled
 before in Aros; during the storm, the coble had broken loose, and,
 striking on the rough splinters of the pier, now lay in four feet of
 water with one side stove in.  Three days of work at least would be
 required to make her float.  But I was not to be beaten.  I led the whole
 party round to where the gut was narrowest, swam to the other side, and
 called to the black to follow me.  He signed, with the same clearness and
 quiet as before, that he knew not the art; and there was truth apparent
 in his signals, it would have occurred to none of us to doubt his truth;
 and that hope being over, we must all go back even as we came to the
 house of Aros, the negro walking in our midst without embarrassment.
 
 All we could do that day was to make one more attempt to communicate with
 the unhappy madman.  Again he was visible on his perch; again he fled in
 silence.  But food and a great cloak were at least left for his comfort;
 the rain, besides, had cleared away, and the night promised to be even
 warm.  We might compose ourselves, we thought, until the morrow; rest was
 the chief requisite, that we might be strengthened for unusual exertions;
 and as none cared to talk, we separated at an early hour.
 
 I lay long awake, planning a campaign for the morrow.  I was to place the
 black on the side of Sandag, whence he should head my uncle towards the
 house; Rorie in the west, I on the east, were to complete the cordon, as
 best we might.  It seemed to me, the more I recalled the configuration of
 the island, that it should be possible, though hard, to force him down
 upon the low ground along Aros Bay; and once there, even with the
 strength of his madness, ultimate escape was hardly to be feared.  It was
 on his terror of the black that I relied; for I made sure, however he
 might run, it would not be in the direction of the man whom he supposed
 to have returned from the dead, and thus one point of the compass at
 least would be secure.
 
 When at length I fell asleep, it was to be awakened shortly after by a
 dream of wrecks, black men, and submarine adventure; and I found myself
 so shaken and fevered that I arose, descended the stair, and stepped out
 before the house.  Within, Rorie and the black were asleep together in
 the kitchen; outside was a wonderful clear night of stars, with here and
 there a cloud still hanging, last stragglers of the tempest.  It was near
 the top of the flood, and the Merry Men were roaring in the windless
 quiet of the night.  Never, not even in the height of the tempest, had I
 heard their song with greater awe.  Now, when the winds were gathered
 home, when the deep was dandling itself back into its summer slumber, and
 when the stars rained their gentle light over land and sea, the voice of
 these tide-breakers was still raised for havoc.  They seemed, indeed, to
 be a part of the world's evil and the tragic side of life.  Nor were
 their meaningless vociferations the only sounds that broke the silence of
 the night.  For I could hear, now shrill and thrilling and now almost
 drowned, the note of a human voice that accompanied the uproar of the
 Roost.  I knew it for my kinsman's; and a great fear fell upon me of
 God's judgments, and the evil in the world.  I went back again into the
 darkness of the house as into a place of shelter, and lay long upon my
 bed, pondering these mysteries.
 
 It was late when I again woke, and I leaped into my clothes and hurried
 to the kitchen.  No one was there; Rorie and the black had both
 stealthily departed long before; and my heart stood still at the
 discovery.  I could rely on Rorie's heart, but I placed no trust in his
 discretion.  If he had thus set out without a word, he was plainly bent
 upon some service to my uncle.  But what service could he hope to render
 even alone, far less in the company of the man in whom my uncle found his
 fears incarnated?  Even if I were not already too late to prevent some
 deadly mischief, it was plain I must delay no longer.  With the thought I
 was out of the house; and often as I have run on the rough sides of Aros,
 I never ran as I did that fatal morning.  I do not believe I put twelve
 minutes to the whole ascent.
 
 My uncle was gone from his perch.  The basket had indeed been torn open
 and the meat scattered on the turf; but, as we found afterwards, no
 mouthful had been tasted; and there was not another trace of human
 existence in that wide field of view.  Day had already filled the clear
 heavens; the sun already lighted in a rosy bloom upon the crest of Ben
 Kyaw; but all below me the rude knolls of Aros and the shield of sea lay
 steeped in the clear darkling twilight of the dawn.
 
 'Rorie!' I cried; and again 'Rorie!'  My voice died in the silence, but
 there came no answer back.  If there were indeed an enterprise afoot to
 catch my uncle, it was plainly not in fleetness of foot, but in dexterity
 of stalking, that the hunters placed their trust.  I ran on farther,
 keeping the higher spurs, and looking right and left, nor did I pause
 again till I was on the mount above Sandag.  I could see the wreck, the
 uncovered belt of sand, the waves idly beating, the long ledge of rocks,
 and on either hand the tumbled knolls, boulders, and gullies of the
 island.  But still no human thing.
 
 At a stride the sunshine fell on Aros, and the shadows and colours leaped
 into being.  Not half a moment later, below me to the west, sheep began
 to scatter as in a panic.  There came a cry.  I saw my uncle running.  I
 saw the black jump up in hot pursuit; and before I had time to
 understand, Rorie also had appeared, calling directions in Gaelic as to a
 dog herding sheep.
 
 I took to my heels to interfere, and perhaps I had done better to have
 waited where I was, for I was the means of cutting off the madman's last
 escape.  There was nothing before him from that moment but the grave, the
 wreck, and the sea in Sandag Bay.  And yet Heaven knows that what I did
 was for the best.
 
 My uncle Gordon saw in what direction, horrible to him, the chase was
 driving him.  He doubled, darting to the right and left; but high as the
 fever ran in his veins, the black was still the swifter.  Turn where he
 would, he was still forestalled, still driven toward the scene of his
 crime.  Suddenly he began to shriek aloud, so that the coast re-echoed;
 and now both I and Rorie were calling on the black to stop.  But all was
 vain, for it was written otherwise.  The pursuer still ran, the chase
 still sped before him screaming; they avoided the grave, and skimmed
 close past the timbers of the wreck; in a breath they had cleared the
 sand; and still my kinsman did not pause, but dashed straight into the
 surf; and the black, now almost within reach, still followed swiftly
 behind him.  Rorie and I both stopped, for the thing was now beyond the
 hands of men, and these were the decrees of God that came to pass before
 our eyes.  There was never a sharper ending.  On that steep beach they
 were beyond their depth at a bound; neither could swim; the black rose
 once for a moment with a throttling cry; but the current had them, racing
 seaward; and if ever they came up again, which God alone can tell, it
 would be ten minutes after, at the far end of Aros Roost, where the
 seabirds hover fishing.
 
 
 
 
 WILL O' THE MILL.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.  THE PLAIN AND THE STARS.
 
 
 The Mill here Will lived with his adopted parents stood in a falling
 valley between pinewoods and great mountains.  Above, hill after hill,
 soared upwards until they soared out of the depth of the hardiest timber,
 and stood naked against the sky.  Some way up, a long grey village lay
 like a seam or a ray of vapour on a wooded hillside; and when the wind
 was favourable, the sound of the church bells would drop down, thin and
 silvery, to Will.  Below, the valley grew ever steeper and steeper, and
 at the same time widened out on either hand; and from an eminence beside
 the mill it was possible to see its whole length and away beyond it over
 a wide plain, where the river turned and shone, and moved on from city to
 city on its voyage towards the sea.  It chanced that over this valley
 there lay a pass into a neighbouring kingdom; so that, quiet and rural as
 it was, the road that ran along beside the river was a high thoroughfare
 between two splendid and powerful societies.  All through the summer,
 travelling-carriages came crawling up, or went plunging briskly downwards
 past the mill; and as it happened that the other side was very much
 easier of ascent, the path was not much frequented, except by people
 going in one direction; and of all the carriages that Will saw go by,
 five-sixths were plunging briskly downwards and only one-sixth crawling
 up.  Much more was this the case with foot-passengers.  All the light-
 footed tourists, all the pedlars laden with strange wares, were tending
 downward like the river that accompanied their path.  Nor was this all;
 for when Will was yet a child a disastrous war arose over a great part of
 the world.  The newspapers were full of defeats and victories, the earth
 rang with cavalry hoofs, and often for days together and for miles around
 the coil of battle terrified good people from their labours in the field.
 Of all this, nothing was heard for a long time in the valley; but at last
 one of the commanders pushed an army over the pass by forced marches, and
 for three days horse and foot, cannon and tumbril, drum and standard,
 kept pouring downward past the mill.  All day the child stood and watched
 them on their passage--the rhythmical stride, the pale, unshaven faces
 tanned about the eyes, the discoloured regimentals and the tattered
 flags, filled him with a sense of weariness, pity, and wonder; and all
 night long, after he was in bed, he could hear the cannon pounding and
 the feet trampling, and the great armament sweeping onward and downward
 past the mill.  No one in the valley ever heard the fate of the
 expedition, for they lay out of the way of gossip in those troublous
 times; but Will saw one thing plainly, that not a man returned.  Whither
 had they all gone?  Whither went all the tourists and pedlars with
 strange wares? whither all the brisk barouches with servants in the
 dicky? whither the water of the stream, ever coursing downward and ever
 renewed from above?  Even the wind blew oftener down the valley, and
 carried the dead leaves along with it in the fall.  It seemed like a
 great conspiracy of things animate and inanimate; they all went downward,
 fleetly and gaily downward, and only he, it seemed, remained behind, like
 a stock upon the wayside.  It sometimes made him glad when he noticed how
 the fishes kept their heads up stream.  They, at least, stood faithfully
 by him, while all else were posting downward to the unknown world.
 
 One evening he asked the miller where the river went.
 
 'It goes down the valley,' answered he, 'and turns a power of mills--six
 score mills, they say, from here to Unterdeck--and is none the wearier
 after all.  And then it goes out into the lowlands, and waters the great
 corn country, and runs through a sight of fine cities (so they say) where
 kings live all alone in great palaces, with a sentry walling up and down
 before the door.  And it goes under bridges with stone men upon them,
 looking down and smiling so curious it the water, and living folks
 leaning their elbows on the wall and looking over too.  And then it goes
 on and on, and down through marshes and sands, until at last it falls
 into the sea, where the ships are that bring parrots and tobacco from the
 Indies.  Ay, it has a long trot before it as it goes singing over our
 weir, bless its heart!'
 
 'And what is the sea?' asked Will.
 
 'The sea!' cried the miller.  'Lord help us all, it is the greatest thing
 God made!  That is where all the water in the world runs down into a
 great salt lake.  There it lies, as flat as my hand and as innocent-like
 as a child; but they do say when the wind blows it gets up into water-
 mountains bigger than any of ours, and swallows down great ships bigger
 than our mill, and makes such a roaring that you can hear it miles away
 upon the land.  There are great fish in it five times bigger than a bull,
 and one old serpent as long as our river and as old as all the world,
 with whiskers like a man, and a crown of silver on her head.'
 
 Will thought he had never heard anything like this, and he kept on asking
 question after question about the world that lay away down the river,
 with all its perils and marvels, until the old miller became quite
 interested himself, and at last took him by the hand and led him to the
 hilltop that overlooks the valley and the plain.  The sun was near
 setting, and hung low down in a cloudless sky.  Everything was defined
 and glorified in golden light.  Will had never seen so great an expanse
 of country in his life; he stood and gazed with all his eyes.  He could
 see the cities, and the woods and fields, and the bright curves of the
 river, and far away to where the rim of the plain trenched along the
 shining heavens.  An over-mastering emotion seized upon the boy, soul and
 body; his heart beat so thickly that he could not breathe; the scene swam
 before his eyes; the sun seemed to wheel round and round, and throw off,
 as it turned, strange shapes which disappeared with the rapidity of
 thought, and were succeeded by others.  Will covered his face with his
 hands, and burst into a violent fit of tears; and the poor miller, sadly
 disappointed and perplexed, saw nothing better for it than to take him up
 in his arms and carry him home in silence.
 
 From that day forward Will was full of new hopes and longings.  Something
 kept tugging at his heart-strings; the running water carried his desires
 along with it as he dreamed over its fleeting surface; the wind, as it
 ran over innumerable tree-tops, hailed him with encouraging words;
 branches beckoned downward; the open road, as it shouldered round the
 angles and went turning and vanishing fast and faster down the valley,
 tortured him with its solicitations.  He spent long whiles on the
 eminence, looking down the rivershed and abroad on the fat lowlands, and
 watched the clouds that travelled forth upon the sluggish wind and
 trailed their purple shadows on the plain; or he would linger by the
 wayside, and follow the carriages with his eyes as they rattled downward
 by the river.  It did not matter what it was; everything that went that
 way, were it cloud or carriage, bird or brown water in the stream, he
 felt his heart flow out after it in an ecstasy of longing.
 
 We are told by men of science that all the ventures of mariners on the
 sea, all that counter-marching of tribes and races that confounds old
 history with its dust and rumour, sprang from nothing more abstruse than
 the laws of supply and demand, and a certain natural instinct for cheap
 rations.  To any one thinking deeply, this will seem a dull and pitiful
 explanation.  The tribes that came swarming out of the North and East, if
 they were indeed pressed onward from behind by others, were drawn at the
 same time by the magnetic influence of the South and West.  The fame of
 other lands had reached them; the name of the eternal city rang in their
 ears; they were not colonists, but pilgrims; they travelled towards wine
 and gold and sunshine, but their hearts were set on something higher.
 That divine unrest, that old stinging trouble of humanity that makes all
 high achievements and all miserable failure, the same that spread wings
 with Icarus, the same that sent Columbus into the desolate Atlantic,
 inspired and supported these barbarians on their perilous march.  There
 is one legend which profoundly represents their spirit, of how a flying
 party of these wanderers encountered a very old man shod with iron.  The
 old man asked them whither they were going; and they answered with one
 voice: 'To the Eternal City!'  He looked upon them gravely.  'I have
 sought it,' he said, 'over the most part of the world.  Three such pairs
 as I now carry on my feet have I worn out upon this pilgrimage, and now
 the fourth is growing slender underneath my steps.  And all this while I
 have not found the city.'  And he turned and went his own way alone,
 leaving them astonished.
 
 And yet this would scarcely parallel the intensity of Will's feeling for
 the plain.  If he could only go far enough out there, he felt as if his
 eyesight would be purged and clarified, as if his hearing would grow more
 delicate, and his very breath would come and go with luxury.  He was
 transplanted and withering where he was; he lay in a strange country and
 was sick for home.  Bit by bit, he pieced together broken notions of the
 world below: of the river, ever moving and growing until it sailed forth
 into the majestic ocean; of the cities, full of brisk and beautiful
 people, playing fountains, bands of music and marble palaces, and lighted
 up at night from end to end with artificial stars of gold; of the great
 churches, wise universities, brave armies, and untold money lying stored
 in vaults; of the high-flying vice that moved in the sunshine, and the
 stealth and swiftness of midnight murder.  I have said he was sick as if
 for home: the figure halts.  He was like some one lying in twilit,
 formless preexistence, and stretching out his hands lovingly towards many-
 coloured, many-sounding life.  It was no wonder he was unhappy, he would
 go and tell the fish: they were made for their life, wished for no more
 than worms and running water, and a hole below a falling bank; but he was
 differently designed, full of desires and aspirations, itching at the
 fingers, lusting with the eyes, whom the whole variegated world could not
 satisfy with aspects.  The true life, the true bright sunshine, lay far
 out upon the plain.  And O! to see this sunlight once before he died! to
 move with a jocund spirit in a golden land! to hear the trained singers
 and sweet church bells, and see the holiday gardens!  'And O fish!' he
 would cry, 'if you would only turn your noses down stream, you could swim
 so easily into the fabled waters and see the vast ships passing over your
 head like clouds, and hear the great water-hills making music over you
 all day long!'  But the fish kept looking patiently in their own
 direction, until Will hardly knew whether to laugh or cry.
 
 Hitherto the traffic on the road had passed by Will, like something seen
 in a picture: he had perhaps exchanged salutations with a tourist, or
 caught sight of an old gentleman in a travelling cap at a carriage
 window; but for the most part it had been a mere symbol, which he
 contemplated from apart and with something of a superstitious feeling.  A
 time came at last when this was to be changed.  The miller, who was a
 greedy man in his way, and never forewent an opportunity of honest
 profit, turned the mill-house into a little wayside inn, and, several
 pieces of good fortune falling in opportunely, built stables and got the
 position of post master on the road.  It now became Will's duty to wait
 upon people, as they sat to break their fasts in the little arbour at the
 top of the mill garden; and you may be sure that he kept his ears open,
 and learned many new things about the outside world as he brought the
 omelette or the wine.  Nay, he would often get into conversation with
 single guests, and by adroit questions and polite attention, not only
 gratify his own curiosity, but win the goodwill of the travellers.  Many
 complimented the old couple on their serving-boy; and a professor was
 eager to take him away with him, and have him properly educated in the
 plain.  The miller and his wife were mightily astonished and even more
 pleased.  They thought it a very good thing that they should have opened
 their inn.  'You see,' the old man would remark, 'he has a kind of talent
 for a publican; he never would have made anything else!'  And so life
 wagged on in the valley, with high satisfaction to all concerned but
 Will.  Every carriage that left the inn-door seemed to take a part of him
 away with it; and when people jestingly offered him a lift, he could with
 difficulty command his emotion.  Night after night he would dream that he
 was awakened by flustered servants, and that a splendid equipage waited
 at the door to carry him down into the plain; night after night; until
 the dream, which had seemed all jollity to him at first, began to take on
 a colour of gravity, and the nocturnal summons and waiting equipage
 occupied a place in his mind as something to be both feared and hoped
 for.
 
 One day, when Will was about sixteen, a fat young man arrived at sunset
 to pass the night.  He was a contented-looking fellow, with a jolly eye,
 and carried a knapsack.  While dinner was preparing, he sat in the arbour
 to read a book; but as soon as he had begun to observe Will, the book was
 laid aside; he was plainly one of those who prefer living people to
 people made of ink and paper.  Will, on his part, although he had not
 been much interested in the stranger at first sight, soon began to take a
 great deal of pleasure in his talk, which was full of good nature and
 good sense, and at last conceived a great respect for his character and
 wisdom.  They sat far into the night; and about two in the morning Will
 opened his heart to the young man, and told him how he longed to leave
 the valley and what bright hopes he had connected with the cities of the
 plain.  The young man whistled, and then broke into a smile.
 
 'My young friend,' he remarked, 'you are a very curious little fellow to
 be sure, and wish a great many things which you will never get.  Why, you
 would feel quite ashamed if you knew how the little fellows in these
 fairy cities of yours are all after the same sort of nonsense, and keep
 breaking their hearts to get up into the mountains.  And let me tell you,
 those who go down into the plains are a very short while there before
 they wish themselves heartily back again.  The air is not so light nor so
 pure; nor is the sun any brighter.  As for the beautiful men and women,
 you would see many of them in rags and many of them deformed with
 horrible disorders; and a city is so hard a place for people who are poor
 and sensitive that many choose to die by their own hand.'
 
 'You must think me very simple,' answered Will.  'Although I have never
 been out of this valley, believe me, I have used my eyes.  I know how one
 thing lives on another; for instance, how the fish hangs in the eddy to
 catch his fellows; and the shepherd, who makes so pretty a picture
 carrying home the lamb, is only carrying it home for dinner.  I do not
 expect to find all things right in your cities.  That is not what
 troubles me; it might have been that once upon a time; but although I
 live here always, I have asked many questions and learned a great deal in
 these last years, and certainly enough to cure me of my old fancies.  But
 you would not have me die like a dog and not see all that is to be seen,
 and do all that a man can do, let it be good or evil? you would not have
 me spend all my days between this road here and the river, and not so
 much as make a motion to be up and live my life?--I would rather die out
 of hand,' he cried, 'than linger on as I am doing.'
 
 'Thousands of people,' said the young man, 'live and die like you, and
 are none the less happy.'
 
 'Ah!' said Will, 'if there are thousands who would like, why should not
 one of them have my place?'
 
 It was quite dark; there was a hanging lamp in the arbour which lit up
 the table and the faces of the speakers; and along the arch, the leaves
 upon the trellis stood out illuminated against the night sky, a pattern
 of transparent green upon a dusky purple.  The fat young man rose, and,
 taking Will by the arm, led him out under the open heavens.
 
 'Did you ever look at the stars?' he asked, pointing upwards.
 
 'Often and often,' answered Will.
 
 'And do you know what they are?'
 
 'I have fancied many things.'
 
 'They are worlds like ours,' said the young man.  'Some of them less;
 many of them a million times greater; and some of the least sparkles that
 you see are not only worlds, but whole clusters of worlds turning about
 each other in the midst of space.  We do not know what there may be in
 any of them; perhaps the answer to all our difficulties or the cure of
 all our sufferings: and yet we can never reach them; not all the skill of
 the craftiest of men can fit out a ship for the nearest of these our
 neighbours, nor would the life of the most aged suffice for such a
 journey.  When a great battle has been lost or a dear friend is dead,
 when we are hipped or in high spirits, there they are unweariedly shining
 overhead.  We may stand down here, a whole army of us together, and shout
 until we break our hearts, and not a whisper reaches them.  We may climb
 the highest mountain, and we are no nearer them.  All we can do is to
 stand down here in the garden and take off our hats; the starshine lights
 upon our heads, and where mine is a little bald, I dare say you can see
 it glisten in the darkness.  The mountain and the mouse.  That is like to
 be all we shall ever have to do with Arcturus or Aldebaran.  Can you
 apply a parable?' he added, laying his hand upon Will's shoulder.  'It is
 not the same thing as a reason, but usually vastly more convincing.'
 
 Will hung his head a little, and then raised it once more to heaven.  The
 stars seemed to expand and emit a sharper brilliancy; and as he kept
 turning his eyes higher and higher, they seemed to increase in multitude
 under his gaze.
 
 'I see,' he said, turning to the young man.  'We are in a rat-trap.'
 
 'Something of that size.  Did you ever see a squirrel turning in a cage?
 and another squirrel sitting philosophically over his nuts?  I needn't
 ask you which of them looked more of a fool.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.  THE PARSON'S MARJORY.
 
 
 After some years the old people died, both in one winter, very carefully
 tended by their adopted son, and very quietly mourned when they were
 gone.  People who had heard of his roving fancies supposed he would
 hasten to sell the property, and go down the river to push his fortunes.
 But there was never any sign of such in intention on the part of Will.  On
 the contrary, he had the inn set on a better footing, and hired a couple
 of servants to assist him in carrying it on; and there he settled down, a
 kind, talkative, inscrutable young man, six feet three in his stockings,
 with an iron constitution and a friendly voice.  He soon began to take
 rank in the district as a bit of an oddity: it was not much to be
 wondered at from the first, for he was always full of notions, and kept
 calling the plainest common-sense in question; but what most raised the
 report upon him was the odd circumstance of his courtship with the
 parson's Marjory.
 
 The parson's Marjory was a lass about nineteen, when Will would be about
 thirty; well enough looking, and much better educated than any other girl
 in that part of the country, as became her parentage.  She held her head
 very high, and had already refused several offers of marriage with a
 grand air, which had got her hard names among the neighbours.  For all
 that she was a good girl, and one that would have made any man well
 contented.
 
 Will had never seen much of her; for although the church and parsonage
 were only two miles from his own door, he was never known to go there but
 on Sundays.  It chanced, however, that the parsonage fell into disrepair,
 and had to be dismantled; and the parson and his daughter took lodgings
 for a month or so, on very much reduced terms, at Will's inn.  Now, what
 with the inn, and the mill, and the old miller's savings, our friend was
 a man of substance; and besides that, he had a name for good temper and
 shrewdness, which make a capital portion in marriage; and so it was
 currently gossiped, among their ill-wishers, that the parson and his
 daughter had not chosen their temporary lodging with their eyes shut.
 Will was about the last man in the world to be cajoled or frightened into
 marriage.  You had only to look into his eyes, limpid and still like
 pools of water, and yet with a sort of clear light that seemed to come
 from within, and you would understand at once that here was one who knew
 his own mind, and would stand to it immovably.  Marjory herself was no
 weakling by her looks, with strong, steady eyes and a resolute and quiet
 bearing.  It might be a question whether she was not Will's match in
 stedfastness, after all, or which of them would rule the roost in
 marriage.  But Marjory had never given it a thought, and accompanied her
 father with the most unshaken innocence and unconcern.
 
 The season was still so early that Will's customers were few and far
 between; but the lilacs were already flowering, and the weather was so
 mild that the party took dinner under the trellice, with the noise of the
 river in their ears and the woods ringing about them with the songs of
 birds.  Will soon began to take a particular pleasure in these dinners.
 The parson was rather a dull companion, with a habit of dozing at table;
 but nothing rude or cruel ever fell from his lips.  And as for the
 parson's daughter, she suited her surroundings with the best grace
 imaginable; and whatever she said seemed so pat and pretty that Will
 conceived a great idea of her talents.  He could see her face, as she
 leaned forward, against a background of rising pinewoods; her eyes shone
 peaceably; the light lay around her hair like a kerchief; something that
 was hardly a smile rippled her pale cheeks, and Will could not contain
 himself from gazing on her in an agreeable dismay.  She looked, even in
 her quietest moments, so complete in herself, and so quick with life down
 to her finger tips and the very skirts of her dress, that the remainder
 of created things became no more than a blot by comparison; and if Will
 glanced away from her to her surroundings, the trees looked inanimate and
 senseless, the clouds hung in heaven like dead things, and even the
 mountain tops were disenchanted.  The whole valley could not compare in
 looks with this one girl.
 
 Will was always observant in the society of his fellow-creatures; but his
 observation became almost painfully eager in the case of Marjory.  He
 listened to all she uttered, and read her eyes, at the same time, for the
 unspoken commentary.  Many kind, simple, and sincere speeches found an
 echo in his heart.  He became conscious of a soul beautifully poised upon
 itself, nothing doubting, nothing desiring, clothed in peace.  It was not
 possible to separate her thoughts from her appearance.  The turn of her
 wrist, the still sound of her voice, the light in her eyes, the lines of
 her body, fell in tune with her grave and gentle words, like the
 accompaniment that sustains and harmonises the voice of the singer.  Her
 influence was one thing, not to be divided or discussed, only to be felt
 with gratitude and joy.  To Will, her presence recalled something of his
 childhood, and the thought of her took its place in his mind beside that
 of dawn, of running water, and of the earliest violets and lilacs.  It is
 the property of things seen for the first time, or for the first time
 after long, like the flowers in spring, to reawaken in us the sharp edge
 of sense and that impression of mystic strangeness which otherwise passes
 out of life with the coming of years; but the sight of a loved face is
 what renews a man's character from the fountain upwards.
 
 One day after dinner Will took a stroll among the firs; a grave beatitude
 possessed him from top to toe, and he kept smiling to himself and the
 landscape as he went.  The river ran between the stepping-stones with a
 pretty wimple; a bird sang loudly in the wood; the hill-tops looked
 immeasurably high, and as he glanced at them from time to time seemed to
 contemplate his movements with a beneficent but awful curiosity.  His way
 took him to the eminence which overlooked the plain; and there he sat
 down upon a stone, and fell into deep and pleasant thought.  The plain
 lay abroad with its cities and silver river; everything was asleep,
 except a great eddy of birds which kept rising and falling and going
 round and round in the blue air.  He repeated Marjory's name aloud, and
 the sound of it gratified his ear.  He shut his eyes, and her image
 sprang up before him, quietly luminous and attended with good thoughts.
 The river might run for ever; the birds fly higher and higher till they
 touched the stars.  He saw it was empty bustle after all; for here,
 without stirring a feet, waiting patiently in his own narrow valley, he
 also had attained the better sunlight.
 
 The next day Will made a sort of declaration across the dinner-table,
 while the parson was filling his pipe.
 
 'Miss Marjory,' he said, 'I never knew any one I liked so well as you.  I
 am mostly a cold, unkindly sort of man; not from want of heart, but out
 of strangeness in my way of thinking; and people seem far away from me.
 'Tis as if there were a circle round me, which kept every one out but
 you; I can hear the others talking and laughing; but you come quite
 close.  Maybe, this is disagreeable to you?' he asked.
 
 Marjory made no answer.
 
 'Speak up, girl,' said the parson.
 
 'Nay, now,' returned Will, 'I wouldn't press her, parson.  I feel tongue-
 tied myself, who am not used to it; and she's a woman, and little more
 than a child, when all is said.  But for my part, as far as I can
 understand what people mean by it, I fancy I must be what they call in
 love.  I do not wish to be held as committing myself; for I may be wrong;
 but that is how I believe things are with me.  And if Miss Marjory should
 feel any otherwise on her part, mayhap she would be so kind as shake her
 head.'
 
 Marjory was silent, and gave no sign that she had heard.
 
 'How is that, parson?' asked Will.
 
 'The girl must speak,' replied the parson, laying down his pipe.  'Here's
 our neighbour who says he loves you, Madge.  Do you love him, ay or no?'
 
 'I think I do,' said Marjory, faintly.
 
 'Well then, that's all that could be wished!' cried Will, heartily.  And
 he took her hand across the table, and held it a moment in both of his
 with great satisfaction.
 
 'You must marry,' observed the parson, replacing his pipe in his mouth.
 
 'Is that the right thing to do, think you?' demanded Will.
 
 'It is indispensable,' said the parson.
 
 'Very well,' replied the wooer.
 
 Two or three days passed away with great delight to Will, although a
 bystander might scarce have found it out.  He continued to take his meals
 opposite Marjory, and to talk with her and gaze upon her in her father's
 presence; but he made no attempt to see her alone, nor in any other way
 changed his conduct towards her from what it had been since the
 beginning.  Perhaps the girl was a little disappointed, and perhaps not
 unjustly; and yet if it had been enough to be always in the thoughts of
 another person, and so pervade and alter his whole life, she might have
 been thoroughly contented.  For she was never out of Will's mind for an
 instant.  He sat over the stream, and watched the dust of the eddy, and
 the poised fish, and straining weeds; he wandered out alone into the
 purple even, with all the blackbirds piping round him in the wood; he
 rose early in the morning, and saw the sky turn from grey to gold, and
 the light leap upon the hill-tops; and all the while he kept wondering if
 he had never seen such things before, or how it was that they should look
 so different now.  The sound of his own mill-wheel, or of the wind among
 the trees, confounded and charmed his heart.  The most enchanting
 thoughts presented themselves unbidden in his mind.  He was so happy that
 he could not sleep at night, and so restless, that he could hardly sit
 still out of her company.  And yet it seemed as if he avoided her rather
 than sought her out.
 
 One day, as he was coming home from a ramble, Will found Marjory in the
 garden picking flowers, and as he came up with her, slackened his pace
 and continued walking by her side.
 
 'You like flowers?' he said.
 
 'Indeed I love them dearly,' she replied.  'Do you?'
 
 'Why, no,' said he, 'not so much.  They are a very small affair, when all
 is done.  I can fancy people caring for them greatly, but not doing as
 you are just now.'
 
 'How?' she asked, pausing and looking up at him.
 
 'Plucking them,' said he.  'They are a deal better off where they are,
 and look a deal prettier, if you go to that.'
 
 'I wish to have them for my own,' she answered, 'to carry them near my
 heart, and keep them in my room.  They tempt me when they grow here; they
 seem to say, "Come and do something with us;" but once I have cut them
 and put them by, the charm is laid, and I can look at them with quite an
 easy heart.'
 
 'You wish to possess them,' replied Will, 'in order to think no more
 about them.  It's a bit like killing the goose with the golden eggs.  It's
 a bit like what I wished to do when I was a boy.  Because I had a fancy
 for looking out over the plain, I wished to go down there--where I
 couldn't look out over it any longer.  Was not that fine reasoning?  Dear,
 dear, if they only thought of it, all the world would do like me; and you
 would let your flowers alone, just as I stay up here in the mountains.'
 Suddenly he broke off sharp.  'By the Lord!' he cried.  And when she
 asked him what was wrong, he turned the question off and walked away into
 the house with rather a humorous expression of face.
 
 He was silent at table; and after the night hid fallen and the stars had
 come out overhead, he walked up and down for hours in the courtyard and
 garden with an uneven pace.  There was still a light in the window of
 Marjory's room: one little oblong patch of orange in a world of dark blue
 hills and silver starlight.  Will's mind ran a great deal on the window;
 but his thoughts were not very lover-like.  'There she is in her room,'
 he thought, 'and there are the stars overhead:--a blessing upon both!'
 Both were good influences in his life; both soothed and braced him in his
 profound contentment with the world.  And what more should he desire with
 either?  The fat young man and his councils were so present to his mind,
 that he threw back his head, and, putting his hands before his mouth,
 shouted aloud to the populous heavens.  Whether from the position of his
 head or the sudden strain of the exertion, he seemed to see a momentary
 shock among the stars, and a diffusion of frosty light pass from one to
 another along the sky.  At the same instant, a corner of the blind was
 lifted and lowered again at once.  He laughed a loud ho-ho!  'One and
 another!' thought Will.  'The stars tremble, and the blind goes up.  Why,
 before Heaven, what a great magician I must be!  Now if I were only a
 fool, should not I be in a pretty way?'  And he went off to bed,
 chuckling to himself: 'If I were only a fool!'
 
 The next morning, pretty early, he saw her once more in the garden, and
 sought her out.
 
 'I have been thinking about getting married,' he began abruptly; 'and
 after having turned it all over, I have made up my mind it's not
 worthwhile.'
 
 She turned upon him for a single moment; but his radiant, kindly
 appearance would, under the circumstances, have disconcerted an angel,
 and she looked down again upon the ground in silence.  He could see her
 tremble.
 
 'I hope you don't mind,' he went on, a little taken aback.  'You ought
 not.  I have turned it all over, and upon my soul there's nothing in it.
 We should never be one whit nearer than we are just now, and, if I am a
 wise man, nothing like so happy.'
 
 'It is unnecessary to go round about with me,' she said.  'I very well
 remember that you refused to commit yourself; and now that I see you were
 mistaken, and in reality have never cared for me, I can only feel sad
 that I have been so far misled.'
 
 'I ask your pardon,' said Will stoutly; 'you do not understand my
 meaning.  As to whether I have ever loved you or not, I must leave that
 to others.  But for one thing, my feeling is not changed; and for
 another, you may make it your boast that you have made my whole life and
 character something different from what they were.  I mean what I say; no
 less.  I do not think getting married is worth while.  I would rather you
 went on living with your father, so that I could walk over and see you
 once, or maybe twice a week, as people go to church, and then we should
 both be all the happier between whiles.  That's my notion.  But I'll
 marry you if you will,' he added.
 
 'Do you know that you are insulting me?' she broke out.
 
 'Not I, Marjory,' said he; 'if there is anything in a clear conscience,
 not I.  I offer all my heart's best affection; you can take it or want
 it, though I suspect it's beyond either your power or mine to change what
 has once been done, and set me fancy-free.  I'll marry you, if you like;
 but I tell you again and again, it's not worth while, and we had best
 stay friends.  Though I am a quiet man I have noticed a heap of things in
 my life.  Trust in me, and take things as I propose; or, if you don't
 like that, say the word, and I'll marry you out of hand.'
 
 There was a considerable pause, and Will, who began to feel uneasy, began
 to grow angry in consequence.
 
 'It seems you are too proud to say your mind,' he said.  'Believe me
 that's a pity.  A clean shrift makes simple living.  Can a man be more
 downright or honourable, to a woman than I have been?  I have said my
 say, and given you your choice.  Do you want me to marry you? or will you
 take my friendship, as I think best? or have you had enough of me for
 good?  Speak out for the dear God's sake!  You know your father told you
 a girl should speak her mind in these affairs.'
 
 She seemed to recover herself at that, turned without a word, walked
 rapidly through the garden, and disappeared into the house, leaving Will
 in some confusion as to the result.  He walked up and down the garden,
 whistling softly to himself.  Sometimes he stopped and contemplated the
 sky and hill-tops; sometimes he went down to the tail of the weir and sat
 there, looking foolishly in the water.  All this dubiety and perturbation
 was so foreign to his nature and the life which he had resolutely chosen
 for himself, that he began to regret Marjory's arrival.  'After all,' he
 thought, 'I was as happy as a man need be.  I could come down here and
 watch my fishes all day long if I wanted: I was as settled and contented
 as my old mill.'
 
 Marjory came down to dinner, looking very trim and quiet; and no sooner
 were all three at table than she made her father a speech, with her eyes
 fixed upon her plate, but showing no other sign of embarrassment or
 distress.
 
 'Father,' she began, 'Mr. Will and I have been talking things over.  We
 see that we have each made a mistake about our feelings, and he has
 agreed, at my request, to give up all idea of marriage, and be no more
 than my very good friend, as in the past.  You see, there is no shadow of
 a quarrel, and indeed I hope we shall see a great deal of him in the
 future, for his visits will always be welcome in our house.  Of course,
 father, you will know best, but perhaps we should do better to leave Mr.
 Will's house for the present.  I believe, after what has passed, we
 should hardly be agreeable inmates for some days.'
 
 Will, who had commanded himself with difficulty from the first, broke out
 upon this into an inarticulate noise, and raised one hand with an
 appearance of real dismay, as if he were about to interfere and
 contradict.  But she checked him at once looking up at him with a swift
 glance and an angry flush upon her cheek.
 
 'You will perhaps have the good grace,' she said, 'to let me explain
 these matters for myself.'
 
 Will was put entirely out of countenance by her expression and the ring
 of her voice.  He held his peace, concluding that there were some things
 about this girl beyond his comprehension, in which he was exactly right.
 
 The poor parson was quite crestfallen.  He tried to prove that this was
 no more than a true lovers' tiff, which would pass off before night; and
 when he was dislodged from that position, he went on to argue that where
 there was no quarrel there could be no call for a separation; for the
 good man liked both his entertainment and his host.  It was curious to
 see how the girl managed them, saying little all the time, and that very
 quietly, and yet twisting them round her finger and insensibly leading
 them wherever she would by feminine tact and generalship.  It scarcely
 seemed to have been her doing--it seemed as if things had merely so
 fallen out--that she and her father took their departure that same
 afternoon in a farm-cart, and went farther down the valley, to wait,
 until their own house was ready for them, in another hamlet.  But Will
 had been observing closely, and was well aware of her dexterity and
 resolution.  When he found himself alone he had a great many curious
 matters to turn over in his mind.  He was very sad and solitary, to begin
 with.  All the interest had gone out of his life, and he might look up at
 the stars as long as he pleased, he somehow failed to find support or
 consolation.  And then he was in such a turmoil of spirit about Marjory.
 He had been puzzled and irritated at her behaviour, and yet he could not
 keep himself from admiring it.  He thought he recognised a fine, perverse
 angel in that still soul which he had never hitherto suspected; and
 though he saw it was an influence that would fit but ill with his own
 life of artificial calm, he could not keep himself from ardently desiring
 to possess it.  Like a man who has lived among shadows and now meets the
 sun, he was both pained and delighted.
 
 As the days went forward he passed from one extreme to another; now
 pluming himself on the strength of his determination, now despising his
 timid and silly caution.  The former was, perhaps, the true thought of
 his heart, and represented the regular tenor of the man's reflections;
 but the latter burst forth from time to time with an unruly violence, and
 then he would forget all consideration, and go up and down his house and
 garden or walk among the fir-woods like one who is beside himself with
 remorse.  To equable, steady-minded Will this state of matters was
 intolerable; and he determined, at whatever cost, to bring it to an end.
 So, one warm summer afternoon he put on his best clothes, took a thorn
 switch in his hand, and set out down the valley by the river.  As soon as
 he had taken his determination, he had regained at a bound his customary
 peace of heart, and he enjoyed the bright weather and the variety of the
 scene without any admixture of alarm or unpleasant eagerness.  It was
 nearly the same to him how the matter turned out.  If she accepted him he
 would have to marry her this time, which perhaps was, all for the best.
 If she refused him, he would have done his utmost, and might follow his
 own way in the future with an untroubled conscience.  He hoped, on the
 whole, she would refuse him; and then, again, as he saw the brown roof
 which sheltered her, peeping through some willows at an angle of the
 stream, he was half inclined to reverse the wish, and more than half
 ashamed of himself for this infirmity of purpose.
 
 Marjory seemed glad to see him, and gave him her hand without affectation
 or delay.
 
 'I have been thinking about this marriage,' he began.
 
 'So have I,' she answered.  'And I respect you more and more for a very
 wise man.  You understood me better than I understood myself; and I am
 now quite certain that things are all for the best as they are.'
 
 'At the same time--,' ventured Will.
 
 'You must be tired,' she interrupted.  'Take a seat and let me fetch you
 a glass of wine.  The afternoon is so warm; and I wish you not to be
 displeased with your visit.  You must come quite often; once a week, if
 you can spare the time; I am always so glad to see my friends.'
 
 'O, very well,' thought Will to himself.  'It appears I was right after
 all.'  And he paid a very agreeable visit, walked home again in capital
 spirits, and gave himself no further concern about the matter.
 
 For nearly three years Will and Marjory continued on these terms, seeing
 each other once or twice a week without any word of love between them;
 and for all that time I believe Will was nearly as happy as a man can be.
 He rather stinted himself the pleasure of seeing her; and he would often
 walk half-way over to the parsonage, and then back again, as if to whet
 his appetite.  Indeed there was one corner of the road, whence he could
 see the church-spire wedged into a crevice of the valley between sloping
 firwoods, with a triangular snatch of plain by way of background, which
 he greatly affected as a place to sit and moralise in before returning
 homewards; and the peasants got so much into the habit of finding him
 there in the twilight that they gave it the name of 'Will o' the Mill's
 Corner.'
 
 At the end of the three years Marjory played him a sad trick by suddenly
 marrying somebody else.  Will kept his countenance bravely, and merely
 remarked that, for as little as he knew of women, he had acted very
 prudently in not marrying her himself three years before.  She plainly
 knew very little of her own mind, and, in spite of a deceptive manner,
 was as fickle and flighty as the rest of them.  He had to congratulate
 himself on an escape, he said, and would take a higher opinion of his own
 wisdom in consequence.  But at heart, he was reasonably displeased, moped
 a good deal for a month or two, and fell away in flesh, to the
 astonishment of his serving-lads.
 
 It was perhaps a year after this marriage that Will was awakened late one
 night by the sound of a horse galloping on the road, followed by
 precipitate knocking at the inn-door.  He opened his window and saw a
 farm servant, mounted and holding a led horse by the bridle, who told him
 to make what haste he could and go along with him; for Marjory was dying,
 and had sent urgently to fetch him to her bedside.  Will was no horseman,
 and made so little speed upon the way that the poor young wife was very
 near her end before he arrived.  But they had some minutes' talk in
 private, and he was present and wept very bitterly while she breathed her
 last.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.  DEATH
 
 
 Year after year went away into nothing, with great explosions and
 outcries in the cities on the plain: red revolt springing up and being
 suppressed in blood, battle swaying hither and thither, patient
 astronomers in observatory towers picking out and christening new stars,
 plays being performed in lighted theatres, people being carried into
 hospital on stretchers, and all the usual turmoil and agitation of men's
 lives in crowded centres.  Up in Will's valley only the winds and seasons
 made an epoch; the fish hung in the swift stream, the birds circled
 overhead, the pine-tops rustled underneath the stars, the tall hills
 stood over all; and Will went to and fro, minding his wayside inn, until
 the snow began to thicken on his head.  His heart was young and vigorous;
 and if his pulses kept a sober time, they still beat strong and steady in
 his wrists.  He carried a ruddy stain on either cheek, like a ripe apple;
 he stooped a little, but his step was still firm; and his sinewy hands
 were reached out to all men with a friendly pressure.  His face was
 covered with those wrinkles which are got in open air, and which rightly
 looked at, are no more than a sort of permanent sunburning; such wrinkles
 heighten the stupidity of stupid faces; but to a person like Will, with
 his clear eyes and smiling mouth, only give another charm by testifying
 to a simple and easy life.  His talk was full of wise sayings.  He had a
 taste for other people; and other people had a taste for him.  When the
 valley was full of tourists in the season, there were merry nights in
 Will's arbour; and his views, which seemed whimsical to his neighbours,
 were often enough admired by learned people out of towns and colleges.
 Indeed, he had a very noble old age, and grew daily better known; so that
 his fame was heard of in the cities of the plain; and young men who had
 been summer travellers spoke together in _cafes_ of Will o' the Mill and
 his rough philosophy.  Many and many an invitation, you may be sure, he
 had; but nothing could tempt him from his upland valley.  He would shake
 his head and smile over his tobacco-pipe with a deal of meaning.  'You
 come too late,' he would answer.  'I am a dead man now: I have lived and
 died already.  Fifty years ago you would have brought my heart into my
 mouth; and now you do not even tempt me.  But that is the object of long
 living, that man should cease to care about life.'  And again: 'There is
 only one difference between a long life and a good dinner: that, in the
 dinner, the sweets come last.'  Or once more: 'When I was a boy, I was a
 bit puzzled, and hardly knew whether it was myself or the world that was
 curious and worth looking into.  Now, I know it is myself, and stick to
 that.'
 
 He never showed any symptom of frailty, but kept stalwart and firm to the
 last; but they say he grew less talkative towards the end, and would
 listen to other people by the hour in an amused and sympathetic silence.
 Only, when he did speak, it was more to the point and more charged with
 old experience.  He drank a bottle of wine gladly; above all, at sunset
 on the hill-top or quite late at night under the stars in the arbour.  The
 sight of something attractive and unatttainable seasoned his enjoyment,
 he would say; and he professed he had lived long enough to admire a
 candle all the more when he could compare it with a planet.
 
 One night, in his seventy-second year, he awoke in bed in such uneasiness
 of body and mind that he arose and dressed himself and went out to
 meditate in the arbour.  It was pitch dark, without a star; the river was
 swollen, and the wet woods and meadows loaded the air with perfume.  It
 had thundered during the day, and it promised more thunder for the
 morrow.  A murky, stifling night for a man of seventy-two!  Whether it
 was the weather or the wakefulness, or some little touch of fever in his
 old limbs, Will's mind was besieged by tumultuous and crying memories.
 His boyhood, the night with the fat young man, the death of his adopted
 parents, the summer days with Marjory, and many of those small
 circumstances, which seem nothing to another, and are yet the very gist
 of a man's own life to himself--things seen, words heard, looks
 misconstrued--arose from their forgotten corners and usurped his
 attention.  The dead themselves were with him, not merely taking part in
 this thin show of memory that defiled before his brain, but revisiting
 his bodily senses as they do in profound and vivid dreams.  The fat young
 man leaned his elbows on the table opposite; Marjory came and went with
 an apronful of flowers between the garden and the arbour; he could hear
 the old parson knocking out his pipe or blowing his resonant nose.  The
 tide of his consciousness ebbed and flowed: he was sometimes half-asleep
 and drowned in his recollections of the past; and sometimes he was broad
 awake, wondering at himself.  But about the middle of the night he was
 startled by the voice of the dead miller calling to him out of the house
 as he used to do on the arrival of custom.  The hallucination was so
 perfect that Will sprang from his seat and stood listening for the
 summons to be repeated; and as he listened he became conscious of another
 noise besides the brawling of the river and the ringing in his feverish
 ears.  It was like the stir of horses and the creaking of harness, as
 though a carriage with an impatient team had been brought up upon the
 road before the courtyard gate.  At such an hour, upon this rough and
 dangerous pass, the supposition was no better than absurd; and Will
 dismissed it from his mind, and resumed his seat upon the arbour chair;
 and sleep closed over him again like running water.  He was once again
 awakened by the dead miller's call, thinner and more spectral than
 before; and once again he heard the noise of an equipage upon the road.
 And so thrice and four times, the same dream, or the same fancy,
 presented itself to his senses: until at length, smiling to himself as
 when one humours a nervous child, he proceeded towards the gate to set
 his uncertainty at rest.
 
 From the arbour to the gate was no great distance, and yet it took Will
 some time; it seemed as if the dead thickened around him in the court,
 and crossed his path at every step.  For, first, he was suddenly
 surprised by an overpowering sweetness of heliotropes; it was as if his
 garden had been planted with this flower from end to end, and the hot,
 damp night had drawn forth all their perfumes in a breath.  Now the
 heliotrope had been Marjory's favourite flower, and since her death not
 one of them had ever been planted in Will's ground.
 
 'I must be going crazy,' he thought.  'Poor Marjory and her heliotropes!'
 
 And with that he raised his eyes towards the window that had once been
 hers.  If he had been bewildered before, he was now almost terrified; for
 there was a light in the room; the window was an orange oblong as of
 yore; and the corner of the blind was lifted and let fall as on the night
 when he stood and shouted to the stars in his perplexity.  The illusion
 only endured an instant; but it left him somewhat unmanned, rubbing his
 eyes and staring at the outline of the house and the black night behind
 it.  While he thus stood, and it seemed as if he must have stood there
 quite a long time, there came a renewal of the noises on the road: and he
 turned in time to meet a stranger, who was advancing to meet him across
 the court.  There was something like the outline of a great carriage
 discernible on the road behind the stranger, and, above that, a few black
 pine-tops, like so many plumes.
 
 'Master Will?' asked the new-comer, in brief military fashion.
 
 'That same, sir,' answered Will.  'Can I do anything to serve you?'
 
 'I have heard you much spoken of, Master Will,' returned the other; 'much
 spoken of, and well.  And though I have both hands full of business, I
 wish to drink a bottle of wine with you in your arbour.  Before I go, I
 shall introduce myself.'
 
 Will led the way to the trellis, and got a lamp lighted and a bottle
 uncorked.  He was not altogether unused to such complimentary interviews,
 and hoped little enough from this one, being schooled by many
 disappointments.  A sort of cloud had settled on his wits and prevented
 him from remembering the strangeness of the hour.  He moved like a person
 in his sleep; and it seemed as if the lamp caught fire and the bottle
 came uncorked with the facility of thought.  Still, he had some curiosity
 about the appearance of his visitor, and tried in vain to turn the light
 into his face; either he handled the lamp clumsily, or there was a
 dimness over his eyes; but he could make out little more than a shadow at
 table with him.  He stared and stared at this shadow, as he wiped out the
 glasses, and began to feel cold and strange about the heart.  The silence
 weighed upon him, for he could hear nothing now, not even the river, but
 the drumming of his own arteries in his ears.
 
 'Here's to you,' said the stranger, roughly.
 
 'Here is my service, sir,' replied Will, sipping his wine, which somehow
 tasted oddly.
 
 'I understand you are a very positive fellow,' pursued the stranger.
 
 Will made answer with a smile of some satisfaction and a little nod.
 
 'So am I,' continued the other; 'and it is the delight of my heart to
 tramp on people's corns.  I will have nobody positive but myself; not
 one.  I have crossed the whims, in my time, of kings and generals and
 great artists.  And what would you say,' he went on, 'if I had come up
 here on purpose to cross yours?'
 
 Will had it on his tongue to make a sharp rejoinder; but the politeness
 of an old innkeeper prevailed; and he held his peace and made answer with
 a civil gesture of the hand.
 
 'I have,' said the stranger.  'And if I did not hold you in a particular
 esteem, I should make no words about the matter.  It appears you pride
 yourself on staying where you are.  You mean to stick by your inn.  Now I
 mean you shall come for a turn with me in my barouche; and before this
 bottle's empty, so you shall.'
 
 'That would be an odd thing, to be sure,' replied Will, with a chuckle.
 'Why, sir, I have grown here like an old oak-tree; the Devil himself
 could hardly root me up: and for all I perceive you are a very
 entertaining old gentleman, I would wager you another bottle you lose
 your pains with me.'
 
 The dimness of Will's eyesight had been increasing all this while; but he
 was somehow conscious of a sharp and chilling scrutiny which irritated
 and yet overmastered him.
 
 'You need not think,' he broke out suddenly, in an explosive, febrile
 manner that startled and alarmed himself, 'that I am a stay-at-home,
 because I fear anything under God.  God knows I am tired enough of it
 all; and when the time comes for a longer journey than ever you dream of,
 I reckon I shall find myself prepared.'
 
 The stranger emptied his glass and pushed it away from him.  He looked
 down for a little, and then, leaning over the table, tapped Will three
 times upon the forearm with a single finger.  'The time has come!' he
 said solemnly.
 
 An ugly thrill spread from the spot he touched.  The tones of his voice
 were dull and startling, and echoed strangely in Will's heart.
 
 'I beg your pardon,' he said, with some discomposure.  'What do you
 mean?'
 
 'Look at me, and you will find your eyesight swim.  Raise your hand; it
 is dead-heavy.  This is your last bottle of wine, Master Will, and your
 last night upon the earth.'
 
 'You are a doctor?' quavered Will.
 
 'The best that ever was,' replied the other; 'for I cure both mind and
 body with the same prescription.  I take away all pain and I forgive all
 sins; and where my patients have gone wrong in life, I smooth out all
 complications and set them free again upon their feet.'
 
 'I have no need of you,' said Will.
 
 'A time comes for all men, Master Will,' replied the doctor, 'when the
 helm is taken out of their hands.  For you, because you were prudent and
 quiet, it has been long of coming, and you have had long to discipline
 yourself for its reception.  You have seen what is to be seen about your
 mill; you have sat close all your days like a hare in its form; but now
 that is at an end; and,' added the doctor, getting on his feet, 'you must
 arise and come with me.'
 
 'You are a strange physician,' said Will, looking steadfastly upon his
 guest.
 
 'I am a natural law,' he replied, 'and people call me Death.'
 
 'Why did you not tell me so at first?' cried Will.  'I have been waiting
 for you these many years.  Give me your hand, and welcome.'
 
 'Lean upon my arm,' said the stranger, 'for already your strength abates.
 Lean on me as heavily as you need; for though I am old, I am very strong.
 It is but three steps to my carriage, and there all your trouble ends.
 Why, Will,' he added, 'I have been yearning for you as if you were my own
 son; and of all the men that ever I came for in my long days, I have come
 for you most gladly.  I am caustic, and sometimes offend people at first
 sight; but I am a good friend at heart to such as you.'
 
 'Since Marjory was taken,' returned Will, 'I declare before God you were
 the only friend I had to look for.'  So the pair went arm-in-arm across
 the courtyard.
 
 One of the servants awoke about this time and heard the noise of horses
 pawing before he dropped asleep again; all down the valley that night
 there was a rushing as of a smooth and steady wind descending towards the
 plain; and when the world rose next morning, sure enough Will o' the Mill
 had gone at last upon his travels.
 
 
 
 
 MARKHEIM
 
 
 'Yes,' said the dealer, 'our windfalls are of various kinds.  Some
 customers are ignorant, and then I touch a dividend on my superior
 knowledge.  Some are dishonest,' and here he held up the candle, so that
 the light fell strongly on his visitor, 'and in that case,' he continued,
 'I profit by my virtue.'
 
 Markheim had but just entered from the daylight streets, and his eyes had
 not yet grown familiar with the mingled shine and darkness in the shop.
 At these pointed words, and before the near presence of the flame, he
 blinked painfully and looked aside.
 
 The dealer chuckled.  'You come to me on Christmas Day,' he resumed,
 'when you know that I am alone in my house, put up my shutters, and make
 a point of refusing business.  Well, you will have to pay for that; you
 will have to pay for my loss of time, when I should be balancing my
 books; you will have to pay, besides, for a kind of manner that I remark
 in you to-day very strongly.  I am the essence of discretion, and ask no
 awkward questions; but when a customer cannot look me in the eye, he has
 to pay for it.'  The dealer once more chuckled; and then, changing to his
 usual business voice, though still with a note of irony, 'You can give,
 as usual, a clear account of how you came into the possession of the
 object?' he continued.  'Still your uncle's cabinet?  A remarkable
 collector, sir!'
 
 And the little pale, round-shouldered dealer stood almost on tip-toe,
 looking over the top of his gold spectacles, and nodding his head with
 every mark of disbelief.  Markheim returned his gaze with one of infinite
 pity, and a touch of horror.
 
 'This time,' said he, 'you are in error.  I have not come to sell, but to
 buy.  I have no curios to dispose of; my uncle's cabinet is bare to the
 wainscot; even were it still intact, I have done well on the Stock
 Exchange, and should more likely add to it than otherwise, and my errand
 to-day is simplicity itself.  I seek a Christmas present for a lady,' he
 continued, waxing more fluent as he struck into the speech he had
 prepared; 'and certainly I owe you every excuse for thus disturbing you
 upon so small a matter.  But the thing was neglected yesterday; I must
 produce my little compliment at dinner; and, as you very well know, a
 rich marriage is not a thing to be neglected.'
 
 There followed a pause, during which the dealer seemed to weigh this
 statement incredulously.  The ticking of many clocks among the curious
 lumber of the shop, and the faint rushing of the cabs in a near
 thoroughfare, filled up the interval of silence.
 
 'Well, sir,' said the dealer, 'be it so.  You are an old customer after
 all; and if, as you say, you have the chance of a good marriage, far be
 it from me to be an obstacle.  Here is a nice thing for a lady now,' he
 went on, 'this hand glass--fifteenth century, warranted; comes from a
 good collection, too; but I reserve the name, in the interests of my
 customer, who was just like yourself, my dear sir, the nephew and sole
 heir of a remarkable collector.'
 
 The dealer, while he thus ran on in his dry and biting voice, had stooped
 to take the object from its place; and, as he had done so, a shock had
 passed through Markheim, a start both of hand and foot, a sudden leap of
 many tumultuous passions to the face.  It passed as swiftly as it came,
 and left no trace beyond a certain trembling of the hand that now
 received the glass.
 
 'A glass,' he said hoarsely, and then paused, and repeated it more
 clearly.  'A glass?  For Christmas?  Surely not?'
 
 'And why not?' cried the dealer.  'Why not a glass?'
 
 Markheim was looking upon him with an indefinable expression.  'You ask
 me why not?' he said.  'Why, look here--look in it--look at yourself!  Do
 you like to see it?  No! nor I--nor any man.'
 
 The little man had jumped back when Markheim had so suddenly confronted
 him with the mirror; but now, perceiving there was nothing worse on hand,
 he chuckled.  'Your future lady, sir, must be pretty hard favoured,' said
 he.
 
 'I ask you,' said Markheim, 'for a Christmas present, and you give me
 this--this damned reminder of years, and sins and follies--this
 hand-conscience!  Did you mean it?  Had you a thought in your mind?  Tell
 me.  It will be better for you if you do.  Come, tell me about yourself.
 I hazard a guess now, that you are in secret a very charitable man?'
 
 The dealer looked closely at his companion.  It was very odd, Markheim
 did not appear to be laughing; there was something in his face like an
 eager sparkle of hope, but nothing of mirth.
 
 'What are you driving at?' the dealer asked.
 
 'Not charitable?' returned the other, gloomily.  Not charitable; not
 pious; not scrupulous; unloving, unbeloved; a hand to get money, a safe
 to keep it.  Is that all?  Dear God, man, is that all?'
 
 'I will tell you what it is,' began the dealer, with some sharpness, and
 then broke off again into a chuckle.  'But I see this is a love match of
 yours, and you have been drinking the lady's health.'
 
 'Ah!' cried Markheim, with a strange curiosity.  'Ah, have you been in
 love?  Tell me about that.'
 
 'I,' cried the dealer.  'I in love!  I never had the time, nor have I the
 time to-day for all this nonsense.  Will you take the glass?'
 
 'Where is the hurry?' returned Markheim.  'It is very pleasant to stand
 here talking; and life is so short and insecure that I would not hurry
 away from any pleasure--no, not even from so mild a one as this.  We
 should rather cling, cling to what little we can get, like a man at a
 cliff's edge.  Every second is a cliff, if you think upon it--a cliff a
 mile high--high enough, if we fall, to dash us out of every feature of
 humanity.  Hence it is best to talk pleasantly.  Let us talk of each
 other: why should we wear this mask?  Let us be confidential.  Who knows,
 we might become friends?'
 
 'I have just one word to say to you,' said the dealer.  'Either make your
 purchase, or walk out of my shop!'
 
 'True true,' said Markheim.  'Enough, fooling.  To business.  Show me
 something else.'
 
 The dealer stooped once more, this time to replace the glass upon the
 shelf, his thin blond hair falling over his eyes as he did so.  Markheim
 moved a little nearer, with one hand in the pocket of his greatcoat; he
 drew himself up and filled his lungs; at the same time many different
 emotions were depicted together on his face--terror, horror, and resolve,
 fascination and a physical repulsion; and through a haggard lift of his
 upper lip, his teeth looked out.
 
 'This, perhaps, may suit,' observed the dealer: and then, as he began to
 re-arise, Markheim bounded from behind upon his victim.  The long,
 skewerlike dagger flashed and fell.  The dealer struggled like a hen,
 striking his temple on the shelf, and then tumbled on the floor in a
 heap.
 
 Time had some score of small voices in that shop, some stately and slow
 as was becoming to their great age; others garrulous and hurried.  All
 these told out the seconds in an intricate, chorus of tickings.  Then the
 passage of a lad's feet, heavily running on the pavement, broke in upon
 these smaller voices and startled Markheim into the consciousness of his
 surroundings.  He looked about him awfully.  The candle stood on the
 counter, its flame solemnly wagging in a draught; and by that
 inconsiderable movement, the whole room was filled with noiseless bustle
 and kept heaving like a sea: the tall shadows nodding, the gross blots of
 darkness swelling and dwindling as with respiration, the faces of the
 portraits and the china gods changing and wavering like images in water.
 The inner door stood ajar, and peered into that leaguer of shadows with a
 long slit of daylight like a pointing finger.
 
 From these fear-stricken rovings, Markheim's eyes returned to the body of
 his victim, where it lay both humped and sprawling, incredibly small and
 strangely meaner than in life.  In these poor, miserly clothes, in that
 ungainly attitude, the dealer lay like so much sawdust.  Markheim had
 feared to see it, and, lo! it was nothing.  And yet, as he gazed, this
 bundle of old clothes and pool of blood began to find eloquent voices.
 There it must lie; there was none to work the cunning hinges or direct
 the miracle of locomotion--there it must lie till it was found.  Found!
 ay, and then?  Then would this dead flesh lift up a cry that would ring
 over England, and fill the world with the echoes of pursuit.  Ay, dead or
 not, this was still the enemy.  'Time was that when the brains were out,'
 he thought; and the first word struck into his mind.  Time, now that the
 deed was accomplished--time, which had closed for the victim, had become
 instant and momentous for the slayer.
 
 The thought was yet in his mind, when, first one and then another, with
 every variety of pace and voice--one deep as the bell from a cathedral
 turret, another ringing on its treble notes the prelude of a waltz-the
 clocks began to strike the hour of three in the afternoon.
 
 The sudden outbreak of so many tongues in that dumb chamber staggered
 him.  He began to bestir himself, going to and fro with the candle,
 beleaguered by moving shadows, and startled to the soul by chance
 reflections.  In many rich mirrors, some of home design, some from Venice
 or Amsterdam, he saw his face repeated and repeated, as it were an army
 of spies; his own eyes met and detected him; and the sound of his own
 steps, lightly as they fell, vexed the surrounding quiet.  And still, as
 he continued to fill his pockets, his mind accused him with a sickening
 iteration, of the thousand faults of his design.  He should have chosen a
 more quiet hour; he should have prepared an alibi; he should not have
 used a knife; he should have been more cautious, and only bound and
 gagged the dealer, and not killed him; he should have been more bold, and
 killed the servant also; he should have done all things otherwise:
 poignant regrets, weary, incessant toiling of the mind to change what was
 unchangeable, to plan what was now useless, to be the architect of the
 irrevocable past.  Meanwhile, and behind all this activity, brute
 terrors, like the scurrying of rats in a deserted attic, filled the more
 remote chambers of his brain with riot; the hand of the constable would
 fall heavy on his shoulder, and his nerves would jerk like a hooked fish;
 or he beheld, in galloping defile, the dock, the prison, the gallows, and
 the black coffin.
 
 Terror of the people in the street sat down before his mind like a
 besieging army.  It was impossible, he thought, but that some rumour of
 the struggle must have reached their ears and set on edge their
 curiosity; and now, in all the neighbouring houses, he divined them
 sitting motionless and with uplifted ear--solitary people, condemned to
 spend Christmas dwelling alone on memories of the past, and now
 startingly recalled from that tender exercise; happy family parties
 struck into silence round the table, the mother still with raised finger:
 every degree and age and humour, but all, by their own hearths, prying
 and hearkening and weaving the rope that was to hang him.  Sometimes it
 seemed to him he could not move too softly; the clink of the tall
 Bohemian goblets rang out loudly like a bell; and alarmed by the bigness
 of the ticking, he was tempted to stop the clocks.  And then, again, with
 a swift transition of his terrors, the very silence of the place appeared
 a source of peril, and a thing to strike and freeze the passer-by; and he
 would step more boldly, and bustle aloud among the contents of the shop,
 and imitate, with elaborate bravado, the movements of a busy man at ease
 in his own house.
 
 But he was now so pulled about by different alarms that, while one
 portion of his mind was still alert and cunning, another trembled on the
 brink of lunacy.  One hallucination in particular took a strong hold on
 his credulity.  The neighbour hearkening with white face beside his
 window, the passer-by arrested by a horrible surmise on the
 pavement--these could at worst suspect, they could not know; through the
 brick walls and shuttered windows only sounds could penetrate.  But here,
 within the house, was he alone?  He knew he was; he had watched the
 servant set forth sweet-hearting, in her poor best, 'out for the day'
 written in every ribbon and smile.  Yes, he was alone, of course; and
 yet, in the bulk of empty house above him, he could surely hear a stir of
 delicate footing--he was surely conscious, inexplicably conscious of some
 presence.  Ay, surely; to every room and corner of the house his
 imagination followed it; and now it was a faceless thing, and yet had
 eyes to see with; and again it was a shadow of himself; and yet again
 behold the image of the dead dealer, reinspired with cunning and hatred.
 
 At times, with a strong effort, he would glance at the open door which
 still seemed to repel his eyes.  The house was tall, the skylight small
 and dirty, the day blind with fog; and the light that filtered down to
 the ground story was exceedingly faint, and showed dimly on the threshold
 of the shop.  And yet, in that strip of doubtful brightness, did there
 not hang wavering a shadow?
 
 Suddenly, from the street outside, a very jovial gentleman began to beat
 with a staff on the shop-door, accompanying his blows with shouts and
 railleries in which the dealer was continually called upon by name.
 Markheim, smitten into ice, glanced at the dead man.  But no! he lay
 quite still; he was fled away far beyond earshot of these blows and
 shoutings; he was sunk beneath seas of silence; and his name, which would
 once have caught his notice above the howling of a storm, had become an
 empty sound.  And presently the jovial gentleman desisted from his
 knocking, and departed.
 
 Here was a broad hint to hurry what remained to be done, to get forth
 from this accusing neighbourhood, to plunge into a bath of London
 multitudes, and to reach, on the other side of day, that haven of safety
 and apparent innocence--his bed.  One visitor had come: at any moment
 another might follow and be more obstinate.  To have done the deed, and
 yet not to reap the profit, would be too abhorrent a failure.  The money,
 that was now Markheim's concern; and as a means to that, the keys.
 
 He glanced over his shoulder at the open door, where the shadow was still
 lingering and shivering; and with no conscious repugnance of the mind,
 yet with a tremor of the belly, he drew near the body of his victim.  The
 human character had quite departed.  Like a suit half-stuffed with bran,
 the limbs lay scattered, the trunk doubled, on the floor; and yet the
 thing repelled him.  Although so dingy and inconsiderable to the eye, he
 feared it might have more significance to the touch.  He took the body by
 the shoulders, and turned it on its back.  It was strangely light and
 supple, and the limbs, as if they had been broken, fell into the oddest
 postures.  The face was robbed of all expression; but it was as pale as
 wax, and shockingly smeared with blood about one temple.  That was, for
 Markheim, the one displeasing circumstance.  It carried him back, upon
 the instant, to a certain fair-day in a fishers' village: a gray day, a
 piping wind, a crowd upon the street, the blare of brasses, the booming
 of drums, the nasal voice of a ballad singer; and a boy going to and fro,
 buried over head in the crowd and divided between interest and fear,
 until, coming out upon the chief place of concourse, he beheld a booth
 and a great screen with pictures, dismally designed, garishly coloured:
 Brown-rigg with her apprentice; the Mannings with their murdered guest;
 Weare in the death-grip of Thurtell; and a score besides of famous
 crimes.  The thing was as clear as an illusion; he was once again that
 little boy; he was looking once again, and with the same sense of
 physical revolt, at these vile pictures; he was still stunned by the
 thumping of the drums.  A bar of that day's music returned upon his
 memory; and at that, for the first time, a qualm came over him, a breath
 of nausea, a sudden weakness of the joints, which he must instantly
 resist and conquer.
 
 He judged it more prudent to confront than to flee from these
 considerations; looking the more hardily in the dead face, bending his
 mind to realise the nature and greatness of his crime.  So little a while
 ago that face had moved with every change of sentiment, that pale mouth
 had spoken, that body had been all on fire with governable energies; and
 now, and by his act, that piece of life had been arrested, as the
 horologist, with interjected finger, arrests the beating of the clock.  So
 he reasoned in vain; he could rise to no more remorseful consciousness;
 the same heart which had shuddered before the painted effigies of crime,
 looked on its reality unmoved.  At best, he felt a gleam of pity for one
 who had been endowed in vain with all those faculties that can make the
 world a garden of enchantment, one who had never lived and who was now
 dead.  But of penitence, no, not a tremor.
 
 With that, shaking himself clear of these considerations, he found the
 keys and advanced towards the open door of the shop.  Outside, it had
 begun to rain smartly; and the sound of the shower upon the roof had
 banished silence.  Like some dripping cavern, the chambers of the house
 were haunted by an incessant echoing, which filled the ear and mingled
 with the ticking of the clocks.  And, as Markheim approached the door, he
 seemed to hear, in answer to his own cautious tread, the steps of another
 foot withdrawing up the stair.  The shadow still palpitated loosely on
 the threshold.  He threw a ton's weight of resolve upon his muscles, and
 drew back the door.
 
 The faint, foggy daylight glimmered dimly on the bare floor and stairs;
 on the bright suit of armour posted, halbert in hand, upon the landing;
 and on the dark wood-carvings, and framed pictures that hung against the
 yellow panels of the wainscot.  So loud was the beating of the rain
 through all the house that, in Markheim's ears, it began to be
 distinguished into many different sounds.  Footsteps and sighs, the tread
 of regiments marching in the distance, the chink of money in the
 counting, and the creaking of doors held stealthily ajar, appeared to
 mingle with the patter of the drops upon the cupola and the gushing of
 the water in the pipes.  The sense that he was not alone grew upon him to
 the verge of madness.  On every side he was haunted and begirt by
 presences.  He heard them moving in the upper chambers; from the shop, he
 heard the dead man getting to his legs; and as he began with a great
 effort to mount the stairs, feet fled quietly before him and followed
 stealthily behind.  If he were but deaf, he thought, how tranquilly he
 would possess his soul!  And then again, and hearkening with ever fresh
 attention, he blessed himself for that unresting sense which held the
 outposts and stood a trusty sentinel upon his life.  His head turned
 continually on his neck; his eyes, which seemed starting from their
 orbits, scouted on every side, and on every side were half-rewarded as
 with the tail of something nameless vanishing.  The four-and-twenty steps
 to the first floor were four-and-twenty agonies.
 
 On that first storey, the doors stood ajar, three of them like three
 ambushes, shaking his nerves like the throats of cannon.  He could never
 again, he felt, be sufficiently immured and fortified from men's
 observing eyes, he longed to be home, girt in by walls, buried among
 bedclothes, and invisible to all but God.  And at that thought he
 wondered a little, recollecting tales of other murderers and the fear
 they were said to entertain of heavenly avengers.  It was not so, at
 least, with him.  He feared the laws of nature, lest, in their callous
 and immutable procedure, they should preserve some damning evidence of
 his crime.  He feared tenfold more, with a slavish, superstitions terror,
 some scission in the continuity of man's experience, some wilful
 illegality of nature.  He played a game of skill, depending on the rules,
 calculating consequence from cause; and what if nature, as the defeated
 tyrant overthrew the chess-board, should break the mould of their
 succession?  The like had befallen Napoleon (so writers said) when the
 winter changed the time of its appearance.  The like might befall
 Markheim: the solid walls might become transparent and reveal his doings
 like those of bees in a glass hive; the stout planks might yield under
 his foot like quicksands and detain him in their clutch; ay, and there
 were soberer accidents that might destroy him: if, for instance, the
 house should fall and imprison him beside the body of his victim; or the
 house next door should fly on fire, and the firemen invade him from all
 sides.  These things he feared; and, in a sense, these things might be
 called the hands of God reached forth against sin.  But about God himself
 he was at ease; his act was doubtless exceptional, but so were his
 excuses, which God knew; it was there, and not among men, that he felt
 sure of justice.
 
 When he had got safe into the drawing-room, and shut the door behind him,
 he was aware of a respite from alarms.  The room was quite dismantled,
 uncarpeted besides, and strewn with packing cases and incongruous
 furniture; several great pier-glasses, in which he beheld himself at
 various angles, like an actor on a stage; many pictures, framed and
 unframed, standing, with their faces to the wall; a fine Sheraton
 sideboard, a cabinet of marquetry, and a great old bed, with tapestry
 hangings.  The windows opened to the floor; but by great good fortune the
 lower part of the shutters had been closed, and this concealed him from
 the neighbours.  Here, then, Markheim drew in a packing case before the
 cabinet, and began to search among the keys.  It was a long business, for
 there were many; and it was irksome, besides; for, after all, there might
 be nothing in the cabinet, and time was on the wing.  But the closeness
 of the occupation sobered him.  With the tail of his eye he saw the
 door--even glanced at it from time to time directly, like a besieged
 commander pleased to verify the good estate of his defences.  But in
 truth he was at peace.  The rain falling in the street sounded natural
 and pleasant.  Presently, on the other side, the notes of a piano were
 wakened to the music of a hymn, and the voices of many children took up
 the air and words.  How stately, how comfortable was the melody!  How
 fresh the youthful voices!  Markheim gave ear to it smilingly, as he
 sorted out the keys; and his mind was thronged with answerable ideas and
 images; church-going children and the pealing of the high organ; children
 afield, bathers by the brookside, ramblers on the brambly common, kite-
 flyers in the windy and cloud-navigated sky; and then, at another cadence
 of the hymn, back again to church, and the somnolence of summer Sundays,
 and the high genteel voice of the parson (which he smiled a little to
 recall) and the painted Jacobean tombs, and the dim lettering of the Ten
 Commandments in the chancel.
 
 And as he sat thus, at once busy and absent, he was startled to his feet.
 A flash of ice, a flash of fire, a bursting gush of blood, went over him,
 and then he stood transfixed and thrilling.  A step mounted the stair
 slowly and steadily, and presently a hand was laid upon the knob, and the
 lock clicked, and the door opened.
 
 Fear held Markheim in a vice.  What to expect he knew not, whether the
 dead man walking, or the official ministers of human justice, or some
 chance witness blindly stumbling in to consign him to the gallows.  But
 when a face was thrust into the aperture, glanced round the room, looked
 at him, nodded and smiled as if in friendly recognition, and then
 withdrew again, and the door closed behind it, his fear broke loose from
 his control in a hoarse cry.  At the sound of this the visitant returned.
 
 'Did you call me?' he asked, pleasantly, and with that he entered the
 room and closed the door behind him.
 
 Markheim stood and gazed at him with all his eyes.  Perhaps there was a
 film upon his sight, but the outlines of the new comer seemed to change
 and waver like those of the idols in the wavering candle-light of the
 shop; and at times he thought he knew him; and at times he thought he
 bore a likeness to himself; and always, like a lump of living terror,
 there lay in his bosom the conviction that this thing was not of the
 earth and not of God.
 
 And yet the creature had a strange air of the commonplace, as he stood
 looking on Markheim with a smile; and when he added: 'You are looking for
 the money, I believe?' it was in the tones of everyday politeness.
 
 Markheim made no answer.
 
 'I should warn you,' resumed the other, 'that the maid has left her
 sweetheart earlier than usual and will soon be here.  If Mr. Markheim be
 found in this house, I need not describe to him the consequences.'
 
 'You know me?' cried the murderer.
 
 The visitor smiled.  'You have long been a favourite of mine,' he said;
 'and I have long observed and often sought to help you.'
 
 'What are you?' cried Markheim: 'the devil?'
 
 'What I may be,' returned the other, 'cannot affect the service I propose
 to render you.'
 
 'It can,' cried Markheim; 'it does!  Be helped by you?  No, never; not by
 you!  You do not know me yet; thank God, you do not know me!'
 
 'I know you,' replied the visitant, with a sort of kind severity or
 rather firmness.  'I know you to the soul.'
 
 'Know me!' cried Markheim.  'Who can do so?  My life is but a travesty
 and slander on myself.  I have lived to belie my nature.  All men do; all
 men are better than this disguise that grows about and stifles them.  You
 see each dragged away by life, like one whom bravos have seized and
 muffled in a cloak.  If they had their own control--if you could see
 their faces, they would be altogether different, they would shine out for
 heroes and saints!  I am worse than most; myself is more overlaid; my
 excuse is known to me and God.  But, had I the time, I could disclose
 myself.'
 
 'To me?' inquired the visitant.
 
 'To you before all,' returned the murderer.  'I supposed you were
 intelligent.  I thought--since you exist--you would prove a reader of the
 heart.  And yet you would propose to judge me by my acts!  Think of it;
 my acts!  I was born and I have lived in a land of giants; giants have
 dragged me by the wrists since I was born out of my mother--the giants of
 circumstance.  And you would judge me by my acts!  But can you not look
 within?  Can you not understand that evil is hateful to me?  Can you not
 see within me the clear writing of conscience, never blurred by any
 wilful sophistry, although too often disregarded?  Can you not read me
 for a thing that surely must be common as humanity--the unwilling
 sinner?'
 
 'All this is very feelingly expressed,' was the reply, 'but it regards me
 not.  These points of consistency are beyond my province, and I care not
 in the least by what compulsion you may have been dragged away, so as you
 are but carried in the right direction.  But time flies; the servant
 delays, looking in the faces of the crowd and at the pictures on the
 hoardings, but still she keeps moving nearer; and remember, it is as if
 the gallows itself was striding towards you through the Christmas
 streets!  Shall I help you; I, who know all?  Shall I tell you where to
 find the money?'
 
 'For what price?' asked Markheim.
 
 'I offer you the service for a Christmas gift,' returned the other.
 
 Markheim could not refrain from smiling with a kind of bitter triumph.
 'No,' said he, 'I will take nothing at your hands; if I were dying of
 thirst, and it was your hand that put the pitcher to my lips, I should
 find the courage to refuse.  It may be credulous, but I will do nothing
 to commit myself to evil.'
 
 'I have no objection to a death-bed repentance,' observed the visitant.
 
 'Because you disbelieve their efficacy!' Markheim cried.
 
 'I do not say so,' returned the other; 'but I look on these things from a
 different side, and when the life is done my interest falls.  The man has
 lived to serve me, to spread black looks under colour of religion, or to
 sow tares in the wheat-field, as you do, in a course of weak compliance
 with desire.  Now that he draws so near to his deliverance, he can add
 but one act of service--to repent, to die smiling, and thus to build up
 in confidence and hope the more timorous of my surviving followers.  I am
 not so hard a master.  Try me.  Accept my help.  Please yourself in life
 as you have done hitherto; please yourself more amply, spread your elbows
 at the board; and when the night begins to fall and the curtains to be
 drawn, I tell you, for your greater comfort, that you will find it even
 easy to compound your quarrel with your conscience, and to make a
 truckling peace with God.  I came but now from such a deathbed, and the
 room was full of sincere mourners, listening to the man's last words: and
 when I looked into that face, which had been set as a flint against
 mercy, I found it smiling with hope.'
 
 'And do you, then, suppose me such a creature?' asked Markheim.  'Do you
 think I have no more generous aspirations than to sin, and sin, and sin,
 and, at the last, sneak into heaven?  My heart rises at the thought.  Is
 this, then, your experience of mankind? or is it because you find me with
 red hands that you presume such baseness? and is this crime of murder
 indeed so impious as to dry up the very springs of good?'
 
 'Murder is to me no special category,' replied the other.  'All sins are
 murder, even as all life is war.  I behold your race, like starving
 mariners on a raft, plucking crusts out of the hands of famine and
 feeding on each other's lives.  I follow sins beyond the moment of their
 acting; I find in all that the last consequence is death; and to my eyes,
 the pretty maid who thwarts her mother with such taking graces on a
 question of a ball, drips no less visibly with human gore than such a
 murderer as yourself.  Do I say that I follow sins?  I follow virtues
 also; they differ not by the thickness of a nail, they are both scythes
 for the reaping angel of Death.  Evil, for which I live, consists not in
 action but in character.  The bad man is dear to me; not the bad act,
 whose fruits, if we could follow them far enough down the hurtling
 cataract of the ages, might yet be found more blessed than those of the
 rarest virtues.  And it is not because you have killed a dealer, but
 because you are Markheim, that I offer to forward your escape.'
 
 'I will lay my heart open to you,' answered Markheim.  'This crime on
 which you find me is my last.  On my way to it I have learned many
 lessons; itself is a lesson, a momentous lesson.  Hitherto I have been
 driven with revolt to what I would not; I was a bond-slave to poverty,
 driven and scourged.  There are robust virtues that can stand in these
 temptations; mine was not so: I had a thirst of pleasure.  But to-day,
 and out of this deed, I pluck both warning and riches--both the power and
 a fresh resolve to be myself.  I become in all things a free actor in the
 world; I begin to see myself all changed, these hands the agents of good,
 this heart at peace.  Something comes over me out of the past; something
 of what I have dreamed on Sabbath evenings to the sound of the church
 organ, of what I forecast when I shed tears over noble books, or talked,
 an innocent child, with my mother.  There lies my life; I have wandered a
 few years, but now I see once more my city of destination.'
 
 'You are to use this money on the Stock Exchange, I think?' remarked the
 visitor; 'and there, if I mistake not, you have already lost some
 thousands?'
 
 'Ah,' said Markheim, 'but this time I have a sure thing.'
 
 'This time, again, you will lose,' replied the visitor quietly.
 
 'Ah, but I keep back the half!' cried Markheim.
 
 'That also you will lose,' said the other.
 
 The sweat started upon Markheim's brow.  'Well, then, what matter?' he
 exclaimed.  'Say it be lost, say I am plunged again in poverty, shall one
 part of me, and that the worse, continue until the end to override the
 better?  Evil and good run strong in me, haling me both ways.  I do not
 love the one thing, I love all.  I can conceive great deeds,
 renunciations, martyrdoms; and though I be fallen to such a crime as
 murder, pity is no stranger to my thoughts.  I pity the poor; who knows
 their trials better than myself?  I pity and help them; I prize love, I
 love honest laughter; there is no good thing nor true thing on earth but
 I love it from my heart.  And are my vices only to direct my life, and my
 virtues to lie without effect, like some passive lumber of the mind?  Not
 so; good, also, is a spring of acts.'
 
 But the visitant raised his finger.  'For six-and-thirty years that you
 have been in this world,' said be, 'through many changes of fortune and
 varieties of humour, I have watched you steadily fall.  Fifteen years ago
 you would have started at a theft.  Three years back you would have
 blenched at the name of murder.  Is there any crime, is there any cruelty
 or meanness, from which you still recoil?--five years from now I shall
 detect you in the fact!  Downward, downward, lies your way; nor can
 anything but death avail to stop you.'
 
 'It is true,' Markheim said huskily, 'I have in some degree complied with
 evil.  But it is so with all: the very saints, in the mere exercise of
 living, grow less dainty, and take on the tone of their surroundings.'
 
 'I will propound to you one simple question,' said the other; 'and as you
 answer, I shall read to you your moral horoscope.  You have grown in many
 things more lax; possibly you do right to be so--and at any account, it
 is the same with all men.  But granting that, are you in any one
 particular, however trifling, more difficult to please with your own
 conduct, or do you go in all things with a looser rein?'
 
 'In any one?' repeated Markheim, with an anguish of consideration.  'No,'
 he added, with despair, 'in none!  I have gone down in all.'
 
 'Then,' said the visitor, 'content yourself with what you are, for you
 will never change; and the words of your part on this stage are
 irrevocably written down.'
 
 Markheim stood for a long while silent, and indeed it was the visitor who
 first broke the silence.  'That being so,' he said, 'shall I show you the
 money?'
 
 'And grace?' cried Markheim.
 
 'Have you not tried it?' returned the other.  'Two or three years ago,
 did I not see you on the platform of revival meetings, and was not your
 voice the loudest in the hymn?'
 
 'It is true,' said Markheim; 'and I see clearly what remains for me by
 way of duty.  I thank you for these lessons from my soul; my eyes are
 opened, and I behold myself at last for what I am.'
 
 At this moment, the sharp note of the door-bell rang through the house;
 and the visitant, as though this were some concerted signal for which he
 had been waiting, changed at once in his demeanour.
 
 'The maid!' he cried.  'She has returned, as I forewarned you, and there
 is now before you one more difficult passage.  Her master, you must say,
 is ill; you must let her in, with an assured but rather serious
 countenance--no smiles, no overacting, and I promise you success!  Once
 the girl within, and the door closed, the same dexterity that has already
 rid you of the dealer will relieve you of this last danger in your path.
 Thenceforward you have the whole evening--the whole night, if needful--to
 ransack the treasures of the house and to make good your safety.  This is
 help that comes to you with the mask of danger.  Up!' he cried; 'up,
 friend; your life hangs trembling in the scales: up, and act!'
 
 Markheim steadily regarded his counsellor.  'If I be condemned to evil
 acts,' he said, 'there is still one door of freedom open--I can cease
 from action.  If my life be an ill thing, I can lay it down.  Though I
 be, as you say truly, at the beck of every small temptation, I can yet,
 by one decisive gesture, place myself beyond the reach of all.  My love
 of good is damned to barrenness; it may, and let it be!  But I have still
 my hatred of evil; and from that, to your galling disappointment, you
 shall see that I can draw both energy and courage.'
 
 The features of the visitor began to undergo a wonderful and lovely
 change: they brightened and softened with a tender triumph, and, even as
 they brightened, faded and dislimned.  But Markheim did not pause to
 watch or understand the transformation.  He opened the door and went
 downstairs very slowly, thinking to himself.  His past went soberly
 before him; he beheld it as it was, ugly and strenuous like a dream,
 random as chance-medley--a scene of defeat.  Life, as he thus reviewed
 it, tempted him no longer; but on the further side he perceived a quiet
 haven for his bark.  He paused in the passage, and looked into the shop,
 where the candle still burned by the dead body.  It was strangely silent.
 Thoughts of the dealer swarmed into his mind, as he stood gazing.  And
 then the bell once more broke out into impatient clamour.
 
 He confronted the maid upon the threshold with something like a smile.
 
 'You had better go for the police,' said he: 'I have killed your master.'
 
 
 
 
 THRAWN JANET
 
 
 The Reverend Murdoch Soulis was long minister of the moorland parish of
 Balweary, in the vale of Dule.  A severe, bleak-faced old man, dreadful
 to his hearers, he dwelt in the last years of his life, without relative
 or servant or any human company, in the small and lonely manse under the
 Hanging Shaw.  In spite of the iron composure of his features, his eye
 was wild, scared, and uncertain; and when he dwelt, in private
 admonitions, on the future of the impenitent, it seemed as if his eye
 pierced through the storms of time to the terrors of eternity.  Many
 young persons, coming to prepare themselves against the season of the
 Holy Communion, were dreadfully affected by his talk.  He had a sermon on
 lst Peter, v. and 8th, 'The devil as a roaring lion,' on the Sunday after
 every seventeenth of August, and he was accustomed to surpass himself
 upon that text both by the appalling nature of the matter and the terror
 of his bearing in the pulpit.  The children were frightened into fits,
 and the old looked more than usually oracular, and were, all that day,
 full of those hints that Hamlet deprecated.  The manse itself, where it
 stood by the water of Dule among some thick trees, with the Shaw
 overhanging it on the one side, and on the other many cold, moorish
 hilltops rising towards the sky, had begun, at a very early period of Mr.
 Soulis's ministry, to be avoided in the dusk hours by all who valued
 themselves upon their prudence; and guidmen sitting at the clachan
 alehouse shook their heads together at the thought of passing late by
 that uncanny neighbourhood.  There was one spot, to be more particular,
 which was regarded with especial awe.  The manse stood between the high
 road and the water of Dule, with a gable to each; its back was towards
 the kirk-town of Balweary, nearly half a mile away; in front of it, a
 bare garden, hedged with thorn, occupied the land between the river and
 the road.  The house was two stories high, with two large rooms on each.
 It opened not directly on the garden, but on a causewayed path, or
 passage, giving on the road on the one hand, and closed on the other by
 the tall willows and elders that bordered on the stream.  And it was this
 strip of causeway that enjoyed among the young parishioners of Balweary
 so infamous a reputation.  The minister walked there often after dark,
 sometimes groaning aloud in the instancy of his unspoken prayers; and
 when he was from home, and the manse door was locked, the more daring
 schoolboys ventured, with beating hearts, to 'follow my leader' across
 that legendary spot.
 
 This atmosphere of terror, surrounding, as it did, a man of God of
 spotless character and orthodoxy, was a common cause of wonder and
 subject of inquiry among the few strangers who were led by chance or
 business into that unknown, outlying country.  But many even of the
 people of the parish were ignorant of the strange events which had marked
 the first year of Mr. Soulis's ministrations; and among those who were
 better informed, some were naturally reticent, and others shy of that
 particular topic.  Now and again, only, one of the older folk would warm
 into courage over his third tumbler, and recount the cause of the
 minister's strange looks and solitary life.
 
 * * * * *
 
 Fifty years syne, when Mr. Soulis cam first into Ba'weary, he was still a
 young man--a callant, the folk said--fu' o' book learnin' and grand at
 the exposition, but, as was natural in sae young a man, wi' nae leevin'
 experience in religion.  The younger sort were greatly taken wi' his
 gifts and his gab; but auld, concerned, serious men and women were moved
 even to prayer for the young man, whom they took to be a self-deceiver,
 and the parish that was like to be sae ill-supplied.  It was before the
 days o' the moderates--weary fa' them; but ill things are like guid--they
 baith come bit by bit, a pickle at a time; and there were folk even then
 that said the Lord had left the college professors to their ain devices,
 an' the lads that went to study wi' them wad hae done mair and better
 sittin' in a peat-bog, like their forbears of the persecution, wi' a
 Bible under their oxter and a speerit o' prayer in their heart.  There
 was nae doubt, onyway, but that Mr. Soulis had been ower lang at the
 college.  He was careful and troubled for mony things besides the ae
 thing needful.  He had a feck o' books wi' him--mair than had ever been
 seen before in a' that presbytery; and a sair wark the carrier had wi'
 them, for they were a' like to have smoored in the Deil's Hag between
 this and Kilmackerlie.  They were books o' divinity, to be sure, or so
 they ca'd them; but the serious were o' opinion there was little service
 for sae mony, when the hail o' God's Word would gang in the neuk of a
 plaid.  Then he wad sit half the day and half the nicht forbye, which was
 scant decent--writin', nae less; and first, they were feared he wad read
 his sermons; and syne it proved he was writin' a book himsel', which was
 surely no fittin' for ane of his years an' sma' experience.
 
 Onyway it behoved him to get an auld, decent wife to keep the manse for
 him an' see to his bit denners; and he was recommended to an auld
 limmer--Janet M'Clour, they ca'd her--and sae far left to himsel' as to
 be ower persuaded.  There was mony advised him to the contrar, for Janet
 was mair than suspeckit by the best folk in Ba'weary.  Lang or that, she
 had had a wean to a dragoon; she hadnae come forrit {140} for maybe
 thretty year; and bairns had seen her mumblin' to hersel' up on Key's
 Loan in the gloamin', whilk was an unco time an' place for a God-fearin'
 woman.  Howsoever, it was the laird himsel' that had first tauld the
 minister o' Janet; and in thae days he wad have gane a far gate to
 pleesure the laird.  When folk tauld him that Janet was sib to the deil,
 it was a' superstition by his way of it; an' when they cast up the Bible
 to him an' the witch of Endor, he wad threep it doun their thrapples that
 thir days were a' gane by, and the deil was mercifully restrained.
 
 Weel, when it got about the clachan that Janet M'Clour was to be servant
 at the manse, the folk were fair mad wi' her an' him thegether; and some
 o' the guidwives had nae better to dae than get round her door cheeks and
 chairge her wi' a' that was ken't again her, frae the sodger's bairn to
 John Tamson's twa kye.  She was nae great speaker; folk usually let her
 gang her ain gate, an' she let them gang theirs, wi', neither Fair-guid-
 een nor Fair-guid-day; but when she buckled to, she had a tongue to deave
 the miller.  Up she got, an' there wasnae an auld story in Ba'weary but
 she gart somebody lowp for it that day; they couldnae say ae thing but
 she could say twa to it; till, at the hinder end, the guidwives up and
 claught haud of her, and clawed the coats aff her back, and pu'd her doun
 the clachan to the water o' Dule, to see if she were a witch or no, soum
 or droun.  The carline skirled till ye could hear her at the Hangin'
 Shaw, and she focht like ten; there was mony a guidwife bure the mark of
 her neist day an' mony a lang day after; and just in the hettest o' the
 collieshangie, wha suld come up (for his sins) but the new minister.
 
 'Women,' said he (and he had a grand voice), 'I charge you in the Lord's
 name to let her go.'
 
 Janet ran to him--she was fair wud wi' terror--an' clang to him, an'
 prayed him, for Christ's sake, save her frae the cummers; an' they, for
 their pairt, tauld him a' that was ken't, and maybe mair.
 
 'Woman,' says he to Janet, 'is this true?'
 
 'As the Lord sees me,' says she, 'as the Lord made me, no a word o't.
 Forbye the bairn,' says she, 'I've been a decent woman a' my days.'
 
 'Will you,' says Mr. Soulis, 'in the name of God, and before me, His
 unworthy minister, renounce the devil and his works?'
 
 Weel, it wad appear that when he askit that, she gave a girn that fairly
 frichtit them that saw her, an' they could hear her teeth play dirl
 thegether in her chafts; but there was naething for it but the ae way or
 the ither; an' Janet lifted up her hand and renounced the deil before
 them a'.
 
 'And now,' says Mr. Soulis to the guidwives, 'home with ye, one and all,
 and pray to God for His forgiveness.'
 
 And he gied Janet his arm, though she had little on her but a sark, and
 took her up the clachan to her ain door like a leddy of the land; an' her
 scrieghin' and laughin' as was a scandal to be heard.
 
 There were mony grave folk lang ower their prayers that nicht; but when
 the morn cam' there was sic a fear fell upon a' Ba'weary that the bairns
 hid theirsels, and even the men folk stood and keekit frae their doors.
 For there was Janet comin' doun the clachan--her or her likeness, nane
 could tell--wi' her neck thrawn, and her heid on ae side, like a body
 that has been hangit, and a girn on her face like an unstreakit corp.  By
 an' by they got used wi' it, and even speered at her to ken what was
 wrang; but frae that day forth she couldnae speak like a Christian woman,
 but slavered and played click wi' her teeth like a pair o' shears; and
 frae that day forth the name o' God cam never on her lips.  Whiles she
 wad try to say it, but it michtnae be.  Them that kenned best said least;
 but they never gied that Thing the name o' Janet M'Clour; for the auld
 Janet, by their way o't, was in muckle hell that day.  But the minister
 was neither to haud nor to bind; he preached about naething but the
 folk's cruelty that had gi'en her a stroke of the palsy; he skelpt the
 bairns that meddled her; and he had her up to the manse that same nicht,
 and dwalled there a' his lane wi' her under the Hangin' Shaw.
 
 Weel, time gaed by: and the idler sort commenced to think mair lichtly o'
 that black business.  The minister was weel thocht o'; he was aye late at
 the writing, folk wad see his can'le doon by the Dule water after twal'
 at e'en; and he seemed pleased wi' himsel' and upsitten as at first,
 though a' body could see that he was dwining.  As for Janet she cam an'
 she gaed; if she didnae speak muckle afore, it was reason she should
 speak less then; she meddled naebody; but she was an eldritch thing to
 see, an' nane wad hae mistrysted wi' her for Ba'weary glebe.
 
 About the end o' July there cam' a spell o' weather, the like o't never
 was in that country side; it was lown an' het an' heartless; the herds
 couldnae win up the Black Hill, the bairns were ower weariet to play; an'
 yet it was gousty too, wi' claps o' het wund that rumm'led in the glens,
 and bits o' shouers that slockened naething.  We aye thocht it but to
 thun'er on the morn; but the morn cam, an' the morn's morning, and it was
 aye the same uncanny weather, sair on folks and bestial.  Of a' that were
 the waur, nane suffered like Mr. Soulis; he could neither sleep nor eat,
 he tauld his elders; an' when he wasnae writin' at his weary book, he wad
 be stravaguin' ower a' the countryside like a man possessed, when a' body
 else was blythe to keep caller ben the house.
 
 Abune Hangin' Shaw, in the bield o' the Black Hill, there's a bit
 enclosed grund wi' an iron yett; and it seems, in the auld days, that was
 the kirkyaird o' Ba'weary, and consecrated by the Papists before the
 blessed licht shone upon the kingdom.  It was a great howff o' Mr.
 Soulis's, onyway; there he would sit an' consider his sermons; and indeed
 it's a bieldy bit.  Weel, as he cam ower the wast end o' the Black Hill,
 ae day, he saw first twa, an syne fower, an' syne seeven corbie craws
 fleein' round an' round abune the auld kirkyaird.  They flew laigh and
 heavy, an' squawked to ither as they gaed; and it was clear to Mr. Soulis
 that something had put them frae their ordinar.  He wasnae easy fleyed,
 an' gaed straucht up to the wa's; an' what suld he find there but a man,
 or the appearance of a man, sittin' in the inside upon a grave.  He was
 of a great stature, an' black as hell, and his e'en were singular to see.
 {144}  Mr. Soulis had heard tell o' black men, mony's the time; but there
 was something unco about this black man that daunted him.  Het as he was,
 he took a kind o' cauld grue in the marrow o' his banes; but up he spak
 for a' that; an' says he: 'My friend, are you a stranger in this place?'
 The black man answered never a word; he got upon his feet, an' begude to
 hirsle to the wa' on the far side; but he aye lookit at the minister; an'
 the minister stood an' lookit back; till a' in a meenute the black man
 was ower the wa' an' rinnin' for the bield o' the trees.  Mr. Soulis, he
 hardly kenned why, ran after him; but he was sair forjaskit wi' his walk
 an' the het, unhalesome weather; and rin as he likit, he got nae mair
 than a glisk o' the black man amang the birks, till he won doun to the
 foot o' the hill-side, an' there he saw him ance mair, gaun, hap, step,
 an' lowp, ower Dule water to the manse.
 
 Mr. Soulis wasnae weel pleased that this fearsome gangrel suld mak' sae
 free wi' Ba'weary manse; an' he ran the harder, an', wet shoon, ower the
 burn, an' up the walk; but the deil a black man was there to see.  He
 stepped out upon the road, but there was naebody there; he gaed a' ower
 the gairden, but na, nae black man.  At the hinder end, and a bit feared
 as was but natural, he lifted the hasp and into the manse; and there was
 Janet M'Clour before his een, wi' her thrawn craig, and nane sae pleased
 to see him.  And he aye minded sinsyne, when first he set his een upon
 her, he had the same cauld and deidly grue.
 
 'Janet,' says he, 'have you seen a black man?'
 
 'A black man?' quo' she.  'Save us a'!  Ye're no wise, minister.  There's
 nae black man in a Ba'weary.'
 
 But she didnae speak plain, ye maun understand; but yam-yammered, like a
 powney wi' the bit in its moo.
 
 'Weel,' says he, 'Janet, if there was nae black man, I have spoken with
 the Accuser of the Brethren.'
 
 And he sat down like ane wi' a fever, an' his teeth chittered in his
 heid.
 
 'Hoots,' says she, 'think shame to yoursel', minister;' an' gied him a
 drap brandy that she keept aye by her.
 
 Syne Mr. Soulis gaed into his study amang a' his books.  It's a lang,
 laigh, mirk chalmer, perishin' cauld in winter, an' no very dry even in
 the tap o' the simmer, for the manse stands near the burn.  Sae doun he
 sat, and thocht of a' that had come an' gane since he was in Ba'weary,
 an' his hame, an' the days when he was a bairn an' ran daffin' on the
 braes; and that black man aye ran in his heid like the ower-come of a
 sang.  Aye the mair he thocht, the mair he thocht o' the black man.  He
 tried the prayer, an' the words wouldnae come to him; an' he tried, they
 say, to write at his book, but he could nae mak' nae mair o' that.  There
 was whiles he thocht the black man was at his oxter, an' the swat stood
 upon him cauld as well-water; and there was other whiles, when he cam to
 himsel' like a christened bairn and minded naething.
 
 The upshot was that he gaed to the window an' stood glowrin' at Dule
 water.  The trees are unco thick, an' the water lies deep an' black under
 the manse; an' there was Janct washin' the cla'es wi' her coats kilted.
 She had her back to the minister, an' he, for his pairt, hardly kenned
 what he was lookin' at.  Syne she turned round, an' shawed her face; Mr.
 Soulis had the same cauld grue as twice that day afore, an' it was borne
 in upon him what folk said, that Janet was deid lang syne, an' this was a
 bogle in her clay-cauld flesh.  He drew back a pickle and he scanned her
 narrowly.  She was tramp-trampin' in the cla'es, croonin' to hersel'; and
 eh!  Gude guide us, but it was a fearsome face.  Whiles she sang louder,
 but there was nae man born o' woman that could tell the words o' her
 sang; an' whiles she lookit side-lang doun, but there was naething there
 for her to look at.  There gaed a scunner through the flesh upon his
 banes; and that was Heeven's advertisement.  But Mr. Soulis just blamed
 himsel', he said, to think sae ill of a puir, auld afflicted wife that
 hadnae a freend forbye himsel'; an' he put up a bit prayer for him and
 her, an' drank a little caller water--for his heart rose again the
 meat--an' gaed up to his naked bed in the gloaming.
 
 That was a nicht that has never been forgotten in Ba'weary, the nicht o'
 the seeventeenth of August, seventeen hun'er' an twal'.  It had been het
 afore, as I hae said, but that nicht it was hetter than ever.  The sun
 gaed doun amang unco-lookin' clouds; it fell as mirk as the pit; no a
 star, no a breath o' wund; ye couldnae see your han' afore your face, and
 even the auld folk cuist the covers frae their beds and lay pechin' for
 their breath.  Wi' a' that he had upon his mind, it was gey and unlikely
 Mr. Soulis wad get muckle sleep.  He lay an' he tummled; the gude, caller
 bed that he got into brunt his very banes; whiles he slept, and whiles he
 waukened; whiles he heard the time o' nicht, and whiles a tyke yowlin' up
 the muir, as if somebody was deid; whiles he thocht he heard bogles
 claverin' in his lug, an' whiles he saw spunkies in the room.  He
 behoved, he judged, to be sick; an' sick he was--little he jaloosed the
 sickness.
 
 At the hinder end, he got a clearness in his mind, sat up in his sark on
 the bed-side, and fell thinkin' ance mair o' the black man an' Janet.  He
 couldnae weel tell how--maybe it was the cauld to his feet--but it cam'
 in upon him wi' a spate that there was some connection between thir twa,
 an' that either or baith o' them were bogles.  And just at that moment,
 in Janet's room, which was neist to his, there cam' a stramp o' feet as
 if men were wars'lin', an' then a loud bang; an' then a wund gaed
 reishling round the fower quarters of the house; an' then a' was aince
 mair as seelent as the grave.
 
 Mr. Soulis was feared for neither man nor deevil.  He got his tinder-box,
 an' lit a can'le, an' made three steps o't ower to Janet's door.  It was
 on the hasp, an' he pushed it open, an' keeked bauldly in.  It was a big
 room, as big as the minister's ain, an' plenished wi' grand, auld, solid
 gear, for he had naething else.  There was a fower-posted bed wi' auld
 tapestry; and a braw cabinet of aik, that was fu' o' the minister's
 divinity books, an' put there to be out o' the gate; an' a wheen duds o'
 Janet's lying here and there about the floor.  But nae Janet could Mr.
 Soulis see; nor ony sign of a contention.  In he gaed (an' there's few
 that wad ha'e followed him) an' lookit a' round, an' listened.  But there
 was naethin' to be heard, neither inside the manse nor in a' Ba'weary
 parish, an' naethin' to be seen but the muckle shadows turnin' round the
 can'le.  An' then a' at aince, the minister's heart played dunt an' stood
 stock-still; an' a cauld wund blew amang the hairs o' his heid.  Whaten a
 weary sicht was that for the puir man's een!  For there was Janat hangin'
 frae a nail beside the auld aik cabinet: her heid aye lay on her
 shoother, her een were steeked, the tongue projekit frae her mouth, and
 her heels were twa feet clear abune the floor.
 
 'God forgive us all!' thocht Mr. Soulis; 'poor Janet's dead.'
 
 He cam' a step nearer to the corp; an' then his heart fair whammled in
 his inside.  For by what cantrip it wad ill-beseem a man to judge, she
 was hingin' frae a single nail an' by a single wursted thread for darnin'
 hose.
 
 It's an awfu' thing to be your lane at nicht wi' siccan prodigies o'
 darkness; but Mr. Soulis was strong in the Lord.  He turned an' gaed his
 ways oot o' that room, and lockit the door ahint him; and step by step,
 doon the stairs, as heavy as leed; and set doon the can'le on the table
 at the stairfoot.  He couldnae pray, he couldnae think, he was dreepin'
 wi' caul' swat, an' naething could he hear but the dunt-dunt-duntin' o'
 his ain heart.  He micht maybe have stood there an hour, or maybe twa, he
 minded sae little; when a' o' a sudden, he heard a laigh, uncanny steer
 upstairs; a foot gaed to an' fro in the cha'mer whaur the corp was
 hingin'; syne the door was opened, though he minded weel that he had
 lockit it; an' syne there was a step upon the landin', an' it seemed to
 him as if the corp was lookin' ower the rail and doun upon him whaur he
 stood.
 
 He took up the can'le again (for he couldnae want the licht), and as
 saftly as ever he could, gaed straucht out o' the manse an' to the far
 end o' the causeway.  It was aye pit-mirk; the flame o' the can'le, when
 he set it on the grund, brunt steedy and clear as in a room; naething
 moved, but the Dule water seepin' and sabbin' doon the glen, an' yon
 unhaly footstep that cam' ploddin doun the stairs inside the manse.  He
 kenned the foot over weel, for it was Janet's; and at ilka step that cam'
 a wee thing nearer, the cauld got deeper in his vitals.  He commanded his
 soul to Him that made an' keepit him; 'and O Lord,' said he, 'give me
 strength this night to war against the powers of evil.'
 
 By this time the foot was comin' through the passage for the door; he
 could hear a hand skirt alang the wa', as if the fearsome thing was
 feelin' for its way.  The saughs tossed an' maned thegether, a lang sigh
 cam' ower the hills, the flame o' the can'le was blawn aboot; an' there
 stood the corp of Thrawn Janet, wi' her grogram goun an' her black mutch,
 wi' the heid aye upon the shouther, an' the girn still upon the face
 o't--leevin', ye wad hae said--deid, as Mr. Soulis weel kenned--upon the
 threshold o' the manse.
 
 It's a strange thing that the saul of man should be that thirled into his
 perishable body; but the minister saw that, an' his heart didnae break.
 
 She didnae stand there lang; she began to move again an' cam' slowly
 towards Mr. Soulis whaur he stood under the saughs.  A' the life o' his
 body, a' the strength o' his speerit, were glowerin' frae his een.  It
 seemed she was gaun to speak, but wanted words, an' made a sign wi' the
 left hand.  There cam' a clap o' wund, like a cat's fuff; oot gaed the
 can'le, the saughs skrieghed like folk; an' Mr. Soulis kenned that, live
 or die, this was the end o't.
 
 'Witch, beldame, devil!' he cried, 'I charge you, by the power of God,
 begone--if you be dead, to the grave--if you be damned, to hell.'
 
 An' at that moment the Lord's ain hand out o' the Heevens struck the
 Horror whaur it stood; the auld, deid, desecrated corp o' the witch-wife,
 sae lang keepit frae the grave and hirsled round by deils, lowed up like
 a brunstane spunk and fell in ashes to the grund; the thunder followed,
 peal on dirling peal, the rairing rain upon the back o' that; and Mr.
 Soulis lowped through the garden hedge, and ran, wi' skelloch upon
 skelloch, for the clachan.
 
 That same mornin', John Christie saw the Black Man pass the Muckle Cairn
 as it was chappin' six; before eicht, he gaed by the change-house at
 Knockdow; an' no lang after, Sandy M'Lellan saw him gaun linkin' doun the
 braes frae Kilmackerlie.  There's little doubt but it was him that
 dwalled sae lang in Janet's body; but he was awa' at last; and sinsyne
 the deil has never fashed us in Ba'weary.
 
 But it was a sair dispensation for the minister; lang, lang he lay ravin'
 in his bed; and frae that hour to this, he was the man ye ken the day.
 
 
 
 
 OLALLA
 
 
 'Now,' said the doctor, 'my part is done, and, I may say, with some
 vanity, well done.  It remains only to get you out of this cold and
 poisonous city, and to give you two months of a pure air and an easy
 conscience.  The last is your affair.  To the first I think I can help
 you.  It fells indeed rather oddly; it was but the other day the Padre
 came in from the country; and as he and I are old friends, although of
 contrary professions, he applied to me in a matter of distress among some
 of his parishioners.  This was a family--but you are ignorant of Spain,
 and even the names of our grandees are hardly known to you; suffice it,
 then, that they were once great people, and are now fallen to the brink
 of destitution.  Nothing now belongs to them but the residencia, and
 certain leagues of desert mountain, in the greater part of which not even
 a goat could support life.  But the house is a fine old place, and stands
 at a great height among the hills, and most salubriously; and I had no
 sooner heard my friend's tale, than I remembered you.  I told him I had a
 wounded officer, wounded in the good cause, who was now able to make a
 change; and I proposed that his friends should take you for a lodger.
 Instantly the Padre's face grew dark, as I had maliciously foreseen it
 would.  It was out of the question, he said.  Then let them starve, said
 I, for I have no sympathy with tatterdemalion pride.  There-upon we
 separated, not very content with one another; but yesterday, to my
 wonder, the Padre returned and made a submission: the difficulty, he
 said, he had found upon enquiry to be less than he had feared; or, in
 other words, these proud people had put their pride in their pocket.  I
 closed with the offer; and, subject to your approval, I have taken rooms
 for you in the residencia.  The air of these mountains will renew your
 blood; and the quiet in which you will there live is worth all the
 medicines in the world.'
 
 'Doctor,' said I, 'you have been throughout my good angel, and your
 advice is a command.  But tell me, if you please, something of the family
 with which I am to reside.'
 
 'I am coming to that,' replied my friend; 'and, indeed, there is a
 difficulty in the way.  These beggars are, as I have said, of very high
 descent and swollen with the most baseless vanity; they have lived for
 some generations in a growing isolation, drawing away, on either hand,
 from the rich who had now become too high for them, and from the poor,
 whom they still regarded as too low; and even to-day, when poverty forces
 them to unfasten their door to a guest, they cannot do so without a most
 ungracious stipulation.  You are to remain, they say, a stranger; they
 will give you attendance, but they refuse from the first the idea of the
 smallest intimacy.'
 
 I will not deny that I was piqued, and perhaps the feeling strengthened
 my desire to go, for I was confident that I could break down that barrier
 if I desired.  'There is nothing offensive in such a stipulation,' said
 I; 'and I even sympathise with the feeling that inspired it.'
 
 'It is true they have never seen you,' returned the doctor politely; 'and
 if they knew you were the handsomest and the most pleasant man that ever
 came from England (where I am told that handsome men are common, but
 pleasant ones not so much so), they would doubtless make you welcome with
 a better grace.  But since you take the thing so well, it matters not.  To
 me, indeed, it seems discourteous.  But you will find yourself the
 gainer.  The family will not much tempt you.  A mother, a son, and a
 daughter; an old woman said to be halfwitted, a country lout, and a
 country girl, who stands very high with her confessor, and is,
 therefore,' chuckled the physician, 'most likely plain; there is not much
 in that to attract the fancy of a dashing officer.'
 
 'And yet you say they are high-born,' I objected.
 
 'Well, as to that, I should distinguish,' returned the doctor.  'The
 mother is; not so the children.  The mother was the last representative
 of a princely stock, degenerate both in parts and fortune.  Her father
 was not only poor, he was mad: and the girl ran wild about the residencia
 till his death.  Then, much of the fortune having died with him, and the
 family being quite extinct, the girl ran wilder than ever, until at last
 she married, Heaven knows whom, a muleteer some say, others a smuggler;
 while there are some who uphold there was no marriage at all, and that
 Felipe and Olalla are bastards.  The union, such as it was, was
 tragically dissolved some years ago; but they live in such seclusion, and
 the country at that time was in so much disorder, that the precise manner
 of the man's end is known only to the priest--if even to him.'
 
 'I begin to think I shall have strange experiences,' said I.
 
 'I would not romance, if I were you,' replied the doctor; 'you will find,
 I fear, a very grovelling and commonplace reality.  Felipe, for instance,
 I have seen.  And what am I to say?  He is very rustic, very cunning,
 very loutish, and, I should say, an innocent; the others are probably to
 match.  No, no, senor commandante, you must seek congenial society among
 the great sights of our mountains; and in these at least, if you are at
 all a lover of the works of nature, I promise you will not be
 disappointed.'
 
 The next day Felipe came for me in a rough country cart, drawn by a mule;
 and a little before the stroke of noon, after I had said farewell to the
 doctor, the innkeeper, and different good souls who had befriended me
 during my sickness, we set forth out of the city by the Eastern gate, and
 began to ascend into the Sierra.  I had been so long a prisoner, since I
 was left behind for dying after the loss of the convoy, that the mere
 smell of the earth set me smiling.  The country through which we went was
 wild and rocky, partially covered with rough woods, now of the cork-tree,
 and now of the great Spanish chestnut, and frequently intersected by the
 beds of mountain torrents.  The sun shone, the wind rustled joyously; and
 we had advanced some miles, and the city had already shrunk into an
 inconsiderable knoll upon the plain behind us, before my attention began
 to be diverted to the companion of my drive.  To the eye, he seemed but a
 diminutive, loutish, well-made country lad, such as the doctor had
 described, mighty quick and active, but devoid of any culture; and this
 first impression was with most observers final.  What began to strike me
 was his familiar, chattering talk; so strangely inconsistent with the
 terms on which I was to be received; and partly from his imperfect
 enunciation, partly from the sprightly incoherence of the matter, so very
 difficult to follow clearly without an effort of the mind.  It is true I
 had before talked with persons of a similar mental constitution; persons
 who seemed to live (as he did) by the senses, taken and possessed by the
 visual object of the moment and unable to discharge their minds of that
 impression.  His seemed to me (as I sat, distantly giving ear) a kind of
 conversation proper to drivers, who pass much of their time in a great
 vacancy of the intellect and threading the sights of a familiar country.
 But this was not the case of Felipe; by his own account, he was a home-
 keeper; 'I wish I was there now,' he said; and then, spying a tree by the
 wayside, he broke off to tell me that he had once seen a crow among its
 branches.
 
 'A crow?' I repeated, struck by the ineptitude of the remark, and
 thinking I had heard imperfectly.
 
 But by this time he was already filled with a new idea; hearkening with a
 rapt intentness, his head on one side, his face puckered; and he struck
 me rudely, to make me hold my peace.  Then he smiled and shook his head.
 
 'What did you hear?' I asked.
 
 'O, it is all right,' he said; and began encouraging his mule with cries
 that echoed unhumanly up the mountain walls.
 
 I looked at him more closely.  He was superlatively well-built, light,
 and lithe and strong; he was well-featured; his yellow eyes were very
 large, though, perhaps, not very expressive; take him altogether, he was
 a pleasant-looking lad, and I had no fault to find with him, beyond that
 he was of a dusky hue, and inclined to hairyness; two characteristics
 that I disliked.  It was his mind that puzzled, and yet attracted me.  The
 doctor's phrase--an innocent--came back to me; and I was wondering if
 that were, after all, the true description, when the road began to go
 down into the narrow and naked chasm of a torrent.  The waters thundered
 tumultuously in the bottom; and the ravine was filled full of the sound,
 the thin spray, and the claps of wind, that accompanied their descent.
 The scene was certainly impressive; but the road was in that part very
 securely walled in; the mule went steadily forward; and I was astonished
 to perceive the paleness of terror in the face of my companion.  The
 voice of that wild river was inconstant, now sinking lower as if in
 weariness, now doubling its hoarse tones; momentary freshets seemed to
 swell its volume, sweeping down the gorge, raving and booming against the
 barrier walls; and I observed it was at each of these accessions to the
 clamour, that my driver more particularly winced and blanched.  Some
 thoughts of Scottish superstition and the river Kelpie, passed across my
 mind; I wondered if perchance the like were prevalent in that part of
 Spain; and turning to Felipe, sought to draw him out.
 
 'What is the matter?' I asked.
 
 'O, I am afraid,' he replied.
 
 'Of what are you afraid?' I returned.  'This seems one of the safest
 places on this very dangerous road.'
 
 'It makes a noise,' he said, with a simplicity of awe that set my doubts
 at rest.
 
 The lad was but a child in intellect; his mind was like his body, active
 and swift, but stunted in development; and I began from that time forth
 to regard him with a measure of pity, and to listen at first with
 indulgence, and at last even with pleasure, to his disjointed babble.
 
 By about four in the afternoon we had crossed the summit of the mountain
 line, said farewell to the western sunshine, and began to go down upon
 the other side, skirting the edge of many ravines and moving through the
 shadow of dusky woods.  There rose upon all sides the voice of falling
 water, not condensed and formidable as in the gorge of the river, but
 scattered and sounding gaily and musically from glen to glen.  Here, too,
 the spirits of my driver mended, and he began to sing aloud in a falsetto
 voice, and with a singular bluntness of musical perception, never true
 either to melody or key, but wandering at will, and yet somehow with an
 effect that was natural and pleasing, like that of the of birds.  As the
 dusk increased, I fell more and more under the spell of this artless
 warbling, listening and waiting for some articulate air, and still
 disappointed; and when at last I asked him what it was he sang--'O,'
 cried he, 'I am just singing!'  Above all, I was taken with a trick he
 had of unweariedly repeating the same note at little intervals; it was
 not so monotonous as you would think, or, at least, not disagreeable; and
 it seemed to breathe a wonderful contentment with what is, such as we
 love to fancy in the attitude of trees, or the quiescence of a pool.
 
 Night had fallen dark before we came out upon a plateau, and drew up a
 little after, before a certain lump of superior blackness which I could
 only conjecture to be the residencia.  Here, my guide, getting down from
 the cart, hooted and whistled for a long time in vain; until at last an
 old peasant man came towards us from somewhere in the surrounding dark,
 carrying a candle in his hand.  By the light of this I was able to
 perceive a great arched doorway of a Moorish character: it was closed by
 iron-studded gates, in one of the leaves of which Felipe opened a wicket.
 The peasant carried off the cart to some out-building; but my guide and I
 passed through the wicket, which was closed again behind us; and by the
 glimmer of the candle, passed through a court, up a stone stair, along a
 section of an open gallery, and up more stairs again, until we came at
 last to the door of a great and somewhat bare apartment.  This room,
 which I understood was to be mine, was pierced by three windows, lined
 with some lustrous wood disposed in panels, and carpeted with the skins
 of many savage animals.  A bright fire burned in the chimney, and shed
 abroad a changeful flicker; close up to the blaze there was drawn a
 table, laid for supper; and in the far end a bed stood ready.  I was
 pleased by these preparations, and said so to Felipe; and he, with the
 same simplicity of disposition that I held already remarked in him,
 warmly re-echoed my praises.  'A fine room,' he said; 'a very fine room.
 And fire, too; fire is good; it melts out the pleasure in your bones.  And
 the bed,' he continued, carrying over the candle in that direction--'see
 what fine sheets--how soft, how smooth, smooth;' and he passed his hand
 again and again over their texture, and then laid down his head and
 rubbed his cheeks among them with a grossness of content that somehow
 offended me.  I took the candle from his hand (for I feared he would set
 the bed on fire) and walked back to the supper-table, where, perceiving a
 measure of wine, I poured out a cup and called to him to come and drink
 of it.  He started to his feet at once and ran to me with a strong
 expression of hope; but when he saw the wine, he visibly shuddered.
 
 'Oh, no,' he said, 'not that; that is for you.  I hate it.'
 
 'Very well, Senor,' said I; 'then I will drink to your good health, and
 to the prosperity of your house and family.  Speaking of which,' I added,
 after I had drunk, 'shall I not have the pleasure of laying my
 salutations in person at the feet of the Senora, your mother?'
 
 But at these words all the childishness passed out of his face, and was
 succeeded by a look of indescribable cunning and secrecy.  He backed away
 from me at the same time, as though I were an animal about to leap or
 some dangerous fellow with a weapon, and when he had got near the door,
 glowered at me sullenly with contracted pupils.  'No,' he said at last,
 and the next moment was gone noiselessly out of the room; and I heard his
 footing die away downstairs as light as rainfall, and silence closed over
 the house.
 
 After I had supped I drew up the table nearer to the bed and began to
 prepare for rest; but in the new position of the light, I was struck by a
 picture on the wall.  It represented a woman, still young.  To judge by
 her costume and the mellow unity which reigned over the canvas, she had
 long been dead; to judge by the vivacity of the attitude, the eyes and
 the features, I might have been beholding in a mirror the image of life.
 Her figure was very slim and strong, and of a just proportion; red
 tresses lay like a crown over her brow; her eyes, of a very golden brown,
 held mine with a look; and her face, which was perfectly shaped, was yet
 marred by a cruel, sullen, and sensual expression.  Something in both
 face and figure, something exquisitely intangible, like the echo of an
 echo, suggested the features and bearing of my guide; and I stood awhile,
 unpleasantly attracted and wondering at the oddity of the resemblance.
 The common, carnal stock of that race, which had been originally designed
 for such high dames as the one now looking on me from the canvas, had
 fallen to baser uses, wearing country clothes, sitting on the shaft and
 holding the reins of a mule cart, to bring home a lodger.  Perhaps an
 actual link subsisted; perhaps some scruple of the delicate flesh that
 was once clothed upon with the satin and brocade of the dead lady, now
 winced at the rude contact of Felipe's frieze.
 
 The first light of the morning shone full upon the portrait, and, as I
 lay awake, my eyes continued to dwell upon it with growing complacency;
 its beauty crept about my heart insidiously, silencing my scruples one
 after another; and while I knew that to love such a woman were to sign
 and seal one's own sentence of degeneration, I still knew that, if she
 were alive, I should love her.  Day after day the double knowledge of her
 wickedness and of my weakness grew clearer.  She came to be the heroine
 of many day-dreams, in which her eyes led on to, and sufficiently
 rewarded, crimes.  She cast a dark shadow on my fancy; and when I was out
 in the free air of heaven, taking vigorous exercise and healthily
 renewing the current of my blood, it was often a glad thought to me that
 my enchantress was safe in the grave, her wand of beauty broken, her lips
 closed in silence, her philtre spilt.  And yet I had a half-lingering
 terror that she might not be dead after all, but re-arisen in the body of
 some descendant.
 
 Felipe served my meals in my own apartment; and his resemblance to the
 portrait haunted me.  At times it was not; at times, upon some change of
 attitude or flash of expression, it would leap out upon me like a ghost.
 It was above all in his ill tempers that the likeness triumphed.  He
 certainly liked me; he was proud of my notice, which he sought to engage
 by many simple and childlike devices; he loved to sit close before my
 fire, talking his broken talk or singing his odd, endless, wordless
 songs, and sometimes drawing his hand over my clothes with an
 affectionate manner of caressing that never failed to cause in me an
 embarrassment of which I was ashamed.  But for all that, he was capable
 of flashes of causeless anger and fits of sturdy sullenness.  At a word
 of reproof, I have seen him upset the dish of which I was about to eat,
 and this not surreptitiously, but with defiance; and similarly at a hint
 of inquisition.  I was not unnaturally curious, being in a strange place
 and surrounded by staring people; but at the shadow of a question, he
 shrank back, lowering and dangerous.  Then it was that, for a fraction of
 a second, this rough lad might have been the brother of the lady in the
 frame.  But these humours were swift to pass; and the resemblance died
 along with them.
 
 In these first days I saw nothing of any one but Felipe, unless the
 portrait is to be counted; and since the lad was plainly of weak mind,
 and had moments of passion, it may be wondered that I bore his dangerous
 neighbourhood with equanimity.  As a matter of fact, it was for some time
 irksome; but it happened before long that I obtained over him so complete
 a mastery as set my disquietude at rest.
 
 It fell in this way.  He was by nature slothful, and much of a vagabond,
 and yet he kept by the house, and not only waited upon my wants, but
 laboured every day in the garden or small farm to the south of the
 residencia.  Here he would be joined by the peasant whom I had seen on
 the night of my arrival, and who dwelt at the far end of the enclosure,
 about half a mile away, in a rude out-house; but it was plain to me that,
 of these two, it was Felipe who did most; and though I would sometimes
 see him throw down his spade and go to sleep among the very plants he had
 been digging, his constancy and energy were admirable in themselves, and
 still more so since I was well assured they were foreign to his
 disposition and the fruit of an ungrateful effort.  But while I admired,
 I wondered what had called forth in a lad so shuttle-witted this enduring
 sense of duty.  How was it sustained?  I asked myself, and to what length
 did it prevail over his instincts?  The priest was possibly his inspirer;
 but the priest came one day to the residencia.  I saw him both come and
 go after an interval of close upon an hour, from a knoll where I was
 sketching, and all that time Felipe continued to labour undisturbed in
 the garden.
 
 At last, in a very unworthy spirit, I determined to debauch the lad from
 his good resolutions, and, way-laying him at the gate, easily pursuaded
 him to join me in a ramble.  It was a fine day, and the woods to which I
 led him were green and pleasant and sweet-smelling and alive with the hum
 of insects.  Here he discovered himself in a fresh character, mounting up
 to heights of gaiety that abashed me, and displaying an energy and grace
 of movement that delighted the eye.  He leaped, he ran round me in mere
 glee; he would stop, and look and listen, and seem to drink in the world
 like a cordial; and then he would suddenly spring into a tree with one
 bound, and hang and gambol there like one at home.  Little as he said to
 me, and that of not much import, I have rarely enjoyed more stirring
 company; the sight of his delight was a continual feast; the speed and
 accuracy of his movements pleased me to the heart; and I might have been
 so thoughtlessly unkind as to make a habit of these wants, had not chance
 prepared a very rude conclusion to my pleasure.  By some swiftness or
 dexterity the lad captured a squirrel in a tree top.  He was then some
 way ahead of me, but I saw him drop to the ground and crouch there,
 crying aloud for pleasure like a child.  The sound stirred my sympathies,
 it was so fresh and innocent; but as I bettered my pace to draw near, the
 cry of the squirrel knocked upon my heart.  I have heard and seen much of
 the cruelty of lads, and above all of peasants; but what I now beheld
 struck me into a passion of anger.  I thrust the fellow aside, plucked
 the poor brute out of his hands, and with swift mercy killed it.  Then I
 turned upon the torturer, spoke to him long out of the heat of my
 indignation, calling him names at which he seemed to wither; and at
 length, pointing toward the residencia, bade him begone and leave me, for
 I chose to walk with men, not with vermin.  He fell upon his knees, and,
 the words coming to him with more cleanness than usual, poured out a
 stream of the most touching supplications, begging me in mercy to forgive
 him, to forget what he had done, to look to the future.  'O, I try so
 hard,' he said.  'O, commandante, bear with Felipe this once; he will
 never be a brute again!'  Thereupon, much more affected than I cared to
 show, I suffered myself to be persuaded, and at last shook hands with him
 and made it up.  But the squirrel, by way of penance, I made him bury;
 speaking of the poor thing's beauty, telling him what pains it had
 suffered, and how base a thing was the abuse of strength.  'See, Felipe,'
 said I, 'you are strong indeed; but in my hands you are as helpless as
 that poor thing of the trees.  Give me your hand in mine.  You cannot
 remove it.  Now suppose that I were cruel like you, and took a pleasure
 in pain.  I only tighten my hold, and see how you suffer.'  He screamed
 aloud, his face stricken ashy and dotted with needle points of sweat; and
 when I set him free, he fell to the earth and nursed his hand and moaned
 over it like a baby.  But he took the lesson in good part; and whether
 from that, or from what I had said to him, or the higher notion he now
 had of my bodily strength, his original affection was changed into a dog-
 like, adoring fidelity.
 
 Meanwhile I gained rapidly in health.  The residencia stood on the crown
 of a stony plateau; on every side the mountains hemmed it about; only
 from the roof, where was a bartizan, there might be seen between two
 peaks, a small segment of plain, blue with extreme distance.  The air in
 these altitudes moved freely and largely; great clouds congregated there,
 and were broken up by the wind and left in tatters on the hilltops; a
 hoarse, and yet faint rumbling of torrents rose from all round; and one
 could there study all the ruder and more ancient characters of nature in
 something of their pristine force.  I delighted from the first in the
 vigorous scenery and changeful weather; nor less in the antique and
 dilapidated mansion where I dwelt.  This was a large oblong, flanked at
 two opposite corners by bastion-like projections, one of which commanded
 the door, while both were loopholed for musketry.  The lower storey was,
 besides, naked of windows, so that the building, if garrisoned, could not
 be carried without artillery.  It enclosed an open court planted with
 pomegranate trees.  From this a broad flight of marble stairs ascended to
 an open gallery, running all round and resting, towards the court, on
 slender pillars.  Thence again, several enclosed stairs led to the upper
 storeys of the house, which were thus broken up into distinct divisions.
 The windows, both within and without, were closely shuttered; some of the
 stone-work in the upper parts had fallen; the roof, in one place, had
 been wrecked in one of the flurries of wind which were common in these
 mountains; and the whole house, in the strong, beating sunlight, and
 standing out above a grove of stunted cork-trees, thickly laden and
 discoloured with dust, looked like the sleeping palace of the legend.  The
 court, in particular, seemed the very home of slumber.  A hoarse cooing
 of doves haunted about the eaves; the winds were excluded, but when they
 blew outside, the mountain dust fell here as thick as rain, and veiled
 the red bloom of the pomegranates; shuttered windows and the closed doors
 of numerous cellars, and the vacant, arches of the gallery, enclosed it;
 and all day long the sun made broken profiles on the four sides, and
 paraded the shadow of the pillars on the gallery floor.  At the ground
 level there was, however, a certain pillared recess, which bore the marks
 of human habitation.  Though it was open in front upon the court, it was
 yet provided with a chimney, where a wood fire would he always prettily
 blazing; and the tile floor was littered with the skins of animals.
 
 It was in this place that I first saw my hostess.  She had drawn one of
 the skins forward and sat in the sun, leaning against a pillar.  It was
 her dress that struck me first of all, for it was rich and brightly
 coloured, and shone out in that dusty courtyard with something of the
 same relief as the flowers of the pomegranates.  At a second look it was
 her beauty of person that took hold of me.  As she sat back--watching me,
 I thought, though with invisible eyes--and wearing at the same time an
 expression of almost imbecile good-humour and contentment, she showed a
 perfectness of feature and a quiet nobility of attitude that were beyond
 a statue's.  I took off my hat to her in passing, and her face puckered
 with suspicion as swiftly and lightly as a pool ruffles in the breeze;
 but she paid no heed to my courtesy.  I went forth on my customary walk a
 trifle daunted, her idol-like impassivity haunting me; and when I
 returned, although she was still in much the same posture, I was half
 surprised to see that she had moved as far as the next pillar, following
 the sunshine.  This time, however, she addressed me with some trivial
 salutation, civilly enough conceived, and uttered in the same
 deep-chested, and yet indistinct and lisping tones, that had already
 baffled the utmost niceness of my hearing from her son.  I answered
 rather at a venture; for not only did I fail to take her meaning with
 precision, but the sudden disclosure of her eyes disturbed me.  They were
 unusually large, the iris golden like Felipe's, but the pupil at that
 moment so distended that they seemed almost black; and what affected me
 was not so much their size as (what was perhaps its consequence) the
 singular insignificance of their regard.  A look more blankly stupid I
 have never met.  My eyes dropped before it even as I spoke, and I went on
 my way upstairs to my own room, at once baffled and embarrassed.  Yet,
 when I came there and saw the face of the portrait, I was again reminded
 of the miracle of family descent.  My hostess was, indeed, both older and
 fuller in person; her eyes were of a different colour; her face, besides,
 was not only free from the ill-significance that offended and attracted
 me in the painting; it was devoid of either good or bad--a moral blank
 expressing literally naught.  And yet there was a likeness, not so much
 speaking as immanent, not so much in any particular feature as upon the
 whole.  It should seem, I thought, as if when the master set his
 signature to that grave canvas, he had not only caught the image of one
 smiling and false-eyed woman, but stamped the essential quality of a
 race.
 
 From that day forth, whether I came or went, I was sure to find the
 Senora seated in the sun against a pillar, or stretched on a rug before
 the fire; only at times she would shift her station to the top round of
 the stone staircase, where she lay with the same nonchalance right across
 my path.  In all these days, I never knew her to display the least spark
 of energy beyond what she expended in brushing and re-brushing her
 copious copper-coloured hair, or in lisping out, in the rich and broken
 hoarseness of her voice, her customary idle salutations to myself.  These,
 I think, were her two chief pleasures, beyond that of mere quiescence.
 She seemed always proud of her remarks, as though they had been
 witticisms: and, indeed, though they were empty enough, like the
 conversation of many respectable persons, and turned on a very narrow
 range of subjects, they were never meaningless or incoherent; nay, they
 had a certain beauty of their own, breathing, as they did, of her entire
 contentment.  Now she would speak of the warmth, in which (like her son)
 she greatly delighted; now of the flowers of the pomegranate trees, and
 now of the white doves and long-winged swallows that fanned the air of
 the court.  The birds excited her.  As they raked the eaves in their
 swift flight, or skimmed sidelong past her with a rush of wind, she would
 sometimes stir, and sit a little up, and seem to awaken from her doze of
 satisfaction.  But for the rest of her days she lay luxuriously folded on
 herself and sunk in sloth and pleasure.  Her invincible content at first
 annoyed me, but I came gradually to find repose in the spectacle, until
 at last it grew to be my habit to sit down beside her four times in the
 day, both coming and going, and to talk with her sleepily, I scarce knew
 of what.  I had come to like her dull, almost animal neighbourhood; her
 beauty and her stupidity soothed and amused me.  I began to find a kind
 of transcendental good sense in her remarks, and her unfathomable good
 nature moved me to admiration and envy.  The liking was returned; she
 enjoyed my presence half-unconsciously, as a man in deep meditation may
 enjoy the babbling of a brook.  I can scarce say she brightened when I
 came, for satisfaction was written on her face eternally, as on some
 foolish statue's; but I was made conscious of her pleasure by some more
 intimate communication than the sight.  And one day, as I set within
 reach of her on the marble step, she suddenly shot forth one of her hands
 and patted mine.  The thing was done, and she was back in her accustomed
 attitude, before my mind had received intelligence of the caress; and
 when I turned to look her in the face I could perceive no answerable
 sentiment.  It was plain she attached no moment to the act, and I blamed
 myself for my own more uneasy consciousness.
 
 The sight and (if I may so call it) the acquaintance of the mother
 confirmed the view I had already taken of the son.  The family blood had
 been impoverished, perhaps by long inbreeding, which I knew to be a
 common error among the proud and the exclusive.  No decline, indeed, was
 to be traced in the body, which had been handed down unimpaired in
 shapeliness and strength; and the faces of to-day were struck as sharply
 from the mint, as the face of two centuries ago that smiled upon me from
 the portrait.  But the intelligence (that more precious heirloom) was
 degenerate; the treasure of ancestral memory ran low; and it had required
 the potent, plebeian crossing of a muleteer or mountain contrabandista to
 raise, what approached hebetude in the mother, into the active oddity of
 the son.  Yet of the two, it was the mother I preferred.  Of Felipe,
 vengeful and placable, full of starts and shyings, inconstant as a hare,
 I could even conceive as a creature possibly noxious.  Of the mother I
 had no thoughts but those of kindness.  And indeed, as spectators are apt
 ignorantly to take sides, I grew something of a partisan in the enmity
 which I perceived to smoulder between them.  True, it seemed mostly on
 the mother's part.  She would sometimes draw in her breath as he came
 near, and the pupils of her vacant eyes would contract as if with horror
 or fear.  Her emotions, such as they were, were much upon the surface and
 readily shared; and this latent repulsion occupied my mind, and kept me
 wondering on what grounds it rested, and whether the son was certainly in
 fault.
 
 I had been about ten days in the residencia, when there sprang up a high
 and harsh wind, carrying clouds of dust.  It came out of malarious
 lowlands, and over several snowy sierras.  The nerves of those on whom it
 blew were strung and jangled; their eyes smarted with the dust; their
 legs ached under the burthen of their body; and the touch of one hand
 upon another grew to be odious.  The wind, besides, came down the gullies
 of the hills and stormed about the house with a great, hollow buzzing and
 whistling that was wearisome to the ear and dismally depressing to the
 mind.  It did not so much blow in gusts as with the steady sweep of a
 waterfall, so that there was no remission of discomfort while it blew.
 But higher upon the mountain, it was probably of a more variable
 strength, with accesses of fury; for there came down at times a far-off
 wailing, infinitely grievous to hear; and at times, on one of the high
 shelves or terraces, there would start up, and then disperse, a tower of
 dust, like the smoke of in explosion.
 
 I no sooner awoke in bed than I was conscious of the nervous tension and
 depression of the weather, and the effect grew stronger as the day
 proceeded.  It was in vain that I resisted; in vain that I set forth upon
 my customary morning's walk; the irrational, unchanging fury of the storm
 had soon beat down my strength and wrecked my temper; and I returned to
 the residencia, glowing with dry heat, and foul and gritty with dust.  The
 court had a forlorn appearance; now and then a glimmer of sun fled over
 it; now and then the wind swooped down upon the pomegranates, and
 scattered the blossoms, and set the window shutters clapping on the wall.
 In the recess the Senora was pacing to and fro with a flushed countenance
 and bright eyes; I thought, too, she was speaking to herself, like one in
 anger.  But when I addressed her with my customary salutation, she only
 replied by a sharp gesture and continued her walk.  The weather had
 distempered even this impassive creature; and as I went on upstairs I was
 the less ashamed of my own discomposure.
 
 All day the wind continued; and I sat in my room and made a feint of
 reading, or walked up and down, and listened to the riot overhead.  Night
 fell, and I had not so much as a candle.  I began to long for some
 society, and stole down to the court.  It was now plunged in the blue of
 the first darkness; but the recess was redly lighted by the fire.  The
 wood had been piled high, and was crowned by a shock of flames, which the
 draught of the chimney brandished to and fro.  In this strong and shaken
 brightness the Senora continued pacing from wall to wall with
 disconnected gestures, clasping her hands, stretching forth her arms,
 throwing back her head as in appeal to heaven.  In these disordered
 movements the beauty and grace of the woman showed more clearly; but
 there was a light in her eye that struck on me unpleasantly; and when I
 had looked on awhile in silence, and seemingly unobserved, I turned tail
 as I had come, and groped my way back again to my own chamber.
 
 By the time Felipe brought my supper and lights, my nerve was utterly
 gone; and, had the lad been such as I was used to seeing him, I should
 have kept him (even by force had that been necessary) to take off the
 edge from my distasteful solitude.  But on Felipe, also, the wind had
 exercised its influence.  He had been feverish all day; now that the
 night had come he was fallen into a low and tremulous humour that reacted
 on my own.  The sight of his scared face, his starts and pallors and
 sudden harkenings, unstrung me; and when he dropped and broke a dish, I
 fairly leaped out of my seat.
 
 'I think we are all mad to-day,' said I, affecting to laugh.
 
 'It is the black wind,' he replied dolefully.  'You feel as if you must
 do something, and you don't know what it is.'
 
 I noted the aptness of the description; but, indeed, Felipe had sometimes
 a strange felicity in rendering into words the sensations of the body.
 'And your mother, too,' said I; 'she seems to feel this weather much.  Do
 you not fear she may be unwell?'
 
 He stared at me a little, and then said, 'No,' almost defiantly; and the
 next moment, carrying his hand to his brow, cried out lamentably on the
 wind and the noise that made his head go round like a millwheel.  'Who
 can be well?' he cried; and, indeed, I could only echo his question, for
 I was disturbed enough myself.
 
 I went to bed early, wearied with day-long restlessness, but the
 poisonous nature of the wind, and its ungodly and unintermittent uproar,
 would not suffer me to sleep.  I lay there and tossed, my nerves and
 senses on the stretch.  At times I would doze, dream horribly, and wake
 again; and these snatches of oblivion confused me as to time.  But it
 must have been late on in the night, when I was suddenly startled by an
 outbreak of pitiable and hateful cries.  I leaped from my bed, supposing
 I had dreamed; but the cries still continued to fill the house, cries of
 pain, I thought, but certainly of rage also, and so savage and discordant
 that they shocked the heart.  It was no illusion; some living thing, some
 lunatic or some wild animal, was being foully tortured.  The thought of
 Felipe and the squirrel flashed into my mind, and I ran to the door, but
 it had been locked from the outside; and I might shake it as I pleased, I
 was a fast prisoner.  Still the cries continued.  Now they would dwindle
 down into a moaning that seemed to be articulate, and at these times I
 made sure they must be human; and again they would break forth and fill
 the house with ravings worthy of hell.  I stood at the door and gave ear
 to them, till at, last they died away.  Long after that, I still lingered
 and still continued to hear them mingle in fancy with the storming of the
 wind; and when at last I crept to my bed, it was with a deadly sickness
 and a blackness of horror on my heart.
 
 It was little wonder if I slept no more.  Why had I been locked in?  What
 had passed?  Who was the author of these indescribable and shocking
 cries?  A human being?  It was inconceivable.  A beast?  The cries were
 scarce quite bestial; and what animal, short of a lion or a tiger, could
 thus shake the solid walls of the residencia?  And while I was thus
 turning over the elements of the mystery, it came into my mind that I had
 not yet set eyes upon the daughter of the house.  What was more probable
 than that the daughter of the Senora, and the sister of Felipe, should be
 herself insane?  Or, what more likely than that these ignorant and half-
 witted people should seek to manage an afflicted kinswoman by violence?
 Here was a solution; and yet when I called to mind the cries (which I
 never did without a shuddering chill) it seemed altogether insufficient:
 not even cruelty could wring such cries from madness.  But of one thing I
 was sure: I could not live in a house where such a thing was half
 conceivable, and not probe the matter home and, if necessary, interfere.
 
 The next day came, the wind had blown itself out, and there was nothing
 to remind me of the business of the night.  Felipe came to my bedside
 with obvious cheerfulness; as I passed through the court, the Senora was
 sunning herself with her accustomed immobility; and when I issued from
 the gateway, I found the whole face of nature austerely smiling, the
 heavens of a cold blue, and sown with great cloud islands, and the
 mountain-sides mapped forth into provinces of light and shadow.  A short
 walk restored me to myself, and renewed within me the resolve to plumb
 this mystery; and when, from the vantage of my knoll, I had seen Felipe
 pass forth to his labours in the garden, I returned at once to the
 residencia to put my design in practice.  The Senora appeared plunged in
 slumber; I stood awhile and marked her, but she did not stir; even if my
 design were indiscreet, I had little to fear from such a guardian; and
 turning away, I mounted to the gallery and began my exploration of the
 house.
 
 All morning I went from one door to another, and entered spacious and
 faded chambers, some rudely shuttered, some receiving their full charge
 of daylight, all empty and unhomely.  It was a rich house, on which Time
 had breathed his tarnish and dust had scattered disillusion.  The spider
 swung there; the bloated tarantula scampered on the cornices; ants had
 their crowded highways on the floor of halls of audience; the big and
 foul fly, that lives on carrion and is often the messenger of death, had
 set up his nest in the rotten woodwork, and buzzed heavily about the
 rooms.  Here and there a stool or two, a couch, a bed, or a great carved
 chair remained behind, like islets on the bare floors, to testify of
 man's bygone habitation; and everywhere the walls were set with the
 portraits of the dead.  I could judge, by these decaying effigies, in the
 house of what a great and what a handsome race I was then wandering.  Many
 of the men wore orders on their breasts and had the port of noble
 offices; the women were all richly attired; the canvases most of them by
 famous hands.  But it was not so much these evidences of greatness that
 took hold upon my mind, even contrasted, as they were, with the present
 depopulation and decay of that great house.  It was rather the parable of
 family life that I read in this succession of fair faces and shapely
 bodies.  Never before had I so realised the miracle of the continued
 race, the creation and recreation, the weaving and changing and handing
 down of fleshly elements.  That a child should be born of its mother,
 that it should grow and clothe itself (we know not how) with humanity,
 and put on inherited looks, and turn its head with the manner of one
 ascendant, and offer its hand with the gesture of another, are wonders
 dulled for us by repetition.  But in the singular unity of look, in the
 common features and common bearing, of all these painted generations on
 the walls of the residencia, the miracle started out and looked me in the
 face.  And an ancient mirror falling opportunely in my way, I stood and
 read my own features a long while, tracing out on either hand the
 filaments of descent and the bonds that knit me with my family.
 
 At last, in the course of these investigations, I opened the door of a
 chamber that bore the marks of habitation.  It was of large proportions
 and faced to the north, where the mountains were most wildly figured.  The
 embers of a fire smouldered and smoked upon the hearth, to which a chair
 had been drawn close.  And yet the aspect of the chamber was ascetic to
 the degree of sternness; the chair was uncushioned; the floor and walls
 were naked; and beyond the books which lay here and there in some
 confusion, there was no instrument of either work or pleasure.  The sight
 of books in the house of such a family exceedingly amazed me; and I began
 with a great hurry, and in momentary fear of interruption, to go from one
 to another and hastily inspect their character.  They were of all sorts,
 devotional, historical, and scientific, but mostly of a great age and in
 the Latin tongue.  Some I could see to bear the marks of constant study;
 others had been torn across and tossed aside as if in petulance or
 disapproval.  Lastly, as I cruised about that empty chamber, I espied
 some papers written upon with pencil on a table near the window.  An
 unthinking curiosity led me to take one up.  It bore a copy of verses,
 very roughly metred in the original Spanish, and which I may render
 somewhat thus--
 
    Pleasure approached with pain and shame,
    Grief with a wreath of lilies came.
    Pleasure showed the lovely sun;
    Jesu dear, how sweet it shone!
    Grief with her worn hand pointed on,
          Jesu dear, to thee!
 
 Shame and confusion at once fell on me; and, laying down the paper, I
 beat an immediate retreat from the apartment.  Neither Felipe nor his
 mother could have read the books nor written these rough but feeling
 verses.  It was plain I had stumbled with sacrilegious feet into the room
 of the daughter of the house.  God knows, my own heart most sharply
 punished me for my indiscretion.  The thought that I had thus secretly
 pushed my way into the confidence of a girl so strangely situated, and
 the fear that she might somehow come to hear of it, oppressed me like
 guilt.  I blamed myself besides for my suspicions of the night before;
 wondered that I should ever have attributed those shocking cries to one
 of whom I now conceived as of a saint, spectral of mien, wasted with
 maceration, bound up in the practices of a mechanical devotion, and
 dwelling in a great isolation of soul with her incongruous relatives; and
 as I leaned on the balustrade of the gallery and looked down into the
 bright close of pomegranates and at the gaily dressed and somnolent
 woman, who just then stretched herself and delicately licked her lips as
 in the very sensuality of sloth, my mind swiftly compared the scene with
 the cold chamber looking northward on the mountains, where the daughter
 dwelt.
 
 That same afternoon, as I sat upon my knoll, I saw the Padre enter the
 gates of the residencia.  The revelation of the daughter's character had
 struck home to my fancy, and almost blotted out the horrors of the night
 before; but at sight of this worthy man the memory revived.  I descended,
 then, from the knoll, and making a circuit among the woods, posted myself
 by the wayside to await his passage.  As soon as he appeared I stepped
 forth and introduced myself as the lodger of the residencia.  He had a
 very strong, honest countenance, on which it was easy to read the mingled
 emotions with which he regarded me, as a foreigner, a heretic, and yet
 one who had been wounded for the good cause.  Of the family at the
 residencia he spoke with reserve, and yet with respect.  I mentioned that
 I had not yet seen the daughter, whereupon he remarked that that was as
 it should be, and looked at me a little askance.  Lastly, I plucked up
 courage to refer to the cries that had disturbed me in the night.  He
 heard me out in silence, and then stopped and partly turned about, as
 though to mark beyond doubt that he was dismissing me.
 
 'Do you take tobacco powder?' said he, offering his snuff-box; and then,
 when I had refused, 'I am an old man,' he added, 'and I may be allowed to
 remind you that you are a guest.'
 
 'I have, then, your authority,' I returned, firmly enough, although I
 flushed at the implied reproof, 'to let things take their course, and not
 to interfere?'
 
 He said 'yes,' and with a somewhat uneasy salute turned and left me where
 I was.  But he had done two things: he had set my conscience at rest, and
 he had awakened my delicacy.  I made a great effort, once more dismissed
 the recollections of the night, and fell once more to brooding on my
 saintly poetess.  At the same time, I could not quite forget that I had
 been locked in, and that night when Felipe brought me my supper I
 attacked him warily on both points of interest.
 
 'I never see your sister,' said I casually.
 
 'Oh, no,' said he; 'she is a good, good girl,' and his mind instantly
 veered to something else.
 
 'Your sister is pious, I suppose?' I asked in the next pause.
 
 'Oh!' he cried, joining his hands with extreme fervour, 'a saint; it is
 she that keeps me up.'
 
 'You are very fortunate,' said I, 'for the most of us, I am afraid, and
 myself among the number, are better at going down.'
 
 'Senor,' said Felipe earnestly, 'I would not say that.  You should not
 tempt your angel.  If one goes down, where is he to stop?'
 
 'Why, Felipe,' said I, 'I had no guess you were a preacher, and I may say
 a good one; but I suppose that is your sister's doing?'
 
 He nodded at me with round eyes.
 
 'Well, then,' I continued, 'she has doubtless reproved you for your sin
 of cruelty?'
 
 'Twelve times!' he cried; for this was the phrase by which the odd
 creature expressed the sense of frequency.  'And I told her you had done
 so--I remembered that,' he added proudly--'and she was pleased.'
 
 'Then, Felipe,' said I, 'what were those cries that I heard last night?
 for surely they were cries of some creature in suffering.'
 
 'The wind,' returned Felipe, looking in the fire.
 
 I took his hand in mine, at which, thinking it to be a caress, he smiled
 with a brightness of pleasure that came near disarming my resolve.  But I
 trod the weakness down.  'The wind,' I repeated; 'and yet I think it was
 this hand,' holding it up, 'that had first locked me in.'  The lad shook
 visibly, but answered never a word.  'Well,' said I, 'I am a stranger and
 a guest.  It is not my part either to meddle or to judge in your affairs;
 in these you shall take your sister's counsel, which I cannot doubt to be
 excellent.  But in so far as concerns my own I will be no man's prisoner,
 and I demand that key.'  Half an hour later my door was suddenly thrown
 open, and the key tossed ringing on the floor.
 
 A day or two after I came in from a walk a little before the point of
 noon.  The Senora was lying lapped in slumber on the threshold of the
 recess; the pigeons dozed below the eaves like snowdrifts; the house was
 under a deep spell of noontide quiet; and only a wandering and gentle
 wind from the mountain stole round the galleries, rustled among the
 pomegranates, and pleasantly stirred the shadows.  Something in the
 stillness moved me to imitation, and I went very lightly across the court
 and up the marble staircase.  My foot was on the topmost round, when a
 door opened, and I found myself face to face with Olalla.  Surprise
 transfixed me; her loveliness struck to my heart; she glowed in the deep
 shadow of the gallery, a gem of colour; her eyes took hold upon mine and
 clung there, and bound us together like the joining of hands; and the
 moments we thus stood face to face, drinking each other in, were
 sacramental and the wedding of souls.  I know not how long it was before
 I awoke out of a deep trance, and, hastily bowing, passed on into the
 upper stair.  She did not move, but followed me with her great, thirsting
 eyes; and as I passed out of sight it seemed to me as if she paled and
 faded.
 
 In my own room, I opened the window and looked out, and could not think
 what change had come upon that austere field of mountains that it should
 thus sing and shine under the lofty heaven.  I had seen her--Olalla!  And
 the stone crags answered, Olalla! and the dumb, unfathomable azure
 answered, Olalla!  The pale saint of my dreams had vanished for ever; and
 in her place I beheld this maiden on whom God had lavished the richest
 colours and the most exuberant energies of life, whom he had made active
 as a deer, slender as a reed, and in whose great eyes he had lighted the
 torches of the soul.  The thrill of her young life, strung like a wild
 animal's, had entered into me; the force of soul that had looked out from
 her eyes and conquered mine, mantled about my heart and sprang to my lips
 in singing.  She passed through my veins: she was one with me.
 
 I will not say that this enthusiasm declined; rather my soul held out in
 its ecstasy as in a strong castle, and was there besieged by cold and
 sorrowful considerations.  I could not doubt but that I loved her at
 first sight, and already with a quivering ardour that was strange to my
 experience.  What then was to follow?  She was the child of an afflicted
 house, the Senora's daughter, the sister of Felipe; she bore it even in
 her beauty.  She had the lightness and swiftness of the one, swift as an
 arrow, light as dew; like the other, she shone on the pale background of
 the world with the brilliancy of flowers.  I could not call by the name
 of brother that half-witted lad, nor by the name of mother that immovable
 and lovely thing of flesh, whose silly eyes and perpetual simper now
 recurred to my mind like something hateful.  And if I could not marry,
 what then?  She was helplessly unprotected; her eyes, in that single and
 long glance which had been all our intercourse, had confessed a weakness
 equal to my own; but in my heart I knew her for the student of the cold
 northern chamber, and the writer of the sorrowful lines; and this was a
 knowledge to disarm a brute.  To flee was more than I could find courage
 for; but I registered a vow of unsleeping circumspection.
 
 As I turned from the window, my eyes alighted on the portrait.  It had
 fallen dead, like a candle after sunrise; it followed me with eyes of
 paint.  I knew it to be like, and marvelled at the tenacity of type in
 that declining race; but the likeness was swallowed up in difference.  I
 remembered how it had seemed to me a thing unapproachable in the life, a
 creature rather of the painter's craft than of the modesty of nature, and
 I marvelled at the thought, and exulted in the image of Olalla.  Beauty I
 had seen before, and not been charmed, and I had been often drawn to
 women, who were not beautiful except to me; but in Olalla all that I
 desired and had not dared to imagine was united.
 
 I did not see her the next day, and my heart ached and my eyes longed for
 her, as men long for morning.  But the day after, when I returned, about
 my usual hour, she was once more on the gallery, and our looks once more
 met and embraced.  I would have spoken, I would have drawn near to her;
 but strongly as she plucked at my heart, drawing me like a magnet,
 something yet more imperious withheld me; and I could only bow and pass
 by; and she, leaving my salutation unanswered, only followed me with her
 noble eyes.
 
 I had now her image by rote, and as I conned the traits in memory it
 seemed as if I read her very heart.  She was dressed with something of
 her mother's coquetry, and love of positive colour.  Her robe, which I
 know she must have made with her own hands, clung about her with a
 cunning grace.  After the fashion of that country, besides, her bodice
 stood open in the middle, in a long slit, and here, in spite of the
 poverty of the house, a gold coin, hanging by a ribbon, lay on her brown
 bosom.  These were proofs, had any been needed, of her inborn delight in
 life and her own loveliness.  On the other hand, in her eyes that hung
 upon mine, I could read depth beyond depth of passion and sadness, lights
 of poetry and hope, blacknesses of despair, and thoughts that were above
 the earth.  It was a lovely body, but the inmate, the soul, was more than
 worthy of that lodging.  Should I leave this incomparable flower to
 wither unseen on these rough mountains?  Should I despise the great gift
 offered me in the eloquent silence of her eyes?  Here was a soul immured;
 should I not burst its prison?  All side considerations fell off from me;
 were she the child of Herod I swore I should make her mine; and that very
 evening I set myself, with a mingled sense of treachery and disgrace, to
 captivate the brother.  Perhaps I read him with more favourable eyes,
 perhaps the thought of his sister always summoned up the better qualities
 of that imperfect soul; but he had never seemed to me so amiable, and his
 very likeness to Olalla, while it annoyed, yet softened me.
 
 A third day passed in vain--an empty desert of hours.  I would not lose a
 chance, and loitered all afternoon in the court where (to give myself a
 countenance) I spoke more than usual with the Senora.  God knows it was
 with a most tender and sincere interest that I now studied her; and even
 as for Felipe, so now for the mother, I was conscious of a growing warmth
 of toleration.  And yet I wondered.  Even while I spoke with her, she
 would doze off into a little sleep, and presently awake again without
 embarrassment; and this composure staggered me.  And again, as I marked
 her make infinitesimal changes in her posture, savouring and lingering on
 the bodily pleasure of the movement, I was driven to wonder at this depth
 of passive sensuality.  She lived in her body; and her consciousness was
 all sunk into and disseminated through her members, where it luxuriously
 dwelt.  Lastly, I could not grow accustomed to her eyes.  Each time she
 turned on me these great beautiful and meaningless orbs, wide open to the
 day, but closed against human inquiry--each time I had occasion to
 observe the lively changes of her pupils which expanded and contracted in
 a breath--I know not what it was came over me, I can find no name for the
 mingled feeling of disappointment, annoyance, and distaste that jarred
 along my nerves.  I tried her on a variety of subjects, equally in vain;
 and at last led the talk to her daughter.  But even there she proved
 indifferent; said she was pretty, which (as with children) was her
 highest word of commendation, but was plainly incapable of any higher
 thought; and when I remarked that Olalla seemed silent, merely yawned in
 my face and replied that speech was of no great use when you had nothing
 to say.  'People speak much, very much,' she added, looking at me with
 expanded pupils; and then again yawned and again showed me a mouth that
 was as dainty as a toy.  This time I took the hint, and, leaving her to
 her repose, went up into my own chamber to sit by the open window,
 looking on the hills and not beholding them, sunk in lustrous and deep
 dreams, and hearkening in fancy to the note of a voice that I had never
 heard.
 
 I awoke on the fifth morning with a brightness of anticipation that
 seemed to challenge fate.  I was sure of myself, light of heart and foot,
 and resolved to put my love incontinently to the touch of knowledge.  It
 should lie no longer under the bonds of silence, a dumb thing, living by
 the eye only, like the love of beasts; but should now put on the spirit,
 and enter upon the joys of the complete human intimacy.  I thought of it
 with wild hopes, like a voyager to El Dorado; into that unknown and
 lovely country of her soul, I no longer trembled to adventure.  Yet when
 I did indeed encounter her, the same force of passion descended on me and
 at once submerged my mind; speech seemed to drop away from me like a
 childish habit; and I but drew near to her as the giddy man draws near to
 the margin of a gulf.  She drew back from me a little as I came; but her
 eyes did not waver from mine, and these lured me forward.  At last, when
 I was already within reach of her, I stopped.  Words were denied me; if I
 advanced I could but clasp her to my heart in silence; and all that was
 sane in me, all that was still unconquered, revolted against the thought
 of such an accost.  So we stood for a second, all our life in our eyes,
 exchanging salvos of attraction and yet each resisting; and then, with a
 great effort of the will, and conscious at the same time of a sudden
 bitterness of disappointment, I turned and went away in the same silence.
 
 What power lay upon me that I could not speak?  And she, why was she also
 silent?  Why did she draw away before me dumbly, with fascinated eyes?
 Was this love? or was it a mere brute attraction, mindless and
 inevitable, like that of the magnet for the steel?  We had never spoken,
 we were wholly strangers: and yet an influence, strong as the grasp of a
 giant, swept us silently together.  On my side, it filled me with
 impatience; and yet I was sure that she was worthy; I had seen her books,
 read her verses, and thus, in a sense, divined the soul of my mistress.
 But on her side, it struck me almost cold.  Of me, she knew nothing but
 my bodily favour; she was drawn to me as stones fall to the earth; the
 laws that rule the earth conducted her, unconsenting, to my arms; and I
 drew back at the thought of such a bridal, and began to be jealous for
 myself.  It was not thus that I desired to be loved.  And then I began to
 fall into a great pity for the girl herself.  I thought how sharp must be
 her mortification, that she, the student, the recluse, Felipe's saintly
 monitress, should have thus confessed an overweening weakness for a man
 with whom she had never exchanged a word.  And at the coming of pity, all
 other thoughts were swallowed up; and I longed only to find and console
 and reassure her; to tell her how wholly her love was returned on my
 side, and how her choice, even if blindly made, was not unworthy.
 
 The next day it was glorious weather; depth upon depth of blue
 over-canopied the mountains; the sun shone wide; and the wind in the
 trees and the many falling torrents in the mountains filled the air with
 delicate and haunting music.  Yet I was prostrated with sadness.  My
 heart wept for the sight of Olalla, as a child weeps for its mother.  I
 sat down on a boulder on the verge of the low cliffs that bound the
 plateau to the north.  Thence I looked down into the wooded valley of a
 stream, where no foot came.  In the mood I was in, it was even touching
 to behold the place untenanted; it lacked Olalla; and I thought of the
 delight and glory of a life passed wholly with her in that strong air,
 and among these rugged and lovely surroundings, at first with a
 whimpering sentiment, and then again with such a fiery joy that I seemed
 to grow in strength and stature, like a Samson.
 
 And then suddenly I was aware of Olalla drawing near.  She appeared out
 of a grove of cork-trees, and came straight towards me; and I stood up
 and waited.  She seemed in her walking a creature of such life and fire
 and lightness as amazed me; yet she came quietly and slowly.  Her energy
 was in the slowness; but for inimitable strength, I felt she would have
 run, she would have flown to me.  Still, as she approached, she kept her
 eyes lowered to the ground; and when she had drawn quite near, it was
 without one glance that she addressed me.  At the first note of her voice
 I started.  It was for this I had been waiting; this was the last test of
 my love.  And lo, her enunciation was precise and clear, not lisping and
 incomplete like that of her family; and the voice, though deeper than
 usual with women, was still both youthful and womanly.  She spoke in a
 rich chord; golden contralto strains mingled with hoarseness, as the red
 threads were mingled with the brown among her tresses.  It was not only a
 voice that spoke to my heart directly; but it spoke to me of her.  And
 yet her words immediately plunged me back upon despair.
 
 'You will go away,' she said, 'to-day.'
 
 Her example broke the bonds of my speech; I felt as lightened of a
 weight, or as if a spell had been dissolved.  I know not in what words I
 answered; but, standing before her on the cliffs, I poured out the whole
 ardour of my love, telling her that I lived upon the thought of her,
 slept only to dream of her loveliness, and would gladly forswear my
 country, my language, and my friends, to live for ever by her side.  And
 then, strongly commanding myself, I changed the note; I reassured, I
 comforted her; I told her I had divined in her a pious and heroic spirit,
 with which I was worthy to sympathise, and which I longed to share and
 lighten.  'Nature,' I told her, 'was the voice of God, which men disobey
 at peril; and if we were thus humbly drawn together, ay, even as by a
 miracle of love, it must imply a divine fitness in our souls; we must be
 made,' I said--'made for one another.  We should be mad rebels,' I cried
 out--'mad rebels against God, not to obey this instinct.'
 
 She shook her head.  'You will go to-day,' she repeated, and then with a
 gesture, and in a sudden, sharp note--'no, not to-day,' she cried, 'to-
 morrow!'
 
 But at this sign of relenting, power came in upon me in a tide.  I
 stretched out my arms and called upon her name; and she leaped to me and
 clung to me.  The hills rocked about us, the earth quailed; a shock as of
 a blow went through me and left me blind and dizzy.  And the next moment
 she had thrust me back, broken rudely from my arms, and fled with the
 speed of a deer among the cork-trees.
 
 I stood and shouted to the mountains; I turned and went back towards the
 residencia, waltzing upon air.  She sent me away, and yet I had but to
 call upon her name and she came to me.  These were but the weaknesses of
 girls, from which even she, the strangest of her sex, was not exempted.
 Go?  Not I, Olalla--O, not I, Olalla, my Olalla!  A bird sang near by;
 and in that season, birds were rare.  It bade me be of good cheer.  And
 once more the whole countenance of nature, from the ponderous and stable
 mountains down to the lightest leaf and the smallest darting fly in the
 shadow of the groves, began to stir before me and to put on the
 lineaments of life and wear a face of awful joy.  The sunshine struck
 upon the hills, strong as a hammer on the anvil, and the hills shook; the
 earth, under that vigorous insulation, yielded up heady scents; the woods
 smouldered in the blaze.  I felt the thrill of travail and delight run
 through the earth.  Something elemental, something rude, violent, and
 savage, in the love that sang in my heart, was like a key to nature's
 secrets; and the very stones that rattled under my feet appeared alive
 and friendly.  Olalla!  Her touch had quickened, and renewed, and strung
 me up to the old pitch of concert with the rugged earth, to a swelling of
 the soul that men learn to forget in their polite assemblies.  Love
 burned in me like rage; tenderness waxed fierce; I hated, I adored, I
 pitied, I revered her with ecstasy.  She seemed the link that bound me in
 with dead things on the one hand, and with our pure and pitying God upon
 the other: a thing brutal and divine, and akin at once to the innocence
 and to the unbridled forces of the earth.
 
 My head thus reeling, I came into the courtyard of the residencia, and
 the sight of the mother struck me like a revelation.  She sat there, all
 sloth and contentment, blinking under the strong sunshine, branded with a
 passive enjoyment, a creature set quite apart, before whom my ardour fell
 away like a thing ashamed.  I stopped a moment, and, commanding such
 shaken tones as I was able, said a word or two.  She looked at me with
 her unfathomable kindness; her voice in reply sounded vaguely out of the
 realm of peace in which she slumbered, and there fell on my mind, for the
 first time, a sense of respect for one so uniformly innocent and happy,
 and I passed on in a kind of wonder at myself, that I should be so much
 disquieted.
 
 On my table there lay a piece of the same yellow paper I had seen in the
 north room; it was written on with pencil in the same hand, Olalla's
 hand, and I picked it up with a sudden sinking of alarm, and read, 'If
 you have any kindness for Olalla, if you have any chivalry for a creature
 sorely wrought, go from here to-day; in pity, in honour, for the sake of
 Him who died, I supplicate that you shall go.'  I looked at this awhile
 in mere stupidity, then I began to awaken to a weariness and horror of
 life; the sunshine darkened outside on the bare hills, and I began to
 shake like a man in terror.  The vacancy thus suddenly opened in my life
 unmanned me like a physical void.  It was not my heart, it was not my
 happiness, it was life itself that was involved.  I could not lose her.  I
 said so, and stood repeating it.  And then, like one in a dream, I moved
 to the window, put forth my hand to open the casement, and thrust it
 through the pane.  The blood spurted from my wrist; and with an
 instantaneous quietude and command of myself, I pressed my thumb on the
 little leaping fountain, and reflected what to do.  In that empty room
 there was nothing to my purpose; I felt, besides, that I required
 assistance.  There shot into my mind a hope that Olalla herself might be
 my helper, and I turned and went down stairs, still keeping my thumb upon
 the wound.
 
 There was no sign of either Olalla or Felipe, and I addressed myself to
 the recess, whither the Senora had now drawn quite back and sat dozing
 close before the fire, for no degree of heat appeared too much for her.
 
 'Pardon me,' said I, 'if I disturb you, but I must apply to you for
 help.'
 
 She looked up sleepily and asked me what it was, and with the very words
 I thought she drew in her breath with a widening of the nostrils and
 seemed to come suddenly and fully alive.
 
 'I have cut myself,' I said, 'and rather badly.  See!'  And I held out my
 two hands from which the blood was oozing and dripping.
 
 Her great eyes opened wide, the pupils shrank into points; a veil seemed
 to fall from her face, and leave it sharply expressive and yet
 inscrutable.  And as I still stood, marvelling a little at her
 disturbance, she came swiftly up to me, and stooped and caught me by the
 hand; and the next moment my hand was at her mouth, and she had bitten me
 to the bone.  The pang of the bite, the sudden spurting of blood, and the
 monstrous horror of the act, flashed through me all in one, and I beat
 her back; and she sprang at me again and again, with bestial cries, cries
 that I recognised, such cries as had awakened me on the night of the high
 wind.  Her strength was like that of madness; mine was rapidly ebbing
 with the loss of blood; my mind besides was whirling with the abhorrent
 strangeness of the onslaught, and I was already forced against the wall,
 when Olalla ran betwixt us, and Felipe, following at a bound, pinned down
 his mother on the floor.
 
 A trance-like weakness fell upon me; I saw, heard, and felt, but I was
 incapable of movement.  I heard the struggle roll to and fro upon the
 floor, the yells of that catamount ringing up to Heaven as she strove to
 reach me.  I felt Olalla clasp me in her arms, her hair falling on my
 face, and, with the strength of a man, raise and half drag, half carry me
 upstairs into my own room, where she cast me down upon the bed.  Then I
 saw her hasten to the door and lock it, and stand an instant listening to
 the savage cries that shook the residencia.  And then, swift and light as
 a thought, she was again beside me, binding up my hand, laying it in her
 bosom, moaning and mourning over it with dove-like sounds.  They were not
 words that came to her, they were sounds more beautiful than speech,
 infinitely touching, infinitely tender; and yet as I lay there, a thought
 stung to my heart, a thought wounded me like a sword, a thought, like a
 worm in a flower, profaned the holiness of my love.  Yes, they were
 beautiful sounds, and they were inspired by human tenderness; but was
 their beauty human?
 
 All day I lay there.  For a long time the cries of that nameless female
 thing, as she struggled with her half-witted whelp, resounded through the
 house, and pierced me with despairing sorrow and disgust.  They were the
 death-cry of my love; my love was murdered; was not only dead, but an
 offence to me; and yet, think as I pleased, feel as I must, it still
 swelled within me like a storm of sweetness, and my heart melted at her
 looks and touch.  This horror that had sprung out, this doubt upon
 Olalla, this savage and bestial strain that ran not only through the
 whole behaviour of her family, but found a place in the very foundations
 and story of our love--though it appalled, though it shocked and sickened
 me, was yet not of power to break the knot of my infatuation.
 
 When the cries had ceased, there came a scraping at the door, by which I
 knew Felipe was without; and Olalla went and spoke to him--I know not
 what.  With that exception, she stayed close beside me, now kneeling by
 my bed and fervently praying, now sitting with her eyes upon mine.  So
 then, for these six hours I drank in her beauty, and silently perused the
 story in her face.  I saw the golden coin hover on her breaths; I saw her
 eyes darken and brighter, and still speak no language but that of an
 unfathomable kindness; I saw the faultless face, and, through the robe,
 the lines of the faultless body.  Night came at last, and in the growing
 darkness of the chamber, the sight of her slowly melted; but even then
 the touch of her smooth hand lingered in mine and talked with me.  To lie
 thus in deadly weakness and drink in the traits of the beloved, is to
 reawake to love from whatever shock of disillusion.  I reasoned with
 myself; and I shut my eyes on horrors, and again I was very bold to
 accept the worst.  What mattered it, if that imperious sentiment
 survived; if her eyes still beckoned and attached me; if now, even as
 before, every fibre of my dull body yearned and turned to her?  Late on
 in the night some strength revived in me, and I spoke:--
 
 'Olalla,' I said, 'nothing matters; I ask nothing; I am content; I love
 you.'
 
 She knelt down awhile and prayed, and I devoutly respected her devotions.
 The moon had begun to shine in upon one side of each of the three
 windows, and make a misty clearness in the room, by which I saw her
 indistinctly.  When she rearose she made the sign of the cross.
 
 'It is for me to speak,' she said, 'and for you to listen.  I know; you
 can but guess.  I prayed, how I prayed for you to leave this place.  I
 begged it of you, and I know you would have granted me even this; or if
 not, O let me think so!'
 
 'I love you,' I said.
 
 'And yet you have lived in the world,' she said; after a pause, 'you are
 a man and wise; and I am but a child.  Forgive me, if I seem to teach,
 who am as ignorant as the trees of the mountain; but those who learn much
 do but skim the face of knowledge; they seize the laws, they conceive the
 dignity of the design--the horror of the living fact fades from their
 memory.  It is we who sit at home with evil who remember, I think, and
 are warned and pity.  Go, rather, go now, and keep me in mind.  So I
 shall have a life in the cherished places of your memory: a life as much
 my own, as that which I lead in this body.'
 
 'I love you,' I said once more; and reaching out my weak hand, took hers,
 and carried it to my lips, and kissed it.  Nor did she resist, but winced
 a little; and I could see her look upon me with a frown that was not
 unkindly, only sad and baffled.  And then it seemed she made a call upon
 her resolution; plucked my hand towards her, herself at the same time
 leaning somewhat forward, and laid it on the beating of her heart.
 'There,' she cried, 'you feel the very footfall of my life.  It only
 moves for you; it is yours.  But is it even mine?  It is mine indeed to
 offer you, as I might take the coin from my neck, as I might break a live
 branch from a tree, and give it you.  And yet not mine!  I dwell, or I
 think I dwell (if I exist at all), somewhere apart, an impotent prisoner,
 and carried about and deafened by a mob that I disown.  This capsule,
 such as throbs against the sides of animals, knows you at a touch for its
 master; ay, it loves you!  But my soul, does my soul?  I think not; I
 know not, fearing to ask.  Yet when you spoke to me your words were of
 the soul; it is of the soul that you ask--it is only from the soul that
 you would take me.'
 
 'Olalla,' I said, 'the soul and the body are one, and mostly so in love.
 What the body chooses, the soul loves; where the body clings, the soul
 cleaves; body for body, soul to soul, they come together at God's signal;
 and the lower part (if we can call aught low) is only the footstool and
 foundation of the highest.'
 
 'Have you,' she said, 'seen the portraits in the house of my fathers?
 Have you looked at my mother or at Felipe?  Have your eyes never rested
 on that picture that hangs by your bed?  She who sat for it died ages
 ago; and she did evil in her life.  But, look-again: there is my hand to
 the least line, there are my eyes and my hair.  What is mine, then, and
 what am I?  If not a curve in this poor body of mine (which you love, and
 for the sake of which you dotingly dream that you love me) not a gesture
 that I can frame, not a tone of my voice, not any look from my eyes, no,
 not even now when I speak to him I love, but has belonged to others?
 Others, ages dead, have wooed other men with my eyes; other men have
 heard the pleading of the same voice that now sounds in your ears.  The
 hands of the dead are in my bosom; they move me, they pluck me, they
 guide me; I am a puppet at their command; and I but reinform features and
 attributes that have long been laid aside from evil in the quiet of the
 grave.  Is it me you love, friend? or the race that made me?  The girl
 who does not know and cannot answer for the least portion of herself? or
 the stream of which she is a transitory eddy, the tree of which she is
 the passing fruit?  The race exists; it is old, it is ever young, it
 carries its eternal destiny in its bosom; upon it, like waves upon the
 sea, individual succeeds to individual, mocked with a semblance of self-
 control, but they are nothing.  We speak of the soul, but the soul is in
 the race.'
 
 'You fret against the common law,' I said.  'You rebel against the voice
 of God, which he has made so winning to convince, so imperious to
 command.  Hear it, and how it speaks between us!  Your hand clings to
 mine, your heart leaps at my touch, the unknown elements of which we are
 compounded awake and run together at a look; the clay of the earth
 remembers its independent life and yearns to join us; we are drawn
 together as the stars are turned about in space, or as the tides ebb and
 flow, by things older and greater than we ourselves.'
 
 'Alas!' she said, 'what can I say to you?  My fathers, eight hundred
 years ago, ruled all this province: they were wise, great, cunning, and
 cruel; they were a picked race of the Spanish; their flags led in war;
 the king called them his cousin; the people, when the rope was slung for
 them or when they returned and found their hovels smoking, blasphemed
 their name.  Presently a change began.  Man has risen; if he has sprung
 from the brutes, he can descend again to the same level.  The breath of
 weariness blew on their humanity and the cords relaxed; they began to go
 down; their minds fell on sleep, their passions awoke in gusts, heady and
 senseless like the wind in the gutters of the mountains; beauty was still
 handed down, but no longer the guiding wit nor the human heart; the seed
 passed on, it was wrapped in flesh, the flesh covered the bones, but they
 were the bones and the flesh of brutes, and their mind was as the mind of
 flies.  I speak to you as I dare; but you have seen for yourself how the
 wheel has gone backward with my doomed race.  I stand, as it were, upon a
 little rising ground in this desperate descent, and see both before and
 behind, both what we have lost and to what we are condemned to go farther
 downward.  And shall I--I that dwell apart in the house of the dead, my
 body, loathing its ways--shall I repeat the spell?  Shall I bind another
 spirit, reluctant as my own, into this bewitched and tempest-broken
 tenement that I now suffer in?  Shall I hand down this cursed vessel of
 humanity, charge it with fresh life as with fresh poison, and dash it,
 like a fire, in the faces of posterity?  But my vow has been given; the
 race shall cease from off the earth.  At this hour my brother is making
 ready; his foot will soon be on the stair; and you will go with him and
 pass out of my sight for ever.  Think of me sometimes as one to whom the
 lesson of life was very harshly told, but who heard it with courage; as
 one who loved you indeed, but who hated herself so deeply that her love
 was hateful to her; as one who sent you away and yet would have longed to
 keep you for ever; who had no dearer hope than to forget you, and no
 greater fear than to be forgotten.'
 
 She had drawn towards the door as she spoke, her rich voice sounding
 softer and farther away; and with the last word she was gone, and I lay
 alone in the moonlit chamber.  What I might have done had not I lain
 bound by my extreme weakness, I know not; but as it was there fell upon
 me a great and blank despair.  It was not long before there shone in at
 the door the ruddy glimmer of a lantern, and Felipe coming, charged me
 without a word upon his shoulders, and carried me down to the great gate,
 where the cart was waiting.  In the moonlight the hills stood out
 sharply, as if they were of cardboard; on the glimmering surface of the
 plateau, and from among the low trees which swung together and sparkled
 in the wind, the great black cube of the residencia stood out bulkily,
 its mass only broken by three dimly lighted windows in the northern front
 above the gate.  They were Olalla's windows, and as the cart jolted
 onwards I kept my eyes fixed upon them till, where the road dipped into a
 valley, they were lost to my view forever.  Felipe walked in silence
 beside the shafts, but from time to time he would cheek the mule and seem
 to look back upon me; and at length drew quite near and laid his hand
 upon my head.  There was such kindness in the touch, and such a
 simplicity, as of the brutes, that tears broke from me like the bursting
 of an artery.
 
 'Felipe,' I said, 'take me where they will ask no questions.'
 
 He said never a word, but he turned his mule about, end for end, retraced
 some part of the way we had gone, and, striking into another path, led me
 to the mountain village, which was, as we say in Scotland, the kirkton of
 that thinly peopled district.  Some broken memories dwell in my mind of
 the day breaking over the plain, of the cart stopping, of arms that
 helped me down, of a bare room into which I was carried, and of a swoon
 that fell upon me like sleep.
 
 The next day and the days following the old priest was often at my side
 with his snuff-box and prayer book, and after a while, when I began to
 pick up strength, he told me that I was now on a fair way to recovery,
 and must as soon as possible hurry my departure; whereupon, without
 naming any reason, he took snuff and looked at me sideways.  I did not
 affect ignorance; I knew he must have seen Olalla.  'Sir,' said I, 'you
 know that I do not ask in wantonness.  What of that family?'
 
 He said they were very unfortunate; that it seemed a declining race, and
 that they were very poor and had been much neglected.
 
 'But she has not,' I said.  'Thanks, doubtless, to yourself, she is
 instructed and wise beyond the use of women.'
 
 'Yes,' he said; 'the Senorita is well-informed.  But the family has been
 neglected.'
 
 'The mother?' I queried.
 
 'Yes, the mother too,' said the Padre, taking snuff.  'But Felipe is a
 well-intentioned lad.'
 
 'The mother is odd?' I asked.
 
 'Very odd,' replied the priest.
 
 'I think, sir, we beat about the bush,' said I.  'You must know more of
 my affairs than you allow.  You must know my curiosity to be justified on
 many grounds.  Will you not be frank with me?'
 
 'My son,' said the old gentleman, 'I will be very frank with you on
 matters within my competence; on those of which I know nothing it does
 not require much discretion to be silent.  I will not fence with you, I
 take your meaning perfectly; and what can I say, but that we are all in
 God's hands, and that His ways are not as our ways?  I have even advised
 with my superiors in the church, but they, too, were dumb.  It is a great
 mystery.'
 
 'Is she mad?' I asked.
 
 'I will answer you according to my belief.  She is not,' returned the
 Padre, 'or she was not.  When she was young--God help me, I fear I
 neglected that wild lamb--she was surely sane; and yet, although it did
 not run to such heights, the same strain was already notable; it had been
 so before her in her father, ay, and before him, and this inclined me,
 perhaps, to think too lightly of it.  But these things go on growing, not
 only in the individual but in the race.'
 
 'When she was young,' I began, and my voice failed me for a moment, and
 it was only with a great effort that I was able to add, 'was she like
 Olalla?'
 
 'Now God forbid!' exclaimed the Padre.  'God forbid that any man should
 think so slightingly of my favourite penitent.  No, no; the Senorita (but
 for her beauty, which I wish most honestly she had less of) has not a
 hair's resemblance to what her mother was at the same age.  I could not
 bear to have you think so; though, Heaven knows, it were, perhaps, better
 that you should.'
 
 At this, I raised myself in bed, and opened my heart to the old man;
 telling him of our love and of her decision, owning my own horrors, my
 own passing fancies, but telling him that these were at an end; and with
 something more than a purely formal submission, appealing to his
 judgment.
 
 He heard me very patiently and without surprise; and when I had done, he
 sat for some time silent.  Then he began: 'The church,' and instantly
 broke off again to apologise.  'I had forgotten, my child, that you were
 not a Christian,' said he.  'And indeed, upon a point so highly unusual,
 even the church can scarce be said to have decided.  But would you have
 my opinion?  The Senorita is, in a matter of this kind, the best judge; I
 would accept her judgment.'
 
 On the back of that he went away, nor was he thenceforward so assiduous
 in his visits; indeed, even when I began to get about again, he plainly
 feared and deprecated my society, not as in distaste but much as a man
 might be disposed to flee from the riddling sphynx.  The villagers, too,
 avoided me; they were unwilling to be my guides upon the mountain.  I
 thought they looked at me askance, and I made sure that the more
 superstitious crossed themselves on my approach.  At first I set this
 down to my heretical opinions; but it began at length to dawn upon me
 that if I was thus redoubted it was because I had stayed at the
 residencia.  All men despise the savage notions of such peasantry; and
 yet I was conscious of a chill shadow that seemed to fall and dwell upon
 my love.  It did not conquer, but I may not deify that it restrained my
 ardour.
 
 Some miles westward of the village there was a gap in the sierra, from
 which the eye plunged direct upon the residencia; and thither it became
 my daily habit to repair.  A wood crowned the summit; and just where the
 pathway issued from its fringes, it was overhung by a considerable shelf
 of rock, and that, in its turn, was surmounted by a crucifix of the size
 of life and more than usually painful in design.  This was my perch;
 thence, day after day, I looked down upon the plateau, and the great old
 house, and could see Felipe, no bigger than a fly, going to and fro about
 the garden.  Sometimes mists would draw across the view, and be broken up
 again by mountain winds; sometimes the plain slumbered below me in
 unbroken sunshine; it would sometimes be all blotted out by rain.  This
 distant post, these interrupted sights of the place where my life had
 been so strangely changed, suited the indecision of my humour.  I passed
 whole days there, debating with myself the various elements of our
 position; now leaning to the suggestions of love, now giving an ear to
 prudence, and in the end halting irresolute between the two.
 
 One day, as I was sitting on my rock, there came by that way a somewhat
 gaunt peasant wrapped in a mantle.  He was a stranger, and plainly did
 not know me even by repute; for, instead of keeping the other side, he
 drew near and sat down beside me, and we had soon fallen in talk.  Among
 other things he told me he had been a muleteer, and in former years had
 much frequented these mountains; later on, he had followed the army with
 his mules, had realised a competence, and was now living retired with his
 family.
 
 'Do you know that house?' I inquired, at last, pointing to the
 residencia, for I readily wearied of any talk that kept me from the
 thought of Olalla.
 
 He looked at me darkly and crossed himself.
 
 'Too well,' he said, 'it was there that one of my comrades sold himself
 to Satan; the Virgin shield us from temptations!  He has paid the price;
 he is now burning in the reddest place in Hell!'
 
 A fear came upon me; I could answer nothing; and presently the man
 resumed, as if to himself: 'Yes,' he said, 'O yes, I know it.  I have
 passed its doors.  There was snow upon the pass, the wind was driving it;
 sure enough there was death that night upon the mountains, but there was
 worse beside the hearth.  I took him by the arm, Senor, and dragged him
 to the gate; I conjured him, by all he loved and respected, to go forth
 with me; I went on my knees before him in the snow; and I could see he
 was moved by my entreaty.  And just then she came out on the gallery, and
 called him by his name; and he turned, and there was she standing with a
 lamp in her hand and smiling on him to come back.  I cried out aloud to
 God, and threw my arms about him, but he put me by, and left me alone.  He
 had made his choice; God help us.  I would pray for him, but to what end?
 there are sins that not even the Pope can loose.'
 
 'And your friend,' I asked, 'what became of him?'
 
 'Nay, God knows,' said the muleteer.  'If all be true that we hear, his
 end was like his sin, a thing to raise the hair.'
 
 'Do you mean that he was killed?' I asked.
 
 'Sure enough, he was killed,' returned the man.  'But how?  Ay, how?  But
 these are things that it is sin to speak of.'
 
 'The people of that house . . . ' I began.
 
 But he interrupted me with a savage outburst.  'The people?' he cried.
 'What people?  There are neither men nor women in that house of Satan's!
 What? have you lived here so long, and never heard?'  And here he put his
 mouth to my ear and whispered, as if even the fowls of the mountain might
 have over-heard and been stricken with horror.
 
 What he told me was not true, nor was it even original; being, indeed,
 but a new edition, vamped up again by village ignorance and superstition,
 of stories nearly as ancient as the race of man.  It was rather the
 application that appalled me.  In the old days, he said, the church would
 have burned out that nest of basilisks; but the arm of the church was now
 shortened; his friend Miguel had been unpunished by the hands of men, and
 left to the more awful judgment of an offended God.  This was wrong; but
 it should be so no more.  The Padre was sunk in age; he was even
 bewitched himself; but the eyes of his flock were now awake to their own
 danger; and some day--ay, and before long--the smoke of that house should
 go up to heaven.
 
 He left me filled with horror and fear.  Which way to turn I knew not;
 whether first to warn the Padre, or to carry my ill-news direct to the
 threatened inhabitants of the residencia.  Fate was to decide for me;
 for, while I was still hesitating, I beheld the veiled figure of a woman
 drawing near to me up the pathway.  No veil could deceive my penetration;
 by every line and every movement I recognised Olalla; and keeping hidden
 behind a corner of the rock, I suffered her to gain the summit.  Then I
 came forward.  She knew me and paused, but did not speak; I, too,
 remained silent; and we continued for some time to gaze upon each other
 with a passionate sadness.
 
 'I thought you had gone,' she said at length.  'It is all that you can do
 for me--to go.  It is all I ever asked of you.  And you still stay.  But
 do you know, that every day heaps up the peril of death, not only on your
 head, but on ours?  A report has gone about the mountain; it is thought
 you love me, and the people will not suffer it.'
 
 I saw she was already informed of her danger, and I rejoiced at it.
 'Olalla,' I said, 'I am ready to go this day, this very hour, but not
 alone.'
 
 She stepped aside and knelt down before the crucifix to pray, and I stood
 by and looked now at her and now at the object of her adoration, now at
 the living figure of the penitent, and now at the ghastly, daubed
 countenance, the painted wounds, and the projected ribs of the image.  The
 silence was only broken by the wailing of some large birds that circled
 sidelong, as if in surprise or alarm, about the summit of the hills.
 Presently Olalla rose again, turned towards me, raised her veil, and,
 still leaning with one hand on the shaft of the crucifix, looked upon me
 with a pale and sorrowful countenance.
 
 'I have laid my hand upon the cross,' she said.  'The Padre says you are
 no Christian; but look up for a moment with my eyes, and behold the face
 of the Man of Sorrows.  We are all such as He was--the inheritors of sin;
 we must all bear and expiate a past which was not ours; there is in all
 of us--ay, even in me--a sparkle of the divine.  Like Him, we must endure
 for a little while, until morning returns bringing peace.  Suffer me to
 pass on upon my way alone; it is thus that I shall be least lonely,
 counting for my friend Him who is the friend of all the distressed; it is
 thus that I shall be the most happy, having taken my farewell of earthly
 happiness, and willingly accepted sorrow for my portion.'
 
 I looked at the face of the crucifix, and, though I was no friend to
 images, and despised that imitative and grimacing art of which it was a
 rude example, some sense of what the thing implied was carried home to my
 intelligence.  The face looked down upon me with a painful and deadly
 contraction; but the rays of a glory encircled it, and reminded me that
 the sacrifice was voluntary.  It stood there, crowning the rock, as it
 still stands on so many highway sides, vainly preaching to passers-by, an
 emblem of sad and noble truths; that pleasure is not an end, but an
 accident; that pain is the choice of the magnanimous; that it is best to
 suffer all things and do well.  I turned and went down the mountain in
 silence; and when I looked back for the last time before the wood closed
 about my path, I saw Olalla still leaning on the crucifix.
 
 
 
 
 THE TREASURE OF FRANCHARD.
 
 
 CHAPTER I.  BY THE DYING MOUNTEBANK.
 
 
 They had sent for the doctor from Bourron before six.  About eight some
 villagers came round for the performance, and were told how matters
 stood.  It seemed a liberty for a mountebank to fall ill like real
 people, and they made off again in dudgeon.  By ten Madame Tentaillon was
 gravely alarmed, and had sent down the street for Doctor Desprez.
 
 The Doctor was at work over his manuscripts in one corner of the little
 dining-room, and his wife was asleep over the fire in another, when the
 messenger arrived.
 
 'Sapristi!' said the Doctor, 'you should have sent for me before.  It was
 a case for hurry.'  And he followed the messenger as he was, in his
 slippers and skull-cap.
 
 The inn was not thirty yards away, but the messenger did not stop there;
 he went in at one door and out by another into the court, and then led
 the way by a flight of steps beside the stable, to the loft where the
 mountebank lay sick.  If Doctor Desprez were to live a thousand years, he
 would never forget his arrival in that room; for not only was the scene
 picturesque, but the moment made a date in his existence.  We reckon our
 lives, I hardly know why, from the date of our first sorry appearance in
 society, as if from a first humiliation; for no actor can come upon the
 stage with a worse grace.  Not to go further back, which would be judged
 too curious, there are subsequently many moving and decisive accidents in
 the lives of all, which would make as logical a period as this of birth.
 And here, for instance, Doctor Desprez, a man past forty, who had made
 what is called a failure in life, and was moreover married, found himself
 at a new point of departure when he opened the door of the loft above
 Tentaillon's stable.
 
 It was a large place, lighted only by a single candle set upon the floor.
 The mountebank lay on his back upon a pallet; a large man, with a
 Quixotic nose inflamed with drinking.  Madame Tentaillon stooped over
 him, applying a hot water and mustard embrocation to his feet; and on a
 chair close by sat a little fellow of eleven or twelve, with his feet
 dangling.  These three were the only occupants, except the shadows.  But
 the shadows were a company in themselves; the extent of the room
 exaggerated them to a gigantic size, and from the low position of the
 candle the light struck upwards and produced deformed foreshortenings.
 The mountebank's profile was enlarged upon the wall in caricature, and it
 was strange to see his nose shorten and lengthen as the flame was blown
 about by draughts.  As for Madame Tentaillon, her shadow was no more than
 a gross hump of shoulders, with now and again a hemisphere of head.  The
 chair legs were spindled out as long as stilts, and the boy set perched
 atop of them, like a cloud, in the corner of the roof.
 
 It was the boy who took the Doctor's fancy.  He had a great arched skull,
 the forehead and the hands of a musician, and a pair of haunting eyes.  It
 was not merely that these eyes were large, or steady, or the softest
 ruddy brown.  There was a look in them, besides, which thrilled the
 Doctor, and made him half uneasy.  He was sure he had seen such a look
 before, and yet he could not remember how or where.  It was as if this
 boy, who was quite a stranger to him, had the eyes of an old friend or an
 old enemy.  And the boy would give him no peace; he seemed profoundly
 indifferent to what was going on, or rather abstracted from it in a
 superior contemplation, beating gently with his feet against the bars of
 the chair, and holding his hands folded on his lap.  But, for all that,
 his eyes kept following the Doctor about the room with a thoughtful
 fixity of gaze.  Desprez could not tell whether he was fascinating the
 boy, or the boy was fascinating him.  He busied himself over the sick
 man: he put questions, he felt the pulse, he jested, he grew a little hot
 and swore: and still, whenever he looked round, there were the brown eyes
 waiting for his with the same inquiring, melancholy gaze.
 
 At last the Doctor hit on the solution at a leap.  He remembered the look
 now.  The little fellow, although he was as straight as a dart, had the
 eyes that go usually with a crooked back; he was not at all deformed, and
 yet a deformed person seemed to be looking at you from below his brows.
 The Doctor drew a long breath, he was so much relieved to find a theory
 (for he loved theories) and to explain away his interest.
 
 For all that, he despatched the invalid with unusual haste, and, still
 kneeling with one knee on the floor, turned a little round and looked the
 boy over at his leisure.  The boy was not in the least put out, but
 looked placidly back at the Doctor.
 
 'Is this your father?' asked Desprez.
 
 'Oh, no,' returned the boy; 'my master.'
 
 'Are you fond of him?' continued the Doctor.
 
 'No, sir,' said the boy.
 
 Madame Tentaillon and Desprez exchanged expressive glances.
 
 'That is bad, my man,' resumed the latter, with a shade of sternness.
 'Every one should be fond of the dying, or conceal their sentiments; and
 your master here is dying.  If I have watched a bird a little while
 stealing my cherries, I have a thought of disappointment when he flies
 away over my garden wall, and I see him steer for the forest and vanish.
 How much more a creature such as this, so strong, so astute, so richly
 endowed with faculties!  When I think that, in a few hours, the speech
 will be silenced, the breath extinct, and even the shadow vanished from
 the wall, I who never saw him, this lady who knew him only as a guest,
 are touched with some affection.'
 
 The boy was silent for a little, and appeared to be reflecting.
 
 'You did not know him,' he replied at last, 'he was a bad man.'
 
 'He is a little pagan,' said the landlady.  'For that matter, they are
 all the same, these mountebanks, tumblers, artists, and what not.  They
 have no interior.'
 
 But the Doctor was still scrutinising the little pagan, his eyebrows
 knotted and uplifted.
 
 'What is your name?' he asked.
 
 'Jean-Marie,' said the lad.
 
 Desprez leaped upon him with one of his sudden flashes of excitement, and
 felt his head all over from an ethnological point of view.
 
 'Celtic, Celtic!' he said.
 
 'Celtic!' cried Madame Tentaillon, who had perhaps confounded the word
 with hydrocephalous.  'Poor lad! is it dangerous?'
 
 'That depends,' returned the Doctor grimly.  And then once more
 addressing the boy: 'And what do you do for your living, Jean-Marie?' he
 inquired.
 
 'I tumble,' was the answer.
 
 'So!  Tumble?' repeated Desprez.  'Probably healthful.  I hazard the
 guess, Madame Tentaillon, that tumbling is a healthful way of life.  And
 have you never done anything else but tumble?'
 
 'Before I learned that, I used to steal,' answered Jean-Marie gravely.
 
 'Upon my word!' cried the doctor.  'You are a nice little man for your
 age.  Madame, when my _confrere_ comes from Bourron, you will communicate
 my unfavourable opinion.  I leave the case in his hands; but of course,
 on any alarming symptom, above all if there should be a sign of rally, do
 not hesitate to knock me up.  I am a doctor no longer, I thank God; but I
 have been one.  Good night, madame.  Good sleep to you, Jean-Marie.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.  MORNING TALK
 
 
 Doctor Desprez always rose early.  Before the smoke arose, before the
 first cart rattled over the bridge to the day's labour in the fields, he
 was to be found wandering in his garden.  Now he would pick a bunch of
 grapes; now he would eat a big pear under the trellice; now he would draw
 all sorts of fancies on the path with the end of his cane; now he would
 go down and watch the river running endlessly past the timber landing-
 place at which he moored his boat.  There was no time, he used to say,
 for making theories like the early morning.  'I rise earlier than any one
 else in the village,' he once boasted.  'It is a fair consequence that I
 know more and wish to do less with my knowledge.'
 
 The Doctor was a connoisseur of sunrises, and loved a good theatrical
 effect to usher in the day.  He had a theory of dew, by which he could
 predict the weather.  Indeed, most things served him to that end: the
 sound of the bells from all the neighbouring villages, the smell of the
 forest, the visits and the behaviour of both birds and fishes, the look
 of the plants in his garden, the disposition of cloud, the colour of the
 light, and last, although not least, the arsenal of meteorological
 instruments in a louvre-boarded hutch upon the lawn.  Ever since he had
 settled at Gretz, he had been growing more and more into the local
 meteorologist, the unpaid champion of the local climate.  He thought at
 first there was no place so healthful in the arrondissement.  By the end
 of the second year, he protested there was none so wholesome in the whole
 department.  And for some time before he met Jean-Marie he had been
 prepared to challenge all France and the better part of Europe for a
 rival to his chosen spot.
 
 'Doctor,' he would say--'doctor is a foul word.  It should not be used to
 ladies.  It implies disease.  I remark it, as a flaw in our civilisation,
 that we have not the proper horror of disease.  Now I, for my part, have
 washed my hands of it; I have renounced my laureation; I am no doctor; I
 am only a worshipper of the true goddess Hygieia.  Ah, believe me, it is
 she who has the cestus!  And here, in this exiguous hamlet, has she
 placed her shrine: here she dwells and lavishes her gifts; here I walk
 with her in the early morning, and she shows me how strong she has made
 the peasants, how fruitful she has made the fields, how the trees grow up
 tall and comely under her eyes, and the fishes in the river become clean
 and agile at her presence.--Rheumatism!' he would cry, on some malapert
 interruption, 'O, yes, I believe we do have a little rheumatism.  That
 could hardly be avoided, you know, on a river.  And of course the place
 stands a little low; and the meadows are marshy, there's no doubt.  But,
 my dear sir, look at Bourron!  Bourron stands high.  Bourron is close to
 the forest; plenty of ozone there, you would say.  Well, compared with
 Gretz, Bourron is a perfect shambles.'
 
 The morning after he had been summoned to the dying mountebank, the
 Doctor visited the wharf at the tail of his garden, and had a long look
 at the running water.  This he called prayer; but whether his adorations
 were addressed to the goddess Hygieia or some more orthodox deity, never
 plainly appeared.  For he had uttered doubtful oracles, sometimes
 declaring that a river was the type of bodily health, sometimes extolling
 it as the great moral preacher, continually preaching peace, continuity,
 and diligence to man's tormented spirits.  After he had watched a mile or
 so of the clear water running by before his eyes, seen a fish or two come
 to the surface with a gleam of silver, and sufficiently admired the long
 shadows of the trees falling half across the river from the opposite
 bank, with patches of moving sunlight in between, he strolled once more
 up the garden and through his house into the street, feeling cool and
 renovated.
 
 The sound of his feet upon the causeway began the business of the day;
 for the village was still sound asleep.  The church tower looked very
 airy in the sunlight; a few birds that turned about it, seemed to swim in
 an atmosphere of more than usual rarity; and the Doctor, walking in long
 transparent shadows, filled his lungs amply, and proclaimed himself well
 contented with the morning.
 
 On one of the posts before Tentaillon's carriage entry he espied a little
 dark figure perched in a meditative attitude, and immediately recognised
 Jean-Marie.
 
 'Aha!' he said, stopping before him humorously, with a hand on either
 knee.  'So we rise early in the morning, do we?  It appears to me that we
 have all the vices of a philosopher.'
 
 The boy got to his feet and made a grave salutation.
 
 'And how is our patient?' asked Desprez.
 
 It appeared the patient was about the same.
 
 'And why do you rise early in the morning?' he pursued.
 
 Jean-Marie, after a long silence, professed that he hardly knew.
 
 'You hardly know?' repeated Desprez.  'We hardly know anything, my man,
 until we try to learn.  Interrogate your consciousness.  Come, push me
 this inquiry home.  Do you like it?'
 
 'Yes,' said the boy slowly; 'yes, I like it.'
 
 'And why do you like it?' continued the Doctor.  '(We are now pursuing
 the Socratic method.)  Why do you like it?'
 
 'It is quiet,' answered Jean-Marie; 'and I have nothing to do; and then I
 feel as if I were good.'
 
 Doctor Desprez took a seat on the post at the opposite side.  He was
 beginning to take an interest in the talk, for the boy plainly thought
 before he spoke, and tried to answer truly.  'It appears you have a taste
 for feeling good,' said the Doctor.  'Now, there you puzzle me extremely;
 for I thought you said you were a thief; and the two are incompatible.'
 
 'Is it very bad to steal?' asked Jean-Marie.
 
 'Such is the general opinion, little boy,' replied the Doctor.
 
 'No; but I mean as I stole,' explained the other.  'For I had no choice.
 I think it is surely right to have bread; it must be right to have bread,
 there comes so plain a want of it.  And then they beat me cruelly if I
 returned with nothing,' he added.  'I was not ignorant of right and
 wrong; for before that I had been well taught by a priest, who was very
 kind to me.'  (The Doctor made a horrible grimace at the word 'priest.')
 'But it seemed to me, when one had nothing to eat and was beaten, it was
 a different affair.  I would not have stolen for tartlets, I believe; but
 any one would steal for baker's bread.'
 
 'And so I suppose,' said the Doctor, with a rising sneer, 'you prayed God
 to forgive you, and explained the case to Him at length.'
 
 'Why, sir?' asked Jean-Marie.  'I do not see.'
 
 'Your priest would see, however,' retorted Desprez.
 
 'Would he?' asked the boy, troubled for the first time.  'I should have
 thought God would have known.'
 
 'Eh?' snarled the Doctor.
 
 'I should have thought God would have understood me,' replied the other.
 'You do not, I see; but then it was God that made me think so, was it
 not?'
 
 'Little boy, little boy,' said Dr. Desprez, 'I told you already you had
 the vices of philosophy; if you display the virtues also, I must go.  I
 am a student of the blessed laws of health, an observer of plain and
 temperate nature in her common walks; and I cannot preserve my equanimity
 in presence of a monster.  Do you understand?'
 
 'No, sir,' said the boy.
 
 'I will make my meaning clear to you,' replied the doctor.  'Look there
 at the sky--behind the belfry first, where it is so light, and then up
 and up, turning your chin back, right to the top of the dome, where it is
 already as blue as at noon.  Is not that a beautiful colour?  Does it not
 please the heart?  We have seen it all our lives, until it has grown in
 with our familiar thoughts.  Now,' changing his tone, 'suppose that sky
 to become suddenly of a live and fiery amber, like the colour of clear
 coals, and growing scarlet towards the top--I do not say it would be any
 the less beautiful; but would you like it as well?'
 
 'I suppose not,' answered Jean-Marie.
 
 'Neither do I like you,' returned the Doctor, roughly.  'I hate all odd
 people, and you are the most curious little boy in all the world.'
 
 Jean-Marie seemed to ponder for a while, and then he raised his head
 again and looked over at the Doctor with an air of candid inquiry.  'But
 are not you a very curious gentleman?' he asked.
 
 The Doctor threw away his stick, bounded on the boy, clasped him to his
 bosom, and kissed him on both cheeks.  'Admirable, admirable imp!' he
 cried.  'What a morning, what an hour for a theorist of forty-two!  No,'
 he continued, apostrophising heaven, 'I did not know such boys existed; I
 was ignorant they made them so; I had doubted of my race; and now!  It is
 like,' he added, picking up his stick, 'like a lovers' meeting.  I have
 bruised my favourite staff in that moment of enthusiasm.  The injury,
 however, is not grave.'  He caught the boy looking at him in obvious
 wonder, embarrassment, and alarm.  'Hullo!' said he, 'why do you look at
 me like that?  Egad, I believe the boy despises me.  Do you despise me,
 boy?'
 
 'O, no,' replied Jean-Marie, seriously; 'only I do not understand.'
 
 'You must excuse me, sir,' returned the Doctor, with gravity; 'I am still
 so young.  O, hang him!' he added to himself.  And he took his seat again
 and observed the boy sardonically.  'He has spoiled the quiet of my
 morning,' thought he.  'I shall be nervous all day, and have a febricule
 when I digest.  Let me compose myself.'  And so he dismissed his
 pre-occupations by an effort of the will which he had long practised, and
 let his soul roam abroad in the contemplation of the morning.  He inhaled
 the air, tasting it critically as a connoisseur tastes a vintage, and
 prolonging the expiration with hygienic gusto.  He counted the little
 flecks of cloud along the sky.  He followed the movements of the birds
 round the church tower--making long sweeps, hanging poised, or turning
 airy somersaults in fancy, and beating the wind with imaginary pinions.
 And in this way he regained peace of mind and animal composure, conscious
 of his limbs, conscious of the sight of his eyes, conscious that the air
 had a cool taste, like a fruit, at the top of his throat; and at last, in
 complete abstraction, he began to sing.  The Doctor had but one air--,
 'Malbrouck s'en va-t-en guerre;' even with that he was on terms of mere
 politeness; and his musical exploits were always reserved for moments
 when he was alone and entirely happy.
 
 He was recalled to earth rudely by a pained expression on the boy's face.
 'What do you think of my singing?' he inquired, stopping in the middle of
 a note; and then, after he had waited some little while and received no
 answer, 'What do you think of my singing?' he repeated, imperiously.
 
 'I do not like it,' faltered Jean-Marie.
 
 'Oh, come!' cried the Doctor.  'Possibly you are a performer yourself?'
 
 'I sing better than that,' replied the boy.
 
 The Doctor eyed him for some seconds in stupefaction.  He was aware that
 he was angry, and blushed for himself in consequence, which made him
 angrier.  'If this is how you address your master!' he said at last, with
 a shrug and a flourish of his arms.
 
 'I do not speak to him at all,' returned the boy.  'I do not like him.'
 
 'Then you like me?' snapped Doctor Desprez, with unusual eagerness.
 
 'I do not know,' answered Jean-Marie.
 
 The Doctor rose.  'I shall wish you a good morning,' he said.  'You are
 too much for me.  Perhaps you have blood in your veins, perhaps celestial
 ichor, or perhaps you circulate nothing more gross than respirable air;
 but of one thing I am inexpugnably assured:--that you are no human being.
 No, boy'--shaking his stick at him--'you are not a human being.  Write,
 write it in your memory--"I am not a human being--I have no pretension to
 be a human being--I am a dive, a dream, an angel, an acrostic, an
 illusion--what you please, but not a human being."  And so accept my
 humble salutations and farewell!'
 
 And with that the Doctor made off along the street in some emotion, and
 the boy stood, mentally gaping, where he left him.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.  THE ADOPTION.
 
 
 Madame Desprez, who answered to the Christian name of Anastasie,
 presented an agreeable type of her sex; exceedingly wholesome to look
 upon, a stout _brune_, with cool smooth cheeks, steady, dark eyes, and
 hands that neither art nor nature could improve.  She was the sort of
 person over whom adversity passes like a summer cloud; she might, in the
 worst of conjunctions, knit her brows into one vertical furrow for a
 moment, but the next it would be gone.  She had much of the placidity of
 a contented nun; with little of her piety, however; for Anastasie was of
 a very mundane nature, fond of oysters and old wine, and somewhat bold
 pleasantries, and devoted to her husband for her own sake rather than for
 his.  She was imperturbably good-natured, but had no idea of
 self-sacrifice.  To live in that pleasant old house, with a green garden
 behind and bright flowers about the window, to eat and drink of the best,
 to gossip with a neighbour for a quarter of an hour, never to wear stays
 or a dress except when she went to Fontainebleau shopping, to be kept in
 a continual supply of racy novels, and to be married to Doctor Desprez
 and have no ground of jealousy, filled the cup of her nature to the brim.
 Those who had known the Doctor in bachelor days, when he had aired quite
 as many theories, but of a different order, attributed his present
 philosophy to the study of Anastasie.  It was her brute enjoyment that he
 rationalised and perhaps vainly imitated.
 
 Madame Desprez was an artist in the kitchen, and made coffee to a nicety.
 She had a knack of tidiness, with which she had infected the Doctor;
 everything was in its place; everything capable of polish shone
 gloriously; and dust was a thing banished from her empire.  Aline, their
 single servant, had no other business in the world but to scour and
 burnish.  So Doctor Desprez lived in his house like a fatted calf, warmed
 and cosseted to his heart's content.
 
 The midday meal was excellent.  There was a ripe melon, a fish from the
 river in a memorable Bearnaise sauce, a fat fowl in a fricassee, and a
 dish of asparagus, followed by some fruit.  The Doctor drank half a
 bottle _plus_ one glass, the wife half a bottle _minus_ the same
 quantity, which was a marital privilege, of an excellent Cote-Rotie,
 seven years old.  Then the coffee was brought, and a flask of Chartreuse
 for madame, for the Doctor despised and distrusted such decoctions; and
 then Aline left the wedded pair to the pleasures of memory and digestion.
 
 'It is a very fortunate circumstance, my cherished one,' observed the
 Doctor--'this coffee is adorable--a very fortunate circumstance upon the
 whole--Anastasie, I beseech you, go without that poison for to-day; only
 one day, and you will feel the benefit, I pledge my reputation.'
 
 'What is this fortunate circumstance, my friend?' inquired Anastasie, not
 heeding his protest, which was of daily recurrence.
 
 'That we have no children, my beautiful,' replied the Doctor.  'I think
 of it more and more as the years go on, and with more and more gratitude
 towards the Power that dispenses such afflictions.  Your health, my
 darling, my studious quiet, our little kitchen delicacies, how they would
 all have suffered, how they would all have been sacrificed!  And for
 what?  Children are the last word of human imperfection.  Health flees
 before their face.  They cry, my dear; they put vexatious questions; they
 demand to be fed, to be washed, to be educated, to have their noses
 blown; and then, when the time comes, they break our hearts, as I break
 this piece of sugar.  A pair of professed egoists, like you and me,
 should avoid offspring, like an infidelity.'
 
 'Indeed!' said she; and she laughed.  'Now, that is like you--to take
 credit for the thing you could not help.'
 
 'My dear,' returned the Doctor, solemnly, 'we might have adopted.'
 
 'Never!' cried madame.  'Never, Doctor, with my consent.  If the child
 were my own flesh and blood, I would not say no.  But to take another
 person's indiscretion on my shoulders, my dear friend, I have too much
 sense.'
 
 'Precisely,' replied the Doctor.  'We both had.  And I am all the better
 pleased with our wisdom, because--because--'  He looked at her sharply.
 
 'Because what?' she asked, with a faint premonition of danger.
 
 'Because I have found the right person,' said the Doctor firmly, 'and
 shall adopt him this afternoon.'
 
 Anastasie looked at him out of a mist.  'You have lost your reason,' she
 said; and there was a clang in her voice that seemed to threaten trouble.
 
 'Not so, my dear,' he replied; 'I retain its complete exercise.  To the
 proof: instead of attempting to cloak my inconsistency, I have, by way of
 preparing you, thrown it into strong relief.  You will there, I think,
 recognise the philosopher who has the ecstasy to call you wife.  The fact
 is, I have been reckoning all this while without an accident.  I never
 thought to find a son of my own.  Now, last night, I found one.  Do not
 unnecessarily alarm yourself, my dear; he is not a drop of blood to me
 that I know.  It is his mind, darling, his mind that calls me father.'
 
 'His mind!' she repeated with a titter between scorn and hysterics.  'His
 mind, indeed!  Henri, is this an idiotic pleasantry, or are you mad?  His
 mind!  And what of my mind?'
 
 'Truly,' replied the Doctor with a shrug, 'you have your finger on the
 hitch.  He will be strikingly antipathetic to my ever beautiful
 Anastasie.  She will never understand him; he will never understand her.
 You married the animal side of my nature, dear and it is on the spiritual
 side that I find my affinity for Jean-Marie.  So much so, that, to be
 perfectly frank, I stand in some awe of him myself.  You will easily
 perceive that I am announcing a calamity for you.  Do not,' he broke out
 in tones of real solicitude--'do not give way to tears after a meal,
 Anastasie.  You will certainly give yourself a false digestion.'
 
 Anastasie controlled herself.  'You know how willing I am to humour you,'
 she said, 'in all reasonable matters.  But on this point--'
 
 'My dear love,' interrupted the Doctor, eager to prevent a refusal, 'who
 wished to leave Paris?  Who made me give up cards, and the opera, and the
 boulevard, and my social relations, and all that was my life before I
 knew you?  Have I been faithful?  Have I been obedient?  Have I not borne
 my doom with cheerfulness?  In all honesty, Anastasie, have I not a right
 to a stipulation on my side?  I have, and you know it.  I stipulate my
 son.'
 
 Anastasie was aware of defeat; she struck her colours instantly.  'You
 will break my heart,' she sighed.
 
 'Not in the least,' said he.  'You will feel a trifling inconvenience for
 a month, just as I did when I was first brought to this vile hamlet; then
 your admirable sense and temper will prevail, and I see you already as
 content as ever, and making your husband the happiest of men.'
 
 'You know I can refuse you nothing,' she said, with a last flicker of
 resistance; 'nothing that will make you truly happier.  But will this?
 Are you sure, my husband?  Last night, you say, you found him!  He may be
 the worst of humbugs.'
 
 'I think not,' replied the Doctor.  'But do not suppose me so unwary as
 to adopt him out of hand.  I am, I flatter myself, a finished man of the
 world; I have had all possibilities in view; my plan is contrived to meet
 them all.  I take the lad as stable boy.  If he pilfer, if he grumble, if
 he desire to change, I shall see I was mistaken; I shall recognise him
 for no son of mine, and send him tramping.'
 
 'You will never do so when the time comes,' said his wife; 'I know your
 good heart.'
 
 She reached out her hand to him, with a sigh; the Doctor smiled as he
 took it and carried it to his lips; he had gained his point with greater
 ease than he had dared to hope; for perhaps the twentieth time he had
 proved the efficacy of his trusty argument, his Excalibur, the hint of a
 return to Paris.  Six months in the capital, for a man of the Doctor's
 antecedents and relations, implied no less a calamity than total ruin.
 Anastasie had saved the remainder of his fortune by keeping him strictly
 in the country.  The very name of Paris put her in a blue fear; and she
 would have allowed her husband to keep a menagerie in the back garden,
 let alone adopting a stable-boy, rather than permit the question of
 return to be discussed.
 
 About four of the afternoon, the mountebank rendered up his ghost; he had
 never been conscious since his seizure.  Doctor Desprez was present at
 his last passage, and declared the farce over.  Then he took Jean-Marie
 by the shoulder and led him out into the inn garden where there was a
 convenient bench beside the river.  Here he sat him down and made the boy
 place himself on his left.
 
 'Jean-Marie,' he said very gravely, 'this world is exceedingly vast; and
 even France, which is only a small corner of it, is a great place for a
 little lad like you.  Unfortunately it is full of eager, shouldering
 people moving on; and there are very few bakers' shops for so many
 eaters.  Your master is dead; you are not fit to gain a living by
 yourself; you do not wish to steal?  No.  Your situation then is
 undesirable; it is, for the moment, critical.  On the other hand, you
 behold in me a man not old, though elderly, still enjoying the youth of
 the heart and the intelligence; a man of instruction; easily situated in
 this world's affairs; keeping a good table:--a man, neither as friend nor
 host, to be despised.  I offer you your food and clothes, and to teach
 you lessons in the evening, which will be infinitely more to the purpose
 for a lad of your stamp than those of all the priests in Europe.  I
 propose no wages, but if ever you take a thought to leave me, the door
 shall be open, and I will give you a hundred francs to start the world
 upon.  In return, I have an old horse and chaise, which you would very
 speedily learn to clean and keep in order.  Do not hurry yourself to
 answer, and take it or leave it as you judge aright.  Only remember this,
 that I am no sentimentalist or charitable person, but a man who lives
 rigorously to himself; and that if I make the proposal, it is for my own
 ends--it is because I perceive clearly an advantage to myself.  And now,
 reflect.'
 
 'I shall be very glad.  I do not see what else I can do.  I thank you,
 sir, most kindly, and I will try to be useful,' said the boy.
 
 'Thank you,' said the Doctor warmly, rising at the same time and wiping
 his brow, for he had suffered agonies while the thing hung in the wind.  A
 refusal, after the scene at noon, would have placed him in a ridiculous
 light before Anastasie.  'How hot and heavy is the evening, to be sure!  I
 have always had a fancy to be a fish in summer, Jean-Marie, here in the
 Loing beside Gretz.  I should lie under a water-lily and listen to the
 bells, which must sound most delicately down below.  That would be a
 life--do you not think so too?'
 
 'Yes,' said Jean-Marie.
 
 'Thank God you have imagination!' cried the Doctor, embracing the boy
 with his usual effusive warmth, though it was a proceeding that seemed to
 disconcert the sufferer almost as much as if he had been an English
 schoolboy of the same age.  'And now,' he added, 'I will take you to my
 wife.'
 
 Madame Desprez sat in the dining-room in a cool wrapper.  All the blinds
 were down, and the tile floor had been recently sprinkled with water; her
 eyes were half shut, but she affected to be reading a novel as the they
 entered.  Though she was a bustling woman, she enjoyed repose between
 whiles and had a remarkable appetite for sleep.
 
 The Doctor went through a solemn form of introduction, adding, for the
 benefit of both parties, 'You must try to like each other for my sake.'
 
 'He is very pretty,' said Anastasie.  'Will you kiss me, my pretty little
 fellow?'
 
 The Doctor was furious, and dragged her into the passage.  'Are you a
 fool, Anastasie?' he said.  'What is all this I hear about the tact of
 women?  Heaven knows, I have not met with it in my experience.  You
 address my little philosopher as if he were an infant.  He must be spoken
 to with more respect, I tell you; he must not be kissed and
 Georgy-porgy'd like an ordinary child.'
 
 'I only did it to please you, I am sure,' replied Anastasie; 'but I will
 try to do better.'
 
 The Doctor apologised for his warmth.  'But I do wish him,' he continued,
 'to feel at home among us.  And really your conduct was so idiotic, my
 cherished one, and so utterly and distantly out of place, that a saint
 might have been pardoned a little vehemence in disapproval.  Do, do
 try--if it is possible for a woman to understand young people--but of
 course it is not, and I waste my breath.  Hold your tongue as much as
 possible at least, and observe my conduct narrowly; it will serve you for
 a model.'
 
 Anastasie did as she was bidden, and considered the Doctor's behaviour.
 She observed that he embraced the boy three times in the course of the
 evening, and managed generally to confound and abash the little fellow
 out of speech and appetite.  But she had the true womanly heroism in
 little affairs.  Not only did she refrain from the cheap revenge of
 exposing the Doctor's errors to himself, but she did her best to remove
 their ill-effect on Jean-Marie.  When Desprez went out for his last
 breath of air before retiring for the night, she came over to the boy's
 side and took his hand.
 
 'You must not be surprised nor frightened by my husband's manners,' she
 said.  'He is the kindest of men, but so clever that he is sometimes
 difficult to understand.  You will soon grow used to him, and then you
 will love him, for that nobody can help.  As for me, you may be sure, I
 shall try to make you happy, and will not bother you at all.  I think we
 should be excellent friends, you and I.  I am not clever, but I am very
 good-natured.  Will you give me a kiss?'
 
 He held up his face, and she took him in her arms and then began to cry.
 The woman had spoken in complaisance; but she had warmed to her own
 words, and tenderness followed.  The Doctor, entering, found them
 enlaced: he concluded that his wife was in fault; and he was just
 beginning, in an awful voice, 'Anastasie--,' when she looked up at him,
 smiling, with an upraised finger; and he held his peace, wondering, while
 she led the boy to his attic.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.  THE EDUCATION OF A PHILOSOPHER.
 
 
 The installation of the adopted stable-boy was thus happily effected, and
 the wheels of life continued to run smoothly in the Doctor's house.  Jean-
 Marie did his horse and carriage duty in the morning; sometimes helped in
 the housework; sometimes walked abroad with the Doctor, to drink wisdom
 from the fountain-head; and was introduced at night to the sciences and
 the dead tongues.  He retained his singular placidity of mind and manner;
 he was rarely in fault; but he made only a very partial progress in his
 studies, and remained much of a stranger in the family.
 
 The Doctor was a pattern of regularity.  All forenoon he worked on his
 great book, the 'Comparative Pharmacopoeia, or Historical Dictionary of
 all Medicines,' which as yet consisted principally of slips of paper and
 pins.  When finished, it was to fill many personable volumes, and to
 combine antiquarian interest with professional utility.  But the Doctor
 was studious of literary graces and the picturesque; an anecdote, a touch
 of manners, a moral qualification, or a sounding epithet was sure to be
 preferred before a piece of science; a little more, and he would have
 written the 'Comparative Pharmacopoeia' in verse!  The article 'Mummia,'
 for instance, was already complete, though the remainder of the work had
 not progressed beyond the letter A.  It was exceedingly copious and
 entertaining, written with quaintness and colour, exact, erudite, a
 literary article; but it would hardly have afforded guidance to a
 practising physician of to-day.  The feminine good sense of his wife had
 led her to point this out with uncompromising sincerity; for the
 Dictionary was duly read aloud to her, betwixt sleep and waning, as it
 proceeded towards an infinitely distant completion; and the Doctor was a
 little sore on the subject of mummies, and sometimes resented an allusion
 with asperity.
 
 After the midday meal and a proper period of digestion, he walked,
 sometimes alone, sometimes accompanied by Jean-Marie; for madame would
 have preferred any hardship rather than walk.
 
 She was, as I have said, a very busy person, continually occupied about
 material comforts, and ready to drop asleep over a novel the instant she
 was disengaged.  This was the less objectionable, as she never snored or
 grew distempered in complexion when she slept.  On the contrary, she
 looked the very picture of luxurious and appetising ease, and woke
 without a start to the perfect possession of her faculties.  I am afraid
 she was greatly an animal, but she was a very nice animal to have about.
 In this way, she had little to do with Jean-Marie; but the sympathy which
 had been established between them on the first night remained unbroken;
 they held occasional conversations, mostly on household matters; to the
 extreme disappointment of the Doctor, they occasionally sallied off
 together to that temple of debasing superstition, the village church;
 madame and he, both in their Sunday's best, drove twice a month to
 Fontainebleau and returned laden with purchases; and in short, although
 the Doctor still continued to regard them as irreconcilably
 anti-pathetic, their relation was as intimate, friendly, and confidential
 as their natures suffered.
 
 I fear, however, that in her heart of hearts, madame kindly despised and
 pitied the boy.  She had no admiration for his class of virtues; she
 liked a smart, polite, forward, roguish sort of boy, cap in hand, light
 of foot, meeting the eye; she liked volubility, charm, a little vice--the
 promise of a second Doctor Desprez.  And it was her indefeasible belief
 that Jean-Marie was dull.  'Poor dear boy,' she had said once, 'how sad
 it is that he should be so stupid!'  She had never repeated that remark,
 for the Doctor had raged like a wild bull, denouncing the brutal
 bluntness of her mind, bemoaning his own fate to be so unequally mated
 with an ass, and, what touched Anastasie more nearly, menacing the table
 china by the fury of his gesticulations.  But she adhered silently to her
 opinion; and when Jean-Marie was sitting, stolid, blank, but not unhappy,
 over his unfinished tasks, she would snatch her opportunity in the
 Doctor's absence, go over to him, put her arms about his neck, lay her
 cheek to his, and communicate her sympathy with his distress.  'Do not
 mind,' she would say; 'I, too, am not at all clever, and I can assure you
 that it makes no difference in life.'
 
 The Doctor's view was naturally different.  That gentleman never wearied
 of the sound of his own voice, which was, to say the truth, agreeable
 enough to hear.  He now had a listener, who was not so cynically
 indifferent as Anastasie, and who sometimes put him on his mettle by the
 most relevant objections.  Besides, was he not educating the boy?  And
 education, philosophers are agreed, is the most philosophical of duties.
 What can be more heavenly to poor mankind than to have one's hobby grow
 into a duty to the State?  Then, indeed, do the ways of life become ways
 of pleasantness.  Never had the Doctor seen reason to be more content
 with his endowments.  Philosophy flowed smoothly from his lips.  He was
 so agile a dialectician that he could trace his nonsense, when
 challenged, back to some root in sense, and prove it to be a sort of
 flower upon his system.  He slipped out of antinomies like a fish, and
 left his disciple marvelling at the rabbi's depth.
 
 Moreover, deep down in his heart the Doctor was disappointed with the ill-
 success of his more formal education.  A boy, chosen by so acute an
 observer for his aptitude, and guided along the path of learning by so
 philosophic an instructor, was bound, by the nature of the universe, to
 make a more obvious and lasting advance.  Now Jean-Marie was slow in all
 things, impenetrable in others; and his power of forgetting was fully on
 a level with his power to learn.  Therefore the Doctor cherished his
 peripatetic lectures, to which the boy attended, which he generally
 appeared to enjoy, and by which he often profited.
 
 Many and many were the talks they had together; and health and moderation
 proved the subject of the Doctor's divagations.  To these he lovingly
 returned.
 
 'I lead you,' he would say, 'by the green pastures.  My system, my
 beliefs, my medicines, are resumed in one phrase--to avoid excess.
 Blessed nature, healthy, temperate nature, abhors and exterminates
 excess.  Human law, in this matter, imitates at a great distance her
 provisions; and we must strive to supplement the efforts of the law.  Yes,
 boy, we must be a law to ourselves and for ourselves and for our
 neighbours--lex armata--armed, emphatic, tyrannous law.  If you see a
 crapulous human ruin snuffing, dash from him his box!  The judge, though
 in a way an admission of disease, is less offensive to me than either the
 doctor or the priest.  Above all the doctor--the doctor and the purulent
 trash and garbage of his pharmacopoeia!  Pure air--from the neighbourhood
 of a pinetum for the sake of the turpentine--unadulterated wine, and the
 reflections of an unsophisticated spirit in the presence of the works of
 nature--these, my boy, are the best medical appliances and the best
 religious comforts.  Devote yourself to these.  Hark! there are the bells
 of Bourron (the wind is in the north, it will be fair).  How clear and
 airy is the sound!  The nerves are harmonised and quieted; the mind
 attuned to silence; and observe how easily and regularly beats the heart!
 Your unenlightened doctor would see nothing in these sensations; and yet
 you yourself perceive they are a part of health.--Did you remember your
 cinchona this morning?  Good.  Cinchona also is a work of nature; it is,
 after all, only the bark of a tree which we might gather for ourselves if
 we lived in the locality.--What a world is this!  Though a professed
 atheist, I delight to bear my testimony to the world.  Look at the
 gratuitous remedies and pleasures that surround our path!  The river runs
 by the garden end, our bath, our fishpond, our natural system of
 drainage.  There is a well in the court which sends up sparkling water
 from the earth's very heart, clean, cool, and, with a little wine, most
 wholesome.  The district is notorious for its salubrity; rheumatism is
 the only prevalent complaint, and I myself have never had a touch of it.
 I tell you--and my opinion is based upon the coldest, clearest processes
 of reason--if I, if you, desired to leave this home of pleasures, it
 would be the duty, it would be the privilege, of our best friend to
 prevent us with a pistol bullet.'
 
 One beautiful June day they sat upon the hill outside the village.  The
 river, as blue as heaven, shone here and there among the foliage.  The
 indefatigable birds turned and flickered about Gretz church tower.  A
 healthy wind blew from over the forest, and the sound of innumerable
 thousands of tree-tops and innumerable millions on millions of green
 leaves was abroad in the air, and filled the ear with something between
 whispered speech and singing.  It seemed as if every blade of grass must
 hide a cigale; and the fields rang merrily with their music, jingling far
 and near as with the sleigh-bells of the fairy queen.  From their station
 on the slope the eye embraced a large space of poplar'd plain upon the
 one hand, the waving hill-tops of the forest on the other, and Gretz
 itself in the middle, a handful of roofs.  Under the bestriding arch of
 the blue heavens, the place seemed dwindled to a toy.  It seemed
 incredible that people dwelt, and could find room to turn or air to
 breathe, in such a corner of the world.  The thought came home to the
 boy, perhaps for the first time, and he gave it words.
 
 'How small it looks!' he sighed.
 
 'Ay,' replied the Doctor, 'small enough now.  Yet it was once a walled
 city; thriving, full of furred burgesses and men in armour, humming with
 affairs;--with tall spires, for aught that I know, and portly towers
 along the battlements.  A thousand chimneys ceased smoking at the curfew
 bell.  There were gibbets at the gate as thick as scarecrows.  In time of
 war, the assault swarmed against it with ladders, the arrows fell like
 leaves, the defenders sallied hotly over the drawbridge, each side
 uttered its cry as they plied their weapons.  Do you know that the walls
 extended as far as the Commanderie?  Tradition so reports.  Alas, what a
 long way off is all this confusion--nothing left of it but my quiet words
 spoken in your ear--and the town itself shrunk to the hamlet underneath
 us!  By-and-by came the English wars--you shall hear more of the English,
 a stupid people, who sometimes blundered into good--and Gretz was taken,
 sacked, and burned.  It is the history of many towns; but Gretz never
 rose again; it was never rebuilt; its ruins were a quarry to serve the
 growth of rivals; and the stones of Gretz are now erect along the streets
 of Nemours.  It gratifies me that our old house was the first to rise
 after the calamity; when the town had come to an end, it inaugurated the
 hamlet.'
 
 'I, too, am glad of that,' said Jean-Marie.
 
 'It should be the temple of the humbler virtues,' responded the Doctor
 with a savoury gusto.  'Perhaps one of the reasons why I love my little
 hamlet as I do, is that we have a similar history, she and I.  Have I
 told you that I was once rich?'
 
 'I do not think so,' answered Jean-Marie.  'I do not think I should have
 forgotten.  I am sorry you should have lost your fortune.'
 
 'Sorry?' cried the Doctor.  'Why, I find I have scarce begun your
 education after all.  Listen to me!  Would you rather live in the old
 Gretz or in the new, free from the alarms of war, with the green country
 at the door, without noise, passports, the exactions of the soldiery, or
 the jangle of the curfew-bell to send us off to bed by sundown?'
 
 'I suppose I should prefer the new,' replied the boy.
 
 'Precisely,' returned the Doctor; 'so do I.  And, in the same way, I
 prefer my present moderate fortune to my former wealth.  Golden
 mediocrity! cried the adorable ancients; and I subscribe to their
 enthusiasm.  Have I not good wine, good food, good air, the fields and
 the forest for my walk, a house, an admirable wife, a boy whom I protest
 I cherish like a son?  Now, if I were still rich, I should indubitably
 make my residence in Paris--you know Paris--Paris and Paradise are not
 convertible terms.  This pleasant noise of the wind streaming among
 leaves changed into the grinding Babel of the street, the stupid glare of
 plaster substituted for this quiet pattern of greens and greys, the
 nerves shattered, the digestion falsified--picture the fall!  Already you
 perceive the consequences; the mind is stimulated, the heart steps to a
 different measure, and the man is himself no longer.  I have passionately
 studied myself--the true business of philosophy.  I know my character as
 the musician knows the ventages of his flute.  Should I return to Paris,
 I should ruin myself gambling; nay, I go further--I should break the
 heart of my Anastasie with infidelities.'
 
 This was too much for Jean-Marie.  That a place should so transform the
 most excellent of men transcended his belief.  Paris, he protested, was
 even an agreeable place of residence.  'Nor when I lived in that city did
 I feel much difference,' he pleaded.
 
 'What!' cried the Doctor.  'Did you not steal when you were there?'
 
 But the boy could never be brought to see that he had done anything wrong
 when he stole.  Nor, indeed, did the Doctor think he had; but that
 gentleman was never very scrupulous when in want of a retort.
 
 'And now,' he concluded, 'do you begin to understand?  My only friends
 were those who ruined me.  Gretz has been my academy, my sanatorium, my
 heaven of innocent pleasures.  If millions are offered me, I wave them
 back: _Retro_, _Sathanas_!--Evil one, begone!  Fix your mind on my
 example; despise riches, avoid the debasing influence of cities.
 Hygiene--hygiene and mediocrity of fortune--these be your watchwords
 during life!'
 
 The Doctor's system of hygiene strikingly coincided with his tastes; and
 his picture of the perfect life was a faithful description of the one he
 was leading at the time.  But it is easy to convince a boy, whom you
 supply with all the facts for the discussion.  And besides, there was one
 thing admirable in the philosophy, and that was the enthusiasm of the
 philosopher.  There was never any one more vigorously determined to be
 pleased; and if he was not a great logician, and so had no right to
 convince the intellect, he was certainly something of a poet, and had a
 fascination to seduce the heart.  What he could not achieve in his
 customary humour of a radiant admiration of himself and his
 circumstances, he sometimes effected in his fits of gloom.
 
 'Boy,' he would say, 'avoid me to-day.  If I were superstitious, I should
 even beg for an interest in your prayers.  I am in the black fit; the
 evil spirit of King Saul, the hag of the merchant Abudah, the personal
 devil of the mediaeval monk, is with me--is in me,' tapping on his
 breast.  'The vices of my nature are now uppermost; innocent pleasures
 woo me in vain; I long for Paris, for my wallowing in the mire.  See,' he
 would continue, producing a handful of silver, 'I denude myself, I am not
 to be trusted with the price of a fare.  Take it, keep it for me,
 squander it on deleterious candy, throw it in the deepest of the river--I
 will homologate your action.  Save me from that part of myself which I
 disown.  If you see me falter, do not hesitate; if necessary, wreck the
 train!  I speak, of course, by a parable.  Any extremity were better than
 for me to reach Paris alive.'
 
 Doubtless the Doctor enjoyed these little scenes, as a variation in his
 part; they represented the Byronic element in the somewhat artificial
 poetry of his existence; but to the boy, though he was dimly aware of
 their theatricality, they represented more.  The Doctor made perhaps too
 little, the boy possibly too much, of the reality and gravity of these
 temptations.
 
 One day a great light shone for Jean-Marie.  'Could not riches be used
 well?' he asked.
 
 'In theory, yes,' replied the Doctor.  'But it is found in experience
 that no one does so.  All the world imagine they will be exceptional when
 they grow wealthy; but possession is debasing, new desires spring up; and
 the silly taste for ostentation eats out the heart of pleasure.'
 
 'Then you might be better if you had less,' said the boy.
 
 'Certainly not,' replied the Doctor; but his voice quavered as he spoke.
 
 'Why?' demanded pitiless innocence.
 
 Doctor Desprez saw all the colours of the rainbow in a moment; the stable
 universe appeared to be about capsizing with him.  'Because,' said
 he--affecting deliberation after an obvious pause--'because I have formed
 my life for my present income.  It is not good for men of my years to be
 violently dissevered from their habits.'
 
 That was a sharp brush.  The Doctor breathed hard, and fell into
 taciturnity for the afternoon.  As for the boy, he was delighted with the
 resolution of his doubts; even wondered that he had not foreseen the
 obvious and conclusive answer.  His faith in the Doctor was a stout piece
 of goods.  Desprez was inclined to be a sheet in the wind's eye after
 dinner, especially after Rhone wine, his favourite weakness.  He would
 then remark on the warmth of his feeling for Anastasie, and with inflamed
 cheeks and a loose, flustered smile, debate upon all sorts of topics, and
 be feebly and indiscreetly witty.  But the adopted stable-boy would not
 permit himself to entertain a doubt that savoured of ingratitude.  It is
 quite true that a man may be a second father to you, and yet take too
 much to drink; but the best natures are ever slow to accept such truths.
 
 The Doctor thoroughly possessed his heart, but perhaps he exaggerated his
 influence over his mind.  Certainly Jean-Marie adopted some of his
 master's opinions, but I have yet to learn that he ever surrendered one
 of his own.  Convictions existed in him by divine right; they were
 virgin, unwrought, the brute metal of decision.  He could add others
 indeed, but he could not put away; neither did he care if they were
 perfectly agreed among themselves; and his spiritual pleasures had
 nothing to do with turning them over or justifying them in words.  Words
 were with him a mere accomplishment, like dancing.  When he was by
 himself, his pleasures were almost vegetable.  He would slip into the
 woods towards Acheres, and sit in the mouth of a cave among grey birches.
 His soul stared straight out of his eyes; he did not move or think;
 sunlight, thin shadows moving in the wind, the edge of firs against the
 sky, occupied and bound his faculties.  He was pure unity, a spirit
 wholly abstracted.  A single mood filled him, to which all the objects of
 sense contributed, as the colours of the spectrum merge and disappear in
 white light.
 
 So while the Doctor made himself drunk with words, the adopted stable-boy
 bemused himself with silence.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.  TREASURE TROVE.
 
 
 The Doctor's carriage was a two-wheeled gig with a hood; a kind of
 vehicle in much favour among country doctors.  On how many roads has one
 not seen it, a great way off between the poplars!--in how many village
 streets, tied to a gate-post!  This sort of chariot is
 affected--particularly at the trot--by a kind of pitching movement to and
 fro across the axle, which well entitles it to the style of a Noddy.  The
 hood describes a considerable arc against the landscape, with a solemnly
 absurd effect on the contemplative pedestrian.  To ride in such a
 carriage cannot be numbered among the things that appertain to glory; but
 I have no doubt it may be useful in liver complaint.  Thence, perhaps,
 its wide popularity among physicians.
 
 One morning early, Jean-Marie led forth the Doctor's noddy, opened the
 gate, and mounted to the driving-seat.  The Doctor followed, arrayed from
 top to toe in spotless linen, armed with an immense flesh-coloured
 umbrella, and girt with a botanical case on a baldric; and the equipage
 drove off smartly in a breeze of its own provocation.  They were bound
 for Franchard, to collect plants, with an eye to the 'Comparative
 Pharmacopoeia.'
 
 A little rattling on the open roads, and they came to the borders of the
 forest and struck into an unfrequented track; the noddy yawed softly over
 the sand, with an accompaniment of snapping twigs.  There was a great,
 green, softly murmuring cloud of congregated foliage overhead.  In the
 arcades of the forest the air retained the freshness of the night.  The
 athletic bearing of the trees, each carrying its leafy mountain, pleased
 the mind like so many statues; and the lines of the trunk led the eye
 admiringly upward to where the extreme leaves sparkled in a patch of
 azure.  Squirrels leaped in mid air.  It was a proper spot for a devotee
 of the goddess Hygieia.
 
 'Have you been to Franchard, Jean-Marie?' inquired the Doctor.  'I fancy
 not.'
 
 'Never,' replied the boy.
 
 'It is ruin in a gorge,' continued Desprez, adopting his expository
 voice; 'the ruin of a hermitage and chapel.  History tells us much of
 Franchard; how the recluse was often slain by robbers; how he lived on a
 most insufficient diet; how he was expected to pass his days in prayer.  A
 letter is preserved, addressed to one of these solitaries by the superior
 of his order, full of admirable hygienic advice; bidding him go from his
 book to praying, and so back again, for variety's sake, and when he was
 weary of both to stroll about his garden and observe the honey bees.  It
 is to this day my own system.  You must often have remarked me leaving
 the "Pharmacopoeia"--often even in the middle of a phrase--to come forth
 into the sun and air.  I admire the writer of that letter from my heart;
 he was a man of thought on the most important subjects.  But, indeed, had
 I lived in the Middle Ages (I am heartily glad that I did not) I should
 have been an eremite myself--if I had not been a professed buffoon, that
 is.  These were the only philosophical lives yet open: laughter or
 prayer; sneers, we might say, and tears.  Until the sun of the Positive
 arose, the wise man had to make his choice between these two.'
 
 'I have been a buffoon, of course,' observed Jean-Marie.
 
 'I cannot imagine you to have excelled in your profession,' said the
 Doctor, admiring the boy's gravity.  'Do you ever laugh?'
 
 'Oh, yes,' replied the other.  'I laugh often.  I am very fond of jokes.'
 
 'Singular being!' said Desprez.  'But I divagate (I perceive in a
 thousand ways that I grow old).  Franchard was at length destroyed in the
 English wars, the same that levelled Gretz.  But--here is the point--the
 hermits (for there were already more than one) had foreseen the danger
 and carefully concealed the sacrificial vessels.  These vessels were of
 monstrous value, Jean-Marie--monstrous value--priceless, we may say;
 exquisitely worked, of exquisite material.  And now, mark me, they have
 never been found.  In the reign of Louis Quatorze some fellows were
 digging hard by the ruins.  Suddenly--tock!--the spade hit upon an
 obstacle.  Imagine the men fooling one to another; imagine how their
 hearts bounded, how their colour came and went.  It was a coffer, and in
 Franchard the place of buried treasure!  They tore it open like famished
 beasts.  Alas! it was not the treasure; only some priestly robes, which,
 at the touch of the eating air, fell upon themselves and instantly wasted
 into dust.  The perspiration of these good fellows turned cold upon them,
 Jean-Marie.  I will pledge my reputation, if there was anything like a
 cutting wind, one or other had a pneumonia for his trouble.'
 
 'I should like to have seen them turning into dust,' said Jean-Marie.
 'Otherwise, I should not have cared so greatly.'
 
 'You have no imagination,' cried the Doctor.  'Picture to yourself the
 scene.  Dwell on the idea--a great treasure lying in the earth for
 centuries: the material for a giddy, copious, opulent existence not
 employed; dresses and exquisite pictures unseen; the swiftest galloping
 horses not stirring a hoof, arrested by a spell; women with the beautiful
 faculty of smiles, not smiling; cards, dice, opera singing, orchestras,
 castles, beautiful parks and gardens, big ships with a tower of
 sailcloth, all lying unborn in a coffin--and the stupid trees growing
 overhead in the sunlight, year after year.  The thought drives one
 frantic.'
 
 'It is only money,' replied Jean-Marie.  'It would do harm.'
 
 'O, come!' cried Desprez, 'that is philosophy; it is all very fine, but
 not to the point just now.  And besides, it is not "only money," as you
 call it; there are works of art in the question; the vessels were carved.
 You speak like a child.  You weary me exceedingly, quoting my words out
 of all logical connection, like a parroquet.'
 
 'And at any rate, we have nothing to do with it,' returned the boy
 submissively.
 
 They struck the Route Ronde at that moment; and the sudden change to the
 rattling causeway combined, with the Doctor's irritation, to keep him
 silent.  The noddy jigged along; the trees went by, looking on silently,
 as if they had something on their minds.  The Quadrilateral was passed;
 then came Franchard.  They put up the horse at the little solitary inn,
 and went forth strolling.  The gorge was dyed deeply with heather; the
 rocks and birches standing luminous in the sun.  A great humming of bees
 about the flowers disposed Jean-Marie to sleep, and he sat down against a
 clump of heather, while the Doctor went briskly to and fro, with quick
 turns, culling his simples.
 
 The boy's head had fallen a little forward, his eyes were closed, his
 fingers had fallen lax about his knees, when a sudden cry called him to
 his feet.  It was a strange sound, thin and brief; it fell dead, and
 silence returned as though it had never been interrupted.  He had not
 recognised the Doctor's voice; but, as there was no one else in all the
 valley, it was plainly the Doctor who had given utterance to the sound.
 He looked right and left, and there was Desprez, standing in a niche
 between two boulders, and looking round on his adopted son with a
 countenance as white as paper.
 
 'A viper!' cried Jean-Marie, running towards him.  'A viper!  You are
 bitten!'
 
 The Doctor came down heavily out of the cleft, and, advanced in silence
 to meet the boy, whom he took roughly by the shoulder.
 
 'I have found it,' he said, with a gasp.
 
 'A plant?' asked Jean-Marie.
 
 Desprez had a fit of unnatural gaiety, which the rocks took up and
 mimicked.  'A plant!' he repeated scornfully.  'Well--yes--a plant.  And
 here,' he added suddenly, showing his right hand, which he had hitherto
 concealed behind his back--'here is one of the bulbs.'
 
 Jean-Marie saw a dirty platter, coated with earth.
 
 'That?' said he.  'It is a plate!'
 
 'It is a coach and horses,' cried the Doctor.  'Boy,' he continued,
 growing warmer, 'I plucked away a great pad of moss from between these
 boulders, and disclosed a crevice; and when I looked in, what do you
 suppose I saw?  I saw a house in Paris with a court and garden, I saw my
 wife shining with diamonds, I saw myself a deputy, I saw you--well, I--I
 saw your future,' he concluded, rather feebly.  'I have just discovered
 America,' he added.
 
 'But what is it?' asked the boy.
 
 'The Treasure of Franchard,' cried the Doctor; and, throwing his brown
 straw hat upon the ground, he whooped like an Indian and sprang upon Jean-
 Marie, whom he suffocated with embraces and bedewed with tears.  Then he
 flung himself down among the heather and once more laughed until the
 valley rang.
 
 But the boy had now an interest of his own, a boy's interest.  No sooner
 was he released from the Doctor's accolade than he ran to the boulders,
 sprang into the niche, and, thrusting his hand into the crevice, drew
 forth one after another, encrusted with the earth of ages, the flagons,
 candlesticks, and patens of the hermitage of Franchard.  A casket came
 last, tightly shut and very heavy.
 
 'O what fun!' he cried.
 
 But when he looked back at the Doctor, who had followed close behind and
 was silently observing, the words died from his lips.  Desprez was once
 more the colour of ashes; his lip worked and trembled; a sort of bestial
 greed possessed him.
 
 'This is childish,' he said.  'We lose precious time.  Back to the inn,
 harness the trap, and bring it to yon bank.  Run for your life, and
 remember--not one whisper.  I stay here to watch.'
 
 Jean-Marie did as he was bid, though not without surprise.  The noddy was
 brought round to the spot indicated; and the two gradually transported
 the treasure from its place of concealment to the boot below the driving
 seat.  Once it was all stored the Doctor recovered his gaiety.
 
 'I pay my grateful duties to the genius of this dell,' he said.  'O, for
 a live coal, a heifer, and a jar of country wine!  I am in the vein for
 sacrifice, for a superb libation.  Well, and why not?  We are at
 Franchard.  English pale ale is to be had--not classical, indeed, but
 excellent.  Boy, we shall drink ale.'
 
 'But I thought it was so unwholesome,' said Jean-Marie, 'and very dear
 besides.'
 
 'Fiddle-de-dee!' exclaimed the Doctor gaily.  'To the inn!'
 
 And he stepped into the noddy, tossing his head, with an elastic,
 youthful air.  The horse was turned, and in a few seconds they drew up
 beside the palings of the inn garden.
 
 'Here,' said Desprez--'here, near the table, so that we may keep an eye
 upon things.'
 
 They tied the horse, and entered the garden, the Doctor singing, now in
 fantastic high notes, now producing deep reverberations from his chest.
 He took a seat, rapped loudly on the table, assailed the waiter with
 witticisms; and when the bottle of Bass was at length produced, far more
 charged with gas than the most delirious champagne, he filled out a long
 glassful of froth and pushed it over to Jean-Marie.  'Drink,' he said;
 'drink deep.'
 
 'I would rather not,' faltered the boy, true to his training.
 
 'What?' thundered Desprez.
 
 'I am afraid of it,' said Jean-Marie: 'my stomach--'
 
 'Take it or leave it,' interrupted Desprez fiercely; 'but understand it
 once for all--there is nothing so contemptible as a precisian.'
 
 Here was a new lesson!  The boy sat bemused, looking at the glass but not
 tasting it, while the Doctor emptied and refilled his own, at first with
 clouded brow, but gradually yielding to the sun, the heady, prickling
 beverage, and his own predisposition to be happy.
 
 'Once in a way,' he said at last, by way of a concession to the boy's
 more rigorous attitude, 'once in a way, and at so critical a moment, this
 ale is a nectar for the gods.  The habit, indeed, is debasing; wine, the
 juice of the grape, is the true drink of the Frenchman, as I have often
 had occasion to point out; and I do not know that I can blame you for
 refusing this outlandish stimulant.  You can have some wine and cakes.  Is
 the bottle empty?  Well, we will not be proud; we will have pity on your
 glass.'
 
 The beer being done, the Doctor chafed bitterly while Jean-Marie finished
 his cakes.  'I burn to be gone,' he said, looking at his watch.  'Good
 God, how slow you eat!'  And yet to eat slowly was his own particular
 prescription, the main secret of longevity!
 
 His martyrdom, however, reached an end at last; the pair resumed their
 places in the buggy, and Desprez, leaning luxuriously back, announced his
 intention of proceeding to Fontainebleau.
 
 'To Fontainebleau?' repeated Jean-Marie.
 
 'My words are always measured,' said the Doctor.  'On!'
 
 The Doctor was driven through the glades of paradise; the air, the light,
 the shining leaves, the very movements of the vehicle, seemed to fall in
 tune with his golden meditations; with his head thrown back, he dreamed a
 series of sunny visions, ale and pleasure dancing in his veins.  At last
 he spoke.
 
 'I shall telegraph for Casimir,' he said.  'Good Casimir! a fellow of the
 lower order of intelligence, Jean-Marie, distinctly not creative, not
 poetic; and yet he will repay your study; his fortune is vast, and is
 entirely due to his own exertions.  He is the very fellow to help us to
 dispose of our trinkets, find us a suitable house in Paris, and manage
 the details of our installation.  Admirable Casimir, one of my oldest
 comrades!  It was on his advice, I may add, that I invested my little
 fortune in Turkish bonds; when we have added these spoils of the mediaeval
 church to our stake in the Mahometan empire, little boy, we shall
 positively roll among doubloons, positively roll!  Beautiful forest,' he
 cried, 'farewell!  Though called to other scenes, I will not forget thee.
 Thy name is graven in my heart.  Under the influence of prosperity I
 become dithyrambic, Jean-Marie.  Such is the impulse of the natural soul;
 such was the constitution of primaeval man.  And I--well, I will not
 refuse the credit--I have preserved my youth like a virginity; another,
 who should have led the same snoozing, countryfied existence for these
 years, another had become rusted, become stereotype; but I, I praise my
 happy constitution, retain the spring unbroken.  Fresh opulence and a new
 sphere of duties find me unabated in ardour and only more mature by
 knowledge.  For this prospective change, Jean-Marie--it may probably have
 shocked you.  Tell me now, did it not strike you as an inconsistency?
 Confess--it is useless to dissemble--it pained you?'
 
 'Yes,' said the boy.
 
 'You see,' returned the Doctor, with sublime fatuity, 'I read your
 thoughts!  Nor am I surprised--your education is not yet complete; the
 higher duties of men have not been yet presented to you fully.  A
 hint--till we have leisure--must suffice.  Now that I am once more in
 possession of a modest competence; now that I have so long prepared
 myself in silent meditation, it becomes my superior duty to proceed to
 Paris.  My scientific training, my undoubted command of language, mark me
 out for the service of my country.  Modesty in such a case would be a
 snare.  If sin were a philosophical expression, I should call it sinful.
 A man must not deny his manifest abilities, for that is to evade his
 obligations.  I must be up and doing; I must be no skulker in life's
 battle.'
 
 So he rattled on, copiously greasing the joint of his inconsistency with
 words; while the boy listened silently, his eyes fixed on the horse, his
 mind seething.  It was all lost eloquence; no array of words could
 unsettle a belief of Jean-Marie's; and he drove into Fontainebleau filled
 with pity, horror, indignation, and despair.
 
 In the town Jean-Marie was kept a fixture on the driving-seat, to guard
 the treasure; while the Doctor, with a singular, slightly tipsy airiness
 of manner, fluttered in and out of cafes, where he shook hands with
 garrison officers, and mixed an absinthe with the nicety of old
 experience; in and out of shops, from which he returned laden with costly
 fruits, real turtle, a magnificent piece of silk for his wife, a
 preposterous cane for himself, and a kepi of the newest fashion for the
 boy; in and out of the telegraph office, whence he despatched his
 telegram, and where three hours later he received an answer promising a
 visit on the morrow; and generally pervaded Fontainebleau with the first
 fine aroma of his divine good humour.
 
 The sun was very low when they set forth again; the shadows of the forest
 trees extended across the broad white road that led them home; the
 penetrating odour of the evening wood had already arisen, like a cloud of
 incense, from that broad field of tree-tops; and even in the streets of
 the town, where the air had been baked all day between white walls, it
 came in whiffs and pulses, like a distant music.  Half-way home, the last
 gold flicker vanished from a great oak upon the left; and when they came
 forth beyond the borders of the wood, the plain was already sunken in
 pearly greyness, and a great, pale moon came swinging skyward through the
 filmy poplars.
 
 The Doctor sang, the Doctor whistled, the Doctor talked.  He spoke of the
 woods, and the wars, and the deposition of dew; he brightened and babbled
 of Paris; he soared into cloudy bombast on the glories of the political
 arena.  All was to be changed; as the day departed, it took with it the
 vestiges of an outworn existence, and to-morrow's sun was to inaugurate
 the new.  'Enough,' he cried, 'of this life of maceration!'  His wife
 (still beautiful, or he was sadly partial) was to be no longer buried;
 she should now shine before society.  Jean-Marie would find the world at
 his feet; the roads open to success, wealth, honour, and post-humous
 renown.  'And O, by the way,' said he, 'for God's sake keep your tongue
 quiet!  You are, of course, a very silent fellow; it is a quality I
 gladly recognise in you--silence, golden silence!  But this is a matter
 of gravity.  No word must get abroad; none but the good Casimir is to be
 trusted; we shall probably dispose of the vessels in England.'
 
 'But are they not even ours?' the boy said, almost with a sob--it was the
 only time he had spoken.
 
 'Ours in this sense, that they are nobody else's,' replied the Doctor.
 'But the State would have some claim.  If they were stolen, for instance,
 we should be unable to demand their restitution; we should have no title;
 we should be unable even to communicate with the police.  Such is the
 monstrous condition of the law. {263}  It is a mere instance of what
 remains to be done, of the injustices that may yet be righted by an
 ardent, active, and philosophical deputy.'
 
 Jean-Marie put his faith in Madame Desprez; and as they drove forward
 down the road from Bourron, between the rustling poplars, he prayed in
 his teeth, and whipped up the horse to an unusual speed.  Surely, as soon
 as they arrived, madame would assert her character, and bring this waking
 nightmare to an end.
 
 Their entrance into Gretz was heralded and accompanied by a most furious
 barking; all the dogs in the village seemed to smell the treasure in the
 noddy.  But there was no one in the street, save three lounging landscape
 painters at Tentaillon's door.  Jean-Marie opened the green gate and led
 in the horse and carriage; and almost at the same moment Madame Desprez
 came to the kitchen threshold with a lighted lantern; for the moon was
 not yet high enough to clear the garden walls.
 
 'Close the gates, Jean-Marie!' cried the Doctor, somewhat unsteadily
 alighting.  'Anastasie, where is Aline?'
 
 'She has gone to Montereau to see her parents,' said madame.
 
 'All is for the best!' exclaimed the Doctor fervently.  'Here, quick,
 come near to me; I do not wish to speak too loud,' he continued.
 'Darling, we are wealthy!'
 
 'Wealthy!' repeated the wife.
 
 'I have found the treasure of Franchard,' replied her husband.  'See,
 here are the first fruits; a pineapple, a dress for my ever-beautiful--it
 will suit her--trust a husband's, trust a lover's, taste!  Embrace me,
 darling!  This grimy episode is over; the butterfly unfolds its painted
 wings.  To-morrow Casimir will come; in a week we may be in Paris--happy
 at last!  You shall have diamonds.  Jean-Marie, take it out of the boot,
 with religious care, and bring it piece by piece into the dining-room.  We
 shall have plate at table!  Darling, hasten and prepare this turtle; it
 will be a whet--it will be an addition to our meagre ordinary.  I myself
 will proceed to the cellar.  We shall have a bottle of that little
 Beaujolais you like, and finish with the Hermitage; there are still three
 bottles left.  Worthy wine for a worthy occasion.'
 
 'But, my husband; you put me in a whirl,' she cried.  'I do not
 comprehend.'
 
 'The turtle, my adored, the turtle!' cried the doctor; and he pushed her
 towards the kitchen, lantern and all.
 
 Jean-Marie stood dumfounded.  He had pictured to himself a different
 scene--a more immediate protest, and his hope began to dwindle on the
 spot.
 
 The Doctor was everywhere, a little doubtful on his legs, perhaps, and
 now and then taking the wall with his shoulder; for it was long since he
 had tasted absinthe, and he was even then reflecting that the absinthe
 had been a misconception.  Not that he regretted excess on such a
 glorious day, but he made a mental memorandum to beware; he must not, a
 second time, become the victim of a deleterious habit.  He had his wine
 out of the cellar in a twinkling; he arranged the sacrificial vessels,
 some on the white table-cloth, some on the sideboard, still crusted with
 historic earth.  He was in and out of the kitchen, plying Anastasie with
 vermouth, heating her with glimpses of the future, estimating their new
 wealth at ever larger figures; and before they sat down to supper, the
 lady's virtue had melted in the fire of his enthusiasm, her timidity had
 disappeared; she, too, had begun to speak disparagingly of the life at
 Gretz; and as she took her place and helped the soup, her eyes shone with
 the glitter of prospective diamonds.
 
 All through the meal, she and the Doctor made and unmade fairy plans.
 They bobbed and bowed and pledged each other.  Their faces ran over with
 smiles; their eyes scattered sparkles, as they projected the Doctor's
 political honours and the lady's drawing-room ovations.
 
 'But you will not be a Red!' cried Anastasie.
 
 'I am Left Centre to the core,' replied the Doctor.
 
 'Madame Gastein will present us--we shall find ourselves forgotten,' said
 the lady.
 
 'Never,' protested the Doctor.  'Beauty and talent leave a mark.'
 
 'I have positively forgotten how to dress,' she sighed.
 
 'Darling, you make me blush,' cried he.  'Yours has been a tragic
 marriage!'
 
 'But your success--to see you appreciated, honoured, your name in all the
 papers, that will be more than pleasure--it will be heaven!' she cried.
 
 'And once a week,' said the Doctor, archly scanning the syllables, 'once
 a week--one good little game of baccarat?'
 
 'Only once a week?' she questioned, threatening him with a finger.
 
 'I swear it by my political honour,' cried he.
 
 'I spoil you,' she said, and gave him her hand.
 
 He covered it with kisses.
 
 Jean-Marie escaped into the night.  The moon swung high over Gretz.  He
 went down to the garden end and sat on the jetty.  The river ran by with
 eddies of oily silver, and a low, monotonous song.  Faint veils of mist
 moved among the poplars on the farther side.  The reeds were quietly
 nodding.  A hundred times already had the boy sat, on such a night, and
 watched the streaming river with untroubled fancy.  And this perhaps was
 to be the last.  He was to leave this familiar hamlet, this green,
 rustling country, this bright and quiet stream; he was to pass into the
 great city; his dear lady mistress was to move bedizened in saloons; his
 good, garrulous, kind-hearted master to become a brawling deputy; and
 both be lost for ever to Jean-Marie and their better selves.  He knew his
 own defects; he knew he must sink into less and less consideration in the
 turmoil of a city life, sink more and more from the child into the
 servant.  And he began dimly to believe the Doctor's prophecies of evil.
 He could see a change in both.  His generous incredulity failed him for
 this once; a child must have perceived that the Hermitage had completed
 what the absinthe had begun.  If this were the first day, what would be
 the last?  'If necessary, wreck the train,' thought he, remembering the
 Doctor's parable.  He looked round on the delightful scene; he drank deep
 of the charmed night air, laden with the scent of hay.  'If necessary,
 wreck the train,' he repeated.  And he rose and returned to the house.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.  A CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION, IN TWO PARTS.
 
 
 The next morning there was a most unusual outcry, in the Doctor's house.
 The last thing before going to bed, the Doctor had locked up some
 valuables in the dining-room cupboard; and behold, when he rose again, as
 he did about four o'clock, the cupboard had been broken open, and the
 valuables in question had disappeared.  Madame and Jean-Marie were
 summoned from their rooms, and appeared in hasty toilets; they found the
 Doctor raving, calling the heavens to witness and avenge his injury,
 pacing the room bare-footed, with the tails of his night-shirt flirting
 as he turned.
 
 'Gone!' he said; 'the things are gone, the fortune gone!  We are paupers
 once more.  Boy! what do you know of this?  Speak up, sir, speak up.  Do
 you know of it?  Where are they?'  He had him by the arm, shaking him
 like a bag, and the boy's words, if he had any, were jolted forth in
 inarticulate murmurs.  The Doctor, with a revulsion from his own
 violence, set him down again.  He observed Anastasie in tears.
 'Anastasie,' he said, in quite an altered voice, 'compose yourself,
 command your feelings.  I would not have you give way to passion like the
 vulgar.  This--this trifling accident must be lived down.  Jean-Marie,
 bring me my smaller medicine chest.  A gentle laxative is indicated.'
 
 And he dosed the family all round, leading the way himself with a double
 quantity.  The wretched Anastasie, who had never been ill in the whole
 course of her existence, and whose soul recoiled from remedies, wept
 floods of tears as she sipped, and shuddered, and protested, and then was
 bullied and shouted at until she sipped again.  As for Jean-Marie, he
 took his portion down with stoicism.
 
 'I have given him a less amount,' observed the Doctor, 'his youth
 protecting him against emotion.  And now that we have thus parried any
 morbid consequences, let us reason.'
 
 'I am so cold,' wailed Anastasie.
 
 'Cold!' cried the Doctor.  'I give thanks to God that I am made of
 fierier material.  Why, madam, a blow like this would set a frog into a
 transpiration.  If you are cold, you can retire; and, by the way, you
 might throw me down my trousers.  It is chilly for the legs.'
 
 'Oh, no!' protested Anastasie; 'I will stay with you.'
 
 'Nay, madam, you shall not suffer for your devotion,' said the Doctor.  'I
 will myself fetch you a shawl.'  And he went upstairs and returned more
 fully clad and with an armful of wraps for the shivering Anastasie.  'And
 now,' he resumed, 'to investigate this crime.  Let us proceed by
 induction.  Anastasie, do you know anything that can help us?'  Anastasie
 knew nothing.  'Or you, Jean-Marie?'
 
 'Not I,' replied the boy steadily.
 
 'Good,' returned the Doctor.  'We shall now turn our attention to the
 material evidences.  (I was born to be a detective; I have the eye and
 the systematic spirit.)  First, violence has been employed.  The door was
 broken open; and it may be observed, in passing, that the lock was dear
 indeed at what I paid for it: a crow to pluck with Master Goguelat.
 Second, here is the instrument employed, one of our own table-knives, one
 of our best, my dear; which seems to indicate no preparation on the part
 of the gang--if gang it was.  Thirdly, I observe that nothing has been
 removed except the Franchard dishes and the casket; our own silver has
 been minutely respected.  This is wily; it shows intelligence, a
 knowledge of the code, a desire to avoid legal consequences.  I argue
 from this fact that the gang numbers persons of respectability--outward,
 of course, and merely outward, as the robbery proves.  But I argue,
 second, that we must have been observed at Franchard itself by some
 occult observer, and dogged throughout the day with a skill and patience
 that I venture to qualify as consummate.  No ordinary man, no occasional
 criminal, would have shown himself capable of this combination.  We have
 in our neighbourhood, it is far from improbable, a retired bandit of the
 highest order of intelligence.'
 
 'Good heaven!' cried the horrified Anastasie.  'Henri, how can you?'
 
 'My cherished one, this is a process of induction,' said the Doctor.  'If
 any of my steps are unsound, correct me.  You are silent?  Then do not, I
 beseech you, be so vulgarly illogical as to revolt from my conclusion.  We
 have now arrived,' he resumed, 'at some idea of the composition of the
 gang--for I incline to the hypothesis of more than one--and we now leave
 this room, which can disclose no more, and turn our attention to the
 court and garden.  (Jean-Marie, I trust you are observantly following my
 various steps; this is an excellent piece of education for you.)  Come
 with me to the door.  No steps on the court; it is unfortunate our court
 should be paved.  On what small matters hang the destiny of these
 delicate investigations!  Hey!  What have we here?  I have led on to the
 very spot,' he said, standing grandly backward and indicating the green
 gate.  'An escalade, as you can now see for yourselves, has taken place.'
 
 Sure enough, the green paint was in several places scratched and broken;
 and one of the panels preserved the print of a nailed shoe.  The foot had
 slipped, however, and it was difficult to estimate the size of the shoe,
 and impossible to distinguish the pattern of the nails.
 
 'The whole robbery,' concluded the Doctor, 'step by step, has been
 reconstituted.  Inductive science can no further go.'
 
 'It is wonderful,' said his wife.  'You should indeed have been a
 detective, Henri.  I had no idea of your talents.'
 
 'My dear,' replied Desprez, condescendingly, 'a man of scientific
 imagination combines the lesser faculties; he is a detective just as he
 is a publicist or a general; these are but local applications of his
 special talent.  But now,' he continued, 'would you have me go further?
 Would you have me lay my finger on the culprits--or rather, for I cannot
 promise quite so much, point out to you the very house where they
 consort?  It may be a satisfaction, at least it is all we are likely to
 get, since we are denied the remedy of law.  I reach the further stage in
 this way.  In order to fill my outline of the robbery, I require a man
 likely to be in the forest idling, I require a man of education, I
 require a man superior to considerations of morality.  The three
 requisites all centre in Tentaillon's boarders.  They are painters,
 therefore they are continually lounging in the forest.  They are
 painters, therefore they are not unlikely to have some smattering of
 education.  Lastly, because they are painters, they are probably immoral.
 And this I prove in two ways.  First, painting is an art which merely
 addresses the eye; it does not in any particular exercise the moral
 sense.  And second, painting, in common with all the other arts, implies
 the dangerous quality of imagination.  A man of imagination is never
 moral; he outsoars literal demarcations and reviews life under too many
 shifting lights to rest content with the invidious distinctions of the
 law!'
 
 'But you always say--at least, so I understood you'--said madame, 'that
 these lads display no imagination whatever.'
 
 'My dear, they displayed imagination, and of a very fantastic order,
 too,' returned the Doctor, 'when they embraced their beggarly profession.
 Besides--and this is an argument exactly suited to your intellectual
 level--many of them are English and American.  Where else should we
 expect to find a thief?--And now you had better get your coffee.  Because
 we have lost a treasure, there is no reason for starving.  For my part, I
 shall break my fast with white wine.  I feel unaccountably heated and
 thirsty to-day.  I can only attribute it to the shock of the discovery.
 And yet, you will bear me out, I supported the emotion nobly.'
 
 The Doctor had now talked himself back into an admirable humour; and as
 he sat in the arbour and slowly imbibed a large allowance of white wine
 and picked a little bread and cheese with no very impetuous appetite, if
 a third of his meditations ran upon the missing treasure, the other two-
 thirds were more pleasingly busied in the retrospect of his detective
 skill.
 
 About eleven Casimir arrived; he had caught an early train to
 Fontainebleau, and driven over to save time; and now his cab was stabled
 at Tentaillon's, and he remarked, studying his watch, that he could spare
 an hour and a half.  He was much the man of business, decisively spoken,
 given to frowning in an intellectual manner.  Anastasie's born brother,
 he did not waste much sentiment on the lady, gave her an English family
 kiss, and demanded a meal without delay.
 
 'You can tell me your story while we eat,' he observed.  'Anything good
 to-day, Stasie?'
 
 He was promised something good.  The trio sat down to table in the
 arbour, Jean-Marie waiting as well as eating, and the Doctor recounted
 what had happened in his richest narrative manner.  Casimir heard it with
 explosions of laughter.
 
 'What a streak of luck for you, my good brother,' he observed, when the
 tale was over.  'If you had gone to Paris, you would have played dick-
 duck-drake with the whole consignment in three months.  Your own would
 have followed; and you would have come to me in a procession like the
 last time.  But I give you warning--Stasie may weep and Henri
 ratiocinate--it will not serve you twice.  Your next collapse will be
 fatal.  I thought I had told you so, Stasie?  Hey?  No sense?'
 
 The Doctor winced and looked furtively at Jean-Marie; but the boy seemed
 apathetic.
 
 'And then again,' broke out Casimir, 'what children you are--vicious
 children, my faith!  How could you tell the value of this trash?  It
 might have been worth nothing, or next door.'
 
 'Pardon me,' said the Doctor.  'You have your usual flow of spirits, I
 perceive, but even less than your usual deliberation.  I am not entirely
 ignorant of these matters.'
 
 'Not entirely ignorant of anything ever I heard of,' interrupted Casimir,
 bowing, and raising his glass with a sort of pert politeness.
 
 'At least,' resumed the Doctor, 'I gave my mind to the subject--that you
 may be willing to believe--and I estimated that our capital would be
 doubled.'  And he described the nature of the find.
 
 'My word of honour!' said Casimir, 'I half believe you!  But much would
 depend on the quality of the gold.'
 
 'The quality, my dear Casimir, was--'  And the Doctor, in default of
 language, kissed his finger-tips.
 
 'I would not take your word for it, my good friend,' retorted the man of
 business.  'You are a man of very rosy views.  But this robbery,' he
 continued--'this robbery is an odd thing.  Of course I pass over your
 nonsense about gangs and landscape-painters.  For me, that is a dream.
 Who was in the house last night?'
 
 'None but ourselves,' replied the Doctor.
 
 'And this young gentleman?' asked Casimir, jerking a nod in the direction
 of Jean-Marie.
 
 'He too'--the Doctor bowed.
 
 'Well; and if it is a fair question, who is he?' pursued the brother-in-
 law.
 
 'Jean-Marie,' answered the Doctor, 'combines the functions of a son and
 stable-boy.  He began as the latter, but he rose rapidly to the more
 honourable rank in our affections.  He is, I may say, the greatest
 comfort in our lives.'
 
 'Ha!' said Casimir.  'And previous to becoming one of you?'
 
 'Jean-Marie has lived a remarkable existence; his experience his been
 eminently formative,' replied Desprez.  'If I had had to choose an
 education for my son, I should have chosen such another.  Beginning life
 with mountebanks and thieves, passing onward to the society and
 friendship of philosophers, he may be said to have skimmed the volume of
 human life.'
 
 'Thieves?' repeated the brother-in-law, with a meditative air.
 
 The Doctor could have bitten his tongue out.  He foresaw what was coming,
 and prepared his mind for a vigorous defence.
 
 'Did you ever steal yourself?' asked Casimir, turning suddenly on Jean-
 Marie, and for the first time employing a single eyeglass which hung
 round his neck.
 
 'Yes, sir,' replied the boy, with a deep blush.
 
 Casimir turned to the others with pursed lips, and nodded to them
 meaningly.  'Hey?' said he; 'how is that?'
 
 'Jean-Marie is a teller of the truth,' returned the Doctor, throwing out
 his bust.
 
 'He has never told a lie,' added madame.  'He is the best of boys.'
 
 'Never told a lie, has he not?' reflected Casimir.  'Strange, very
 strange.  Give me your attention, my young friend,' he continued.  'You
 knew about this treasure?'
 
 'He helped to bring it home,' interposed the Doctor.
 
 'Desprez, I ask you nothing but to hold your tongue,' returned Casimir.
 'I mean to question this stable-boy of yours; and if you are so certain
 of his innocence, you can afford to let him answer for himself.  Now,
 sir,' he resumed, pointing his eyeglass straight at Jean-Marie.  'You
 knew it could be stolen with impunity?  You knew you could not be
 prosecuted?  Come!  Did you, or did you not?'
 
 'I did,' answered Jean-Marie, in a miserable whisper.  He sat there
 changing colour like a revolving pharos, twisting his fingers
 hysterically, swallowing air, the picture of guilt.
 
 'You knew where it was put?' resumed the inquisitor.
 
 'Yes,' from Jean-Marie.
 
 'You say you have been a thief before,' continued Casimir.  'Now how am I
 to know that you are not one still?  I suppose you could climb the green
 gate?'
 
 'Yes,' still lower, from the culprit.
 
 'Well, then, it was you who stole these things.  You know it, and you
 dare not deny it.  Look me in the face!  Raise your sneak's eyes, and
 answer!'
 
 But in place of anything of that sort Jean-Marie broke into a dismal howl
 and fled from the arbour.  Anastasie, as she pursued to capture and
 reassure the victim, found time to send one Parthian arrow--'Casimir, you
 are a brute!'
 
 'My brother,' said Desprez, with the greatest dignity, 'you take upon
 yourself a licence--'
 
 'Desprez,' interrupted Casimir, 'for Heaven's sake be a man of the world.
 You telegraph me to leave my business and come down here on yours.  I
 come, I ask the business, you say "Find me this thief!"  Well, I find
 him; I say "There he is!"  You need not like it, but you have no manner
 of right to take offence.'
 
 'Well,' returned the Doctor, 'I grant that; I will even thank you for
 your mistaken zeal.  But your hypothesis was so extravagantly monstrous--'
 
 'Look here,' interrupted Casimir; 'was it you or Stasie?'
 
 'Certainly not,' answered the Doctor.
 
 'Very well; then it was the boy.  Say no more about it,' said the brother-
 in-law, and he produced his cigar-case.
 
 'I will say this much more,' returned Desprez: 'if that boy came and told
 me so himself, I should not believe him; and if I did believe him, so
 implicit is my trust, I should conclude that he had acted for the best.'
 
 'Well, well,' said Casimir, indulgently.  'Have you a light?  I must be
 going.  And by the way, I wish you would let me sell your Turks for you.
 I always told you, it meant smash.  I tell you so again.  Indeed, it was
 partly that that brought me down.  You never acknowledge my letters--a
 most unpardonable habit.'
 
 'My good brother,' replied the Doctor blandly, 'I have never denied your
 ability in business; but I can perceive your limitations.'
 
 'Egad, my friend, I can return the compliment,' observed the man of
 business.  'Your limitation is to be downright irrational.'
 
 'Observe the relative position,' returned the Doctor with a smile.  'It
 is your attitude to believe through thick and thin in one man's
 judgment--your own.  I follow the same opinion, but critically and with
 open eyes.  Which is the more irrational?--I leave it to yourself.'
 
 'O, my dear fellow!' cried Casimir, 'stick to your Turks, stick to your
 stable-boy, go to the devil in general in your own way and be done with
 it.  But don't ratiocinate with me--I cannot bear it.  And so, ta-ta.  I
 might as well have stayed away for any good I've done.  Say good-bye from
 me to Stasie, and to the sullen hang-dog of a stable-boy, if you insist
 on it; I'm off.'
 
 And Casimir departed.  The Doctor, that night, dissected his character
 before Anastasie.  'One thing, my beautiful,' he said, 'he has learned
 one thing from his lifelong acquaintance with your husband: the word
 _ratiocinate_.  It shines in his vocabulary, like a jewel in a muck-heap.
 And, even so, he continually misapplies it.  For you must have observed
 he uses it as a sort of taunt, in the sense of to _ergotise_, implying,
 as it were--the poor, dear fellow!--a vein of sophistry.  As for his
 cruelty to Jean-Marie, it must be forgiven him--it is not his nature, it
 is the nature of his life.  A man who deals with money, my dear, is a man
 lost.'
 
 With Jean-Marie the process of reconciliation had been somewhat slow.  At
 first he was inconsolable, insisted on leaving the family, went from
 paroxysm to paroxysm of tears; and it was only after Anastasie had been
 closeted for an hour with him, alone, that she came forth, sought out the
 Doctor, and, with tears in her eyes, acquainted that gentleman with what
 had passed.
 
 'At first, my husband, he would hear of nothing,' she said.  'Imagine! if
 he had left us! what would the treasure be to that?  Horrible treasure,
 it has brought all this about!  At last, after he has sobbed his very
 heart out, he agrees to stay on a condition--we are not to mention this
 matter, this infamous suspicion, not even to mention the robbery.  On
 that agreement only, the poor, cruel boy will consent to remain among his
 friends.'
 
 'But this inhibition,' said the Doctor, 'this embargo--it cannot possibly
 apply to me?'
 
 'To all of us,' Anastasie assured him.
 
 'My cherished one,' Desprez protested, 'you must have misunderstood.  It
 cannot apply to me.  He would naturally come to me.'
 
 'Henri,' she said, 'it does; I swear to you it does.'
 
 'This is a painful, a very painful circumstance,' the Doctor said,
 looking a little black.  'I cannot affect, Anastasie, to be anything but
 justly wounded.  I feel this, I feel it, my wife, acutely.'
 
 'I knew you would,' she said.  'But if you had seen his distress!  We
 must make allowances, we must sacrifice our feelings.'
 
 'I trust, my dear, you have never found me averse to sacrifices,'
 returned the Doctor very stiffly.
 
 'And you will let me go and tell him that you have agreed?  It will be
 like your noble nature,' she cried.
 
 So it would, he perceived--it would be like his noble nature!  Up jumped
 his spirits, triumphant at the thought.  'Go, darling,' he said nobly,
 'reassure him.  The subject is buried; more--I make an effort, I have
 accustomed my will to these exertions--and it is forgotten.'
 
 A little after, but still with swollen eyes and looking mortally
 sheepish, Jean-Marie reappeared and went ostentatiously about his
 business.  He was the only unhappy member of the party that sat down that
 night to supper.  As for the Doctor, he was radiant.  He thus sang the
 requiem of the treasure:--
 
 'This has been, on the whole, a most amusing episode,' he said.  'We are
 not a penny the worse--nay, we are immensely gainers.  Our philosophy has
 been exercised; some of the turtle is still left--the most wholesome of
 delicacies; I have my staff, Anastasie has her new dress, Jean-Marie is
 the proud possessor of a fashionable kepi.  Besides, we had a glass of
 Hermitage last night; the glow still suffuses my memory.  I was growing
 positively niggardly with that Hermitage, positively niggardly.  Let me
 take the hint: we had one bottle to celebrate the appearance of our
 visionary fortune; let us have a second to console us for its
 occultation.  The third I hereby dedicate to Jean-Marie's wedding
 breakfast.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.  THE FALL OF THE HOUSE OF DESPREZ.
 
 
 The Doctor's house has not yet received the compliment of a description,
 and it is now high time that the omission were supplied, for the house is
 itself an actor in the story, and one whose part is nearly at an end.  Two
 stories in height, walls of a warm yellow, tiles of an ancient ruddy
 brown diversified with moss and lichen, it stood with one wall to the
 street in the angle of the Doctor's property.  It was roomy, draughty,
 and inconvenient.  The large rafters were here and there engraven with
 rude marks and patterns; the handrail of the stair was carved in
 countrified arabesque; a stout timber pillar, which did duty to support
 the dining-room roof, bore mysterious characters on its darker side,
 runes, according to the Doctor; nor did he fail, when he ran over the
 legendary history of the house and its possessors, to dwell upon the
 Scandinavian scholar who had left them.  Floors, doors, and rafters made
 a great variety of angles; every room had a particular inclination; the
 gable had tilted towards the garden, after the manner of a leaning tower,
 and one of the former proprietors had buttressed the building from that
 side with a great strut of wood, like the derrick of a crane.  Altogether,
 it had many marks of ruin; it was a house for the rats to desert; and
 nothing but its excellent brightness--the window-glass polished and
 shining, the paint well scoured, the brasses radiant, the very prop all
 wreathed about with climbing flowers--nothing but its air of a
 well-tended, smiling veteran, sitting, crutch and all, in the sunny
 corner of a garden, marked it as a house for comfortable people to
 inhabit.  In poor or idle management it would soon have hurried into the
 blackguard stages of decay.  As it was, the whole family loved it, and
 the Doctor was never better inspired than when he narrated its imaginary
 story and drew the character of its successive masters, from the Hebrew
 merchant who had re-edified its walls after the sack of the town, and
 past the mysterious engraver of the runes, down to the long-headed, dirty-
 handed boor from whom he had himself acquired it at a ruinous expense.  As
 for any alarm about its security, the idea had never presented itself.
 What had stood four centuries might well endure a little longer.
 
 Indeed, in this particular winter, after the finding and losing of the
 treasure, the Desprez' had an anxiety of a very different order, and one
 which lay nearer their hearts.  Jean-Marie was plainly not himself.  He
 had fits of hectic activity, when he made unusual exertions to please,
 spoke more and faster, and redoubled in attention to his lessons.  But
 these were interrupted by spells of melancholia and brooding silence,
 when the boy was little better than unbearable.
 
 'Silence,' the Doctor moralised--'you see, Anastasie, what comes of
 silence.  Had the boy properly unbosomed himself, the little
 disappointment about the treasure, the little annoyance about Casimir's
 incivility, would long ago have been forgotten.  As it is, they prey upon
 him like a disease.  He loses flesh, his appetite is variable and, on the
 whole, impaired.  I keep him on the strictest regimen, I exhibit the most
 powerful tonics; both in vain.'
 
 'Don't you think you drug him too much?' asked madame, with an
 irrepressible shudder.
 
 'Drug?' cried the Doctor; 'I drug?  Anastasie, you are mad!'
 
 Time went on, and the boy's health still slowly declined.  The Doctor
 blamed the weather, which was cold and boisterous.  He called in his
 _confrere_ from Bourron, took a fancy for him, magnified his capacity,
 and was pretty soon under treatment himself--it scarcely appeared for
 what complaint.  He and Jean-Marie had each medicine to take at different
 periods of the day.  The Doctor used to lie in wait for the exact moment,
 watch in hand.  'There is nothing like regularity,' he would say, fill
 out the doses, and dilate on the virtues of the draught; and if the boy
 seemed none the better, the Doctor was not at all the worse.
 
 Gunpowder Day, the boy was particularly low.  It was scowling, squally
 weather.  Huge broken companies of cloud sailed swiftly overhead; raking
 gleams of sunlight swept the village, and were followed by intervals of
 darkness and white, flying rain.  At times the wind lifted up its voice
 and bellowed.  The trees were all scourging themselves along the meadows,
 the last leaves flying like dust.
 
 The Doctor, between the boy and the weather, was in his element; he had a
 theory to prove.  He sat with his watch out and a barometer in front of
 him, waiting for the squalls and noting their effect upon the human
 pulse.  'For the true philosopher,' he remarked delightedly, 'every fact
 in nature is a toy.'  A letter came to him; but, as its arrival coincided
 with the approach of another gust, he merely crammed it into his pocket,
 gave the time to Jean-Marie, and the next moment they were both counting
 their pulses as if for a wager.
 
 At nightfall the wind rose into a tempest.  It besieged the hamlet,
 apparently from every side, as if with batteries of cannon; the houses
 shook and groaned; live coals were blown upon the floor.  The uproar and
 terror of the night kept people long awake, sitting with pallid faces
 giving ear.
 
 It was twelve before the Desprez family retired.  By half-past one, when
 the storm was already somewhat past its height, the Doctor was awakened
 from a troubled slumber, and sat up.  A noise still rang in his ears, but
 whether of this world or the world of dreams he was not certain.  Another
 clap of wind followed.  It was accompanied by a sickening movement of the
 whole house, and in the subsequent lull Desprez could hear the tiles
 pouring like a cataract into the loft above his head.  He plucked
 Anastasie bodily out of bed.
 
 'Run!' he cried, thrusting some wearing apparel into her hands; 'the
 house is falling!  To the garden!'
 
 She did not pause to be twice bidden; she was down the stair in an
 instant.  She had never before suspected herself of such activity.  The
 Doctor meanwhile, with the speed of a piece of pantomime business, and
 undeterred by broken shins, proceeded to rout out Jean-Marie, tore Aline
 from her virgin slumbers, seized her by the hand, and tumbled downstairs
 and into the garden, with the girl tumbling behind him, still not half
 awake.
 
 The fugitives rendezvous'd in the arbour by some common instinct.  Then
 came a bull's-eye flash of struggling moonshine, which disclosed their
 four figures standing huddled from the wind in a raffle of flying
 drapery, and not without a considerable need for more.  At the
 humiliating spectacle Anastasie clutched her nightdress desperately about
 her and burst loudly into tears.  The Doctor flew to console her; but she
 elbowed him away.  She suspected everybody of being the general public,
 and thought the darkness was alive with eyes.
 
 Another gleam and another violent gust arrived together; the house was
 seen to rock on its foundation, and, just as the light was once more
 eclipsed, a crash which triumphed over the shouting of the wind announced
 its fall, and for a moment the whole garden was alive with skipping tiles
 and brickbats.  One such missile grazed the Doctor's ear; another
 descended on the bare foot of Aline, who instantly made night hideous
 with her shrieks.
 
 By this time the hamlet was alarmed, lights flashed from the windows,
 hails reached the party, and the Doctor answered, nobly contending
 against Aline and the tempest.  But this prospect of help only awakened
 Anastasie to a more active stage of terror.
 
 'Henri, people will be coming,' she screamed in her husband's ear.
 
 'I trust so,' he replied.
 
 'They cannot.  I would rather die,' she wailed.
 
 'My dear,' said the Doctor reprovingly, 'you are excited.  I gave you
 some clothes.  What have you done with them?'
 
 'Oh, I don't know--I must have thrown them away!  Where are they?' she
 sobbed.
 
 Desprez groped about in the darkness.  'Admirable!' he remarked; 'my grey
 velveteen trousers!  This will exactly meet your necessities.'
 
 'Give them to me!' she cried fiercely; but as soon as she had them in her
 hands her mood appeared to alter--she stood silent for a moment, and then
 pressed the garment back upon the Doctor.  'Give it to Aline,' she
 said--'poor girl.'
 
 'Nonsense!' said the Doctor.  'Aline does not know what she is about.
 Aline is beside herself with terror; and at any rate, she is a peasant.
 Now I am really concerned at this exposure for a person of your
 housekeeping habits; my solicitude and your fantastic modesty both point
 to the same remedy--the pantaloons.'  He held them ready.
 
 'It is impossible.  You do not understand,' she said with dignity.
 
 By this time rescue was at hand.  It had been found impracticable to
 enter by the street, for the gate was blocked with masonry, and the
 nodding ruin still threatened further avalanches.  But between the
 Doctor's garden and the one on the right hand there was that very
 picturesque contrivance--a common well; the door on the Desprez' side had
 chanced to be unbolted, and now, through the arched aperture a man's
 bearded face and an arm supporting a lantern were introduced into the
 world of windy darkness, where Anastasie concealed her woes.  The light
 struck here and there among the tossing apple boughs, it glinted on the
 grass; but the lantern and the glowing face became the centre of the
 world.  Anastasie crouched back from the intrusion.
 
 'This way!' shouted the man.  'Are you all safe?'  Aline, still
 screaming, ran to the new comer, and was presently hauled head-foremost
 through the wall.
 
 'Now, Anastasie, come on; it is your turn,' said the husband.
 
 'I cannot,' she replied.
 
 'Are we all to die of exposure, madame?' thundered Doctor Desprez.
 
 'You can go!' she cried.  'Oh, go, go away!  I can stay here; I am quite
 warm.'
 
 The Doctor took her by the shoulders with an oath.
 
 'Stop!' she screamed.  'I will put them on.'
 
 She took the detested lendings in her hand once more; but her repulsion
 was stronger than shame.  'Never!' she cried, shuddering, and flung them
 far away into the night.
 
 Next moment the Doctor had whirled her to the well.  The man was there
 and the lantern; Anastasie closed her eyes and appeared to herself to be
 about to die.  How she was transported through the arch she knew not; but
 once on the other side she was received by the neighbour's wife, and
 enveloped in a friendly blanket.
 
 Beds were made ready for the two women, clothes of very various sizes for
 the Doctor and Jean-Marie; and for the remainder of the night, while
 madame dozed in and out on the borderland of hysterics, her husband sat
 beside the fire and held forth to the admiring neighbours.  He showed
 them, at length, the causes of the accident; for years, he explained, the
 fall had been impending; one sign had followed another, the joints had
 opened, the plaster had cracked, the old walls bowed inward; last, not
 three weeks ago, the cellar door had begun to work with difficulty in its
 grooves.  'The cellar!' he said, gravely shaking his head over a glass of
 mulled wine.  'That reminds me of my poor vintages.  By a manifest
 providence the Hermitage was nearly at an end.  One bottle--I lose but
 one bottle of that incomparable wine.  It had been set apart against Jean-
 Marie's wedding.  Well, I must lay down some more; it will be an interest
 in life.  I am, however, a man somewhat advanced in years.  My great work
 is now buried in the fall of my humble roof; it will never be
 completed--my name will have been writ in water.  And yet you find me
 calm--I would say cheerful.  Can your priest do more?'
 
 By the first glimpse of day the party sallied forth from the fireside
 into the street.  The wind had fallen, but still charioted a world of
 troubled clouds; the air bit like frost; and the party, as they stood
 about the ruins in the rainy twilight of the morning, beat upon their
 breasts and blew into their hands for warmth.  The house had entirely
 fallen, the walls outward, the roof in; it was a mere heap of rubbish,
 with here and there a forlorn spear of broken rafter.  A sentinel was
 placed over the ruins to protect the property, and the party adjourned to
 Tentaillon's to break their fast at the Doctor's expense.  The bottle
 circulated somewhat freely; and before they left the table it had begun
 to snow.
 
 For three days the snow continued to fall, and the ruins, covered with
 tarpaulin and watched by sentries, were left undisturbed.  The Desprez'
 meanwhile had taken up their abode at Tentaillon's.  Madame spent her
 time in the kitchen, concocting little delicacies, with the admiring aid
 of Madame Tentaillon, or sitting by the fire in thoughtful abstraction.
 The fall of the house affected her wonderfully little; that blow had been
 parried by another; and in her mind she was continually fighting over
 again the battle of the trousers.  Had she done right?  Had she done
 wrong?  And now she would applaud her determination; and anon, with a
 horrid flush of unavailing penitence, she would regret the trousers.  No
 juncture in her life had so much exercised her judgment.  In the meantime
 the Doctor had become vastly pleased with his situation.  Two of the
 summer boarders still lingered behind the rest, prisoners for lack of a
 remittance; they were both English, but one of them spoke French pretty
 fluently, and was, besides, a humorous, agile-minded fellow, with whom
 the Doctor could reason by the hour, secure of comprehension.  Many were
 the glasses they emptied, many the topics they discussed.
 
 'Anastasie,' the Doctor said on the third morning, 'take an example from
 your husband, from Jean-Marie!  The excitement has done more for the boy
 than all my tonics, he takes his turn as sentry with positive gusto.  As
 for me, you behold me.  I have made friends with the Egyptians; and my
 Pharaoh is, I swear it, a most agreeable companion.  You alone are
 hipped.  About a house--a few dresses?  What are they in comparison to
 the "Pharmacopoeia"--the labour of years lying buried below stones and
 sticks in this depressing hamlet?  The snow falls; I shake it from my
 cloak!  Imitate me.  Our income will be impaired, I grant it, since we
 must rebuild; but moderation, patience, and philosophy will gather about
 the hearth.  In the meanwhile, the Tentaillons are obliging; the table,
 with your additions, will pass; only the wine is execrable--well, I shall
 send for some to-day.  My Pharaoh will be gratified to drink a decent
 glass; aha! and I shall see if he possesses that acme of organisation--a
 palate.  If he has a palate, he is perfect.'
 
 'Henri,' she said, shaking her head, 'you are a man; you cannot
 understand my feelings; no woman could shake off the memory of so public
 a humiliation.'  The Doctor could not restrain a titter.  'Pardon me,
 darling,' he said; 'but really, to the philosophical intelligence, the
 incident appears so small a trifle.  You looked extremely well--'
 
 'Henri!' she cried.
 
 'Well, well, I will say no more,' he replied.  'Though, to be sure, if
 you had consented to indue--_A propos_,' he broke off, 'and my trousers!
 They are lying in the snow--my favourite trousers!'  And he dashed in
 quest of Jean-Marie.
 
 Two hours afterwards the boy returned to the inn with a spade under one
 arm and a curious sop of clothing under the other.
 
 The Doctor ruefully took it in his hands.  'They have been!' he said.
 'Their tense is past.  Excellent pantaloons, you are no more!  Stay,
 something in the pocket,' and he produced a piece of paper.  'A letter!
 ay, now I mind me; it was received on the morning of the gale, when I was
 absorbed in delicate investigations.  It is still legible.  From poor,
 dear Casimir!  It is as well,' he chuckled, 'that I have educated him to
 patience.  Poor Casimir and his correspondence--his infinitesimal,
 timorous, idiotic correspondence!'
 
 He had by this time cautiously unfolded the wet letter; but, as he bent
 himself to decipher the writing, a cloud descended on his brow.
 
 '_Bigre_!' he cried, with a galvanic start.
 
 And then the letter was whipped into the fire, and the Doctor's cap was
 on his head in the turn of a hand.
 
 'Ten minutes!  I can catch it, if I run,' he cried.  'It is always late.
 I go to Paris.  I shall telegraph.'
 
 'Henri! what is wrong?' cried his wife.
 
 'Ottoman Bonds!' came from the disappearing Doctor; and Anastasie and
 Jean-Marie were left face to face with the wet trousers.  Desprez had
 gone to Paris, for the second time in seven years; he had gone to Paris
 with a pair of wooden shoes, a knitted spencer, a black blouse, a country
 nightcap, and twenty francs in his pocket.  The fall of the house was but
 a secondary marvel; the whole world might have fallen and scarce left his
 family more petrified.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII. THE WAGES OF PHILOSOPHY.
 
 
 On the morning of the next day, the Doctor, a mere spectre of himself,
 was brought back in the custody of Casimir.  They found Anastasie and the
 boy sitting together by the fire; and Desprez, who had exchanged his
 toilette for a ready-made rig-out of poor materials, waved his hand as he
 entered, and sank speechless on the nearest chair.  Madame turned direct
 to Casimir.
 
 'What is wrong?' she cried.
 
 'Well,' replied Casimir, 'what have I told you all along?  It has come.
 It is a clean shave, this time; so you may as well bear up and make the
 best of it.  House down, too, eh?  Bad luck, upon my soul.'
 
 'Are we--are we--ruined?' she gasped.
 
 The Doctor stretched out his arms to her.  'Ruined,' he replied, 'you are
 ruined by your sinister husband.'
 
 Casimir observed the consequent embrace through his eyeglass; then he
 turned to Jean-Marie.  'You hear?' he said.  'They are ruined; no more
 pickings, no more house, no more fat cutlets.  It strikes me, my friend,
 that you had best be packing; the present speculation is about worked
 out.'  And he nodded to him meaningly.
 
 'Never!' cried Desprez, springing up.  'Jean-Marie, if you prefer to
 leave me, now that I am poor, you can go; you shall receive your hundred
 francs, if so much remains to me.  But if you will consent to stay'--the
 Doctor wept a little--'Casimir offers me a place--as clerk,' he resumed.
 'The emoluments are slender, but they will be enough for three.  It is
 too much already to have lost my fortune; must I lose my son?'
 
 Jean-Marie sobbed bitterly, but without a word.
 
 'I don't like boys who cry,' observed Casimir.  'This one is always
 crying.  Here! you clear out of this for a little; I have business with
 your master and mistress, and these domestic feelings may be settled
 after I am gone.  March!' and he held the door open.
 
 Jean-Marie slunk out, like a detected thief.
 
 By twelve they were all at table but Jean-Marie.
 
 'Hey?' said Casimir.  'Gone, you see.  Took the hint at once.'
 
 'I do not, I confess,' said Desprez, 'I do not seek to excuse his
 absence.  It speaks a want of heart that disappoints me sorely.'
 
 'Want of manners,' corrected Casimir.  'Heart, he never had.  Why,
 Desprez, for a clever fellow, you are the most gullible mortal in
 creation.  Your ignorance of human nature and human business is beyond
 belief.  You are swindled by heathen Turks, swindled by vagabond
 children, swindled right and left, upstairs and downstairs.  I think it
 must be your imagination.  I thank my stars I have none.'
 
 'Pardon me,' replied Desprez, still humbly, but with a return of spirit
 at sight of a distinction to be drawn; 'pardon me, Casimir.  You possess,
 even to an eminent degree, the commercial imagination.  It was the lack
 of that in me--it appears it is my weak point--that has led to these
 repeated shocks.  By the commercial imagination the financier forecasts
 the destiny of his investments, marks the falling house--'
 
 'Egad,' interrupted Casimir: 'our friend the stable-boy appears to have
 his share of it.'
 
 The Doctor was silenced; and the meal was continued and finished
 principally to the tune of the brother-in-law's not very consolatory
 conversation.  He entirely ignored the two young English painters,
 turning a blind eyeglass to their salutations, and continuing his remarks
 as if he were alone in the bosom of his family; and with every second
 word he ripped another stitch out of the air balloon of Desprez's vanity.
 By the time coffee was over the poor Doctor was as limp as a napkin.
 
 'Let us go and see the ruins,' said Casimir.
 
 They strolled forth into the street.  The fall of the house, like the
 loss of a front tooth, had quite transformed the village.  Through the
 gap the eye commanded a great stretch of open snowy country, and the
 place shrank in comparison.  It was like a room with an open door.  The
 sentinel stood by the green gate, looking very red and cold, but he had a
 pleasant word for the Doctor and his wealthy kinsman.
 
 Casimir looked at the mound of ruins, he tried the quality of the
 tarpaulin.  'H'm,' he said, 'I hope the cellar arch has stood.  If it
 has, my good brother, I will give you a good price for the wines.'
 
 'We shall start digging to-morrow,' said the sentry.  'There is no more
 fear of snow.'
 
 'My friend,' returned Casimir sententiously, 'you had better wait till
 you get paid.'
 
 The Doctor winced, and began dragging his offensive brother-in-law
 towards Tentaillon's.  In the house there would be fewer auditors, and
 these already in the secret of his fall.
 
 'Hullo!' cried Casimir, 'there goes the stable-boy with his luggage; no,
 egad, he is taking it into the inn.'
 
 And sure enough, Jean-Marie was seen to cross the snowy street and enter
 Tentaillon's, staggering under a large hamper.
 
 The Doctor stopped with a sudden, wild hope.
 
 'What can he have?' he said.  'Let us go and see.'  And he hurried on.
 
 'His luggage, to be sure,' answered Casimir.  'He is on the move--thanks
 to the commercial imagination.'
 
 'I have not seen that hamper for--for ever so long,' remarked the Doctor.
 
 'Nor will you see it much longer,' chuckled Casimir; 'unless, indeed, we
 interfere.  And by the way, I insist on an examination.'
 
 'You will not require,' said Desprez, positively with a sob; and, casting
 a moist, triumphant glance at Casimir, he began to run.
 
 'What the devil is up with him, I wonder?' Casimir reflected; and then,
 curiosity taking the upper hand, he followed the Doctor's example and
 took to his heels.
 
 The hamper was so heavy and large, and Jean-Marie himself so little and
 so weary, that it had taken him a great while to bundle it upstairs to
 the Desprez' private room; and he had just set it down on the floor in
 front of Anastasie, when the Doctor arrived, and was closely followed by
 the man of business.  Boy and hamper were both in a most sorry plight;
 for the one had passed four months underground in a certain cave on the
 way to Acheres, and the other had run about five miles as hard as his
 legs would carry him, half that distance under a staggering weight.
 
 'Jean-Marie,' cried the Doctor, in a voice that was only too seraphic to
 be called hysterical, 'is it--?  It is!' he cried.  'O, my son, my son!'
 And he sat down upon the hamper and sobbed like a little child.
 
 'You will not go to Paris now,' said Jean-Marie sheepishly.
 
 'Casimir,' said Desprez, raising his wet face, 'do you see that boy, that
 angel boy?  He is the thief; he took the treasure from a man unfit to be
 entrusted with its use; he brings it back to me when I am sobered and
 humbled.  These, Casimir, are the Fruits of my Teaching, and this moment
 is the Reward of my Life.'
 
 '_Tiens_,' said Casimir.
 
 PRINTED BY
 SPOTTISWOODE AND CO. LTD., NEW-STREET SQUARE
 LONDON
 
 
 
 
 Footnotes
 
 
 {5}  Boggy.
 
 {15}  Clock
 
 {16}  Enjoy.
 
 {140}  To come forrit--to offer oneself as a communicant.
 
 {144}  It was a common belief in Scotland that the devil appeared as a
 black man.  This appears in several witch trials and I think in Law's
 _Memorials_, that delightful store-house of the quaint and grisly.
 
 {263}  Let it be so, for my tale!
 

 
 
 
 Produced by David T. Jones, Ross Cooling and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Canada Team at
 http://www.pgdpcanada.net (This file was produced from
 images generously made available by The Internet
 Archive/American Libraries.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   A LOWDEN SABBATH MORN
 
   BY
 
   ROBERT
   LOUIS
   STEVENSON
 
   ILLUSTRATED
 
   BY
 
   A. S. BOYD
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 
 
   A LOWDEN SABBATH MORN
 
 [Illustration: THE PRAYER        p. 16]
 
 
 
 
   A LOWDEN
   SABBATH MORN
 
   BY ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
   ILLUSTRATED BY A. S. BOYD
 
   & PUBLISHED AT LONDON BY
   CHATTO & WINDUS MCMIX
 
 
 
 
   First Illustrated Edition published 1898, and a Second Impression in
   the same year.
 
   New Edition in 1907; and with Coloured Frontispiece in 1909.
 
 
   Printed by Ballantyne, Hanson & Co.
   At the Ballantyne Press, Edinburgh
 
 
 
 
   TO
 
   THE MEMORY OF
 
   ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
   THIS BOOK IS DEDICATED
 
   BY
 
   THE ILLUSTRATOR
 
 
 
 
   A Lowden Sabbath Morn
 
 
     I
 
   The clinkum-clank o' Sabbath bells
   Noo to the hoastin' rookery swells,
   Noo faintin' laigh in shady dells,
           Sounds far an' near,
   An' through the simmer kintry tells
           Its tale o' cheer.
 
 
     II
 
   An' noo, to that melodious play,
   A' deidly awn the quiet sway--
   A' ken their solemn holiday,
           Bestial an' human,
   The singin' lintie on the brae,
           The restin' plou'man.
 
 
     III
 
   He, mair than a' the lave o' men,
   His week completit joys to ken;
   Half-dressed, he daunders out an' in,
           Perplext wi' leisure;
   An' his raxt limbs he'll rax again
           Wi' painfue' pleesure.
 
 
       IV
 
   The steerin' mither strang afit
   Noo shoos the bairnies but a bit;
   Noo cries them ben, their Sinday shueit
           To scart upon them,
   Or sweeties in their pouch to pit,
           Wi' blessin's on them.
 
 
     V
 
   The lasses, clean frae tap to taes,
   Are busked in crunklin' underclaes;
   The gartened hose, the weel-filled stays,
           The nakit shift,
   A' bleached on bonny greens for days
           An' white's the drift.
 
 
     VI
 
   An' noo to face the kirkward mile:
   The guidman's hat o' dacent style,
   The blackit shoon, we noo maun fyle
           As white's the miller:
   A waefue' peety tae, to spile
           The warth o' siller.
 
 
     VII
 
   Our Marg'et, aye sae keen to crack,
   Douce-stappin' in the stoury track,
   Her emeralt goun a' kiltit back
           Frae snawy coats,
   White-ankled, leads the kirkward pack
           Wi' Dauvit Groats.
 
 
     VIII
 
   A thocht ahint, in runkled breeks,
   A' spiled wi' lyin' by for weeks,
   The guidman follows closs, an' cleiks
           The sonsie missis;
   His sarious face at aince bespeaks
           The day that this is.
 
 
     IX
 
   And aye an' while we nearer draw
   To whaur the kirkton lies alaw,
   Mair neebours, comin' saft an' slaw
           Frae here an' there,
   The thicker thrang the gate, an' caw
           The stour in air.
 
 
     X
 
   But hark! the bells frae nearer clang;
   To rowst the slaw, their sides they bang;
   An' see! black coats a'ready thrang
           The green kirkyaird;
   And at the yett, the chestnuts spang
           That brocht the laird.
 
 
     XI
 
   The solemn elders at the plate
   Stand drinkin' deep the pride o' state:
   The practised hands as gash an' great
           As Lords o' Session;
   The later named, a wee thing blate
           In their expression.
 
 
     XII
 
   The prentit stanes that mark the deid,
   Wi' lengthened lip, the sarious read;
   Syne wag a moraleesin' heid,
           An' then an' there
   Their hirplin' practice an' their creed
           Try hard to square.
 
 
     XIII
 
   It's here our Merren lang has lain,
   A wee bewast the table-stane;
   An' yon's the grave o' Sandy Blane;
           An' further ower,
   The mither's brithers, dacent men!
           Lie a' the fower.
 
 
     XIV
 
   Here the guidman sall bide awee
   To dwall amang the deid; to see
   Auld faces clear in fancy's e'e;
           Belike to hear
   Auld voices fa'in saft an' slee
           On fancy's ear.
 
 
     XV
 
   Thus, on the day o' solemn things,
   The bell that in the steeple swings
   To fauld a scaittered faim'ly rings
           Its walcome screed;
   An' just a wee thing nearer brings
           The quick an' deid.
 
 
     XVI
 
   But noo the bell is ringin' in;
   To tak their places, folk begin;
   The minister himsel' will shuene
           Be up the gate,
   Filled fu' wi' clavers about sin
           An' man's estate.
 
 
     XVII
 
   The tuenes are up--_French_, to be shuere,
   The faithfue' _French_, an' twa-three mair;
   The auld prezentor, hoastin' sair,
           Wales out the portions,
   An' yirks the tuene into the air
           Wi' queer contortions.
 
 
     XVIII
 
   Follows the prayer, the readin' next,
   An' than the fisslin' for the text--
   The twa-three last to find it, vext
           But kind o' proud;
   An' than the peppermints are raxed,
           An' southernwood.
 
 
     XIX
 
   For noo's the time whan pows are seen
   Nid-noddin' like a mandareen;
   When tenty mithers stap a preen
           In sleepin' weans;
   An' nearly half the parochine
           Forget their pains.
 
 
     XX
 
   There's just a waukrif' twa or three:
   Thrawn commentautors sweer to 'gree,
   Weans glowrin' at the bumlin' bee
           On windie-glasses,
   Or lads that tak a keek a-glee
           At sonsie lasses.
 
 
     XXI
 
   Himsel', meanwhile, frae whaur he cocks
   An' bobs belaw the soundin'-box,
   The treesures of his words unlocks
           Wi' prodigality,
   An' deals some unco dingin' knocks
           To infidality.
 
 
     XXII
 
   Wi' sappy unction, hoo he burkes
   The hopes o' men that trust in works,
   Expounds the fau'ts o' ither kirks,
           An' shaws the best o' them
   No muckle better than mere Turks,
           When a's confessed o' them.
 
 
     XXIII
 
   Bethankit! what a bonny creed!
   What mair would ony Christian need?--
   The braw words rumm'le ower his heid,
           Nor steer the sleeper;
   And in their restin' graves, the deid
           Sleep aye the deeper.
 
 
 
 
   AUTHOR'S NOTE
 
 
 It may be guessed by some that I had a certain parish in my eye, and
 this makes it proper I should add a word of disclamation. In my time
 there have been two ministers in that parish. Of the first I have a
 special reason to speak well, even had there been any to think ill. The
 second I have often met in private and long (in the due phrase) "sat
 under" in his church, and neither here nor there have I heard an unkind
 or ugly word upon his lips. The preacher of the text had thus no
 original in that particular parish; but when I was a boy he might have
 been observed in many others; he was then (like the schoolmaster)
 abroad; and by recent advices, it would seem he has not yet entirely
 disappeared.
 
 
 
 
   ILLUSTRATOR'S NOTE
 
 
 I am not certain of the particular parish Stevenson had in his mind when
 he wrote this poem, but I am certain that the description is typical of
 almost any Scottish rural parish, Lowden (that is, _Lothian_) or other.
 In illustrating the verses it has seemed to me, therefore, unnecessary
 to make portraits from any one locality. I fancy the writer looked back
 to the period of his boyhood and to the people he knew in more than one
 part of his native country, so I have tried to depict that period and
 that class of people as I remember them in various counties of his land
 and mine.
 
   A. S. B.
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The clinkum-clank o' Sabbath bells
   Noo to the hoastin' rookery swells,
   Noo faintin' laigh in shady dells,
           Sounds far an' near,
   An' through the simmer kintry tells
           Its tale o' cheer._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _An' noo, to that melodious play,
   A' deidly awn the quiet sway--
   A' ken their solemn holiday,
           Bestial an' human,
   The singin' lintie on the brae,
           The restin' plou'man._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _He, mair than a' the lave o' men,
   His week completit joys to ken;
   Half-dressed, he daunders out an' in,
           Perplext wi' leisure;
   An' his raxt limbs he'll rax again
           Wi' painfue' pleesure._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The steerin' mither strang afit
   Noo shoos the bairnies but a bit;
   Noo cries them ben, their Sinday shueit
           To scart upon them,
   Or sweeties in their pouch to pit,
           Wi' blessin's on them._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The lasses, clean frae tap to taes,
   Are busked in crunklin' underclaes;
   The gartened hose, the weel-filled stays,
           The nakit shift,
   A' bleached on bonny greens for days,
           An' white's the drift._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _An' noo to face the kirkward mile:
   The guidman's hat o' dacent style,
   The blackit shoon, we noo maun fyle
           As white's the miller:
   A waefue' peety tae, to spile
           The warth o' siller._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Our Marg'et, aye sae keen to crack,
   Douce-stappin' in the stoury track,
   Her emeralt goun a' kiltit back
           Frae snawy coats,
   White-ankled, leads the kirkward pack
           Wi' Dauvit Groats._
 
   _A thocht ahint, in runkled breeks,
   A' spiled wi' lyin' by for weeks,
   The guidman follows closs, an' cleiks
           The sonsie missis;
   His sarious face at aince bespeaks
           The day that this is._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _And aye an' while we nearer draw
   To whaur the kirkton lies alaw,
   Mair neebours, comin saft an' slaw
           Frae here an' there,
   The thicker thrang the gate, an' caw
           The stour in air._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _But hark! the bells frae nearer clang;
   To rowst the slaw, their sides they bang;
   An' see! black coats a'ready thrang
           The green kirkyaird;
   And at the yett, the chestnuts spang
           That brocht the laird._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The solemn elders at the plate
   Stand drinkin' deep the pride o' state:
   The practised hands as gash an' great
           As Lords o' Session;
   The later named, a wee thing blate
           In their expression._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The prentit stanes that mark the deid,
   Wi' lengthened lip, the sarious read;
   Syne wag a moraleesin' heid,
           An' then an' there
   Their hirplin' practice an' their creed
         Try hard to square._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _It's here our Merren lang has lain,
   A wee bewast the table-stane;
   An' yon's the grave o' Sandy Blane;
           An' further ower,
   The mither's brithers, dacent men!
           Lie a' the fower._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Here the guidman sall bide awee
   To dwall amang the deid; to see
   Auld faces clear in fancy's e'e;
           Belike to hear
   Auld voices fa'in saft an' slee
           On fancy's ear._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Thus, on the day o' solemn things,
   The bell that in the steeple swings
   To fauld a scaittered faim'ly rings
           Its walcome screed;
   An' just a wee thing nearer brings
           The quick an' deid._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _But noo the bell is ringin' in;
   To tak their places, folk begin;_
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The minister himsel' will shuene
           Be up the gate,
   Filled fu' wi' clavers about sin
           An' man's estate._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The tuenes are up_--French, _to be shuere,
   The faithfue'_ French, _an' twa-three mair;
   The auld prezentor, hoastin' sair,
           Wales out the portions,
   An' yirks the tuene into the air
           Wi' queer contortions._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Follows the prayer, the readin' next,
   An' than the fisslin' for the text--
   The twa-three last to find it, vext
           But kind o' proud;_
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _An' than the peppermints are raxed,
           An' southernwood._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _For noo's the time whan pows are seen
   Nid-noddin' like a mandareen;
   When tenty mithers stap a preen
           In sleepin' weans;
   An' nearly half the parochine
           Forget their pains._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _There's just a waukrif' twa or three:
   Thrawn commentautors sweer to 'gree,_
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Weans glowrin' at the bumlin' bee
           On windie-glasses,
   Or lads that tak a keek a-glee
           At sonsie lasses._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Himsel', meanwhile, frae whaur he cocks
   An' bobs belaw the soundin'-box,
   The treesures of his words unlocks
           Wi' prodigality,
   An' deals some unco dingin' knocks
           To infidality._
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _Wi' sappy unction, hoo he burkes
   The hopes o' men that trust in works,
   Expounds the fau'ts o' ither kirks,
           An' shaws the best o' them
   No muckle better than mere Turks,
           When a's confessed o' them._
 
   _Bethankit! what a bonny creed!
   What mair would ony Christian need?_--
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _The braw words rumm'le ower his heid,
           Nor steer the sleeper;_
 
 [Illustration]
 
   _And in their restin' graves, the deid
           Sleep aye the deeper._
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 
 
     Works by Robert Louis Stevenson
 
   AN INLAND VOYAGE.
   EDINBURGH: PICTURESQUE NOTES.
   TRAVELS WITH A DONKEY.
   VIRGINIBUS PUERISQUE.
   FAMILIAR STUDIES OF MEN AND BOOKS.
   NEW ARABIAN NIGHTS.
   TREASURE ISLAND.
   THE SILVERADO SQUATTERS.
   A CHILD'S GARDEN OF VERSES.
   PRINCE OTTO.
   THE STRANGE CASE OF DR. JEKYLL AND MR. HYDE.
   KIDNAPPED.
   THE MERRY MEN.
   UNDERWOODS.
   MEMORIES AND PORTRAITS.
   THE BLACK ARROW.
   THE MASTER OF BALLANTRAE.
   FATHER DAMIEN: AN OPEN LETTER.
   BALLADS.
   ACROSS THE PLAINS.
   ISLAND NIGHTS ENTERTAINMENTS.
   A FOOTNOTE TO HISTORY.
   CATRIONA.
   WEIR OF HERMISTON.
   VAILIMA LETTERS.
   FABLES.
   SONGS OF TRAVEL.
   ST. IVES.
   IN THE SOUTH SEAS.
   ESSAYS OF TRAVEL.
   TALES AND FANTASIES.
   THE ART OF WRITING.
   PRAYERS WRITTEN AT VAILIMA.
   A CHRISTMAS SERMON.
 
 
     with Mrs. Stevenson
 
   THE DYNAMITER.
 
 
     with Lloyd Osbourne
 
   THE WRONG BOX.      THE WRECKER.      THE EBB-TIDE.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the 1905 edition by David Price, email ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                           PRINCE OTTOA ROMANCE
 
 
                                 A ROMANCE
 
                                     BY
 
                           ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
                       [Picture: Decorative graphic]
 
                               A NEW EDITION
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                              CHATTO & WINDUS
                                    1905
 
 
 
 
 TO NELLY VAN DE GRIFT
 (MRS. ADULFO SANCHEZ, OF MONTEREY)
 
 
 At last, after so many years, I have the pleasure of re-introducing you
 to Prince Otto, whom you will remember a very little fellow, no bigger
 in fact than a few sheets of memoranda written for me by your kind hand.
 The sight of his name will carry you back to an old wooden house
 embowered in creepers; a house that was far gone in the respectable
 stages of antiquity and seemed indissoluble from the green garden in
 which it stood, and that yet was a sea-traveller in its younger days, and
 had come round the Horn piecemeal in the belly of a ship, and might have
 heard the seamen stamping and shouting and the note of the boatswains
 whistle.  It will recall to you the nondescript inhabitants now so widely
 scattered:the two horses, the dog, and the four cats, some of them still
 looking in your face as you read these lines;the poor lady, so
 unfortunately married to an author;the China boy, by this time, perhaps,
 baiting his line by the banks of a river in the Flowery Land;and in
 particular the Scot who was then sick apparently unto death, and whom you
 did so much to cheer and keep in good behaviour.
 
 You may remember that he was full of ambitions and designs: so soon as he
 had his health again completely, you may remember the fortune he was to
 earn, the journeys he was to go upon, the delights he was to enjoy and
 confer, and (among other matters) the masterpiece he was to make of
 Prince Otto!
 
 Well, we will not give in that we are finally beaten.  We read together
 in those days the story of Braddock, and how, as he was carried dying
 from the scene of his defeat, he promised himself to do better another
 time: a story that will always touch a brave heart, and a dying speech
 worthy of a more fortunate commander.  I try to be of Braddocks mind.  I
 still mean to get my health again; I still purpose, by hook or crook,
 this book or the next, to launch a masterpiece; and I still
 intendsomehow, some time or otherto see your face and to hold your
 hand.
 
 Meanwhile, this little paper traveller goes forth instead, crosses the
 great seas and the long plains and the dark mountains, and comes at last
 to your door in Monterey, charged with tender greetings.  Pray you, take
 him in.  He comes from a house where (even as in your own) there are
 gathered together some of the waifs of our company at Oakland: a
 housefor all its outlandish Gaelic name and distant stationwhere you
 are well-beloved.
 
                                                                   R. L. S.
 
 _Skerryvore_,
       Bournemouth.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IPRINCE ERRANT
 
 
 CHAPTER IIN WHICH THE PRINCE DEPARTS ON AN ADVENTURE
 
 
 You shall seek in vain upon the map of Europe for the bygone state of
 Grnewald.  An independent principality, an infinitesimal member of the
 German Empire, she played, for several centuries, her part in the discord
 of Europe; and, at last, in the ripeness of time and at the spiriting of
 several bald diplomatists, vanished like a morning ghost.  Less fortunate
 than Poland, she left not a regret behind her; and the very memory of her
 boundaries has faded.
 
 It was a patch of hilly country covered with thick wood.  Many streams
 took their beginning in the glens of Grnewald, turning mills for the
 inhabitants.  There was one town, Mittwalden, and many brown, wooden
 hamlets, climbing roof above roof, along the steep bottom of dells, and
 communicating by covered bridges over the larger of the torrents.  The
 hum of watermills, the splash of running water, the clean odour of pine
 sawdust, the sound and smell of the pleasant wind among the innumerable
 army of the mountain pines, the dropping fire of huntsmen, the dull
 stroke of the wood-axe, intolerable roads, fresh trout for supper in the
 clean bare chamber of an inn, and the song of birds and the music of the
 village-bellsthese were the recollections of the Grnewald tourist.
 
 North and east the foothills of Grnewald sank with varying profile into
 a vast plain.  On these sides many small states bordered with the
 principality, Gerolstein, an extinct grand duchy, among the number.  On
 the south it marched with the comparatively powerful kingdom of Seaboard
 Bohemia, celebrated for its flowers and mountain bears, and inhabited by
 a people of singular simplicity and tenderness of heart.  Several
 intermarriages had, in the course of centuries, united the crowned
 families of Grnewald and Maritime Bohemia; and the last Prince of
 Grnewald, whose history I purpose to relate, drew his descent through
 Perdita, the only daughter of King Florizel the First of Bohemia.  That
 these intermarriages had in some degree mitigated the rough, manly stock
 of the first Grnewalds, was an opinion widely held within the borders of
 the principality.  The charcoal burner, the mountain sawyer, the wielder
 of the broad axe among the congregated pines of Grnewald, proud of their
 hard hands, proud of their shrewd ignorance and almost savage lore,
 looked with an unfeigned contempt on the soft character and manners of
 the sovereign race.
 
 The precise year of grace in which this tale begins shall be left to the
 conjecture of the reader.  But for the season of the year (which, in such
 a story, is the more important of the two) it was already so far forward
 in the spring, that when mountain people heard horns echoing all day
 about the north-west corner of the principality, they told themselves
 that Prince Otto and his hunt were up and out for the last time till the
 return of autumn.
 
 At this point the borders of Grnewald descend somewhat steeply, here and
 there breaking into crags; and this shaggy and trackless country stands
 in a bold contrast to the cultivated plain below.  It was traversed at
 that period by two roads alone; one, the imperial highway, bound to
 Brandenau in Gerolstein, descended the slope obliquely and by the easiest
 gradients.  The other ran like a fillet across the very forehead of the
 hills, dipping into savage gorges, and wetted by the spray of tiny
 waterfalls.  Once it passed beside a certain tower or castle, built sheer
 upon the margin of a formidable cliff, and commanding a vast prospect of
 the skirts of Grnewald and the busy plains of Gerolstein.  The
 Felsenburg (so this tower was called) served now as a prison, now as a
 hunting-seat; and for all it stood so lonesome to the naked eye, with the
 aid of a good glass the burghers of Brandenau could count its windows
 from the lime-tree terrace where they walked at night.
 
 In the wedge of forest hillside enclosed between the roads, the horns
 continued all day long to scatter tumult; and at length, as the sun began
 to draw near to the horizon of the plain, a rousing triumph announced the
 slaughter of the quarry.  The first and second huntsman had drawn
 somewhat aside, and from the summit of a knoll gazed down before them on
 the drooping shoulders of the hill and across the expanse of plain.  They
 covered their eyes, for the sun was in their faces.  The glory of its
 going down was somewhat pale.  Through the confused tracery of many
 thousands of naked poplars, the smoke of so many houses, and the evening
 steam ascending from the fields, the sails of a windmill on a gentle
 eminence moved very conspicuously, like a donkeys ears.  And hard by,
 like an open gash, the imperial high-road ran straight sun-ward, an
 artery of travel.
 
 There is one of natures spiritual ditties, that has not yet been set to
 words or human music: The Invitation to the Road; an air continually
 sounding in the ears of gipsies, and to whose inspiration our nomadic
 fathers journeyed all their days.  The hour, the season, and the scene,
 all were in delicate accordance.  The air was full of birds of passage,
 steering westward and northward over Grnewald, an army of specks to the
 up-looking eye.  And below, the great practicable road was bound for the
 same quarter.
 
 But to the two horsemen on the knoll this spiritual ditty was unheard.
 They were, indeed, in some concern of mind, scanning every fold of the
 subjacent forest, and betraying both anger and dismay in their impatient
 gestures.
 
 I do not see him, Kuno, said the first huntsman, nowherenot a trace,
 not a hair of the mares tail!  No, sir, hes off; broke cover and got
 away.  Why, for twopence I would hunt him with the dogs!
 
 Mayhap, hes gone home, said Kuno, but without conviction.
 
 Home! sneered the other.  I give him twelve days to get home.  No,
 its begun again; its as it was three years ago, before he married; a
 disgrace!  Hereditary prince, hereditary fool!  There goes the government
 over the borders on a grey mare.  Whats that?  No, nothingno, I tell
 you, on my word, I set more store by a good gelding or an English dog.
 That for your Otto!
 
 Hes not my Otto, growled Kuno.
 
 Then I dont know whose he is, was the retort.
 
 You would put your hand in the fire for him to-morrow, said Kuno,
 facing round.
 
 Me! cried the huntsman.  I would see him hanged!  Im a Grnewald
 patriotenrolled, and have my medal, too; and I would help a prince!  Im
 for liberty and Gondremark.
 
 Well, its all one, said Kuno.  If anybody said what you said, you
 would have his blood, and you know it.
 
 You have him on the brain, retorted his companion.  There he goes! he
 cried, the next moment.
 
 And sure enough, about a mile down the mountain, a rider on a white horse
 was seen to flit rapidly across a heathy open and vanish among the trees
 on the farther side.
 
 In ten minutes hell be over the border into Gerolstein, said Kuno.
 Its past cure.
 
 Well, if he founders that mare, Ill never forgive him, added the
 other, gathering his reins.
 
 And as they turned down from the knoll to rejoin their comrades, the sun
 dipped and disappeared, and the woods fell instantly into the gravity and
 greyness of the early night.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIN WHICH THE PRINCE PLAYS HAROUN-AL-RASCHID
 
 
 The night fell upon the Prince while he was threading green tracks in the
 lower valleys of the wood; and though the stars came out overhead and
 displayed the interminable order of the pine-tree pyramids, regular and
 dark like cypresses, their light was of small service to a traveller in
 such lonely paths, and from thenceforth he rode at random.  The austere
 face of nature, the uncertain issue of his course, the open sky and the
 free air, delighted him like wine; and the hoarse chafing of a river on
 his left sounded in his ears agreeably.
 
 It was past eight at night before his toil was rewarded and he issued at
 last out of the forest on the firm white high-road.  It lay downhill
 before him, with a sweeping eastward trend, faintly bright between the
 thickets; and Otto paused and gazed upon it.  So it ran, league after
 league, still joining others, to the farthest ends of Europe, there
 skirting the sea-surge, here gleaming in the lights of cities; and the
 innumerable army of tramps and travellers moved upon it in all lands as
 by a common impulse, and were now in all places drawing near to the inn
 door and the nights rest.  The pictures swarmed and vanished in his
 brain; a surge of temptation, a beat of all his blood, went over him, to
 set spur to the mare and to go on into the unknown for ever.  And then it
 passed away; hunger and fatigue, and that habit of middling actions which
 we call common sense, resumed their empire; and in that changed mood his
 eye lighted upon two bright windows on his left hand, between the road
 and river.
 
 He turned off by a by-road, and in a few minutes he was knocking with his
 whip on the door of a large farmhouse, and a chorus of dogs from the
 farmyard were making angry answer.  A very tall, old, white-headed man
 came, shading a candle, at the summons.  He had been of great strength in
 his time, and of a handsome countenance; but now he was fallen away, his
 teeth were quite gone, and his voice when he spoke was broken and
 falsetto.
 
 You will pardon me, said Otto.  I am a traveller and have entirely
 lost my way.
 
 Sir, said the old man, in a very stately, shaky manner, you are at the
 River Farm, and I am Killian Gottesheim, at your disposal.  We are here,
 sir, at about an equal distance from Mittwalden in Grnewald and
 Brandenau in Gerolstein: six leagues to either, and the road excellent;
 but there is not a wine bush, not a carters alehouse, anywhere between.
 You will have to accept my hospitality for the night; rough hospitality,
 to which I make you freely welcome; for, sir, he added with a bow, it
 is God who sends the guest.
 
 Amen.  And I most heartily thank you, replied Otto, bowing in his turn.
 
 Fritz, said the old man, turning towards the interior, lead round this
 gentlemans horse; and you, sir, condescend to enter.
 
 Otto entered a chamber occupying the greater part of the ground-floor of
 the building.  It had probably once been divided; for the farther end was
 raised by a long step above the nearer, and the blazing fire and the
 white supper-table seemed to stand upon a das.  All around were dark,
 brass-mounted cabinets and cupboards; dark shelves carrying ancient
 country crockery; guns and antlers and broadside ballads on the wall; a
 tall old clock with roses on the dial; and down in one corner the
 comfortable promise of a wine barrel.  It was homely, elegant, and
 quaint.
 
 A powerful youth hurried out to attend on the grey mare; and when Mr.
 Killian Gottesheim had presented him to his daughter Ottilia, Otto
 followed to the stable as became, not perhaps the Prince, but the good
 horseman.  When he returned, a smoking omelette and some slices of
 home-cured ham were waiting him; these were followed by a ragout and a
 cheese; and it was not until his guest had entirely satisfied his hunger,
 and the whole party drew about the fire over the wine jug, that Killian
 Gottesheims elaborate courtesy permitted him to address a question to
 the Prince.
 
 You have perhaps ridden far, sir? he inquired.
 
 I have, as you say, ridden far, replied Otto; and, as you have seen, I
 was prepared to do justice to your daughters cookery.
 
 Possibly, sir, from the direction of Brandenau? continued Killian.
 
 Precisely: and I should have slept to-night, had I not wandered, in
 Mittwalden, answered the Prince, weaving in a patch of truth, according
 to the habit of all liars.
 
 Business leads you to Mittwalden? was the next question.
 
 Mere curiosity, said Otto.  I have never yet visited the principality
 of Grnewald.
 
 A pleasant state, sir, piped the old man, nodding, a very pleasant
 state, and a fine race, both pines and people.  We reckon ourselves part
 Grnewalders here, lying so near the borders; and the river there is all
 good Grnewald water, every drop of it.  Yes, sir, a fine state.  A man
 of Grnewald now will swing me an axe over his head that many a man of
 Gerolstein could hardly lift; and the pines, why, deary me, there must be
 more pines in that little state, sir, than people in this whole big
 world.  Tis twenty years now since I crossed the marshes, for we grow
 home-keepers in old age; but I mind it as if it was yesterday.  Up and
 down, the road keeps right on from here to Mittwalden; and nothing all
 the way but the good green pine-trees, big and little, and water-power!
 water-power at every step, sir.  We once sold a bit of forest, up there
 beside the high-road; and the sight of minted money that we got for it
 has set me ciphering ever since what all the pines in Grnewald would
 amount to.
 
 I suppose you see nothing of the Prince? inquired Otto.
 
 No, said the young man, speaking for the first time, nor want to.
 
 Why so? is he so much disliked? asked Otto.
 
 Not what you might call disliked, replied the old gentleman, but
 despised, sir.
 
 Indeed, said the Prince, somewhat faintly.
 
 Yes, sir, despised, nodded Killian, filling a long pipe, and, to my
 way of thinking, justly despised.  Here is a man with great
 opportunities, and what does he do with them?  He hunts, and he dresses
 very prettilywhich is a thing to be ashamed of in a manand he acts
 plays; and if he does aught else, the news of it has not come here.
 
 Yet these are all innocent, said Otto.  What would you have him
 domake war?
 
 No, sir, replied the old man.  But here it is; I have been fifty years
 upon this River Farm, and wrought in it, day in, day out; I have ploughed
 and sowed and reaped, and risen early, and waked late; and this is the
 upshot: that all these years it has supported me and my family; and been
 the best friend that ever I had, set aside my wife; and now, when my time
 comes, I leave it a better farm than when I found it.  So it is, if a man
 works hearty in the order of nature, he gets bread and he receives
 comfort, and whatever he touches breeds.  And it humbly appears to me, if
 that Prince was to labour on his throne, as I have laboured and wrought
 in my farm, he would find both an increase and a blessing.
 
 I believe with you, sir, Otto said; and yet the parallel is inexact.
 For the farmers life is natural and simple; but the princes is both
 artificial and complicated.  It is easy to do right in the one, and
 exceedingly difficult not to do wrong in the other.  If your crop is
 blighted, you can take off your bonnet and say, Gods will be done; but
 if the prince meets with a reverse, he may have to blame himself for the
 attempt.  And perhaps, if all the kings in Europe were to confine
 themselves to innocent amusement, the subjects would be the better off.
 
 Ay, said the young man Fritz, you are in the right of it there.  That
 was a true word spoken.  And I see you are like me, a good patriot and an
 enemy to princes.
 
 Otto was somewhat abashed at this deduction, and he made haste to change
 his ground.  But, said he, you surprise me by what you say of this
 Prince Otto.  I have heard him, I must own, more favourably painted.  I
 was told he was, in his heart, a good fellow, and the enemy of no one but
 himself.
 
 And so he is, sir, said the girl, a very handsome, pleasant prince;
 and we know some who would shed their blood for him.
 
 O! Kuno! said Fritz.  An ignoramus!
 
 Ay, Kuno, to be sure, quavered the old farmer.  Well, since this
 gentleman is a stranger to these parts, and curious about the Prince, I
 do believe that story might divert him.  This Kuno, you must know, sir,
 is one of the hunt servants, and a most ignorant, intemperate man: a
 right Grnewalder, as we say in Gerolstein.  We know him well, in this
 house; for he has come as far as here after his stray dogs; and I make
 all welcome, sir, without account of state or nation.  And, indeed,
 between Gerolstein and Grnewald the peace has held so long that the
 roads stand open like my door; and a man will make no more of the
 frontier than the very birds themselves.
 
 Ay, said Otto, it has been a long peacea peace of centuries.
 
 Centuries, as you say, returned Killian; the more the pity that it
 should not be for ever.  Well, sir, this Kuno was one day in fault, and
 Otto, who has a quick temper, up with his whip and thrashed him, they do
 say, soundly.  Kuno took it as best he could, but at last he broke out,
 and dared the Prince to throw his whip away and wrestle like a man; for
 we are all great at wrestling in these parts, and its so that we
 generally settle our disputes.  Well, sir, the Prince did so; and, being
 a weakly creature, found the tables turned; for the man whom he had just
 been thrashing like a negro slave, lifted him with a back grip and threw
 him heels overhead.
 
 He broke his bridle-arm, cried Fritzand some say his nose.  Serve him
 right, say I!  Man to man, which is the better at that?
 
 And then? asked Otto.
 
 O, then Kuno carried him home; and they were the best of friends from
 that day forth.  I dont say its a discreditable story, you observe,
 continued Mr. Gottesheim; but its droll, and thats the fact.  A man
 should think before he strikes; for, as my nephew says, man to man was
 the old valuation.
 
 Now, if you were to ask me, said Otto, I should perhaps surprise you.
 I think it was the Prince that conquered.
 
 And, sir, you would be right, replied Killian seriously.  In the eyes
 of God, I do not question but you would be right; but men, sir, look at
 these things differently, and they laugh.
 
 They made a song of it, observed Fritz.  How does it go?  Ta-tum-ta-ra
 . . .
 
 Well, interrupted Otto, who had no great anxiety to hear the song, the
 Prince is young; he may yet mend.
 
 Not so young, by your leave, cried Fritz.  A man of forty.
 
 Thirty-six, corrected Mr. Gottesheim.
 
 O, cried Ottilia, in obvious disillusion, a man of middle age!  And
 they said he was so handsome when he was young!
 
 And bald, too, added Fritz.
 
 Otto passed his hand among his locks.  At that moment he was far from
 happy, and even the tedious evenings at Mittwalden Palace began to smile
 upon him by comparison.
 
 O, six-and-thirty! he protested.  A man is not yet old at
 six-and-thirty.  I am that age myself.
 
 I should have taken you for more, sir, piped the old farmer.  But if
 that be so, you are of an age with Master Ottekin, as people call him;
 and, I would wager a crown, have done more service in your time.  Though
 it seems young by comparison with men of a great age like me, yet its
 some way through life for all that; and the mere fools and fiddlers are
 beginning to grow weary and to look old.  Yes, sir, by six-and-thirty, if
 a man be a follower of Gods laws, he should have made himself a home and
 a good name to live by; he should have got a wife and a blessing on his
 marriage; and his works, as the Word says, should begin to follow him.
 
 Ah, well, the Prince is married, cried Fritz, with a coarse burst of
 laughter.
 
 That seems to entertain you, sir, said Otto.
 
 Ay, said the young boor.  Did you not know that?  I thought all Europe
 knew it!  And he added a pantomime of a nature to explain his accusation
 to the dullest.
 
 Ah, sir, said Mr. Gottesheim, it is very plain that you are not from
 hereabouts!  But the truth is, that the whole princely family and Court
 are rips and rascals, not one to mend another.  They live, sir, in
 idleness andwhat most commonly follows itcorruption.  The Princess has
 a lovera Baron, as he calls himself, from East Prussia; and the Prince
 is so little of a man, sir, that he holds the candle.  Nor is that the
 worst of it, for this foreigner and his paramour are suffered to transact
 the State affairs, while the Prince takes the salary and leaves all
 things to go to wrack.  There will follow upon this some manifest
 judgment which, though I am old, I may survive to see.
 
 Good man, you are in the wrong about Gondremark, said Fritz, showing a
 greatly increased animation; but for all the rest, you speak the Gods
 truth like a good patriot.  As for the Prince, if he would take and
 strangle his wife, I would forgive him yet.
 
 Nay, Fritz, said the old man, that would be to add iniquity to evil.
 For you perceive, sir, he continued, once more addressing himself to the
 unfortunate Prince, this Otto has himself to thank for these disorders.
 He has his young wife and his principality, and he has sworn to cherish
 both.
 
 Sworn at the altar! echoed Fritz.  But put your faith in princes!
 
 Well, sir, he leaves them both to an adventurer from East Prussia,
 pursued the farmer: leaves the girl to be seduced and to go on from bad
 to worse, till her names become a tap-room by-word, and she not yet
 twenty; leaves the country to be overtaxed, and bullied with armaments,
 and jockied into war
 
 War! cried Otto.
 
 So they say, sir; those that watch their ongoings, say to war,
 asseverated Killian.  Well, sir, that is very sad; it is a sad thing for
 this poor, wicked girl to go down to hell with peoples curses; its a
 sad thing for a tight little happy country to be misconducted; but
 whoever may complain, I humbly conceive, sir, that this Otto cannot.
 What he has worked for, that he has got; and may God have pity on his
 soul, for a great and a silly sinners!
 
 He has broke his oath; then he is a perjurer.  He takes the money and
 leaves the work; why, then plainly hes a thief.  A cuckold he was
 before, and a fool by birth.  Better me that! cried Fritz, and snapped
 his fingers.
 
 And now, sir, you will see a little, continued the farmer, why we
 think so poorly of this Prince Otto.  Theres such a thing as a man being
 pious and honest in the private way; and there is such a thing, sir, as a
 public virtue; but when a man has neither, the Lord lighten him!  Even
 this Gondremark, that Fritz here thinks so much of
 
 Ay, interrupted Fritz, Gondremarks the man for me.  I would we had
 his like in Gerolstein.
 
 He is a bad man, said the old farmer, shaking his head; and there was
 never good begun by the breach of Gods commandments.  But so far I will
 go with you; he is a man that works for what he has.
 
 I tell you hes the hope of Grnewald, cried Fritz.  He doesnt suit
 some of your high-and-dry, old, ancient ideas; but hes a downright
 modern mana man of the new lights and the progress of the age.  He does
 some things wrong; so they all do; but he has the peoples interests next
 his heart; and you mark meyou, sir, who are a Liberal, and the enemy of
 all their governments, you please to mark my wordsthe day will come in
 Grnewald, when they take out that yellow-headed skulk of a Prince and
 that dough-faced Messalina of a Princess, march em back foremost over
 the borders, and proclaim the Baron Gondremark first President.  Ive
 heard them say it in a speech.  I was at a meeting once at Brandenau, and
 the Mittwalden delegates spoke up for fifteen thousand.  Fifteen
 thousand, all brigaded, and each man with a medal round his neck to rally
 by.  Thats all Gondremark.
 
 Ay, sir, you see what it leads to; wild talk to-day, and wilder doings
 to-morrow, said the old man.  For there is one thing certain: that this
 Gondremark has one foot in the Court backstairs, and the other in the
 Masons lodges.  He gives himself out, sir, for what nowadays they call a
 patriot: a man from East Prussia!
 
 Give himself out! cried Fritz.  He is!  He is to lay by his title as
 soon as the Republic is declared; I heard it in a speech.
 
 Lay by Baron to take up President? returned Killian.  King Log, King
 Stork.  But youll live longer than I, and you will see the fruits of
 it.
 
 Father, whispered Ottilia, pulling at the speakers coat, surely the
 gentleman is ill.
 
 I beg your pardon, cried the farmer, rewaking to hospitable thoughts;
 can I offer you anything?
 
 I thank you.  I am very weary, answered Otto.  I have presumed upon my
 strength.  If you would show me to a bed, I should be grateful.
 
 Ottilia, a candle! said the old man.  Indeed, sir, you look paley.  A
 little cordial water?  No?  Then follow me, I beseech you, and I will
 bring you to the strangers bed.  You are not the first by many who has
 slept well below my roof, continued the old gentleman, mounting the
 stairs before his guest; for good food, honest wine, a grateful
 conscience, and a little pleasant chat before a man retires, are worth
 all the possets and apothecarys drugs.  See, sir, and here he opened a
 door and ushered Otto into a little white-washed sleeping-room, here you
 are in port.  It is small, but it is airy, and the sheets are clean and
 kept in lavender.  The window, too, looks out above the river, and
 theres no music like a little rivers.  It plays the same tune (and
 thats the favourite) over and over again, and yet does not weary of it
 like men fiddlers.  It takes the mind out of doors: and though we should
 be grateful for good houses, there is, after all, no house like Gods
 out-of-doors.  And lastly, sir, it quiets a man down like saying his
 prayers.  So here, sir, I take my kind leave of you until to-morrow; and
 it is my prayerful wish that you may slumber like a prince.
 
 And the old man, with the twentieth courteous inclination, left his guest
 alone.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIIN WHICH THE PRINCE COMFORTS AGE AND BEAUTY AND DELIVERS A
 LECTURE ON DISCRETION IN LOVE
 
 
 The Prince was early abroad: in the time of the first chorus of birds, of
 the pure and quiet air, of the slanting sunlight and the mile-long
 shadows.  To one who had passed a miserable night, the freshness of that
 hour was tonic and reviving; to steal a march upon his slumbering
 fellows, to be the Adam of the coming day, composed and fortified his
 spirits; and the Prince, breathing deep and pausing as he went, walked in
 the wet fields beside his shadow, and was glad.
 
 A trellised path led down into the valley of the brook, and he turned to
 follow it.  The stream was a break-neck, boiling Highland river.  Hard by
 the farm, it leaped a little precipice in a thick grey-mares tail of
 twisted filaments, and then lay and worked and bubbled in a lynn.  Into
 the middle of this quaking pool a rock protruded, shelving to a cape; and
 thither Otto scrambled and sat down to ponder.
 
 Soon the sun struck through the screen of branches and thin early leaves
 that made a hanging bower above the fall; and the golden lights and
 flitting shadows fell upon and marbled the surface of that so seething
 pot; and rays plunged deep among the turning waters; and a spark, as
 bright as a diamond, lit upon the swaying eddy.  It began to grow warm
 where Otto lingered, warm and heady; the lights swam, weaving their maze
 across the shaken pool; on the impending rock, reflections danced like
 butterflies; and the air was fanned by the waterfall as by a swinging
 curtain.
 
 Otto, who was weary with tossing and beset with horrid phantoms of
 remorse and jealousy, instantly fell dead in love with that
 sun-chequered, echoing corner.  Holding his feet, he stared out of a
 drowsy trance, wondering, admiring, musing, losing his way among
 uncertain thoughts.  There is nothing that so apes the external bearing
 of free will as that unconscious bustle, obscurely following liquid laws,
 with which a river contends among obstructions.  It seems the very play
 of man and destiny, and as Otto pored on these recurrent changes, he
 grew, by equal steps, the sleepier and the more profound.  Eddy and
 Prince were alike jostled in their purpose, alike anchored by intangible
 influences in one corner of the world.  Eddy and Prince were alike
 useless, starkly useless, in the cosmology of men.  Eddy and
 PrincePrince and Eddy.
 
 It is probable he had been some while asleep when a voice recalled him
 from oblivion.  Sir, it was saying; and looking round, he saw Mr.
 Killians daughter, terrified by her boldness and making bashful signals
 from the shore.  She was a plain, honest lass, healthy and happy and
 good, and with that sort of beauty that comes of happiness and health.
 But her confusion lent her for the moment an additional charm.
 
 Good-morning, said Otto, rising and moving towards her.  I arose early
 and was in a dream.
 
 O, sir! she cried, I wish to beg of you to spare my father; for I
 assure your Highness, if he had known who you was, he would have bitten
 his tongue out sooner.  And Fritz, toohow he went on!  But I had a
 notion; and this morning I went straight down into the stable, and there
 was your Highnesss crown upon the stirrup-irons!  But, O, sir, I made
 certain you would spare them; for they were as innocent as lambs.
 
 My dear, said Otto, both amused and gratified, you do not understand.
 It is I who am in the wrong; for I had no business to conceal my name and
 lead on these gentleman to speak of me.  And it is I who have to beg of
 you that you will keep my secret and not betray the discourtesy of which
 I was guilty.  As for any fear of me, your friends are safe in
 Gerolstein; and even in my own territory, you must be well aware I have
 no power.
 
 O, sir, she said, curtsying, I would not say that: the huntsmen would
 all die for you.
 
 Happy Prince! said Otto.  But although you are too courteous to avow
 the knowledge, you have had many opportunities of learning that I am a
 vain show.  Only last night we heard it very clearly stated.  You see the
 shadow flitting on this hard rock?  Prince Otto, I am afraid, is but the
 moving shadow, and the name of the rock is Gondremark.  Ah! if your
 friends had fallen foul of Gondremark!  But happily the younger of the
 two admires him.  And as for the old gentleman your father, he is a wise
 man and an excellent talker, and I would take a long wager he is honest.
 
 O, for honest, your Highness, that he is! exclaimed the girl.  And
 Fritz is as honest as he.  And as for all they said, it was just talk and
 nonsense.  When countryfolk get gossiping, they go on, I do assure you,
 for the fun; they dont as much as think of what they say.  If you went
 to the next farm, its my belief you would hear as much against my
 father.
 
 Nay, nay, said Otto, there you go too fast.  For all that was said
 against Prince Otto
 
 O, it was shameful! cried the girl.
 
 Not shamefultrue, returned Otto.  O, yestrue.  I am all they said of
 meall that and worse.
 
 I never! cried Ottilia.  Is that how you do?  Well, you would never
 be a soldier.  Now if any one accuses me, I get up and give it them.  O,
 I defend myself.  I wouldnt take a fault at another persons hands, no,
 not if I had it on my forehead.  And thats what you must do, if you mean
 to live it out.  But, indeed, I never heard such nonsense.  I should
 think you was ashamed of yourself!  Youre bald, then, I suppose?
 
 O no, said Otto, fairly laughing.  There I acquit myself: not bald!
 
 Well, and good? pursued the girl.  Come now, you know you are good,
 and Ill make you say so . . . Your Highness, I beg your humble pardon.
 But theres no disrespect intended.  And anyhow, you know you are.
 
 Why, now, what am I to say? replied Otto.  You are a cook, and
 excellently well you do it; I embrace the chance of thanking you for the
 ragout.  Well now, have you not seen good food so bedevilled by unskilful
 cookery that no one could be brought to eat the pudding?  That is me, my
 dear.  I am full of good ingredients, but the dish is worthless.  I amI
 give it you in one wordsugar in the salad.
 
 Well, I dont care, youre good, reiterated Ottilia, a little flushed
 by having failed to understand.
 
 I will tell you one thing, replied Otto: You are!
 
 Ah, well, thats what they all said of you, moralised the girl; such a
 tongue to come roundsuch a flattering tongue!
 
 O, you forget, I am a man of middle age, the Prince chuckled.
 
 Well, to speak to you, I should think you was a boy; and Prince or no
 Prince, if you came worrying where I was cooking, I would pin a napkin to
 your tails. . . . And, O Lord, I declare I hope your Highness will
 forgive me, the girl added.  I cant keep it in my mind.
 
 No more can I, cried Otto.  That is just what they complain of!
 
 They made a loverly-looking couple; only the heavy pouring of that
 horse-tail of water made them raise their voices above lovers pitch.
 But to a jealous onlooker from above, their mirth and close proximity
 might easily give umbrage; and a rough voice out of a tuft of brambles
 began calling on Ottilia by name.  She changed colour at that.  It is
 Fritz, she said.  I must go.
 
 Go, my dear, and I need not bid you go in peace, for I think you have
 discovered that I am not formidable at close quarters, said the Prince,
 and made her a fine gesture of dismissal.
 
 So Ottilia skipped up the bank, and disappeared into the thicket,
 stopping once for a single blushing bobblushing, because she had in the
 interval once more forgotten and remembered the strangers quality.
 
 Otto returned to his rock promontory; but his humour had in the meantime
 changed.  The sun now shone more fairly on the pool; and over its brown,
 welling surface, the blue of heaven and the golden green of the spring
 foliage danced in fleeting arabesque.  The eddies laughed and brightened
 with essential colour.  And the beauty of the dell began to rankle in the
 Princes mind; it was so near to his own borders, yet without.  He had
 never had much of the joy of possessorship in any of the thousand and one
 beautiful and curious things that were his; and now he was conscious of
 envy for what was anothers.  It was, indeed, a smiling, dilettante sort
 of envy; but yet there it was: the passion of Ahab for the vineyard, done
 in little; and he was relieved when Mr. Killian appeared upon the scene.
 
 I hope, sir, that you have slept well under my plain roof, said the old
 farmer.
 
 I am admiring this sweet spot that you are privileged to dwell in,
 replied Otto, evading the inquiry.
 
 It is rustic, returned Mr. Gottesheim, looking around him with
 complacency, a very rustic corner; and some of the land to the west is
 most excellent fat land, excellent deep soil.  You should see my wheat in
 the ten-acre field.  There is not a farm in Grnewald, no, nor many in
 Gerolstein, to match the River Farm.  Some sixtyI keep thinking when I
 sowsome sixty, and some seventy, and some an hundredfold; and my own
 place, six score!  But that, sir, is partly the farming.
 
 And the stream has fish? asked Otto.
 
 A fish-pond, said the farmer.  Ay, it is a pleasant bit.  It is
 pleasant even here, if one had time, with the brook drumming in that
 black pool, and the green things hanging all about the rocks, and, dear
 heart, to see the very pebbles! all turned to gold and precious stones!
 But you have come to that time of life, sir, when, if you will excuse me,
 you must look to have the rheumatism set in.  Thirty to forty is, as one
 may say, their seed-time.  And this is a damp cold corner for the early
 morning and an empty stomach.  If I might humbly advise you, sir, I would
 be moving.
 
 With all my heart, said Otto gravely.  And so you have lived your life
 here? he added, as they turned to go.
 
 Here I was born, replied the farmer, and here I wish I could say I was
 to die.  But fortune, sir, fortune turns the wheel.  They say she is
 blind, but we will hope she only sees a little farther on.  My
 grandfather and my father and I, we have all tilled these acres, my
 furrow following theirs.  All the three names are on the garden bench,
 two Killians and one Johann.  Yes, sir, good men have prepared themselves
 for the great change in my old garden.  Well do I mind my father, in a
 woollen night-cap, the good soul, going round and round to see the last
 of it.  Killian, said he, do you see the smoke of my tobacco?  Why,
 said he, that is mans life.  It was his last pipe, and I believe he
 knew it; and it was a strange thing, without doubt, to leave the trees
 that he had planted, and the son that he had begotten, ay, sir, and even
 the old pipe with the Turks head that he had smoked since he was a lad
 and went a-courting.  But here we have no continuing city; and as for the
 eternal, its a comfortable thought that we have other merits than our
 own.  And yet you would hardly think how sore it goes against the grain
 with me, to die in a strange bed.
 
 And must you do so?  For what reason? Otto asked.
 
 The reason?  The place is to be sold; three thousand crowns, replied
 Mr. Gottesheim.  Had it been a third of that, I may say without boasting
 that, what with my credit and my savings, I could have met the sum.  But
 at three thousand, unless I have singular good fortune and the new
 proprietor continues me in office, there is nothing left me but to
 budge.
 
 Ottos fancy for the place redoubled at the news, and became joined with
 other feelings.  If all he heard were true, Grnewald was growing very
 hot for a sovereign Prince; it might be well to have a refuge; and if so,
 what more delightful hermitage could man imagine?  Mr. Gottesheim,
 besides, had touched his sympathies.  Every man loves in his soul to play
 the part of the stage deity.  And to step down to the aid of the old
 farmer, who had so roughly handled him in talk, was the ideal of a Fair
 Revenge.  Ottos thoughts brightened at the prospect, and he began to
 regard himself with a renewed respect.
 
 I can find you, I believe, a purchaser, he said, and one who would
 continue to avail himself of your skill.
 
 Can you, sir, indeed? said the old man.  Well, I shall be heartily
 obliged; for I begin to find a man may practise resignation all his days,
 as he takes physic, and not come to like it in the end.
 
 If you will have the papers drawn, you may even burthen the purchase
 with your interest, said Otto.  Let it be assured to you through life.
 
 Your friend, sir, insinuated Killian, would not, perhaps, care to make
 the interest reversible?  Fritz is a good lad.
 
 Fritz is young, said the Prince dryly; he must earn consideration, not
 inherit.
 
 He has long worked upon the place, sir, insisted Mr. Gottesheim; and
 at my great age, for I am seventy-eight come harvest, it would be a
 troublesome thought to the proprietor how to fill my shoes.  It would be
 a care spared to assure yourself of Fritz.  And I believe he might be
 tempted by a permanency.
 
 The young man has unsettled views, returned Otto.
 
 Possibly the purchaser began Killian.
 
 A little spot of anger burned in Ottos cheek.  I am the purchaser, he
 said.
 
 It was what I might have guessed, replied the farmer, bowing with an
 aged, obsequious dignity.  You have made an old man very happy; and I
 may say, indeed, that I have entertained an angel unawares.  Sir, the
 great people of this worldand by that I mean those who are great in
 stationif they had only hearts like yours, how they would make the fires
 burn and the poor sing!
 
 I would not judge them hardly, sir, said Otto.  We all have our
 frailties.
 
 Truly, sir, said Mr. Gottesheim, with unction.  And by what name, sir,
 am I to address my generous landlord?
 
 The double recollection of an English traveller, whom he had received the
 week before at court, and of an old English rogue called Transome, whom
 he had known in youth, came pertinently to the Princes help.
 Transome, he answered, is my name.  I am an English traveller.  It is,
 to-day, Tuesday.  On Thursday, before noon, the money shall be ready.
 Let us meet, if you please, in Mittwalden, at the Morning Star.
 
 I am, in all things lawful, your servant to command, replied the
 farmer.  An Englishman!  You are a great race of travellers.  And has
 your lordship some experience of land?
 
 I have had some interest of the kind before, returned the Prince; not
 in Gerolstein, indeed.  But fortune, as you say, turns the wheel, and I
 desire to be beforehand with her revolutions.
 
 Very right, sir, I am sure, said Mr. Killian.
 
 They had been strolling with deliberation; but they were now drawing near
 to the farmhouse, mounting by the trellised pathway to the level of the
 meadow.  A little before them, the sound of voices had been some while
 audible, and now grew louder and more distinct with every step of their
 advance.  Presently, when they emerged upon the top of the bank, they
 beheld Fritz and Ottilia some way off; he, very black and bloodshot,
 emphasising his hoarse speech with the smacking of his fist against his
 palm; she, standing a little way off in blowsy, voluble distress.
 
 Dear me! said Mr. Gottesheim, and made as if he would turn aside.
 
 But Otto went straight towards the lovers, in whose dissension he
 believed himself to have a share.  And, indeed, as soon as he had seen
 the Prince, Fritz had stood tragic, as if awaiting and defying his
 approach.
 
 O, here you are! he cried, as soon as they were near enough for easy
 speech.  You are a man at least, and must reply.  What were you after?
 Why were you two skulking in the bush?  God! he broke out, turning again
 upon Ottilia, to think that I should waste my heart on you!
 
 I beg your pardon, Otto cut in.  You were addressing me.  In virtue of
 what circumstance am I to render you an account of this young ladys
 conduct?  Are you her father? her brother? her husband?
 
 O, sir, you know as well as I, returned the peasant.  We keep company,
 she and I.  I love her, and she is by way of loving me; but all shall be
 above-board, I would have her to know.  I have a good pride of my own.
 
 Why, I perceive I must explain to you what love is, said Otto.  Its
 measure is kindness.  It is very possible that you are proud; but she,
 too, may have some self-esteem; I do not speak for myself.  And perhaps,
 if your own doings were so curiously examined, you might find it
 inconvenient to reply.
 
 These are all set-offs, said the young man.  You know very well that a
 man is a man, and a woman only a woman.  That holds good all over, up and
 down.  I ask you a question, I ask it again, and here I stand.  He drew
 a mark and toed it.
 
 When you have studied liberal doctrines somewhat deeper, said the
 Prince, you will perhaps change your note.  You are a man of false
 weights and measures, my young friend.  You have one scale for women,
 another for men; one for princes, and one for farmer-folk.  On the prince
 who neglects his wife you can be most severe.  But what of the lover who
 insults his mistress?  You use the name of love.  I should think this
 lady might very fairly ask to be delivered from love of such a nature.
 For if I, a stranger, had been one-tenth part so gross and so
 discourteous, you would most righteously have broke my head.  It would
 have been in your part, as lover, to protect her from such insolence.
 Protect her first, then, from yourself.
 
 Ay, quoth Mr. Gottesheim, who had been looking on with his hands behind
 his tall old back, ay, thats Scripture truth.
 
 Fritz was staggered, not only by the Princes imperturbable superiority
 of manner, but by a glimmering consciousness that he himself was in the
 wrong.  The appeal to liberal doctrines had, besides, unmanned him.
 
 Well, said he, if I was rude, Ill own to it.  I meant no ill, and did
 nothing out of my just rights; but I am above all these old vulgar
 notions too; and if I spoke sharp, Ill ask her pardon.
 
 Freely granted, Fritz, said Ottilia.
 
 But all this doesnt answer me, cried Fritz.  I ask what you two spoke
 about.  She says she promised not to tell; well, then, I mean to know.
 Civility is civility, but Ill be no mans gull.  I have a right to
 common justice, if I _do_ keep company!
 
 If you will ask Mr. Gottesheim, replied Otto, you will find I have not
 spent my hours in idleness.  I have, since I arose this morning, agreed
 to buy the farm.  So far I will go to satisfy a curiosity which I
 condemn.
 
 O, well, if there was business, thats another matter, returned Fritz.
 Though it beats me why you could not tell.  But, of course, if the
 gentleman is to buy the farm, I suppose there would naturally be an end.
 
 To be sure, said Mr. Gottesheim, with a strong accent of conviction.
 
 But Ottilia was much braver.  There now! she cried in triumph.  What
 did I tell you?  I told you I was fighting your battles.  Now you see!
 Think shame of your suspicious temper!  You should go down upon your
 bended knees both to that gentleman and me.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVIN WHICH THE PRINCE COLLECTS OPINIONS BY THE WAY
 
 
 A little before noon Otto, by a triumph of manoeuvring, effected his
 escape.  He was quit in this way of the ponderous gratitude of Mr.
 Killian, and of the confidential gratitude of poor Ottilia; but of Fritz
 he was not quit so readily.  That young politician, brimming with
 mysterious glances, offered to lend his convoy as far as to the
 high-road; and Otto, in fear of some residuary jealousy and for the
 girls sake, had not the courage to gainsay him; but he regarded his
 companion with uneasy glances, and devoutly wished the business at an
 end.  For some time Fritz walked by the mare in silence; and they had
 already traversed more than half the proposed distance when, with
 something of a blush, he looked up and opened fire.
 
 Are you not, he asked, what they call a socialist?
 
 Why, no, returned Otto, not precisely what they call so.  Why do you
 ask?
 
 I will tell you why, said the young man.  I saw from the first that
 you were a red progressional, and nothing but the fear of old Killian
 kept you back.  And there, sir, you were right: old men are always
 cowards.  But nowadays, you see, there are so many groups: you can never
 tell how far the likeliest kind of man may be prepared to go; and I was
 never sure you were one of the strong thinkers, till you hinted about
 women and free love.
 
 Indeed, cried Otto, I never said a word of such a thing.
 
 Not you! cried Fritz.  Never a word to compromise!  You was sowing
 seed: ground-bait, our president calls it.  But its hard to deceive me,
 for I know all the agitators and their ways, and all the doctrines; and
 between you and me, lowering his voice, I am myself affiliated.  O yes,
 I am a secret society man, and here is my medal.  And drawing out a
 green ribbon that he wore about his neck, he held up, for Ottos
 inspection, a pewter medal bearing the imprint of a Phoenix and the
 legend _Libertas_.  And so now you see you may trust me, added Fritz,
 I am none of your alehouse talkers; I am a convinced revolutionary.
 And he looked meltingly upon Otto.
 
 I see, replied the Prince; that is very gratifying.  Well, sir, the
 great thing for the good of ones country is, first of all, to be a good
 man.  All springs from there.  For my part, although you are right in
 thinking that I have to do with politics, I am unfit by intellect and
 temper for a leading rle.  I was intended, I fear, for a subaltern.  Yet
 we have all something to command, Mr. Fritz, if it be only our own
 temper; and a man about to marry must look closely to himself.  The
 husbands, like the princes, is a very artificial standing; and it is
 hard to be kind in either.  Do you follow that?
 
 O yes, I follow that, replied the young man, sadly chop-fallen over the
 nature of the information he had elicited; and then brightening up: Is
 it, he ventured, is it for an arsenal that you have bought the farm?
 
 Well see about that, the Prince answered, laughing.  You must not be
 too zealous.  And in the meantime, if I were you, I would say nothing on
 the subject.
 
 O, trust me, sir, for that, cried Fritz, as he pocketed a crown.  And
 youve let nothing out; for I suspectedI might say I knew itfrom the
 first.  And mind you, when a guide is required, he added, I know all
 the forest paths.
 
 Otto rode away, chuckling.  This talk with Fritz had vastly entertained
 him; nor was he altogether discontented with his bearing at the farm;
 men, he was able to tell himself, had behaved worse under smaller
 provocation.  And, to harmonise all, the road and the April air were both
 delightful to his soul.
 
 Up and down, and to and fro, ever mounting through the wooded foothills,
 the broad white high-road wound onward into Grnewald.  On either hand
 the pines stood coolly rootedgreen moss prospering, springs welling
 forth between their knuckled spurs; and though some were broad and
 stalwart, and others spiry and slender, yet all stood firm in the same
 attitude and with the same expression, like a silent army presenting
 arms.
 
 The road lay all the way apart from towns and villages, which it left on
 either hand.  Here and there, indeed, in the bottom of green glens, the
 Prince could spy a few congregated roofs, or perhaps above him, on a
 shoulder, the solitary cabin of a woodman.  But the highway was an
 international undertaking and with its face set for distant cities,
 scorned the little life of Grnewald.  Hence it was exceeding solitary.
 Near the frontier Otto met a detachment of his own troops marching in the
 hot dust; and he was recognised and somewhat feebly cheered as he rode
 by.  But from that time forth and for a long while he was alone with the
 great woods.
 
 Gradually the spell of pleasure relaxed; his own thoughts returned, like
 stinging insects, in a cloud; and the talk of the night before, like a
 shower of buffets, fell upon his memory.  He looked east and west for any
 comforter; and presently he was aware of a cross-road coming steeply down
 hill, and a horseman cautiously descending.  A human voice or presence,
 like a spring in the desert, was now welcome in itself, and Otto drew
 bridle to await the coming of this stranger.  He proved to be a very
 red-faced, thick-lipped countryman, with a pair of fat saddle-bags and a
 stone bottle at his waist; who, as soon as the Prince hailed him,
 jovially, if somewhat thickly, answered.  At the same time he gave a
 beery yaw in the saddle.  It was clear his bottle was no longer full.
 
 Do you ride towards Mittwalden? asked the Prince.
 
 As far as the cross-road to Tannenbrunn, the man replied.  Will you
 bear company?
 
 With pleasure.  I have even waited for you on the chance, answered
 Otto.
 
 By this time they were close alongside; and the man, with the countryfolk
 instinct, turned his cloudy vision first of all on his companions mount.
 The devil! he cried.  You ride a bonny mare, friend!  And then, his
 curiosity being satisfied about the essential, he turned his attention to
 that merely secondary matter, his companions face.  He started.  The
 Prince! he cried, saluting, with another yaw that came near dismounting
 him.  I beg your pardon, your Highness, not to have recognised you at
 once.
 
 The Prince was vexed out of his self-possession.  Since you know me, he
 said, it is unnecessary we should ride together.  I will precede you, if
 you please.  And he was about to set spur to the grey mare, when the
 half-drunken fellow, reaching over, laid his hand upon the rein.
 
 Hark you, he said, prince or no prince, that is not how one man should
 conduct himself with another.  What!  Youll ride with me incog. and set
 me talking!  But if I know you, youll preshede me, if you please!  Spy!
 And the fellow, crimson with drink and injured vanity, almost spat the
 word into the Princes face.
 
 A horrid confusion came over Otto.  He perceived that he had acted
 rudely, grossly presuming on his station.  And perhaps a little shiver of
 physical alarm mingled with his remorse, for the fellow was very powerful
 and not more than half in the possession of his senses.  Take your hand
 from my rein, he said, with a sufficient assumption of command; and when
 the man, rather to his wonder, had obeyed: You should understand, sir,
 he added, that while I might be glad to ride with you as one person of
 sagacity with another, and so receive your true opinions, it would amuse
 me very little to hear the empty compliments you would address to me as
 Prince.
 
 You think I would lie, do you? cried the man with the bottle, purpling
 deeper.
 
 I know you would, returned Otto, entering entirely into his
 self-possession.  You would not even show me the medal you wear about
 your neck.  For he had caught a glimpse of a green ribbon at the
 fellows throat.
 
 The change was instantaneous: the red face became mottled with yellow: a
 thick-fingered, tottering hand made a clutch at the tell-tale ribbon.
 Medal! the man cried, wonderfully sobered.  I have no medal.
 
 Pardon me, said the Prince.  I will even tell you what that medal
 bears: a Phoenix burning, with the word _Libertas_.  The medallist
 remaining speechless, You are a pretty fellow, continued Otto, smiling,
 to complain of incivility from the man whom you conspire to murder.
 
 Murder! protested the man.  Nay, never that; nothing criminal for me!
 
 You are strangely misinformed, said Otto.  Conspiracy itself is
 criminal, and ensures the pain of death.  Nay, sir, death it is; I will
 guarantee my accuracy.  Not that you need be so deplorably affected, for
 I am no officer.  But those who mingle with politics should look at both
 sides of the medal.
 
 Your Highness . . .  began the knight of the bottle.
 
 Nonsense! you are a Republican, cried Otto; what have you to do with
 highnesses?  But let us continue to ride forward.  Since you so much
 desire it, I cannot find it in my heart to deprive you of my company.
 And for that matter, I have a question to address to you.  Why, being so
 great a body of menfor you are a great bodyfifteen thousand, I have
 heard, but that will be understated; am I right?
 
 The man gurgled in his throat.
 
 Why, then, being so considerable a party, resumed Otto, do you not
 come before me boldly with your wants?what do I say? with your commands?
 Have I the name of being passionately devoted to my throne?  I can scarce
 suppose it.  Come, then; show me your majority, and I will instantly
 resign.  Tell this to your friends; assure them from me of my docility;
 assure them that, however they conceive of my deficiencies, they cannot
 suppose me more unfit to be a ruler than I do myself.  I am one of the
 worst princes in Europe; will they improve on that?
 
 Far be it from me . . . the man began.
 
 See, now, if you will not defend my government! cried Otto.  If I were
 you, I would leave conspiracies.  You are as little fit to be a
 conspirator as I to be a king.
 
 One thing I will say out, said the man.  It is not so much you that we
 complain of, its your lady.
 
 Not a word, sir said the Prince; and then after a moments pause, and
 in tones of some anger and contempt: I once more advise you to have done
 with politics, he added; and when next I see you, let me see you sober.
 A morning drunkard is the last man to sit in judgment even upon the worst
 of princes.
 
 I have had a drop, but I had not been drinking, the man replied,
 triumphing in a sound distinction.  And if I had, what then?  Nobody
 hangs by me.  But my mill is standing idle, and I blame it on your wife.
 Am I alone in that?  Go round and ask.  Where are the mills?  Where are
 the young men that should be working?  Where is the currency?  All
 paralysed.  No, sir, it is not equal; for I suffer for your faultsI pay
 for them, by George, out of a poor mans pocket.  And what have you to do
 with mine?  Drunk or sober, I can see my country going to hell, and I can
 see whose fault it is.  And so now, Ive said my say, and you may drag me
 to a stinking dungeon; what care I?  Ive spoke the truth, and so Ill
 hold hard, and not intrude upon your Highnesss society.
 
 And the miller reined up and, clumsily enough, saluted.
 
 You will observe, I have not asked your name, said Otto.  I wish you a
 good ride, and he rode on hard.  But let him ride as he pleased, this
 interview with the miller was a chokepear, which he could not swallow.
 He had begun by receiving a reproof in manners, and ended by sustaining a
 defeat in logic, both from a man whom he despised.  All his old thoughts
 returned with fresher venom.  And by three in the afternoon, coming to
 the cross-roads for Beckstein, Otto decided to turn aside and dine there
 leisurely.  Nothing at least could be worse than to go on as he was
 going.
 
 In the inn at Beckstein he remarked, immediately upon his entrance, an
 intelligent young gentleman dining, with a book in front of him.  He had
 his own place laid close to the reader, and with a proper apology, broke
 ground by asking what he read.
 
 I am perusing, answered the young gentleman, the last work of the Herr
 Doctor Hohenstockwitz, cousin and librarian of your Prince here in
 Grnewalda man of great erudition and some lambencies of wit.
 
 I am acquainted, said Otto, with the Herr Doctor, though not yet with
 his work.
 
 Two privileges that I must envy you, replied the young man politely:
 an honour in hand, a pleasure in the bush.
 
 The Herr Doctor is a man much respected, I believe, for his
 attainments? asked the Prince.
 
 He is, sir, a remarkable instance of the force of intellect, replied
 the reader.  Who of our young men know anything of his cousin, all
 reigning Prince although he be?  Who but has heard of Doctor Gotthold?
 But intellectual merit, alone of all distinctions, has its base in
 nature.
 
 I have the gratification of addressing a studentperhaps an author?
 Otto suggested.
 
 The young man somewhat flushed.  I have some claim to both distinctions,
 sir, as you suppose, said he; there is my card.  I am the licentiate
 Roederer, author of several works on the theory and practice of
 politics.
 
 You immensely interest me, said the Prince; the more so as I gather
 that here in Grnewald we are on the brink of revolution.  Pray, since
 these have been your special studies, would you augur hopefully of such a
 movement?
 
 I perceive, said the young author, with a certain vinegary twitch,
 that you are unacquainted with my opuscula.  I am a convinced
 authoritarian.  I share none of those illusory, Utopian fancies with
 which empirics blind themselves and exasperate the ignorant.  The day of
 these ideas is, believe me, past, or at least passing.
 
 When I look about me began Otto.
 
 When you look about you, interrupted the licentiate, you behold the
 ignorant.  But in the laboratory of opinion, beside the studious lamp, we
 begin already to discard these figments.  We begin to return to natures
 order, to what I might call, if I were to borrow from the language of
 therapeutics, the expectant treatment of abuses.  You will not
 misunderstand me, he continued: a country in the condition in which we
 find Grnewald, a prince such as your Prince Otto, we must explicitly
 condemn; they are behind the age.  But I would look for a remedy not to
 brute convulsions, but to the natural supervenience of a more able
 sovereign.  I should amuse you, perhaps, added the licentiate, with a
 smile, I think I should amuse you if I were to explain my notion of a
 prince.  We who have studied in the closet, no longer, in this age,
 propose ourselves for active service.  The paths, we have perceived, are
 incompatible.  I would not have a student on the throne, though I would
 have one near by for an adviser.  I would set forward as prince a man of
 a good, medium understanding, lively rather than deep; a man of courtly
 manner, possessed of the double art to ingratiate and to command;
 receptive, accommodating, seductive.  I have been observing you since
 your first entrance.  Well, sir, were I a subject of Grnewald I should
 pray heaven to set upon the seat of government just such another as
 yourself.
 
 The devil you would! exclaimed the Prince.
 
 The licentiate Roederer laughed most heartily.  I thought I should
 astonish you, he said.  These are not the ideas of the masses.
 
 They are not, I can assure you, Otto said.
 
 Or rather, distinguished the licentiate, not to-day.  The time will
 come, however, when these ideas shall prevail.
 
 You will permit me, sir, to doubt it, said Otto.
 
 Modesty is always admirable, chuckled the theorist.  But yet I assure
 you, a man like you, with such a man as, say, Doctor Gotthold at your
 elbow, would be, for all practical issues, my ideal ruler.
 
 At this rate the hours sped pleasantly for Otto.  But the licentiate
 unfortunately slept that night at Beckstein, where he was, being dainty
 in the saddle and given to half stages.  And to find a convoy to
 Mittwalden, and thus mitigate the company of his own thoughts, the Prince
 had to make favour with a certain party of wood-merchants from various
 states of the empire, who had been drinking together somewhat noisily at
 the far end of the apartment.
 
 The night had already fallen when they took the saddle.  The merchants
 were very loud and mirthful; each had a face like a norwest moon; and
 they played pranks with each others horses, and mingled songs and
 choruses, and alternately remembered and forgot the companion of their
 ride.  Otto thus combined society and solitude, hearkening now to their
 chattering and empty talk, now to the voices of the encircling forest.
 The starlit dark, the faint wood airs, the clank of the horse-shoes
 making broken music, accorded together and attuned his mind.  And he was
 still in a most equal temper when the party reached the top of that long
 hill that overlooks Mittwalden.
 
 Down in the bottom of a bowl of forest, the lights of the little formal
 town glittered in a pattern, street crossing street; away by itself on
 the right, the palace was glowing like a factory.
 
 Although he knew not Otto, one of the wood-merchants was a native of the
 state.  There, said he, pointing to the palace with his whip, there is
 Jezebels inn.
 
 What, do you call it that? cried another, laughing.
 
 Ay, thats what they call it, returned the Grnewalder; and he broke
 into a song, which the rest, as people well acquainted with the words and
 air, instantly took up in chorus.  Her Serene Highness Amalia Seraphina,
 Princess of Grnewald, was the heroine, Gondremark the hero of this
 ballad.  Shame hissed in Ottos ears.  He reined up short and sat stunned
 in the saddle; and the singers continued to descend the hill without him.
 
 The song went to a rough, swashing, popular air; and long after the words
 became inaudible the swing of the music, rising and falling, echoed
 insult in the Princes brain.  He fled the sounds.  Hard by him on his
 right a road struck towards the palace, and he followed it through the
 thick shadows and branching alleys of the park.  It was a busy place on a
 fine summers afternoon, when the court and burghers met and saluted; but
 at that hour of the night in the early spring it was deserted to the
 roosting birds.  Hares rustled among the covert; here and there a statue
 stood glimmering, with its eternal gesture; here and there the echo of an
 imitation temple clattered ghostly to the trampling of the mare.  Ten
 minutes brought him to the upper end of his own home garden, where the
 small stables opened, over a bridge, upon the park.  The yard clock was
 striking the hour of ten; so was the big bell in the palace bell-tower;
 and, farther off, the belfries of the town.  About the stable all else
 was silent but the stamping of stalled horses and the rattle of halters.
 Otto dismounted; and as he did so a memory came back to him: a whisper of
 dishonest grooms and stolen corn, once heard, long forgotten, and now
 recurring in the nick of opportunity.  He crossed the bridge, and, going
 up to a window, knocked six or seven heavy blows in a particular cadence,
 and, as he did so, smiled.  Presently a wicket was opened in the gate,
 and a mans head appeared in the dim starlight.
 
 Nothing to-night, said a voice.
 
 Bring a lantern, said the Prince.
 
 Dear heart a mercy! cried the groom.  Whos that?
 
 It is I, the Prince, replied Otto.  Bring a lantern, take in the mare,
 and let me through into the garden.
 
 The man remained silent for a while, his head still projecting through
 the wicket.
 
 His Highness! he said at last.  And why did your Highness knock so
 strange?
 
 It is a superstition in Mittwalden, answered Otto, that it cheapens
 corn.
 
 With a sound like a sob the groom fled.  He was very white when he
 returned, even by the light of the lantern; and his hand trembled as he
 undid the fastenings and took the mare.
 
 Your Highness, he began at last, for Gods sake . . .   And there he
 paused, oppressed with guilt.
 
 For Gods sake, what? asked Otto cheerfully.  For Gods sake let us
 have cheaper corn, say I.  Good-night!  And he strode off into the
 garden, leaving the groom petrified once more.
 
 The garden descended by a succession of stone terraces to the level of
 the fish-pond.  On the far side the ground rose again, and was crowned by
 the confused roofs and gables of the palace.  The modern pillared front,
 the ball-room, the great library, the princely apartments, the busy and
 illuminated quarters of that great house, all faced the town.  The garden
 side was much older; and here it was almost dark; only a few windows
 quietly lighted at various elevations.  The great square tower rose,
 thinning by stages like a telescope; and on the top of all the flag hung
 motionless.
 
 The garden, as it now lay in the dusk and glimmer of the starshine,
 breathed of April violets.  Under nights cavern arch the shrubs
 obscurely bustled.  Through the plotted terraces and down the marble
 stairs the Prince rapidly descended, fleeing before uncomfortable
 thoughts.  But, alas! from these there is no city of refuge.  And now,
 when he was about midway of the descent, distant strains of music began
 to fall upon his ear from the ball-room, where the court was dancing.
 They reached him faint and broken, but they touched the keys of memory;
 and through and above them Otto heard the ranting melody of the
 wood-merchants song.  Mere blackness seized upon his mind.  Here he was,
 coming home; the wife was dancing, the husband had been playing a trick
 upon a lackey; and meanwhile, all about them, they were a by-word to
 their subjects.  Such a prince, such a husband, such a man, as this Otto
 had become!  And he sped the faster onward.
 
 Some way below he came unexpectedly upon a sentry; yet a little farther,
 and he was challenged by a second; and as he crossed the bridge over the
 fish-pond, an officer making the rounds stopped him once more.  The
 parade of watch was more than usual; but curiosity was dead in Ottos
 mind, and he only chafed at the interruption.  The porter of the back
 postern admitted him, and started to behold him so disordered.  Thence,
 hasting by private stairs and passages, he came at length unseen to his
 own chamber, tore off his clothes, and threw himself upon his bed in the
 dark.  The music of the ball-room still continued to a very lively
 measure; and still, behind that, he heard in spirit the chorus of the
 merchants clanking down the hill.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IIOF LOVE AND POLITICS
 
 
 CHAPTER IWHAT HAPPENED IN THE LIBRARY
 
 
 At a quarter before six on the following morning Doctor Gotthold was
 already at his desk in the library; and with a small cup of black coffee
 at his elbow, and an eye occasionally wandering to the busts and the long
 array of many-coloured books, was quietly reviewing the labours of the
 day before.  He was a man of about forty, flaxen-haired, with refined
 features a little worn, and bright eyes somewhat faded.  Early to bed and
 early to rise, his life was devoted to two things: erudition and Rhine
 wine.  An ancient friendship existed latent between him and Otto; they
 rarely met, but when they did it was to take up at once the thread of
 their suspended intimacy.  Gotthold, the virgin priest of knowledge, had
 envied his cousin, for half a day, when he was married; he had never
 envied him his throne.
 
 Reading was not a popular diversion at the court of Grnewald; and that
 great, pleasant, sunshiny gallery of books and statues was, in practice,
 Gottholds private cabinet.  On this particular Wednesday morning,
 however, he had not been long about his manuscript when a door opened and
 the Prince stepped into the apartment.  The doctor watched him as he drew
 near, receiving, from each of the embayed windows in succession, a flush
 of morning sun; and Otto looked so gay, and walked so airily, he was so
 well dressed and brushed and frizzled, so point-device, and of such a
 sovereign elegance, that the heart of his cousin the recluse was rather
 moved against him.
 
 Good-morning, Gotthold, said Otto, dropping in a chair.
 
 Good-morning, Otto, returned the librarian.  You are an early bird.
 Is this an accident, or do you begin reforming?
 
 It is about time, I fancy, answered the Prince.
 
 I cannot imagine, said the Doctor.  I am too sceptical to be an
 ethical adviser; and as for good resolutions, I believed in them when I
 was young.  They are the colours of hopes rainbow.
 
 If you come to think of it, said Otto, I am not a popular sovereign.
 And with a look he changed his statement to a question.
 
 Popular?  Well, there I would distinguish, answered Gotthold, leaning
 back and joining the tips of his fingers.  There are various kinds of
 popularity; the bookish, which is perfectly impersonal, as unreal as the
 nightmare; the politicians, a mixed variety; and yours, which is the
 most personal of all.  Women take to you; footmen adore you; it is as
 natural to like you as to pat a dog; and were you a saw-miller you would
 be the most popular citizen in Grnewald.  As a princewell, you are in
 the wrong trade.  It is perhaps philosophical to recognise it as you do.
 
 Perhaps philosophical? repeated Otto.
 
 Yes, perhaps.  I would not be dogmatic, answered Gotthold.
 
 Perhaps philosophical, and certainly not virtuous, Otto resumed.
 
 Not of a Roman virtue, chuckled the recluse.
 
 Otto drew his chair nearer to the table, leaned upon it with his elbow,
 and looked his cousin squarely in the face.  In short, he asked, not
 manly?
 
 Well, Gotthold hesitated, not manly, if you will.  And then, with a
 laugh, I did not know that you gave yourself out to be manly, he added.
 It was one of the points that I inclined to like about you; inclined, I
 believe, to admire.  The names of virtues exercise a charm on most of us;
 we must lay claim to all of them, however incompatible; we must all be
 both daring and prudent; we must all vaunt our pride and go to the stake
 for our humility.  Not so you.  Without compromise you were yourself: a
 pretty sight.  I have always said it: none so void of all pretence as
 Otto.
 
 Pretence and effort both! cried Otto.  A dead dog in a canal is more
 alive.  And the question, Gotthold, the question that I have to face is
 this: Can I not, with effort and self-denial, can I not become a
 tolerable sovereign?
 
 Never, replied Gotthold.  Dismiss the notion.  And besides, dear
 child, you would not try.
 
 Nay, Gotthold, I am not to be put by, said Otto.  If I am
 constitutionally unfit to be a sovereign, what am I doing with this
 money, with this palace, with these guards?  And Ia thiefam to execute
 the law on others?
 
 I admit the difficulty, said Gotthold.
 
 Well, can I not try? continued Otto.  Am I not bound to try?  And with
 the advice and help of such a man as you
 
 Me! cried the librarian.  Now, God forbid!
 
 Otto, though he was in no very smiling humour, could not forbear to
 smile.  Yet I was told last night, he laughed, that with a man like me
 to impersonate, and a man like you to touch the springs, a very possible
 government could be composed.
 
 Now I wonder in what diseased imagination, Gotthold said, that
 preposterous monster saw the light of day?
 
 It was one of your own tradea writer: one Roederer, said Otto.
 
 Roederer! an ignorant puppy! cried the librarian.
 
 You are ungrateful, said Otto.  He is one of your professed admirers.
 
 Is he? cried Gotthold, obviously impressed.  Come, that is a good
 account of the young man.  I must read his stuff again.  It is the rather
 to his credit, as our views are opposite.  The east and west are not more
 opposite.  Can I have converted him?  But no; the incident belongs to
 Fairyland.
 
 You are not then, asked the Prince, an authoritarian?
 
 I?  God bless me, no! said Gotthold.  I am a red, dear child.
 
 That brings me then to my next point, and by a natural transition.  If I
 am so clearly unfitted for my post, the Prince asked; if my friends
 admit it, if my subjects clamour for my downfall, if revolution is
 preparing at this hour, must I not go forth to meet the inevitable?
 should I not save these horrors and be done with these absurdities? in a
 word, should I not abdicate?  O, believe me, I feel the ridicule, the
 vast abuse of language, he added, wincing, but even a principulus like
 me cannot resign; he must make a great gesture, and come buskined forth,
 and abdicate.
 
 Ay, said Gotthold, or else stay where he is.  What gnat has bitten you
 to-day?  Do you not know that you are touching, with lay hands, the very
 holiest inwards of philosophy, where madness dwells?  Ay, Otto, madness;
 for in the serene temples of the wise, the inmost shrine, which we
 carefully keep locked, is full of spiders webs.  All men, all, are
 fundamentally useless; nature tolerates, she does not need, she does not
 use them: sterile flowers!  Alldown to the fellow swinking in a byre,
 whom fools point out for the exceptionall are useless; all weave ropes
 of sand; or like a child that has breathed on a window, write and
 obliterate, write and obliterate, idle words!  Talk of it no more.  That
 way, I tell you, madness lies.  The speaker rose from his chair and then
 sat down again.  He laughed a little laugh, and then, changing his tone,
 resumed: Yes, dear child, we are not here to do battle with giants; we
 are here to be happy like the flowers, if we can be.  It is because you
 could, that I have always secretly admired you.  Cling to that trade;
 believe me, it is the right one.  Be happy, be idle, be airy.  To the
 devil with all casuistry! and leave the state to Gondremark, as
 heretofore.  He does it well enough, they say; and his vanity enjoys the
 situation.
 
 Gotthold, cried Otto, what is this to me?  Useless is not the
 question; I cannot rest at uselessness; I must be useful or I must be
 noxiousone or other.  I grant you the whole thing, prince and
 principality alike, is pure absurdity, a stroke of satire; and that a
 banker or the man who keeps an inn has graver duties.  But now, when I
 have washed my hands of it three years, and left alllabour,
 responsibility, and honour and enjoyment too, if there be anyto
 Gondremark and toSeraphina  He hesitated at the name, and Gotthold
 glanced aside.  Well, the Prince continued, what has come of it?
 Taxes, army, cannonwhy, its like a box of lead soldiers!  And the
 people sick at the folly of it, and fired with the injustice!  And war,
 tooI hear of warwar in this teapot!  What a complication of absurdity
 and disgrace!  And when the inevitable end arrivesthe revolutionwho
 will be to blame in the sight of God, who will be gibbeted in public
 opinion?  I!  Prince Puppet!
 
 I thought you had despised public opinion, said Gotthold.
 
 I did, said Otto sombrely, but now I do not.  I am growing old.  And
 then, Gotthold, there is Seraphina.  She is loathed in this country that
 I brought her to and suffered her to spoil.  Yes, I gave it her as a
 plaything, and she has broken it: a fine Prince, an admirable Princess!
 Even her lifeI ask you, Gotthold, is her life safe?
 
 It is safe enough to-day, replied the librarian: but since you ask me
 seriously, I would not answer for to-morrow.  She is ill-advised.
 
 And by whom?  By this Gondremark, to whom you counsel me to leave my
 country, cried the Prince.  Rare advice!  The course that I have been
 following all these years, to come at last to this.  O, ill-advised! if
 that were all!  See now, there is no sense in beating about the bush
 between two men: you know what scandal says of her?
 
 Gotthold, with pursed lips, silently nodded.
 
 Well, come, you are not very cheering as to my conduct as the Prince;
 have I even done my duty as a husband? Otto asked.
 
 Nay, nay, said Gotthold, earnestly and eagerly, this is another
 chapter.  I am an old celibate, an old monk.  I cannot advise you in your
 marriage.
 
 Nor do I require advice, said Otto, rising.  All of this must cease.
 And he began to walk to and fro with his hands behind his back.
 
 Well, Otto, may God guide you! said Gotthold, after a considerable
 silence.  I cannot.
 
 From what does all this spring? said the Prince, stopping in his walk.
 What am I to call it?  Diffidence?  The fear of ridicule?  Inverted
 vanity?  What matter names, if it has brought me to this?  I could never
 bear to be bustling about nothing; I was ashamed of this toy kingdom from
 the first; I could not tolerate that people should fancy I believed in a
 thing so patently absurd!  I would do nothing that cannot be done
 smiling.  I have a sense of humour, forsooth!  I must know better than my
 Maker.  And it was the same thing in my marriage, he added more
 hoarsely.  I did not believe this girl could care for me; I must not
 intrude; I must preserve the foppery of my indifference.  What an
 impotent picture!
 
 Ay, we have the same blood, moralised Gotthold.  You are drawing, with
 fine strokes, the character of the born sceptic.
 
 Sceptic?coward! cried Otto.  Coward is the word.  A springless,
 putty-hearted, cowering coward!
 
 And as the Prince rapped out the words in tones of unusual vigour, a
 little, stout, old gentleman, opening a door behind Gotthold, received
 them fairly in the face.  With his parrots beak for a nose, his pursed
 mouth, his little goggling eyes, he was the picture of formality; and in
 ordinary circumstances, strutting behind the drum of his corporation, he
 impressed the beholder with a certain air of frozen dignity and wisdom.
 But at the smallest contrariety, his trembling hands and disconnected
 gestures betrayed the weakness at the root.  And now, when he was thus
 surprisingly received in that library of Mittwalden Palace, which was the
 customary haunt of silence, his hands went up into the air as if he had
 been shot, and he cried aloud with the scream of an old woman.
 
 O! he gasped, recovering, Your Highness!  I beg ten thousand pardons.
 But your Highness at such an hour in the library!a circumstance so
 unusual as your Highnesss presence was a thing I could not be expected
 to foresee.
 
 There is no harm done, Herr Cancellarius, said Otto.
 
 I came upon the errand of a moment: some papers I left over-night with
 the Herr Doctor, said the Chancellor of Grnewald.  Herr Doctor, if you
 will kindly give me them, I will intrude no longer.
 
 Gotthold unlocked a drawer and handed a bundle of manuscript to the old
 gentleman, who prepared, with fitting salutations, to take his departure.
 
 Herr Greisengesang, since we have met, said Otto, let us talk.
 
 I am honoured by his Highnesss commands, replied the Chancellor.
 
 All has been quiet since I left? asked the Prince, resuming his seat.
 
 The usual business, your Highness, answered Greisengesang; punctual
 trifles: huge, indeed, if neglected, but trifles when discharged.  Your
 Highness is most zealously obeyed.
 
 Obeyed, Herr Cancellarius? returned the Prince.  And when have I
 obliged you with an order?  Replaced, let us rather say.  But to touch
 upon these trifles; instance me a few.
 
 The routine of government, from which your Highness has so wisely
 dissociated his leisure . . .  began Greisengesang.
 
 We will leave my leisure, sir, said Otto.  Approach the facts.
 
 The routine of business was proceeded with, replied the official, now
 visibly twittering.
 
 It is very strange, Herr Cancellarius, that you should so persistently
 avoid my questions, said the Prince.  You tempt me to suppose a purpose
 in your dulness.  I have asked you whether all was quiet; do me the
 pleasure to reply.
 
 PerfectlyO, perfectly quiet, jerked the ancient puppet, with every
 signal of untruth.
 
 I make a note of these words, said the Prince gravely.  You assure me,
 your sovereign, that since the date of my departure nothing has occurred
 of which you owe me an account.
 
 I take your Highness, I take the Herr Doctor to witness, cried
 Greisengesang, that I have had no such expression.
 
 Halt! said the Prince; and then, after a pause: Herr Greisengesang,
 you are an old man, and you served my father before you served me, he
 added.  It consists neither with your dignity nor mine that you should
 babble excuses and stumble possibly upon untruths.  Collect your
 thoughts; and then categorically inform me of all you have been charged
 to hide.
 
 Gotthold, stooping very low over his desk, appeared to have resumed his
 labours; but his shoulders heaved with subterranean merriment.  The
 Prince waited, drawing his handkerchief quietly through his fingers.
 
 Your Highness, in this informal manner, said the old gentleman at last,
 and being unavoidably deprived of documents, it would be difficult, it
 would be impossible, to do justice to the somewhat grave occurrences
 which have transpired.
 
 I will not criticise your attitude, replied the Prince.  I desire
 that, between you and me, all should be done gently; for I have not
 forgotten, my old friend, that you were kind to me from the first, and
 for a period of years a faithful servant.  I will thus dismiss the
 matters on which you waive immediate inquiry.  But you have certain
 papers actually in your hand.  Come, Herr Greisengesang, there is at
 least one point for which you have authority.  Enlighten me on that.
 
 On that? cried the old gentleman.  O, that is a trifle; a matter, your
 Highness, of police; a detail of a purely administrative order.  These
 are simply a selection of the papers seized upon the English traveller.
 
 Seized? echoed Otto.  In what sense?  Explain yourself.
 
 Sir John Crabtree, interposed Gotthold, looking up, was arrested
 yesterday evening.
 
 It this so, Herr Cancellarius? demanded Otto sternly.
 
 It was judged right, your Highness, protested Greisengesang.  The
 decree was in due form, invested with your Highnesss authority by
 procuration.  I am but an agent; I had no status to prevent the measure.
 
 This man, my guest, has been arrested, said the Prince.  On what
 grounds, sir?  With what colour of pretence?
 
 The Chancellor stammered.
 
 Your Highness will perhaps find the reason in these documents, said
 Gotthold, pointing with the tail of his pen.
 
 Otto thanked his cousin with a look.  Give them to me, he said,
 addressing the Chancellor.
 
 But that gentleman visibly hesitated to obey.  Baron von Gondremark, he
 said, has made the affair his own.  I am in this case a mere messenger;
 and as such, I am not clothed with any capacity to communicate the
 documents I carry.  Herr Doctor, I am convinced you will not fail to bear
 me out.
 
 I have heard a great deal of nonsense, said Gotthold, and most of it
 from you; but this beats all.
 
 Come, sir, said Otto, rising, the papers.  I command.
 
 Herr Greisengesang instantly gave way.
 
 With your Highnesss permission, he said, and laying at his feet my
 most submiss apologies, I will now hasten to attend his further orders in
 the Chancery.
 
 Herr Cancellarius, do you see this chair? said Otto.  There is where
 you shall attend my further orders.  O, now, no more! he cried, with a
 gesture, as the old man opened his lips.  You have sufficiently marked
 your zeal to your employer; and I begin to weary of a moderation you
 abuse.
 
 The Chancellor moved to the appointed chair and took his seat in silence.
 
 And now, said Otto, opening the roll, what is all this? it looks like
 the manuscript of a book.
 
 It is, said Gotthold, the manuscript of a book of travels.
 
 You have read it, Doctor Hohenstockwitz? asked the Prince.
 
 Nay, I but saw the title-page, replied Gotthold.  But the roll was
 given to me open, and I heard no word of any secrecy.
 
 Otto dealt the Chancellor an angry glance.
 
 I see, he went on.  The papers of an author seized at this date of the
 worlds history, in a state so petty and so ignorant as Grnewald, here
 is indeed an ignominious folly.  Sir, to the Chancellor, I marvel to
 find you in so scurvy an employment.  On your conduct to your Prince I
 will not dwell; but to descend to be a spy!  For what else can it be
 called?  To seize the papers of this gentleman, the private papers of a
 stranger, the toil of a life, perhapsto open, and to read them.  And
 what have we to do with books?  The Herr Doctor might perhaps be asked
 for his advice; but we have no _index expurgatorius_ in Grnewald.  Had
 we but that, we should be the most absolute parody and farce upon this
 tawdry earth.
 
 Yet, even while Otto spoke, he had continued to unfold the roll; and now,
 when it lay fully open, his eye rested on the title-page elaborately
 written in red ink.  It ran thus:
 
                                    MEMOIRS
                           OF A VISIT TO THE VARIOUS
                               COURTS OF EUROPE,
                                       BY
                          SIR JOHN CRABTREE, BARONET.
 
 Below was a list of chapters, each bearing the name of one of the
 European Courts; and among these the nineteenth and the last upon the
 list was dedicated to Grnewald.
 
 Ah!  The Court of Grnewald! said Otto, that should be droll reading.
 And his curiosity itched for it.
 
 A methodical dog, this English Baronet, said Gotthold.  Each chapter
 written and finished on the spot.  I shall look for his work when it
 appears.
 
 It would be odd, now, just to glance at it, said Otto, wavering.
 
 Gottholds brow darkened, and he looked out of window.
 
 But though the Prince understood the reproof, his weakness prevailed.  I
 will, he said, with an uneasy laugh, I will, I think, just glance at
 it.
 
 So saying, he resumed his seat and spread the travellers manuscript upon
 the table.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IION THE COURT OF GRNEWALD, BEING A PORTION OF THE
 TRAVELLERS MANUSCRIPT
 
 
 It may well be asked (_it was thus the English traveller began his
 nineteenth chapter_) why I should have chosen Grnewald out of so many
 other states equally petty, formal, dull, and corrupt.  Accident, indeed,
 decided, and not I; but I have seen no reason to regret my visit.  The
 spectacle of this small society macerating in its own abuses was not
 perhaps instructive, but I have found it exceedingly diverting.
 
 The reigning Prince, Otto Johann Friedrich, a young man of imperfect
 education, questionable valour, and no scintilla of capacity, has fallen
 into entire public contempt.  It was with difficulty that I obtained an
 interview, for he is frequently absent from a court where his presence is
 unheeded, and where his only rle is to be a cloak for the amours of his
 wife.  At last, however, on the third occasion when I visited the palace,
 I found this sovereign in the exercise of his inglorious function, with
 the wife on one hand, and the lover on the other.  He is not ill-looking;
 he has hair of a ruddy gold, which naturally curls, and his eyes are
 dark, a combination which I always regard as the mark of some congenital
 deficiency, physical or moral; his features are irregular, but pleasing;
 the nose perhaps a little short, and the mouth a little womanish; his
 address is excellent, and he can express himself with point.  But to
 pierce below these externals is to come on a vacuity of any sterling
 quality, a deliquescence of the moral nature, a frivolity and
 inconsequence of purpose that mark the nearly perfect fruit of a decadent
 age.  He has a worthless smattering of many subjects, but a grasp of
 none.  I soon weary of a pursuit, he said to me, laughing; it would
 almost appear as if he took a pride in his incapacity and lack of moral
 courage.  The results of his dilettanteism are to be seen in every field;
 he is a bad fencer, a second-rate horseman, dancer, shot; he singsI have
 heard himand he sings like a child; he writes intolerable verses in more
 than doubtful French; he acts like the common amateur; and in short there
 is no end to the number of the things that he does, and does badly.  His
 one manly taste is for the chase.  In sum, he is but a plexus of
 weaknesses; the singing chambermaid of the stage, tricked out in mans
 apparel, and mounted on a circus horse.  I have seen this poor phantom of
 a prince riding out alone or with a few huntsmen, disregarded by all, and
 I have been even grieved for the bearer of so futile and melancholy an
 existence.  The last Merovingians may have looked not otherwise.
 
 The Princess Amalia Seraphina, a daughter of the Grand-Ducal house of
 Toggenburg-Tannhuser, would be equally inconsiderable if she were not a
 cutting instrument in the hands of an ambitious man.  She is much younger
 than the Prince, a girl of two-and-twenty, sick with vanity,
 superficially clever, and fundamentally a fool.  She has a red-brown
 rolling eye, too large for her face, and with sparks of both levity and
 ferocity; her forehead is high and narrow, her figure thin and a little
 stooping.  Her manners, her conversation, which she interlards with
 French, her very tastes and ambitions, are alike assumed; and the
 assumption is ungracefully apparent: Hoyden playing Cleopatra.  I should
 judge her to be incapable of truth.  In private life a girl of this
 description embroils the peace of families, walks attended by a troop of
 scowling swains, and passes, once at least, through the divorce court; it
 is a common and, except to the cynic, an uninteresting type.  On the
 throne, however, and in the hands of a man like Gondremark, she may
 become the authoress of serious public evils.
 
 Gondremark, the true ruler of this unfortunate country, is a more complex
 study.  His position in Grnewald, to which he is a foreigner, is
 eminently false; and that he should maintain it as he does, a very
 miracle of impudence and dexterity.  His speech, his face, his policy,
 are all double: heads and tails.  Which of the two extremes may be his
 actual design he were a bold man who should offer to decide.  Yet I will
 hazard the guess that he follows both experimentally, and awaits, at the
 hand of destiny, one of those directing hints of which she is so lavish
 to the wise.
 
 On the one hand, as _Maire du Palais_ to the incompetent Otto, and using
 the love-sick Princess for a tool and mouthpiece, he pursues a policy of
 arbitrary power and territorial aggrandisement.  He has called out the
 whole capable male population of the state to military service; he has
 bought cannon; he has tempted away promising officers from foreign
 armies; and he now begins, in his international relations, to assume the
 swaggering port and the vague, threatful language of a bully.  The idea
 of extending Grnewald may appear absurd, but the little state is
 advantageously placed, its neighbours are all defenceless; and if at any
 moment the jealousies of the greater courts should neutralise each other,
 an active policy might double the principality both in population and
 extent.  Certainly at least the scheme is entertained in the court of
 Mittwalden; nor do I myself regard it as entirely desperate.  The
 margravate of Brandenburg has grown from as small beginnings to a
 formidable power; and though it is late in the day to try adventurous
 policies, and the age of war seems ended, Fortune, we must not forget,
 still blindly turns her wheel for men and nations.  Concurrently with,
 and tributary to, these warlike preparations, crushing taxes have been
 levied, journals have been suppressed, and the country, which three years
 ago was prosperous and happy, now stagnates in a forced inaction, gold
 has become a curiosity, and the mills stand idle on the mountain streams.
 
 On the other hand, in his second capacity of popular tribune, Gondremark
 is the incarnation of the free lodges, and sits at the centre of an
 organised conspiracy against the state.  To any such movement my
 sympathies were early acquired, and I would not willingly let fall a word
 that might embarrass or retard the revolution.  But to show that I speak
 of knowledge, and not as the reporter of mere gossip, I may mention that
 I have myself been present at a meeting where the details of a republican
 Constitution were minutely debated and arranged; and I may add that
 Gondremark was throughout referred to by the speakers as their captain in
 action and the arbiter of their disputes.  He has taught his dupes (for
 so I must regard them) that his power of resistance to the Princess is
 limited, and at each fresh stretch of authority persuades them, with
 specious reasons, to postpone the hour of insurrection.  Thus (to give
 some instances of his astute diplomacy) he salved over the decree
 enforcing military service, under the plea that to be well drilled and
 exercised in arms was even a necessary preparation for revolt.  And the
 other day, when it began to be rumoured abroad that a war was being
 forced on a reluctant neighbour, the Grand Duke of Gerolstein, and I made
 sure it would be the signal for an instant rising, I was struck dumb with
 wonder to find that even this had been prepared and was to be accepted.
 I went from one to another in the Liberal camp, and all were in the same
 story, all had been drilled and schooled and fitted out with vacuous
 argument.  The lads had better see some real fighting, they said; and
 besides, it will be as well to capture Gerolstein: we can then extend to
 our neighbours the blessing of liberty on the same day that we snatch it
 for ourselves; and the republic will be all the stronger to resist, if
 the kings of Europe should band themselves together to reduce it.  I
 know not which of the two I should admire the more: the simplicity of the
 multitude or the audacity of the adventurer.  But such are the
 subtleties, such the quibbling reasons, with which he blinds and leads
 this people.  How long a course so tortuous can be pursued with safety I
 am incapable of guessing; not long, one would suppose; and yet this
 singular man has been treading the mazes for five years, and his favour
 at court and his popularity among the lodges still endure unbroken.
 
 I have the privilege of slightly knowing him.  Heavily and somewhat
 clumsily built, of a vast, disjointed, rambling frame, he can still pull
 himself together, and figure, not without admiration, in the saloon or
 the ball-room.  His hue and temperament are plentifully bilious; he has a
 saturnine eye; his cheek is of a dark blue where he has been shaven.
 Essentially he is to be numbered among the man-haters, a convinced
 contemner of his fellows.  Yet he is himself of a commonplace ambition
 and greedy of applause.  In talk, he is remarkable for a thirst of
 information, loving rather to hear than to communicate; for sound and
 studious views; and, judging by the extreme short-sightedness of common
 politicians, for a remarkable provision of events.  All this, however,
 without grace, pleasantry, or charm, heavily set forth, with a dull
 countenance.  In our numerous conversations, although he has always heard
 me with deference, I have been conscious throughout of a sort of
 ponderous finessing hard to tolerate.  He produces none of the effect of
 a gentleman; devoid not merely of pleasantry, but of all attention or
 communicative warmth of bearing.  No gentleman, besides, would so parade
 his amours with the Princess; still less repay the Prince for his
 long-suffering with a studied insolence of demeanour and the fabrication
 of insulting nicknames, such as Prince Featherhead, which run from ear to
 ear and create a laugh throughout the country.  Gondremark has thus some
 of the clumsier characters of the self-made man, combined with an
 inordinate, almost a besotted, pride of intellect and birth.  Heavy,
 bilious, selfish, inornate, he sits upon this court and country like an
 incubus.
 
 But it is probable that he preserves softer gifts for necessary purposes.
 Indeed, it is certain, although he vouchsafed none of it to me, that this
 cold and stolid politician possesses to a great degree the art of
 ingratiation, and can be all things to all men.  Hence there has probably
 sprung up the idle legend that in private life he is a gross romping
 voluptuary.  Nothing, at least, can well be more surprising than the
 terms of his connection with the Princess.  Older than her husband,
 certainly uglier, and, according to the feeble ideas common among women,
 in every particular less pleasing, he has not only seized the complete
 command of all her thought and action, but has imposed on her in public a
 humiliating part.  I do not here refer to the complete sacrifice of every
 rag of her reputation; for to many women these extremities are in
 themselves attractive.  But there is about the court a certain lady of a
 dishevelled reputation, a Countess von Rosen, wife or widow of a cloudy
 count, no longer in her second youth, and already bereft of some of her
 attractions, who unequivocally occupies the station of the Barons
 mistress.  I had thought, at first, that she was but a hired accomplice,
 a mere blind or buffer for the more important sinner.  A few hours
 acquaintance with Madame von Rosen for ever dispelled the illusion.  She
 is one rather to make than to prevent a scandal, and she values none of
 those bribesmoney, honours, or employmentwith which the situation might
 be gilded.  Indeed, as a person frankly bad, she pleased me, in the court
 of Grnewald, like a piece of nature.
 
 The power of this man over the Princess is, therefore, without bounds.
 She has sacrificed to the adoration with which he has inspired her not
 only her marriage vow and every shred of public decency, but that vice of
 jealousy which is so much dearer to the female sex than either intrinsic
 honour or outward consideration.  Nay, more: a young, although not a very
 attractive woman, and a princess both by birth and fact, she submits to
 the triumphant rivalry of one who might be her mother as to years, and
 who is so manifestly her inferior in station.  This is one of the
 mysteries of the human heart.  But the rage of illicit love, when it is
 once indulged, appears to grow by feeding; and to a person of the
 character and temperament of this unfortunate young lady, almost any
 depth of degradation is within the reach of possibility.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIITHE PRINCE AND THE ENGLISH TRAVELLER
 
 
 So far Otto read, with waxing indignation; and here his fury overflowed.
 He tossed the roll upon the table and stood up.  This man, he said, is
 a devil.  A filthy imagination, an ear greedy of evil, a ponderous
 malignity of thought and language: I grow like him by the reading!
 Chancellor, where is this fellow lodged?
 
 He was committed to the Flag Tower, replied Greisengesang, in the
 Gamiani apartment.
 
 Lead me to him, said the Prince; and then, a thought striking him, Was
 it for that, he asked, that I found so many sentries in the garden?
 
 Your Highness, I am unaware, answered Greisengesang, true to his
 policy.  The disposition of the guards is a matter distinct from my
 functions.
 
 Otto turned upon the old man fiercely, but ere he had time to speak,
 Gotthold touched him on the arm.  He swallowed his wrath with a great
 effort.  It is well, he said, taking the roll.  Follow me to the Flag
 Tower.
 
 The Chancellor gathered himself together, and the two set forward.  It
 was a long and complicated voyage; for the library was in the wing of the
 new buildings, and the tower which carried the flag was in the old
 schloss upon the garden.  By a great variety of stairs and corridors,
 they came out at last upon a patch of gravelled court; the garden peeped
 through a high grating with a flash of green; tall, old gabled buildings
 mounted on every side; the Flag Tower climbed, stage after stage, into
 the blue; and high over all, among the building daws, the yellow flag
 wavered in the wind.  A sentinel at the foot of the tower stairs
 presented arms; another paced the first landing; and a third was
 stationed before the door of the extemporised prison.
 
 We guard this mud-bag like a jewel, Otto sneered.
 
 The Gamiani apartment was so called from an Italian doctor who had
 imposed on the credulity of a former prince.  The rooms were large, airy,
 pleasant, and looked upon the garden; but the walls were of great
 thickness (for the tower was old), and the windows were heavily barred.
 The Prince, followed by the Chancellor, still trotting to keep up with
 him, brushed swiftly through the little library and the long saloon, and
 burst like a thunderbolt into the bedroom at the farther end.  Sir John
 was finishing his toilet; a man of fifty, hard, uncompromising, able,
 with the eye and teeth of physical courage.  He was unmoved by the
 irruption, and bowed with a sort of sneering ease.
 
 To what am I to attribute the honour of this visit? he asked.
 
 You have eaten my bread, replied Otto, you have taken my hand, you
 have been received under my roof.  When did I fail you in courtesy?  What
 have you asked that was not granted as to an honoured guest?  And here,
 sir, tapping fiercely on the manuscript, here is your return.
 
 Your Highness has read my papers? said the Baronet.  I am honoured
 indeed.  But the sketch is most imperfect.  I shall now have much to add.
 I can say that the Prince, whom I had accused of idleness, is zealous in
 the department of police, taking upon himself those duties that are most
 distasteful.  I shall be able to relate the burlesque incident of my
 arrest, and the singular interview with which you honour me at present.
 For the rest, I have already communicated with my Ambassador at Vienna;
 and unless you propose to murder me, I shall be at liberty, whether you
 please or not, within the week.  For I hardly fancy the future empire of
 Grnewald is yet ripe to go to war with England.  I conceive I am a
 little more than quits.  I owe you no explanation; yours has been the
 wrong.  You, if you have studied my writing with intelligence, owe me a
 large debt of gratitude.  And to conclude, as I have not yet finished my
 toilet, I imagine the courtesy of a turnkey to a prisoner would induce
 you to withdraw.
 
 There was some paper on the table, and Otto, sitting down, wrote a
 passport in the name of Sir John Crabtree.
 
 Affix the seal, Herr Cancellarius, he said, in his most princely
 manner, as he rose.
 
 Greisengesang produced a red portfolio, and affixed the seal in the
 unpoetic guise of an adhesive stamp; nor did his perturbed and clumsy
 movements at all lessen the comedy of the performance.  Sir John looked
 on with a malign enjoyment; and Otto chafed, regretting, when too late,
 the unnecessary royalty of his command and gesture.  But at length the
 Chancellor had finished his piece of prestidigitation, and, without
 waiting for an order, had countersigned the passport.  Thus regularised,
 he returned it to Otto with a bow.
 
 You will now, said the Prince, order one of my own carriages to be
 prepared; see it, with your own eyes, charged with Sir Johns effects,
 and have it waiting within the hour behind the Pheasant House.  Sir John
 departs this morning for Vienna.
 
 The Chancellor took his elaborate departure.
 
 Here, sir, is your passport, said Otto, turning to the Baronet.  I
 regret it from my heart that you have met inhospitable usage.
 
 Well, there will be no English war, returned Sir John.
 
 Nay, sir, said Otto, you surely owe me your civility.  Matters are now
 changed, and we stand again upon the footing of two gentlemen.  It was
 not I who ordered your arrest; I returned late last night from hunting;
 and as you cannot blame me for your imprisonment, you may even thank me
 for your freedom.
 
 And yet you read my papers, said the traveller shrewdly.
 
 There, sir, I was wrong, returned Otto; and for that I ask your
 pardon.  You can scarce refuse it, for your own dignity, to one who is a
 plexus of weaknesses.  Nor was the fault entirely mine.  Had the papers
 been innocent, it would have been at most an indiscretion.  Your own
 guilt is the sting of my offence.
 
 Sir John regarded Otto with an approving twinkle; then he bowed, but
 still in silence.
 
 Well, sir, as you are now at your entire disposal, I have a favour to
 beg of your indulgence, continued the Prince.  I have to request that
 you will walk with me alone into the garden so soon as your convenience
 permits.
 
 From the moment that I am a free man, Sir John replied, this time with
 perfect courtesy, I am wholly at your Highnesss command; and if you
 will excuse a rather summary toilet, I will even follow you, as I am.
 
 I thank you, sir, said Otto.
 
 So without more delay, the Prince leading, the pair proceeded down
 through the echoing stairway of the tower, and out through the grating,
 into the ample air and sunshine of the morning, and among the terraces
 and flower-beds of the garden.  They crossed the fish-pond, where the
 carp were leaping as thick as bees; they mounted, one after another, the
 various flights of stairs, snowed upon, as they went, with April
 blossoms, and marching in time to the great orchestra of birds.  Nor did
 Otto pause till they had reached the highest terrace of the garden.  Here
 was a gate into the park, and hard by, under a tuft of laurel, a marble
 garden seat.  Hence they looked down on the green tops of many elm-trees,
 where the rooks were busy; and, beyond that, upon the palace roof, and
 the yellow banner flying in the blue.  I pray you to be seated, sir,
 said Otto.
 
 Sir John complied without a word; and for some seconds Otto walked to and
 fro before him, plunged in angry thought.  The birds were all singing for
 a wager.
 
 Sir, said the Prince at length, turning towards the Englishman, you
 are to me, except by the conventions of society, a perfect stranger.  Of
 your character and wishes I am ignorant.  I have never wittingly
 disobliged you.  There is a difference in station, which I desire to
 waive.  I would, if you still think me entitled to so much
 considerationI would be regarded simply as a gentleman.  Now, sir, I did
 wrong to glance at these papers, which I here return to you; but if
 curiosity be undignified, as I am free to own, falsehood is both cowardly
 and cruel.  I opened your roll; and what did I findwhat did I find about
 my wife; Lies! he broke out.  They are lies!  There are not, so help me
 God! four words of truth in your intolerable libel!  You are a man; you
 are old, and might be the girls father; you are a gentleman; you are a
 scholar, and have learned refinement; and you rake together all this
 vulgar scandal, and propose to print it in a public book!  Such is your
 chivalry!  But, thank God, sir, she has still a husband.  You say, sir,
 in that paper in your hand, that I am a bad fencer; I have to request
 from you a lesson in the art.  The park is close behind; yonder is the
 Pheasant House, where you will find your carriage; should I fall, you
 know, siryou have written it in your paperhow little my movements are
 regarded; I am in the custom of disappearing; it will be one more
 disappearance; and long before it has awakened a remark, you may be safe
 across the border.
 
 You will observe, said Sir John, that what you ask is impossible.
 
 And if I struck you? cried the Prince, with a sudden menacing flash.
 
 It would be a cowardly blow, returned the Baronet, unmoved, for it
 would make no change.  I cannot draw upon a reigning sovereign.
 
 And it is this man, to whom you dare not offer satisfaction, that you
 choose to insult! cried Otto.
 
 Pardon me, said the traveller, you are unjust.  It is because you are
 a reigning sovereign that I cannot fight with you; and it is for the same
 reason that I have a right to criticise your action and your wife.  You
 are in everything a public creature; you belong to the public, body and
 bone.  You have with you the law, the muskets of the army, and the eyes
 of spies.  We, on our side, have but one weapontruth.
 
 Truth! echoed the Prince, with a gesture.
 
 There was another silence.
 
 Your Highness, said Sir John at last, you must not expect grapes from
 a thistle.  I am old and a cynic.  Nobody cares a rush for me; and on the
 whole, after the present interview, I scarce know anybody that I like
 better than yourself.  You see, I have changed my mind, and have the
 uncommon virtue to avow the change.  I tear up this stuff before you,
 here in your own garden; I ask your pardon, I ask the pardon of the
 Princess; and I give you my word of honour as a gentleman and an old man,
 that when my book of travels shall appear it shall not contain so much as
 the name of Grnewald.  And yet it was a racy chapter!  But had your
 Highness only read about the other courts!  I am a carrion crow; but it
 is not my fault, after all, that the world is such a nauseous kennel.
 
 Sir, said Otto, is the eye not jaundiced?
 
 Nay, cried the traveller, very likely.  I am one who goes sniffing; I
 am no poet.  I believe in a better future for the world; or, at all
 accounts, I do most potently disbelieve in the present.  Rotten eggs is
 the burthen of my song.  But indeed, your Highness, when I meet with any
 merit, I do not think that I am slow to recognise it.  This is a day that
 I shall still recall with gratitude, for I have found a sovereign with
 some manly virtues; and for onceold courtier and old radical as I amit
 is from the heart and quite sincerely that I can request the honour of
 kissing your Highnesss hand?
 
 Nay, sir, said Otto, to my heart!
 
 And the Englishman, taken at unawares, was clasped for a moment in the
 Princes arms.
 
 And now, sir, added Otto, there is the Pheasant House; close behind it
 you will find my carriage, which I pray you to accept.  God speed you to
 Vienna!
 
 In the impetuosity of youth, replied Sir John, your Highness has
 overlooked one circumstance.  I am still fasting.
 
 Well, sir, said Otto, smiling, you are your own master; you may go or
 stay.  But I warn you, your friend may prove less powerful than your
 enemies.  The Prince, indeed, is thoroughly on your side; he has all the
 will to help; but to whom do I speak?you know better than I do, he is
 not alone in Grnewald.
 
 There is a deal in position, returned the traveller, gravely nodding.
 Gondremark loves to temporise; his policy is below ground, and he fears
 all open courses; and now that I have seen you act with so much spirit, I
 will cheerfully risk myself on your protection.  Who knows?  You may be
 yet the better man.
 
 Do you indeed believe so? cried the Prince.  You put life into my
 heart!
 
 I will give up sketching portraits, said the Baronet.  I am a blind
 owl; I had misread you strangely.  And yet remember this; a sprint is one
 thing, and to run all day another.  For I still mistrust your
 constitution; the short nose, the hair and eyes of several complexions;
 no, they are diagnostic; and I must end, I see, as I began.
 
 I am still a singing chambermaid? said Otto.
 
 Nay, your Highness, I pray you to forget what I had written, said Sir
 John; I am not like Pilate; and the chapter is no more.  Bury it, if you
 love me.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVWHILE THE PRINCE IS IN THE ANTE-ROOM . . .
 
 
 Greatly comforted by the exploits of the morning, the Prince turned
 towards the Princesss ante-room, bent on a more difficult enterprise.
 The curtains rose before him, the usher called his name, and he entered
 the room with an exaggeration of his usual mincing and airy dignity.
 There were about a score of persons waiting, principally ladies; it was
 one of the few societies in Grnewald where Otto knew himself to be
 popular; and while a maid of honour made her exit by a side door to
 announce his arrival to the Princess, he moved round the apartment,
 collecting homage and bestowing compliments with friendly grace.  Had
 this been the sum of his duties, he had been an admirable monarch.  Lady
 after lady was impartially honoured by his attention.
 
 Madam, he said to one, how does this happen?  I find you daily more
 adorable.
 
 And your Highness daily browner, replied the lady.  We began equal; O,
 there I will be bold: we have both beautiful complexions.  But while I
 study mine, your Highness tans himself.
 
 A perfect negro, madam; and what so fitlybeing beautys slave? said
 Otto.Madame Grafinski, when is our next play?  I have just heard that I
 am a bad actor.
 
 _O ciel_! cried Madame Grafinski.  Who could venture?  What a bear!
 
 An excellent man, I can assure you, returned Otto.
 
 O, never!  O, is it possible! fluted the lady.  Your Highness plays
 like an angel.
 
 You must be right, madam; who could speak falsely and yet look so
 charming? said the Prince.  But this gentleman, it seems, would have
 preferred me playing like an actor.
 
 A sort of hum, a falsetto, feminine cooing, greeted the tiny sally; and
 Otto expanded like a peacock.  This warm atmosphere of women and flattery
 and idle chatter pleased him to the marrow.
 
 Madame von Eisenthal, your coiffure is delicious, he remarked.
 
 Every one was saying so, said one.
 
 If I have pleased Prince Charming?  And Madame von Eisenthal swept him
 a deep curtsy with a killing glance of adoration.
 
 It is new? he asked.  Vienna fashion.
 
 Mint new, replied the lady, for your Highnesss return.  I felt young
 this morning; it was a premonition.  But why, Prince, do you ever leave
 us?
 
 For the pleasure of the return, said Otto.  I am like a dog; I must
 bury my bone, and then come back to great upon it.
 
 O, a bone!  Fie, what a comparison!  You have brought back the manners
 of the wood, returned the lady.
 
 Madam, it is what the dog has dearest, said the Prince.  But I observe
 Madame von Rosen.
 
 And Otto, leaving the group to which he had been piping, stepped towards
 the embrasure of a window where a lady stood.
 
 The Countess von Rosen had hitherto been silent, and a thought depressed,
 but on the approach of Otto she began to brighten.  She was tall, slim as
 a nymph, and of a very airy carriage; and her face, which was already
 beautiful in repose, lightened and changed, flashed into smiles, and
 glowed with lovely colour at the touch of animation.  She was a good
 vocalist; and, even in speech, her voice commanded a great range of
 changes, the low notes rich with tenor quality, the upper ringing, on the
 brink of laughter, into music.  A gem of many facets and variable hues of
 fire; a woman who withheld the better portion of her beauty, and then, in
 a caressing second, flashed it like a weapon full on the beholder; now
 merely a tall figure and a sallow handsome face, with the evidences of a
 reckless temper; anon opening like a flower to life and colour, mirth and
 tenderness:Madame von Rosen had always a dagger in reserve for the
 despatch of ill-assured admirers.  She met Otto with the dart of tender
 gaiety.
 
 You have come to me at last, Prince Cruel, she said.  Butterfly!
 Well, and am I not to kiss your hand? she added.
 
 Madam, it is I who must kiss yours.  And Otto bowed and kissed it.
 
 You deny me every indulgence, she said, smiling.
 
 And now what news in Court? inquired the Prince.  I come to you for my
 gazette.
 
 Ditch-water! she replied.  The world is all asleep, grown grey in
 slumber; I do not remember any waking movement since quite an eternity;
 and the last thing in the nature of a sensation was the last time my
 governess was allowed to box my ears.  But yet I do myself and your
 unfortunate enchanted palace some injustice.  Here is the lastO
 positively!  And she told him the story from behind her fan, with many
 glances, many cunning strokes of the narrators art.  The others had
 drawn away, for it was understood that Madame von Rosen was in favour
 with the Prince.  None the less, however, did the Countess lower her
 voice at times to within a semitone of whispering; and the pair leaned
 together over the narrative.
 
 Do you know, said Otto, laughing, you are the only entertaining woman
 on this earth!
 
 O, you have found out so much, she cried.
 
 Yes, madam, I grow wiser with advancing years, he returned.
 
 Years, she repeated.  Do you name the traitors?  I do not believe in
 years; the calendar is a delusion.
 
 You must be right, madam, replied the Prince.  For six years that we
 have been good friends, I have observed you to grow younger.
 
 Flatterer! cried she, and then with a change, But why should I say
 so, she added, when I protest I think the same?  A week ago I had a
 council with my father director, the glass; and the glass replied, Not
 yet!  I confess my face in this way once a month.  O! a very solemn
 moment.  Do you know what I shall do when the mirror answers, Now?
 
 I cannot guess, said he.
 
 No more can I, returned the Countess.  There is such a choice!
 Suicide, gambling, a nunnery, a volume of memoirs, or politicsthe last,
 I am afraid.
 
 It is a dull trade, said Otto.
 
 Nay, she replied, it is a trade I rather like.  It is, after all,
 first cousin to gossip, which no one can deny to be amusing.  For
 instance, if I were to tell you that the Princess and the Baron rode out
 together daily to inspect the cannon, it is either a piece of politics or
 scandal, as I turn my phrase.  I am the alchemist that makes the
 transmutation.  They have been everywhere together since you left, she
 continued, brightening as she saw Otto darken; that is a poor snippet of
 malicious gossipand they were everywhere cheeredand with that addition
 all becomes political intelligence.
 
 Let us change the subject, said Otto.
 
 I was about to propose it, she replied, or rather to pursue the
 politics.  Do you know? this war is popularpopular to the length of
 cheering Princess Seraphina.
 
 All things, madam, are possible, said the Prince; and this among
 others, that we may be going into war, but I give you my word of honour I
 do not know with whom.
 
 And you put up with it? she cried.  I have no pretensions to morality;
 and I confess I have always abominated the lamb, and nourished a romantic
 feeling for the wolf.  O, be done with lambiness!  Let us see there is a
 prince, for I am weary of the distaff.
 
 Madam, said Otto, I thought you were of that faction.
 
 I should be of yours, _mon Prince_, if you had one, she retorted.  Is
 it true that you have no ambition?  There was a man once in England whom
 they call the kingmaker.  Do you know, she added, I fancy I could make
 a prince?
 
 Some day, madam, said Otto, I may ask you to help make a farmer.
 
 Is that a riddle? asked the Countess.
 
 It is, replied the Prince, and a very good one too.
 
 Tit for tat.  I will ask you another, she returned.  Where is
 Gondremark?
 
 The Prime Minister?  In the prime-ministry, no doubt, said Otto.
 
 Precisely, said the Countess; and she pointed with her fan to the door
 of the Princesss apartments.  You and I, _mon Prince_, are in the
 ante-room.  You think me unkind, she added.  Try me and you will see.
 Set me a task, put me a question; there is no enormity I am not capable
 of doing to oblige you, and no secret that I am not ready to betray.
 
 Nay, madam, but I respect my friend too much, he answered, kissing her
 hand.  I would rather remain ignorant of all.  We fraternise like foemen
 soldiers at the outposts, but let each be true to his own army.
 
 Ah, she cried, if all men were generous like you, it would be worth
 while to be a woman!  Yet, judging by her looks, his generosity, if
 anything, had disappointed her; she seemed to seek a remedy, and, having
 found it, brightened once more.  And now, she said, may I dismiss my
 sovereign?  This is rebellion and a _cas pendable_; but what am I to do?
 My bear is jealous!
 
 Madam, enough! cried Otto.  Ahasuerus reaches you the sceptre; more,
 he will obey you in all points.  I should have been a dog to come to
 whistling.
 
 And so the Prince departed, and fluttered round Grafinski and von
 Eisenthal.  But the Countess knew the use of her offensive weapons, and
 had left a pleasant arrow in the Princes heart.  That Gondremark was
 jealoushere was an agreeable revenge!  And Madame von Rosen, as the
 occasion of the jealousy, appeared to him in a new light.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V. . . GONDREMARK IS IN MY LADYS CHAMBER
 
 
 The Countess von Rosen spoke the truth.  The great Prime Minister of
 Grnewald was already closeted with Seraphina.  The toilet was over; and
 the Princess, tastefully arrayed, sat face to face with a tall mirror.
 Sir Johns description was unkindly true, true in terms and yet a libel,
 a misogynistic masterpiece.  Her forehead was perhaps too high, but it
 became her; her figure somewhat stooped, but every detail was formed and
 finished like a gem; her hand, her foot, her ear, the set of her comely
 head, were all dainty and accordant; if she was not beautiful, she was
 vivid, changeful, coloured, and pretty with a thousand various
 prettinesses; and her eyes, if they indeed rolled too consciously, yet
 rolled to purpose.  They were her most attractive feature, yet they
 continually bore eloquent false witness to her thoughts; for while she
 herself, in the depths of her immature, unsoftened heart, was given
 altogether to manlike ambition and the desire of power, the eyes were by
 turns bold, inviting, fiery, melting, and artful, like the eyes of a
 rapacious siren.  And artful, in a sense, she was.  Chafing that she was
 not a man, and could not shine by action, she had conceived a womans
 part, of answerable domination; she sought to subjugate for by-ends, to
 rain influence and be fancy free; and, while she loved not man, loved to
 see man obey her.  It is a common girls ambition.  Such was perhaps that
 lady of the glove, who sent her lover to the lions.  But the snare is
 laid alike for male and female, and the world most artfully contrived.
 
 Near her, in a low chair, Gondremark had arranged his limbs into a
 cat-like attitude, high-shouldered, stooping, and submiss.  The
 formidable blue jowl of the man, and the dull bilious eye, set perhaps a
 higher value on his evident desire to please.  His face was marked by
 capacity, temper, and a kind of bold, piratical dishonesty which it would
 be calumnious to call deceit.  His manners, as he smiled upon the
 Princess, were over-fine, yet hardly elegant.
 
 Possibly, said the Baron, I should now proceed to take my leave.  I
 must not keep my sovereign in the ante-room.  Let us come at once to a
 decision.
 
 It cannot, cannot be put off? she asked.
 
 It is impossible, answered Gondremark.  Your Highness sees it for
 herself.  In the earlier stages, we might imitate the serpent; but for
 the ultimatum, there is no choice but to be bold like lions.  Had the
 Prince chosen to remain away, it had been better; but we have gone too
 far forward to delay.
 
 What can have brought him? she cried.  To-day of all days?
 
 The marplot, madam, has the instinct of his nature, returned
 Gondremark.  But you exaggerate the peril.  Think, madam, how far we
 have prospered, and against what odds!  Shall a Featherhead?but no!
 And he blew upon his fingers lightly with a laugh.
 
 Featherhead, she replied, is still the Prince of Grnewald.
 
 On your sufferance only, and so long as you shall please to be
 indulgent, said the Baron.  There are rights of nature; power to the
 powerful is the law.  If he shall think to cross your destinywell, you
 have heard of the brazen and the earthen pot.
 
 Do you call me pot?  You are ungallant, Baron, laughed the Princess.
 
 Before we are done with your glory, I shall have called you by many
 different titles, he replied.
 
 The girl flushed with pleasure.  But Frdric is still the Prince,
 _monsieur le flatteur_, she said.  You do not propose a revolution?you
 of all men?
 
 Dear madam, when it is already made! he cried.  The Prince reigns
 indeed in the almanac; but my Princess reigns and rules.  And he looked
 at her with a fond admiration that made the heart of Seraphina swell.
 Looking on her huge slave, she drank the intoxicating joys of power.
 Meanwhile he continued, with that sort of massive archness that so ill
 became him, She has but one fault; there is but one danger in the great
 career that I foresee for her.  May I name it? may I be so irreverent?
 It is in herselfher heart is soft.
 
 Her courage is faint, Baron, said the Princess.  Suppose we have
 judged ill, suppose we were defeated?
 
 Defeated, madam? returned the Baron, with a touch of ill-humour.  Is
 the dog defeated by the hare?  Our troops are all cantoned along the
 frontier; in five hours the vanguard of five thousand bayonets shall be
 hammering on the gates of Brandenau; and in all Gerolstein there are not
 fifteen hundred men who can manuvre.  It is as simple as a sum.  There
 can be no resistance.
 
 It is no great exploit, she said.  Is that what you call glory?  It is
 like beating a child.
 
 The courage, madam, is diplomatic, he replied.  We take a grave step;
 we fix the eyes of Europe, for the first time, on Grnewald; and in the
 negotiations of the next three months, mark me, we stand or fall.  It is
 there, madam, that I shall have to depend upon your counsels, he added,
 almost gloomily.  If I had not seen you at work, if I did not know the
 fertility of your mind, I own I should tremble for the consequence.  But
 it is in this field that men must recognise their inability.  All the
 great negotiators, when they have not been women, have had women at their
 elbows.  Madame de Pompadour was ill served; she had not found her
 Gondremark; but what a mighty politician!  Catherine de Medici, too,
 what justice of sight, what readiness of means, what elasticity against
 defeat!  But alas! madam, her Featherheads were her own children; and she
 had that one touch of vulgarity, that one trait of the good-wife, that
 she suffered family ties and affections to confine her liberty.
 
 These singular views of history, strictly _ad usum Seraphin_, did not
 weave their usual soothing spell over the Princess.  It was plain that
 she had taken a momentary distaste to her own resolutions; for she
 continued to oppose her counsellor, looking upon him out of half-closed
 eyes and with the shadow of a sneer upon her lips.  What boys men are!
 she said; what lovers of big words!  Courage, indeed!  If you had to
 scour pans, Herr Von Gondremark, you would call it, I suppose, Domestic
 Courage?
 
 I would, madam, said the Baron stoutly, if I scoured them well.  I
 would put a good name upon a virtue; you will not overdo it: they are not
 so enchanting in themselves.
 
 Well, but let me see, she said.  I wish to understand your courage.
 Why we asked leave, like children!  Our grannie in Berlin, our uncle in
 Vienna, the whole family, have patted us on the head and sent us forward.
 Courage?  I wonder when I hear you!
 
 My Princess is unlike herself, returned the Baron.  She has forgotten
 where the peril lies.  True, we have received encouragement on every
 hand; but my Princess knows too well on what untenable conditions; and
 she knows besides how, in the publicity of the diet, these whispered
 conferences are forgotten and disowned.  The danger is very realhe
 raged inwardly at having to blow the very coal he had been
 quenchingnone the less real in that it is not precisely military, but
 for that reason the easier to be faced.  Had we to count upon your
 troops, although I share your Highnesss expectations of the conduct of
 Alvenau, we cannot forget that he has not been proved in chief command.
 But where negotiation is concerned, the conduct lies with us; and with
 your help, I laugh at danger.
 
 It may be so, said Seraphina, sighing.  It is elsewhere that I see
 danger.  The people, these abominable peoplesuppose they should
 instantly rebel?  What a figure we should make in the eyes of Europe to
 have undertaken an invasion while my own throne was tottering to its
 fall!
 
 Nay, madam, said Gondremark, smiling, here you are beneath yourself.
 What is it that feeds their discontent?  What but the taxes?  Once we
 have seized Gerolstein, the taxes are remitted, the sons return covered
 with renown, the houses are adorned with pillage, each tastes his little
 share of military glory, and behold us once again a happy family!  Ay,
 they will say, in each others long ears, the Princess knew what she was
 about; she was in the right of it; she has a head upon her shoulders; and
 here we are, you see, better off than before.  But why should I say all
 this?  It is what my Princess pointed out to me herself; it was by these
 reasons that she converted me to this adventure.
 
 I think, Herr von Gondremark, said Seraphina, somewhat tartly, you
 often attribute your own sagacity to your Princess.
 
 For a second Gondremark staggered under the shrewdness of the attack; the
 next, he had perfectly recovered.  Do I? he said.  It is very
 possible.  I have observed a similar tendency in your Highness.
 
 It was so openly spoken, and appeared so just, that Seraphina breathed
 again.  Her vanity had been alarmed, and the greatness of the relief
 improved her spirits.  Well, she said, all this is little to the
 purpose.  We are keeping Frdric without, and I am still ignorant of our
 line of battle.  Come, co-admiral, let us consult. . . . How am I to
 receive him now?  And what are we to do if he should appear at the
 council?
 
 Now, he answered.  I shall leave him to my Princess for just now!  I
 have seen her at work.  Send him off to his theatricals!  But in all
 gentleness, he added.  Would it, for instance, would it displease my
 sovereign to affect a headache?
 
 Never! said she.  The woman who can manage, like the man who can
 fight, must never shrink from an encounter.  The knight must not disgrace
 his weapons.
 
 Then let me pray my _belle dame sans merci_, he returned, to affect
 the only virtue that she lacks.  Be pitiful to the poor young man; affect
 an interest in his hunting; be weary of politics; find in his society, as
 it were, a grateful repose from dry considerations.  Does my Princess
 authorise the line of battle?
 
 Well, that is a trifle, answered Seraphina.  The councilthere is the
 point.
 
 The council? cried Gondremark.  Permit me, madam.  And he rose and
 proceeded to flutter about the room, counterfeiting Otto both in voice
 and gesture not unhappily.  What is there to-day, Herr von Gondremark?
 Ah, Herr Cancellarius, a new wig!  You cannot deceive me; I know every
 wig in Grnewald; I have the sovereigns eye.  What are these papers
 about?  O, I see.  O, certainly.  Surely, surely.  I wager none of you
 remarked that wig.  By all means.  I know nothing about that.  Dear me,
 are there as many as all that?  Well, you can sign them; you have the
 procuration.  You see, Herr Cancellarius, I knew your wig.  And so,
 concluded Gondremark, resuming his own voice, our sovereign, by the
 particular grace of God, enlightens and supports his privy councillors.
 
 But when the Baron turned to Seraphina for approval, he found her frozen.
 You are pleased to be witty, Herr von Gondremark, she said, and have
 perhaps forgotten where you are.  But these rehearsals are apt to be
 misleading.  Your master, the Prince of Grnewald, is sometimes more
 exacting.
 
 Gondremark cursed her in his soul.  Of all injured vanities, that of the
 reproved buffoon is the most savage; and when grave issues are involved,
 these petty stabs become unbearable.  But Gondremark was a man of iron;
 he showed nothing; he did not even, like the common trickster, retreat
 because he had presumed, but held to his point bravely.  Madam, he
 said, if, as you say, he prove exacting, we must take the bull by the
 horns.
 
 We shall see, she said, and she arranged her skirt like one about to
 rise.  Temper, scorn, disgust, all the more acrid feelings, became her
 like jewels; and she now looked her best.
 
 Pray God they quarrel, thought Gondremark.  The damned minx may fail
 me yet, unless they quarrel.  It is time to let him in.  Zzfight, dogs!
 Consequent on these reflections, he bent a stiff knee and chivalrously
 kissed the Princesss hand.  My Princess, he said, must now dismiss
 her servant.  I have much to arrange against the hour of council.
 
 Go, she said, and rose.
 
 And as Gondremark tripped out of a private door, she touched a bell, and
 gave the order to admit the Prince.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VITHE PRINCE DELIVERS A LECTURE ON MARRIAGE, WITH PRACTICAL
 ILLUSTRATIONS OF DIVORCE
 
 
 With what a world of excellent intentions Otto entered his wifes
 cabinet! how fatherly, how tender! how morally affecting were the words
 he had prepared!  Nor was Seraphina unamiably inclined.  Her usual fear
 of Otto as a marplot in her great designs was now swallowed up in a
 passing distrust of the designs themselves.  For Gondremark, besides, she
 had conceived an angry horror.  In her heart she did not like the Baron.
 Behind his impudent servility, behind the devotion which, with indelicate
 delicacy, he still forced on her attention, she divined the grossness of
 his nature.  So a man may be proud of having tamed a bear, and yet sicken
 at his captives odour.  And above all, she had certain jealous
 intimations that the man was false and the deception double.  True, she
 falsely trifled with his love; but he, perhaps, was only trifling with
 her vanity.  The insolence of his late mimicry, and the odium of her own
 position as she sat and watched it, lay besides like a load upon her
 conscience.  She met Otto almost with a sense of guilt, and yet she
 welcomed him as a deliverer from ugly things.
 
 But the wheels of an interview are at the mercy of a thousand ruts; and
 even at Ottos entrance, the first jolt occurred.  Gondremark, he saw,
 was gone; but there was the chair drawn close for consultation; and it
 pained him not only that this man had been received, but that he should
 depart with such an air of secrecy.  Struggling with this twinge, it was
 somewhat sharply that he dismissed the attendant who had brought him in.
 
 You make yourself at home, _chez moi_, she said, a little ruffled both
 by his tone of command and by the glance he had thrown upon the chair.
 
 Madam, replied Otto, I am here so seldom that I have almost the rights
 of a stranger.
 
 You choose your own associates, Frdric, she said.
 
 I am here to speak of it, he returned.  It is now four years since we
 were married; and these four years, Seraphina, have not perhaps been
 happy either for you or for me.  I am well aware I was unsuitable to be
 your husband.  I was not young, I had no ambition, I was a trifler; and
 you despised me, I dare not say unjustly.  But to do justice on both
 sides, you must bear in mind how I have acted.  When I found it amused
 you to play the part of Princess on this little stage, did I not
 immediately resign to you my box of toys, this Grnewald?  And when I
 found I was distasteful as a husband, could any husband have been less
 intrusive?  You will tell me that I have no feelings, no preference, and
 thus no credit; that I go before the wind; that all this was in my
 character.  And indeed, one thing is true, that it is easy, too easy, to
 leave things undone.  But Seraphina, I begin to learn it is not always
 wise.  If I were too old and too uncongenial for your husband, I should
 still have remembered that I was the Prince of that country to which you
 came, a visitor and a child.  In that relation also there were duties,
 and these duties I have not performed.
 
 To claim the advantage of superior age is to give sure offence.  Duty!
 laughed Seraphina, and on your lips, Frdric!  You make me laugh.  What
 fancy is this?  Go, flirt with the maids and be a prince in Dresden
 china, as you look.  Enjoy yourself, _mon enfant_, and leave duty and the
 state to us.
 
 The plural grated on the Prince.  I have enjoyed myself too much, he
 said, since enjoyment is the word.  And yet there were much to say upon
 the other side.  You must suppose me desperately fond of hunting.  But
 indeed there were days when I found a great deal of interest in what it
 was courtesy to call my government.  And I have always had some claim to
 taste; I could tell live happiness from dull routine; and between
 hunting, and the throne of Austria, and your society, my choice had never
 wavered, had the choice been mine.  You were a girl, a bud, when you were
 given me
 
 Heavens! she cried, is this to be a love-scene?
 
 I am never ridiculous, he said; it is my only merit; and you may be
 certain this shall be a scene of marriage _ la mode_.  But when I
 remember the beginning, it is bare courtesy to speak in sorrow.  Be just,
 madam: you would think me strangely uncivil to recall these days without
 the decency of a regret.  Be yet a little juster, and own, if only in
 complaisance, that you yourself regret that past.
 
 I have nothing to regret, said the Princess.  You surprise me.  I
 thought you were so happy.
 
 Happy and happy, there are so many hundred ways, said Otto.  A man may
 be happy in revolt; he may be happy in sleep; wine, change, and travel
 make him happy; virtue, they say, will do the likeI have not tried; and
 they say also that in old, quiet, and habitual marriages there is yet
 another happiness.  Happy, yes; I am happy if you like; but I will tell
 you frankly, I was happier when I brought you home.
 
 Well, said the Princess, not without constraint, it seems you changed
 your mind.
 
 Not I, returned Otto, I never changed.  Do you remember, Seraphina, on
 our way home, when you saw the roses in the lane, and I got out and
 plucked them?  It was a narrow lane between great trees; the sunset at
 the end was all gold, and the rooks were flying overhead.  There were
 nine, nine red roses; you gave me a kiss for each, and I told myself that
 every rose and every kiss should stand for a year of love.  Well, in
 eighteen months there was an end.  But do you fancy, Seraphina, that my
 heart has altered?
 
 I am sure I cannot tell, she said, like an automaton.
 
 It has not, the Prince continued.  There is nothing ridiculous, even
 from a husband, in a love that owns itself unhappy and that asks no more.
 I built on sand; pardon me, I do not breathe a reproachI built, I
 suppose, upon my own infirmities; but I put my heart in the building, and
 it still lies among the ruins.
 
 How very poetical! she said, with a little choking laugh, unknown
 relentings, unfamiliar softnesses, moving within her.  What would you be
 at? she added, hardening her voice.
 
 I would be at this, he answered; and hard it is to say.  I would be at
 this:Seraphina, I am your husband after all, and a poor fool that loves
 you.  Understand, he cried almost fiercely, I am no suppliant husband;
 what your love refuses I would scorn to receive from your pity.  I do not
 ask, I would not take it.  And for jealousy, what ground have I?  A
 dog-in-the-manger jealousy is a thing the dogs may laugh at.  But at
 least, in the worlds eye, I am still your husband; and I ask you if you
 treat me fairly?  I keep to myself, I leave you free, I have given you in
 everything your will.  What do you in return?  I find, Seraphina, that
 you have been too thoughtless.  But between persons such as we are, in
 our conspicuous station, particular care and a particular courtesy are
 owing.  Scandal is perhaps not easy to avoid; but it is hard to bear.
 
 Scandal! she cried, with a deep breath.  Scandal!  It is for this you
 have been driving!
 
 I have tried to tell you how I feel, he replied.  I have told you that
 I love youlove you in vaina bitter thing for a husband; I have laid
 myself open that I might speak without offence.  And now that I have
 begun, I will go on and finish.
 
 I demand it, she said.  What is this about?
 
 Otto flushed crimson.  I have to say what I would fain not, he
 answered.  I counsel you to see less of Gondremark.
 
 Of Gondremark?  And why? she asked.
 
 Your intimacy is the ground of scandal, madam, said Otto, firmly
 enoughof a scandal that is agony to me, and would be crushing to your
 parents if they knew it.
 
 You are the first to bring me word of it, said she.  I thank you.
 
 You have perhaps cause, he replied.  Perhaps I am the only one among
 your friends
 
 O, leave my friends alone, she interrupted.  My friends are of a
 different stamp.  You have come to me here and made a parade of
 sentiment.  When have I last seen you?  I have governed your kingdom for
 you in the meanwhile, and there I got no help.  At last, when I am weary
 with a mans work, and you are weary of your playthings, you return to
 make me a scene of conjugal reproachesthe grocer and his wife!  The
 positions are too much reversed; and you should understand, at least,
 that I cannot at the same time do your work of government and behave
 myself like a little girl.  Scandal is the atmosphere in which we live,
 we princes; it is what a prince should know.  You play an odious part.
 Do you believe this rumour?
 
 Madam, should I be here? said Otto.
 
 It is what I want to know! she cried, the tempest of her scorn
 increasing.  Suppose you didI say, suppose you did believe it?
 
 I should make it my business to suppose the contrary, he answered.
 
 I thought so.  O, you are made of baseness! said she.
 
 Madam, he cried, roused at last, enough of this.  You wilfully
 misunderstand my attitude; you outwear my patience.  In the name of your
 parents, in my own name, I summon you to be more circumspect.
 
 Is this a request, _monsieur mon mari_? she demanded.
 
 Madam, if I chose, I might command, said Otto.
 
 You might, sir, as the law stands, make me prisoner, returned
 Seraphina.  Short of that you will gain nothing.
 
 You will continue as before? he asked.
 
 Precisely as before, said she.  As soon as this comedy is over, I
 shall request the Freiherr von Gondremark to visit me.  Do you
 understand? she added, rising.  For my part, I have done.
 
 I will then ask the favour of your hand, madam, said Otto, palpitating
 in every pulse with anger.  I have to request that you will visit in my
 society another part of my poor house.  And reassure yourselfit will not
 take longand it is the last obligation that you shall have the chance to
 lay me under.
 
 The last? she cried.  Most joyfully?
 
 She offered her hand, and he took it; on each side with an elaborate
 affectation, each inwardly incandescent.  He led her out by the private
 door, following where Gondremark had passed; they threaded a corridor or
 two, little frequented, looking on a court, until they came at last into
 the Princes suite.  The first room was an armoury, hung all about with
 the weapons of various countries, and looking forth on the front terrace.
 
 Have you brought me here to slay me? she inquired.
 
 I have brought you, madam, only to pass on, replied Otto.
 
 Next they came to a library, where an old chamberlain sat half asleep.
 He rose and bowed before the princely couple, asking for orders.
 
 You will attend us here, said Otto.
 
 The next stage was a gallery of pictures, where Seraphinas portrait hung
 conspicuous, dressed for the chase, red roses in her hair, as Otto, in
 the first months of marriage, had directed.  He pointed to it without a
 word; she raised her eyebrows in silence; and they passed still forward
 into a matted corridor where four doors opened.  One led to Ottos
 bedroom; one was the private door to Seraphinas.  And here, for the
 first time, Otto left her hand, and stepping forward, shot the bolt.
 
 It is long, madam, said he, since it was bolted on the other side.
 
 One was effectual, returned the Princess.  Is this all?
 
 Shall I reconduct you? he asking, bowing.
 
 I should prefer, she asked, in ringing tones, the conduct of the
 Freiherr von Gondremark.
 
 Otto summoned the chamberlain.  If the Freiherr von Gondremark is in the
 palace, he said, bid him attend the Princess here.  And when the
 official had departed, Can I do more to serve you, madam? the Prince
 asked.
 
 Thank you, no.  I have been much amused, she answered.
 
 I have now, continued Otto, given you your liberty complete.  This has
 been for you a miserable marriage.
 
 Miserable! said she.
 
 It has been made light to you; it shall be lighter still, continued the
 Prince.  But one thing, madam, you must still continue to bearmy
 fathers name, which is now yours.  I leave it in your hands.  Let me see
 you, since you will have no advice of mine, apply the more attention of
 your own to bear it worthily.
 
 Herr von Gondremark is long in coming, she remarked.
 
 O Seraphina, Seraphina! he cried.  And that was the end of their
 interview.
 
 She tripped to a window and looked out; and a little after, the
 chamberlain announced the Freiherr von Gondremark, who entered with
 something of a wild eye and changed complexion, confounded, as he was, at
 this unusual summons.  The Princess faced round from the window with a
 pearly smile; nothing but her heightened colour spoke of discomposure.
 
 Otto was pale, but he was otherwise master of himself.
 
 Herr von Gondremark, said he, oblige me so far: reconduct the Princess
 to her own apartment.
 
 The Baron, still all at sea, offered his hand, which was smilingly
 accepted, and the pair sailed forth through the picture-gallery.
 
 As soon as they were gone, and Otto knew the length and breadth of his
 miscarriage, and how he had done the contrary of all that he intended, he
 stood stupefied.  A fiasco so complete and sweeping was laughable, even
 to himself; and he laughed aloud in his wrath.  Upon this mood there
 followed the sharpest violence of remorse; and to that again, as he
 recalled his provocation, anger succeeded afresh.  So he was tossed in
 spirit; now bewailing his inconsequence and lack of temper, now flaming
 up in white-hot indignation and a noble pity for himself.
 
 He paced his apartment like a leopard.  There was danger in Otto, for a
 flash.  Like a pistol, he could kill at one moment, and the next he might
 he kicked aside.  But just then, as he walked the long floors in his
 alternate humours, tearing his handkerchief between his hands, he was
 strung to his top note, every nerve attent.  The pistol, you might say,
 was charged.  And when jealousy from time to time fetched him a lash
 across the tenderest of his feeling, and sent a string of her
 fire-pictures glancing before his minds eye, the contraction of his face
 was even dangerous.  He disregarded jealousys inventions, yet they
 stung.  In this height of anger, he still preserved his faith in
 Seraphinas innocence; but the thought of her possible misconduct was the
 bitterest ingredient in his pot of sorrow.
 
 There came a knock at the door, and the chamberlain brought him a note.
 He took it and ground it in his hand, continuing his march, continuing
 his bewildered thoughts; and some minutes had gone by before the
 circumstance came clearly to his mind.  Then he paused and opened it.  It
 was a pencil scratch from Gotthold, thus conceived:
 
     The council is privately summoned at once.
 
                                                                  G. v. H.
 
 If the council was thus called before the hour, and that privately, it
 was plain they feared his interference.  Feared: here was a sweet
 thought.  Gotthold, tooGotthold, who had always used and regarded him as
 a mere peasant lad, had now been at the pains to warn him; Gotthold
 looked for something at his hands.  Well, none should be disappointed;
 the Prince, too long beshadowed by the uxorious lover, should now return
 and shine.  He summoned his valet, repaired the disorder of his
 appearance with elaborate care; and then, curled and scented and adorned,
 Prince Charming in every line, but with a twitching nostril, he set forth
 unattended for the council.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIITHE PRINCE DISSOLVES THE COUNCIL
 
 
 It was as Gotthold wrote.  The liberation of Sir John, Greisengesangs
 uneasy narrative, last of all, the scene between Seraphina and the
 Prince, had decided the conspirators to take a step of bold timidity.
 There had been a period of bustle, liveried messengers speeding here and
 there with notes; and at half-past ten in the morning, about an hour
 before its usual hour, the council of Grnewald sat around the board.
 
 It was not a large body.  At the instance of Gondremark, it had undergone
 a strict purgation, and was now composed exclusively of tools.  Three
 secretaries sat at a side-table.  Seraphina took the head; on her right
 was the Baron, on her left Greisengesang; below these Grafinski the
 treasurer, Count Eisenthal, a couple of non-combatants, and, to the
 surprise of all, Gotthold.  He had been named a privy councillor by Otto,
 merely that he might profit by the salary; and as he was never known to
 attend a meeting, it had occurred to nobody to cancel his appointment.
 His present appearance was the more ominous, coming when it did.
 Gondremark scowled upon him; and the non-combatant on his right,
 intercepting this black look, edged away from one who was so clearly out
 of favour.
 
 The hour presses, your Highness, said the Baron; may we proceed to
 business?
 
 At once, replied Seraphina.
 
 Your Highness will pardon me, said Gotthold; but you are still,
 perhaps, unacquainted with the fact that Prince Otto has returned.
 
 The Prince will not attend the council, replied Seraphina, with a
 momentary blush.  The despatches, Herr Cancellarius?  There is one for
 Gerolstein?
 
 A secretary brought a paper.
 
 Here, madam, said Greisengesang.  Shall I read it?
 
 We are all familiar with its terms, replied Gondremark.  Your Highness
 approves?
 
 Unhesitatingly, said Seraphina.
 
 It may then be held as read, concluded the Baron.  Will your Highness
 sign?
 
 The Princess did so; Gondremark, Eisenthal, and one of the non-combatants
 followed suit; and the paper was then passed across the table to the
 librarian.  He proceeded leisurely to read.
 
 We have no time to spare, Herr Doctor, cried the Baron brutally.  If
 you do not choose to sign on the authority of your sovereign, pass it on.
 Or you may leave the table, he added, his temper ripping out.
 
 I decline your invitation, Herr von Gondremark; and my sovereign, as I
 continue to observe with regret, is still absent from the board, replied
 the Doctor calmly; and he resumed the perusal of the paper, the rest
 chafing and exchanging glances.  Madame and gentlemen, he said, at
 last, what I hold in my hand is simply a declaration of war.
 
 Simply, said Seraphina, flashing defiance.
 
 The sovereign of this country is under the same roof with us, continued
 Gotthold, and I insist he shall be summoned.  It is needless to adduce
 my reasons; you are all ashamed at heart of this projected treachery.
 
 The council waved like a sea.  There were various outcries.
 
 You insult the Princess, thundered Gondremark.
 
 I maintain my protest, replied Gotthold.
 
 At the height of this confusion the door was thrown open; an usher
 announced, Gentlemen, the Prince! and Otto, with his most excellent
 bearing, entered the apartment.  It was like oil upon the troubled
 waters; every one settled instantly into his place, and Griesengesang, to
 give himself a countenance, became absorbed in the arrangement of his
 papers; but in their eagerness to dissemble, one and all neglected to
 rise.
 
 Gentlemen, said the Prince, pausing.
 
 They all got to their feet in a moment; and this reproof still further
 demoralised the weaker brethren.
 
 The Prince moved slowly towards the lower end of the table; then he
 paused again, and, fixing his eye on Greisengesang, How comes it, Herr
 Cancellarius, he asked, that I have received no notice of the change of
 hour?
 
 Your Highness, replied the Chancellor, her Highness the Princess . . .
  and there paused.
 
 I understood, said Seraphina, taking him up, that you did not purpose
 to be present.
 
 Their eyes met for a second, and Seraphinas fell; but her anger only
 burned the brighter for that private shame.
 
 And now, gentlemen, said Otto, taking his chair, I pray you to be
 seated.  I have been absent: there are doubtless some arrears; but ere we
 proceed to business, Herr Grafinski, you will direct four thousand crowns
 to be sent to me at once.  Make a note, if you please, he added, as the
 treasurer still stared in wonder.
 
 Four thousand crowns? asked Seraphina.  Pray, for what?
 
 Madam, returned Otto, smiling, for my own purposes.
 
 Gondremark spurred up Grafinski underneath the table.
 
 If your Highness will indicate the destination . . .  began the puppet.
 
 You are not here, sir, to interrogate your Prince, said Otto.
 
 Grafinski looked for help to his commander; and Gondremark came to his
 aid, in suave and measured tones.
 
 Your Highness may reasonably be surprised, he said; and Herr
 Grafinski, although I am convinced he is clear of the intention of
 offending, would have perhaps done better to begin with an explanation.
 The resources of the state are at the present moment entirely swallowed
 up, or, as we hope to prove, wisely invested.  In a month from now, I do
 not question we shall be able to meet any command your Highness may lay
 upon us; but at this hour I fear that, even in so small a matter, he must
 prepare himself for disappointment.  Our zeal is no less, although our
 power may be inadequate.
 
 How much, Herr Grafinski, have we in the treasury? asked Otto.
 
 Your Highness, protested the treasurer, we have immediate need of
 every crown.
 
 I think, sir, you evade me, flashed the Prince; and then turning to the
 side-table, Mr. Secretary, he added, bring me, if you please, the
 treasury docket.
 
 Herr Grafinski became deadly pale; the Chancellor, expecting his own
 turn, was probably engaged in prayer; Gondremark was watching like a
 ponderous cat.  Gotthold, on his part, looked on with wonder at his
 cousin; he was certainly showing spirit, but what, in such a time of
 gravity, was all this talk of money? and why should he waste his strength
 upon a personal issue?
 
 I find, said Otto, with his finger on the docket, that we have 20,000
 crowns in case.
 
 That is exact, your Highness, replied the Baron.  But our liabilities,
 all of which are happily not liquid, amount to a far larger sum; and at
 the present point of time it would be morally impossible to divert a
 single florin.  Essentially, the case is empty.  We have, already
 presented, a large note for material of war.
 
 Material of war? exclaimed Otto, with an excellent assumption of
 surprise.  But if my memory serves me right, we settled these accounts
 in January.
 
 There have been further orders, the Baron explained.  A new park of
 artillery has been completed; five hundred stand of arms, seven hundred
 baggage mulesthe details are in a special memorandum.Mr. Secretary
 Holtz, the memorandum, if you please.
 
 One would think, gentlemen, that we were going to war, said Otto.
 
 We are, said Seraphina.
 
 War! cried the Prince, and, gentlemen, with whom?  The peace of
 Grnewald has endured for centuries.  What aggression, what insult, have
 we suffered?
 
 Here, your Highness, said Gotthold, is the ultimatum.  It was in the
 very article of signature, when your Highness so opportunely entered.
 
 Otto laid the paper before him; as he read, his fingers played tattoo
 upon the table.  Was it proposed, he inquired, to send this paper
 forth without a knowledge of my pleasure?
 
 One of the non-combatants, eager to trim, volunteered an answer.  The
 Herr Doctor von Hohenstockwitz had just entered his dissent, he added.
 
 Give me the rest of this correspondence, said the Prince.  It was
 handed to him, and he read it patiently from end to end, while the
 councillors sat foolishly enough looking before them on the table.
 
 The secretaries, in the background, were exchanging glances of delight; a
 row at the council was for them a rare and welcome feature.
 
 Gentlemen, said Otto, when he had finished, I have read with pain.
 This claim upon Obermnsterol is palpably unjust; it has not a tincture,
 not a show, of justice.  There is not in all this ground enough for
 after-dinner talk, and you propose to force it as a _casus belli_.
 
 Certainly, your Highness, returned Gondremark, too wise to defend the
 indefensible, the claim on Obermnsterol is simply a pretext.
 
 It is well, said the Prince.  Herr Cancellarius, take your pen.  The
 council, he began to dictateI withhold all notice of my intervention,
 he said, in parenthesis, and addressing himself more directly to his
 wife; and I say nothing of the strange suppression by which this
 business has been smuggled past my knowledge.  I am content to be in
 timeThe council, he resumed, on a further examination of the facts,
 and enlightened by the note in the last despatch from Gerolstein, have
 the pleasure to announce that they are entirely at one, both as to fact
 and sentiment, with the Grand-Ducal Court of Gerolstein.  You have it?
 Upon these lines, sir, you will draw up the despatch.
 
 If your Highness will allow me, said the Baron, your Highness is so
 imperfectly acquainted with the internal history of this correspondence,
 that any interference will be merely hurtful.  Such a paper as your
 Highness proposes would be to stultify the whole previous policy of
 Grnewald.
 
 The policy of Grnewald! cried the Prince.  One would suppose you had
 no sense of humour!  Would you fish in a coffee cup?
 
 With deference, your Highness, returned the Baron, even in a coffee
 cup there may be poison.  The purpose of this war is not simply
 territorial enlargement; still less is it a war of glory; for, as your
 Highness indicates, the state of Grnewald is too small to be ambitious.
 But the body politic is seriously diseased; republicanism, socialism,
 many disintegrating ideas are abroad; circle within circle, a really
 formidable organisation has grown up about your Highnesss throne.
 
 I have heard of it, Herr von Gondremark, put in the Prince; but I have
 reason to be aware that yours is the more authoritative information.
 
 I am honoured by this expression of my Princes confidence returned
 Gondremark, unabashed.  It is, therefore, with a single eye to these
 disorders that our present external policy has been shaped.  Something
 was required to divert public attention, to employ the idle, to
 popularise your Highnesss rule, and, if it were possible, to enable him
 to reduce the taxes at a blow and to a notable amount.  The proposed
 expeditionfor it cannot without hyperbole be called a warseemed to the
 council to combine the various characters required; a marked improvement
 in the public sentiment has followed even upon our preparations; and I
 cannot doubt that when success shall follow, the effect will surpass even
 our boldest hopes.
 
 You are very adroit, Herr von Gondremark, said Otto.  You fill me with
 admiration.  I had not heretofore done justice to your qualities.
 
 Seraphina looked up with joy, supposing Otto conquered; but Gondremark
 still waited, armed at every point; he knew how very stubborn is the
 revolt of a weak character.
 
 And the territorial army scheme, to which I was persuaded to consentwas
 it secretly directed to the same end? the Prince asked.
 
 I still believe the effect to have been good, replied the Baron;
 discipline and mounting guard are excellent sedatives.  But I will avow
 to your Highness, I was unaware, at the date of that decree, of the
 magnitude of the revolutionary movement; nor did any of us, I think,
 imagine that such a territorial army was a part of the republican
 proposals.
 
 It was? asked Otto.  Strange!  Upon what fancied grounds?
 
 The grounds were indeed fanciful, returned the Baron.  It was
 conceived among the leaders that a territorial army, drawn from and
 returning to the people, would, in the event of any popular uprising,
 prove lukewarm or unfaithful to the throne.
 
 I see, said the Prince.  I begin to understand.
 
 His Highness begins to understand? repeated Gondremark, with the
 sweetest politeness.  May I beg of him to complete the phrase?
 
 The history of the revolution, replied Otto dryly.  And now, he
 added, what do you conclude?
 
 I conclude, your Highness, with a simple reflection, said the Baron,
 accepting the stab without a quiver, the war is popular; were the rumour
 contradicted to-morrow, a considerable disappointment would be felt in
 many classes; and in the present tension of spirits, the most lukewarm
 sentiment may be enough to precipitate events.  There lies the danger.
 The revolution hangs imminent; we sit, at this council board, below the
 sword of Damocles.
 
 We must then lay our heads together, said the Prince, and devise some
 honourable means of safety.
 
 Up to this moment, since the first note of opposition fell from the
 librarian, Seraphina had uttered about twenty words.  With a somewhat
 heightened colour, her eyes generally lowered, her foot sometimes
 nervously tapping on the floor, she had kept her own counsel and
 commanded her anger like a hero.  But at this stage of the engagement she
 lost control of her impatience.
 
 Means! she cried.  They have been found and prepared before you knew
 the need for them.  Sign the despatch, and let us be done with this
 delay.
 
 Madam, I said honourable, returned Otto, bowing.  This war is, in my
 eyes, and by Herr von Gondremarks account, an inadmissible expedient.
 If we have misgoverned here in Grnewald, are the people of Gerolstein to
 bleed and pay for our mis-doings?  Never, madam; not while I live.  But I
 attach so much importance to all that I have heard to-day for the first
 timeand why only to-day, I do not even stop to askthat I am eager to
 find some plan that I can follow with credit to myself.
 
 And should you fail? she asked.
 
 Should I fail, I will then meet the blow half-way, replied the Prince.
 On the first open discontent, I shall convoke the States, and, when it
 pleases them to bid me, abdicate.
 
 Seraphina laughed angrily.  This is the man for whom we have been
 labouring! she cried.  We tell him of change; he will devise the means,
 he says; and his device is abdication?  Sir, have you no shame to come
 here at the eleventh hour among those who have borne the heat and burthen
 of the day?  Do you not wonder at yourself?  I, sir, was here in my
 place, striving to uphold your dignity alone.  I took counsel with the
 wisest I could find, while you were eating and hunting.  I have laid my
 plans with foresight; they were ripe for action; and thenshe
 chokedthen you returnfor a forenoonto ruin all!  To-morrow, you will
 be once more about your pleasures; you will give us leave once more to
 think and work for you; and again you will come back, and again you will
 thwart what you had not the industry or knowledge to conceive.  O! it is
 intolerable.  Be modest, sir.  Do not presume upon the rank you cannot
 worthily uphold.  I would not issue my commands with so much gustoit is
 from no merit in yourself they are obeyed.  What are you?  What have you
 to do in this grave council?  Go, she cried, go among your equals?  The
 very people in the streets mock at you for a prince.
 
 At this surprising outburst the whole council sat aghast.
 
 Madam, said the Baron, alarmed out of his caution, command yourself.
 
 Address yourself to me, sir! cried the Prince.  I will not bear these
 whisperings!
 
 Seraphina burst into tears.
 
 Sir, cried the Baron, rising, this lady
 
 Herr von Gondremark, said the Prince, one more observation, and I
 place you under arrest.
 
 Your Highness is the master, replied Gondremark, bowing.
 
 Bear it in mind more constantly, said Otto.  Herr Cancellarius, bring
 all the papers to my cabinet.  Gentlemen, the council is dissolved.
 
 And he bowed and left the apartment, followed by Greisengesang and the
 secretaries, just at the moment when the Princesss ladies, summoned in
 all haste, entered by another door to help her forth.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIIITHE PARTY OF WAR TAKES ACTION
 
 
 Half an hour after, Gondremark was once more closeted with Seraphina.
 
 Where is he now? she asked, on his arrival.
 
 Madam, he is with the Chancellor, replied the Baron.  Wonder of
 wonders, he is at work!
 
 Ah, she said, he was born to torture me!  O what a fall, what a
 humiliation!  Such a scheme to wreck upon so small a trifle!  But now all
 is lost.
 
 Madam, said Gondremark, nothing is lost.  Something, on the other
 hand, is found.  You have found your senses; you see him as he issee him
 as you see everything where your too-good heart is not in questionwith
 the judicial, with the statesmans eye.  So long as he had a right to
 interfere, the empire that may be was still distant.  I have not entered
 on this course without the plain foresight of its dangers; and even for
 this I was prepared.  But, madam, I knew two things: I knew that you were
 born to command, that I was born to serve; I knew that by a rare
 conjuncture, the hand had found the tool; and from the first I was
 confident, as I am confident to-day, that no hereditary trifler has the
 power to shatter that alliance.
 
 I, born to command! she said.  Do you forget my tears?
 
 Madam, they were the tears of Alexander, cried the Baron.  They
 touched, they thrilled me; I, forgot myself a momenteven I!  But do you
 suppose that I had not remarked, that I had not admired, your previous
 bearing? your great self-command?  Ay, that was princely!  He paused.
 It was a thing to see.  I drank confidence!  I tried to imitate your
 calm.  And I was well inspired; in my heart, I think that I was well
 inspired; that any man, within the reach of argument, had been convinced!
 But it was not to be; nor, madam, do I regret the failure.  Let us be
 open; let me disclose my heart.  I have loved two things, not unworthily:
 Grnewald and my sovereign!  Here he kissed her hand.  Either I must
 resign my ministry, leave the land of my adoption and the queen whom I
 had chosen to obeyor  He paused again.
 
 Alas, Herr von Gondremark, there is no or, said Seraphina.
 
 Nay, madam, give me time, he replied.  When first I saw you, you were
 still young; not every man would have remarked your powers; but I had not
 been twice honoured by your conversation ere I had found my mistress.  I
 have, madam, I believe, some genius; and I have much ambition.  But the
 genius is of the serving kind; and to offer a career to my ambition, I
 had to find one born to rule.  This is the base and essence of our union;
 each had need of the other; each recognised, master and servant, lever
 and fulcrum, the complement of his endowment.  Marriages, they say, are
 made in heaven: how much more these pure, laborious, intellectual
 fellowships, born to found empires!  Nor is this all.  We found each
 other ripe, filled with great ideas that took shape and clarified with
 every word.  We grew togetheray, madam, in mind we grew together like
 twin children.  All of my life until we met was petty and groping; was it
 notI will flatter myself openlyit _was_ the same with you!  Not till
 then had you those eagle surveys, that wide and hopeful sweep of
 intuition!  Thus we had formed ourselves, and we were ready.
 
 It is true, she cried.  I feel it.  Yours is the genius; your
 generosity confounds your insight; all I could offer you was the
 position, was this throne, to be a fulcrum.  But I offered it without
 reserve; I entered at least warmly into all your thoughts; you were sure
 of mesure of my supportcertain of justice.  Tell me, tell me again,
 that I have helped you.
 
 Nay, madam, he said, you made me.  In everything you were my
 inspiration.  And as we prepared our policy, weighing every step, how
 often have I had to admire your perspicacity, your man-like diligence and
 fortitude!  You know that these are not the words of flattery; your
 conscience echoes them; have you spared a day? have you indulged yourself
 in any pleasure?  Young and beautiful, you have lived a life of high
 intellectual effort, of irksome intellectual patience with details.
 Well, you have your reward: with the fall of Brandenau, the throne of
 your Empire is founded.
 
 What thought have you in your mind? she asked.  Is not all ruined?
 
 Nay, my Princess, the same thought is in both our minds, he said.
 
 Herr von Gondremark, she replied, by all that I hold sacred, I have
 none; I do not think at all; I am crushed.
 
 You are looking at the passionate side of a rich nature, misunderstood
 and recently insulted, said the Baron.  Look into your intellect, and
 tell me.
 
 I find nothing, nothing but tumult, she replied.
 
 You find one word branded, madam, returned the Baron: Abdication!
 
 O! she cried.  The coward!  He leaves me to bear all, and in the hour
 of trial he stabs me from behind.  There is nothing in him, not respect,
 not love, not couragehis wife, his dignity, his throne, the honour of
 his father, he forgets them all!
 
 Yes, pursued the Baron, the word Abdication.  I perceive a glimmering
 there.
 
 I read your fancy, she returned.  It is mere madness, midsummer
 madness.  Baron, I am more unpopular than he.  You know it.  They can
 excuse, they can love, his weakness; but me, they hate.
 
 Such is the gratitude of peoples, said the Baron.  But we trifle.
 Here, madam, are my plain thoughts.  The man who in the hour of danger
 speaks of abdication is, for me, a venomous animal.  I speak with the
 bluntness of gravity, madam; this is no hour for mincing.  The coward, in
 a station of authority, is more dangerous than fire.  We dwell on a
 volcano; if this man can have his way, Grnewald before a week will have
 been deluged with innocent blood.  You know the truth of what I say; we
 have looked unblenching into this ever-possible catastrophe.  To him it
 is nothing: he will abdicate!  Abdicate, just God! and this unhappy
 country committed to his charge, and the lives of men and the honour of
 women . . .  His voice appeared to fail him; in an instant he had
 conquered his emotion and resumed: But you, madam, conceive more
 worthily of your responsibilities.  I am with you in the thought; and in
 the face of the horrors that I see impending, I say, and your heart
 repeats itwe have gone too far to pause.  Honour, duty, ay, and the care
 of our own lives, demand we should proceed.
 
 She was looking at him, her brow thoughtfully knitted.  I feel it, she
 said.  But how?  He has the power.
 
 The power, madam?  The power is in the army, he replied; and then
 hastily, ere she could intervene, we have to save ourselves, he went
 on; I have to save my Princess, she has to save her minister; we have
 both of us to save this infatuated youth from his own madness.  He in the
 outbreak would be the earliest victim; I see him, he cried, torn in
 pieces; and Grnewald, unhappy Grnewald!  Nay, madam, you who have the
 power must use it; it lies hard upon your conscience.
 
 Show me how! she cried.  Suppose I were to place him under some
 constraint, the revolution would break upon us instantly.
 
 The Baron feigned defeat.  It is true, he said.  You see more clearly
 than I do.  Yet there should, there must be, some way.  And he waited
 for his chance.
 
 No, she said; I told you from the first there is no remedy.  Our hopes
 are lost: lost by one miserable trifler, ignorant, fretful, fitfulwho
 will have disappeared to-morrow, who knows? to his boorish pleasures!
 
 Any peg would do for Gondremark.  The thing! he cried, striking his
 brow.  Fool, not to have thought of it!  Madam, without perhaps knowing
 it, you have solved our problem.
 
 What do you mean?  Speak! she said.
 
 He appeared to collect himself; and then, with a smile, The Prince, he
 said, must go once more a-hunting.
 
 Ay, if he would! cried she, and stay there!
 
 And stay there, echoed the Baron.  It was so significantly said, that
 her face changed; and the schemer, fearful of the sinister ambiguity of
 his expressions, hastened to explain.  This time he shall go hunting in
 a carriage, with a good escort of our foreign lancers.  His destination
 shall be the Felsenburg; it is healthy, the rock is high, the windows are
 small and barred; it might have been built on purpose.  We shall intrust
 the captaincy to the Scotsman Gordon; he at least will have no scruple.
 Who will miss the sovereign?  He is gone hunting; he came home on
 Tuesday, on Thursday he returned; all is usual in that.  Meanwhile the
 war proceeds; our Prince will soon weary of his solitude; and about the
 time of our triumph, or, if he prove very obstinate, a little later, he
 shall be released upon a proper understanding, and I see him once more
 directing his theatricals.
 
 Seraphina sat gloomy, plunged in thought.  Yes, she said suddenly, and
 the despatch?  He is now writing it.
 
 It cannot pass the council before Friday, replied Gondremark; and as
 for any private note, the messengers are all at my disposal.  They are
 picked men, madam.  I am a person of precaution.
 
 It would appear so, she said, with a flash of her occasional repugnance
 to the man; and then after a pause, Herr von Gondremark, she added, I
 recoil from this extremity.
 
 I share your Highnesss repugnance, answered he.  But what would you
 have?  We are defenceless, else.
 
 I see it, but this is sudden.  It is a public crime, she said, nodding
 at him with a sort of horror.
 
 Look but a little deeper, he returned, and whose is the crime?
 
 His! she cried.  His, before God!  And I hold him liable.  But still
 
 It is not as if he would be harmed, submitted Gondremark.
 
 I know it, she replied, but it was still unheartily.
 
 And then, as brave men are entitled, by prescriptive right as old as the
 worlds history, to the alliance and the active help of Fortune, the
 punctual goddess stepped down from the machine.  One of the Princesss
 ladies begged to enter; a man, it appeared, had brought a line for the
 Freiherr von Gondremark.  It proved to be a pencil billet, which the
 crafty Greisengesang had found the means to scribble and despatch under
 the very guns of Otto; and the daring of the act bore testimony to the
 terror of the actor.  For Greisengesang had but one influential motive:
 fear.  The note ran thus: At the first council, procuration to be
 withdrawn.CORN. GREIS.
 
 So, after three years of exercise, the right of signature was to be
 stript from Seraphina.  It was more than an insult; it was a public
 disgrace; and she did not pause to consider how she had earned it, but
 morally bounded under the attack as bounds the wounded tiger.
 
 Enough, she said; I will sign the order.  When shall he leave?
 
 It will take me twelve hours to collect my men, and it had best be done
 at night.  To-morrow midnight, if you please? answered the Baron.
 
 Excellent, she said.  My door is always open to you, Baron.  As soon
 as the order is prepared, bring it me to sign.
 
 Madam, he said, alone of all of us you do not risk your head in this
 adventure.  For that reason, and to prevent all hesitation, I venture to
 propose the order should be in your hand throughout.
 
 You are right, she replied.
 
 He laid a form before her, and she wrote the order in a clear hand, and
 re-read it.  Suddenly a cruel smile came on her face.  I had forgotten
 his puppet, said she.  They will keep each other company.  And she
 interlined and initiated the condemnation of Doctor Gotthold.
 
 Your Highness has more memory than your servant, said the Baron; and
 then he, in his turn, carefully perused the fateful paper.  Good! said
 he.
 
 You will appear in the drawing-room, Baron? she asked.
 
 I thought it better, said he, to avoid the possibility of a public
 affront.  Anything that shook my credit might hamper us in the immediate
 future.
 
 You are right, she said; and she held out her hand as to an old friend
 and equal.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IXTHE PRICE OF THE RIVER FARM; IN WHICH VAINGLORY GOES BEFORE A
 FALL
 
 
 The pistol had been practically fired.  Under ordinary circumstances the
 scene at the council table would have entirely exhausted Ottos store
 both of energy and anger; he would have begun to examine and condemn his
 conduct, have remembered all that was true, forgotten all that was unjust
 in Seraphinas onslaught; and by half an hour after would have fallen
 into that state of mind in which a Catholic flees to the confessional and
 a sot takes refuge with the bottle.  Two matters of detail preserved his
 spirits.  For, first, he had still an infinity of business to transact;
 and to transact business, for a man of Ottos neglectful and
 procrastinating habits, is the best anodyne for conscience.  All
 afternoon he was hard at it with the Chancellor, reading, dictating,
 signing, and despatching papers; and this kept him in a glow of
 self-approval.  But, secondly, his vanity was still alarmed; he had
 failed to get the money; to-morrow before noon he would have to
 disappoint old Killian; and in the eyes of that family which counted him
 so little, and to which he had sought to play the part of the heroic
 comforter, he must sink lower than at first.  To a man of Ottos temper,
 this was death.  He could not accept the situation.  And even as he
 worked, and worked wisely and well, over the hated details of his
 principality, he was secretly maturing a plan by which to turn the
 situation.  It was a scheme as pleasing to the man as it was
 dishonourable in the prince; in which his frivolous nature found and took
 vengeance for the gravity and burthen of the afternoon.  He chuckled as
 he thought of it: and Greisengesang heard him with wonder, and attributed
 his lively spirits to the skirmish of the morning.
 
 Led by this idea, the antique courtier ventured to compliment his
 sovereign on his bearing.  It reminded him, he said, of Ottos father.
 
 What? asked the Prince, whose thoughts were miles away.
 
 Your Highnesss authority at the board, explained the flatterer.
 
 O, that!  O yes, returned Otto; but for all his carelessness, his
 vanity was delicately tickled, and his mind returned and dwelt
 approvingly over the details of his victory.  I quelled them all, he
 thought.
 
 When the more pressing matters had been dismissed, it was already late,
 and Otto kept the Chancellor to dinner, and was entertained with a leash
 of ancient histories and modern compliments.  The Chancellors career had
 been based, from the first off-put, on entire subserviency; he had
 crawled into honours and employments; and his mind was prostitute.  The
 instinct of the creature served him well with Otto.  First, he let fall a
 sneering word or two upon the female intellect; thence he proceeded to a
 closer engagement; and before the third course he was artfully dissecting
 Seraphinas character to her approving husband.  Of course no names were
 used; and of course the identity of that abstract or ideal man, with whom
 she was currently contrasted, remained an open secret.  But this stiff
 old gentleman had a wonderful instinct for evil, thus to wind his way
 into mans citadel; thus to harp by the hour on the virtues of his hearer
 and not once alarm his self-respect.  Otto was all roseate, in and out,
 with flattery and Tokay and an approving conscience.  He saw himself in
 the most attractive colours.  If even Greisengesang, he thought, could
 thus espy the loose stitches in Seraphinas character, and thus
 disloyally impart them to the opposite camp, he, the discarded
 husbandthe dispossessed Princecould scarce have erred on the side of
 severity.
 
 In this excellent frame he bade adieu to the old gentleman, whose voice
 had proved so musical, and set forth for the drawing-room.  Already on
 the stair, he was seized with some compunction; but when he entered the
 great gallery and beheld his wife, the Chancellors abstract flatteries
 fell from him like rain, and he re-awoke to the poetic facts of life.
 She stood a good way off below a shining lustre, her back turned.  The
 bend of her waist overcame him with physical weakness.  This was the
 girl-wife who had lain in his arms and whom he had sworn to cherish;
 there was she, who was better than success.
 
 It was Seraphina who restored him from the blow.  She swam forward and
 smiled upon her husband with a sweetness that was insultingly artificial.
 Frdric, she lisped, you are late.  It was a scene of high comedy,
 such as is proper to unhappy marriages; and her _aplomb_ disgusted him.
 
 There was no etiquette at these small drawing-rooms.  People came and
 went at pleasure.  The window embrasures became the roost of happy
 couples; at the great chimney the talkers mostly congregated, each
 full-charged with scandal; and down at the farther end the gamblers
 gambled.  It was towards this point that Otto moved, not ostentatiously,
 but with a gentle insistence, and scattering attentions as he went.  Once
 abreast of the card-table, he placed himself opposite to Madame von
 Rosen, and, as soon as he had caught her eye, withdrew to the embrasure
 of a window.  There she had speedily joined him.
 
 You did well to call me, she said, a little wildly.  These cards will
 be my ruin.
 
 Leave them, said Otto.
 
 I! she cried, and laughed; they are my destiny.  My only chance was to
 die of a consumption; now I must die in a garret.
 
 You are bitter to-night, said Otto.
 
 I have been losing, she replied.  You do not know what greed is.
 
 I have come, then, in an evil hour, said he.
 
 Ah, you wish a favour! she cried, brightening beautifully.
 
 Madam, said he, I am about to found my party, and I come to you for a
 recruit.
 
 Done, said the Countess.  I am a man again.
 
 I may be wrong, continued Otto, but I believe upon my heart you wish
 me no ill.
 
 I wish you so well, she said, that I dare not tell it you.
 
 Then if I ask my favour? quoth the Prince.
 
 Ask it, _mon Prince_, she answered.  Whatever it is, it is granted.
 
 I wish you, he returned, this very night to make the farmer of our
 talk.
 
 Heaven knows your meaning! she exclaimed.  I know not, neither care;
 there are no bounds to my desire to please you.  Call him made.
 
 I will put it in another way, returned Otto.  Did you ever steal?
 
 Often! cried the Countess.  I have broken all the ten commandments;
 and if there were more to-morrow, I should not sleep till I had broken
 these.
 
 This is a case of burglary: to say the truth, I thought it would amuse
 you, said the Prince.
 
 I have no practical experience, she replied, but O! the good-will!  I
 have broken a work-box in my time, and several hearts, my own included.
 Never a house!  But it cannot be difficult; sins are so unromantically
 easy!  What are we to break?
 
 Madam, we are to break the treasury, said Otto and he sketched to her
 briefly, wittily, with here and there a touch of pathos, the story of his
 visit to the farm, of his promise to buy it, and of the refusal with
 which his demand for money had been met that morning at the council;
 concluding with a few practical words as to the treasury windows, and the
 helps and hindrances of the proposed exploit.
 
 They refused you the money, she said when he had done.  And you
 accepted the refusal?  Well!
 
 They gave their reasons, replied Otto, colouring.  They were not such
 as I could combat; and I am driven to dilapidate the funds of my own
 country by a theft.  It is not dignified; but it is fun.
 
 Fun, she said; yes.  And then she remained silently plunged in
 thought for an appreciable time.  How much do you require? she asked at
 length.
 
 Three thousand crowns will do, he answered, for I have still some
 money of my own.
 
 Excellent, she said, regaining her levity.  I am your true accomplice.
 And where are we to meet?
 
 You know the Flying Mercury, he answered, in the Park?  Three pathways
 intersect; there they have made a seat and raised the statue.  The spot
 is handy and the deity congenial.
 
 Child, she said, and tapped him with her fan.  But do you know, my
 Prince, you are an egoistyour handy trysting-place is miles from me.
 You must give me ample time; I cannot, I think, possibly be there before
 two.  But as the bell beats two, your helper shall arrive: welcome, I
 trust.  Staydo you bring any one? she added.  O, it is not for a
 chaperonI am not a prude!
 
 I shall bring a groom of mine, said Otto.  I caught him stealing
 corn.
 
 His name? she asked.
 
 I profess I know not.  I am not yet intimate with my corn-stealer,
 returned the Prince.  It was in a professional capacity
 
 Like me!  Flatterer! she cried.  But oblige me in one thing.  Let me
 find you waiting at the seatyes, you shall await me; for on this
 expedition it shall be no longer Prince and Countess, it shall be the
 lady and the squireand your friend the thief shall be no nearer than the
 fountain.  Do you promise?
 
 Madam, in everything you are to command; you shall be captain, I am but
 supercargo, answered Otto.
 
 Well, Heaven bring all safe to port! she said.  It is not Friday!
 
 Something in her manner had puzzled Otto, had possibly touched him with
 suspicion.
 
 Is it not strange, he remarked, that I should choose my accomplice
 from the other camp?
 
 Fool! she said.  But it is your only wisdom that you know your
 friends.  And suddenly, in the vantage of the deep window, she caught up
 his hand and kissed it with a sort of passion.  Now go, she added, go
 at once.
 
 He went, somewhat staggered, doubting in his heart that he was over-bold.
 For in that moment she had flashed upon him like a jewel; and even
 through the strong panoply of a previous love he had been conscious of a
 shock.  Next moment he had dismissed the fear.
 
 Both Otto and the Countess retired early from the drawing-room; and the
 Prince, after an elaborate feint, dismissed his valet, and went forth by
 the private passage and the back postern in quest of the groom.
 
 Once more the stable was in darkness, once more Otto employed the
 talismanic knock, and once more the groom appeared and sickened with
 terror.
 
 Good-evening, friend, said Otto pleasantly.  I want you to bring a
 corn sackempty this timeand to accompany me.  We shall be gone all
 night.
 
 Your Highness, groaned the man, I have the charge of the small
 stables.  I am here alone.
 
 Come, said the Prince, you are no such martinet in duty.  And then
 seeing that the man was shaking from head to foot, Otto laid a hand upon
 his shoulder.  If I meant you harm, he said, should I be here?
 
 The fellow became instantly reassured.  He got the sack; and Otto led him
 round by several paths and avenues, conversing pleasantly by the way, and
 left him at last planted by a certain fountain where a goggle-eyed Triton
 spouted intermittently into a rippling laver.  Thence he proceeded alone
 to where, in a round clearing, a copy of Gian Bolognas Mercury stood
 tiptoe in the twilight of the stars.  The night was warm and windless.  A
 shaving of new moon had lately arisen; but it was still too small and too
 low down in heaven to contend with the immense host of lesser luminaries;
 and the rough face of the earth was drenched with starlight.  Down one of
 the alleys, which widened as it receded, he could see a part of the
 lamplit terrace where a sentry silently paced, and beyond that a corner
 of the town with interlacing street-lights.  But all around him the young
 trees stood mystically blurred in the dim shine; and in the stock-still
 quietness the upleaping god appeared alive.
 
 In this dimness and silence of the night, Ottos conscience became
 suddenly and staringly luminous, like the dial of a city clock.  He
 averted the eyes of his mind, but the finger rapidly travelling, pointed
 to a series of misdeeds that took his breath away.  What was he doing in
 that place?  The money had been wrongly squandered, but that was largely
 by his own neglect.  And he now proposed to embarrass the finances of
 this country which he had been too idle to govern.  And he now proposed
 to squander the money once again, and this time for a private, if a
 generous end.  And the man whom he had reproved for stealing corn he was
 now to set stealing treasure.  And then there was Madame von Rosen, upon
 whom he looked down with some of that ill-favoured contempt of the chaste
 male for the imperfect woman.  Because he thought of her as one degraded
 below scruples, he had picked her out to be still more degraded, and to
 risk her whole irregular establishment in life by complicity in this
 dishonourable act.  It was uglier than a seduction.
 
 Otto had to walk very briskly and whistle very busily; and when at last
 he heard steps in the narrowest and darkest of the alleys, it was with a
 gush of relief that he sprang to meet the Countess.  To wrestle alone
 with ones good angel is so hard! and so precious, at the proper time, is
 a companion certain to be less virtuous than oneself!
 
 It was a young man who came towards hima young man of small stature and
 a peculiar gait, wearing a wide flapping hat, and carrying, with great
 weariness, a heavy bag.  Otto recoiled; but the young man held up his
 hand by way of signal, and coming up with a panting run, as if with the
 last of his endurance, laid the bag upon the ground, threw himself upon
 the bench, and disclosed the features of Madame von Rosen.
 
 You, Countess! cried the Prince.
 
 No, no, she panted, the Count von Rosenmy young brother.  A capital
 fellow.  Let him get his breath.
 
 Ah, madam . . .  said he.
 
 Call me Count, she returned, respect my incognito.
 
 Count be it, then, he replied.  And let me implore that gallant
 gentleman to set forth at once on our enterprise.
 
 Sit down beside me here, she returned, patting the further corner of
 the bench.  I will follow you in a moment.  O, I am so tiredfeel how my
 heart leaps!  Where is your thief?
 
 At his post, replied Otto.  Shall I introduce him?  He seems an
 excellent companion.
 
 No, she said, do not hurry me yet.  I must speak to you.  Not but I
 adore your thief; I adore any one who has the spirit to do wrong.  I
 never cared for virtue till I fell in love with my Prince.  She laughed
 musically.  And even so, it is not for your virtues, she added.
 
 Otto was embarrassed.  And now, he asked, if you are anyway rested?
 
 Presently, presently.  Let me breathe, she said, panting a little
 harder than before.
 
 And what has so wearied you? he asked.  This bag?  And why, in the
 name of eccentricity, a bag?  For an empty one, you might have relied on
 my own foresight; and this one is very far from being empty.  My dear
 Count, with what trash have you come laden?  But the shortest method is
 to see for myself.  And he put down his hand.
 
 She stopped him at once.  Otto, she said, nonot that way.  I will
 tell, I will make a clean breast.  It is done already.  I have robbed the
 treasury single-handed.  There are three thousand two hundred crowns.  O,
 I trust it is enough!
 
 Her embarrassment was so obvious that the Prince was struck into a muse,
 gazing in her face, with his hand still outstretched, and she still
 holding him by the wrist.  You! he said at last.  How? And then
 drawing himself up, O madam, he cried, I understand.  You must indeed
 think meanly of the Prince.
 
 Well, then, it was a lie! she cried.  The money is mine, honestly my
 ownnow yours.  This was an unworthy act that you proposed.  But I love
 your honour, and I swore to myself that I should save it in your teeth.
 I beg of you to let me save itwith a sudden lovely change of tone.
 Otto, I beseech you let me save it.  Take this dross from your poor
 friend who loves you!
 
 Madam, madam, babbled Otto, in the extreme of misery, I cannotI must
 go.
 
 And he half rose; but she was on the ground before him in an instant,
 clasping his knees.  No, she gasped, you shall not go.  Do you despise
 me so entirely?  It is dross; I hate it; I should squander it at play and
 be no richer; it is an investment, it is to save me from ruin.  Otto,
 she cried, as he again feebly tried to put her from him, if you leave me
 alone in this disgrace, I will die here!  He groaned aloud.  O, she
 said, think what I suffer!  If you suffer from a piece of delicacy,
 think what I suffer in my shame!  To have my trash refused!  You would
 rather steal, you think of me so basely!  You would rather tread my heart
 in pieces!  O, unkind!  O my Prince!  O Otto!  O pity me!  She was still
 clasping him; then she found his hand and covered it with kisses, and at
 this his head began to turn.  O, she cried again, I see it!  O what a
 horror!  It is because I am old, because I am no longer beautiful.  And
 she burst into a storm of sobs.
 
 This was the _coup de grce_.  Otto had now to comfort and compose her as
 he could, and before many words, the money was accepted.  Between the
 woman and the weak man such was the inevitable end.  Madame von Rosen
 instantly composed her sobs.  She thanked him with a fluttering voice,
 and resumed her place upon the bench, at the far end from Otto.  Now you
 see, she said, why I bade you keep the thief at distance, and why I
 came alone.  How I trembled for my treasure!
 
 Madam, said Otto, with a tearful whimper in his voice, spare me!  You
 are too good, too noble!
 
 I wonder to hear you, she returned.  You have avoided a great folly.
 You will be able to meet your good old peasant.  You have found an
 excellent investment for a friends money.  You have preferred essential
 kindness to an empty scruple; and now you are ashamed of it!  You have
 made your friend happy; and now you mourn as the dove!  Come, cheer up.
 I know it is depressing to have done exactly right; but you need not make
 a practice of it.  Forgive yourself this virtue; come now, look me in the
 face and smile!
 
 He did look at her.  When a man has been embraced by a woman, he sees her
 in a glamour; and at such a time, in the baffling glimmer of the stars,
 she will look wildly well.  The hair is touched with light; the eyes are
 constellations; the face sketched in shadowsa sketch, you might say, by
 passion.  Otto became consoled for his defeat; he began to take an
 interest.  No, he said, I am no ingrate.
 
 You promised me fun, she returned, with a laugh.  I have given you as
 good.  We have had a stormy _scena_.
 
 He laughed in his turn, and the sound of the laughter, in either case,
 was hardly reassuring.
 
 Come, what are you going to give me in exchange, she continued, for my
 excellent declamation?
 
 What you will, he said.
 
 Whatever I will?  Upon your honour?  Suppose I asked the crown?  She
 was flashing upon him, beautiful in triumph.
 
 Upon my honour, he replied.
 
 Shall I ask the crown? she continued.  Nay; what should I do with it?
 Grnewald is but a petty state; my ambition swells above it.  I shall
 askI find I want nothing, she concluded.  I will give you something
 instead.  I will give you leave to kiss meonce.
 
 Otto drew near, and she put up her face; they were both smiling, both on
 the brink of laughter, all was so innocent and playful; and the Prince,
 when their lips encountered, was dumbfoundered by the sudden convulsion
 of his being.  Both drew instantly apart, and for an appreciable time sat
 tongue-tied.  Otto was indistinctly conscious of a peril in the silence,
 but could find no words to utter.  Suddenly the Countess seemed to awake.
 As for your wife she began in a clear and steady voice.
 
 The word recalled Otto, with a shudder, from his trance.  I will hear
 nothing against my wife, he cried wildly; and then, recovering himself
 and in a kindlier tone, I will tell you my one secret, he added.  I
 love my wife.
 
 You should have let me finish, she returned, smiling.  Do you suppose
 I did not mention her on purpose?  You know you had lost your head.
 Well, so had I.  Come now, do not be abashed by words, she added
 somewhat sharply.  It is the one thing I despise.  If you are not a
 fool, you will see that I am building fortresses about your virtue.  And
 at any rate, I choose that you shall understand that I am not dying of
 love for you.  It is a very smiling business; no tragedy for me!  And now
 here is what I have to say about your wife; she is not and she never has
 been Gondremarks mistress.  Be sure he would have boasted if she had.
 Good-night!
 
 And in a moment she was gone down the alley, and Otto was alone with the
 bag of money and the flying god.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XGOTTHOLDS REVISED OPINION; AND THE FALL COMPLETED
 
 
 The Countess left poor Otto with a caress and buffet simultaneously
 administered.  The welcome word about his wife and the virtuous ending of
 his interview should doubtless have delighted him.  But for all that, as
 he shouldered the bag of money and set forward to rejoin his groom, he
 was conscious of many aching sensibilities.  To have gone wrong and to
 have been set right makes but a double trial for mans vanity.  The
 discovery of his own weakness and possible unfaith had staggered him to
 the heart; and to hear, in the same hour, of his wifes fidelity from one
 who loved her not, increased the bitterness of the surprise.
 
 He was about half-way between the fountain and the Flying Mercury before
 his thoughts began to be clear; and he was surprised to find them
 resentful.  He paused in a kind of temper, and struck with his hand a
 little shrub.  Thence there arose instantly a cloud of awakened sparrows,
 which as instantly dispersed and disappeared into the thicket.  He looked
 at them stupidly, and when they were gone continued staring at the stars.
 I am angry.  By what right?  By none! he thought; but he was still
 angry.  He cursed Madame von Rosen and instantly repented.  Heavy was the
 money on his shoulders.
 
 When he reached the fountain, he did, out of ill-humour and parade, an
 unpardonable act.  He gave the money bodily to the dishonest groom.
 Keep this for me, he said, until I call for it to-morrow.  It is a
 great sum, and by that you will judge that I have not condemned you.
 And he strode away ruffling, as if he had done something generous.  It
 was a desperate stroke to re-enter at the point of the bayonet into his
 self-esteem; and, like all such, it was fruitless in the end.  He got to
 bed with the devil, it appeared: kicked and tumbled till the grey of the
 morning; and then fell inopportunely into a leaden slumber, and awoke to
 find it ten.  To miss the appointment with old Killian after all, had
 been too tragic a miscarriage: and he hurried with all his might, found
 the groom (for a wonder) faithful to his trust, and arrived only a few
 minutes before noon in the guest-chamber of the Morning Star.  Killian
 was there in his Sundays best and looking very gaunt and rigid; a lawyer
 from Brandenau stood sentinel over his outspread papers; and the groom
 and the landlord of the inn were called to serve as witnesses.  The
 obvious deference of that great man, the innkeeper, plainly affected the
 old farmer with surprise; but it was not until Otto had taken the pen and
 signed that the truth flashed upon him fully.  Then, indeed, he was
 beside himself.
 
 His Highness! he cried, His Highness! and repeated the exclamation
 till his mind had grappled fairly with the facts.  Then he turned to the
 witnesses.  Gentlemen, he said, you dwell in a country highly favoured
 by God; for of all generous gentlemen, I will say it on my conscience,
 this one is the king.  I am an old man, and I have seen good and bad, and
 the year of the great famine; but a more excellent gentleman, no, never.
 
 We know that, cried the landlord, we know that well in Grnewald.  If
 we saw more of his Highness we should be the better pleased.
 
 It is the kindest Prince, began the groom, and suddenly closed his
 mouth upon a sob, so that every one turned to gaze upon his emotionOtto
 not last; Otto struck with remorse, to see the man so grateful.
 
 Then it was the lawyers turn to pay a compliment.  I do not know what
 Providence may hold in store, he said, but this day should be a bright
 one in the annals of your reign.  The shouts of armies could not be more
 eloquent than the emotion on these honest faces.  And the Brandenau
 lawyer bowed, skipped, stepped back, and took snuff, with the air of a
 man who has found and seized an opportunity.
 
 Well, young gentleman, said Killian, if you will pardon me the
 plainness of calling you a gentleman, many a good days work you have
 done, I doubt not, but never a better, or one that will be better
 blessed; and whatever, sir, may be your happiness and triumph in that
 high sphere to which you have been called, it will be none the worse,
 sir, for an old mans blessing!
 
 The scene had almost assumed the proportions of an ovation; and when the
 Prince escaped he had but one thought: to go wherever he was most sure of
 praise.  His conduct at the board of council occurred to him as a fair
 chapter; and this evoked the memory of Gotthold.  To Gotthold he would
 go.
 
 Gotthold was in the library as usual, and laid down his pen, a little
 angrily, on Ottos entrance.  Well, he said, here you are.
 
 Well, returned Otto, we made a revolution, I believe.
 
 It is what I fear, returned the Doctor.
 
 How? said Otto.  Fear?  Fear is the burnt child.  I have learned my
 strength and the weakness of the others; and I now mean to govern.
 
 Gotthold said nothing, but he looked down and smoothed his chin.
 
 You disapprove? cried Otto.  You are a weather-cock.
 
 On the contrary, replied the Doctor.  My observation has confirmed my
 fears.  It will not do, Otto, not do.
 
 What will not do? demanded the Prince, with a sickening stab of pain.
 
 None of it, answered Gotthold.  You are unfitted for a life of action;
 you lack the stamina, the habit, the restraint, the patience.  Your wife
 is greatly better, vastly better; and though she is in bad hands,
 displays a very different aptitude.  She is a woman of affairs; you
 aredear boy, you are yourself.  I bid you back to your amusements; like
 a smiling dominie, I give you holidays for life.  Yes, he continued,
 there is a day appointed for all when they shall turn again upon their
 own philosophy.  I had grown to disbelieve impartially in all; and if in
 the atlas of the sciences there were two charts I disbelieved in more
 than all the rest, they were politics and morals.  I had a sneaking
 kindness for your vices; as they were negative, they flattered my
 philosophy; and I called them almost virtues.  Well, Otto, I was wrong; I
 have forsworn my sceptical philosophy; and I perceive your faults to be
 unpardonable.  You are unfit to be a Prince, unfit to be a husband.  And
 I give you my word, I would rather see a man capably doing evil than
 blundering about good.
 
 Otto was still silent, in extreme dudgeon.
 
 Presently the Doctor resumed: I will take the smaller matter first: your
 conduct to your wife.  You went, I hear, and had an explanation.  That
 may have been right or wrong; I know not; at least, you had stirred her
 temper.  At the council she insults you; well, you insult her backa man
 to a woman, a husband to his wife, in public!  Next upon the back of
 this, you proposethe story runs like wildfireto recall the power of
 signature.  Can she ever forgive that? a womana young womanambitious,
 conscious of talents beyond yours?  Never, Otto.  And to sum all, at such
 a crisis in your married life, you get into a window corner with that
 ogling dame von Rosen.  I do not dream that there was any harm; but I do
 say it was an idle disrespect to your wife.  Why, man, the woman is not
 decent.
 
 Gotthold, said Otto, I will hear no evil of the Countess.
 
 You will certainly hear no good of her, returned Gotthold; and if you
 wish your wife to be the pink of nicety, you should clear your court of
 demi-reputations.
 
 The commonplace injustice of a by-word, Otto cried.  The partiality of
 sex.  She is a demirep; what then is Gondremark?  Were she a man
 
 It would be all one, retorted Gotthold roughly.  When I see a man,
 come to years of wisdom, who speaks in double-meanings and is the
 braggart of his vices, I spit on the other side.  You, my friend, say
 I, are not even a gentleman.  Well, shes not even a lady.
 
 She is the best friend I have, and I choose that she shall be
 respected, Otto said.
 
 If she is your friend, so much the worse, replied the Doctor.  It will
 not stop there.
 
 Ah! cried Otto, there is the charity of virtue!  All evil in the
 spotted fruit.  But I can tell you, sir, that you do Madame von Rosen
 prodigal injustice.
 
 You can tell me! said the Doctor shrewdly.  Have you, tried? have you
 been riding the marches?
 
 The blood came into Ottos face.
 
 Ah! cried Gotthold, look at your wife and blush!  Theres a wife for a
 man to marry and then lose!  Shes a carnation, Otto.  The soul is in her
 eyes.
 
 You have changed your note for Seraphina, I perceive, said Otto.
 
 Changed it! cried the Doctor, with a flush.  Why, when was it
 different?  But I own I admired her at the council.  When she sat there
 silent, tapping with her foot, I admired her as I might a hurricane.
 Were I one of those who venture upon matrimony, there had been the prize
 to tempt me!  She invites, as Mexico invited Cortez; the enterprise is
 hard, the natives are unfriendlyI believe them cruel toobut the
 metropolis is paved with gold and the breeze blows out of paradise.  Yes,
 I could desire to be that conqueror.  But to philander with von Rosen!
 never!  Senses?  I discard them; what are they?pruritus!  Curiosity?
 Reach me my Anatomy!
 
 To whom do you address yourself? cried Otto.  Surely you, of all men,
 know that I love my wife!
 
 O, love! cried Gotthold; love is a great word; it is in all the
 dictionaries.  If you had loved, she would have paid you back.  What does
 she ask?  A little ardour!
 
 It is hard to love for two, replied the Prince.
 
 Hard?  Why, theres the touchstone!  O, I know my poets! cried the
 Doctor.  We are but dust and fire, too and to endure lifes scorching;
 and love, like the shadow of a great rock, should lend shelter and
 refreshment, not to the lover only, but to his mistress and to the
 children that reward them; and their very friends should seek repose in
 the fringes of that peace.  Love is not love that cannot build a home.
 And you call it love to grudge and quarrel and pick faults?  You call it
 love to thwart her to her face, and bandy insults?  Love!
 
 Gotthold, you are unjust.  I was then fighting for my country, said the
 Prince.
 
 Ay, and theres the worst of all, returned the Doctor.  You could not
 even see that you were wrong; that being where they were, retreat was
 ruin.
 
 Why, you supported me! cried Otto.
 
 I did.  I was a fool like you, replied Gotthold.  But now my eyes are
 open.  If you go on as you have started, disgrace this fellow Gondremark,
 and publish the scandal of your divided house, there will befall a most
 abominable thing in Grnewald.  A revolution, frienda revolution.
 
 You speak strangely for a red, said Otto.
 
 A red republican, but not a revolutionary, returned the Doctor.  An
 ugly thing is a Grnewalder drunk!  One man alone can save the country
 from this pass, and that is the double-dealer Gondremark, with whom I
 conjure you to make peace.  It will not be you; it never can be you:you,
 who can do nothing, as your wife said, but trade upon your stationyou,
 who spent the hours in begging money!  And in Gods name, what for?  Why
 money?  What mystery of idiocy was this?
 
 It was to no ill end.  It was to buy a farm, quoth Otto sulkily.
 
 To buy a farm! cried Gotthold.  Buy a farm!
 
 Well, what then? returned Otto. I have bought it, if you come to
 that.
 
 Gotthold fairly bounded on his seat.  And how that? he cried.
 
 How? repeated Otto, startled.
 
 Ay, verily, how! returned the Doctor.  How came you by the money?
 
 The Princes countenance darkened.  That is my affair, said he.
 
 You see you are ashamed, retorted Gotthold.  And so you bought a farm
 in the hour of our countrys needdoubtless to be ready for the
 abdication; and I put it that you stole the funds.  There are not three
 ways of getting money: there are but two: to earn and steal.  And now,
 when you have combined Charles the Fifth and Long-fingered Tom, you come
 to me to fortify your vanity!  But I will clear my mind upon this matter:
 until I know the right and wrong of the transaction, I put my hand behind
 my back.  A man may be the pitifullest prince; he must be a spotless
 gentleman.
 
 The Prince had gotten to his feet, as pale as paper.  Gotthold, he said,
 you drive me beyond bounds.  Beware, sir, beware!
 
 Do you threaten me, friend Otto? asked the Doctor grimly.  That would
 be a strange conclusion.
 
 When have you ever known me use my power in any private animosity?
 cried Otto.  To any private man your words were an unpardonable insult,
 but at me you shoot in full security, and I must turn aside to compliment
 you on your plainness.  I must do more than pardon, I must admire,
 because you have faced thisthis formidable monarch, like a Nathan before
 David.  You have uprooted an old kindness, sir, with an unsparing hand.
 You leave me very bare.  My last bond is broken; and though I take Heaven
 to witness that I sought to do the right, I have this reward: to find
 myself alone.  You say I am no gentleman; yet the sneers have been upon
 your side; and though I can very well perceive where you have lodged your
 sympathies, I will forbear the taunt.
 
 Otto, are you insane? cried Gotthold, leaping up.  Because I ask you
 how you came by certain moneys, and because you refuse
 
 Herr von Hohenstockwitz, I have ceased to invite your aid in my
 affairs, said Otto.  I have heard all that I desire, and you have
 sufficiently trampled on my vanity.  It may be that I cannot govern, it
 may be that I cannot loveyou tell me so with every mark of honesty; but
 God has granted me one virtue, and I can still forgive.  I forgive you;
 even in this hour of passion, I can perceive my faults and your excuses;
 and if I desire that in future I may be spared your conversation, it is
 not, sir, from resentmentnot resentmentbut, by Heaven, because no man
 on earth could endure to be so rated.  You have the satisfaction to see
 your sovereign weep; and that person whom you have so often taunted with
 his happiness reduced to the last pitch of solitude and misery.  No,I
 will hear nothing; I claim the last word, sir, as your Prince; and that
 last word shall beforgiveness.
 
 And with that Otto was gone from the apartment, and Doctor Gotthold was
 left alone with the most conflicting sentiments of sorrow, remorse, and
 merriment; walking to and fro before his table, and asking himself, with
 hands uplifted, which of the pair of them was most to blame for this
 unhappy rupture.  Presently, he took from a cupboard a bottle of Rhine
 wine and a goblet of the deep Bohemian ruby.  The first glass a little
 warmed and comforted his bosom; with the second he began to look down
 upon these troubles from a sunny mountain; yet a while, and filled with
 this false comfort and contemplating life throughout a golden medium, he
 owned to himself, with a flush, a smile, and a half-pleasurable sigh,
 that he had been somewhat over plain in dealing with his cousin.  He
 said the truth, too, added the penitent librarian, for in my monkish
 fashion I adore the Princess.  And then, with a still deepening flush
 and a certain stealth, although he sat all alone in that great gallery,
 he toasted Seraphina to the dregs.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIPROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE FIRST
 SHE BEGUILES THE BARON
 
 
 At a sufficiently late hour, or to be more exact, at three in the
 afternoon, Madame von Rosen issued on the world.  She swept downstairs
 and out across the garden, a black mantilla thrown over her head, and the
 long train of her black velvet dress ruthlessly sweeping in the dirt.
 
 At the other end of that long garden, and back to back with the villa of
 the Countess, stood the large mansion where the Prime Minister transacted
 his affairs and pleasures.  This distance, which was enough for decency
 by the easy canons of Mittwalden, the Countess swiftly traversed, opened
 a little door with a key, mounted a flight of stairs, and entered
 unceremoniously into Gondremarks study.  It was a large and very high
 apartment; books all about the walls, papers on the table, papers on the
 floor; here and there a picture, somewhat scant of drapery; a great fire
 glowing and flaming in the blue tiled hearth; and the daylight streaming
 through a cupola above.  In the midst of this sat the great Baron
 Gondremark in his shirt-sleeves, his business for that day fairly at an
 end, and the hour arrived for relaxation.  His expression, his very
 nature, seemed to have undergone a fundamental change.  Gondremark at
 home appeared the very antipode of Gondremark on duty.  He had an air of
 massive jollity that well became him; grossness and geniality sat upon
 his features; and along with his manners, he had laid aside his sly and
 sinister expression.  He lolled there, sunning his bulk before the fire,
 a noble animal.
 
 Hey! he cried.  At last!
 
 The Countess stepped into the room in silence, threw herself on a chair,
 and crossed her legs.  In her lace and velvet, with a good display of
 smooth black stocking and of snowy petticoat, and with the refined
 profile of her face and slender plumpness of her body, she showed in
 singular contrast to the big, black, intellectual satyr by the fire.
 
 How often do you send for me? she cried.  It is compromising.
 
 Gondremark laughed.  Speaking of that, said he, what in the devils
 name were you about?  You were not home till morning.
 
 I was giving alms, she said.
 
 The Baron again laughed loud and long, for in his shirt-sleeves he was a
 very mirthful creature.  It is fortunate I am not jealous, he remarked.
 But you know my way: pleasure and liberty go hand in hand.  I believe
 what I believe; it is not much, but I believe it.But now to business.
 Have you not read my letter?
 
 No, she said; my head ached.
 
 Ah, well! then I have news indeed! cried Gondremark.  I was mad to see
 you all last night and all this morning: for yesterday afternoon I
 brought my long business to a head; the ship has come home; one more dead
 lift, and I shall cease to fetch and carry for the Princess Ratafia.
 Yes, tis done.  I have the order all in Ratafias hand; I carry it on my
 heart.  At the hour of twelve to-night, Prince Featherhead is to be taken
 in his bed and, like the bambino, whipped into a chariot; and by next
 morning he will command a most romantic prospect from the donjon of the
 Felsenburg.  Farewell, Featherhead!  The war goes on, the girl is in my
 hand; I have long been indispensable, but now I shall be sole.  I have
 long, he added exultingly, long carried this intrigue upon my
 shoulders, like Samson with the gates of Gaza; now I discharge that
 burthen.
 
 She had sprung to her feet a little paler.  Is this true? she cried.
 
 I tell you a fact, he asseverated.  The trick is played.
 
 I will never believe it, she said.  An order in her own hand?  I will
 never believe it, Heinrich.
 
 I swear to you, said he.
 
 O, what do you care for oathsor I either?  What would you swear by?
 Wine, women, and song?  It is not binding, she said.  She had come quite
 close up to him and laid her hand upon his arm.  As for the orderno,
 Heinrich, never!  I will never believe it.  I will die ere I believe it.
 You have some secret purposewhat, I cannot guessbut not one word of it
 is true.
 
 Shall I show it you? he asked.
 
 You cannot, she answered.  There is no such thing.
 
 Incorrigible Sadducee! he cried.  Well, I will convert you; you shall
 see the order.  He moved to a chair where he had thrown his coat, and
 then drawing forth and holding out a paper, Read, said he.
 
 She took it greedily, and her eye flashed as she perused it.
 
 Hey! cried the Baron, there falls a dynasty, and it was I that felled
 it; and I and you inherit!  He seemed to swell in stature; and next
 moment, with a laugh, he put his hand forward.  Give me the dagger, said
 he.
 
 But she whisked the paper suddenly behind her back and faced him,
 lowering.  No, no, she said.  You and I have first a point to settle.
 Do you suppose me blind?  She could never have given that paper but to
 one man, and that man her lover.  Here you standher lover, her
 accomplice, her masterO, I well believe it, for I know your power.  But
 what am I? she cried; I, whom you deceive!
 
 Jealousy! cried Gondremark.  Anna, I would never have believed it!
 But I declare to you by all thats credible that I am not her lover.  I
 might be, I suppose; but I never yet durst risk the declaration.  The
 chit is so unreal; a mincing doll; she will and she will not; there is no
 counting on her, by God!  And hitherto I have had my own way without, and
 keep the lover in reserve.  And I say, Anna, he added with severity,
 you must break yourself of this new fit, my girl; there must be no
 combustion.  I keep the creature under the belief that I adore her; and
 if she caught a breath of you and me, she is such a fool, prude, and dog
 in the manger, that she is capable of spoiling all.
 
 All very fine, returned the lady.  With whom do you pass your days?
 and which am I to believe, your words or your actions?
 
 Anna, the devil take you, are you blind? cried Gondremark.  You know
 me.  Am I likely to care for such a preciosa?  Tis hard that we should
 have been together for so long, and you should still take me for a
 troubadour.  But if there is one thing that I despise and deprecate, it
 is all such figures in Berlin wool.  Give me a human womanlike myself.
 You are my mate; you were made for me; you amuse me like the play.  And
 what have I to gain that I should pretend to you?  If I do not love you,
 what use are you to me?  Why, none.  It is as clear as noonday.
 
 Do you love me, Heinrich? she asked, languishing.  Do you truly?
 
 I tell you, he cried, I love you next after myself.  I should be all
 abroad if I had lost you.
 
 Well, then, said she, folding up the paper and putting it calmly in her
 pocket, I will believe you, and I join the plot.  Count upon me.  At
 midnight, did you say?  It is Gordon, I see, that you have charged with
 it.  Excellent; he will stick at nothing
 
 Gondremark watched her suspiciously.  Why do you take the paper? he
 demanded.  Give it here.
 
 No, she returned; I mean to keep it.  It is I who must prepare the
 stroke; you cannot manage it without me; and to do my best I must possess
 the paper.  Where shall I find Gordon?  In his rooms?  She spoke with a
 rather feverish self-possession.
 
 Anna, he said sternly, the black, bilious countenance of his palace
 _rle_ taking the place of the more open favour of his hours at home, I
 ask you for that paper.  Once, twice, and thrice.
 
 Heinrich, she returned, looking him in the face, take care.  I will
 put up with no dictation.
 
 Both looked dangerous; and the silence lasted for a measurable interval
 of time.  Then she made haste to have the first word; and with a laugh
 that rang clear and honest, Do not be a child, she said.  I wonder at
 you.  If your assurances are true, you can have no reason to mistrust me,
 nor I to play you false.  The difficulty is to get the Prince out of the
 palace without scandal.  His valets are devoted; his chamberlain a slave;
 and yet one cry might ruin all.
 
 They must be overpowered, he said, following her to the new ground,
 and disappear along with him.
 
 And your whole scheme along with them! she cried.  He does not take
 his servants when he goes a-hunting: a child could read the truth.  No,
 no; the plan is idiotic; it must be Ratafias.  But hear me.  You know
 the Prince worships me?
 
 I know, he said.  Poor Featherhead, I cross his destiny!
 
 Well now, she continued, what if I bring him alone out of the palace,
 to some quiet corner of the Parkthe Flying Mercury, for instance?
 Gordon can be posted in the thicket; the carriage wait behind the temple;
 not a cry, not a scuffle, not a footfall; simply, the Prince
 vanishes!What do you say?  Am I an able ally?  Are my _beaux yuex_ of
 service?  Ah, Heinrich, do not lose your Anna!she has power!
 
 He struck with his open hand upon the chimney.  Witch! he said, there
 is not your match for devilry in Europe.  Service! the thing runs on
 wheels.
 
 Kiss me, then, and let me go.  I must not miss my Featherhead, she
 said.
 
 Stay, stay, said the Baron; not so fast.  I wish, upon my soul, that I
 could trust you; but you are, out and in, so whimsical a devil that I
 dare not.  Hang it, Anna, no; its not possible!
 
 You doubt me, Heinrich? she cried.
 
 Doubt is not the word, said he.  I know you.  Once you were clear of
 me with that paper in your pocket, who knows what you would do with
 it?not you, at leastnor I.  You see, he added, shaking his head
 paternally upon the Countess, you are as vicious as a monkey.
 
 I swear to you, she cried, by my salvation . . . 
 
 I have no curiosity to hear you swearing, said the Baron.
 
 You think that I have no religion?  You suppose me destitute of honour.
 Well, she said, see here: I will not argue, but I tell you once for
 all: leave me this order, and the Prince shall be arrestedtake it from
 me, and, as certain as I speak, I will upset the coach.  Trust me, or
 fear me: take your choice.  And she offered him the paper.
 
 The Baron, in a great contention of mind, stood irresolute, weighing the
 two dangers.  Once his hand advanced, then dropped.  Well, he said,
 since trust is what you call it . . .
 
 No more, she interrupted, Do not spoil your attitude.  And now since
 you have behaved like a good sort of fellow in the dark, I will
 condescend to tell you why.  I go to the palace to arrange with Gordon;
 but how is Gordon to obey me?  And how can I foresee the hours?  It may
 be midnight; ay, and it may be nightfall; alls a chance; and to act, I
 must be free and hold the strings of the adventure.  And now, she cried,
 your Vivien goes.  Dub me your knight!  And she held out her arms and
 smiled upon him radiant.
 
 Well, he said, when he had kissed her, every man must have his folly;
 I thank God mine is no worse.  Off with you!  I have given a child a
 squib.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIIPROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE SECOND
 SHE INFORMS THE PRINCE
 
 
 It was the first impulse of Madame von Rosen to return to her own villa
 and revise her toilette.  Whatever else should come of this adventure, it
 was her firm design to pay a visit to the Princess.  And before that
 woman, so little beloved, the Countess would appear at no disadvantage.
 It was the work of minutes.  Von Rosen had the captains eye in matters
 of the toilette; she was none of those who hang in Fabian helplessness
 among their finery and, after hours, come forth upon the world as
 dowdies.  A glance, a loosened curl, a studied and admired disorder in
 the hair, a bit of lace, a touch of colour, a yellow rose in the bosom;
 and the instant picture was complete.
 
 That will do, she said.  Bid my carriage follow me to the palace.  In
 half an hour it should be there in waiting.
 
 The night was beginning to fall and the shops to shine with lamps along
 the tree-beshadowed thorough-fares of Ottos capital, when the Countess
 started on her high emprise.  She was jocund at heart; pleasure and
 interest had winged her beauty, and she knew it.  She paused before the
 glowing jewellers; she remarked and praised a costume in the milliners
 window; and when she reached the lime-tree walk, with its high,
 umbrageous arches and stir of passers-by in the dim alleys, she took her
 place upon a bench and began to dally with the pleasures of the hour.  It
 was cold, but she did not feel it, being warm within; her thoughts, in
 that dark corner, shone like the gold and rubies at the jewellers; her
 ears, which heard the brushing of so many footfalls, transposed it into
 music.
 
 What was she to do?  She held the paper by which all depended.  Otto and
 Gondremark and Ratafia, and the state itself, hung light in her balances,
 as light as dust; her little finger laid in either scale would set all
 flying: and she hugged herself upon her huge preponderance, and then
 laughed aloud to think how giddily it might be used.  The vertigo of
 omnipotence, the disease of Csars, shook her reason.  O the mad world!
 she thought, and laughed aloud in exultation.
 
 A child, finger in mouth, had paused a little way from where she sat, and
 stared with cloudy interest upon this laughing lady.  She called it
 nearer; but the child hung back.  Instantly, with that curious passion
 which you may see any woman in the world display, on the most odd
 occasions, for a similar end, the Countess bent herself with singleness
 of mind to overcome this diffidence; and presently, sure enough, the
 child was seated on her knee, thumbing and glowering at her watch.
 
 If you had a clay bear and a china monkey, asked Von Rosen, which
 would you prefer to break?
 
 But I have neither, said the child.
 
 Well, she said, here is a bright florin, with which you may purchase
 both the one and the other; and I shall give it you at once, if you will
 answer my question.  The clay bear or the china monkeycome?
 
 But the unbreeched soothsayer only stared upon the florin with big eyes;
 the oracle could not be persuaded to reply; and the Countess kissed him
 lightly, gave him the florin, set him down upon the path, and resumed her
 way with swinging and elastic gait.
 
 Which shall I break? she wondered; and she passed her hand with delight
 among the careful disarrangement of her locks.  Which? and she
 consulted heaven with her bright eyes.  Do I love both or neither?  A
 littlepassionatelynot at all?  Both or neitherboth, I believe; but at
 least I will make hay of Ratafia.
 
 By the time she had passed the iron gates, mounted the drive, and set her
 foot upon the broad flagged terrace, the night had come completely; the
 palace front was thick with lighted windows; and along the balustrade,
 the lamp on every twentieth baluster shone clear.  A few withered tracks
 of sunset, amber and glow-worm green, still lingered in the western sky;
 and she paused once again to watch them fading.
 
 And to think, she said, that here am Idestiny embodied, a norn, a
 fate, a providenceand have no guess upon which side I shall declare
 myself!  What other woman in my place would not be prejudiced, and think
 herself committed?  But, thank Heaven!  I was born just!  Ottos windows
 were bright among the rest, and she looked on them with rising
 tenderness.  How does it feel to be deserted? she thought.  Poor dear
 fool!  The girl deserves that he should see this order.
 
 Without more delay, she passed into the palace and asked for an audience
 of Prince Otto.  The Prince, she was told, was in his own apartment, and
 desired to be private.  She sent her name.  A man presently returned with
 word that the Prince tendered his apologies, but could see no one.  Then
 I will write, she said, and scribbled a few lines alleging urgency of
 life and death.  Help me, my Prince, she added; none but you can help
 me.  This time the messenger returned more speedily, and begged the
 Countess to follow him: the Prince was graciously pleased to receive the
 Frau Grfin von Rosen.
 
 Otto sat by the fire in his large armoury, weapons faintly glittering all
 about him in the changeful light.  His face was disfigured by the marks
 of weeping; he looked sour and sad; nor did he rise to greet his visitor,
 but bowed, and bade the man begone.  That kind of general tenderness
 which served the Countess for both heart and conscience, sharply smote
 her at this spectacle of grief and weakness; she began immediately to
 enter into the spirit of her part; and as soon as they were alone, taking
 one step forward and with a magnificent gestureUp! she cried.
 
 Madame von Rosen, replied Otto dully, you have used strong words.  You
 speak of life and death.  Pray, madam, who is threatened?  Who is there,
 he added bitterly, so destitute that even Otto of Grnewald can assist
 him?
 
 First learn, said she, the names of the conspirators; the Princess and
 the Baron Gondremark.  Can you not guess the rest?  And then, as he
 maintained his silenceYou! she cried, pointing at him with her finger.
 Tis you they threaten!  Your rascal and mine have laid their heads
 together and condemned you.  But they reckoned without you and me.  We
 make a _partie carre_, Prince, in love and politics.  They lead an ace,
 but we shall trump it.  Come, partner, shall I draw my card?
 
 Madam, he said, explain yourself.  Indeed I fail to comprehend.
 
 See, then, said she; and handed him the order.
 
 He took it, looked upon it with a start; and then, still without speech,
 he put his hand before his face.  She waited for a word in vain.
 
 What! she cried, do you take the thing down-heartedly?  As well seek
 wine in a milk-pail as love in that girls heart!  Be done with this, and
 be a man.  After the league of the lions, let us have a conspiracy of
 mice, and pull this piece of machinery to ground.  You were brisk enough
 last night when nothing was at stake and all was frolic.  Well, here is
 better sport; here is life indeed.
 
 He got to his feet with some alacrity, and his face, which was a little
 flushed, bore the marks of resolution.
 
 Madame von Rosen, said he, I am neither unconscious nor ungrateful;
 this is the true continuation of your friendship; but I see that I must
 disappoint your expectations.  You seem to expect from me some effort of
 resistance; but why should I resist?  I have not much to gain; and now
 that I have read this paper, and the last of a fools paradise is
 shattered, it would be hyperbolical to speak of loss in the same breath
 with Otto of Grnewald.  I have no party, no policy; no pride, nor
 anything to be proud of.  For what benefit or principle under Heaven do
 you expect me to contend?  Or would you have me bite and scratch like a
 trapped weasel?  No, madam; signify to those who sent you my readiness to
 go.  I would at least avoid a scandal.
 
 You go?of your own will, you go? she cried.
 
 I cannot say so much, perhaps, he answered; but I go with good
 alacrity.  I have desired a change some time; behold one offered me!
 Shall I refuse?  Thank God, I am not so destitute of humour as to make a
 tragedy of such a farce.  He flicked the order on the table.  You may
 signify my readiness, he added grandly.
 
 Ah, she said, you are more angry than you own.
 
 I, madam? angry? he cried.  You rave!  I have no cause for anger.  In
 every way I have been taught my weakness, my instability, and my
 unfitness for the world.  I am a plexus of weaknesses, an impotent
 Prince, a doubtful gentleman; and you yourself, indulgent as you are,
 have twice reproved my levity.  And shall I be angry?  I may feel the
 unkindness, but I have sufficient honesty of mind to see the reasons of
 this _coup dtat_.
 
 From whom have you got this? she cried in wonder.  You think you have
 not behaved well?  My Prince, were you not young and handsome, I should
 detest you for your virtues.  You push them to the verge of commonplace.
 And this ingratitude
 
 Understand me, Madame von Rosen, returned the Prince, flushing a little
 darker, there can be here no talk of gratitude, none of pride.  You are
 here, by what circumstance I know not, but doubtless led by your
 kindness, mixed up in what regards my family alone.  You have no
 knowledge what my wife, your sovereign, may have suffered; it is not for
 youno, nor for meto judge.  I own myself in fault; and were it
 otherwise, a man were a very empty boaster who should talk of love and
 start before a small humiliation.  It is in all the copybooks that one
 should die to please his lady-love; and shall a man not go to prison?
 
 Love?  And what has love to do with being sent to gaol? exclaimed the
 Countess, appealing to the walls and roof.  Heaven knows I think as much
 of love as any one; my life would prove it; but I admit no love, at least
 for a man, that is not equally returned.  The rest is moonshine.
 
 I think of love more absolutely, madam, though I am certain no more
 tenderly, than a lady to whom I am indebted for such kindnesses,
 returned the Prince.  But this is unavailing.  We are not here to hold a
 court of troubadours.
 
 Still, she replied, there is one thing you forget.  If she conspires
 with Gondremark against your liberty, she may conspire with him against
 your honour also.
 
 My honour? he repeated.  For a woman, you surprise me.  If I have
 failed to gain her love or play my part of husband, what right is left
 me? or what honour can remain in such a scene of defeat?  No honour that
 I recognise.  I am become a stranger.  If my wife no longer loves me, I
 will go to prison, since she wills it; if she love another, where should
 I be more in place? or whose fault is it but mine?  You speak, Madame von
 Rosen, like too many women, with a mans tongue.  Had I myself fallen
 into temptation (as, Heaven knows, I might) I should have trembled, but
 still hoped and asked for her forgiveness; and yet mine had been a
 treason in the teeth of love.  But let me tell you, madam, he pursued,
 with rising irritation, where a husband by futility, facility, and
 ill-timed humours has outwearied his wifes patience, I will suffer
 neither man nor woman to misjudge her.  She is free; the man has been
 found wanting.
 
 Because she loves you not? the Countess cried.  You know she is
 incapable of such a feeling.
 
 Rather, it was I who was born incapable of inspiring it, said Otto.
 
 Madame von Rosen broke into sudden laughter.  Fool, she cried, I am in
 love with you myself!
 
 Ah, madam, you are most compassionate, the Prince retorted, smiling.
 But this is waste debate.  I know my purpose.  Perhaps, to equal you in
 frankness, I know and embrace my advantage.  I am not without the spirit
 of adventure.  I am in a false positionso recognised by public
 acclamation: do you grudge me, then, my issue?
 
 If your mind is made up, why should I dissuade you? said the Countess.
 I own, with a bare face, I am the gainer.  Go, you take my heart with
 you, or more of it than I desire; I shall not sleep at night for thinking
 of your misery.  But do not be afraid; I would not spoil you, you are
 such a fool and hero.
 
 Alas! madam, cried the Prince, and your unlucky money!  I did amiss to
 take it, but you are a wonderful persuader.  And I thank God, I can still
 offer you the fair equivalent.  He took some papers from the chimney.
 Here, madam, are the title-deeds, he said; where I am going, they can
 certainly be of no use to me, and I have now no other hope of making up
 to you your kindness.  You made the loan without formality, obeying your
 kind heart.  The parts are somewhat changed; the sun of this Prince of
 Grnewald is upon the point of setting; and I know you better than to
 doubt you will once more waive ceremony, and accept the best that he can
 give you.  If I may look for any pleasure in the coming time, it will be
 to remember that the peasant is secure, and my most generous friend no
 loser.
 
 Do you not understand my odious position? cried the Countess.  Dear
 Prince, it is upon your fall that I begin my fortune.
 
 It was the more like you to tempt me to resistance, returned Otto.
 But this cannot alter our relations; and I must, for the last time, lay
 my commands upon you in the character of Prince.  And with his loftiest
 dignity, he forced the deeds on her acceptance.
 
 I hate the very touch of them, she cried.
 
 There followed upon this a little silence.  At what time, resumed Otto,
 (if indeed you know) am I to be arrested?
 
 Your Highness, when you please! exclaimed the Countess.  Or, if you
 choose to tear that paper, never!
 
 I would rather it were done quickly, said the Prince.  I shall take
 but time to leave a letter for the Princess.
 
 Well, said the Countess, I have advised you to resist; at the same
 time, if you intend to be dumb before your shearers, I must say that I
 ought to set about arranging your arrest.  I offeredshe hesitatedI
 offered to manage it, intending, my dear friendintending, upon my soul,
 to be of use to you.  Well, if you will not profit by my goodwill, then
 be of use to me; and as soon as ever you feel ready, go to the Flying
 Mercury where we met last night.  It will be none the worse for you; and
 to make it quite plain, it will be better for the rest of us.
 
 Dear madam, certainly, said Otto.  If I am prepared for the chief
 evil, I shall not quarrel with details.  Go, then, with my best
 gratitude; and when I have written a few lines of leave-taking, I shall
 immediately hasten to keep tryst.  To-night I shall not meet so dangerous
 a cavalier, he added, with a smiling gallantry.
 
 As soon as Madame von Rosen was gone, he made a great call upon his
 self-command.  He was face to face with a miserable passage where, if it
 were possible, he desired to carry himself with dignity.  As to the main
 fact, he never swerved or faltered; he had come so heart-sick and so
 cruelly humiliated from his talk with Gotthold, that he embraced the
 notion of imprisonment with something bordering on relief.  Here was, at
 least, a step which he thought blameless; here was a way out of his
 troubles.  He sat down to write to Seraphina; and his anger blazed.  The
 tale of his forbearances mounted, in his eyes, to something monstrous;
 still more monstrous, the coldness, egoism, and cruelty that had required
 and thus requited them.  The pen which he had taken shook in his hand.
 He was amazed to find his resignation fled, but it was gone beyond his
 recall.  In a few white-hot words, he bade adieu, dubbing desperation by
 the name of love, and calling his wrath forgiveness; then he cast but one
 look of leave-taking on the place that had been his for so long and was
 now to be his no longer; and hurried forthloves prisoneror prides.
 
 He took that private passage which he had trodden so often in less
 momentous hours.  The porter let him out; and the bountiful, cold air of
 the night and the pure glory of the stars received him on the threshold.
 He looked round him, breathing deep of earths plain fragrance; he looked
 up into the great array of heaven, and was quieted.  His little turgid
 life dwindled to its true proportions; and he saw himself (that great
 flame-hearted martyr!) stand like a speck under the cool cupola of the
 night.  Thus he felt his careless injuries already soothed; the live air
 of out-of-doors, the quiet of the world, as if by their silent music,
 sobering and dwarfing his emotions.
 
 Well, I forgive her, he said.  If it be of any use to her, I forgive.
 
 And with brisk steps he crossed the garden, issued upon the Park, and
 came to the Flying Mercury.  A dark figure moved forward from the shadow
 of the pedestal.
 
 I have to ask your pardon, sir, a voice observed, but if I am right in
 taking you for the Prince, I was given to understand that you would be
 prepared to meet me.
 
 Herr Gordon, I believe? said Otto.
 
 Herr Oberst Gordon, replied that officer.  This is rather a ticklish
 business for a man to be embarked in; and to find that all is to go
 pleasantly is a great relief to me.  The carriage is at hand; shall I
 have the honour of following your Highness?
 
 Colonel, said the Prince, I have now come to that happy moment of my
 life when I have orders to receive but none to give.
 
 A most philosophical remark, returned the Colonel.  Begad, a very
 pertinent remark! it might be Plutarch.  I am not a drops blood to your
 Highness, or indeed to any one in this principality; or else I should
 dislike my orders.  But as it is, and since there is nothing unnatural or
 unbecoming on my side, and your Highness takes it in good part, I begin
 to believe we may have a capital time together, sira capital time.  For
 a gaoler is only a fellow-captive.
 
 May I inquire, Herr Gordon, asked Otto, what led you to accept this
 dangerous and I would fain hope thankless office?
 
 Very natural, I am sure, replied the officer of fortune.  My pay is,
 in the meanwhile, doubled.
 
 Well, sir, I will not presume to criticise, returned the Prince.  And
 I perceive the carriage.
 
 Sure enough, at the intersection of two alleys of the Park, a coach and
 four, conspicuous by its lanterns, stood in waiting.  And a little way
 off about a score of lancers were drawn up under the shadow of the trees.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIIIPROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE THIRD
 SHE ENLIGHTENS SERAPHINA
 
 
 When Madame von Rosen left the Prince, she hurried straight to Colonel
 Gordon; and not content with directing the arrangements, she had herself
 accompanied the soldier of fortune to the Flying Mercury.  The Colonel
 gave her his arm, and the talk between this pair of conspirators ran high
 and lively.  The Countess, indeed, was in a whirl of pleasure and
 excitement; her tongue stumbled upon laughter, her eyes shone, the colour
 that was usually wanting now perfected her face.  It would have taken
 little more to bring Gordon to her feetor so, at least, she believed,
 disdaining the idea.
 
 Hidden among some lilac bushes, she enjoyed the great decorum of the
 arrest, and heard the dialogue of the two men die away along the path.
 Soon after, the rolling of a carriage and the beat of hoofs arose in the
 still air of the night, and passed speedily farther and fainter into
 silence.  The Prince was gone.
 
 Madame von Rosen consulted her watch.  She had still, she thought, time
 enough for the tit-bit of her evening; and hurrying to the palace, winged
 by the fear of Gondremarks arrival, she sent her name and a pressing
 request for a reception to the Princess Seraphina.  As the Countess von
 Rosen unqualified, she was sure to be refused; but as an emissary of the
 Barons, for so she chose to style herself, she gained immediate entry.
 
 The Princess sat alone at table, making a feint of dining.  Her cheeks
 were mottled, her eyes heavy; she had neither slept nor eaten; even her
 dress had been neglected.  In short, she was out of health, out of looks,
 out of heart, and hag-ridden by her conscience.  The Countess drew a
 swift comparison, and shone brighter in beauty.
 
 You come, madam, _de la part de Monsieur le Baron_, drawled the
 Princess.  Be seated!  What have you to say?
 
 To say? repeated Madame von Rosen, O, much to say!  Much to say that I
 would rather not, and much to leave unsaid that I would rather say.  For
 I am like St. Paul, your Highness, and always wish to do the things I
 should not.  Well! to be categoricalthat is the word?I took the Prince
 your order.  He could not credit his senses.  Ah, he cried dear Madame
 von Rosen, it is not possibleit cannot be I must hear it from your lips.
 My wife is a poor girl misled, she is only silly, she is not cruel.
 _Mon Prince_, said I, a girland therefore cruel; youth kills
 flies.He had such pain to understand it!
 
 Madame von Rosen, said the Princess, in most steadfast tones, but with
 a rose of anger in her face, who sent you here, and for what purpose?
 Tell your errand.
 
 O, madam, I believe you understand me very well, returned von Rosen.
 I have not your philosophy.  I wear my heart upon my sleeve, excuse the
 indecency!  It is a very little one, she laughed, and I so often change
 the sleeve!
 
 Am I to understand the Prince has been arrested? asked the Princess,
 rising.
 
 While you sat there dining! cried the Countess, still nonchalantly
 seated.
 
 You have discharged your errand, was the reply; I will not detain
 you.
 
 O no, madam, said the Countess, with your permission, I have not yet
 done.  I have borne much this evening in your service.  I have suffered.
 I was made to suffer in your service.  She unfolded her fan as she
 spoke.  Quick as her pulses beat, the fan waved languidly.  She betrayed
 her emotion only by the brightness of her eyes and face, and by the
 almost insolent triumph with which she looked down upon the Princess.
 There were old scores of rivalry between them in more than one field; so
 at least von Rosen felt; and now she was to have her hour of victory in
 them all.
 
 You are no servant, Madame von Rosen, of mine, said Seraphina.
 
 No, madam, indeed, returned the Countess; but we both serve the same
 person, as you knowor if you do not, then I have the pleasure of
 informing you.  Your conduct is so lightso light, she repeated, the fan
 wavering higher like a butterfly, that perhaps you do not truly
 understand.  The Countess rolled her fan together, laid it in her lap,
 and rose to a less languorous position.  Indeed, she continued, I
 should be sorry to see any young woman in your situation.  You began with
 every advantagebirth, a suitable marriagequite pretty tooand see what
 you have come to!  My poor girl, to think of it!  But there is nothing
 that does so much harm, observed the Countess finely, as giddiness of
 mind.  And she once more unfurled the fan, and approvingly fanned
 herself.
 
 I will no longer permit you to forget yourself, cried Seraphina.  I
 think you are mad.
 
 Not mad, returned von Rosen.  Sane enough to know you dare not break
 with me to-night, and to profit by the knowledge.  I left my poor, pretty
 Prince Charming crying his eyes out for a wooden doll.  My heart is soft;
 I love my pretty Prince; you will never understand it, but I long to give
 my Prince his doll, dry his poor eyes, and send him off happy.  O, you
 immature fool! the Countess cried, rising to her feet, and pointing at
 the Princess the closed fan that now began to tremble in her hand.  O
 wooden doll! she cried, have you a heart, or blood, of any nature?
 This is a man, childa man who loves you.  O, it will not happen twice!
 it is not common; beautiful and clever women look in vain for it.  And
 you, you pitiful schoolgirl, tread this jewel under foot! you, stupid
 with your vanity!  Before you try to govern kingdoms, you should first be
 able to behave yourself at home; home is the womans kingdom.  She
 paused and laughed a little, strangely to hear and look upon.  I will
 tell you one of the things, she said, that were to stay unspoken.  Von
 Rosen is a better women than you, my Princess, though you will never have
 the pain of understanding it; and when I took the Prince your order, and
 looked upon his face, my soul was meltedO, I am frankhere, within my
 arms, I offered him repose!  She advanced a step superbly as she spoke,
 with outstretched arms; and Seraphina shrank.  Do not be alarmed! the
 Countess cried; I am not offering that hermitage to you; in all the
 world there is but one who wants to, and him you have dismissed!  If it
 will give her pleasure I should wear the martyrs crown, he cried, I
 will embrace the thorns.  I tell youI am quite frankI put the order in
 his power and begged him to resist.  You, who have betrayed your husband,
 may betray me to Gondremark; my Prince would betray no one.  Understand
 it plainly, she cried, tis of his pure forbearance that you sit there;
 he had the powerI gave it himto change the parts; and he refused, and
 went to prison in your place.
 
 The Princess spoke with some distress.  Your violence shocks me and
 pains me, she began, but I cannot be angry with what at least does
 honour to the mistaken kindness of your heart: it was right for me to
 know this.  I will condescend to tell you.  It was with deep regret that
 I was driven to this step.  I admire in many ways the PrinceI admit his
 amiability.  It was our great misfortune, it was perhaps somewhat of my
 fault, that we were so unsuited to each other; but I have a regard, a
 sincere regard, for all his qualities.  As a private person I should
 think as you do.  It is difficult, I know, to make allowances for state
 considerations.  I have only with deep reluctance obeyed the call of a
 superior duty; and so soon as I dare do it for the safety of the state, I
 promise you the Prince shall be released.  Many in my situation would
 have resented your freedoms.  I am notand she looked for a moment
 rather piteously upon the CountessI am not altogether so inhuman as you
 think.
 
 And you can put these troubles of the state, the Countess cried, to
 weigh with a mans love?
 
 Madame von Rosen, these troubles are affairs of life and death to many;
 to the Prince, and perhaps even to yourself, among the number, replied
 the Princess, with dignity.  I have learned, madam, although still so
 young, in a hard school, that my own feelings must everywhere come last.
 
 O callow innocence! exclaimed the other.  Is it possible you do not
 know, or do not suspect, the intrigue in which you move?  I find it in my
 heart to pity you!  We are both women after allpoor girl, poor girl!and
 who is born a woman is born a fool.  And though I hate all womencome,
 for the common folly, I forgive you.  Your Highnessshe dropped a deep
 stage curtsey and resumed her fanI am going to insult you, to betray
 one who is called my lover, and if it pleases you to use the power I now
 put unreservedly into your hands, to ruin my dear self.  O what a French
 comedy!  You betray, I betray, they betray.  It is now my cue.  The
 letter, yes.  Behold the letter, madam, its seal unbroken as I found it
 by my bed this morning; for I was out of humour, and I get many, too
 many, of these favours.  For your own sake, for the sake of my Prince
 Charming, for the sake of this great principality that sits so heavy on
 your conscience, open it and read!
 
 Am I to understand, inquired the Princess, that this letter in any way
 regards me?
 
 You see I have not opened it, replied von Rosen; but tis mine, and I
 beg you to experiment.
 
 I cannot look at it till you have, returned Seraphina, very seriously.
 There may be matter there not meant for me to see; it is a private
 letter.
 
 The Countess tore it open, glanced it through, and tossed it back; and
 the Princess, taking up the sheet, recognised the hand of Gondremark, and
 read with a sickening shock the following lines:
 
     Dearest Anna, come at once.  Ratafia has done the deed, her husband
     is to be packed to prison.  This puts the minx entirely in my power;
     _le tour est jou_; she will now go steady in harness, or I will know
     the reason why.  Come.
 
                                                                 HEINRICH.
 
 Command yourself, madam, said the Countess, watching with some alarm
 the white face of Seraphina.  It is in vain for you to fight with
 Gondremark; he has more strings than mere court favour, and could bring
 you down to-morrow with a word.  I would not have betrayed him otherwise;
 but Heinrich is a man, and plays with all of you like marionnettes.  And
 now at least you see for what you sacrificed my Prince.  Madam, will you
 take some wine?  I have been cruel.
 
 Not cruel, madamsalutary, said Seraphina, with a phantom smile.  No,
 I thank you, I require no attentions.  The first surprise affected me:
 will you give me time a little?  I must think.
 
 She took her head between her hands, and contemplated for a while the
 hurricane confusion of her thoughts.
 
 This information reaches me, she said, when I have need of it.  I
 would not do as you have done, but yet I thank you.  I have been much
 deceived in Baron Gondremark.
 
 O, madam, leave Gondremark, and think upon the Prince! cried von Rosen.
 
 You speak once more as a private person, said the Princess; nor do I
 blame you.  But my own thoughts are more distracted.  However, as I
 believe you are truly a friend to myto theas I believe, she said, you
 are a friend to Otto, I shall put the order for his release into your
 hands this moment.  Give me the ink-dish.  There!  And she wrote
 hastily, steadying her arm upon the table, for she trembled like a reed.
 Remember; madam, she resumed, handing her the order, this must not be
 used nor spoken of at present; till I have seen the Baron, any hurried
 stepI lose myself in thinking.  The suddenness has shaken me.
 
 I promise you I will not use it, said the Countess, till you give me
 leave, although I wish the Prince could be informed of it, to comfort his
 poor heart.  And O, I had forgotten, he has left a letter.  Suffer me,
 madam, I will bring it you.  This is the door, I think?  And she sought
 to open it.
 
 The bolt is pushed, said Seraphina, flushing.
 
 O!  O! cried the Countess.
 
 A silence fell between them.
 
 I will get it for myself, said Seraphina; and in the meanwhile I beg
 you to leave me.  I thank you, I am sure, but I shall be obliged if you
 will leave me.
 
 The Countess deeply curtseyed, and withdrew.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIVRELATES THE CAUSE AND OUTBREAK OF THE REVOLUTION
 
 
 Brave as she was, and brave by intellect, the Princess, when first she
 was alone, clung to the table for support.  The four corners of her
 universe had fallen.  She had never liked nor trusted Gondremark
 completely; she had still held it possible to find him false to
 friendship; but from that to finding him devoid of all those public
 virtues for which she had honoured him, a mere commonplace intriguer,
 using her for his own ends, the step was wide and the descent giddy.
 Light and darkness succeeded each other in her brain; now she believed,
 and now she could not.  She turned, blindly groping for the note.  But
 von Rosen, who had not forgotten to take the warrant from the Prince, had
 remembered to recover her note from the Princess: von Rosen was an old
 campaigner, whose most violent emotion aroused rather than clouded the
 vigour of her reason.
 
 The thought recalled to Seraphina the remembrance of the other
 letterOttos.  She rose and went speedily, her brain still wheeling, and
 burst into the Princes armoury.  The old chamberlain was there in
 waiting; and the sight of another face, prying (or so she felt) on her
 distress, struck Seraphina into childish anger.
 
 Go! she cried; and then, when the old man was already half-way to the
 door, Stay! she added.  As soon as Baron Gondremark arrives, let him
 attend me here.
 
 It shall be so directed, said the chamberlain.
 
 There was a letter . . .  she began, and paused.
 
 Her Highness, said the chamberlain, will, find a letter on the table.
 I had received no orders, or her Highness had been spared this trouble.
 
 No, no, no, she cried.  I thank you.  I desire to be alone.
 
 And then, when he was gone, she leaped upon the letter.  Her mind was
 still obscured; like the moon upon a night of clouds and wind, her reason
 shone and was darkened, and she read the words by flashes.
 
     Seraphina, the Prince wrote, I will write no syllable of reproach.
     I have seen your order, and I go.  What else is left me?  I have
     wasted my love, and have no more.  To say that I forgive you is not
     needful; at least, we are now separate for ever; by your own act, you
     free me from my willing bondage: I go free to prison.  This is the
     last that you will hear of me in love or anger.  I have gone out of
     your life; you may breathe easy; you have now rid yourself of the
     husband who allowed you to desert him, of the Prince who gave you his
     rights, and of the married lover who made it his pride to defend you
     in your absence.  How you have requited him, your own heart more
     loudly tells you than my words.  There is a day coming when your vain
     dreams will roll away like clouds, and you will find yourself alone.
     Then you will remember
 
                                                                     OTTO.
 
 She read with a great horror on her mind; that day, of which he wrote,
 was come.  She was alone; she had been false, she had been cruel; remorse
 rolled in upon her; and then with a more piercing note, vanity bounded on
 the stage of consciousness.  She a dupe! she helpless! she to have
 betrayed herself in seeking to betray her husband! she to have lived
 these years upon flattery, grossly swallowing the bolus, like a clown
 with sharpers! sheSeraphina!  Her swift mind drank the consequences; she
 foresaw the coming fall, her public shame; she saw the odium, disgrace,
 and folly of her story flaunt through Europe.  She recalled the scandal
 she had so royally braved; and alas! she had now no courage to confront
 it with.  To be thought the mistress of that man: perhaps for that. . . .
 She closed her eyes on agonising vistas.  Swift as thought she had
 snatched a bright dagger from the weapons that shone along the wall.  Ay,
 she would escape.  From that world-wide theatre of nodding heads and
 buzzing whisperers, in which she now beheld herself unpitiably martyred,
 one door stood open.  At any cost, through any stress of suffering, that
 greasy laughter should be stifled.  She closed her eyes, breathed a
 wordless prayer, and pressed the weapon to her bosom.
 
 At the astonishing sharpness of the prick, she gave a cry and awoke to a
 sense of undeserved escape.  A little ruby spot of blood was the reward
 of that great act of desperation; but the pain had braced her like a
 tonic, and her whole design of suicide had passed away.
 
 At the same instant regular feet drew near along the gallery, and she
 knew the tread of the big Baron, so often gladly welcome, and even now
 rallying her spirits like a call to battle.  She concealed the dagger in
 the folds of her skirt; and drawing her stature up, she stood
 firm-footed, radiant with anger, waiting for the foe.
 
 The Baron was announced, and entered.  To him, Seraphina was a hated
 task: like the schoolboy with his Virgil, he had neither will nor leisure
 to remark her beauties; but when he now beheld her standing illuminated
 by her passion, new feelings flashed upon him, a frank admiration, a
 brief sparkle of desire.  He noted both with joy; they were means.  If I
 have to play the lover, thought he, for that was his constant
 preoccupation, I believe I can put soul into it.  Meanwhile, with his
 usual ponderous grace, he bent before the lady.
 
 I propose, she said in a strange voice, not known to her till then,
 that we release the Prince and do not prosecute the war.
 
 Ah, madam, he replied, tis as I knew it would be!  Your heart, I
 knew, would wound you when we came to this distasteful but most necessary
 step.  Ah, madam, believe me, I am not unworthy to be your ally; I know
 you have qualities to which I am a stranger, and count them the best
 weapons in the armoury of our alliance:the girl in the queenpity, love,
 tenderness, laughter; the smile that can reward.  I can only command; I
 am the frowner.  But you!  And you have the fortitude to command these
 comely weaknesses, to tread them down at the call of reason.  How often
 have I not admired it even to yourself!  Ay, even to yourself, he added
 tenderly, dwelling, it seemed, in memory on hours of more private
 admiration.  But now, madam
 
 But now, Herr von Gondremark, the time for these declarations has gone
 by, she cried.  Are you true to me? are you false?  Look in your heart
 and answer: it is your heart I want to know.
 
 It has come, thought Gondremark.  You, madam! he cried, starting
 backwith fear, you would have said, and yet a timid joy.  You!
 yourself, you bid me look into my heart?
 
 Do you suppose I fear? she cried, and looked at him with such a
 heightened colour, such bright eyes, and a smile of so abstruse a
 meaning, that the Baron discarded his last doubt.
 
 Ah, madam! he cried, plumping on his knees.  Seraphina!  Do you permit
 me? have you divined my secret?  It is trueI put my life with joy into
 your powerI love you, love with ardour, as an equal, as a mistress, as a
 brother-in-arms, as an adored, desired, sweet-hearted woman.  O Bride!
 he cried, waxing dithyrambic, bride of my reason and my senses, have
 pity, have pity on my love!
 
 She heard him with wonder, rage, and then contempt.  His words offended
 her to sickness; his appearance, as he grovelled bulkily upon the floor,
 moved her to such laughter as we laugh in nightmares.
 
 O shame! she cried.  Absurd and odious!  What would the Countess say?
 
 That great Baron Gondremark, the excellent politician, remained for some
 little time upon his knees in a frame of mind which perhaps we are
 allowed to pity.  His vanity, within his iron bosom, bled and raved.  If
 he could have blotted all, if he could have withdrawn part, if he had not
 called her bridewith a roaring in his ears, he thus regretfully reviewed
 his declaration.  He got to his feet tottering; and then, in that first
 moment when a dumb agony finds a vent in words, and the tongue betrays
 the inmost and worst of a man, he permitted himself a retort which, for
 six weeks to follow, he was to repent at leisure.
 
 Ah, said he, the Countess?  Now I perceive the reason of your
 Highnesss disorder.
 
 The lackey-like insolence of the words was driven home by a more insolent
 manner.  There fell upon Seraphina one of those storm-clouds which had
 already blackened upon her reason; she heard herself cry out; and when
 the cloud dispersed, flung the blood-stained dagger on the floor, and saw
 Gondremark reeling back with open mouth and clapping his hand upon the
 wound.  The next moment, with oaths that she had never heard, he leaped
 at her in savage passion; clutched her as she recoiled; and in the very
 act, stumbled and drooped.  She had scarce time to fear his murderous
 onslaught ere he fell before her feet.
 
 He rose upon one elbow; she still staring upon him, white with horror.
 
 Anna! he cried, Anna!  Help!
 
 And then his utterance failed him, and he fell back, to all appearance
 dead.
 
 Seraphina ran to and fro in the room; she wrung her hands and cried
 aloud; within she was all one uproar of terror, and conscious of no
 articulate wish but to awake.
 
 There came a knocking at the door; and she sprang to it and held it,
 panting like a beast, and with the strength of madness in her arms, till
 she had pushed the bolt.  At this success a certain calm fell upon her
 reason.  She went back and looked upon her victim, the knocking growing
 louder.  O yes, he was dead.  She had killed him.  He had called upon von
 Rosen with his latest breath; ah! who would call on Seraphina?  She had
 killed him.  She, whose irresolute hand could scarce prick blood from her
 own bosom, had found strength to cast down that great colossus at a blow.
 
 All this while the knocking was growing more uproarious and more unlike
 the staid career of life in such a palace.  Scandal was at the door, with
 what a fatal following she dreaded to conceive; and at the same time
 among the voices that now began to summon her by name, she recognised the
 Chancellors.  He or another, somebody must be the first.
 
 Is Herr von Greisengesang without? she called.
 
 Your Highnessyes! the old gentleman answered.  We have heard cries, a
 fall.  Is anything amiss?
 
 Nothing, replied Seraphina I desire to speak with you.  Send off the
 rest.  She panted between each phrase; but her mind was clear.  She let
 the looped curtain down upon both sides before she drew the bolt; and,
 thus secure from any sudden eyeshot from without, admitted the obsequious
 Chancellor, and again made fast the door.
 
 Greisengesang clumsily revolved among the wings of the curtain, so that
 she was clear of it as soon as he.
 
 My God! he cried The Baron!
 
 I have killed him, she said.  O, killed him!
 
 Dear me, said the old gentleman, this is most unprecedented.  Lovers
 quarrels, he added ruefully, redintegratio and then paused.  But, my
 dear madam, he broke out again, in the name of all that is practical,
 what are we to do?  This is exceedingly grave; morally, madam, it is
 appalling.  I take the liberty, your Highness, for one moment, of
 addressing you as a daughter, a loved although respected daughter; and I
 must say that I cannot conceal from you that this is morally most
 questionable.  And, O dear me, we have a dead body!
 
 She had watched him closely; hope fell to contempt; she drew away her
 skirts from his weakness, and, in the act, her own strength returned to
 her.
 
 See if he be dead, she said; not one word of explanation or defence;
 she had scorned to justify herself before so poor a creature: See if he
 be dead was all.
 
 With the greatest compunction, the Chancellor drew near; and as he did so
 the wounded Baron rolled his eyes.
 
 He lives, cried the old courtier, turning effusively to Seraphina.
 Madam, he still lives.
 
 Help him, then, returned the Princess, standing fixed.  Bind up his
 wound.
 
 Madam, I have no means, protested the Chancellor.
 
 Can you not take your handkerchief, your neck-cloth, anything? she
 cried; and at the same moment, from her light muslin gown she rent off a
 flounce and tossed it on the floor.  Take that, she said, and for the
 first time directly faced Greisengesang.
 
 But the Chancellor held up his hands and turned away his head in agony.
 The grasp of the falling Baron had torn down the dainty fabric of the
 bodice; andO Highness! cried Greisengesang, appalled, the terrible
 disorder of your toilette!
 
 Take up that flounce, she said; the man may die.
 
 Greisengesang turned in a flutter to the Baron, and attempted some
 innocent and bungling measures.  He still breathes, he kept saying.
 All is not yet over; he is not yet gone.
 
 And now, said she if that is all you can do, begone and get some
 porters; he must instantly go home.
 
 Madam, cried the Chancellor, if this most melancholy sight were seen
 in townO dear, the State would fall! he piped.
 
 There is a litter in the Palace, she replied.  It is your part to see
 him safe.  I lay commands upon you.  On your life it stands.
 
 I see it, dear Highness, he jerked.  Clearly I see it.  But how? what
 men?  The Princes servantsyes.  They had a personal affection.  They
 will be true, if any.
 
 O, not them! she cried.  Take Sabra, my own man.
 
 Sabra!  The grand-mason? returned the Chancellor, aghast.  If he but
 saw this, he would sound the tocsinwe should all be butchered.
 
 She measured the depth of her abasement steadily.  Take whom you must,
 she said, and bring the litter here.
 
 Once she was alone she ran to the Baron, and with a sickening heart
 sought to allay the flux of blood.  The touch of the skin of that great
 charlatan revolted her to the toes; the wound, in her ignorant eyes,
 looked deathly; yet she contended with her shuddering, and, with more
 skill at least than the Chancellors, staunched the welling injury.  An
 eye unprejudiced with hate would have admired the Baron in his swoon; he
 looked so great and shapely; it was so powerful a machine that lay
 arrested; and his features, cleared for the moment both of temper and
 dissimulation, were seen to be so purely modelled.  But it was not thus
 with Seraphina.  Her victim, as he lay outspread, twitching a little, his
 big chest unbared, fixed her with his ugliness; and her mind flitted for
 a glimpse to Otto.
 
 Rumours began to sound about the Palace of feet running and of voices
 raised; the echoes of the great arched staircase were voluble of some
 confusion; and then the gallery jarred with a quick and heavy tramp.  It
 was the Chancellor, followed by four of Ottos valets and a litter.  The
 servants, when they were admitted, stared at the dishevelled Princess and
 the wounded man; speech was denied them, but their thoughts were riddled
 with profanity.  Gondremark was bundled in; the curtains of the litter
 were lowered; the bearers carried it forth, and the Chancellor followed
 behind with a white face.
 
 Seraphina ran to the window.  Pressing her face upon the pane, she could
 see the terrace, where the lights contended; thence, the avenue of lamps
 that joined the Palace and town; and overhead the hollow night and the
 larger stars.  Presently the small procession issued from the Palace,
 crossed the parade, and began to thread the glittering alley: the
 swinging couch with its four porters, the much-pondering Chancellor
 behind.  She watched them dwindle with strange thoughts: her eyes fixed
 upon the scene, her mind still glancing right and left on the overthrow
 of her life and hopes.  There was no one left in whom she might confide;
 none whose hand was friendly, or on whom she dared to reckon for the
 barest loyalty.  With the fall of Gondremark, her party, her brief
 popularity, had fallen.  So she sat crouched upon the window-seat, her
 brow to the cool pane; her dress in tatters, barely shielding her; her
 mind revolving bitter thoughts.
 
 Meanwhile, consequences were fast mounting; and in the deceptive quiet of
 the night, downfall and red revolt were brewing.  The litter had passed
 forth between the iron gates and entered on the streets of the town.  By
 what flying panic, by what thrill of air communicated, who shall say? but
 the passing bustle in the Palace had already reached and re-echoed in the
 region of the burghers.  Rumour, with her loud whisper, hissed about the
 town; men left their homes without knowing why; knots formed along the
 boulevard; under the rare lamps and the great limes the crowd grew
 blacker.
 
 And now through the midst of that expectant company, the unusual sight of
 a closed litter was observed approaching, and trotting hard behind it
 that great dignitary Cancellarius Greisengesang.  Silence looked on as it
 went by; and as soon as it was passed, the whispering seethed over like a
 boiling pot.  The knots were sundered; and gradually, one following
 another, the whole mob began to form into a procession and escort the
 curtained litter.  Soon spokesmen, a little bolder than their mates,
 began to ply the Chancellor with questions.  Never had he more need of
 that great art of falsehood, by whose exercise he had so richly lived.
 And yet now he stumbled, the master passion, fear, betraying him.  He was
 pressed; he became incoherent; and then from the jolting litter came a
 groan.  In the instant hubbub and the gathering of the crowd as to a
 natural signal, the clear-eyed quavering Chancellor heard the catch of
 the clock before it strikes the hour of doom; and for ten seconds he
 forgot himself.  This shall atone for many sins.  He plucked a bearer by
 the sleeve.  Bid the Princess flee.  All is lost, he whispered.  And
 the next moment he was babbling for his life among the multitude.
 
 Five minutes later the wild-eyed servant burst into the armoury.  All is
 lost! he cried.  The Chancellor bids you flee.  And at the same time,
 looking through the window, Seraphina saw the black rush of the populace
 begin to invade the lamplit avenue.
 
 Thank you, Georg, she said.  I thank you.  Go.  And as the man still
 lingered, I bid you go, she added.  Save yourself.
 
 Down by the private passage, and just some two hours later, Amalia
 Seraphina, the last Princess, followed Otto Johann Friedrich, the last
 Prince of Grnewald.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK IIIFORTUNATE MISFORTUNE
 
 
 CHAPTER IPRINCESS CINDERELLA
 
 
 The porter, drawn by the growing turmoil, had vanished from the postern,
 and the door stood open on the darkness of the night.  As Seraphina fled
 up the terraces, the cries and loud footing of the mob drew nearer the
 doomed palace; the rush was like the rush of cavalry; the sound of
 shattering lamps tingled above the rest; and, overtowering all, she heard
 her own name bandied among the shouters.  A bugle sounded at the door of
 the guard-room; one gun was fired; and then with the yell of hundreds,
 Mittwalden Palace was carried at a rush.
 
 Sped by these dire sounds and voices, the Princess scaled the long
 garden, skimming like a bird the starlit stairways; crossed the Park,
 which was in that place narrow; and plunged upon the farther side into
 the rude shelter of the forest.  So, at a bound, she left the discretion
 and the cheerful lamps of Palace evenings; ceased utterly to be a
 sovereign lady; and, falling from the whole height of civilisation, ran
 forth into the woods, a ragged Cinderella.
 
 She went direct before her through an open tract of the forest, full of
 brush and birches, and where the starlight guided her; and, beyond that
 again, must thread the columned blackness of a pine grove joining
 overhead the thatch of its long branches.  At that hour the place was
 breathless; a horror of night like a presence occupied that dungeon of
 the wood; and she went groping, knocking against the bolesher ear,
 betweenwhiles, strained to aching and yet unrewarded.
 
 But the slope of the ground was upward, and encouraged her; and presently
 she issued on a rocky hill that stood forth above the sea of forest.  All
 around were other hill-tops, big and little; sable vales of forest
 between; overhead the open heaven and the brilliancy of countless stars;
 and along the western sky the dim forms of mountains.  The glory of the
 great night laid hold upon her; her eyes shone with stars; she dipped her
 sight into the coolness and brightness of the sky, as she might have
 dipped her wrist into a spring; and her heart, at that ethereal shock,
 began to move more soberly.  The sun that sails overhead, ploughing into
 gold the fields of daylight azure and uttering the signal to mans
 myriads, has no word apart for man the individual; and the moon, like a
 violin, only praises and laments our private destiny.  The stars alone,
 cheerful whisperers, confer quietly with each of us like friends; they
 give ear to our sorrows smilingly, like wise old men, rich in tolerance;
 and by their double scale, so small to the eye, so vast to the
 imagination, they keep before the mind the double character of mans
 nature and fate.
 
 There sat the Princess, beautifully looking upon beauty, in council with
 these glad advisers.  Bright like pictures, clear like a voice in the
 porches of her ear, memory re-enacted the tumult of the evening: the
 Countess and the dancing fan, the big Baron on his knees, the blood on
 the polished floor, the knocking, the swing of the litter down the avenue
 of lamps, the messenger, the cries of the charging mob; and yet all were
 far away and phantasmal, and she was still healingly conscious of the
 peace and glory of the night.  She looked towards Mittwalden; and above
 the hill-top, which already hid it from her view, a throbbing redness
 hinted of fire.  Better so: better so, that she should fall with tragic
 greatness, lit by a blazing palace!  She felt not a trace of pity for
 Gondremark or of concern for Grnewald: that period of her life was
 closed for ever, a wrench of wounded vanity alone surviving.  She had but
 one clear idea: to flee;and another, obscure and half-rejected, although
 still obeyed: to flee in the direction of the Felsenburg.  She had a duty
 to perform, she must free Ottoso her mind said, very coldly; but her
 heart embraced the notion of that duty even with ardour, and her hands
 began to yearn for the grasp of kindness.
 
 She rose, with a start of recollection, and plunged down the slope into
 the covert.  The woods received and closed upon her.  Once more, she
 wandered and hasted in a blot, uncheered, unpiloted.  Here and there,
 indeed, through rents in the wood-roof, a glimmer attracted her; here and
 there a tree stood out among its neighbours by some force of outline;
 here and there a brushing among the leaves, a notable blackness, a dim
 shine, relieved, only to exaggerate, the solid oppression of the night
 and silence.  And betweenwhiles, the unfeatured darkness would redouble
 and the whole ear of night appear to be gloating on her steps.  Now she
 would stand still, and the silence, would grow and grow, till it weighed
 upon her breathing; and then she would address herself again to run,
 stumbling, falling, and still hurrying the more.  And presently the whole
 wood rocked and began to run along with her.  The noise of her own mad
 passage through the silence spread and echoed, and filled the night with
 terror.  Panic hunted her: Panic from the trees reached forth with
 clutching branches; the darkness was lit up and peopled with strange
 forms and faces.  She strangled and fled before her fears.  And yet in
 the last fortress, reason, blown upon by these gusts of terror, still
 shone with a troubled light.  She knew, yet could not act upon her
 knowledge; she knew that she must stop, and yet she still ran.
 
 She was already near madness, when she broke suddenly into a narrow
 clearing.  At the same time the din grew louder, and she became conscious
 of vague forms and fields of whiteness.  And with that the earth gave
 way; she fell and found her feet again with an incredible shock to her
 senses, and her mind was swallowed up.
 
 When she came again to herself, she was standing to the mid-leg in an icy
 eddy of a brook, and leaning with one hand on the rock from which it
 poured.  The spray had wet her hair.  She saw the white cascade, the
 stars wavering in the shaken pool, foam flitting, and high overhead the
 tall pines on either hand serenely drinking starshine; and in the sudden
 quiet of her spirit she heard with joy the firm plunge of the cataract in
 the pool.  She scrambled forth dripping.  In the face of her proved
 weakness, to adventure again upon the horror of blackness in the groves
 were a suicide of life or reason.  But here, in the alley of the brook,
 with the kind stars above her, and the moon presently swimming into
 sight, she could await the coming of day without alarm.
 
 This lane of pine-trees ran very rapidly down-hill and wound among the
 woods; but it was a wider thoroughfare than the brook needed, and here
 and there were little dimpling lawns and coves of the forest, where the
 starshine slumbered.  Such a lawn she paced, taking patience bravely; and
 now she looked up the hill and saw the brook coming down to her in a
 series of cascades; and now approached the margin, where it welled among
 the rushes silently; and now gazed at the great company of heaven with an
 enduring wonder.  The early evening had fallen chill, but the night was
 now temperate; out of the recesses of the wood there came mild airs as
 from a deep and peaceful breathing; and the dew was heavy on the grass
 and the tight-shut daisies.  This was the girls first night under the
 naked heaven; and now that her fears were overpast, she was touched to
 the soul by its serene amenity and peace.  Kindly the host of heaven
 blinked down upon that wandering Princess; and the honest brook had no
 words but to encourage her.
 
 At last she began to be aware of a wonderful revolution, compared to
 which the fire of Mittwalden Palace was but the crack and flash of a
 percussion-cap.  The countenance with which the pines regarded her began
 insensibly to change; the grass too, short as it was, and the whole
 winding staircase of the brooks course, began to wear a solemn freshness
 of appearance.  And this slow transfiguration reached her heart, and
 played upon it, and transpierced it with a serious thrill.  She looked
 all about; the whole face of nature looked back, brimful of meaning,
 finger on lip, leaking its glad secret.  She looked up.  Heaven was
 almost emptied of stars.  Such as still lingered shone with a changed and
 waning brightness, and began to faint in their stations.  And the colour
 of the sky itself was the most wonderful; for the rich blue of the night
 had now melted and softened and brightened; and there had succeeded in
 its place a hue that has no name, and that is never seen but as the
 herald of morning.  O! she cried, joy catching at her voice, O! it is
 the dawn!
 
 In a breath she passed over the brook, and looped up her skirts and
 fairly ran in the dim alleys.  As she ran, her ears were aware of many
 pipings, more beautiful than music; in the small dish-shaped houses in
 the fork of giant arms, where they had lain all night, lover by lover,
 warmly pressed, the bright-eyed, big-hearted singers began to awaken for
 the day.  Her heart melted and flowed forth to them in kindness.  And
 they, from their small and high perches in the clerestories of the wood
 cathedral, peered down sidelong at the ragged Princess as she flitted
 below them on the carpet of the moss and tassel.
 
 Soon she had struggled to a certain hill-top, and saw far before her the
 silent inflooding of the day.  Out of the East it welled and whitened;
 the darkness trembled into light; and the stars were extinguished like
 the street-lamps of a human city.  The whiteness brightened into silver,
 the silver warmed into gold, the gold kindled into pure and living fire;
 and the face of the East was barred with elemental scarlet.  The day drew
 its first long breath, steady and chill; and for leagues around the woods
 sighed and shivered.  And then, at one bound, the sun had floated up; and
 her startled eyes received days first arrow, and quailed under the
 buffet.  On every side, the shadows leaped from their ambush and fell
 prone.  The day was come, plain and garish; and up the steep and solitary
 eastern heaven, the sun, victorious over his competitors, continued
 slowly and royally to mount.
 
 Seraphina drooped for a little, leaning on a pine, the shrill joy of the
 woodlands mocking her.  The shelter of the night, the thrilling and
 joyous changes of the dawn, were over; and now, in the hot eye of the
 day, she turned uneasily and looked sighingly about her.  Some way off
 among the lower woods, a pillar of smoke was mounting and melting in the
 gold and blue.  There, surely enough, were human folk, the
 hearth-surrounders.  Mans fingers had laid the twigs; it was mans
 breath that had quickened and encouraged the baby flames; and now, as the
 fire caught, it would be playing ruddily on the face of its creator.  At
 the thought, she felt a-cold and little and lost in that great
 out-of-doors.  The electric shock of the young sun-beams and the unhuman
 beauty of the woods began to irk and daunt her.  The covert of the house,
 the decent privacy of rooms, the swept and regulated fire, all that
 denotes or beautifies the home life of man, began to draw her as with
 cords.  The pillar of smoke was now risen into some stream of moving air;
 it began to lean out sideways in a pennon; and thereupon, as though the
 change had been a summons, Seraphina plunged once more into the labyrinth
 of the wood.
 
 She left day upon the high ground.  In the lower groves there still
 lingered the blue early twilight and the seizing freshness of the dew.
 But here and there, above this field of shadow, the head of a great
 outspread pine was already glorious with day; and here and there, through
 the breaches of the hills, the sun-beams made a great and luminous entry.
 Here Seraphina hastened along forest paths.  She had lost sight of the
 pilot smoke, which blew another way, and conducted herself in that great
 wilderness by the direction of the sun.  But presently fresh signs
 bespoke the neighbourhood of man; felled trunks, white slivers from the
 axe, bundles of green boughs, and stacks of firewood.  These guided her
 forward; until she came forth at last upon the clearing whence the smoke
 arose.  A hut stood in the clear shadow, hard by a brook which made a
 series of inconsiderable falls; and on the threshold the Princess saw a
 sun-burnt and hard-featured woodman, standing with his hands behind his
 back and gazing skyward.
 
 She went to him directly: a beautiful, bright-eyed, and haggard vision;
 splendidly arrayed and pitifully tattered; the diamond ear-drops still
 glittering in her ears; and with the movement of her coming, one small
 breast showing and hiding among the ragged covert of the laces.  At that
 ambiguous hour, and coming as she did from the great silence of the
 forest, the man drew back from the Princess as from something elfin.
 
 I am cold, she said, and weary.  Let me rest beside your fire.
 
 The woodman was visibly commoved, but answered nothing.
 
 I will pay, she said, and then repented of the words, catching perhaps
 a spark of terror from his frightened eyes.  But, as usual, her courage
 rekindled brighter for the check.  She put him from the door and entered;
 and he followed her in superstitious wonder.
 
 Within, the hut was rough and dark; but on the stone that served as
 hearth, twigs and a few dry branches burned with the brisk sounds and all
 the variable beauty of fire.  The very sight of it composed her; she
 crouched hard by on the earth floor and shivered in the glow, and looked
 upon the eating blaze with admiration.  The woodman was still staring at
 his guest: at the wreck of the rich dress, the bare arms, the bedraggled
 laces and the gems.  He found no word to utter.
 
 Give me food, said she,here, by the fire.
 
 He set down a pitcher of coarse wine, bread, a piece of cheese, and a
 handful of raw onions.  The bread was hard and sour, the cheese like
 leather; even the onion, which ranks with the truffle and the nectarine
 in the chief place of honour of earths fruits, is not perhaps a dish for
 princesses when raw.  But she ate, if not with appetite, with courage;
 and when she had eaten, did not disdain the pitcher.  In all her life
 before, she had not tasted of gross food nor drunk after another; but a
 brave woman far more readily accepts a change of circumstances than the
 bravest man.  All that while, the woodman continued to observe her
 furtively, many low thoughts of fear and greed contending in his eyes.
 She read them clearly, and she knew she must begone.
 
 Presently she arose and offered him a florin.
 
 Will that repay you? she asked.
 
 But here the man found his tongue.  I must have more than that, said
 he.
 
 It is all I have to give you, she returned, and passed him by serenely.
 
 Yet her heart trembled, for she saw his hand stretched forth as if to
 arrest her, and his unsteady eyes wandering to his axe.  A beaten path
 led westward from the clearing, and she swiftly followed it.  She did not
 glance behind her.  But as soon as the least turning of the path had
 concealed her from the woodmans eyes, she slipped among the trees and
 ran till she deemed herself in safety.
 
 By this time the strong sunshine pierced in a thousand places the
 pine-thatch of the forest, fired the red boles, irradiated the cool
 aisles of shadow, and burned in jewels on the grass.  The gum of these
 trees was dearer to the senses than the gums of Araby; each pine, in the
 lusty morning sunlight, burned its own wood-incense; and now and then a
 breeze would rise and toss these rooted censers, and send shade and
 sun-gem flitting, swift as swallows, thick as bees; and wake a brushing
 bustle of sounds that murmured and went by.
 
 On she passed, and up and down, in sun and shadow; now aloft on the bare
 ridge among the rocks and birches, with the lizards and the snakes; and
 anon in the deep grove among sunless pillars.  Now she followed wandering
 wood-paths, in the maze of valleys; and again, from a hill-top, beheld
 the distant mountains and the great birds circling under the sky.  She
 would see afar off a nestling hamlet, and go round to avoid it.  Below,
 she traced the course of the foam of mountain torrents.  Nearer hand, she
 saw where the tender springs welled up in silence, or oozed in green
 moss; or in the more favoured hollows a whole family of infant rivers
 would combine, and tinkle in the stones, and lie in pools to be a
 bathing-place for sparrows, or fall from the sheer rock in rods of
 crystal.  Upon all these things, as she still sped along in the bright
 air, she looked with a rapture of surprise and a joyful fainting of the
 heart; they seemed so novel, they touched so strangely home, they were so
 hued and scented, they were so beset and canopied by the dome of the blue
 air of heaven.
 
 At length, when she was well weary, she came upon a wide and shallow
 pool.  Stones stood in it, like islands; bulrushes fringed the coast; the
 floor was paved with the pine needles; and the pines themselves, whose
 roots made promontories, looked down silently on their green images.  She
 crept to the margin and beheld herself with wonder, a hollow and
 bright-eyed phantom, in the ruins of her palace robe.  The breeze now
 shook her image; now it would be marred with flies; and at that she
 smiled; and from the fading circles, her counterpart smiled back to her
 and looked kind.  She sat long in the warm sun, and pitied her bare arms
 that were all bruised and marred with falling, and marvelled to see that
 she was dirty, and could not grow to believe that she had gone so long in
 such a strange disorder.
 
 Then, with a sigh, she addressed herself to make a toilette by that
 forest mirror, washed herself pure from all the stains of her adventure,
 took off her jewels and wrapped them in her handkerchief, re-arranged the
 tatters of her dress, and took down the folds of her hair.  She shook it
 round her face, and the pool repeated her thus veiled.  Her hair had
 smelt like violets, she remembered Otto saying; and so now she tried to
 smell it, and then shook her head, and laughed a little, sadly, to
 herself.
 
 The laugh was returned upon her in a childish echo.
 
 She looked up; and lo! two children looking on,a small girl and a yet
 smaller boy, standing, like playthings, by the pool, below a spreading
 pine.  Seraphina was not fond of children, and now she was startled to
 the heart.
 
 Who are you? she cried hoarsely.
 
 The mites huddled together and drew back; and Seraphinas heart
 reproached her that she should have frightened things so quaint and
 little, and yet alive with senses.  She thought upon the birds and looked
 again at her two visitors; so little larger and so far more innocent.  On
 their clear faces, as in a pool, she saw the reflection of their fears.
 With gracious purpose she arose.
 
 Come, she said, do not be afraid of me, and took a step towards them.
 
 But alas! at the first moment, the two poor babes in the wood turned and
 ran helter-skelter from the Princess.
 
 The most desolate pang was struck into the girls heart.  Here she was,
 twenty-twosoon twenty-threeand not a creature loved her; none but Otto;
 and would even he forgive?  If she began weeping in these woods alone, it
 would mean death or madness.  Hastily she trod the thoughts out like a
 burning paper; hastily rolled up her locks, and with terror dogging her,
 and her whole bosom sick with grief, resumed her journey.
 
 Past ten in the forenoon, she struck a high-road, marching in that place
 uphill between two stately groves, a river of sunlight; and here, dead
 weary, careless of consequences, and taking some courage from the human
 and civilised neighbourhood of the road, she stretched herself on the
 green margin in the shadow of a tree.  Sleep closed on her, at first with
 a horror of fainting, but when she ceased to struggle, kindly embracing
 her.  So she was taken home for a little, from all her toils and sorrows,
 to her Fathers arms.  And there in the meanwhile her body lay exposed by
 the highwayside, in tattered finery; and on either hand from the woods
 the birds came flying by and calling upon others, and debated in their
 own tongue this strange appearance.
 
 The sun pursued his journey; the shadow flitted from her feet, shrank
 higher and higher, and was upon the point of leaving her altogether, when
 the rumble of a coach was signalled to and fro by the birds.  The road in
 that part was very steep; the rumble drew near with great deliberation;
 and ten minutes passed before a gentleman appeared, walking with a sober
 elderly gait upon the grassy margin of the highway, and looking
 pleasantly around him as he walked.  From time to time he paused, took
 out his note-book and made an entry with a pencil; and any spy who had
 been near enough would have heard him mumbling words as though he were a
 poet testing verses.  The voice of the wheels was still faint, and it was
 plain the traveller had far outstripped his carriage.
 
 He had drawn very near to where the Princess lay asleep, before his eye
 alighted on her; but when it did he started, pocketed his note-book, and
 approached.  There was a milestone close to where she lay; and he sat
 down on that and coolly studied her.  She lay upon one side, all curled
 and sunken, her brow on one bare arm, the other stretched out, limp and
 dimpled.  Her young body, like a thing thrown down, had scarce a mark of
 life.  Her breathing stirred her not.  The deadliest fatigue was thus
 confessed in every language of the sleeping flesh.  The traveller smiled
 grimly.  As though he had looked upon a statue, he made a grudging
 inventory of her charms: the figure in that touching freedom of
 forgetfulness surprised him; the flush of slumber became her like a
 flower.
 
 Upon my word, he thought, I did not think the girl could be so pretty.
 And to think, he added, that I am under obligation not to use one word
 of this!  He put forth his stick and touched her; and at that she awoke,
 sat up with a cry, and looked upon him wildly.
 
 I trust your Highness has slept well, he said, nodding.
 
 But she only uttered sounds.
 
 Compose yourself, said he, giving her certainly a brave example in his
 own demeanour.  My chaise is close at hand; and I shall have, I trust,
 the singular entertainment of abducting a sovereign Princess.
 
 Sir John! she said, at last.
 
 At your Highnesss disposal, he replied.
 
 She sprang to her feet.  O! she cried, have you come from Mittwalden?
 
 This morning, he returned, I left it; and if there is any one less
 likely to return to it than yourself, behold him!
 
 The Baron she began, and paused.
 
 Madam, he answered, it was well meant, and you are quite a Judith; but
 after the hours that have elapsed, you will probably be relieved to hear
 that he is fairly well.  I took his news this morning ere I left.  Doing
 fairly well, they said, but suffering acutely.  Hey?acutely.  They could
 hear his groans in the next room.
 
 And the Prince, she asked, is anything known of him?
 
 It is reported, replied Sir John, with the same pleasurable
 deliberation, that upon that point your Highness is the best authority.
 
 Sir John, she said eagerly, you were generous enough to speak about
 your carriage.  Will you, I beseech you, will you take me to the
 Felsenburg?  I have business there of an extreme importance.
 
 I can refuse you nothing, replied the old gentleman, gravely and
 seriously enough.  Whatever, madam, it is in my power to do for you,
 that shall be done with pleasure.  As soon as my chaise shall overtake
 us, it is yours to carry you where you will.  But, added he, reverting
 to his former manner, I observe you ask me nothing of the Palace.
 
 I do not care, she said.  I thought I saw it burning.
 
 Prodigious! said the Baronet.  You thought?  And can the loss of forty
 toilettes leave you cold?  Well, madam, I admire your fortitude.  And the
 state, too?  As I left, the government was sitting,the new government,
 of which at least two members must be known to you by name: Sabra, who
 had, I believe, the benefit of being formed in your employmenta footman,
 am I right?and our old friend the Chancellor, in something of a
 subaltern position.  But in these convulsions the last shall be first,
 and the first last.
 
 Sir John, she said, with an air of perfect honesty, I am sure you mean
 most kindly, but these matters have no interest for me.
 
 The Baronet was so utterly discountenanced that he hailed the appearance
 of his chaise with welcome, and, by way of saying something, proposed
 that they should walk back to meet it.  So it was done; and he helped her
 in with courtesy, mounted to her side, and from various receptacles (for
 the chaise was most completely fitted out) produced fruits and truffled
 liver, beautiful white bread, and a bottle of delicate wine.  With these
 he served her like a father, coaxing and praising her to fresh exertions;
 and during all that time, as though silenced by the laws of hospitality,
 he was not guilty of the shadow of a sneer.  Indeed his kindness seemed
 so genuine that Seraphina was moved to gratitude.
 
 Sir John, she said, you hate me in your heart; why are you so kind to
 me?
 
 Ah, my good lady, said he, with no disclaimer of the accusation, I
 have the honour to be much your husbands friend, and somewhat his
 admirer.
 
 You! she cried.  They told me you wrote cruelly of both of us.
 
 Such was the strange path by which we grew acquainted, said Sir John.
 I had written, madam, with particular cruelty (since that shall be the
 phrase) of your fair self.  Your husband set me at liberty, gave me a
 passport, ordered a carriage, and then, with the most boyish spirit,
 challenged me to fight.  Knowing the nature of his married life, I
 thought the dash and loyalty he showed delightful.  Do not be afraid,
 says he; if I am killed, there is nobody to miss me.  It appears you
 subsequently thought of that yourself.  But I digress.  I explained to
 him it was impossible that I could fight!  Not if I strike you? says
 he.  Very droll; I wish I could have put it in my book.  However, I was
 conquered, took the young gentleman to my high favour, and tore up my
 bits of scandal on the spot.  That is one of the little favours, madam,
 that you owe your husband.
 
 Seraphina sat for some while in silence.  She could bear to be misjudged
 without a pang by those whom she contemned; she had none of Ottos
 eagerness to be approved, but went her own way straight and head in air.
 To Sir John, however, after what he had said, and as her husbands
 friend, she was prepared to stoop.
 
 What do you think of me? she asked abruptly.
 
 I have told you already, said Sir John: I think you want another glass
 of my good wine.
 
 Come, she said, this is unlike you.  You are not wont to be afraid.
 You say that you admire my husband: in his name, be honest.
 
 I admire your courage, said the Baronet.  Beyond that, as you have
 guessed, and indeed said, our natures are not sympathetic.
 
 You spoke of scandal, pursued Seraphina.  Was the scandal great?
 
 It was considerable, said Sir John.
 
 And you believed it? she demanded.
 
 O, madam, said Sir John, the question!
 
 Thank you for that answer! cried Seraphina.  And now here, I will tell
 you, upon my honour, upon my soul, in spite of all the scandal in this
 world, I am as true a wife as ever stood.
 
 We should probably not agree upon a definition, observed Sir John.
 
 O! she cried, I have abominably used himI know that; it is not that I
 mean.  But if you admire my husband, I insist that you shall understand
 me: I can look him in the face without a blush.
 
 It may be, madam, said Sir John; nor have I presumed to think the
 contrary.
 
 You will not believe me? she cried.  You think I am a guilty wife?
 You think he was my lover?
 
 Madam, returned the Baronet, when I tore up my papers, I promised your
 good husband to concern myself no more with your affairs; and I assure
 you for the last time that I have no desire to judge you.
 
 But you will not acquit me!  Ah! she cried, _he_ willhe knows me
 better!
 
 Sir John smiled.
 
 You smile at my distress? asked Seraphina.
 
 At your womans coolness, said Sir John.  A man would scarce have had
 the courage of that cry, which was, for all that, very natural, and I
 make no doubt quite true.  But remark, madamsince you do me the honour
 to consult me gravelyI have no pity for what you call your distresses.
 You have been completely selfish, and now reap the consequence.  Had you
 once thought of your husband, instead of singly thinking of yourself, you
 would not now have been alone, a fugitive, with blood upon your hands,
 and hearing from a morose old Englishman truth more bitter than scandal.
 
 I thank you, she said, quivering.  This is very true.  Will you stop
 the carriage?
 
 No, child, said Sir John, not until I see you mistress of yourself.
 
 There was a long pause, during which the carriage rolled by rock and
 woodland.
 
 And now, she resumed, with perfect steadiness, will you consider me
 composed?  I request you, as a gentleman, to let me out.
 
 I think you do unwisely, he replied.  Continue, if you please, to use
 my carriage.
 
 Sir John, she said, if death were sitting on that pile of stones, I
 would alight!  I do not blame, I thank you; I now know how I appear to
 others; but sooner than draw breath beside a man who can so think of me,
 I wouldO! she cried, and was silent.
 
 Sir John pulled the string, alighted, and offered her his hand; but she
 refused the help.
 
 The road had now issued from the valleys in which it had been winding,
 and come to that part of its course where it runs, like a cornice, along
 the brow of the steep northward face of Grnewald.  The place where they
 had alighted was at a salient angle; a bold rock and some wind-tortured
 pine-trees overhung it from above; far below the blue plains lay forth
 and melted into heaven; and before them the road, by a succession of bold
 zigzags, was seen mounting to where a tower upon a tall cliff closed the
 view.
 
 There, said the Baronet, pointing to the tower, you see the
 Felsenburg, your goal.  I wish you a good journey, and regret I cannot be
 of more assistance.
 
 He mounted to his place and gave a signal, and the carriage rolled away.
 
 Seraphina stood by the wayside, gazing before her with blind eyes.  Sir
 John she had dismissed already from her mind: she hated him, that was
 enough; for whatever Seraphina hated or contemned fell instantly to
 Lilliputian smallness, and was thenceforward steadily ignored in thought.
 And now she had matter for concern indeed.  Her interview with Otto,
 which she had never yet forgiven him, began to appear before her in a
 very different light.  He had come to her, still thrilling under recent
 insult, and not yet breathed from fighting her own cause; and how that
 knowledge changed the value of his words!  Yes, he must have loved her!
 this was a brave feelingit was no mere weakness of the will.  And she,
 was she incapable of love?  It would appear so; and she swallowed her
 tears, and yearned to see Otto, to explain all, to ask pity upon her
 knees for her transgressions, and, if all else were now beyond the reach
 of reparation, to restore at least the liberty of which she had deprived
 him.
 
 Swiftly she sped along the highway, and, as the road wound out and in
 about the bluffs and gullies of the mountain, saw and lost by glimpses
 the tall tower that stood before and above her, purpled by the mountain
 air.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IITREATS OF A CHRISTIAN VIRTUE
 
 
 When Otto mounted to his rolling prison he found another occupant in a
 corner of the front seat; but as this person hung his head and the
 brightness of the carriage lamps shone outward, the Prince could only see
 it was a man.  The Colonel followed his prisoner and clapped-to the door;
 and at that the four horses broke immediately into a swinging trot.
 
 Gentlemen, said the Colonel, after some little while had passed, if we
 are to travel in silence, we might as well be at home.  I appear, of
 course, in an invidious character; but I am a man of taste, fond of books
 and solidly informing talk, and unfortunately condemned for life to the
 guard-room.  Gentlemen, this is my chance: dont spoil it for me.  I have
 here the pick of the whole court, barring lovely woman; I have a great
 author in the person of the Doctor
 
 Gotthold! cried Otto.
 
 It appears, said the Doctor bitterly, that we must go together.  Your
 Highness had not calculated upon that.
 
 What do you infer? cried Otto; that I had you arrested?
 
 The inference is simple, said the Doctor.
 
 Colonel Gordon, said the Prince, oblige me so far, and set me right
 with Herr von Hohenstockwitz.
 
 Gentlemen, said the Colonel, you are both arrested on the same warrant
 in the name of the Princess Seraphina, acting regent, countersigned by
 Prime Minister Freiherr von Gondremark, and dated the day before
 yesterday, the twelfth.  I reveal to you the secrets of the
 prison-house, he added.
 
 Otto, said Gotthold, I ask you to pardon my suspicions.
 
 Gotthold, said the Prince, I am not certain I can grant you that.
 
 Your Highness is, I am sure, far too magnanimous to hesitate, said the
 Colonel.  But allow me: we speak at home in my religion of the means of
 grace: and I now propose to offer them.  So saying, the Colonel lighted
 a bright lamp which he attached to one side of the carriage, and from
 below the front seat produced a goodly basket adorned with the long necks
 of bottles.  _Tu spem reducis_how does it go, Doctor? he asked gaily.
 I am, in a sense, your host; and I am sure you are both far too
 considerate of my embarrassing position to refuse to do me honour.
 Gentlemen, I drink to the Prince!
 
 Colonel, said Otto, we have a jovial entertainer.  I drink to Colonel
 Gordon.
 
 Thereupon all three took their wine very pleasantly; and even as they did
 so, the carriage with a lurch turned into the high-road and began to make
 better speed.
 
 All was bright within; the wine had coloured Gottholds cheek; dim forms
 of forest trees, dwindling and spiring, scarves of the starry sky, now
 wide and now narrow, raced past the windows, through one that was left
 open the air of the woods came in with a nocturnal raciness; and the roll
 of wheels and the tune of the trotting horses sounded merrily on the ear.
 Toast followed toast; glass after glass was bowed across and emptied by
 the trio; and presently there began to fall upon them a luxurious spell,
 under the influence of which little but the sound of quiet and
 confidential laughter interrupted the long intervals of meditative
 silence.
 
 Otto, said Gotthold, after one of these seasons of quiet, I do not ask
 you to forgive me.  Were the parts reversed, I could not forgive you.
 
 Well, said Otto, it is a phrase we use.  I do forgive you, but your
 words and your suspicions rankle; and not yours alone.  It is idle,
 Colonel Gordon, in view of the order you are carrying out, to conceal
 from you the dissensions of my family; they have gone so far that they
 are now public property.  Well, gentlemen, can I forgive my wife?  I can,
 of course, and do; but in what sense?  I would certainly not stoop to any
 revenge; as certainly I could not think of her but as one changed beyond
 my recognition.
 
 Allow me, returned the Colonel.  You will permit me to hope that I am
 addressing Christians?  We are all conscious, I trust, that we are
 miserable sinners.
 
 I disown the consciousness, said Gotthold.  Warmed with this good
 fluid, I deny your thesis.
 
 How, sir?  You never did anything wrong? and I heard you asking pardon
 but this moment, not of your God, sir, but of a common fellow-worm! the
 Colonel cried.
 
 I own you have me; you are expert in argument, Herr Oberst, said the
 Doctor.
 
 Begad, sir, I am proud to hear you say so, said the Colonel.  I was
 well grounded indeed at Aberdeen.  And as for this matter of forgiveness,
 it comes, sir, of loose views and (what is if anything more dangerous) a
 regular life.  A sound creed and a bad morality, thats the root of
 wisdom.  You two gentlemen are too good to be forgiving.
 
 The paradox is somewhat forced, said Gotthold.
 
 Pardon me, Colonel, said the Prince; I readily acquit you of any
 design of offence, but your words bite like satire.  Is this a time, do
 you think, when I can wish to hear myself called good, now that I am
 paying the penalty (and am willing like yourself to think it just) of my
 prolonged misconduct?
 
 O, pardon me! cried the Colonel.  You have never been expelled from
 the divinity hall; you have never been broke.  I was: broke for a neglect
 of military duty.  To tell you the open truth, your Highness, I was the
 worse of drink; its a thing I never do now, he added, taking out his
 glass.  But a man, you see, who has really tasted the defects of his own
 character, as I have, and has come to regard himself as a kind of blind
 teetotum knocking about life, begins to learn a very different view about
 forgiveness.  I will talk of not forgiving others, sir, when I have made
 out to forgive myself, and not before; and the date is like to be a long
 one.  My father, the Reverend Alexander Gordon, was a good man, and
 damned hard upon others.  I am what they call a bad one, and that is just
 the difference.  The man who cannot forgive any mortal thing is a green
 hand in life.
 
 And yet I have heard of you, Colonel, as a duellist, said Gotthold.
 
 A different thing, sir, replied the soldier.  Professional etiquette.
 And I trust without unchristian feeling.
 
 Presently after the Colonel fell into a deep sleep and his companions
 looked upon each other, smiling.
 
 An odd fish, said Gotthold.
 
 And a strange guardian, said the Prince.  Yet what he said was true.
 
 Rightly looked upon, mused Gotthold, it is ourselves that we cannot
 forgive, when we refuse forgiveness to our friend.  Some strand of our
 own misdoing is involved in every quarrel.
 
 Are there not offences that disgrace the pardoner? asked Otto.  Are
 there not bounds of self-respect?
 
 Otto, said Gotthold, does any man respect himself?  To this poor waif
 of a soldier of fortune we may seem respectable gentlemen; but to
 ourselves, what are we unless a pasteboard portico and a deliquium of
 deadly weaknesses within?
 
 I? yes, said Otto; but you, Gottholdyou, with your interminable
 industry, your keen mind, your booksserving mankind, scorning pleasures
 and temptations!  You do not know how I envy you.
 
 Otto, said the Doctor, in one word, and a bitter one to say: I am a
 secret tippler.  Yes, I drink too much.  The habit has robbed these very
 books, to which you praise my devotion, of the merits that they should
 have had.  It has spoiled my temper.  When I spoke to you the other day,
 how much of my warmth was in the cause of virtue? how much was the fever
 of last nights wine?  Ay, as my poor fellow-sot there said, and as I
 vaingloriously denied, we are all miserable sinners, put here for a
 moment, knowing the good, choosing the evil, standing naked and ashamed
 in the eye of God.
 
 Is it so? said Otto.  Why, then, what are we?  Are the very best
 
 There is no best in man, said Gotthold.  I am not better, it is likely
 I am not worse, than you or that poor sleeper.  I was a sham, and now you
 know me: that is all.
 
 And yet it has not changed my love, returned Otto softly.  Our
 misdeeds do not change us.  Gotthold, fill your glass.  Let us drink to
 what is good in this bad business; let us drink to our old affection;
 and, when we have done so, forgive your too just grounds of offence, and
 drink with me to my wife, whom I have so misused, who has so misused me,
 and whom I have left, I fear, I greatly fear, in danger.  What matters it
 how bad we are, if others can still love us, and we can still love
 others?
 
 Ay! replied the Doctor.  It is very well said.  It is the true answer
 to the pessimist, and the standing miracle of mankind.  So you still love
 me? and so you can forgive your wife?  Why, then, we may bid conscience
 Down, dog, like an ill-trained puppy yapping at shadows.
 
 The pair fell into silence, the Doctor tapping on his empty glass.
 
 The carriage swung forth out of the valleys on that open balcony of
 high-road that runs along the front of Grnewald, looking down on
 Gerolstein.  Far below, a white waterfall was shining to the stars from
 the falling skirts of forest, and beyond that, the night stood naked
 above the plain.  On the other hand, the lamp-light skimmed the face of
 the precipices, and the dwarf pine-trees twinkled with all their needles,
 and were gone again into the wake.  The granite roadway thundered under
 wheels and hoofs; and at times, by reason of its continual winding, Otto
 could see the escort on the other side of a ravine, riding well together
 in the night.  Presently the Felsenburg came plainly in view, some way
 above them, on a bold projection of the mountain, and planting its bulk
 against the starry sky.
 
 See, Gotthold, said the Prince, our destination.
 
 Gotthold awoke as from a trance.
 
 I was thinking, said he, if there is any danger, why did you not
 resist?  I was told you came of your free will; but should you not be
 there to help her?
 
 The colour faded from the Princes cheeks.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIPROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE LAST
 IN WHICH SHE GALLOPS OFF
 
 
 When the busy Countess came forth from her interview with Seraphina, it
 is not too much to say that she was beginning to be terribly afraid.  She
 paused in the corridor and reckoned up her doings with an eye to
 Gondremark.  The fan was in requisition in an instant; but her disquiet
 was beyond the reach of fanning.  The girl has lost her head, she
 thought; and then dismally, I have gone too far.  She instantly decided
 on secession.  Now the _Mons Sacer_ of the Frau von Rosen was a certain
 rustic villa in the forest, called by herself, in a smart attack of
 poesy, Tannen Zauber, and by everybody else plain Kleinbrunn.
 
 Thither, upon the thought, she furiously drove, passing Gondremark at the
 entrance to the Palace avenue, but feigning not to observe him; and as
 Kleinbrunn was seven good miles away, and in the bottom of a narrow dell,
 she passed the night without any rumour of the outbreak reaching her; and
 the glow of the conflagration was concealed by intervening hills.  Frau
 von Rosen did not sleep well; she was seriously uneasy as to the results
 of her delightful evening, and saw herself condemned to quite a lengthy
 sojourn in her deserts and a long defensive correspondence, ere she could
 venture to return to Gondremark.  On the other hand, she examined, by way
 of pastime, the deeds she had received from Otto; and even here saw cause
 for disappointment.  In these troublous days she had no taste for landed
 property, and she was convinced, besides, that Otto had paid dearer than
 the farm was worth.  Lastly, the order for the Princes release fairly
 burned her meddling fingers.
 
 All things considered, the next day beheld an elegant and beautiful lady,
 in a riding-habit and a flapping hat, draw bridle at the gate of the
 Felsenburg, not perhaps with any clear idea of her purpose, but with her
 usual experimental views on life.  Governor Gordon, summoned to the gate,
 welcomed the omnipotent Countess with his most gallant bearing, though it
 was wonderful how old he looked in the morning.
 
 Ah, Governor, she said, we have surprises for you, sir, and nodded at
 him meaningly.
 
 Eh, madam, leave me my prisoners, he said; and if you will but join
 the band, begad, Ill be happy for life.
 
 You would spoil me, would you not? she asked.
 
 I would try, I would try, returned the Governor, and he offered her his
 arm.
 
 She took it, picked up her skirt, and drew him close to her.  I have
 come to see the Prince, she said.  Now, infidel! on business.  A
 message from that stupid Gondremark, who keeps me running like a courier.
 Do I look like one, Herr Gordon? And she planted her eyes in him.
 
 You look like an angel, maam, returned the Governor, with a great air
 of finished gallantry.
 
 The Countess laughed.  An angel on horseback! she said.  Quick work.
 
 You came, you saw, you conquered, flourished Gordon, in high good
 humour with his own wit and grace.  We toasted you, madam, in the
 carriage, in an excellent good glass of wine; toasted you fathom deep;
 the finest woman, with, begad, the finest eyes in Grnewald.  I never saw
 the like of them but once, in my own country, when I was a young fool at
 College: Thomasina Haig her name was.  I give you my word of honour, she
 was as like you as two peas.
 
 And so you were merry in the carriage? asked the Countess, gracefully
 dissembling a yawn.
 
 We were; we had a very pleasant conversation; but we took perhaps a
 glass more than that fine fellow of a Prince has been accustomed to,
 said the Governor; and I observe this morning that he seems a little off
 his mettle.  Well get him mellow again ere bedtime.  This is his door.
 
 Well, she whispered, let me get my breath.  No, no; wait.  Have the
 door ready to open.  And the Countess, standing like one inspired, shook
 out her fine voice in Lascia chio pianga; and when she had reached the
 proper point, and lyrically uttered forth her sighings after liberty, the
 door, at a sign, was flung wide open, and she swam into the Princes
 sight, bright-eyed, and with her colour somewhat freshened by the
 exercise of singing.  It was a great dramatic entrance, and to the
 somewhat doleful prisoner within the sight was sunshine.
 
 Ah, madam, he cried, running to heryou here!
 
 She looked meaningly at Gordon; and as soon as the door was closed she
 fell on Ottos neck.  To see you here! she moaned and clung to him.
 
 But the Prince stood somewhat stiffly in that enviable situation, and the
 Countess instantly recovered from her outburst.
 
 Poor child, she said, poor child!  Sit down beside me here, and tell
 me all about it.  My heart really bleeds to see you.  How does time go?
 
 Madam, replied the Prince, sitting down beside her, his gallantry
 recovered, the time will now go all too quickly till you leave.  But I
 must ask you for the news.  I have most bitterly condemned myself for my
 inertia of last night.  You wisely counselled me; it was my duty to
 resist.  You wisely and nobly counselled me; I have since thought of it
 with wonder.  You have a noble heart.
 
 Otto, she said, spare me.  Was it even right, I wonder?  I have
 duties, too, you poor child; and when I see you they all meltall my good
 resolutions fly away.
 
 And mine still come too late, he replied, sighing.  O, what would I
 not give to have resisted?  What would I not give for freedom?
 
 Well, what would you give? she asked; and the red fan was spread; only
 her eyes, as if from over battlements, brightly surveyed him.
 
 I?  What do you mean?  Madam, you have some news for me, he cried.
 
 O, O! said madam dubiously.
 
 He was at her feet.  Do not trifle with my hopes, he pleaded.  Tell
 me, dearest Madame von Rosen, tell me!  You cannot be cruel: it is not in
 your nature.  Give?  I can give nothing; I have nothing; I can only plead
 in mercy.
 
 Do not, she said; it is not fair.  Otto, you know my weakness.  Spare
 me.  Be generous.
 
 O, madam, he said, it is for you to be generous, to have pity.  He
 took her hand and pressed it; he plied her with caresses and appeals.
 The Countess had a most enjoyable sham siege, and then relented.  She
 sprang to her feet, she tore her dress open, and, all warm from her
 bosom, threw the order on the floor.
 
 There! she cried.  I forced it from her.  Use it, and I am ruined!
 And she turned away as if to veil the force of her emotions.
 
 Otto sprang upon the paper, read it, and cried out aloud.  O, God bless
 her! he said, God bless her.  And he kissed the writing.
 
 Von Rosen was a singularly good-natured woman, but her part was now
 beyond her.  Ingrate! she cried; I wrung it from her, I betrayed my
 trust to get it, and tis she you thank!
 
 Can you blame me? said the Prince.  I love her.
 
 I see that, she said.  And I?
 
 You, Madame von Rosen?  You are my dearest, my kindest, and most
 generous of friends, he said, approaching her.  You would be a perfect
 friend, if you were not so lovely.  You have a great sense of humour, you
 cannot be unconscious of your charm, and you amuse yourself at times by
 playing on my weakness; and at times I can take pleasure in the comedy.
 But not to-day: to-day you will be the true, the serious, the manly
 friend, and you will suffer me to forget that you are lovely and that I
 am weak.  Come, dear Countess, let me to-day repose in you entirely.
 
 He held out his hand, smiling, and she took it frankly.  I vow you have
 bewitched me, she said; and then with a laugh, I break my staff! she
 added; and I must pay you my best compliment.  You made a difficult
 speech.  You are as adroit, dear Prince, as I amcharming.  And as she
 said the word with a great curtsey, she justified it.
 
 You hardly keep the bargain, madam, when you make yourself so
 beautiful, said the Prince, bowing.
 
 It was my last arrow, she returned.  I am disarmed.  Blank cartridge,
 _O mon Prince_!  And now I tell you, if you choose to leave this prison,
 you can, and I am ruined.  Choose!
 
 Madame von Rosen, replied Otto, I choose, and I will go.  My duty
 points me, duty still neglected by this Featherhead.  But do not fear to
 be a loser.  I propose instead that you should take me with you, a bear
 in chains, to Baron Gondremark.  I am become perfectly unscrupulous: to
 save my wife I will do all, all he can ask or fancy.  He shall be filled;
 were he huge as leviathan and greedy as the grave, I will content him.
 And you, the fairy of our pantomime, shall have the credit.
 
 Done! she cried.  Admirable!  Prince Charming no longerPrince
 Sorcerer, Prince Solon!  Let us go this moment.  Stay, she cried,
 pausing.  I beg dear Prince, to give you back these deeds.  Twas you
 who liked the farmI have not seen it; and it was you who wished to
 benefit the peasants.  And, besides, she added, with a comical change of
 tone, I should prefer the ready money.
 
 Both laughed.  Here I am, once more a farmer, said Otto, accepting the
 papers, but overwhelmed in debt.
 
 The Countess touched a bell, and the Governor appeared.
 
 Governor, she said, I am going to elope with his Highness.  The result
 of our talk has been a thorough understanding, and the _coup dtat_ is
 over.  Here is the order.
 
 Colonel Gordon adjusted silver spectacles upon his nose.  Yes, he said,
 the Princess: very right.  But the warrant, madam, was countersigned.
 
 By Heinrich! said von Rosen.  Well, and here am I to represent him.
 
 Well, your Highness, resumed the soldier of fortune, I must
 congratulate you upon my loss.  You have been cut out by beauty, and I am
 left lamenting.  The Doctor still remains to me: _probus_, _doctus_,
 _lepidus_, _jucundus_: a man of books.
 
 Ay, there is nothing about poor Gotthold, said the Prince.
 
 The Governors consolation?  Would you leave him bare? asked von Rosen.
 
 And, your Highness, resumed Gordon, may I trust that in the course of
 this temporary obscuration, you have found me discharge my part with
 suitable respect and, I may add, tact?  I adopted purposely a
 cheerfulness of manner; mirth, it appeared to me, and a good glass of
 wine, were the fit alleviations.
 
 Colonel, said Otto, holding out his hand, your society was of itself
 enough.  I do not merely thank you for your pleasant spirits; I have to
 thank you, besides, for some philosophy, of which I stood in need.  I
 trust I do not see you for the last time; and in the meanwhile, as a
 memento of our strange acquaintance, let me offer you these verses on
 which I was but now engaged.  I am so little of a poet, and was so ill
 inspired by prison bars, that they have some claim to be at least a
 curiosity.
 
 The Colonels countenance lighted as he took the paper; the silver
 spectacles were hurriedly replaced.  Ha! he said, Alexandrines, the
 tragic metre.  I shall cherish this, your Highness, like a relic; no more
 suitable offering, although I say it, could be made. _Dieux de limmense
 plaine et des vastes forts_.  Very good, he said, very good indeed!
 _Et du gelier lui-mme apprendre des leons_.  Most handsome, begad!
 
 Come, Governor, cried the Countess, you can read his poetry when we
 are gone.  Open your grudging portals.
 
 I ask your pardon, said the Colonel.  To a man of my character and
 tastes, these verses, this handsome referencemost moving, I assure you.
 Can I offer you an escort?
 
 No, no, replied the Countess.  We go incogniti, as we arrived.  We
 ride together; the Prince will take my servants horse.  Hurry and
 privacy, Herr Oberst, that is all we seek. And she began impatiently to
 lead the way.
 
 But Otto had still to bid farewell to Dr. Gotthold; and the Governor
 following, with his spectacles in one hand and the paper in the other,
 had still to communicate his treasured verses, piece by piece, as he
 succeeded in deciphering the manuscript, to all he came across; and still
 his enthusiasm mounted.  I declare, he cried at last, with the air of
 one who has at length divined a mystery, they remind me of Robbie
 Burns!
 
 But there is an end to all things; and at length Otto was walking by the
 side of Madame von Rosen, along that mountain wall, her servant following
 with both the horses, and all about them sunlight, and breeze, and flying
 bird, and the vast regions of the air, and the capacious prospect:
 wildwood and climbing pinnacle, and the sound and voice of mountain
 torrents, at their hand: and far below them, green melting into sapphire
 on the plains.
 
 They walked at first in silence; for Ottos mind was full of the delight
 of liberty and nature, and still, betweenwhiles, he was preparing his
 interview with Gondremark.  But when the first rough promontory of the
 rock was turned, and the Felsenburg concealed behind its bulk, the lady
 paused.
 
 Here, she said, I will dismount poor Karl, and you and I must ply our
 spurs.  I love a wild ride with a good companion.
 
 As she spoke, a carriage came into sight round the corner next below them
 in the order of the road.  It came heavily creaking, and a little ahead
 of it a traveller was soberly walking, note-book in hand.
 
 It is Sir John, cried Otto, and he hailed him.
 
 The Baronet pocketed his note-book, stared through an eye-glass, and then
 waved his stick; and he on his side, and the Countess and the Prince on
 theirs, advanced with somewhat quicker steps.  They met at the re-entrant
 angle, where a thin stream sprayed across a boulder and was scattered in
 rain among the brush; and the Baronet saluted the Prince with much
 punctilio.  To the Countess, on the other hand, he bowed with a kind of
 sneering wonder.
 
 Is it possible, madam, that you have not heard the news? he asked.
 
 What news? she cried.
 
 News of the first order, returned Sir John: a revolution in the State,
 a Republic declared, the palace burned to the ground, the Princess in
 flight, Gondremark wounded
 
 Heinrich wounded? she screamed.
 
 Wounded and suffering acutely, said Sir John.  His groans
 
 There fell from the ladys lips an oath so potent that, in smoother
 hours, it would have made her hearers jump.  She ran to her horse,
 scrambled to the saddle, and, yet half seated, dashed down the road at
 full gallop.  The groom, after a pause of wonder, followed her.  The rush
 of her impetuous passage almost scared the carriage horses over the verge
 of the steep hill; and still she clattered further, and the crags echoed
 to her flight, and still the groom flogged vainly in pursuit of her.  At
 the fourth corner, a woman trailing slowly up leaped back with a cry and
 escaped death by a hands-breadth.  But the Countess wasted neither
 glance nor thought upon the incident.  Out and in, about the bluffs of
 the mountain wall, she fled, loose-reined, and still the groom toiled in
 her pursuit.
 
 A most impulsive lady! said Sir John.  Who would have thought she
 cared for him?  And before the words were uttered, he was struggling in
 the Princes grasp.
 
 My wife! the Princess?  What of her?
 
 She is down the road, he gasped.  I left her twenty minutes back.
 
 And next moment, the choked author stood alone, and the Prince on foot
 was racing down the hill behind the Countess.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVBABES IN THE WOOD
 
 
 While the feet of the Prince continued to run swiftly, his heart, which
 had at first by far outstripped his running, soon began to linger and
 hang back.  Not that he ceased to pity the misfortune or to yearn for the
 sight of Seraphina; but the memory of her obdurate coldness awoke within
 him, and woke in turn his own habitual diffidence of self.  Had Sir John
 been given time to tell him all, had he even known that she was speeding
 to the Felsenburg, he would have gone to her with ardour.  As it was, he
 began to see himself once more intruding, profiting, perhaps, by her
 misfortune, and now that she was fallen, proffering unloved caresses to
 the wife who had spurned him in prosperity.  The sore spots upon his
 vanity began to burn; once more, his anger assumed the carriage of a
 hostile generosity; he would utterly forgive indeed; he would help, save,
 and comfort his unloving wife; but all with distant self-denial, imposing
 silence on his heart, respecting Seraphinas disaffection as he would the
 innocence of a child.  So, when at length he turned a corner and beheld
 the Princess, it was his first thought to reassure her of the purity of
 his respect, and he at once ceased running and stood still.  She, upon
 her part, began to run to him with a little cry; then, seeing him pause,
 she paused also, smitten with remorse; and at length, with the most
 guilty timidity, walked nearly up to where he stood.
 
 Otto, she said, I have ruined all!
 
 Seraphina! he cried with a sob, but did not move, partly withheld by
 his resolutions, partly struck stupid at the sight of her weariness and
 disorder.  Had she stood silent, they had soon been locked in an embrace.
 But she too had prepared herself against the interview, and must spoil
 the golden hour with protestations.
 
 All! she went on, I have ruined all!  But, Otto, in kindness you must
 hear menot justify, but own, my faults.  I have been taught so cruelly;
 I have had such time for thought, and see the world so changed.  I have
 been blind, stone-blind; I have let all true good go by me, and lived on
 shadows.  But when this dream fell, and I had betrayed you, and thought I
 had killed  She paused.  I thought I had killed Gondremark, she said
 with a deep flush, and I found myself alone, as you said.
 
 The mention of the name of Gondremark pricked the Princes generosity like
 a spur.  Well, he cried, and whose fault was it but mine?  It was my
 duty to be beside you, loved or not.  But I was a skulker in the grain,
 and found it easier to desert than to oppose you.  I could never learn
 that better part of love, to fight loves battles.  But yet the love was
 there.  And now when this toy kingdom of ours has fallen, first of all by
 my demerits, and next by your inexperience, and we are here alone
 together, as poor as Job and merely a man and a womanlet me conjure you
 to forgive the weakness and to repose in the love.  Do not mistake me!
 he cried, seeing her about to speak, and imposing silence with uplifted
 hand.  My love is changed; it is purged of any conjugal pretension; it
 does not ask, does not hope, does not wish for a return in kind.  You may
 forget for ever that part in which you found me so distasteful, and
 accept without embarrassment the affection of a brother.
 
 You are too generous, Otto, she said.  I know that I have forfeited
 your love.  I cannot take this sacrifice.  You had far better leave me.
 O, go away, and leave me to my fate!
 
 O no! said Otto; we must first of all escape out of this hornets
 nest, to which I led you.  My honour is engaged.  I said but now we were
 as poor as Job; and behold! not many miles from here I have a house of my
 own to which I will conduct you.  Otto the Prince being down, we must try
 what luck remains to Otto the Hunter.  Come, Seraphina; show that you
 forgive me, and let us set about this business of escape in the best
 spirits possible.  You used to say, my dear, that, except as a husband
 and a prince, I was a pleasant fellow.  I am neither now, and you may
 like my company without remorse.  Come, then; it were idle to be
 captured.  Can you still walk?  Forth, then, said he, and he began to
 lead the way.
 
 A little below where they stood, a good-sized brook passed below the
 road, which overleapt it in a single arch.  On one bank of that
 loquacious water a foot-path descended a green dell.  Here it was rocky
 and stony, and lay on the steep scarps of the ravine; here it was choked
 with brambles; and there, in fairy haughs, it lay for a few paces evenly
 on the green turf.  Like a sponge, the hillside oozed with well-water.
 The burn kept growing both in force and volume; at every leap it fell
 with heavier plunges and span more widely in the pool.  Great had been
 the labours of that stream, and great and agreeable the changes it had
 wrought.  It had cut through dykes of stubborn rock, and now, like a
 blowing dolphin, spouted through the orifice; along all its humble
 coasts, it had undermined and rafted-down the goodlier timber of the
 forest; and on these rough clearings it now set and tended primrose
 gardens, and planted woods of willow, and made a favourite of the silver
 birch.  Through all these friendly features the path, its human acolyte,
 conducted our two wanderers downward,Otto before, still pausing at the
 more difficult passages to lend assistance; the Princess following.  From
 time to time, when he turned to help her, her face would lighten upon
 hisher eyes, half desperately, woo him.  He saw, but dared not
 understand.  She does not love me, he told himself, with magnanimity.
 This is remorse or gratitude; I were no gentleman, no, nor yet a man, if
 I presumed upon these pitiful concessions.
 
 Some way down the glen, the stream, already grown to a good bulk of
 water, was rudely dammed across, and about a third of it abducted in a
 wooden trough.  Gaily the pure water, airs first cousin, fleeted along
 the rude aqueduct, whose sides and floor it had made green with grasses.
 The path, bearing it close company, threaded a wilderness of briar and
 wild-rose.  And presently, a little in front, the brown top of a mill and
 the tall mill-wheel, spraying diamonds, arose in the narrows of the glen;
 at the same time the snoring music of the saws broke the silence.
 
 The miller, hearing steps, came forth to his door, and both he and Otto
 started.
 
 Good-morning, miller, said the Prince.  You were right, it seems, and
 I was wrong.  I give you the news, and bid you to Mittwalden.  My throne
 has fallengreat was the fall of it!and your good friends of the Phoenix
 bear the rule.
 
 The red-faced miller looked supreme astonishment.  And your Highness?
 he gasped.
 
 My Highness is running away, replied Otto, straight for the frontier.
 
 Leaving Grnewald? cried the man.  Your fathers son?  Its not to be
 permitted!
 
 Do you arrest us, friend? asked Otto, smiling.
 
 Arrest you?  I? exclaimed the man.  For what does your Highness take
 me?  Why, sir, I make sure there is not a man in Grnewald would lay
 hands upon you.
 
 O, many, many, said the Prince; but from you, who were bold with me in
 my greatness, I should even look for aid in my distress.
 
 The miller became the colour of beetroot.  You may say so indeed, said
 he.  And meanwhile, will you and your lady step into my house.
 
 We have not time for that, replied the Prince; but if you would oblige
 us with a cup of wine without here, you will give a pleasure and a
 service, both in one.
 
 The miller once more coloured to the nape.  He hastened to bring forth
 wine in a pitcher and three bright crystal tumblers.  Your Highness must
 not suppose, he said, as he filled them, that I am an habitual drinker.
 The time when I had the misfortune to encounter you, I was a trifle
 overtaken, I allow; but a more sober man than I am in my ordinary, I do
 not know where you are to look for; and even this glass that I drink to
 you (and to the lady) is quite an unusual recreation.
 
 The wine was drunk with due rustic courtesies; and then, refusing further
 hospitality, Otto and Seraphina once more proceeded to descend the glen,
 which now began to open and to be invaded by the taller trees.
 
 I owed that man a reparation, said the Prince; for when we met I was
 in the wrong and put a sore affront upon him.  I judge by myself,
 perhaps; but I begin to think that no one is the better for a
 humiliation.
 
 But some have to be taught so, she replied.
 
 Well, well, he said, with a painful embarrassment.  Well, well.  But
 let us think of safety.  My miller is all very good, but I do not pin my
 faith to him.  To follow down this stream will bring us, but after
 innumerable windings, to my house.  Here, up this glade, there lies a
 cross-cutthe worlds end for solitudethe very deer scarce visit it.
 Are you too tired, or could you pass that way?
 
 Choose the path, Otto.  I will follow you, she said.
 
 No, he replied, with a singular imbecility of manner and appearance,
 but I meant the path was rough.  It lies, all the way, by glade and
 dingle, and the dingles are both deep and thorny.
 
 Lead on, she said.  Are you not Otto the Hunter?
 
 They had now burst across a veil of underwood, and were come into a lawn
 among the forest, very green and innocent, and solemnly surrounded by
 trees.  Otto paused on the margin, looking about him with delight; then
 his glance returned to Seraphina, as she stood framed in that silvan
 pleasantness and looking at her husband with undecipherable eyes.  A
 weakness both of the body and mind fell on him like the beginnings of
 sleep; the cords of his activity were relaxed, his eyes clung to her.
 Let us rest, he said; and he made her sit down, and himself sat down
 beside her on the slope of an inconsiderable mound.
 
 She sat with her eyes downcast, her slim hand dabbling in grass, like a
 maid waiting for loves summons.  The sound of the wind in the forest
 swelled and sank, and drew near them with a running rush, and died away
 and away in the distance into fainting whispers.  Nearer hand, a bird out
 of the deep covert uttered broken and anxious notes.  All this seemed but
 a halting prelude to speech.  To Otto it seemed as if the whole frame of
 nature were waiting for his words; and yet his pride kept him silent.
 The longer he watched that slender and pale hand plucking at the grasses,
 the harder and rougher grew the fight between pride and its kindly
 adversary.
 
 Seraphina, he said at last, it is right you should know one thing: I
 never . . .  He was about to say doubted you, but was that true?  And,
 if true, was it generous to speak of it?  Silence succeeded.
 
 I pray you, tell it me, she said; tell it me, in pity.
 
 I mean only this, he resumed, that I understand all, and do not blame
 you.  I understand how the brave woman must look down on the weak man.  I
 think you were wrong in some things; but I have tried to understand it,
 and I do.  I do not need to forget or to forgive, Seraphina, for I have
 understood.
 
 I know what I have done, she said.  I am not so weak that I can be
 deceived with kind speeches.  I know what I have beenI see myself.  I am
 not worth your anger, how much less to be forgiven!  In all this downfall
 and misery, I see only me and you: you, as you have been always; me, as I
 wasme, above all!  O yes, I see myself: and what can I think?
 
 Ah, then, let us reverse the parts! said Otto.  It is ourselves we
 cannot forgive, when we deny forgiveness to anotherso a friend told me
 last night.  On these terms, Seraphina, you see how generously _I_ have
 forgiven myself.  But am not I to be forgiven?  Come, then, forgive
 yourselfand me.
 
 She did not answer in words, but reached out her hand to him quickly.  He
 took it; and as the smooth fingers settled and nestled in his, love ran
 to and fro between them in tender and transforming currents.
 
 Seraphina, he cried, O, forget the past!  Let me serve and help you;
 let me be your servant; it is enough for me to serve you and to be near
 you; let me be near you, deardo not send me away.  He hurried his
 pleading like the speech of a frightened child.  It is not love, he
 went on; I do not ask for love; my love is enough . . .
 
 Otto! she said, as if in pain.
 
 He looked up into her face.  It was wrung with the very ecstasy of
 tenderness and anguish; on her features, and most of all in her changed
 eyes, there shone the very light of love.
 
 Seraphina? he cried aloud, and with a sudden, tuneless voice,
 Seraphina?
 
 Look round you at this glade, she cried, and where the leaves are
 coming on young trees, and the flowers begin to blossom.  This is where
 we meet, meet for the first time; it is so much better to forget and to
 be born again.  O what a pit there is for sinsGods mercy, mans
 oblivion!
 
 Seraphina, he said, let it be so, indeed; let all that was be merely
 the abuse of dreaming; let me begin again, a stranger.  I have dreamed,
 in a long dream, that I adored a girl unkind and beautiful; in all things
 my superior, but still cold, like ice.  And again I dreamed, and thought
 she changed and melted, glowed and turned to me.  And Iwho had no merit
 but a love, slavish and unerectlay close, and durst not move for fear of
 waking.
 
 Lie close, she said, with a deep thrill of speech.
 
 So they spake in the spring woods; and meanwhile, in Mittwalden
 Rath-haus, the Republic was declared.
 
 
 
 
 BIBLIOGRAPHICAL POSTSCRIPT TO COMPLETE THE STORY
 
 
 The reader well informed in modern history will not require details as to
 the fate of the Republic.  The best account is to be found in the memoirs
 of Herr Greisengesang (7 Bnde: Leipzig), by our passing acquaintance the
 licentiate Roederer.  Herr Roederer, with too much of an authors
 licence, makes a great figure of his heroposes him, indeed, to be the
 centre-piece and cloud-compeller of the whole.  But, with due allowance
 for this bias, the book is able and complete.
 
 The reader is of course acquainted with the vigorous and bracing pages of
 Sir John (2 vols., London: Longman, Hurst, Rees, Orme and Brown).  Sir
 John, who plays but a tooth-comb in the orchestra of this historical
 romance, blows in his own book the big bassoon.  His character is there
 drawn at large; and the sympathy of Landor has countersigned the
 admiration of the public.  One point, however, calls for explanation; the
 chapter on Grnewald was torn by the hand of the author in the palace
 gardens; how comes it, then, to figure at full length among my more
 modest pages, the Lion of the caravan?  That eminent literatus was a man
 of method; Juvenal by double entry, he was once profanely called; and
 when he tore the sheets in question, it was rather, as he has since
 explained, in the search for some dramatic evidence of his sincerity,
 than with the thought of practical deletion.  At that time, indeed, he
 was possessed of two blotted scrolls and a fair copy in double.  But the
 chapter, as the reader knows, was honestly omitted from the famous
 Memoirs on the various Courts of Europe.  It has been mine to give it
 to the public.
 
 Bibliography still helps us with a further glimpse of our characters.  I
 have here before me a small volume (printed for private circulation: no
 printers name; n.d.), Posies par Frdric et Amlie.  Mine is a
 presentation copy, obtained for me by Mr. Bain in the Haymarket; and the
 name of the first owner is written on the fly-leaf in the hand of Prince
 Otto himself.  The modest epigraphLe rime nest pas richemay be
 attributed, with a good show of likelihood, to the same collaborator.  It
 is strikingly appropriate, and I have found the volume very dreary.
 Those pieces in which I seem to trace the hand of the Princess are
 particularly dull and conscientious.  But the booklet had a fair success
 with that public for which it was designed; and I have come across some
 evidences of a second venture of the same sort, now unprocurable.  Here,
 at least, we may take leave of Otto and Seraphinawhat do I say? of
 Frdric and Amlieageing together peaceably at the court of the wifes
 father, jingling French rhymes and correcting joint proofs.
 
 Still following the book-lists, I perceive that Mr. Swinburne has
 dedicated a rousing lyric and some vigorous sonnets to the memory of
 Gondremark; that name appears twice at least in Victor Hugos
 trumpet-blasts of patriot enumeration; and I came latterly, when I
 supposed my task already ended, on a trace of the fallen politician and
 his Countess.  It is in the Diary of J. Hogg Cotterill, Esq. (that very
 interesting work).  Mr. Cotterill, being at Naples, is introduced (May
 27th) to a Baron and Baroness Gondremarkhe a man who once made a
 noiseshe still beautifulboth witty.  She complimented me much upon my
 Frenchshould never have known me to be Englishhad known my uncle, Sir
 John, in Germanyrecognised in me, as a family trait, some of his _grand
 air_ and studious courtesyasked me to call.  And again (May 30th),
 visited the Baronne de Gondremarkmuch gratifieda most _refined_,
 _intelligent_ woman, quite of the old school, now, _hlas_! extincthad
 read my _Remarks on Sicily_it reminds her of my uncle, but with more of
 graceI feared she thought there was less energyassured noa softer
 style of presentation, more of the _literary grace_, but the same firm
 grasp of circumstance and force of thoughtin short, just Buttonholes
 opinion.  Much encouraged.  I have a real esteem for this patrician
 lady.  The acquaintance lasted some time; and when Mr. Cotterill left in
 the suite of Lord Protocol, and, as he is careful to inform us, in
 Admiral Yardarms flag-ship, one of his chief causes of regret is to
 leave that most _spirituelle_ and sympathetic lady, who already regards
 me as a younger brother.
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the 1905 edition by David Price, email ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                           PRINCE OTTO--A ROMANCE
 
 
                                 A ROMANCE
 
                                     BY
 
                           ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
                       [Picture: Decorative graphic]
 
                               A NEW EDITION
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                              CHATTO & WINDUS
                                    1905
 
 
 
 
 TO NELLY VAN DE GRIFT
 (MRS. ADULFO SANCHEZ, OF MONTEREY)
 
 
 At last, after so many years, I have the pleasure of re-introducing you
 to 'Prince Otto,' whom you will remember a very little fellow, no bigger
 in fact than a few sheets of memoranda written for me by your kind hand.
 The sight of his name will carry you back to an old wooden house
 embowered in creepers; a house that was far gone in the respectable
 stages of antiquity and seemed indissoluble from the green garden in
 which it stood, and that yet was a sea-traveller in its younger days, and
 had come round the Horn piecemeal in the belly of a ship, and might have
 heard the seamen stamping and shouting and the note of the boatswain's
 whistle.  It will recall to you the nondescript inhabitants now so widely
 scattered:--the two horses, the dog, and the four cats, some of them
 still looking in your face as you read these lines;--the poor lady, so
 unfortunately married to an author;--the China boy, by this time,
 perhaps, baiting his line by the banks of a river in the Flowery
 Land;--and in particular the Scot who was then sick apparently unto
 death, and whom you did so much to cheer and keep in good behaviour.
 
 You may remember that he was full of ambitions and designs: so soon as he
 had his health again completely, you may remember the fortune he was to
 earn, the journeys he was to go upon, the delights he was to enjoy and
 confer, and (among other matters) the masterpiece he was to make of
 'Prince Otto'!
 
 Well, we will not give in that we are finally beaten.  We read together
 in those days the story of Braddock, and how, as he was carried dying
 from the scene of his defeat, he promised himself to do better another
 time: a story that will always touch a brave heart, and a dying speech
 worthy of a more fortunate commander.  I try to be of Braddock's mind.  I
 still mean to get my health again; I still purpose, by hook or crook,
 this book or the next, to launch a masterpiece; and I still
 intend--somehow, some time or other--to see your face and to hold your
 hand.
 
 Meanwhile, this little paper traveller goes forth instead, crosses the
 great seas and the long plains and the dark mountains, and comes at last
 to your door in Monterey, charged with tender greetings.  Pray you, take
 him in.  He comes from a house where (even as in your own) there are
 gathered together some of the waifs of our company at Oakland: a
 house--for all its outlandish Gaelic name and distant station--where you
 are well-beloved.
 
                                                                   R. L. S.
 
 _Skerryvore_,
       Bournemouth.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK I--PRINCE ERRANT
 
 
 CHAPTER I--IN WHICH THE PRINCE DEPARTS ON AN ADVENTURE
 
 
 You shall seek in vain upon the map of Europe for the bygone state of
 Grunewald.  An independent principality, an infinitesimal member of the
 German Empire, she played, for several centuries, her part in the discord
 of Europe; and, at last, in the ripeness of time and at the spiriting of
 several bald diplomatists, vanished like a morning ghost.  Less fortunate
 than Poland, she left not a regret behind her; and the very memory of her
 boundaries has faded.
 
 It was a patch of hilly country covered with thick wood.  Many streams
 took their beginning in the glens of Grunewald, turning mills for the
 inhabitants.  There was one town, Mittwalden, and many brown, wooden
 hamlets, climbing roof above roof, along the steep bottom of dells, and
 communicating by covered bridges over the larger of the torrents.  The
 hum of watermills, the splash of running water, the clean odour of pine
 sawdust, the sound and smell of the pleasant wind among the innumerable
 army of the mountain pines, the dropping fire of huntsmen, the dull
 stroke of the wood-axe, intolerable roads, fresh trout for supper in the
 clean bare chamber of an inn, and the song of birds and the music of the
 village-bells--these were the recollections of the Grunewald tourist.
 
 North and east the foothills of Grunewald sank with varying profile into
 a vast plain.  On these sides many small states bordered with the
 principality, Gerolstein, an extinct grand duchy, among the number.  On
 the south it marched with the comparatively powerful kingdom of Seaboard
 Bohemia, celebrated for its flowers and mountain bears, and inhabited by
 a people of singular simplicity and tenderness of heart.  Several
 intermarriages had, in the course of centuries, united the crowned
 families of Grunewald and Maritime Bohemia; and the last Prince of
 Grunewald, whose history I purpose to relate, drew his descent through
 Perdita, the only daughter of King Florizel the First of Bohemia.  That
 these intermarriages had in some degree mitigated the rough, manly stock
 of the first Grunewalds, was an opinion widely held within the borders of
 the principality.  The charcoal burner, the mountain sawyer, the wielder
 of the broad axe among the congregated pines of Grunewald, proud of their
 hard hands, proud of their shrewd ignorance and almost savage lore,
 looked with an unfeigned contempt on the soft character and manners of
 the sovereign race.
 
 The precise year of grace in which this tale begins shall be left to the
 conjecture of the reader.  But for the season of the year (which, in such
 a story, is the more important of the two) it was already so far forward
 in the spring, that when mountain people heard horns echoing all day
 about the north-west corner of the principality, they told themselves
 that Prince Otto and his hunt were up and out for the last time till the
 return of autumn.
 
 At this point the borders of Grunewald descend somewhat steeply, here and
 there breaking into crags; and this shaggy and trackless country stands
 in a bold contrast to the cultivated plain below.  It was traversed at
 that period by two roads alone; one, the imperial highway, bound to
 Brandenau in Gerolstein, descended the slope obliquely and by the easiest
 gradients.  The other ran like a fillet across the very forehead of the
 hills, dipping into savage gorges, and wetted by the spray of tiny
 waterfalls.  Once it passed beside a certain tower or castle, built sheer
 upon the margin of a formidable cliff, and commanding a vast prospect of
 the skirts of Grunewald and the busy plains of Gerolstein.  The
 Felsenburg (so this tower was called) served now as a prison, now as a
 hunting-seat; and for all it stood so lonesome to the naked eye, with the
 aid of a good glass the burghers of Brandenau could count its windows
 from the lime-tree terrace where they walked at night.
 
 In the wedge of forest hillside enclosed between the roads, the horns
 continued all day long to scatter tumult; and at length, as the sun began
 to draw near to the horizon of the plain, a rousing triumph announced the
 slaughter of the quarry.  The first and second huntsman had drawn
 somewhat aside, and from the summit of a knoll gazed down before them on
 the drooping shoulders of the hill and across the expanse of plain.  They
 covered their eyes, for the sun was in their faces.  The glory of its
 going down was somewhat pale.  Through the confused tracery of many
 thousands of naked poplars, the smoke of so many houses, and the evening
 steam ascending from the fields, the sails of a windmill on a gentle
 eminence moved very conspicuously, like a donkey's ears.  And hard by,
 like an open gash, the imperial high-road ran straight sun-ward, an
 artery of travel.
 
 There is one of nature's spiritual ditties, that has not yet been set to
 words or human music: 'The Invitation to the Road'; an air continually
 sounding in the ears of gipsies, and to whose inspiration our nomadic
 fathers journeyed all their days.  The hour, the season, and the scene,
 all were in delicate accordance.  The air was full of birds of passage,
 steering westward and northward over Grunewald, an army of specks to the
 up-looking eye.  And below, the great practicable road was bound for the
 same quarter.
 
 But to the two horsemen on the knoll this spiritual ditty was unheard.
 They were, indeed, in some concern of mind, scanning every fold of the
 subjacent forest, and betraying both anger and dismay in their impatient
 gestures.
 
 'I do not see him, Kuno,' said the first huntsman, 'nowhere--not a trace,
 not a hair of the mare's tail!  No, sir, he's off; broke cover and got
 away.  Why, for twopence I would hunt him with the dogs!'
 
 'Mayhap, he's gone home,' said Kuno, but without conviction.
 
 'Home!' sneered the other.  'I give him twelve days to get home.  No,
 it's begun again; it's as it was three years ago, before he married; a
 disgrace!  Hereditary prince, hereditary fool!  There goes the government
 over the borders on a grey mare.  What's that?  No, nothing--no, I tell
 you, on my word, I set more store by a good gelding or an English dog.
 That for your Otto!'
 
 'He's not my Otto,' growled Kuno.
 
 'Then I don't know whose he is,' was the retort.
 
 'You would put your hand in the fire for him to-morrow,' said Kuno,
 facing round.
 
 'Me!' cried the huntsman.  'I would see him hanged!  I'm a Grunewald
 patriot--enrolled, and have my medal, too; and I would help a prince!
 I'm for liberty and Gondremark.'
 
 'Well, it's all one,' said Kuno.  'If anybody said what you said, you
 would have his blood, and you know it.'
 
 'You have him on the brain,' retorted his companion.  'There he goes!' he
 cried, the next moment.
 
 And sure enough, about a mile down the mountain, a rider on a white horse
 was seen to flit rapidly across a heathy open and vanish among the trees
 on the farther side.
 
 'In ten minutes he'll be over the border into Gerolstein,' said Kuno.
 'It's past cure.'
 
 'Well, if he founders that mare, I'll never forgive him,' added the
 other, gathering his reins.
 
 And as they turned down from the knoll to rejoin their comrades, the sun
 dipped and disappeared, and the woods fell instantly into the gravity and
 greyness of the early night.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--IN WHICH THE PRINCE PLAYS HAROUN-AL-RASCHID
 
 
 The night fell upon the Prince while he was threading green tracks in the
 lower valleys of the wood; and though the stars came out overhead and
 displayed the interminable order of the pine-tree pyramids, regular and
 dark like cypresses, their light was of small service to a traveller in
 such lonely paths, and from thenceforth he rode at random.  The austere
 face of nature, the uncertain issue of his course, the open sky and the
 free air, delighted him like wine; and the hoarse chafing of a river on
 his left sounded in his ears agreeably.
 
 It was past eight at night before his toil was rewarded and he issued at
 last out of the forest on the firm white high-road.  It lay downhill
 before him, with a sweeping eastward trend, faintly bright between the
 thickets; and Otto paused and gazed upon it.  So it ran, league after
 league, still joining others, to the farthest ends of Europe, there
 skirting the sea-surge, here gleaming in the lights of cities; and the
 innumerable army of tramps and travellers moved upon it in all lands as
 by a common impulse, and were now in all places drawing near to the inn
 door and the night's rest.  The pictures swarmed and vanished in his
 brain; a surge of temptation, a beat of all his blood, went over him, to
 set spur to the mare and to go on into the unknown for ever.  And then it
 passed away; hunger and fatigue, and that habit of middling actions which
 we call common sense, resumed their empire; and in that changed mood his
 eye lighted upon two bright windows on his left hand, between the road
 and river.
 
 He turned off by a by-road, and in a few minutes he was knocking with his
 whip on the door of a large farmhouse, and a chorus of dogs from the
 farmyard were making angry answer.  A very tall, old, white-headed man
 came, shading a candle, at the summons.  He had been of great strength in
 his time, and of a handsome countenance; but now he was fallen away, his
 teeth were quite gone, and his voice when he spoke was broken and
 falsetto.
 
 'You will pardon me,' said Otto.  'I am a traveller and have entirely
 lost my way.'
 
 'Sir,' said the old man, in a very stately, shaky manner, 'you are at the
 River Farm, and I am Killian Gottesheim, at your disposal.  We are here,
 sir, at about an equal distance from Mittwalden in Grunewald and
 Brandenau in Gerolstein: six leagues to either, and the road excellent;
 but there is not a wine bush, not a carter's alehouse, anywhere between.
 You will have to accept my hospitality for the night; rough hospitality,
 to which I make you freely welcome; for, sir,' he added with a bow, 'it
 is God who sends the guest.'
 
 'Amen.  And I most heartily thank you,' replied Otto, bowing in his turn.
 
 'Fritz,' said the old man, turning towards the interior, 'lead round this
 gentleman's horse; and you, sir, condescend to enter.'
 
 Otto entered a chamber occupying the greater part of the ground-floor of
 the building.  It had probably once been divided; for the farther end was
 raised by a long step above the nearer, and the blazing fire and the
 white supper-table seemed to stand upon a dais.  All around were dark,
 brass-mounted cabinets and cupboards; dark shelves carrying ancient
 country crockery; guns and antlers and broadside ballads on the wall; a
 tall old clock with roses on the dial; and down in one corner the
 comfortable promise of a wine barrel.  It was homely, elegant, and
 quaint.
 
 A powerful youth hurried out to attend on the grey mare; and when Mr.
 Killian Gottesheim had presented him to his daughter Ottilia, Otto
 followed to the stable as became, not perhaps the Prince, but the good
 horseman.  When he returned, a smoking omelette and some slices of
 home-cured ham were waiting him; these were followed by a ragout and a
 cheese; and it was not until his guest had entirely satisfied his hunger,
 and the whole party drew about the fire over the wine jug, that Killian
 Gottesheim's elaborate courtesy permitted him to address a question to
 the Prince.
 
 'You have perhaps ridden far, sir?' he inquired.
 
 'I have, as you say, ridden far,' replied Otto; 'and, as you have seen, I
 was prepared to do justice to your daughters cookery.'
 
 'Possibly, sir, from the direction of Brandenau?' continued Killian.
 
 'Precisely: and I should have slept to-night, had I not wandered, in
 Mittwalden,' answered the Prince, weaving in a patch of truth, according
 to the habit of all liars.
 
 'Business leads you to Mittwalden?' was the next question.
 
 'Mere curiosity,' said Otto.  'I have never yet visited the principality
 of Grunewald.'
 
 'A pleasant state, sir,' piped the old man, nodding, 'a very pleasant
 state, and a fine race, both pines and people.  We reckon ourselves part
 Grunewalders here, lying so near the borders; and the river there is all
 good Grunewald water, every drop of it.  Yes, sir, a fine state.  A man
 of Grunewald now will swing me an axe over his head that many a man of
 Gerolstein could hardly lift; and the pines, why, deary me, there must be
 more pines in that little state, sir, than people in this whole big
 world.  'Tis twenty years now since I crossed the marshes, for we grow
 home-keepers in old age; but I mind it as if it was yesterday.  Up and
 down, the road keeps right on from here to Mittwalden; and nothing all
 the way but the good green pine-trees, big and little, and water-power!
 water-power at every step, sir.  We once sold a bit of forest, up there
 beside the high-road; and the sight of minted money that we got for it
 has set me ciphering ever since what all the pines in Grunewald would
 amount to.'
 
 'I suppose you see nothing of the Prince?' inquired Otto.
 
 'No,' said the young man, speaking for the first time, 'nor want to.'
 
 'Why so? is he so much disliked?' asked Otto.
 
 'Not what you might call disliked,' replied the old gentleman, 'but
 despised, sir.'
 
 'Indeed,' said the Prince, somewhat faintly.
 
 'Yes, sir, despised,' nodded Killian, filling a long pipe, 'and, to my
 way of thinking, justly despised.  Here is a man with great
 opportunities, and what does he do with them?  He hunts, and he dresses
 very prettily--which is a thing to be ashamed of in a man--and he acts
 plays; and if he does aught else, the news of it has not come here.'
 
 'Yet these are all innocent,' said Otto.  'What would you have him
 do--make war?'
 
 'No, sir,' replied the old man.  'But here it is; I have been fifty years
 upon this River Farm, and wrought in it, day in, day out; I have ploughed
 and sowed and reaped, and risen early, and waked late; and this is the
 upshot: that all these years it has supported me and my family; and been
 the best friend that ever I had, set aside my wife; and now, when my time
 comes, I leave it a better farm than when I found it.  So it is, if a man
 works hearty in the order of nature, he gets bread and he receives
 comfort, and whatever he touches breeds.  And it humbly appears to me, if
 that Prince was to labour on his throne, as I have laboured and wrought
 in my farm, he would find both an increase and a blessing.'
 
 'I believe with you, sir,' Otto said; 'and yet the parallel is inexact.
 For the farmer's life is natural and simple; but the prince's is both
 artificial and complicated.  It is easy to do right in the one, and
 exceedingly difficult not to do wrong in the other.  If your crop is
 blighted, you can take off your bonnet and say, "God's will be done"; but
 if the prince meets with a reverse, he may have to blame himself for the
 attempt.  And perhaps, if all the kings in Europe were to confine
 themselves to innocent amusement, the subjects would be the better off.'
 
 'Ay,' said the young man Fritz, 'you are in the right of it there.  That
 was a true word spoken.  And I see you are like me, a good patriot and an
 enemy to princes.'
 
 Otto was somewhat abashed at this deduction, and he made haste to change
 his ground.  'But,' said he, 'you surprise me by what you say of this
 Prince Otto.  I have heard him, I must own, more favourably painted.  I
 was told he was, in his heart, a good fellow, and the enemy of no one but
 himself.'
 
 'And so he is, sir,' said the girl, 'a very handsome, pleasant prince;
 and we know some who would shed their blood for him.'
 
 'O! Kuno!' said Fritz.  'An ignoramus!'
 
 'Ay, Kuno, to be sure,' quavered the old farmer.  'Well, since this
 gentleman is a stranger to these parts, and curious about the Prince, I
 do believe that story might divert him.  This Kuno, you must know, sir,
 is one of the hunt servants, and a most ignorant, intemperate man: a
 right Grunewalder, as we say in Gerolstein.  We know him well, in this
 house; for he has come as far as here after his stray dogs; and I make
 all welcome, sir, without account of state or nation.  And, indeed,
 between Gerolstein and Grunewald the peace has held so long that the
 roads stand open like my door; and a man will make no more of the
 frontier than the very birds themselves.'
 
 'Ay,' said Otto, 'it has been a long peace--a peace of centuries.'
 
 'Centuries, as you say,' returned Killian; 'the more the pity that it
 should not be for ever.  Well, sir, this Kuno was one day in fault, and
 Otto, who has a quick temper, up with his whip and thrashed him, they do
 say, soundly.  Kuno took it as best he could, but at last he broke out,
 and dared the Prince to throw his whip away and wrestle like a man; for
 we are all great at wrestling in these parts, and it's so that we
 generally settle our disputes.  Well, sir, the Prince did so; and, being
 a weakly creature, found the tables turned; for the man whom he had just
 been thrashing like a negro slave, lifted him with a back grip and threw
 him heels overhead.'
 
 'He broke his bridle-arm,' cried Fritz--'and some say his nose.  Serve
 him right, say I!  Man to man, which is the better at that?'
 
 'And then?' asked Otto.
 
 'O, then Kuno carried him home; and they were the best of friends from
 that day forth.  I don't say it's a discreditable story, you observe,'
 continued Mr. Gottesheim; 'but it's droll, and that's the fact.  A man
 should think before he strikes; for, as my nephew says, man to man was
 the old valuation.'
 
 'Now, if you were to ask me,' said Otto, 'I should perhaps surprise you.
 I think it was the Prince that conquered.'
 
 'And, sir, you would be right,' replied Killian seriously.  'In the eyes
 of God, I do not question but you would be right; but men, sir, look at
 these things differently, and they laugh.'
 
 'They made a song of it,' observed Fritz.  'How does it go?  Ta-tum-ta-ra
 . . .'
 
 'Well,' interrupted Otto, who had no great anxiety to hear the song, 'the
 Prince is young; he may yet mend.'
 
 'Not so young, by your leave,' cried Fritz.  'A man of forty.'
 
 'Thirty-six,' corrected Mr. Gottesheim.
 
 'O,' cried Ottilia, in obvious disillusion, 'a man of middle age!  And
 they said he was so handsome when he was young!'
 
 'And bald, too,' added Fritz.
 
 Otto passed his hand among his locks.  At that moment he was far from
 happy, and even the tedious evenings at Mittwalden Palace began to smile
 upon him by comparison.
 
 'O, six-and-thirty!' he protested.  'A man is not yet old at
 six-and-thirty.  I am that age myself.'
 
 'I should have taken you for more, sir,' piped the old farmer.  'But if
 that be so, you are of an age with Master Ottekin, as people call him;
 and, I would wager a crown, have done more service in your time.  Though
 it seems young by comparison with men of a great age like me, yet it's
 some way through life for all that; and the mere fools and fiddlers are
 beginning to grow weary and to look old.  Yes, sir, by six-and-thirty, if
 a man be a follower of God's laws, he should have made himself a home and
 a good name to live by; he should have got a wife and a blessing on his
 marriage; and his works, as the Word says, should begin to follow him.'
 
 'Ah, well, the Prince is married,' cried Fritz, with a coarse burst of
 laughter.
 
 'That seems to entertain you, sir,' said Otto.
 
 'Ay,' said the young boor.  'Did you not know that?  I thought all Europe
 knew it!'  And he added a pantomime of a nature to explain his accusation
 to the dullest.
 
 'Ah, sir,' said Mr. Gottesheim, 'it is very plain that you are not from
 hereabouts!  But the truth is, that the whole princely family and Court
 are rips and rascals, not one to mend another.  They live, sir, in
 idleness and--what most commonly follows it--corruption.  The Princess
 has a lover--a Baron, as he calls himself, from East Prussia; and the
 Prince is so little of a man, sir, that he holds the candle.  Nor is that
 the worst of it, for this foreigner and his paramour are suffered to
 transact the State affairs, while the Prince takes the salary and leaves
 all things to go to wrack.  There will follow upon this some manifest
 judgment which, though I am old, I may survive to see.'
 
 'Good man, you are in the wrong about Gondremark,' said Fritz, showing a
 greatly increased animation; 'but for all the rest, you speak the God's
 truth like a good patriot.  As for the Prince, if he would take and
 strangle his wife, I would forgive him yet.'
 
 'Nay, Fritz,' said the old man, 'that would be to add iniquity to evil.
 For you perceive, sir,' he continued, once more addressing himself to the
 unfortunate Prince, 'this Otto has himself to thank for these disorders.
 He has his young wife and his principality, and he has sworn to cherish
 both.'
 
 'Sworn at the altar!' echoed Fritz.  'But put your faith in princes!'
 
 'Well, sir, he leaves them both to an adventurer from East Prussia,'
 pursued the farmer: 'leaves the girl to be seduced and to go on from bad
 to worse, till her name's become a tap-room by-word, and she not yet
 twenty; leaves the country to be overtaxed, and bullied with armaments,
 and jockied into war--'
 
 'War!' cried Otto.
 
 'So they say, sir; those that watch their ongoings, say to war,'
 asseverated Killian.  'Well, sir, that is very sad; it is a sad thing for
 this poor, wicked girl to go down to hell with people's curses; it's a
 sad thing for a tight little happy country to be misconducted; but
 whoever may complain, I humbly conceive, sir, that this Otto cannot.
 What he has worked for, that he has got; and may God have pity on his
 soul, for a great and a silly sinner's!'
 
 'He has broke his oath; then he is a perjurer.  He takes the money and
 leaves the work; why, then plainly he's a thief.  A cuckold he was
 before, and a fool by birth.  Better me that!' cried Fritz, and snapped
 his fingers.
 
 'And now, sir, you will see a little,' continued the farmer, 'why we
 think so poorly of this Prince Otto.  There's such a thing as a man being
 pious and honest in the private way; and there is such a thing, sir, as a
 public virtue; but when a man has neither, the Lord lighten him!  Even
 this Gondremark, that Fritz here thinks so much of--'
 
 'Ay,' interrupted Fritz, 'Gondremark's the man for me.  I would we had
 his like in Gerolstein.'
 
 'He is a bad man,' said the old farmer, shaking his head; 'and there was
 never good begun by the breach of God's commandments.  But so far I will
 go with you; he is a man that works for what he has.'
 
 'I tell you he's the hope of Grunewald,' cried Fritz.  'He doesn't suit
 some of your high-and-dry, old, ancient ideas; but he's a downright
 modern man--a man of the new lights and the progress of the age.  He does
 some things wrong; so they all do; but he has the people's interests next
 his heart; and you mark me--you, sir, who are a Liberal, and the enemy of
 all their governments, you please to mark my words--the day will come in
 Grunewald, when they take out that yellow-headed skulk of a Prince and
 that dough-faced Messalina of a Princess, march 'em back foremost over
 the borders, and proclaim the Baron Gondremark first President.  I've
 heard them say it in a speech.  I was at a meeting once at Brandenau, and
 the Mittwalden delegates spoke up for fifteen thousand.  Fifteen
 thousand, all brigaded, and each man with a medal round his neck to rally
 by.  That's all Gondremark.'
 
 'Ay, sir, you see what it leads to; wild talk to-day, and wilder doings
 to-morrow,' said the old man.  'For there is one thing certain: that this
 Gondremark has one foot in the Court backstairs, and the other in the
 Masons' lodges.  He gives himself out, sir, for what nowadays they call a
 patriot: a man from East Prussia!'
 
 'Give himself out!' cried Fritz.  'He is!  He is to lay by his title as
 soon as the Republic is declared; I heard it in a speech.'
 
 'Lay by Baron to take up President?' returned Killian.  'King Log, King
 Stork.  But you'll live longer than I, and you will see the fruits of
 it.'
 
 'Father,' whispered Ottilia, pulling at the speaker's coat, 'surely the
 gentleman is ill.'
 
 'I beg your pardon,' cried the farmer, rewaking to hospitable thoughts;
 'can I offer you anything?'
 
 'I thank you.  I am very weary,' answered Otto.  'I have presumed upon my
 strength.  If you would show me to a bed, I should be grateful.'
 
 'Ottilia, a candle!' said the old man.  'Indeed, sir, you look paley.  A
 little cordial water?  No?  Then follow me, I beseech you, and I will
 bring you to the stranger's bed.  You are not the first by many who has
 slept well below my roof,' continued the old gentleman, mounting the
 stairs before his guest; 'for good food, honest wine, a grateful
 conscience, and a little pleasant chat before a man retires, are worth
 all the possets and apothecary's drugs.  See, sir,' and here he opened a
 door and ushered Otto into a little white-washed sleeping-room, 'here you
 are in port.  It is small, but it is airy, and the sheets are clean and
 kept in lavender.  The window, too, looks out above the river, and
 there's no music like a little river's.  It plays the same tune (and
 that's the favourite) over and over again, and yet does not weary of it
 like men fiddlers.  It takes the mind out of doors: and though we should
 be grateful for good houses, there is, after all, no house like God's
 out-of-doors.  And lastly, sir, it quiets a man down like saying his
 prayers.  So here, sir, I take my kind leave of you until to-morrow; and
 it is my prayerful wish that you may slumber like a prince.'
 
 And the old man, with the twentieth courteous inclination, left his guest
 alone.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--IN WHICH THE PRINCE COMFORTS AGE AND BEAUTY AND DELIVERS A
 LECTURE ON DISCRETION IN LOVE
 
 
 The Prince was early abroad: in the time of the first chorus of birds, of
 the pure and quiet air, of the slanting sunlight and the mile-long
 shadows.  To one who had passed a miserable night, the freshness of that
 hour was tonic and reviving; to steal a march upon his slumbering
 fellows, to be the Adam of the coming day, composed and fortified his
 spirits; and the Prince, breathing deep and pausing as he went, walked in
 the wet fields beside his shadow, and was glad.
 
 A trellised path led down into the valley of the brook, and he turned to
 follow it.  The stream was a break-neck, boiling Highland river.  Hard by
 the farm, it leaped a little precipice in a thick grey-mare's tail of
 twisted filaments, and then lay and worked and bubbled in a lynn.  Into
 the middle of this quaking pool a rock protruded, shelving to a cape; and
 thither Otto scrambled and sat down to ponder.
 
 Soon the sun struck through the screen of branches and thin early leaves
 that made a hanging bower above the fall; and the golden lights and
 flitting shadows fell upon and marbled the surface of that so seething
 pot; and rays plunged deep among the turning waters; and a spark, as
 bright as a diamond, lit upon the swaying eddy.  It began to grow warm
 where Otto lingered, warm and heady; the lights swam, weaving their maze
 across the shaken pool; on the impending rock, reflections danced like
 butterflies; and the air was fanned by the waterfall as by a swinging
 curtain.
 
 Otto, who was weary with tossing and beset with horrid phantoms of
 remorse and jealousy, instantly fell dead in love with that
 sun-chequered, echoing corner.  Holding his feet, he stared out of a
 drowsy trance, wondering, admiring, musing, losing his way among
 uncertain thoughts.  There is nothing that so apes the external bearing
 of free will as that unconscious bustle, obscurely following liquid laws,
 with which a river contends among obstructions.  It seems the very play
 of man and destiny, and as Otto pored on these recurrent changes, he
 grew, by equal steps, the sleepier and the more profound.  Eddy and
 Prince were alike jostled in their purpose, alike anchored by intangible
 influences in one corner of the world.  Eddy and Prince were alike
 useless, starkly useless, in the cosmology of men.  Eddy and
 Prince--Prince and Eddy.
 
 It is probable he had been some while asleep when a voice recalled him
 from oblivion.  'Sir,' it was saying; and looking round, he saw Mr.
 Killian's daughter, terrified by her boldness and making bashful signals
 from the shore.  She was a plain, honest lass, healthy and happy and
 good, and with that sort of beauty that comes of happiness and health.
 But her confusion lent her for the moment an additional charm.
 
 'Good-morning,' said Otto, rising and moving towards her.  'I arose early
 and was in a dream.'
 
 'O, sir!' she cried, 'I wish to beg of you to spare my father; for I
 assure your Highness, if he had known who you was, he would have bitten
 his tongue out sooner.  And Fritz, too--how he went on!  But I had a
 notion; and this morning I went straight down into the stable, and there
 was your Highness's crown upon the stirrup-irons!  But, O, sir, I made
 certain you would spare them; for they were as innocent as lambs.'
 
 'My dear,' said Otto, both amused and gratified, 'you do not understand.
 It is I who am in the wrong; for I had no business to conceal my name and
 lead on these gentleman to speak of me.  And it is I who have to beg of
 you that you will keep my secret and not betray the discourtesy of which
 I was guilty.  As for any fear of me, your friends are safe in
 Gerolstein; and even in my own territory, you must be well aware I have
 no power.'
 
 'O, sir,' she said, curtsying, 'I would not say that: the huntsmen would
 all die for you.'
 
 'Happy Prince!' said Otto.  'But although you are too courteous to avow
 the knowledge, you have had many opportunities of learning that I am a
 vain show.  Only last night we heard it very clearly stated.  You see the
 shadow flitting on this hard rock?  Prince Otto, I am afraid, is but the
 moving shadow, and the name of the rock is Gondremark.  Ah! if your
 friends had fallen foul of Gondremark!  But happily the younger of the
 two admires him.  And as for the old gentleman your father, he is a wise
 man and an excellent talker, and I would take a long wager he is honest.'
 
 'O, for honest, your Highness, that he is!' exclaimed the girl.  'And
 Fritz is as honest as he.  And as for all they said, it was just talk and
 nonsense.  When countryfolk get gossiping, they go on, I do assure you,
 for the fun; they don't as much as think of what they say.  If you went
 to the next farm, it's my belief you would hear as much against my
 father.'
 
 'Nay, nay,' said Otto, 'there you go too fast.  For all that was said
 against Prince Otto--'
 
 'O, it was shameful!' cried the girl.
 
 'Not shameful--true,' returned Otto.  'O, yes--true.  I am all they said
 of me--all that and worse.'
 
 'I never!' cried 'Ottilia.  'Is that how you do?  Well, you would never
 be a soldier.  Now if any one accuses me, I get up and give it them.  O,
 I defend myself.  I wouldn't take a fault at another person's hands, no,
 not if I had it on my forehead.  And that's what you must do, if you mean
 to live it out.  But, indeed, I never heard such nonsense.  I should
 think you was ashamed of yourself!  You're bald, then, I suppose?'
 
 'O no,' said Otto, fairly laughing.  'There I acquit myself: not bald!'
 
 'Well, and good?' pursued the girl.  'Come now, you know you are good,
 and I'll make you say so . . . Your Highness, I beg your humble pardon.
 But there's no disrespect intended.  And anyhow, you know you are.'
 
 'Why, now, what am I to say?' replied Otto.  'You are a cook, and
 excellently well you do it; I embrace the chance of thanking you for the
 ragout.  Well now, have you not seen good food so bedevilled by unskilful
 cookery that no one could be brought to eat the pudding?  That is me, my
 dear.  I am full of good ingredients, but the dish is worthless.  I am--I
 give it you in one word--sugar in the salad.'
 
 'Well, I don't care, you're good,' reiterated Ottilia, a little flushed
 by having failed to understand.
 
 'I will tell you one thing,' replied Otto: 'You are!'
 
 'Ah, well, that's what they all said of you,' moralised the girl; 'such a
 tongue to come round--such a flattering tongue!'
 
 'O, you forget, I am a man of middle age,' the Prince chuckled.
 
 'Well, to speak to you, I should think you was a boy; and Prince or no
 Prince, if you came worrying where I was cooking, I would pin a napkin to
 your tails. . . . And, O Lord, I declare I hope your Highness will
 forgive me,' the girl added.  'I can't keep it in my mind.'
 
 'No more can I,' cried Otto.  'That is just what they complain of!'
 
 They made a loverly-looking couple; only the heavy pouring of that
 horse-tail of water made them raise their voices above lovers' pitch.
 But to a jealous onlooker from above, their mirth and close proximity
 might easily give umbrage; and a rough voice out of a tuft of brambles
 began calling on Ottilia by name.  She changed colour at that.  'It is
 Fritz,' she said.  'I must go.'
 
 'Go, my dear, and I need not bid you go in peace, for I think you have
 discovered that I am not formidable at close quarters,' said the Prince,
 and made her a fine gesture of dismissal.
 
 So Ottilia skipped up the bank, and disappeared into the thicket,
 stopping once for a single blushing bob--blushing, because she had in the
 interval once more forgotten and remembered the stranger's quality.
 
 Otto returned to his rock promontory; but his humour had in the meantime
 changed.  The sun now shone more fairly on the pool; and over its brown,
 welling surface, the blue of heaven and the golden green of the spring
 foliage danced in fleeting arabesque.  The eddies laughed and brightened
 with essential colour.  And the beauty of the dell began to rankle in the
 Prince's mind; it was so near to his own borders, yet without.  He had
 never had much of the joy of possessorship in any of the thousand and one
 beautiful and curious things that were his; and now he was conscious of
 envy for what was another's.  It was, indeed, a smiling, dilettante sort
 of envy; but yet there it was: the passion of Ahab for the vineyard, done
 in little; and he was relieved when Mr. Killian appeared upon the scene.
 
 'I hope, sir, that you have slept well under my plain roof,' said the old
 farmer.
 
 'I am admiring this sweet spot that you are privileged to dwell in,'
 replied Otto, evading the inquiry.
 
 'It is rustic,' returned Mr. Gottesheim, looking around him with
 complacency, 'a very rustic corner; and some of the land to the west is
 most excellent fat land, excellent deep soil.  You should see my wheat in
 the ten-acre field.  There is not a farm in Grunewald, no, nor many in
 Gerolstein, to match the River Farm.  Some sixty--I keep thinking when I
 sow--some sixty, and some seventy, and some an hundredfold; and my own
 place, six score!  But that, sir, is partly the farming.'
 
 'And the stream has fish?' asked Otto.
 
 'A fish-pond,' said the farmer.  'Ay, it is a pleasant bit.  It is
 pleasant even here, if one had time, with the brook drumming in that
 black pool, and the green things hanging all about the rocks, and, dear
 heart, to see the very pebbles! all turned to gold and precious stones!
 But you have come to that time of life, sir, when, if you will excuse me,
 you must look to have the rheumatism set in.  Thirty to forty is, as one
 may say, their seed-time.  And this is a damp cold corner for the early
 morning and an empty stomach.  If I might humbly advise you, sir, I would
 be moving.'
 
 'With all my heart,' said Otto gravely.  'And so you have lived your life
 here?' he added, as they turned to go.
 
 'Here I was born,' replied the farmer, 'and here I wish I could say I was
 to die.  But fortune, sir, fortune turns the wheel.  They say she is
 blind, but we will hope she only sees a little farther on.  My
 grandfather and my father and I, we have all tilled these acres, my
 furrow following theirs.  All the three names are on the garden bench,
 two Killians and one Johann.  Yes, sir, good men have prepared themselves
 for the great change in my old garden.  Well do I mind my father, in a
 woollen night-cap, the good soul, going round and round to see the last
 of it.  'Killian,' said he, 'do you see the smoke of my tobacco?  Why,'
 said he, 'that is man's life.'  It was his last pipe, and I believe he
 knew it; and it was a strange thing, without doubt, to leave the trees
 that he had planted, and the son that he had begotten, ay, sir, and even
 the old pipe with the Turk's head that he had smoked since he was a lad
 and went a-courting.  But here we have no continuing city; and as for the
 eternal, it's a comfortable thought that we have other merits than our
 own.  And yet you would hardly think how sore it goes against the grain
 with me, to die in a strange bed.'
 
 'And must you do so?  For what reason?' Otto asked.
 
 'The reason?  The place is to be sold; three thousand crowns,' replied
 Mr. Gottesheim.  'Had it been a third of that, I may say without boasting
 that, what with my credit and my savings, I could have met the sum.  But
 at three thousand, unless I have singular good fortune and the new
 proprietor continues me in office, there is nothing left me but to
 budge.'
 
 Otto's fancy for the place redoubled at the news, and became joined with
 other feelings.  If all he heard were true, Grunewald was growing very
 hot for a sovereign Prince; it might be well to have a refuge; and if so,
 what more delightful hermitage could man imagine?  Mr. Gottesheim,
 besides, had touched his sympathies.  Every man loves in his soul to play
 the part of the stage deity.  And to step down to the aid of the old
 farmer, who had so roughly handled him in talk, was the ideal of a Fair
 Revenge.  Otto's thoughts brightened at the prospect, and he began to
 regard himself with a renewed respect.
 
 'I can find you, I believe, a purchaser,' he said, 'and one who would
 continue to avail himself of your skill.'
 
 'Can you, sir, indeed?' said the old man.  'Well, I shall be heartily
 obliged; for I begin to find a man may practise resignation all his days,
 as he takes physic, and not come to like it in the end.'
 
 'If you will have the papers drawn, you may even burthen the purchase
 with your interest,' said Otto.  'Let it be assured to you through life.'
 
 'Your friend, sir,' insinuated Killian, 'would not, perhaps, care to make
 the interest reversible?  Fritz is a good lad.'
 
 'Fritz is young,' said the Prince dryly; 'he must earn consideration, not
 inherit.'
 
 'He has long worked upon the place, sir,' insisted Mr. Gottesheim; 'and
 at my great age, for I am seventy-eight come harvest, it would be a
 troublesome thought to the proprietor how to fill my shoes.  It would be
 a care spared to assure yourself of Fritz.  And I believe he might be
 tempted by a permanency.'
 
 'The young man has unsettled views,' returned Otto.
 
 'Possibly the purchaser--' began Killian.
 
 A little spot of anger burned in Otto's cheek.  'I am the purchaser,' he
 said.
 
 'It was what I might have guessed,' replied the farmer, bowing with an
 aged, obsequious dignity.  'You have made an old man very happy; and I
 may say, indeed, that I have entertained an angel unawares.  Sir, the
 great people of this world--and by that I mean those who are great in
 station--if they had only hearts like yours, how they would make the
 fires burn and the poor sing!'
 
 'I would not judge them hardly, sir,' said Otto.  'We all have our
 frailties.'
 
 'Truly, sir,' said Mr. Gottesheim, with unction.  'And by what name, sir,
 am I to address my generous landlord?'
 
 The double recollection of an English traveller, whom he had received the
 week before at court, and of an old English rogue called Transome, whom
 he had known in youth, came pertinently to the Prince's help.
 'Transome,' he answered, 'is my name.  I am an English traveller.  It is,
 to-day, Tuesday.  On Thursday, before noon, the money shall be ready.
 Let us meet, if you please, in Mittwalden, at the "Morning Star."'
 
 'I am, in all things lawful, your servant to command,' replied the
 farmer.  'An Englishman!  You are a great race of travellers.  And has
 your lordship some experience of land?'
 
 'I have had some interest of the kind before,' returned the Prince; 'not
 in Gerolstein, indeed.  But fortune, as you say, turns the wheel, and I
 desire to be beforehand with her revolutions.'
 
 'Very right, sir, I am sure,' said Mr. Killian.
 
 They had been strolling with deliberation; but they were now drawing near
 to the farmhouse, mounting by the trellised pathway to the level of the
 meadow.  A little before them, the sound of voices had been some while
 audible, and now grew louder and more distinct with every step of their
 advance.  Presently, when they emerged upon the top of the bank, they
 beheld Fritz and Ottilia some way off; he, very black and bloodshot,
 emphasising his hoarse speech with the smacking of his fist against his
 palm; she, standing a little way off in blowsy, voluble distress.
 
 'Dear me!' said Mr. Gottesheim, and made as if he would turn aside.
 
 But Otto went straight towards the lovers, in whose dissension he
 believed himself to have a share.  And, indeed, as soon as he had seen
 the Prince, Fritz had stood tragic, as if awaiting and defying his
 approach.
 
 'O, here you are!' he cried, as soon as they were near enough for easy
 speech.  'You are a man at least, and must reply.  What were you after?
 Why were you two skulking in the bush?  God!' he broke out, turning again
 upon Ottilia, 'to think that I should waste my heart on you!'
 
 'I beg your pardon,' Otto cut in.  'You were addressing me.  In virtue of
 what circumstance am I to render you an account of this young lady's
 conduct?  Are you her father? her brother? her husband?'
 
 'O, sir, you know as well as I,' returned the peasant.  'We keep company,
 she and I.  I love her, and she is by way of loving me; but all shall be
 above-board, I would have her to know.  I have a good pride of my own.'
 
 'Why, I perceive I must explain to you what love is,' said Otto.  'Its
 measure is kindness.  It is very possible that you are proud; but she,
 too, may have some self-esteem; I do not speak for myself.  And perhaps,
 if your own doings were so curiously examined, you might find it
 inconvenient to reply.'
 
 'These are all set-offs,' said the young man.  'You know very well that a
 man is a man, and a woman only a woman.  That holds good all over, up and
 down.  I ask you a question, I ask it again, and here I stand.'  He drew
 a mark and toed it.
 
 'When you have studied liberal doctrines somewhat deeper,' said the
 Prince, 'you will perhaps change your note.  You are a man of false
 weights and measures, my young friend.  You have one scale for women,
 another for men; one for princes, and one for farmer-folk.  On the prince
 who neglects his wife you can be most severe.  But what of the lover who
 insults his mistress?  You use the name of love.  I should think this
 lady might very fairly ask to be delivered from love of such a nature.
 For if I, a stranger, had been one-tenth part so gross and so
 discourteous, you would most righteously have broke my head.  It would
 have been in your part, as lover, to protect her from such insolence.
 Protect her first, then, from yourself.'
 
 'Ay,' quoth Mr. Gottesheim, who had been looking on with his hands behind
 his tall old back, 'ay, that's Scripture truth.'
 
 Fritz was staggered, not only by the Prince's imperturbable superiority
 of manner, but by a glimmering consciousness that he himself was in the
 wrong.  The appeal to liberal doctrines had, besides, unmanned him.
 
 'Well,' said he, 'if I was rude, I'll own to it.  I meant no ill, and did
 nothing out of my just rights; but I am above all these old vulgar
 notions too; and if I spoke sharp, I'll ask her pardon.'
 
 'Freely granted, Fritz,' said Ottilia.
 
 'But all this doesn't answer me,' cried Fritz.  'I ask what you two spoke
 about.  She says she promised not to tell; well, then, I mean to know.
 Civility is civility, but I'll be no man's gull.  I have a right to
 common justice, if I _do_ keep company!'
 
 'If you will ask Mr. Gottesheim,' replied Otto, 'you will find I have not
 spent my hours in idleness.  I have, since I arose this morning, agreed
 to buy the farm.  So far I will go to satisfy a curiosity which I
 condemn.'
 
 'O, well, if there was business, that's another matter,' returned Fritz.
 'Though it beats me why you could not tell.  But, of course, if the
 gentleman is to buy the farm, I suppose there would naturally be an end.'
 
 'To be sure,' said Mr. Gottesheim, with a strong accent of conviction.
 
 But Ottilia was much braver.  'There now!' she cried in triumph.  'What
 did I tell you?  I told you I was fighting your battles.  Now you see!
 Think shame of your suspicious temper!  You should go down upon your
 bended knees both to that gentleman and me.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--IN WHICH THE PRINCE COLLECTS OPINIONS BY THE WAY
 
 
 A little before noon Otto, by a triumph of manoeuvring, effected his
 escape.  He was quit in this way of the ponderous gratitude of Mr.
 Killian, and of the confidential gratitude of poor Ottilia; but of Fritz
 he was not quit so readily.  That young politician, brimming with
 mysterious glances, offered to lend his convoy as far as to the
 high-road; and Otto, in fear of some residuary jealousy and for the
 girl's sake, had not the courage to gainsay him; but he regarded his
 companion with uneasy glances, and devoutly wished the business at an
 end.  For some time Fritz walked by the mare in silence; and they had
 already traversed more than half the proposed distance when, with
 something of a blush, he looked up and opened fire.
 
 'Are you not,' he asked, 'what they call a socialist?'
 
 'Why, no,' returned Otto, 'not precisely what they call so.  Why do you
 ask?'
 
 'I will tell you why,' said the young man.  'I saw from the first that
 you were a red progressional, and nothing but the fear of old Killian
 kept you back.  And there, sir, you were right: old men are always
 cowards.  But nowadays, you see, there are so many groups: you can never
 tell how far the likeliest kind of man may be prepared to go; and I was
 never sure you were one of the strong thinkers, till you hinted about
 women and free love.'
 
 'Indeed,' cried Otto, 'I never said a word of such a thing.'
 
 'Not you!' cried Fritz.  'Never a word to compromise!  You was sowing
 seed: ground-bait, our president calls it.  But it's hard to deceive me,
 for I know all the agitators and their ways, and all the doctrines; and
 between you and me,' lowering his voice, 'I am myself affiliated.  O yes,
 I am a secret society man, and here is my medal.'  And drawing out a
 green ribbon that he wore about his neck, he held up, for Otto's
 inspection, a pewter medal bearing the imprint of a Phoenix and the
 legend _Libertas_.  'And so now you see you may trust me,' added Fritz,
 'I am none of your alehouse talkers; I am a convinced revolutionary.'
 And he looked meltingly upon Otto.
 
 'I see,' replied the Prince; 'that is very gratifying.  Well, sir, the
 great thing for the good of one's country is, first of all, to be a good
 man.  All springs from there.  For my part, although you are right in
 thinking that I have to do with politics, I am unfit by intellect and
 temper for a leading role.  I was intended, I fear, for a subaltern.  Yet
 we have all something to command, Mr. Fritz, if it be only our own
 temper; and a man about to marry must look closely to himself.  The
 husband's, like the prince's, is a very artificial standing; and it is
 hard to be kind in either.  Do you follow that?'
 
 'O yes, I follow that,' replied the young man, sadly chop-fallen over the
 nature of the information he had elicited; and then brightening up: 'Is
 it,' he ventured, 'is it for an arsenal that you have bought the farm?'
 
 'We'll see about that,' the Prince answered, laughing.  'You must not be
 too zealous.  And in the meantime, if I were you, I would say nothing on
 the subject.'
 
 'O, trust me, sir, for that,' cried Fritz, as he pocketed a crown.  'And
 you've let nothing out; for I suspected--I might say I knew it--from the
 first.  And mind you, when a guide is required,' he added, 'I know all
 the forest paths.'
 
 Otto rode away, chuckling.  This talk with Fritz had vastly entertained
 him; nor was he altogether discontented with his bearing at the farm;
 men, he was able to tell himself, had behaved worse under smaller
 provocation.  And, to harmonise all, the road and the April air were both
 delightful to his soul.
 
 Up and down, and to and fro, ever mounting through the wooded foothills,
 the broad white high-road wound onward into Grunewald.  On either hand
 the pines stood coolly rooted--green moss prospering, springs welling
 forth between their knuckled spurs; and though some were broad and
 stalwart, and others spiry and slender, yet all stood firm in the same
 attitude and with the same expression, like a silent army presenting
 arms.
 
 The road lay all the way apart from towns and villages, which it left on
 either hand.  Here and there, indeed, in the bottom of green glens, the
 Prince could spy a few congregated roofs, or perhaps above him, on a
 shoulder, the solitary cabin of a woodman.  But the highway was an
 international undertaking and with its face set for distant cities,
 scorned the little life of Grunewald.  Hence it was exceeding solitary.
 Near the frontier Otto met a detachment of his own troops marching in the
 hot dust; and he was recognised and somewhat feebly cheered as he rode
 by.  But from that time forth and for a long while he was alone with the
 great woods.
 
 Gradually the spell of pleasure relaxed; his own thoughts returned, like
 stinging insects, in a cloud; and the talk of the night before, like a
 shower of buffets, fell upon his memory.  He looked east and west for any
 comforter; and presently he was aware of a cross-road coming steeply down
 hill, and a horseman cautiously descending.  A human voice or presence,
 like a spring in the desert, was now welcome in itself, and Otto drew
 bridle to await the coming of this stranger.  He proved to be a very
 red-faced, thick-lipped countryman, with a pair of fat saddle-bags and a
 stone bottle at his waist; who, as soon as the Prince hailed him,
 jovially, if somewhat thickly, answered.  At the same time he gave a
 beery yaw in the saddle.  It was clear his bottle was no longer full.
 
 'Do you ride towards Mittwalden?' asked the Prince.
 
 'As far as the cross-road to Tannenbrunn,' the man replied.  'Will you
 bear company?'
 
 'With pleasure.  I have even waited for you on the chance,' answered
 Otto.
 
 By this time they were close alongside; and the man, with the countryfolk
 instinct, turned his cloudy vision first of all on his companion's mount.
 'The devil!' he cried.  'You ride a bonny mare, friend!'  And then, his
 curiosity being satisfied about the essential, he turned his attention to
 that merely secondary matter, his companion's face.  He started.  'The
 Prince!' he cried, saluting, with another yaw that came near dismounting
 him.  'I beg your pardon, your Highness, not to have recognised you at
 once.'
 
 The Prince was vexed out of his self-possession.  'Since you know me,' he
 said, 'it is unnecessary we should ride together.  I will precede you, if
 you please.'  And he was about to set spur to the grey mare, when the
 half-drunken fellow, reaching over, laid his hand upon the rein.
 
 'Hark you,' he said, 'prince or no prince, that is not how one man should
 conduct himself with another.  What!  You'll ride with me incog. and set
 me talking!  But if I know you, you'll preshede me, if you please!  Spy!'
 And the fellow, crimson with drink and injured vanity, almost spat the
 word into the Prince's face.
 
 A horrid confusion came over Otto.  He perceived that he had acted
 rudely, grossly presuming on his station.  And perhaps a little shiver of
 physical alarm mingled with his remorse, for the fellow was very powerful
 and not more than half in the possession of his senses.  'Take your hand
 from my rein,' he said, with a sufficient assumption of command; and when
 the man, rather to his wonder, had obeyed: 'You should understand, sir,'
 he added, 'that while I might be glad to ride with you as one person of
 sagacity with another, and so receive your true opinions, it would amuse
 me very little to hear the empty compliments you would address to me as
 Prince.'
 
 'You think I would lie, do you?' cried the man with the bottle, purpling
 deeper.
 
 'I know you would,' returned Otto, entering entirely into his
 self-possession.  'You would not even show me the medal you wear about
 your neck.'  For he had caught a glimpse of a green ribbon at the
 fellow's throat.
 
 The change was instantaneous: the red face became mottled with yellow: a
 thick-fingered, tottering hand made a clutch at the tell-tale ribbon.
 'Medal!' the man cried, wonderfully sobered.  'I have no medal.'
 
 'Pardon me,' said the Prince.  'I will even tell you what that medal
 bears: a Phoenix burning, with the word _Libertas_.'  The medallist
 remaining speechless, 'You are a pretty fellow,' continued Otto, smiling,
 'to complain of incivility from the man whom you conspire to murder.'
 
 'Murder!' protested the man.  'Nay, never that; nothing criminal for me!'
 
 'You are strangely misinformed,' said Otto.  'Conspiracy itself is
 criminal, and ensures the pain of death.  Nay, sir, death it is; I will
 guarantee my accuracy.  Not that you need be so deplorably affected, for
 I am no officer.  But those who mingle with politics should look at both
 sides of the medal.'
 
 'Your Highness . . . ' began the knight of the bottle.
 
 'Nonsense! you are a Republican,' cried Otto; 'what have you to do with
 highnesses?  But let us continue to ride forward.  Since you so much
 desire it, I cannot find it in my heart to deprive you of my company.
 And for that matter, I have a question to address to you.  Why, being so
 great a body of men--for you are a great body--fifteen thousand, I have
 heard, but that will be understated; am I right?'
 
 The man gurgled in his throat.
 
 'Why, then, being so considerable a party,' resumed Otto, 'do you not
 come before me boldly with your wants?--what do I say? with your
 commands?  Have I the name of being passionately devoted to my throne?  I
 can scarce suppose it.  Come, then; show me your majority, and I will
 instantly resign.  Tell this to your friends; assure them from me of my
 docility; assure them that, however they conceive of my deficiencies,
 they cannot suppose me more unfit to be a ruler than I do myself.  I am
 one of the worst princes in Europe; will they improve on that?'
 
 'Far be it from me . . .' the man began.
 
 'See, now, if you will not defend my government!' cried Otto.  'If I were
 you, I would leave conspiracies.  You are as little fit to be a
 conspirator as I to be a king.'
 
 'One thing I will say out,' said the man.  'It is not so much you that we
 complain of, it's your lady.'
 
 'Not a word, sir' said the Prince; and then after a moment's pause, and
 in tones of some anger and contempt: 'I once more advise you to have done
 with politics,' he added; 'and when next I see you, let me see you sober.
 A morning drunkard is the last man to sit in judgment even upon the worst
 of princes.'
 
 'I have had a drop, but I had not been drinking,' the man replied,
 triumphing in a sound distinction.  'And if I had, what then?  Nobody
 hangs by me.  But my mill is standing idle, and I blame it on your wife.
 Am I alone in that?  Go round and ask.  Where are the mills?  Where are
 the young men that should be working?  Where is the currency?  All
 paralysed.  No, sir, it is not equal; for I suffer for your faults--I pay
 for them, by George, out of a poor man's pocket.  And what have you to do
 with mine?  Drunk or sober, I can see my country going to hell, and I can
 see whose fault it is.  And so now, I've said my say, and you may drag me
 to a stinking dungeon; what care I?  I've spoke the truth, and so I'll
 hold hard, and not intrude upon your Highness's society.'
 
 And the miller reined up and, clumsily enough, saluted.
 
 'You will observe, I have not asked your name,' said Otto.  'I wish you a
 good ride,' and he rode on hard.  But let him ride as he pleased, this
 interview with the miller was a chokepear, which he could not swallow.
 He had begun by receiving a reproof in manners, and ended by sustaining a
 defeat in logic, both from a man whom he despised.  All his old thoughts
 returned with fresher venom.  And by three in the afternoon, coming to
 the cross-roads for Beckstein, Otto decided to turn aside and dine there
 leisurely.  Nothing at least could be worse than to go on as he was
 going.
 
 In the inn at Beckstein he remarked, immediately upon his entrance, an
 intelligent young gentleman dining, with a book in front of him.  He had
 his own place laid close to the reader, and with a proper apology, broke
 ground by asking what he read.
 
 'I am perusing,' answered the young gentleman, 'the last work of the Herr
 Doctor Hohenstockwitz, cousin and librarian of your Prince here in
 Grunewald--a man of great erudition and some lambencies of wit.'
 
 'I am acquainted,' said Otto, 'with the Herr Doctor, though not yet with
 his work.'
 
 'Two privileges that I must envy you,' replied the young man politely:
 'an honour in hand, a pleasure in the bush.'
 
 'The Herr Doctor is a man much respected, I believe, for his
 attainments?' asked the Prince.
 
 'He is, sir, a remarkable instance of the force of intellect,' replied
 the reader.  'Who of our young men know anything of his cousin, all
 reigning Prince although he be?  Who but has heard of Doctor Gotthold?
 But intellectual merit, alone of all distinctions, has its base in
 nature.'
 
 'I have the gratification of addressing a student--perhaps an author?'
 Otto suggested.
 
 The young man somewhat flushed.  'I have some claim to both distinctions,
 sir, as you suppose,' said he; 'there is my card.  I am the licentiate
 Roederer, author of several works on the theory and practice of
 politics.'
 
 'You immensely interest me,' said the Prince; 'the more so as I gather
 that here in Grunewald we are on the brink of revolution.  Pray, since
 these have been your special studies, would you augur hopefully of such a
 movement?'
 
 'I perceive,' said the young author, with a certain vinegary twitch,
 'that you are unacquainted with my opuscula.  I am a convinced
 authoritarian.  I share none of those illusory, Utopian fancies with
 which empirics blind themselves and exasperate the ignorant.  The day of
 these ideas is, believe me, past, or at least passing.'
 
 'When I look about me--' began Otto.
 
 'When you look about you,' interrupted the licentiate, 'you behold the
 ignorant.  But in the laboratory of opinion, beside the studious lamp, we
 begin already to discard these figments.  We begin to return to nature's
 order, to what I might call, if I were to borrow from the language of
 therapeutics, the expectant treatment of abuses.  You will not
 misunderstand me,' he continued: 'a country in the condition in which we
 find Grunewald, a prince such as your Prince Otto, we must explicitly
 condemn; they are behind the age.  But I would look for a remedy not to
 brute convulsions, but to the natural supervenience of a more able
 sovereign.  I should amuse you, perhaps,' added the licentiate, with a
 smile, 'I think I should amuse you if I were to explain my notion of a
 prince.  We who have studied in the closet, no longer, in this age,
 propose ourselves for active service.  The paths, we have perceived, are
 incompatible.  I would not have a student on the throne, though I would
 have one near by for an adviser.  I would set forward as prince a man of
 a good, medium understanding, lively rather than deep; a man of courtly
 manner, possessed of the double art to ingratiate and to command;
 receptive, accommodating, seductive.  I have been observing you since
 your first entrance.  Well, sir, were I a subject of Grunewald I should
 pray heaven to set upon the seat of government just such another as
 yourself.'
 
 'The devil you would!' exclaimed the Prince.
 
 The licentiate Roederer laughed most heartily.  'I thought I should
 astonish you,' he said.  'These are not the ideas of the masses.'
 
 'They are not, I can assure you,' Otto said.
 
 'Or rather,' distinguished the licentiate, 'not to-day.  The time will
 come, however, when these ideas shall prevail.'
 
 'You will permit me, sir, to doubt it,' said Otto.
 
 'Modesty is always admirable,' chuckled the theorist.  'But yet I assure
 you, a man like you, with such a man as, say, Doctor Gotthold at your
 elbow, would be, for all practical issues, my ideal ruler.'
 
 At this rate the hours sped pleasantly for Otto.  But the licentiate
 unfortunately slept that night at Beckstein, where he was, being dainty
 in the saddle and given to half stages.  And to find a convoy to
 Mittwalden, and thus mitigate the company of his own thoughts, the Prince
 had to make favour with a certain party of wood-merchants from various
 states of the empire, who had been drinking together somewhat noisily at
 the far end of the apartment.
 
 The night had already fallen when they took the saddle.  The merchants
 were very loud and mirthful; each had a face like a nor'west moon; and
 they played pranks with each others' horses, and mingled songs and
 choruses, and alternately remembered and forgot the companion of their
 ride.  Otto thus combined society and solitude, hearkening now to their
 chattering and empty talk, now to the voices of the encircling forest.
 The starlit dark, the faint wood airs, the clank of the horse-shoes
 making broken music, accorded together and attuned his mind.  And he was
 still in a most equal temper when the party reached the top of that long
 hill that overlooks Mittwalden.
 
 Down in the bottom of a bowl of forest, the lights of the little formal
 town glittered in a pattern, street crossing street; away by itself on
 the right, the palace was glowing like a factory.
 
 Although he knew not Otto, one of the wood-merchants was a native of the
 state.  'There,' said he, pointing to the palace with his whip, 'there is
 Jezebel's inn.'
 
 'What, do you call it that?' cried another, laughing.
 
 'Ay, that's what they call it,' returned the Grunewalder; and he broke
 into a song, which the rest, as people well acquainted with the words and
 air, instantly took up in chorus.  Her Serene Highness Amalia Seraphina,
 Princess of Grunewald, was the heroine, Gondremark the hero of this
 ballad.  Shame hissed in Otto's ears.  He reined up short and sat stunned
 in the saddle; and the singers continued to descend the hill without him.
 
 The song went to a rough, swashing, popular air; and long after the words
 became inaudible the swing of the music, rising and falling, echoed
 insult in the Prince's brain.  He fled the sounds.  Hard by him on his
 right a road struck towards the palace, and he followed it through the
 thick shadows and branching alleys of the park.  It was a busy place on a
 fine summer's afternoon, when the court and burghers met and saluted; but
 at that hour of the night in the early spring it was deserted to the
 roosting birds.  Hares rustled among the covert; here and there a statue
 stood glimmering, with its eternal gesture; here and there the echo of an
 imitation temple clattered ghostly to the trampling of the mare.  Ten
 minutes brought him to the upper end of his own home garden, where the
 small stables opened, over a bridge, upon the park.  The yard clock was
 striking the hour of ten; so was the big bell in the palace bell-tower;
 and, farther off, the belfries of the town.  About the stable all else
 was silent but the stamping of stalled horses and the rattle of halters.
 Otto dismounted; and as he did so a memory came back to him: a whisper of
 dishonest grooms and stolen corn, once heard, long forgotten, and now
 recurring in the nick of opportunity.  He crossed the bridge, and, going
 up to a window, knocked six or seven heavy blows in a particular cadence,
 and, as he did so, smiled.  Presently a wicket was opened in the gate,
 and a man's head appeared in the dim starlight.
 
 'Nothing to-night,' said a voice.
 
 'Bring a lantern,' said the Prince.
 
 'Dear heart a' mercy!' cried the groom.  'Who's that?'
 
 'It is I, the Prince,' replied Otto.  'Bring a lantern, take in the mare,
 and let me through into the garden.'
 
 The man remained silent for a while, his head still projecting through
 the wicket.
 
 'His Highness!' he said at last.  'And why did your Highness knock so
 strange?'
 
 'It is a superstition in Mittwalden,' answered Otto, 'that it cheapens
 corn.'
 
 With a sound like a sob the groom fled.  He was very white when he
 returned, even by the light of the lantern; and his hand trembled as he
 undid the fastenings and took the mare.
 
 'Your Highness,' he began at last, 'for God's sake . . . '  And there he
 paused, oppressed with guilt.
 
 'For God's sake, what?' asked Otto cheerfully.  'For God's sake let us
 have cheaper corn, say I.  Good-night!'  And he strode off into the
 garden, leaving the groom petrified once more.
 
 The garden descended by a succession of stone terraces to the level of
 the fish-pond.  On the far side the ground rose again, and was crowned by
 the confused roofs and gables of the palace.  The modern pillared front,
 the ball-room, the great library, the princely apartments, the busy and
 illuminated quarters of that great house, all faced the town.  The garden
 side was much older; and here it was almost dark; only a few windows
 quietly lighted at various elevations.  The great square tower rose,
 thinning by stages like a telescope; and on the top of all the flag hung
 motionless.
 
 The garden, as it now lay in the dusk and glimmer of the starshine,
 breathed of April violets.  Under night's cavern arch the shrubs
 obscurely bustled.  Through the plotted terraces and down the marble
 stairs the Prince rapidly descended, fleeing before uncomfortable
 thoughts.  But, alas! from these there is no city of refuge.  And now,
 when he was about midway of the descent, distant strains of music began
 to fall upon his ear from the ball-room, where the court was dancing.
 They reached him faint and broken, but they touched the keys of memory;
 and through and above them Otto heard the ranting melody of the
 wood-merchants' song.  Mere blackness seized upon his mind.  Here he was,
 coming home; the wife was dancing, the husband had been playing a trick
 upon a lackey; and meanwhile, all about them, they were a by-word to
 their subjects.  Such a prince, such a husband, such a man, as this Otto
 had become!  And he sped the faster onward.
 
 Some way below he came unexpectedly upon a sentry; yet a little farther,
 and he was challenged by a second; and as he crossed the bridge over the
 fish-pond, an officer making the rounds stopped him once more.  The
 parade of watch was more than usual; but curiosity was dead in Otto's
 mind, and he only chafed at the interruption.  The porter of the back
 postern admitted him, and started to behold him so disordered.  Thence,
 hasting by private stairs and passages, he came at length unseen to his
 own chamber, tore off his clothes, and threw himself upon his bed in the
 dark.  The music of the ball-room still continued to a very lively
 measure; and still, behind that, he heard in spirit the chorus of the
 merchants clanking down the hill.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK II--OF LOVE AND POLITICS
 
 
 CHAPTER I--WHAT HAPPENED IN THE LIBRARY
 
 
 At a quarter before six on the following morning Doctor Gotthold was
 already at his desk in the library; and with a small cup of black coffee
 at his elbow, and an eye occasionally wandering to the busts and the long
 array of many-coloured books, was quietly reviewing the labours of the
 day before.  He was a man of about forty, flaxen-haired, with refined
 features a little worn, and bright eyes somewhat faded.  Early to bed and
 early to rise, his life was devoted to two things: erudition and Rhine
 wine.  An ancient friendship existed latent between him and Otto; they
 rarely met, but when they did it was to take up at once the thread of
 their suspended intimacy.  Gotthold, the virgin priest of knowledge, had
 envied his cousin, for half a day, when he was married; he had never
 envied him his throne.
 
 Reading was not a popular diversion at the court of Grunewald; and that
 great, pleasant, sunshiny gallery of books and statues was, in practice,
 Gotthold's private cabinet.  On this particular Wednesday morning,
 however, he had not been long about his manuscript when a door opened and
 the Prince stepped into the apartment.  The doctor watched him as he drew
 near, receiving, from each of the embayed windows in succession, a flush
 of morning sun; and Otto looked so gay, and walked so airily, he was so
 well dressed and brushed and frizzled, so point-device, and of such a
 sovereign elegance, that the heart of his cousin the recluse was rather
 moved against him.
 
 'Good-morning, Gotthold,' said Otto, dropping in a chair.
 
 'Good-morning, Otto,' returned the librarian.  'You are an early bird.
 Is this an accident, or do you begin reforming?'
 
 'It is about time, I fancy,' answered the Prince.
 
 'I cannot imagine,' said the Doctor.  'I am too sceptical to be an
 ethical adviser; and as for good resolutions, I believed in them when I
 was young.  They are the colours of hope's rainbow.'
 
 'If you come to think of it,' said Otto, 'I am not a popular sovereign.'
 And with a look he changed his statement to a question.
 
 'Popular?  Well, there I would distinguish,' answered Gotthold, leaning
 back and joining the tips of his fingers.  'There are various kinds of
 popularity; the bookish, which is perfectly impersonal, as unreal as the
 nightmare; the politician's, a mixed variety; and yours, which is the
 most personal of all.  Women take to you; footmen adore you; it is as
 natural to like you as to pat a dog; and were you a saw-miller you would
 be the most popular citizen in Grunewald.  As a prince--well, you are in
 the wrong trade.  It is perhaps philosophical to recognise it as you do.'
 
 'Perhaps philosophical?' repeated Otto.
 
 'Yes, perhaps.  I would not be dogmatic,' answered Gotthold.
 
 'Perhaps philosophical, and certainly not virtuous,' Otto resumed.
 
 'Not of a Roman virtue,' chuckled the recluse.
 
 Otto drew his chair nearer to the table, leaned upon it with his elbow,
 and looked his cousin squarely in the face.  'In short,' he asked, 'not
 manly?'
 
 'Well,' Gotthold hesitated, 'not manly, if you will.'  And then, with a
 laugh, 'I did not know that you gave yourself out to be manly,' he added.
 'It was one of the points that I inclined to like about you; inclined, I
 believe, to admire.  The names of virtues exercise a charm on most of us;
 we must lay claim to all of them, however incompatible; we must all be
 both daring and prudent; we must all vaunt our pride and go to the stake
 for our humility.  Not so you.  Without compromise you were yourself: a
 pretty sight.  I have always said it: none so void of all pretence as
 Otto.'
 
 'Pretence and effort both!' cried Otto.  'A dead dog in a canal is more
 alive.  And the question, Gotthold, the question that I have to face is
 this: Can I not, with effort and self-denial, can I not become a
 tolerable sovereign?'
 
 'Never,' replied Gotthold.  'Dismiss the notion.  And besides, dear
 child, you would not try.'
 
 'Nay, Gotthold, I am not to be put by,' said Otto.  'If I am
 constitutionally unfit to be a sovereign, what am I doing with this
 money, with this palace, with these guards?  And I--a thief--am to
 execute the law on others?'
 
 'I admit the difficulty,' said Gotthold.
 
 'Well, can I not try?' continued Otto.  'Am I not bound to try?  And with
 the advice and help of such a man as you--'
 
 'Me!' cried the librarian.  'Now, God forbid!'
 
 Otto, though he was in no very smiling humour, could not forbear to
 smile.  'Yet I was told last night,' he laughed, 'that with a man like me
 to impersonate, and a man like you to touch the springs, a very possible
 government could be composed.'
 
 'Now I wonder in what diseased imagination,' Gotthold said, 'that
 preposterous monster saw the light of day?'
 
 'It was one of your own trade--a writer: one Roederer,' said Otto.
 
 'Roederer! an ignorant puppy!' cried the librarian.
 
 'You are ungrateful,' said Otto.  'He is one of your professed admirers.'
 
 'Is he?' cried Gotthold, obviously impressed.  'Come, that is a good
 account of the young man.  I must read his stuff again.  It is the rather
 to his credit, as our views are opposite.  The east and west are not more
 opposite.  Can I have converted him?  But no; the incident belongs to
 Fairyland.'
 
 'You are not then,' asked the Prince, 'an authoritarian?'
 
 'I?  God bless me, no!' said Gotthold.  'I am a red, dear child.'
 
 'That brings me then to my next point, and by a natural transition.  If I
 am so clearly unfitted for my post,' the Prince asked; 'if my friends
 admit it, if my subjects clamour for my downfall, if revolution is
 preparing at this hour, must I not go forth to meet the inevitable?
 should I not save these horrors and be done with these absurdities? in a
 word, should I not abdicate?  O, believe me, I feel the ridicule, the
 vast abuse of language,' he added, wincing, 'but even a principulus like
 me cannot resign; he must make a great gesture, and come buskined forth,
 and abdicate.'
 
 'Ay,' said Gotthold, 'or else stay where he is.  What gnat has bitten you
 to-day?  Do you not know that you are touching, with lay hands, the very
 holiest inwards of philosophy, where madness dwells?  Ay, Otto, madness;
 for in the serene temples of the wise, the inmost shrine, which we
 carefully keep locked, is full of spiders' webs.  All men, all, are
 fundamentally useless; nature tolerates, she does not need, she does not
 use them: sterile flowers!  All--down to the fellow swinking in a byre,
 whom fools point out for the exception--all are useless; all weave ropes
 of sand; or like a child that has breathed on a window, write and
 obliterate, write and obliterate, idle words!  Talk of it no more.  That
 way, I tell you, madness lies.'  The speaker rose from his chair and then
 sat down again.  He laughed a little laugh, and then, changing his tone,
 resumed: 'Yes, dear child, we are not here to do battle with giants; we
 are here to be happy like the flowers, if we can be.  It is because you
 could, that I have always secretly admired you.  Cling to that trade;
 believe me, it is the right one.  Be happy, be idle, be airy.  To the
 devil with all casuistry! and leave the state to Gondremark, as
 heretofore.  He does it well enough, they say; and his vanity enjoys the
 situation.'
 
 'Gotthold,' cried Otto, 'what is this to me?  Useless is not the
 question; I cannot rest at uselessness; I must be useful or I must be
 noxious--one or other.  I grant you the whole thing, prince and
 principality alike, is pure absurdity, a stroke of satire; and that a
 banker or the man who keeps an inn has graver duties.  But now, when I
 have washed my hands of it three years, and left all--labour,
 responsibility, and honour and enjoyment too, if there be any--to
 Gondremark and to--Seraphina--'  He hesitated at the name, and Gotthold
 glanced aside.  'Well,' the Prince continued, 'what has come of it?
 Taxes, army, cannon--why, it's like a box of lead soldiers!  And the
 people sick at the folly of it, and fired with the injustice!  And war,
 too--I hear of war--war in this teapot!  What a complication of absurdity
 and disgrace!  And when the inevitable end arrives--the revolution--who
 will be to blame in the sight of God, who will be gibbeted in public
 opinion?  I!  Prince Puppet!'
 
 'I thought you had despised public opinion,' said Gotthold.
 
 'I did,' said Otto sombrely, 'but now I do not.  I am growing old.  And
 then, Gotthold, there is Seraphina.  She is loathed in this country that
 I brought her to and suffered her to spoil.  Yes, I gave it her as a
 plaything, and she has broken it: a fine Prince, an admirable Princess!
 Even her life--I ask you, Gotthold, is her life safe?'
 
 'It is safe enough to-day,' replied the librarian: 'but since you ask me
 seriously, I would not answer for to-morrow.  She is ill-advised.'
 
 'And by whom?  By this Gondremark, to whom you counsel me to leave my
 country,' cried the Prince.  'Rare advice!  The course that I have been
 following all these years, to come at last to this.  O, ill-advised! if
 that were all!  See now, there is no sense in beating about the bush
 between two men: you know what scandal says of her?'
 
 Gotthold, with pursed lips, silently nodded.
 
 'Well, come, you are not very cheering as to my conduct as the Prince;
 have I even done my duty as a husband?' Otto asked.
 
 'Nay, nay,' said Gotthold, earnestly and eagerly, 'this is another
 chapter.  I am an old celibate, an old monk.  I cannot advise you in your
 marriage.'
 
 'Nor do I require advice,' said Otto, rising.  'All of this must cease.'
 And he began to walk to and fro with his hands behind his back.
 
 'Well, Otto, may God guide you!' said Gotthold, after a considerable
 silence.  'I cannot.'
 
 'From what does all this spring?' said the Prince, stopping in his walk.
 'What am I to call it?  Diffidence?  The fear of ridicule?  Inverted
 vanity?  What matter names, if it has brought me to this?  I could never
 bear to be bustling about nothing; I was ashamed of this toy kingdom from
 the first; I could not tolerate that people should fancy I believed in a
 thing so patently absurd!  I would do nothing that cannot be done
 smiling.  I have a sense of humour, forsooth!  I must know better than my
 Maker.  And it was the same thing in my marriage,' he added more
 hoarsely.  'I did not believe this girl could care for me; I must not
 intrude; I must preserve the foppery of my indifference.  What an
 impotent picture!'
 
 'Ay, we have the same blood,' moralised Gotthold.  'You are drawing, with
 fine strokes, the character of the born sceptic.'
 
 'Sceptic?--coward!' cried Otto.  'Coward is the word.  A springless,
 putty-hearted, cowering coward!'
 
 And as the Prince rapped out the words in tones of unusual vigour, a
 little, stout, old gentleman, opening a door behind Gotthold, received
 them fairly in the face.  With his parrot's beak for a nose, his pursed
 mouth, his little goggling eyes, he was the picture of formality; and in
 ordinary circumstances, strutting behind the drum of his corporation, he
 impressed the beholder with a certain air of frozen dignity and wisdom.
 But at the smallest contrariety, his trembling hands and disconnected
 gestures betrayed the weakness at the root.  And now, when he was thus
 surprisingly received in that library of Mittwalden Palace, which was the
 customary haunt of silence, his hands went up into the air as if he had
 been shot, and he cried aloud with the scream of an old woman.
 
 'O!' he gasped, recovering, 'Your Highness!  I beg ten thousand pardons.
 But your Highness at such an hour in the library!--a circumstance so
 unusual as your Highness's presence was a thing I could not be expected
 to foresee.'
 
 'There is no harm done, Herr Cancellarius,' said Otto.
 
 'I came upon the errand of a moment: some papers I left over-night with
 the Herr Doctor,' said the Chancellor of Grunewald.  'Herr Doctor, if you
 will kindly give me them, I will intrude no longer.'
 
 Gotthold unlocked a drawer and handed a bundle of manuscript to the old
 gentleman, who prepared, with fitting salutations, to take his departure.
 
 'Herr Greisengesang, since we have met,' said Otto, 'let us talk.'
 
 'I am honoured by his Highness's commands,' replied the Chancellor.
 
 'All has been quiet since I left?' asked the Prince, resuming his seat.
 
 'The usual business, your Highness,' answered Greisengesang; 'punctual
 trifles: huge, indeed, if neglected, but trifles when discharged.  Your
 Highness is most zealously obeyed.'
 
 'Obeyed, Herr Cancellarius?' returned the Prince.  'And when have I
 obliged you with an order?  Replaced, let us rather say.  But to touch
 upon these trifles; instance me a few.'
 
 'The routine of government, from which your Highness has so wisely
 dissociated his leisure . . . ' began Greisengesang.
 
 'We will leave my leisure, sir,' said Otto.  'Approach the facts.'
 
 'The routine of business was proceeded with,' replied the official, now
 visibly twittering.
 
 'It is very strange, Herr Cancellarius, that you should so persistently
 avoid my questions,' said the Prince.  'You tempt me to suppose a purpose
 in your dulness.  I have asked you whether all was quiet; do me the
 pleasure to reply.'
 
 'Perfectly--O, perfectly quiet,' jerked the ancient puppet, with every
 signal of untruth.
 
 'I make a note of these words,' said the Prince gravely.  'You assure me,
 your sovereign, that since the date of my departure nothing has occurred
 of which you owe me an account.'
 
 'I take your Highness, I take the Herr Doctor to witness,' cried
 Greisengesang, 'that I have had no such expression.'
 
 'Halt!' said the Prince; and then, after a pause: 'Herr Greisengesang,
 you are an old man, and you served my father before you served me,' he
 added.  'It consists neither with your dignity nor mine that you should
 babble excuses and stumble possibly upon untruths.  Collect your
 thoughts; and then categorically inform me of all you have been charged
 to hide.'
 
 Gotthold, stooping very low over his desk, appeared to have resumed his
 labours; but his shoulders heaved with subterranean merriment.  The
 Prince waited, drawing his handkerchief quietly through his fingers.
 
 'Your Highness, in this informal manner,' said the old gentleman at last,
 'and being unavoidably deprived of documents, it would be difficult, it
 would be impossible, to do justice to the somewhat grave occurrences
 which have transpired.'
 
 'I will not criticise your attitude,' replied the Prince.  'I desire
 that, between you and me, all should be done gently; for I have not
 forgotten, my old friend, that you were kind to me from the first, and
 for a period of years a faithful servant.  I will thus dismiss the
 matters on which you waive immediate inquiry.  But you have certain
 papers actually in your hand.  Come, Herr Greisengesang, there is at
 least one point for which you have authority.  Enlighten me on that.'
 
 'On that?' cried the old gentleman.  'O, that is a trifle; a matter, your
 Highness, of police; a detail of a purely administrative order.  These
 are simply a selection of the papers seized upon the English traveller.'
 
 'Seized?' echoed Otto.  'In what sense?  Explain yourself.'
 
 'Sir John Crabtree,' interposed Gotthold, looking up, 'was arrested
 yesterday evening.'
 
 'It this so, Herr Cancellarius?' demanded Otto sternly.
 
 'It was judged right, your Highness,' protested Greisengesang.  'The
 decree was in due form, invested with your Highness's authority by
 procuration.  I am but an agent; I had no status to prevent the measure.'
 
 'This man, my guest, has been arrested,' said the Prince.  'On what
 grounds, sir?  With what colour of pretence?'
 
 The Chancellor stammered.
 
 'Your Highness will perhaps find the reason in these documents,' said
 Gotthold, pointing with the tail of his pen.
 
 Otto thanked his cousin with a look.  'Give them to me,' he said,
 addressing the Chancellor.
 
 But that gentleman visibly hesitated to obey.  'Baron von Gondremark,' he
 said, 'has made the affair his own.  I am in this case a mere messenger;
 and as such, I am not clothed with any capacity to communicate the
 documents I carry.  Herr Doctor, I am convinced you will not fail to bear
 me out.'
 
 'I have heard a great deal of nonsense,' said Gotthold, 'and most of it
 from you; but this beats all.'
 
 'Come, sir,' said Otto, rising, 'the papers.  I command.'
 
 Herr Greisengesang instantly gave way.
 
 'With your Highness's permission,' he said, 'and laying at his feet my
 most submiss apologies, I will now hasten to attend his further orders in
 the Chancery.'
 
 'Herr Cancellarius, do you see this chair?' said Otto.  'There is where
 you shall attend my further orders.  O, now, no more!' he cried, with a
 gesture, as the old man opened his lips.  'You have sufficiently marked
 your zeal to your employer; and I begin to weary of a moderation you
 abuse.'
 
 The Chancellor moved to the appointed chair and took his seat in silence.
 
 'And now,' said Otto, opening the roll, 'what is all this? it looks like
 the manuscript of a book.'
 
 'It is,' said Gotthold, 'the manuscript of a book of travels.'
 
 'You have read it, Doctor Hohenstockwitz?' asked the Prince.
 
 'Nay, I but saw the title-page,' replied Gotthold.  'But the roll was
 given to me open, and I heard no word of any secrecy.'
 
 Otto dealt the Chancellor an angry glance.
 
 'I see,' he went on.  'The papers of an author seized at this date of the
 world's history, in a state so petty and so ignorant as Grunewald, here
 is indeed an ignominious folly.  Sir,' to the Chancellor, 'I marvel to
 find you in so scurvy an employment.  On your conduct to your Prince I
 will not dwell; but to descend to be a spy!  For what else can it be
 called?  To seize the papers of this gentleman, the private papers of a
 stranger, the toil of a life, perhaps--to open, and to read them.  And
 what have we to do with books?  The Herr Doctor might perhaps be asked
 for his advice; but we have no _index expurgatorius_ in Grunewald.  Had
 we but that, we should be the most absolute parody and farce upon this
 tawdry earth.'
 
 Yet, even while Otto spoke, he had continued to unfold the roll; and now,
 when it lay fully open, his eye rested on the title-page elaborately
 written in red ink.  It ran thus:
 
                                    MEMOIRS
                           OF A VISIT TO THE VARIOUS
                               COURTS OF EUROPE,
                                       BY
                          SIR JOHN CRABTREE, BARONET.
 
 Below was a list of chapters, each bearing the name of one of the
 European Courts; and among these the nineteenth and the last upon the
 list was dedicated to Grunewald.
 
 'Ah!  The Court of Grunewald!' said Otto, 'that should be droll reading.'
 And his curiosity itched for it.
 
 'A methodical dog, this English Baronet,' said Gotthold.  'Each chapter
 written and finished on the spot.  I shall look for his work when it
 appears.'
 
 'It would be odd, now, just to glance at it,' said Otto, wavering.
 
 Gotthold's brow darkened, and he looked out of window.
 
 But though the Prince understood the reproof, his weakness prevailed.  'I
 will,' he said, with an uneasy laugh, 'I will, I think, just glance at
 it.'
 
 So saying, he resumed his seat and spread the traveller's manuscript upon
 the table.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--'ON THE COURT OF GRUNEWALD,' BEING A PORTION OF THE
 TRAVELLER'S MANUSCRIPT
 
 
 It may well be asked (_it was thus the English traveller began his
 nineteenth chapter_) why I should have chosen Grunewald out of so many
 other states equally petty, formal, dull, and corrupt.  Accident, indeed,
 decided, and not I; but I have seen no reason to regret my visit.  The
 spectacle of this small society macerating in its own abuses was not
 perhaps instructive, but I have found it exceedingly diverting.
 
 The reigning Prince, Otto Johann Friedrich, a young man of imperfect
 education, questionable valour, and no scintilla of capacity, has fallen
 into entire public contempt.  It was with difficulty that I obtained an
 interview, for he is frequently absent from a court where his presence is
 unheeded, and where his only role is to be a cloak for the amours of his
 wife.  At last, however, on the third occasion when I visited the palace,
 I found this sovereign in the exercise of his inglorious function, with
 the wife on one hand, and the lover on the other.  He is not ill-looking;
 he has hair of a ruddy gold, which naturally curls, and his eyes are
 dark, a combination which I always regard as the mark of some congenital
 deficiency, physical or moral; his features are irregular, but pleasing;
 the nose perhaps a little short, and the mouth a little womanish; his
 address is excellent, and he can express himself with point.  But to
 pierce below these externals is to come on a vacuity of any sterling
 quality, a deliquescence of the moral nature, a frivolity and
 inconsequence of purpose that mark the nearly perfect fruit of a decadent
 age.  He has a worthless smattering of many subjects, but a grasp of
 none.  'I soon weary of a pursuit,' he said to me, laughing; it would
 almost appear as if he took a pride in his incapacity and lack of moral
 courage.  The results of his dilettanteism are to be seen in every field;
 he is a bad fencer, a second-rate horseman, dancer, shot; he sings--I
 have heard him--and he sings like a child; he writes intolerable verses
 in more than doubtful French; he acts like the common amateur; and in
 short there is no end to the number of the things that he does, and does
 badly.  His one manly taste is for the chase.  In sum, he is but a plexus
 of weaknesses; the singing chambermaid of the stage, tricked out in man's
 apparel, and mounted on a circus horse.  I have seen this poor phantom of
 a prince riding out alone or with a few huntsmen, disregarded by all, and
 I have been even grieved for the bearer of so futile and melancholy an
 existence.  The last Merovingians may have looked not otherwise.
 
 The Princess Amalia Seraphina, a daughter of the Grand-Ducal house of
 Toggenburg-Tannhauser, would be equally inconsiderable if she were not a
 cutting instrument in the hands of an ambitious man.  She is much younger
 than the Prince, a girl of two-and-twenty, sick with vanity,
 superficially clever, and fundamentally a fool.  She has a red-brown
 rolling eye, too large for her face, and with sparks of both levity and
 ferocity; her forehead is high and narrow, her figure thin and a little
 stooping.  Her manners, her conversation, which she interlards with
 French, her very tastes and ambitions, are alike assumed; and the
 assumption is ungracefully apparent: Hoyden playing Cleopatra.  I should
 judge her to be incapable of truth.  In private life a girl of this
 description embroils the peace of families, walks attended by a troop of
 scowling swains, and passes, once at least, through the divorce court; it
 is a common and, except to the cynic, an uninteresting type.  On the
 throne, however, and in the hands of a man like Gondremark, she may
 become the authoress of serious public evils.
 
 Gondremark, the true ruler of this unfortunate country, is a more complex
 study.  His position in Grunewald, to which he is a foreigner, is
 eminently false; and that he should maintain it as he does, a very
 miracle of impudence and dexterity.  His speech, his face, his policy,
 are all double: heads and tails.  Which of the two extremes may be his
 actual design he were a bold man who should offer to decide.  Yet I will
 hazard the guess that he follows both experimentally, and awaits, at the
 hand of destiny, one of those directing hints of which she is so lavish
 to the wise.
 
 On the one hand, as _Maire du Palais_ to the incompetent Otto, and using
 the love-sick Princess for a tool and mouthpiece, he pursues a policy of
 arbitrary power and territorial aggrandisement.  He has called out the
 whole capable male population of the state to military service; he has
 bought cannon; he has tempted away promising officers from foreign
 armies; and he now begins, in his international relations, to assume the
 swaggering port and the vague, threatful language of a bully.  The idea
 of extending Grunewald may appear absurd, but the little state is
 advantageously placed, its neighbours are all defenceless; and if at any
 moment the jealousies of the greater courts should neutralise each other,
 an active policy might double the principality both in population and
 extent.  Certainly at least the scheme is entertained in the court of
 Mittwalden; nor do I myself regard it as entirely desperate.  The
 margravate of Brandenburg has grown from as small beginnings to a
 formidable power; and though it is late in the day to try adventurous
 policies, and the age of war seems ended, Fortune, we must not forget,
 still blindly turns her wheel for men and nations.  Concurrently with,
 and tributary to, these warlike preparations, crushing taxes have been
 levied, journals have been suppressed, and the country, which three years
 ago was prosperous and happy, now stagnates in a forced inaction, gold
 has become a curiosity, and the mills stand idle on the mountain streams.
 
 On the other hand, in his second capacity of popular tribune, Gondremark
 is the incarnation of the free lodges, and sits at the centre of an
 organised conspiracy against the state.  To any such movement my
 sympathies were early acquired, and I would not willingly let fall a word
 that might embarrass or retard the revolution.  But to show that I speak
 of knowledge, and not as the reporter of mere gossip, I may mention that
 I have myself been present at a meeting where the details of a republican
 Constitution were minutely debated and arranged; and I may add that
 Gondremark was throughout referred to by the speakers as their captain in
 action and the arbiter of their disputes.  He has taught his dupes (for
 so I must regard them) that his power of resistance to the Princess is
 limited, and at each fresh stretch of authority persuades them, with
 specious reasons, to postpone the hour of insurrection.  Thus (to give
 some instances of his astute diplomacy) he salved over the decree
 enforcing military service, under the plea that to be well drilled and
 exercised in arms was even a necessary preparation for revolt.  And the
 other day, when it began to be rumoured abroad that a war was being
 forced on a reluctant neighbour, the Grand Duke of Gerolstein, and I made
 sure it would be the signal for an instant rising, I was struck dumb with
 wonder to find that even this had been prepared and was to be accepted.
 I went from one to another in the Liberal camp, and all were in the same
 story, all had been drilled and schooled and fitted out with vacuous
 argument.  'The lads had better see some real fighting,' they said; 'and
 besides, it will be as well to capture Gerolstein: we can then extend to
 our neighbours the blessing of liberty on the same day that we snatch it
 for ourselves; and the republic will be all the stronger to resist, if
 the kings of Europe should band themselves together to reduce it.'  I
 know not which of the two I should admire the more: the simplicity of the
 multitude or the audacity of the adventurer.  But such are the
 subtleties, such the quibbling reasons, with which he blinds and leads
 this people.  How long a course so tortuous can be pursued with safety I
 am incapable of guessing; not long, one would suppose; and yet this
 singular man has been treading the mazes for five years, and his favour
 at court and his popularity among the lodges still endure unbroken.
 
 I have the privilege of slightly knowing him.  Heavily and somewhat
 clumsily built, of a vast, disjointed, rambling frame, he can still pull
 himself together, and figure, not without admiration, in the saloon or
 the ball-room.  His hue and temperament are plentifully bilious; he has a
 saturnine eye; his cheek is of a dark blue where he has been shaven.
 Essentially he is to be numbered among the man-haters, a convinced
 contemner of his fellows.  Yet he is himself of a commonplace ambition
 and greedy of applause.  In talk, he is remarkable for a thirst of
 information, loving rather to hear than to communicate; for sound and
 studious views; and, judging by the extreme short-sightedness of common
 politicians, for a remarkable provision of events.  All this, however,
 without grace, pleasantry, or charm, heavily set forth, with a dull
 countenance.  In our numerous conversations, although he has always heard
 me with deference, I have been conscious throughout of a sort of
 ponderous finessing hard to tolerate.  He produces none of the effect of
 a gentleman; devoid not merely of pleasantry, but of all attention or
 communicative warmth of bearing.  No gentleman, besides, would so parade
 his amours with the Princess; still less repay the Prince for his
 long-suffering with a studied insolence of demeanour and the fabrication
 of insulting nicknames, such as Prince Featherhead, which run from ear to
 ear and create a laugh throughout the country.  Gondremark has thus some
 of the clumsier characters of the self-made man, combined with an
 inordinate, almost a besotted, pride of intellect and birth.  Heavy,
 bilious, selfish, inornate, he sits upon this court and country like an
 incubus.
 
 But it is probable that he preserves softer gifts for necessary purposes.
 Indeed, it is certain, although he vouchsafed none of it to me, that this
 cold and stolid politician possesses to a great degree the art of
 ingratiation, and can be all things to all men.  Hence there has probably
 sprung up the idle legend that in private life he is a gross romping
 voluptuary.  Nothing, at least, can well be more surprising than the
 terms of his connection with the Princess.  Older than her husband,
 certainly uglier, and, according to the feeble ideas common among women,
 in every particular less pleasing, he has not only seized the complete
 command of all her thought and action, but has imposed on her in public a
 humiliating part.  I do not here refer to the complete sacrifice of every
 rag of her reputation; for to many women these extremities are in
 themselves attractive.  But there is about the court a certain lady of a
 dishevelled reputation, a Countess von Rosen, wife or widow of a cloudy
 count, no longer in her second youth, and already bereft of some of her
 attractions, who unequivocally occupies the station of the Baron's
 mistress.  I had thought, at first, that she was but a hired accomplice,
 a mere blind or buffer for the more important sinner.  A few hours'
 acquaintance with Madame von Rosen for ever dispelled the illusion.  She
 is one rather to make than to prevent a scandal, and she values none of
 those bribes--money, honours, or employment--with which the situation
 might be gilded.  Indeed, as a person frankly bad, she pleased me, in the
 court of Grunewald, like a piece of nature.
 
 The power of this man over the Princess is, therefore, without bounds.
 She has sacrificed to the adoration with which he has inspired her not
 only her marriage vow and every shred of public decency, but that vice of
 jealousy which is so much dearer to the female sex than either intrinsic
 honour or outward consideration.  Nay, more: a young, although not a very
 attractive woman, and a princess both by birth and fact, she submits to
 the triumphant rivalry of one who might be her mother as to years, and
 who is so manifestly her inferior in station.  This is one of the
 mysteries of the human heart.  But the rage of illicit love, when it is
 once indulged, appears to grow by feeding; and to a person of the
 character and temperament of this unfortunate young lady, almost any
 depth of degradation is within the reach of possibility.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--THE PRINCE AND THE ENGLISH TRAVELLER
 
 
 So far Otto read, with waxing indignation; and here his fury overflowed.
 He tossed the roll upon the table and stood up.  'This man,' he said, 'is
 a devil.  A filthy imagination, an ear greedy of evil, a ponderous
 malignity of thought and language: I grow like him by the reading!
 Chancellor, where is this fellow lodged?'
 
 'He was committed to the Flag Tower,' replied Greisengesang, 'in the
 Gamiani apartment.'
 
 'Lead me to him,' said the Prince; and then, a thought striking him, 'Was
 it for that,' he asked, 'that I found so many sentries in the garden?'
 
 'Your Highness, I am unaware,' answered Greisengesang, true to his
 policy.  'The disposition of the guards is a matter distinct from my
 functions.'
 
 Otto turned upon the old man fiercely, but ere he had time to speak,
 Gotthold touched him on the arm.  He swallowed his wrath with a great
 effort.  'It is well,' he said, taking the roll.  'Follow me to the Flag
 Tower.'
 
 The Chancellor gathered himself together, and the two set forward.  It
 was a long and complicated voyage; for the library was in the wing of the
 new buildings, and the tower which carried the flag was in the old
 schloss upon the garden.  By a great variety of stairs and corridors,
 they came out at last upon a patch of gravelled court; the garden peeped
 through a high grating with a flash of green; tall, old gabled buildings
 mounted on every side; the Flag Tower climbed, stage after stage, into
 the blue; and high over all, among the building daws, the yellow flag
 wavered in the wind.  A sentinel at the foot of the tower stairs
 presented arms; another paced the first landing; and a third was
 stationed before the door of the extemporised prison.
 
 'We guard this mud-bag like a jewel,' Otto sneered.
 
 The Gamiani apartment was so called from an Italian doctor who had
 imposed on the credulity of a former prince.  The rooms were large, airy,
 pleasant, and looked upon the garden; but the walls were of great
 thickness (for the tower was old), and the windows were heavily barred.
 The Prince, followed by the Chancellor, still trotting to keep up with
 him, brushed swiftly through the little library and the long saloon, and
 burst like a thunderbolt into the bedroom at the farther end.  Sir John
 was finishing his toilet; a man of fifty, hard, uncompromising, able,
 with the eye and teeth of physical courage.  He was unmoved by the
 irruption, and bowed with a sort of sneering ease.
 
 'To what am I to attribute the honour of this visit?' he asked.
 
 'You have eaten my bread,' replied Otto, 'you have taken my hand, you
 have been received under my roof.  When did I fail you in courtesy?  What
 have you asked that was not granted as to an honoured guest?  And here,
 sir,' tapping fiercely on the manuscript, 'here is your return.'
 
 'Your Highness has read my papers?' said the Baronet.  'I am honoured
 indeed.  But the sketch is most imperfect.  I shall now have much to add.
 I can say that the Prince, whom I had accused of idleness, is zealous in
 the department of police, taking upon himself those duties that are most
 distasteful.  I shall be able to relate the burlesque incident of my
 arrest, and the singular interview with which you honour me at present.
 For the rest, I have already communicated with my Ambassador at Vienna;
 and unless you propose to murder me, I shall be at liberty, whether you
 please or not, within the week.  For I hardly fancy the future empire of
 Grunewald is yet ripe to go to war with England.  I conceive I am a
 little more than quits.  I owe you no explanation; yours has been the
 wrong.  You, if you have studied my writing with intelligence, owe me a
 large debt of gratitude.  And to conclude, as I have not yet finished my
 toilet, I imagine the courtesy of a turnkey to a prisoner would induce
 you to withdraw.'
 
 There was some paper on the table, and Otto, sitting down, wrote a
 passport in the name of Sir John Crabtree.
 
 'Affix the seal, Herr Cancellarius,' he said, in his most princely
 manner, as he rose.
 
 Greisengesang produced a red portfolio, and affixed the seal in the
 unpoetic guise of an adhesive stamp; nor did his perturbed and clumsy
 movements at all lessen the comedy of the performance.  Sir John looked
 on with a malign enjoyment; and Otto chafed, regretting, when too late,
 the unnecessary royalty of his command and gesture.  But at length the
 Chancellor had finished his piece of prestidigitation, and, without
 waiting for an order, had countersigned the passport.  Thus regularised,
 he returned it to Otto with a bow.
 
 'You will now,' said the Prince, 'order one of my own carriages to be
 prepared; see it, with your own eyes, charged with Sir John's effects,
 and have it waiting within the hour behind the Pheasant House.  Sir John
 departs this morning for Vienna.'
 
 The Chancellor took his elaborate departure.
 
 'Here, sir, is your passport,' said Otto, turning to the Baronet.  'I
 regret it from my heart that you have met inhospitable usage.'
 
 'Well, there will be no English war,' returned Sir John.
 
 'Nay, sir,' said Otto, 'you surely owe me your civility.  Matters are now
 changed, and we stand again upon the footing of two gentlemen.  It was
 not I who ordered your arrest; I returned late last night from hunting;
 and as you cannot blame me for your imprisonment, you may even thank me
 for your freedom.'
 
 'And yet you read my papers,' said the traveller shrewdly.
 
 'There, sir, I was wrong,' returned Otto; 'and for that I ask your
 pardon.  You can scarce refuse it, for your own dignity, to one who is a
 plexus of weaknesses.  Nor was the fault entirely mine.  Had the papers
 been innocent, it would have been at most an indiscretion.  Your own
 guilt is the sting of my offence.'
 
 Sir John regarded Otto with an approving twinkle; then he bowed, but
 still in silence.
 
 'Well, sir, as you are now at your entire disposal, I have a favour to
 beg of your indulgence,' continued the Prince.  'I have to request that
 you will walk with me alone into the garden so soon as your convenience
 permits.'
 
 'From the moment that I am a free man,' Sir John replied, this time with
 perfect courtesy, 'I am wholly at your Highness's command; and if you
 will excuse a rather summary toilet, I will even follow you, as I am.'
 
 'I thank you, sir,' said Otto.
 
 So without more delay, the Prince leading, the pair proceeded down
 through the echoing stairway of the tower, and out through the grating,
 into the ample air and sunshine of the morning, and among the terraces
 and flower-beds of the garden.  They crossed the fish-pond, where the
 carp were leaping as thick as bees; they mounted, one after another, the
 various flights of stairs, snowed upon, as they went, with April
 blossoms, and marching in time to the great orchestra of birds.  Nor did
 Otto pause till they had reached the highest terrace of the garden.  Here
 was a gate into the park, and hard by, under a tuft of laurel, a marble
 garden seat.  Hence they looked down on the green tops of many elm-trees,
 where the rooks were busy; and, beyond that, upon the palace roof, and
 the yellow banner flying in the blue.  I pray you to be seated, sir,'
 said Otto.
 
 Sir John complied without a word; and for some seconds Otto walked to and
 fro before him, plunged in angry thought.  The birds were all singing for
 a wager.
 
 'Sir,' said the Prince at length, turning towards the Englishman, 'you
 are to me, except by the conventions of society, a perfect stranger.  Of
 your character and wishes I am ignorant.  I have never wittingly
 disobliged you.  There is a difference in station, which I desire to
 waive.  I would, if you still think me entitled to so much
 consideration--I would be regarded simply as a gentleman.  Now, sir, I
 did wrong to glance at these papers, which I here return to you; but if
 curiosity be undignified, as I am free to own, falsehood is both cowardly
 and cruel.  I opened your roll; and what did I find--what did I find
 about my wife; Lies!' he broke out.  'They are lies!  There are not, so
 help me God! four words of truth in your intolerable libel!  You are a
 man; you are old, and might be the girl's father; you are a gentleman;
 you are a scholar, and have learned refinement; and you rake together all
 this vulgar scandal, and propose to print it in a public book!  Such is
 your chivalry!  But, thank God, sir, she has still a husband.  You say,
 sir, in that paper in your hand, that I am a bad fencer; I have to
 request from you a lesson in the art.  The park is close behind; yonder
 is the Pheasant House, where you will find your carriage; should I fall,
 you know, sir--you have written it in your paper--how little my movements
 are regarded; I am in the custom of disappearing; it will be one more
 disappearance; and long before it has awakened a remark, you may be safe
 across the border.'
 
 'You will observe,' said Sir John, 'that what you ask is impossible.'
 
 'And if I struck you?' cried the Prince, with a sudden menacing flash.
 
 'It would be a cowardly blow,' returned the Baronet, unmoved, 'for it
 would make no change.  I cannot draw upon a reigning sovereign.'
 
 'And it is this man, to whom you dare not offer satisfaction, that you
 choose to insult!' cried Otto.
 
 'Pardon me,' said the traveller, 'you are unjust.  It is because you are
 a reigning sovereign that I cannot fight with you; and it is for the same
 reason that I have a right to criticise your action and your wife.  You
 are in everything a public creature; you belong to the public, body and
 bone.  You have with you the law, the muskets of the army, and the eyes
 of spies.  We, on our side, have but one weapon--truth.'
 
 'Truth!' echoed the Prince, with a gesture.
 
 There was another silence.
 
 'Your Highness,' said Sir John at last, 'you must not expect grapes from
 a thistle.  I am old and a cynic.  Nobody cares a rush for me; and on the
 whole, after the present interview, I scarce know anybody that I like
 better than yourself.  You see, I have changed my mind, and have the
 uncommon virtue to avow the change.  I tear up this stuff before you,
 here in your own garden; I ask your pardon, I ask the pardon of the
 Princess; and I give you my word of honour as a gentleman and an old man,
 that when my book of travels shall appear it shall not contain so much as
 the name of Grunewald.  And yet it was a racy chapter!  But had your
 Highness only read about the other courts!  I am a carrion crow; but it
 is not my fault, after all, that the world is such a nauseous kennel.'
 
 'Sir,' said Otto, 'is the eye not jaundiced?'
 
 'Nay,' cried the traveller, 'very likely.  I am one who goes sniffing; I
 am no poet.  I believe in a better future for the world; or, at all
 accounts, I do most potently disbelieve in the present.  Rotten eggs is
 the burthen of my song.  But indeed, your Highness, when I meet with any
 merit, I do not think that I am slow to recognise it.  This is a day that
 I shall still recall with gratitude, for I have found a sovereign with
 some manly virtues; and for once--old courtier and old radical as I
 am--it is from the heart and quite sincerely that I can request the
 honour of kissing your Highness's hand?'
 
 'Nay, sir,' said Otto, 'to my heart!'
 
 And the Englishman, taken at unawares, was clasped for a moment in the
 Prince's arms.
 
 'And now, sir,' added Otto, 'there is the Pheasant House; close behind it
 you will find my carriage, which I pray you to accept.  God speed you to
 Vienna!'
 
 'In the impetuosity of youth,' replied Sir John, 'your Highness has
 overlooked one circumstance.  I am still fasting.'
 
 'Well, sir,' said Otto, smiling, 'you are your own master; you may go or
 stay.  But I warn you, your friend may prove less powerful than your
 enemies.  The Prince, indeed, is thoroughly on your side; he has all the
 will to help; but to whom do I speak?--you know better than I do, he is
 not alone in Grunewald.'
 
 'There is a deal in position,' returned the traveller, gravely nodding.
 'Gondremark loves to temporise; his policy is below ground, and he fears
 all open courses; and now that I have seen you act with so much spirit, I
 will cheerfully risk myself on your protection.  Who knows?  You may be
 yet the better man.'
 
 'Do you indeed believe so?' cried the Prince.  'You put life into my
 heart!'
 
 'I will give up sketching portraits,' said the Baronet.  'I am a blind
 owl; I had misread you strangely.  And yet remember this; a sprint is one
 thing, and to run all day another.  For I still mistrust your
 constitution; the short nose, the hair and eyes of several complexions;
 no, they are diagnostic; and I must end, I see, as I began.'
 
 'I am still a singing chambermaid?' said Otto.
 
 'Nay, your Highness, I pray you to forget what I had written,' said Sir
 John; 'I am not like Pilate; and the chapter is no more.  Bury it, if you
 love me.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--WHILE THE PRINCE IS IN THE ANTE-ROOM . . .
 
 
 Greatly comforted by the exploits of the morning, the Prince turned
 towards the Princess's ante-room, bent on a more difficult enterprise.
 The curtains rose before him, the usher called his name, and he entered
 the room with an exaggeration of his usual mincing and airy dignity.
 There were about a score of persons waiting, principally ladies; it was
 one of the few societies in Grunewald where Otto knew himself to be
 popular; and while a maid of honour made her exit by a side door to
 announce his arrival to the Princess, he moved round the apartment,
 collecting homage and bestowing compliments with friendly grace.  Had
 this been the sum of his duties, he had been an admirable monarch.  Lady
 after lady was impartially honoured by his attention.
 
 'Madam,' he said to one, 'how does this happen?  I find you daily more
 adorable.'
 
 'And your Highness daily browner,' replied the lady.  'We began equal; O,
 there I will be bold: we have both beautiful complexions.  But while I
 study mine, your Highness tans himself.'
 
 'A perfect negro, madam; and what so fitly--being beauty's slave?' said
 Otto.--'Madame Grafinski, when is our next play?  I have just heard that
 I am a bad actor.'
 
 '_O ciel_!' cried Madame Grafinski.  'Who could venture?  What a bear!'
 
 'An excellent man, I can assure you,' returned Otto.
 
 'O, never!  O, is it possible!' fluted the lady.  'Your Highness plays
 like an angel.'
 
 'You must be right, madam; who could speak falsely and yet look so
 charming?' said the Prince.  'But this gentleman, it seems, would have
 preferred me playing like an actor.'
 
 A sort of hum, a falsetto, feminine cooing, greeted the tiny sally; and
 Otto expanded like a peacock.  This warm atmosphere of women and flattery
 and idle chatter pleased him to the marrow.
 
 'Madame von Eisenthal, your coiffure is delicious,' he remarked.
 
 'Every one was saying so,' said one.
 
 'If I have pleased Prince Charming?'  And Madame von Eisenthal swept him
 a deep curtsy with a killing glance of adoration.
 
 'It is new?' he asked.  'Vienna fashion.'
 
 'Mint new,' replied the lady, 'for your Highness's return.  I felt young
 this morning; it was a premonition.  But why, Prince, do you ever leave
 us?'
 
 'For the pleasure of the return,' said Otto.  'I am like a dog; I must
 bury my bone, and then come back to great upon it.'
 
 'O, a bone!  Fie, what a comparison!  You have brought back the manners
 of the wood,' returned the lady.
 
 'Madam, it is what the dog has dearest,' said the Prince.  'But I observe
 Madame von Rosen.'
 
 And Otto, leaving the group to which he had been piping, stepped towards
 the embrasure of a window where a lady stood.
 
 The Countess von Rosen had hitherto been silent, and a thought depressed,
 but on the approach of Otto she began to brighten.  She was tall, slim as
 a nymph, and of a very airy carriage; and her face, which was already
 beautiful in repose, lightened and changed, flashed into smiles, and
 glowed with lovely colour at the touch of animation.  She was a good
 vocalist; and, even in speech, her voice commanded a great range of
 changes, the low notes rich with tenor quality, the upper ringing, on the
 brink of laughter, into music.  A gem of many facets and variable hues of
 fire; a woman who withheld the better portion of her beauty, and then, in
 a caressing second, flashed it like a weapon full on the beholder; now
 merely a tall figure and a sallow handsome face, with the evidences of a
 reckless temper; anon opening like a flower to life and colour, mirth and
 tenderness:--Madame von Rosen had always a dagger in reserve for the
 despatch of ill-assured admirers.  She met Otto with the dart of tender
 gaiety.
 
 'You have come to me at last, Prince Cruel,' she said.  'Butterfly!
 Well, and am I not to kiss your hand?' she added.
 
 'Madam, it is I who must kiss yours.'  And Otto bowed and kissed it.
 
 'You deny me every indulgence,' she said, smiling.
 
 'And now what news in Court?' inquired the Prince.  'I come to you for my
 gazette.'
 
 'Ditch-water!' she replied.  'The world is all asleep, grown grey in
 slumber; I do not remember any waking movement since quite an eternity;
 and the last thing in the nature of a sensation was the last time my
 governess was allowed to box my ears.  But yet I do myself and your
 unfortunate enchanted palace some injustice.  Here is the last--O
 positively!'  And she told him the story from behind her fan, with many
 glances, many cunning strokes of the narrator's art.  The others had
 drawn away, for it was understood that Madame von Rosen was in favour
 with the Prince.  None the less, however, did the Countess lower her
 voice at times to within a semitone of whispering; and the pair leaned
 together over the narrative.
 
 'Do you know,' said Otto, laughing, 'you are the only entertaining woman
 on this earth!'
 
 'O, you have found out so much,' she cried.
 
 'Yes, madam, I grow wiser with advancing years,' he returned.
 
 'Years,' she repeated.  'Do you name the traitors?  I do not believe in
 years; the calendar is a delusion.'
 
 'You must be right, madam,' replied the Prince.  'For six years that we
 have been good friends, I have observed you to grow younger.'
 
 'Flatterer!' cried she, and then with a change, 'But why should I say
 so,' she added, 'when I protest I think the same?  A week ago I had a
 council with my father director, the glass; and the glass replied, "Not
 yet!"  I confess my face in this way once a month.  O! a very solemn
 moment.  Do you know what I shall do when the mirror answers, "Now"?'
 
 'I cannot guess,' said he.
 
 'No more can I,' returned the Countess.  'There is such a choice!
 Suicide, gambling, a nunnery, a volume of memoirs, or politics--the last,
 I am afraid.'
 
 'It is a dull trade,' said Otto.
 
 'Nay,' she replied, 'it is a trade I rather like.  It is, after all,
 first cousin to gossip, which no one can deny to be amusing.  For
 instance, if I were to tell you that the Princess and the Baron rode out
 together daily to inspect the cannon, it is either a piece of politics or
 scandal, as I turn my phrase.  I am the alchemist that makes the
 transmutation.  They have been everywhere together since you left,' she
 continued, brightening as she saw Otto darken; 'that is a poor snippet of
 malicious gossip--and they were everywhere cheered--and with that
 addition all becomes political intelligence.'
 
 'Let us change the subject,' said Otto.
 
 'I was about to propose it,' she replied, 'or rather to pursue the
 politics.  Do you know? this war is popular--popular to the length of
 cheering Princess Seraphina.'
 
 'All things, madam, are possible,' said the Prince; and this among
 others, that we may be going into war, but I give you my word of honour I
 do not know with whom.'
 
 'And you put up with it?' she cried.  'I have no pretensions to morality;
 and I confess I have always abominated the lamb, and nourished a romantic
 feeling for the wolf.  O, be done with lambiness!  Let us see there is a
 prince, for I am weary of the distaff.'
 
 'Madam,' said Otto, 'I thought you were of that faction.'
 
 'I should be of yours, _mon Prince_, if you had one,' she retorted.  'Is
 it true that you have no ambition?  There was a man once in England whom
 they call the kingmaker.  Do you know,' she added, 'I fancy I could make
 a prince?'
 
 'Some day, madam,' said Otto, 'I may ask you to help make a farmer.'
 
 'Is that a riddle?' asked the Countess.
 
 'It is,' replied the Prince, 'and a very good one too.'
 
 'Tit for tat.  I will ask you another,' she returned.  'Where is
 Gondremark?'
 
 'The Prime Minister?  In the prime-ministry, no doubt,' said Otto.
 
 'Precisely,' said the Countess; and she pointed with her fan to the door
 of the Princess's apartments.  'You and I, _mon Prince_, are in the
 ante-room.  You think me unkind,' she added.  'Try me and you will see.
 Set me a task, put me a question; there is no enormity I am not capable
 of doing to oblige you, and no secret that I am not ready to betray.'
 
 'Nay, madam, but I respect my friend too much,' he answered, kissing her
 hand.  'I would rather remain ignorant of all.  We fraternise like foemen
 soldiers at the outposts, but let each be true to his own army.'
 
 'Ah,' she cried, 'if all men were generous like you, it would be worth
 while to be a woman!'  Yet, judging by her looks, his generosity, if
 anything, had disappointed her; she seemed to seek a remedy, and, having
 found it, brightened once more.  'And now,' she said, 'may I dismiss my
 sovereign?  This is rebellion and a _cas pendable_; but what am I to do?
 My bear is jealous!'
 
 'Madam, enough!' cried Otto.  'Ahasuerus reaches you the sceptre; more,
 he will obey you in all points.  I should have been a dog to come to
 whistling.'
 
 And so the Prince departed, and fluttered round Grafinski and von
 Eisenthal.  But the Countess knew the use of her offensive weapons, and
 had left a pleasant arrow in the Prince's heart.  That Gondremark was
 jealous--here was an agreeable revenge!  And Madame von Rosen, as the
 occasion of the jealousy, appeared to him in a new light.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V--. . . GONDREMARK IS IN MY LADY'S CHAMBER
 
 
 The Countess von Rosen spoke the truth.  The great Prime Minister of
 Grunewald was already closeted with Seraphina.  The toilet was over; and
 the Princess, tastefully arrayed, sat face to face with a tall mirror.
 Sir John's description was unkindly true, true in terms and yet a libel,
 a misogynistic masterpiece.  Her forehead was perhaps too high, but it
 became her; her figure somewhat stooped, but every detail was formed and
 finished like a gem; her hand, her foot, her ear, the set of her comely
 head, were all dainty and accordant; if she was not beautiful, she was
 vivid, changeful, coloured, and pretty with a thousand various
 prettinesses; and her eyes, if they indeed rolled too consciously, yet
 rolled to purpose.  They were her most attractive feature, yet they
 continually bore eloquent false witness to her thoughts; for while she
 herself, in the depths of her immature, unsoftened heart, was given
 altogether to manlike ambition and the desire of power, the eyes were by
 turns bold, inviting, fiery, melting, and artful, like the eyes of a
 rapacious siren.  And artful, in a sense, she was.  Chafing that she was
 not a man, and could not shine by action, she had conceived a woman's
 part, of answerable domination; she sought to subjugate for by-ends, to
 rain influence and be fancy free; and, while she loved not man, loved to
 see man obey her.  It is a common girl's ambition.  Such was perhaps that
 lady of the glove, who sent her lover to the lions.  But the snare is
 laid alike for male and female, and the world most artfully contrived.
 
 Near her, in a low chair, Gondremark had arranged his limbs into a
 cat-like attitude, high-shouldered, stooping, and submiss.  The
 formidable blue jowl of the man, and the dull bilious eye, set perhaps a
 higher value on his evident desire to please.  His face was marked by
 capacity, temper, and a kind of bold, piratical dishonesty which it would
 be calumnious to call deceit.  His manners, as he smiled upon the
 Princess, were over-fine, yet hardly elegant.
 
 'Possibly,' said the Baron, 'I should now proceed to take my leave.  I
 must not keep my sovereign in the ante-room.  Let us come at once to a
 decision.'
 
 'It cannot, cannot be put off?' she asked.
 
 'It is impossible,' answered Gondremark.  'Your Highness sees it for
 herself.  In the earlier stages, we might imitate the serpent; but for
 the ultimatum, there is no choice but to be bold like lions.  Had the
 Prince chosen to remain away, it had been better; but we have gone too
 far forward to delay.'
 
 'What can have brought him?' she cried.  'To-day of all days?'
 
 'The marplot, madam, has the instinct of his nature,' returned
 Gondremark.  'But you exaggerate the peril.  Think, madam, how far we
 have prospered, and against what odds!  Shall a Featherhead?--but no!'
 And he blew upon his fingers lightly with a laugh.
 
 'Featherhead,' she replied, 'is still the Prince of Grunewald.'
 
 'On your sufferance only, and so long as you shall please to be
 indulgent,' said the Baron.  'There are rights of nature; power to the
 powerful is the law.  If he shall think to cross your destiny--well, you
 have heard of the brazen and the earthen pot.'
 
 'Do you call me pot?  You are ungallant, Baron,' laughed the Princess.
 
 'Before we are done with your glory, I shall have called you by many
 different titles,' he replied.
 
 The girl flushed with pleasure.  'But Frederic is still the Prince,
 _monsieur le flatteur_,' she said.  'You do not propose a
 revolution?--you of all men?'
 
 'Dear madam, when it is already made!' he cried.  'The Prince reigns
 indeed in the almanac; but my Princess reigns and rules.'  And he looked
 at her with a fond admiration that made the heart of Seraphina swell.
 Looking on her huge slave, she drank the intoxicating joys of power.
 Meanwhile he continued, with that sort of massive archness that so ill
 became him, 'She has but one fault; there is but one danger in the great
 career that I foresee for her.  May I name it? may I be so irreverent?
 It is in herself--her heart is soft.'
 
 'Her courage is faint, Baron,' said the Princess.  'Suppose we have
 judged ill, suppose we were defeated?'
 
 'Defeated, madam?' returned the Baron, with a touch of ill-humour.  'Is
 the dog defeated by the hare?  Our troops are all cantoned along the
 frontier; in five hours the vanguard of five thousand bayonets shall be
 hammering on the gates of Brandenau; and in all Gerolstein there are not
 fifteen hundred men who can manoeuvre.  It is as simple as a sum.  There
 can be no resistance.'
 
 'It is no great exploit,' she said.  'Is that what you call glory?  It is
 like beating a child.'
 
 'The courage, madam, is diplomatic,' he replied.  'We take a grave step;
 we fix the eyes of Europe, for the first time, on Grunewald; and in the
 negotiations of the next three months, mark me, we stand or fall.  It is
 there, madam, that I shall have to depend upon your counsels,' he added,
 almost gloomily.  'If I had not seen you at work, if I did not know the
 fertility of your mind, I own I should tremble for the consequence.  But
 it is in this field that men must recognise their inability.  All the
 great negotiators, when they have not been women, have had women at their
 elbows.  Madame de Pompadour was ill served; she had not found her
 Gondremark; but what a mighty politician!  Catherine de' Medici, too,
 what justice of sight, what readiness of means, what elasticity against
 defeat!  But alas! madam, her Featherheads were her own children; and she
 had that one touch of vulgarity, that one trait of the good-wife, that
 she suffered family ties and affections to confine her liberty.'
 
 These singular views of history, strictly _ad usum Seraphinae_, did not
 weave their usual soothing spell over the Princess.  It was plain that
 she had taken a momentary distaste to her own resolutions; for she
 continued to oppose her counsellor, looking upon him out of half-closed
 eyes and with the shadow of a sneer upon her lips.  'What boys men are!'
 she said; 'what lovers of big words!  Courage, indeed!  If you had to
 scour pans, Herr Von Gondremark, you would call it, I suppose, Domestic
 Courage?'
 
 'I would, madam,' said the Baron stoutly, 'if I scoured them well.  I
 would put a good name upon a virtue; you will not overdo it: they are not
 so enchanting in themselves.'
 
 'Well, but let me see,' she said.  'I wish to understand your courage.
 Why we asked leave, like children!  Our grannie in Berlin, our uncle in
 Vienna, the whole family, have patted us on the head and sent us forward.
 Courage?  I wonder when I hear you!'
 
 'My Princess is unlike herself,' returned the Baron.  'She has forgotten
 where the peril lies.  True, we have received encouragement on every
 hand; but my Princess knows too well on what untenable conditions; and
 she knows besides how, in the publicity of the diet, these whispered
 conferences are forgotten and disowned.  The danger is very real'--he
 raged inwardly at having to blow the very coal he had been
 quenching--'none the less real in that it is not precisely military, but
 for that reason the easier to be faced.  Had we to count upon your
 troops, although I share your Highness's expectations of the conduct of
 Alvenau, we cannot forget that he has not been proved in chief command.
 But where negotiation is concerned, the conduct lies with us; and with
 your help, I laugh at danger.'
 
 'It may be so,' said Seraphina, sighing.  'It is elsewhere that I see
 danger.  The people, these abominable people--suppose they should
 instantly rebel?  What a figure we should make in the eyes of Europe to
 have undertaken an invasion while my own throne was tottering to its
 fall!'
 
 'Nay, madam,' said Gondremark, smiling, 'here you are beneath yourself.
 What is it that feeds their discontent?  What but the taxes?  Once we
 have seized Gerolstein, the taxes are remitted, the sons return covered
 with renown, the houses are adorned with pillage, each tastes his little
 share of military glory, and behold us once again a happy family!  "Ay,"
 they will say, in each other's long ears, "the Princess knew what she was
 about; she was in the right of it; she has a head upon her shoulders; and
 here we are, you see, better off than before."  But why should I say all
 this?  It is what my Princess pointed out to me herself; it was by these
 reasons that she converted me to this adventure.'
 
 'I think, Herr von Gondremark,' said Seraphina, somewhat tartly, 'you
 often attribute your own sagacity to your Princess.'
 
 For a second Gondremark staggered under the shrewdness of the attack; the
 next, he had perfectly recovered.  'Do I?' he said.  'It is very
 possible.  I have observed a similar tendency in your Highness.'
 
 It was so openly spoken, and appeared so just, that Seraphina breathed
 again.  Her vanity had been alarmed, and the greatness of the relief
 improved her spirits.  'Well,' she said, 'all this is little to the
 purpose.  We are keeping Frederic without, and I am still ignorant of our
 line of battle.  Come, co-admiral, let us consult. . . . How am I to
 receive him now?  And what are we to do if he should appear at the
 council?'
 
 'Now,' he answered.  'I shall leave him to my Princess for just now!  I
 have seen her at work.  Send him off to his theatricals!  But in all
 gentleness,' he added.  'Would it, for instance, would it displease my
 sovereign to affect a headache?'
 
 'Never!' said she.  'The woman who can manage, like the man who can
 fight, must never shrink from an encounter.  The knight must not disgrace
 his weapons.'
 
 'Then let me pray my _belle dame sans merci_,' he returned, 'to affect
 the only virtue that she lacks.  Be pitiful to the poor young man; affect
 an interest in his hunting; be weary of politics; find in his society, as
 it were, a grateful repose from dry considerations.  Does my Princess
 authorise the line of battle?'
 
 'Well, that is a trifle,' answered Seraphina.  'The council--there is the
 point.'
 
 'The council?' cried Gondremark.  'Permit me, madam.'  And he rose and
 proceeded to flutter about the room, counterfeiting Otto both in voice
 and gesture not unhappily.  'What is there to-day, Herr von Gondremark?
 Ah, Herr Cancellarius, a new wig!  You cannot deceive me; I know every
 wig in Grunewald; I have the sovereign's eye.  What are these papers
 about?  O, I see.  O, certainly.  Surely, surely.  I wager none of you
 remarked that wig.  By all means.  I know nothing about that.  Dear me,
 are there as many as all that?  Well, you can sign them; you have the
 procuration.  You see, Herr Cancellarius, I knew your wig.  And so,'
 concluded Gondremark, resuming his own voice, 'our sovereign, by the
 particular grace of God, enlightens and supports his privy councillors.'
 
 But when the Baron turned to Seraphina for approval, he found her frozen.
 'You are pleased to be witty, Herr von Gondremark,' she said, 'and have
 perhaps forgotten where you are.  But these rehearsals are apt to be
 misleading.  Your master, the Prince of Grunewald, is sometimes more
 exacting.'
 
 Gondremark cursed her in his soul.  Of all injured vanities, that of the
 reproved buffoon is the most savage; and when grave issues are involved,
 these petty stabs become unbearable.  But Gondremark was a man of iron;
 he showed nothing; he did not even, like the common trickster, retreat
 because he had presumed, but held to his point bravely.  'Madam,' he
 said, 'if, as you say, he prove exacting, we must take the bull by the
 horns.'
 
 'We shall see,' she said, and she arranged her skirt like one about to
 rise.  Temper, scorn, disgust, all the more acrid feelings, became her
 like jewels; and she now looked her best.
 
 'Pray God they quarrel,' thought Gondremark.  'The damned minx may fail
 me yet, unless they quarrel.  It is time to let him in.  Zz--fight,
 dogs!'  Consequent on these reflections, he bent a stiff knee and
 chivalrously kissed the Princess's hand.  'My Princess,' he said, 'must
 now dismiss her servant.  I have much to arrange against the hour of
 council.'
 
 'Go,' she said, and rose.
 
 And as Gondremark tripped out of a private door, she touched a bell, and
 gave the order to admit the Prince.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI--THE PRINCE DELIVERS A LECTURE ON MARRIAGE, WITH PRACTICAL
 ILLUSTRATIONS OF DIVORCE
 
 
 With what a world of excellent intentions Otto entered his wife's
 cabinet! how fatherly, how tender! how morally affecting were the words
 he had prepared!  Nor was Seraphina unamiably inclined.  Her usual fear
 of Otto as a marplot in her great designs was now swallowed up in a
 passing distrust of the designs themselves.  For Gondremark, besides, she
 had conceived an angry horror.  In her heart she did not like the Baron.
 Behind his impudent servility, behind the devotion which, with indelicate
 delicacy, he still forced on her attention, she divined the grossness of
 his nature.  So a man may be proud of having tamed a bear, and yet sicken
 at his captive's odour.  And above all, she had certain jealous
 intimations that the man was false and the deception double.  True, she
 falsely trifled with his love; but he, perhaps, was only trifling with
 her vanity.  The insolence of his late mimicry, and the odium of her own
 position as she sat and watched it, lay besides like a load upon her
 conscience.  She met Otto almost with a sense of guilt, and yet she
 welcomed him as a deliverer from ugly things.
 
 But the wheels of an interview are at the mercy of a thousand ruts; and
 even at Otto's entrance, the first jolt occurred.  Gondremark, he saw,
 was gone; but there was the chair drawn close for consultation; and it
 pained him not only that this man had been received, but that he should
 depart with such an air of secrecy.  Struggling with this twinge, it was
 somewhat sharply that he dismissed the attendant who had brought him in.
 
 'You make yourself at home, _chez moi_,' she said, a little ruffled both
 by his tone of command and by the glance he had thrown upon the chair.
 
 'Madam,' replied Otto, 'I am here so seldom that I have almost the rights
 of a stranger.'
 
 'You choose your own associates, Frederic,' she said.
 
 'I am here to speak of it,' he returned.  'It is now four years since we
 were married; and these four years, Seraphina, have not perhaps been
 happy either for you or for me.  I am well aware I was unsuitable to be
 your husband.  I was not young, I had no ambition, I was a trifler; and
 you despised me, I dare not say unjustly.  But to do justice on both
 sides, you must bear in mind how I have acted.  When I found it amused
 you to play the part of Princess on this little stage, did I not
 immediately resign to you my box of toys, this Grunewald?  And when I
 found I was distasteful as a husband, could any husband have been less
 intrusive?  You will tell me that I have no feelings, no preference, and
 thus no credit; that I go before the wind; that all this was in my
 character.  And indeed, one thing is true, that it is easy, too easy, to
 leave things undone.  But Seraphina, I begin to learn it is not always
 wise.  If I were too old and too uncongenial for your husband, I should
 still have remembered that I was the Prince of that country to which you
 came, a visitor and a child.  In that relation also there were duties,
 and these duties I have not performed.'
 
 To claim the advantage of superior age is to give sure offence.  'Duty!'
 laughed Seraphina, 'and on your lips, Frederic!  You make me laugh.  What
 fancy is this?  Go, flirt with the maids and be a prince in Dresden
 china, as you look.  Enjoy yourself, _mon enfant_, and leave duty and the
 state to us.'
 
 The plural grated on the Prince.  'I have enjoyed myself too much,' he
 said, 'since enjoyment is the word.  And yet there were much to say upon
 the other side.  You must suppose me desperately fond of hunting.  But
 indeed there were days when I found a great deal of interest in what it
 was courtesy to call my government.  And I have always had some claim to
 taste; I could tell live happiness from dull routine; and between
 hunting, and the throne of Austria, and your society, my choice had never
 wavered, had the choice been mine.  You were a girl, a bud, when you were
 given me--'
 
 'Heavens!' she cried, 'is this to be a love-scene?'
 
 'I am never ridiculous,' he said; 'it is my only merit; and you may be
 certain this shall be a scene of marriage _a la mode_.  But when I
 remember the beginning, it is bare courtesy to speak in sorrow.  Be just,
 madam: you would think me strangely uncivil to recall these days without
 the decency of a regret.  Be yet a little juster, and own, if only in
 complaisance, that you yourself regret that past.'
 
 'I have nothing to regret,' said the Princess.  'You surprise me.  I
 thought you were so happy.'
 
 'Happy and happy, there are so many hundred ways,' said Otto.  'A man may
 be happy in revolt; he may be happy in sleep; wine, change, and travel
 make him happy; virtue, they say, will do the like--I have not tried; and
 they say also that in old, quiet, and habitual marriages there is yet
 another happiness.  Happy, yes; I am happy if you like; but I will tell
 you frankly, I was happier when I brought you home.'
 
 'Well,' said the Princess, not without constraint, 'it seems you changed
 your mind.'
 
 'Not I,' returned Otto, 'I never changed.  Do you remember, Seraphina, on
 our way home, when you saw the roses in the lane, and I got out and
 plucked them?  It was a narrow lane between great trees; the sunset at
 the end was all gold, and the rooks were flying overhead.  There were
 nine, nine red roses; you gave me a kiss for each, and I told myself that
 every rose and every kiss should stand for a year of love.  Well, in
 eighteen months there was an end.  But do you fancy, Seraphina, that my
 heart has altered?'
 
 'I am sure I cannot tell,' she said, like an automaton.
 
 'It has not,' the Prince continued.  'There is nothing ridiculous, even
 from a husband, in a love that owns itself unhappy and that asks no more.
 I built on sand; pardon me, I do not breathe a reproach--I built, I
 suppose, upon my own infirmities; but I put my heart in the building, and
 it still lies among the ruins.'
 
 'How very poetical!' she said, with a little choking laugh, unknown
 relentings, unfamiliar softnesses, moving within her.  'What would you be
 at?' she added, hardening her voice.
 
 'I would be at this,' he answered; 'and hard it is to say.  I would be at
 this:--Seraphina, I am your husband after all, and a poor fool that loves
 you.  Understand,' he cried almost fiercely, 'I am no suppliant husband;
 what your love refuses I would scorn to receive from your pity.  I do not
 ask, I would not take it.  And for jealousy, what ground have I?  A
 dog-in-the-manger jealousy is a thing the dogs may laugh at.  But at
 least, in the world's eye, I am still your husband; and I ask you if you
 treat me fairly?  I keep to myself, I leave you free, I have given you in
 everything your will.  What do you in return?  I find, Seraphina, that
 you have been too thoughtless.  But between persons such as we are, in
 our conspicuous station, particular care and a particular courtesy are
 owing.  Scandal is perhaps not easy to avoid; but it is hard to bear.'
 
 'Scandal!' she cried, with a deep breath.  'Scandal!  It is for this you
 have been driving!'
 
 'I have tried to tell you how I feel,' he replied.  'I have told you that
 I love you--love you in vain--a bitter thing for a husband; I have laid
 myself open that I might speak without offence.  And now that I have
 begun, I will go on and finish.'
 
 'I demand it,' she said.  'What is this about?'
 
 Otto flushed crimson.  'I have to say what I would fain not,' he
 answered.  'I counsel you to see less of Gondremark.'
 
 'Of Gondremark?  And why?' she asked.
 
 'Your intimacy is the ground of scandal, madam,' said Otto, firmly
 enough--'of a scandal that is agony to me, and would be crushing to your
 parents if they knew it.'
 
 'You are the first to bring me word of it,' said she.  'I thank you.'
 
 'You have perhaps cause,' he replied.  'Perhaps I am the only one among
 your friends--'
 
 'O, leave my friends alone,' she interrupted.  'My friends are of a
 different stamp.  You have come to me here and made a parade of
 sentiment.  When have I last seen you?  I have governed your kingdom for
 you in the meanwhile, and there I got no help.  At last, when I am weary
 with a man's work, and you are weary of your playthings, you return to
 make me a scene of conjugal reproaches--the grocer and his wife!  The
 positions are too much reversed; and you should understand, at least,
 that I cannot at the same time do your work of government and behave
 myself like a little girl.  Scandal is the atmosphere in which we live,
 we princes; it is what a prince should know.  You play an odious part.
 Do you believe this rumour?'
 
 'Madam, should I be here?' said Otto.
 
 'It is what I want to know!' she cried, the tempest of her scorn
 increasing.  'Suppose you did--I say, suppose you did believe it?'
 
 'I should make it my business to suppose the contrary,' he answered.
 
 'I thought so.  O, you are made of baseness!' said she.
 
 'Madam,' he cried, roused at last, 'enough of this.  You wilfully
 misunderstand my attitude; you outwear my patience.  In the name of your
 parents, in my own name, I summon you to be more circumspect.'
 
 'Is this a request, _monsieur mon mari_?' she demanded.
 
 'Madam, if I chose, I might command,' said Otto.
 
 'You might, sir, as the law stands, make me prisoner,' returned
 Seraphina.  'Short of that you will gain nothing.'
 
 'You will continue as before?' he asked.
 
 'Precisely as before,' said she.  'As soon as this comedy is over, I
 shall request the Freiherr von Gondremark to visit me.  Do you
 understand?' she added, rising.  'For my part, I have done.'
 
 'I will then ask the favour of your hand, madam,' said Otto, palpitating
 in every pulse with anger.  'I have to request that you will visit in my
 society another part of my poor house.  And reassure yourself--it will
 not take long--and it is the last obligation that you shall have the
 chance to lay me under.'
 
 'The last?' she cried.  'Most joyfully?'
 
 She offered her hand, and he took it; on each side with an elaborate
 affectation, each inwardly incandescent.  He led her out by the private
 door, following where Gondremark had passed; they threaded a corridor or
 two, little frequented, looking on a court, until they came at last into
 the Prince's suite.  The first room was an armoury, hung all about with
 the weapons of various countries, and looking forth on the front terrace.
 
 'Have you brought me here to slay me?' she inquired.
 
 'I have brought you, madam, only to pass on,' replied Otto.
 
 Next they came to a library, where an old chamberlain sat half asleep.
 He rose and bowed before the princely couple, asking for orders.
 
 'You will attend us here,' said Otto.
 
 The next stage was a gallery of pictures, where Seraphina's portrait hung
 conspicuous, dressed for the chase, red roses in her hair, as Otto, in
 the first months of marriage, had directed.  He pointed to it without a
 word; she raised her eyebrows in silence; and they passed still forward
 into a matted corridor where four doors opened.  One led to Otto's
 bedroom; one was the private door to Seraphina's.  And here, for the
 first time, Otto left her hand, and stepping forward, shot the bolt.
 
 'It is long, madam,' said he, 'since it was bolted on the other side.'
 
 'One was effectual,' returned the Princess.  'Is this all?'
 
 'Shall I reconduct you?' he asking, bowing.
 
 'I should prefer,' she asked, in ringing tones, 'the conduct of the
 Freiherr von Gondremark.'
 
 Otto summoned the chamberlain.  'If the Freiherr von Gondremark is in the
 palace,' he said, 'bid him attend the Princess here.'  And when the
 official had departed, 'Can I do more to serve you, madam?' the Prince
 asked.
 
 'Thank you, no.  I have been much amused,' she answered.
 
 'I have now,' continued Otto, 'given you your liberty complete.  This has
 been for you a miserable marriage.'
 
 'Miserable!' said she.
 
 'It has been made light to you; it shall be lighter still,' continued the
 Prince.  'But one thing, madam, you must still continue to bear--my
 father's name, which is now yours.  I leave it in your hands.  Let me see
 you, since you will have no advice of mine, apply the more attention of
 your own to bear it worthily.'
 
 'Herr von Gondremark is long in coming,' she remarked.
 
 'O Seraphina, Seraphina!' he cried.  And that was the end of their
 interview.
 
 She tripped to a window and looked out; and a little after, the
 chamberlain announced the Freiherr von Gondremark, who entered with
 something of a wild eye and changed complexion, confounded, as he was, at
 this unusual summons.  The Princess faced round from the window with a
 pearly smile; nothing but her heightened colour spoke of discomposure.
 
 Otto was pale, but he was otherwise master of himself.
 
 'Herr von Gondremark,' said he, 'oblige me so far: reconduct the Princess
 to her own apartment.'
 
 The Baron, still all at sea, offered his hand, which was smilingly
 accepted, and the pair sailed forth through the picture-gallery.
 
 As soon as they were gone, and Otto knew the length and breadth of his
 miscarriage, and how he had done the contrary of all that he intended, he
 stood stupefied.  A fiasco so complete and sweeping was laughable, even
 to himself; and he laughed aloud in his wrath.  Upon this mood there
 followed the sharpest violence of remorse; and to that again, as he
 recalled his provocation, anger succeeded afresh.  So he was tossed in
 spirit; now bewailing his inconsequence and lack of temper, now flaming
 up in white-hot indignation and a noble pity for himself.
 
 He paced his apartment like a leopard.  There was danger in Otto, for a
 flash.  Like a pistol, he could kill at one moment, and the next he might
 he kicked aside.  But just then, as he walked the long floors in his
 alternate humours, tearing his handkerchief between his hands, he was
 strung to his top note, every nerve attent.  The pistol, you might say,
 was charged.  And when jealousy from time to time fetched him a lash
 across the tenderest of his feeling, and sent a string of her
 fire-pictures glancing before his mind's eye, the contraction of his face
 was even dangerous.  He disregarded jealousy's inventions, yet they
 stung.  In this height of anger, he still preserved his faith in
 Seraphina's innocence; but the thought of her possible misconduct was the
 bitterest ingredient in his pot of sorrow.
 
 There came a knock at the door, and the chamberlain brought him a note.
 He took it and ground it in his hand, continuing his march, continuing
 his bewildered thoughts; and some minutes had gone by before the
 circumstance came clearly to his mind.  Then he paused and opened it.  It
 was a pencil scratch from Gotthold, thus conceived:
 
     'The council is privately summoned at once.
 
                                                                  G. v. H.'
 
 If the council was thus called before the hour, and that privately, it
 was plain they feared his interference.  Feared: here was a sweet
 thought.  Gotthold, too--Gotthold, who had always used and regarded him
 as a mere peasant lad, had now been at the pains to warn him; Gotthold
 looked for something at his hands.  Well, none should be disappointed;
 the Prince, too long beshadowed by the uxorious lover, should now return
 and shine.  He summoned his valet, repaired the disorder of his
 appearance with elaborate care; and then, curled and scented and adorned,
 Prince Charming in every line, but with a twitching nostril, he set forth
 unattended for the council.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII--THE PRINCE DISSOLVES THE COUNCIL
 
 
 It was as Gotthold wrote.  The liberation of Sir John, Greisengesang's
 uneasy narrative, last of all, the scene between Seraphina and the
 Prince, had decided the conspirators to take a step of bold timidity.
 There had been a period of bustle, liveried messengers speeding here and
 there with notes; and at half-past ten in the morning, about an hour
 before its usual hour, the council of Grunewald sat around the board.
 
 It was not a large body.  At the instance of Gondremark, it had undergone
 a strict purgation, and was now composed exclusively of tools.  Three
 secretaries sat at a side-table.  Seraphina took the head; on her right
 was the Baron, on her left Greisengesang; below these Grafinski the
 treasurer, Count Eisenthal, a couple of non-combatants, and, to the
 surprise of all, Gotthold.  He had been named a privy councillor by Otto,
 merely that he might profit by the salary; and as he was never known to
 attend a meeting, it had occurred to nobody to cancel his appointment.
 His present appearance was the more ominous, coming when it did.
 Gondremark scowled upon him; and the non-combatant on his right,
 intercepting this black look, edged away from one who was so clearly out
 of favour.
 
 'The hour presses, your Highness,' said the Baron; 'may we proceed to
 business?'
 
 'At once,' replied Seraphina.
 
 'Your Highness will pardon me,' said Gotthold; 'but you are still,
 perhaps, unacquainted with the fact that Prince Otto has returned.'
 
 'The Prince will not attend the council,' replied Seraphina, with a
 momentary blush.  'The despatches, Herr Cancellarius?  There is one for
 Gerolstein?'
 
 A secretary brought a paper.
 
 'Here, madam,' said Greisengesang.  'Shall I read it?'
 
 'We are all familiar with its terms,' replied Gondremark.  'Your Highness
 approves?'
 
 'Unhesitatingly,' said Seraphina.
 
 'It may then be held as read,' concluded the Baron.  'Will your Highness
 sign?'
 
 The Princess did so; Gondremark, Eisenthal, and one of the non-combatants
 followed suit; and the paper was then passed across the table to the
 librarian.  He proceeded leisurely to read.
 
 'We have no time to spare, Herr Doctor,' cried the Baron brutally.  'If
 you do not choose to sign on the authority of your sovereign, pass it on.
 Or you may leave the table,' he added, his temper ripping out.
 
 'I decline your invitation, Herr von Gondremark; and my sovereign, as I
 continue to observe with regret, is still absent from the board,' replied
 the Doctor calmly; and he resumed the perusal of the paper, the rest
 chafing and exchanging glances.  'Madame and gentlemen,' he said, at
 last, 'what I hold in my hand is simply a declaration of war.'
 
 'Simply,' said Seraphina, flashing defiance.
 
 'The sovereign of this country is under the same roof with us,' continued
 Gotthold, 'and I insist he shall be summoned.  It is needless to adduce
 my reasons; you are all ashamed at heart of this projected treachery.'
 
 The council waved like a sea.  There were various outcries.
 
 'You insult the Princess,' thundered Gondremark.
 
 'I maintain my protest,' replied Gotthold.
 
 At the height of this confusion the door was thrown open; an usher
 announced, 'Gentlemen, the Prince!' and Otto, with his most excellent
 bearing, entered the apartment.  It was like oil upon the troubled
 waters; every one settled instantly into his place, and Griesengesang, to
 give himself a countenance, became absorbed in the arrangement of his
 papers; but in their eagerness to dissemble, one and all neglected to
 rise.
 
 'Gentlemen,' said the Prince, pausing.
 
 They all got to their feet in a moment; and this reproof still further
 demoralised the weaker brethren.
 
 The Prince moved slowly towards the lower end of the table; then he
 paused again, and, fixing his eye on Greisengesang, 'How comes it, Herr
 Cancellarius,' he asked, 'that I have received no notice of the change of
 hour?'
 
 'Your Highness,' replied the Chancellor, 'her Highness the Princess . . . '
 and there paused.
 
 'I understood,' said Seraphina, taking him up, 'that you did not purpose
 to be present.'
 
 Their eyes met for a second, and Seraphina's fell; but her anger only
 burned the brighter for that private shame.
 
 'And now, gentlemen,' said Otto, taking his chair, 'I pray you to be
 seated.  I have been absent: there are doubtless some arrears; but ere we
 proceed to business, Herr Grafinski, you will direct four thousand crowns
 to be sent to me at once.  Make a note, if you please,' he added, as the
 treasurer still stared in wonder.
 
 'Four thousand crowns?' asked Seraphina.  'Pray, for what?'
 
 'Madam,' returned Otto, smiling, 'for my own purposes.'
 
 Gondremark spurred up Grafinski underneath the table.
 
 'If your Highness will indicate the destination . . . ' began the puppet.
 
 'You are not here, sir, to interrogate your Prince,' said Otto.
 
 Grafinski looked for help to his commander; and Gondremark came to his
 aid, in suave and measured tones.
 
 'Your Highness may reasonably be surprised,' he said; 'and Herr
 Grafinski, although I am convinced he is clear of the intention of
 offending, would have perhaps done better to begin with an explanation.
 The resources of the state are at the present moment entirely swallowed
 up, or, as we hope to prove, wisely invested.  In a month from now, I do
 not question we shall be able to meet any command your Highness may lay
 upon us; but at this hour I fear that, even in so small a matter, he must
 prepare himself for disappointment.  Our zeal is no less, although our
 power may be inadequate.'
 
 'How much, Herr Grafinski, have we in the treasury?' asked Otto.
 
 'Your Highness,' protested the treasurer, 'we have immediate need of
 every crown.'
 
 'I think, sir, you evade me,' flashed the Prince; and then turning to the
 side-table, 'Mr. Secretary,' he added, 'bring me, if you please, the
 treasury docket.'
 
 Herr Grafinski became deadly pale; the Chancellor, expecting his own
 turn, was probably engaged in prayer; Gondremark was watching like a
 ponderous cat.  Gotthold, on his part, looked on with wonder at his
 cousin; he was certainly showing spirit, but what, in such a time of
 gravity, was all this talk of money? and why should he waste his strength
 upon a personal issue?
 
 'I find,' said Otto, with his finger on the docket, 'that we have 20,000
 crowns in case.'
 
 'That is exact, your Highness,' replied the Baron.  'But our liabilities,
 all of which are happily not liquid, amount to a far larger sum; and at
 the present point of time it would be morally impossible to divert a
 single florin.  Essentially, the case is empty.  We have, already
 presented, a large note for material of war.'
 
 'Material of war?' exclaimed Otto, with an excellent assumption of
 surprise.  'But if my memory serves me right, we settled these accounts
 in January.'
 
 'There have been further orders,' the Baron explained.  'A new park of
 artillery has been completed; five hundred stand of arms, seven hundred
 baggage mules--the details are in a special memorandum.--Mr. Secretary
 Holtz, the memorandum, if you please.'
 
 'One would think, gentlemen, that we were going to war,' said Otto.
 
 'We are,' said Seraphina.
 
 'War!' cried the Prince, 'and, gentlemen, with whom?  The peace of
 Grunewald has endured for centuries.  What aggression, what insult, have
 we suffered?'
 
 'Here, your Highness,' said Gotthold, 'is the ultimatum.  It was in the
 very article of signature, when your Highness so opportunely entered.'
 
 Otto laid the paper before him; as he read, his fingers played tattoo
 upon the table.  'Was it proposed,' he inquired, 'to send this paper
 forth without a knowledge of my pleasure?'
 
 One of the non-combatants, eager to trim, volunteered an answer.  'The
 Herr Doctor von Hohenstockwitz had just entered his dissent,' he added.
 
 'Give me the rest of this correspondence,' said the Prince.  It was
 handed to him, and he read it patiently from end to end, while the
 councillors sat foolishly enough looking before them on the table.
 
 The secretaries, in the background, were exchanging glances of delight; a
 row at the council was for them a rare and welcome feature.
 
 'Gentlemen,' said Otto, when he had finished, 'I have read with pain.
 This claim upon Obermunsterol is palpably unjust; it has not a tincture,
 not a show, of justice.  There is not in all this ground enough for
 after-dinner talk, and you propose to force it as a _casus belli_.'
 
 'Certainly, your Highness,' returned Gondremark, too wise to defend the
 indefensible, 'the claim on Obermunsterol is simply a pretext.'
 
 'It is well,' said the Prince.  'Herr Cancellarius, take your pen.  "The
 council," he began to dictate--'I withhold all notice of my
 intervention,' he said, in parenthesis, and addressing himself more
 directly to his wife; 'and I say nothing of the strange suppression by
 which this business has been smuggled past my knowledge.  I am content to
 be in time--"The council,"' he resumed, '"on a further examination of the
 facts, and enlightened by the note in the last despatch from Gerolstein,
 have the pleasure to announce that they are entirely at one, both as to
 fact and sentiment, with the Grand-Ducal Court of Gerolstein."  You have
 it?  Upon these lines, sir, you will draw up the despatch.'
 
 'If your Highness will allow me,' said the Baron, 'your Highness is so
 imperfectly acquainted with the internal history of this correspondence,
 that any interference will be merely hurtful.  Such a paper as your
 Highness proposes would be to stultify the whole previous policy of
 Grunewald.'
 
 'The policy of Grunewald!' cried the Prince.  'One would suppose you had
 no sense of humour!  Would you fish in a coffee cup?'
 
 'With deference, your Highness,' returned the Baron, 'even in a coffee
 cup there may be poison.  The purpose of this war is not simply
 territorial enlargement; still less is it a war of glory; for, as your
 Highness indicates, the state of Grunewald is too small to be ambitious.
 But the body politic is seriously diseased; republicanism, socialism,
 many disintegrating ideas are abroad; circle within circle, a really
 formidable organisation has grown up about your Highness's throne.'
 
 'I have heard of it, Herr von Gondremark,' put in the Prince; 'but I have
 reason to be aware that yours is the more authoritative information.'
 
 'I am honoured by this expression of my Prince's confidence' returned
 Gondremark, unabashed.  'It is, therefore, with a single eye to these
 disorders that our present external policy has been shaped.  Something
 was required to divert public attention, to employ the idle, to
 popularise your Highness's rule, and, if it were possible, to enable him
 to reduce the taxes at a blow and to a notable amount.  The proposed
 expedition--for it cannot without hyperbole be called a war--seemed to
 the council to combine the various characters required; a marked
 improvement in the public sentiment has followed even upon our
 preparations; and I cannot doubt that when success shall follow, the
 effect will surpass even our boldest hopes.'
 
 'You are very adroit, Herr von Gondremark,' said Otto.  'You fill me with
 admiration.  I had not heretofore done justice to your qualities.'
 
 Seraphina looked up with joy, supposing Otto conquered; but Gondremark
 still waited, armed at every point; he knew how very stubborn is the
 revolt of a weak character.
 
 'And the territorial army scheme, to which I was persuaded to
 consent--was it secretly directed to the same end?' the Prince asked.
 
 'I still believe the effect to have been good,' replied the Baron;
 'discipline and mounting guard are excellent sedatives.  But I will avow
 to your Highness, I was unaware, at the date of that decree, of the
 magnitude of the revolutionary movement; nor did any of us, I think,
 imagine that such a territorial army was a part of the republican
 proposals.'
 
 'It was?' asked Otto.  'Strange!  Upon what fancied grounds?'
 
 'The grounds were indeed fanciful,' returned the Baron.  'It was
 conceived among the leaders that a territorial army, drawn from and
 returning to the people, would, in the event of any popular uprising,
 prove lukewarm or unfaithful to the throne.'
 
 'I see,' said the Prince.  'I begin to understand.'
 
 'His Highness begins to understand?' repeated Gondremark, with the
 sweetest politeness.  'May I beg of him to complete the phrase?'
 
 'The history of the revolution,' replied Otto dryly.  'And now,' he
 added, 'what do you conclude?'
 
 'I conclude, your Highness, with a simple reflection,' said the Baron,
 accepting the stab without a quiver, 'the war is popular; were the rumour
 contradicted to-morrow, a considerable disappointment would be felt in
 many classes; and in the present tension of spirits, the most lukewarm
 sentiment may be enough to precipitate events.  There lies the danger.
 The revolution hangs imminent; we sit, at this council board, below the
 sword of Damocles.'
 
 'We must then lay our heads together,' said the Prince, 'and devise some
 honourable means of safety.'
 
 Up to this moment, since the first note of opposition fell from the
 librarian, Seraphina had uttered about twenty words.  With a somewhat
 heightened colour, her eyes generally lowered, her foot sometimes
 nervously tapping on the floor, she had kept her own counsel and
 commanded her anger like a hero.  But at this stage of the engagement she
 lost control of her impatience.
 
 'Means!' she cried.  'They have been found and prepared before you knew
 the need for them.  Sign the despatch, and let us be done with this
 delay.'
 
 'Madam, I said "honourable,"' returned Otto, bowing.  'This war is, in my
 eyes, and by Herr von Gondremark's account, an inadmissible expedient.
 If we have misgoverned here in Grunewald, are the people of Gerolstein to
 bleed and pay for our mis-doings?  Never, madam; not while I live.  But I
 attach so much importance to all that I have heard to-day for the first
 time--and why only to-day, I do not even stop to ask--that I am eager to
 find some plan that I can follow with credit to myself.'
 
 'And should you fail?' she asked.
 
 'Should I fail, I will then meet the blow half-way,' replied the Prince.
 'On the first open discontent, I shall convoke the States, and, when it
 pleases them to bid me, abdicate.'
 
 Seraphina laughed angrily.  'This is the man for whom we have been
 labouring!' she cried.  'We tell him of change; he will devise the means,
 he says; and his device is abdication?  Sir, have you no shame to come
 here at the eleventh hour among those who have borne the heat and burthen
 of the day?  Do you not wonder at yourself?  I, sir, was here in my
 place, striving to uphold your dignity alone.  I took counsel with the
 wisest I could find, while you were eating and hunting.  I have laid my
 plans with foresight; they were ripe for action; and then--'she
 choked--'then you return--for a forenoon--to ruin all!  To-morrow, you
 will be once more about your pleasures; you will give us leave once more
 to think and work for you; and again you will come back, and again you
 will thwart what you had not the industry or knowledge to conceive.  O!
 it is intolerable.  Be modest, sir.  Do not presume upon the rank you
 cannot worthily uphold.  I would not issue my commands with so much
 gusto--it is from no merit in yourself they are obeyed.  What are you?
 What have you to do in this grave council?  Go,' she cried, 'go among
 your equals?  The very people in the streets mock at you for a prince.'
 
 At this surprising outburst the whole council sat aghast.
 
 'Madam,' said the Baron, alarmed out of his caution, 'command yourself.'
 
 'Address yourself to me, sir!' cried the Prince.  'I will not bear these
 whisperings!'
 
 Seraphina burst into tears.
 
 'Sir,' cried the Baron, rising, 'this lady--'
 
 'Herr von Gondremark,' said the Prince, 'one more observation, and I
 place you under arrest.'
 
 'Your Highness is the master,' replied Gondremark, bowing.
 
 'Bear it in mind more constantly,' said Otto.  'Herr Cancellarius, bring
 all the papers to my cabinet.  Gentlemen, the council is dissolved.'
 
 And he bowed and left the apartment, followed by Greisengesang and the
 secretaries, just at the moment when the Princess's ladies, summoned in
 all haste, entered by another door to help her forth.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII--THE PARTY OF WAR TAKES ACTION
 
 
 Half an hour after, Gondremark was once more closeted with Seraphina.
 
 'Where is he now?' she asked, on his arrival.
 
 'Madam, he is with the Chancellor,' replied the Baron.  'Wonder of
 wonders, he is at work!'
 
 'Ah,' she said, 'he was born to torture me!  O what a fall, what a
 humiliation!  Such a scheme to wreck upon so small a trifle!  But now all
 is lost.'
 
 'Madam,' said Gondremark, 'nothing is lost.  Something, on the other
 hand, is found.  You have found your senses; you see him as he is--see
 him as you see everything where your too-good heart is not in
 question--with the judicial, with the statesman's eye.  So long as he had
 a right to interfere, the empire that may be was still distant.  I have
 not entered on this course without the plain foresight of its dangers;
 and even for this I was prepared.  But, madam, I knew two things: I knew
 that you were born to command, that I was born to serve; I knew that by a
 rare conjuncture, the hand had found the tool; and from the first I was
 confident, as I am confident to-day, that no hereditary trifler has the
 power to shatter that alliance.'
 
 'I, born to command!' she said.  'Do you forget my tears?'
 
 'Madam, they were the tears of Alexander,' cried the Baron.  'They
 touched, they thrilled me; I, forgot myself a moment--even I!  But do you
 suppose that I had not remarked, that I had not admired, your previous
 bearing? your great self-command?  Ay, that was princely!'  He paused.
 'It was a thing to see.  I drank confidence!  I tried to imitate your
 calm.  And I was well inspired; in my heart, I think that I was well
 inspired; that any man, within the reach of argument, had been convinced!
 But it was not to be; nor, madam, do I regret the failure.  Let us be
 open; let me disclose my heart.  I have loved two things, not unworthily:
 Grunewald and my sovereign!'  Here he kissed her hand.  'Either I must
 resign my ministry, leave the land of my adoption and the queen whom I
 had chosen to obey--or--'  He paused again.
 
 'Alas, Herr von Gondremark, there is no "or,"' said Seraphina.
 
 'Nay, madam, give me time,' he replied.  'When first I saw you, you were
 still young; not every man would have remarked your powers; but I had not
 been twice honoured by your conversation ere I had found my mistress.  I
 have, madam, I believe, some genius; and I have much ambition.  But the
 genius is of the serving kind; and to offer a career to my ambition, I
 had to find one born to rule.  This is the base and essence of our union;
 each had need of the other; each recognised, master and servant, lever
 and fulcrum, the complement of his endowment.  Marriages, they say, are
 made in heaven: how much more these pure, laborious, intellectual
 fellowships, born to found empires!  Nor is this all.  We found each
 other ripe, filled with great ideas that took shape and clarified with
 every word.  We grew together--ay, madam, in mind we grew together like
 twin children.  All of my life until we met was petty and groping; was it
 not--I will flatter myself openly--it _was_ the same with you!  Not till
 then had you those eagle surveys, that wide and hopeful sweep of
 intuition!  Thus we had formed ourselves, and we were ready.'
 
 'It is true,' she cried.  'I feel it.  Yours is the genius; your
 generosity confounds your insight; all I could offer you was the
 position, was this throne, to be a fulcrum.  But I offered it without
 reserve; I entered at least warmly into all your thoughts; you were sure
 of me--sure of my support--certain of justice.  Tell me, tell me again,
 that I have helped you.'
 
 'Nay, madam,' he said, 'you made me.  In everything you were my
 inspiration.  And as we prepared our policy, weighing every step, how
 often have I had to admire your perspicacity, your man-like diligence and
 fortitude!  You know that these are not the words of flattery; your
 conscience echoes them; have you spared a day? have you indulged yourself
 in any pleasure?  Young and beautiful, you have lived a life of high
 intellectual effort, of irksome intellectual patience with details.
 Well, you have your reward: with the fall of Brandenau, the throne of
 your Empire is founded.'
 
 'What thought have you in your mind?' she asked.  'Is not all ruined?'
 
 'Nay, my Princess, the same thought is in both our minds,' he said.
 
 'Herr von Gondremark,' she replied, 'by all that I hold sacred, I have
 none; I do not think at all; I am crushed.'
 
 'You are looking at the passionate side of a rich nature, misunderstood
 and recently insulted,' said the Baron.  'Look into your intellect, and
 tell me.'
 
 'I find nothing, nothing but tumult,' she replied.
 
 'You find one word branded, madam,' returned the Baron: '"Abdication!"'
 
 'O!' she cried.  'The coward!  He leaves me to bear all, and in the hour
 of trial he stabs me from behind.  There is nothing in him, not respect,
 not love, not courage--his wife, his dignity, his throne, the honour of
 his father, he forgets them all!'
 
 'Yes,' pursued the Baron, 'the word Abdication.  I perceive a glimmering
 there.'
 
 'I read your fancy,' she returned.  'It is mere madness, midsummer
 madness.  Baron, I am more unpopular than he.  You know it.  They can
 excuse, they can love, his weakness; but me, they hate.'
 
 'Such is the gratitude of peoples,' said the Baron.  'But we trifle.
 Here, madam, are my plain thoughts.  The man who in the hour of danger
 speaks of abdication is, for me, a venomous animal.  I speak with the
 bluntness of gravity, madam; this is no hour for mincing.  The coward, in
 a station of authority, is more dangerous than fire.  We dwell on a
 volcano; if this man can have his way, Grunewald before a week will have
 been deluged with innocent blood.  You know the truth of what I say; we
 have looked unblenching into this ever-possible catastrophe.  To him it
 is nothing: he will abdicate!  Abdicate, just God! and this unhappy
 country committed to his charge, and the lives of men and the honour of
 women . . .'  His voice appeared to fail him; in an instant he had
 conquered his emotion and resumed: 'But you, madam, conceive more
 worthily of your responsibilities.  I am with you in the thought; and in
 the face of the horrors that I see impending, I say, and your heart
 repeats it--we have gone too far to pause.  Honour, duty, ay, and the
 care of our own lives, demand we should proceed.'
 
 She was looking at him, her brow thoughtfully knitted.  'I feel it,' she
 said.  'But how?  He has the power.'
 
 'The power, madam?  The power is in the army,' he replied; and then
 hastily, ere she could intervene, 'we have to save ourselves,' he went
 on; 'I have to save my Princess, she has to save her minister; we have
 both of us to save this infatuated youth from his own madness.  He in the
 outbreak would be the earliest victim; I see him,' he cried, 'torn in
 pieces; and Grunewald, unhappy Grunewald!  Nay, madam, you who have the
 power must use it; it lies hard upon your conscience.'
 
 'Show me how!' she cried.  'Suppose I were to place him under some
 constraint, the revolution would break upon us instantly.'
 
 The Baron feigned defeat.  'It is true,' he said.  'You see more clearly
 than I do.  Yet there should, there must be, some way.'  And he waited
 for his chance.
 
 'No,' she said; 'I told you from the first there is no remedy.  Our hopes
 are lost: lost by one miserable trifler, ignorant, fretful, fitful--who
 will have disappeared to-morrow, who knows? to his boorish pleasures!'
 
 Any peg would do for Gondremark.  'The thing!' he cried, striking his
 brow.  'Fool, not to have thought of it!  Madam, without perhaps knowing
 it, you have solved our problem.'
 
 'What do you mean?  Speak!' she said.
 
 He appeared to collect himself; and then, with a smile, 'The Prince,' he
 said, 'must go once more a-hunting.'
 
 'Ay, if he would!' cried she, 'and stay there!'
 
 'And stay there,' echoed the Baron.  It was so significantly said, that
 her face changed; and the schemer, fearful of the sinister ambiguity of
 his expressions, hastened to explain.  'This time he shall go hunting in
 a carriage, with a good escort of our foreign lancers.  His destination
 shall be the Felsenburg; it is healthy, the rock is high, the windows are
 small and barred; it might have been built on purpose.  We shall intrust
 the captaincy to the Scotsman Gordon; he at least will have no scruple.
 Who will miss the sovereign?  He is gone hunting; he came home on
 Tuesday, on Thursday he returned; all is usual in that.  Meanwhile the
 war proceeds; our Prince will soon weary of his solitude; and about the
 time of our triumph, or, if he prove very obstinate, a little later, he
 shall be released upon a proper understanding, and I see him once more
 directing his theatricals.'
 
 Seraphina sat gloomy, plunged in thought.  'Yes,' she said suddenly, 'and
 the despatch?  He is now writing it.'
 
 'It cannot pass the council before Friday,' replied Gondremark; 'and as
 for any private note, the messengers are all at my disposal.  They are
 picked men, madam.  I am a person of precaution.'
 
 'It would appear so,' she said, with a flash of her occasional repugnance
 to the man; and then after a pause, 'Herr von Gondremark,' she added, 'I
 recoil from this extremity.'
 
 'I share your Highness's repugnance,' answered he.  'But what would you
 have?  We are defenceless, else.'
 
 'I see it, but this is sudden.  It is a public crime,' she said, nodding
 at him with a sort of horror.
 
 'Look but a little deeper,' he returned, 'and whose is the crime?'
 
 'His!' she cried.  'His, before God!  And I hold him liable.  But
 still--'
 
 'It is not as if he would be harmed,' submitted Gondremark.
 
 'I know it,' she replied, but it was still unheartily.
 
 And then, as brave men are entitled, by prescriptive right as old as the
 world's history, to the alliance and the active help of Fortune, the
 punctual goddess stepped down from the machine.  One of the Princess's
 ladies begged to enter; a man, it appeared, had brought a line for the
 Freiherr von Gondremark.  It proved to be a pencil billet, which the
 crafty Greisengesang had found the means to scribble and despatch under
 the very guns of Otto; and the daring of the act bore testimony to the
 terror of the actor.  For Greisengesang had but one influential motive:
 fear.  The note ran thus: 'At the first council, procuration to be
 withdrawn.--CORN. GREIS.'
 
 So, after three years of exercise, the right of signature was to be
 stript from Seraphina.  It was more than an insult; it was a public
 disgrace; and she did not pause to consider how she had earned it, but
 morally bounded under the attack as bounds the wounded tiger.
 
 'Enough,' she said; 'I will sign the order.  When shall he leave?'
 
 'It will take me twelve hours to collect my men, and it had best be done
 at night.  To-morrow midnight, if you please?' answered the Baron.
 
 'Excellent,' she said.  'My door is always open to you, Baron.  As soon
 as the order is prepared, bring it me to sign.'
 
 'Madam,' he said, 'alone of all of us you do not risk your head in this
 adventure.  For that reason, and to prevent all hesitation, I venture to
 propose the order should be in your hand throughout.'
 
 'You are right,' she replied.
 
 He laid a form before her, and she wrote the order in a clear hand, and
 re-read it.  Suddenly a cruel smile came on her face.  'I had forgotten
 his puppet,' said she.  'They will keep each other company.'  And she
 interlined and initiated the condemnation of Doctor Gotthold.
 
 'Your Highness has more memory than your servant,' said the Baron; and
 then he, in his turn, carefully perused the fateful paper.  'Good!' said
 he.
 
 'You will appear in the drawing-room, Baron?' she asked.
 
 'I thought it better,' said he, 'to avoid the possibility of a public
 affront.  Anything that shook my credit might hamper us in the immediate
 future.'
 
 'You are right,' she said; and she held out her hand as to an old friend
 and equal.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX--THE PRICE OF THE RIVER FARM; IN WHICH VAINGLORY GOES BEFORE A
 FALL
 
 
 The pistol had been practically fired.  Under ordinary circumstances the
 scene at the council table would have entirely exhausted Otto's store
 both of energy and anger; he would have begun to examine and condemn his
 conduct, have remembered all that was true, forgotten all that was unjust
 in Seraphina's onslaught; and by half an hour after would have fallen
 into that state of mind in which a Catholic flees to the confessional and
 a sot takes refuge with the bottle.  Two matters of detail preserved his
 spirits.  For, first, he had still an infinity of business to transact;
 and to transact business, for a man of Otto's neglectful and
 procrastinating habits, is the best anodyne for conscience.  All
 afternoon he was hard at it with the Chancellor, reading, dictating,
 signing, and despatching papers; and this kept him in a glow of
 self-approval.  But, secondly, his vanity was still alarmed; he had
 failed to get the money; to-morrow before noon he would have to
 disappoint old Killian; and in the eyes of that family which counted him
 so little, and to which he had sought to play the part of the heroic
 comforter, he must sink lower than at first.  To a man of Otto's temper,
 this was death.  He could not accept the situation.  And even as he
 worked, and worked wisely and well, over the hated details of his
 principality, he was secretly maturing a plan by which to turn the
 situation.  It was a scheme as pleasing to the man as it was
 dishonourable in the prince; in which his frivolous nature found and took
 vengeance for the gravity and burthen of the afternoon.  He chuckled as
 he thought of it: and Greisengesang heard him with wonder, and attributed
 his lively spirits to the skirmish of the morning.
 
 Led by this idea, the antique courtier ventured to compliment his
 sovereign on his bearing.  It reminded him, he said, of Otto's father.
 
 'What?' asked the Prince, whose thoughts were miles away.
 
 'Your Highness's authority at the board,' explained the flatterer.
 
 'O, that!  O yes,' returned Otto; but for all his carelessness, his
 vanity was delicately tickled, and his mind returned and dwelt
 approvingly over the details of his victory.  'I quelled them all,' he
 thought.
 
 When the more pressing matters had been dismissed, it was already late,
 and Otto kept the Chancellor to dinner, and was entertained with a leash
 of ancient histories and modern compliments.  The Chancellor's career had
 been based, from the first off-put, on entire subserviency; he had
 crawled into honours and employments; and his mind was prostitute.  The
 instinct of the creature served him well with Otto.  First, he let fall a
 sneering word or two upon the female intellect; thence he proceeded to a
 closer engagement; and before the third course he was artfully dissecting
 Seraphina's character to her approving husband.  Of course no names were
 used; and of course the identity of that abstract or ideal man, with whom
 she was currently contrasted, remained an open secret.  But this stiff
 old gentleman had a wonderful instinct for evil, thus to wind his way
 into man's citadel; thus to harp by the hour on the virtues of his hearer
 and not once alarm his self-respect.  Otto was all roseate, in and out,
 with flattery and Tokay and an approving conscience.  He saw himself in
 the most attractive colours.  If even Greisengesang, he thought, could
 thus espy the loose stitches in Seraphina's character, and thus
 disloyally impart them to the opposite camp, he, the discarded
 husband--the dispossessed Prince--could scarce have erred on the side of
 severity.
 
 In this excellent frame he bade adieu to the old gentleman, whose voice
 had proved so musical, and set forth for the drawing-room.  Already on
 the stair, he was seized with some compunction; but when he entered the
 great gallery and beheld his wife, the Chancellor's abstract flatteries
 fell from him like rain, and he re-awoke to the poetic facts of life.
 She stood a good way off below a shining lustre, her back turned.  The
 bend of her waist overcame him with physical weakness.  This was the
 girl-wife who had lain in his arms and whom he had sworn to cherish;
 there was she, who was better than success.
 
 It was Seraphina who restored him from the blow.  She swam forward and
 smiled upon her husband with a sweetness that was insultingly artificial.
 'Frederic,' she lisped, 'you are late.'  It was a scene of high comedy,
 such as is proper to unhappy marriages; and her _aplomb_ disgusted him.
 
 There was no etiquette at these small drawing-rooms.  People came and
 went at pleasure.  The window embrasures became the roost of happy
 couples; at the great chimney the talkers mostly congregated, each
 full-charged with scandal; and down at the farther end the gamblers
 gambled.  It was towards this point that Otto moved, not ostentatiously,
 but with a gentle insistence, and scattering attentions as he went.  Once
 abreast of the card-table, he placed himself opposite to Madame von
 Rosen, and, as soon as he had caught her eye, withdrew to the embrasure
 of a window.  There she had speedily joined him.
 
 'You did well to call me,' she said, a little wildly.  'These cards will
 be my ruin.'
 
 'Leave them,' said Otto.
 
 'I!' she cried, and laughed; 'they are my destiny.  My only chance was to
 die of a consumption; now I must die in a garret.'
 
 'You are bitter to-night,' said Otto.
 
 'I have been losing,' she replied.  'You do not know what greed is.'
 
 'I have come, then, in an evil hour,' said he.
 
 'Ah, you wish a favour!' she cried, brightening beautifully.
 
 'Madam,' said he, 'I am about to found my party, and I come to you for a
 recruit.'
 
 'Done,' said the Countess.  'I am a man again.'
 
 'I may be wrong,' continued Otto, 'but I believe upon my heart you wish
 me no ill.'
 
 'I wish you so well,' she said, 'that I dare not tell it you.'
 
 'Then if I ask my favour?' quoth the Prince.
 
 'Ask it, _mon Prince_,' she answered.  'Whatever it is, it is granted.'
 
 'I wish you,' he returned, 'this very night to make the farmer of our
 talk.'
 
 'Heaven knows your meaning!' she exclaimed.  'I know not, neither care;
 there are no bounds to my desire to please you.  Call him made.'
 
 'I will put it in another way,' returned Otto.  'Did you ever steal?'
 
 'Often!' cried the Countess.  'I have broken all the ten commandments;
 and if there were more to-morrow, I should not sleep till I had broken
 these.'
 
 'This is a case of burglary: to say the truth, I thought it would amuse
 you,' said the Prince.
 
 'I have no practical experience,' she replied, 'but O! the good-will!  I
 have broken a work-box in my time, and several hearts, my own included.
 Never a house!  But it cannot be difficult; sins are so unromantically
 easy!  What are we to break?'
 
 'Madam, we are to break the treasury,' said Otto and he sketched to her
 briefly, wittily, with here and there a touch of pathos, the story of his
 visit to the farm, of his promise to buy it, and of the refusal with
 which his demand for money had been met that morning at the council;
 concluding with a few practical words as to the treasury windows, and the
 helps and hindrances of the proposed exploit.
 
 'They refused you the money,' she said when he had done.  'And you
 accepted the refusal?  Well!'
 
 'They gave their reasons,' replied Otto, colouring.  'They were not such
 as I could combat; and I am driven to dilapidate the funds of my own
 country by a theft.  It is not dignified; but it is fun.'
 
 'Fun,' she said; 'yes.'  And then she remained silently plunged in
 thought for an appreciable time.  'How much do you require?' she asked at
 length.
 
 'Three thousand crowns will do,' he answered, 'for I have still some
 money of my own.'
 
 'Excellent,' she said, regaining her levity.  'I am your true accomplice.
 And where are we to meet?'
 
 'You know the Flying Mercury,' he answered, 'in the Park?  Three pathways
 intersect; there they have made a seat and raised the statue.  The spot
 is handy and the deity congenial.'
 
 'Child,' she said, and tapped him with her fan.  'But do you know, my
 Prince, you are an egoist--your handy trysting-place is miles from me.
 You must give me ample time; I cannot, I think, possibly be there before
 two.  But as the bell beats two, your helper shall arrive: welcome, I
 trust.  Stay--do you bring any one?' she added.  'O, it is not for a
 chaperon--I am not a prude!'
 
 'I shall bring a groom of mine,' said Otto.  'I caught him stealing
 corn.'
 
 'His name?' she asked.
 
 'I profess I know not.  I am not yet intimate with my corn-stealer,'
 returned the Prince.  'It was in a professional capacity--'
 
 'Like me!  Flatterer!' she cried.  'But oblige me in one thing.  Let me
 find you waiting at the seat--yes, you shall await me; for on this
 expedition it shall be no longer Prince and Countess, it shall be the
 lady and the squire--and your friend the thief shall be no nearer than
 the fountain.  Do you promise?'
 
 'Madam, in everything you are to command; you shall be captain, I am but
 supercargo,' answered Otto.
 
 'Well, Heaven bring all safe to port!' she said.  'It is not Friday!'
 
 Something in her manner had puzzled Otto, had possibly touched him with
 suspicion.
 
 'Is it not strange,' he remarked, 'that I should choose my accomplice
 from the other camp?'
 
 'Fool!' she said.  'But it is your only wisdom that you know your
 friends.'  And suddenly, in the vantage of the deep window, she caught up
 his hand and kissed it with a sort of passion.  'Now go,' she added, 'go
 at once.'
 
 He went, somewhat staggered, doubting in his heart that he was over-bold.
 For in that moment she had flashed upon him like a jewel; and even
 through the strong panoply of a previous love he had been conscious of a
 shock.  Next moment he had dismissed the fear.
 
 Both Otto and the Countess retired early from the drawing-room; and the
 Prince, after an elaborate feint, dismissed his valet, and went forth by
 the private passage and the back postern in quest of the groom.
 
 Once more the stable was in darkness, once more Otto employed the
 talismanic knock, and once more the groom appeared and sickened with
 terror.
 
 'Good-evening, friend,' said Otto pleasantly.  'I want you to bring a
 corn sack--empty this time--and to accompany me.  We shall be gone all
 night.'
 
 'Your Highness,' groaned the man, 'I have the charge of the small
 stables.  I am here alone.'
 
 'Come,' said the Prince, 'you are no such martinet in duty.'  And then
 seeing that the man was shaking from head to foot, Otto laid a hand upon
 his shoulder.  'If I meant you harm,' he said, 'should I be here?'
 
 The fellow became instantly reassured.  He got the sack; and Otto led him
 round by several paths and avenues, conversing pleasantly by the way, and
 left him at last planted by a certain fountain where a goggle-eyed Triton
 spouted intermittently into a rippling laver.  Thence he proceeded alone
 to where, in a round clearing, a copy of Gian Bologna's Mercury stood
 tiptoe in the twilight of the stars.  The night was warm and windless.  A
 shaving of new moon had lately arisen; but it was still too small and too
 low down in heaven to contend with the immense host of lesser luminaries;
 and the rough face of the earth was drenched with starlight.  Down one of
 the alleys, which widened as it receded, he could see a part of the
 lamplit terrace where a sentry silently paced, and beyond that a corner
 of the town with interlacing street-lights.  But all around him the young
 trees stood mystically blurred in the dim shine; and in the stock-still
 quietness the upleaping god appeared alive.
 
 In this dimness and silence of the night, Otto's conscience became
 suddenly and staringly luminous, like the dial of a city clock.  He
 averted the eyes of his mind, but the finger rapidly travelling, pointed
 to a series of misdeeds that took his breath away.  What was he doing in
 that place?  The money had been wrongly squandered, but that was largely
 by his own neglect.  And he now proposed to embarrass the finances of
 this country which he had been too idle to govern.  And he now proposed
 to squander the money once again, and this time for a private, if a
 generous end.  And the man whom he had reproved for stealing corn he was
 now to set stealing treasure.  And then there was Madame von Rosen, upon
 whom he looked down with some of that ill-favoured contempt of the chaste
 male for the imperfect woman.  Because he thought of her as one degraded
 below scruples, he had picked her out to be still more degraded, and to
 risk her whole irregular establishment in life by complicity in this
 dishonourable act.  It was uglier than a seduction.
 
 Otto had to walk very briskly and whistle very busily; and when at last
 he heard steps in the narrowest and darkest of the alleys, it was with a
 gush of relief that he sprang to meet the Countess.  To wrestle alone
 with one's good angel is so hard! and so precious, at the proper time, is
 a companion certain to be less virtuous than oneself!
 
 It was a young man who came towards him--a young man of small stature and
 a peculiar gait, wearing a wide flapping hat, and carrying, with great
 weariness, a heavy bag.  Otto recoiled; but the young man held up his
 hand by way of signal, and coming up with a panting run, as if with the
 last of his endurance, laid the bag upon the ground, threw himself upon
 the bench, and disclosed the features of Madame von Rosen.
 
 'You, Countess!' cried the Prince.
 
 'No, no,' she panted, 'the Count von Rosen--my young brother.  A capital
 fellow.  Let him get his breath.'
 
 'Ah, madam . . . ' said he.
 
 'Call me Count,' she returned, 'respect my incognito.'
 
 'Count be it, then,' he replied.  'And let me implore that gallant
 gentleman to set forth at once on our enterprise.'
 
 'Sit down beside me here,' she returned, patting the further corner of
 the bench.  'I will follow you in a moment.  O, I am so tired--feel how
 my heart leaps!  Where is your thief?'
 
 'At his post,' replied Otto.  'Shall I introduce him?  He seems an
 excellent companion.'
 
 'No,' she said, 'do not hurry me yet.  I must speak to you.  Not but I
 adore your thief; I adore any one who has the spirit to do wrong.  I
 never cared for virtue till I fell in love with my Prince.'  She laughed
 musically.  'And even so, it is not for your virtues,' she added.
 
 Otto was embarrassed.  'And now,' he asked, 'if you are anyway rested?'
 
 'Presently, presently.  Let me breathe,' she said, panting a little
 harder than before.
 
 'And what has so wearied you?' he asked.  'This bag?  And why, in the
 name of eccentricity, a bag?  For an empty one, you might have relied on
 my own foresight; and this one is very far from being empty.  My dear
 Count, with what trash have you come laden?  But the shortest method is
 to see for myself.'  And he put down his hand.
 
 She stopped him at once.  'Otto,' she said, 'no--not that way.  I will
 tell, I will make a clean breast.  It is done already.  I have robbed the
 treasury single-handed.  There are three thousand two hundred crowns.  O,
 I trust it is enough!'
 
 Her embarrassment was so obvious that the Prince was struck into a muse,
 gazing in her face, with his hand still outstretched, and she still
 holding him by the wrist.  'You!' he said at last.  'How?' And then
 drawing himself up, 'O madam,' he cried, 'I understand.  You must indeed
 think meanly of the Prince.'
 
 'Well, then, it was a lie!' she cried.  'The money is mine, honestly my
 own--now yours.  This was an unworthy act that you proposed.  But I love
 your honour, and I swore to myself that I should save it in your teeth.
 I beg of you to let me save it'--with a sudden lovely change of tone.
 'Otto, I beseech you let me save it.  Take this dross from your poor
 friend who loves you!'
 
 'Madam, madam,' babbled Otto, in the extreme of misery, 'I cannot--I must
 go.'
 
 And he half rose; but she was on the ground before him in an instant,
 clasping his knees.  'No,' she gasped, 'you shall not go.  Do you despise
 me so entirely?  It is dross; I hate it; I should squander it at play and
 be no richer; it is an investment, it is to save me from ruin.  Otto,'
 she cried, as he again feebly tried to put her from him, 'if you leave me
 alone in this disgrace, I will die here!'  He groaned aloud.  'O,' she
 said, 'think what I suffer!  If you suffer from a piece of delicacy,
 think what I suffer in my shame!  To have my trash refused!  You would
 rather steal, you think of me so basely!  You would rather tread my heart
 in pieces!  O, unkind!  O my Prince!  O Otto!  O pity me!'  She was still
 clasping him; then she found his hand and covered it with kisses, and at
 this his head began to turn.  'O,' she cried again, 'I see it!  O what a
 horror!  It is because I am old, because I am no longer beautiful.'  And
 she burst into a storm of sobs.
 
 This was the _coup de grace_.  Otto had now to comfort and compose her as
 he could, and before many words, the money was accepted.  Between the
 woman and the weak man such was the inevitable end.  Madame von Rosen
 instantly composed her sobs.  She thanked him with a fluttering voice,
 and resumed her place upon the bench, at the far end from Otto.  'Now you
 see,' she said, 'why I bade you keep the thief at distance, and why I
 came alone.  How I trembled for my treasure!'
 
 'Madam,' said Otto, with a tearful whimper in his voice, 'spare me!  You
 are too good, too noble!'
 
 'I wonder to hear you,' she returned.  'You have avoided a great folly.
 You will be able to meet your good old peasant.  You have found an
 excellent investment for a friend's money.  You have preferred essential
 kindness to an empty scruple; and now you are ashamed of it!  You have
 made your friend happy; and now you mourn as the dove!  Come, cheer up.
 I know it is depressing to have done exactly right; but you need not make
 a practice of it.  Forgive yourself this virtue; come now, look me in the
 face and smile!'
 
 He did look at her.  When a man has been embraced by a woman, he sees her
 in a glamour; and at such a time, in the baffling glimmer of the stars,
 she will look wildly well.  The hair is touched with light; the eyes are
 constellations; the face sketched in shadows--a sketch, you might say, by
 passion.  Otto became consoled for his defeat; he began to take an
 interest.  'No,' he said, 'I am no ingrate.'
 
 'You promised me fun,' she returned, with a laugh.  'I have given you as
 good.  We have had a stormy _scena_.'
 
 He laughed in his turn, and the sound of the laughter, in either case,
 was hardly reassuring.
 
 'Come, what are you going to give me in exchange,' she continued, 'for my
 excellent declamation?'
 
 'What you will,' he said.
 
 'Whatever I will?  Upon your honour?  Suppose I asked the crown?'  She
 was flashing upon him, beautiful in triumph.
 
 'Upon my honour,' he replied.
 
 'Shall I ask the crown?' she continued.  'Nay; what should I do with it?
 Grunewald is but a petty state; my ambition swells above it.  I shall
 ask--I find I want nothing,' she concluded.  'I will give you something
 instead.  I will give you leave to kiss me--once.'
 
 Otto drew near, and she put up her face; they were both smiling, both on
 the brink of laughter, all was so innocent and playful; and the Prince,
 when their lips encountered, was dumbfoundered by the sudden convulsion
 of his being.  Both drew instantly apart, and for an appreciable time sat
 tongue-tied.  Otto was indistinctly conscious of a peril in the silence,
 but could find no words to utter.  Suddenly the Countess seemed to awake.
 'As for your wife--' she began in a clear and steady voice.
 
 The word recalled Otto, with a shudder, from his trance.  'I will hear
 nothing against my wife,' he cried wildly; and then, recovering himself
 and in a kindlier tone, 'I will tell you my one secret,' he added.  'I
 love my wife.'
 
 'You should have let me finish,' she returned, smiling.  'Do you suppose
 I did not mention her on purpose?  You know you had lost your head.
 Well, so had I.  Come now, do not be abashed by words,' she added
 somewhat sharply.  'It is the one thing I despise.  If you are not a
 fool, you will see that I am building fortresses about your virtue.  And
 at any rate, I choose that you shall understand that I am not dying of
 love for you.  It is a very smiling business; no tragedy for me!  And now
 here is what I have to say about your wife; she is not and she never has
 been Gondremark's mistress.  Be sure he would have boasted if she had.
 Good-night!'
 
 And in a moment she was gone down the alley, and Otto was alone with the
 bag of money and the flying god.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X--GOTTHOLD'S REVISED OPINION; AND THE FALL COMPLETED
 
 
 The Countess left poor Otto with a caress and buffet simultaneously
 administered.  The welcome word about his wife and the virtuous ending of
 his interview should doubtless have delighted him.  But for all that, as
 he shouldered the bag of money and set forward to rejoin his groom, he
 was conscious of many aching sensibilities.  To have gone wrong and to
 have been set right makes but a double trial for man's vanity.  The
 discovery of his own weakness and possible unfaith had staggered him to
 the heart; and to hear, in the same hour, of his wife's fidelity from one
 who loved her not, increased the bitterness of the surprise.
 
 He was about half-way between the fountain and the Flying Mercury before
 his thoughts began to be clear; and he was surprised to find them
 resentful.  He paused in a kind of temper, and struck with his hand a
 little shrub.  Thence there arose instantly a cloud of awakened sparrows,
 which as instantly dispersed and disappeared into the thicket.  He looked
 at them stupidly, and when they were gone continued staring at the stars.
 'I am angry.  By what right?  By none!' he thought; but he was still
 angry.  He cursed Madame von Rosen and instantly repented.  Heavy was the
 money on his shoulders.
 
 When he reached the fountain, he did, out of ill-humour and parade, an
 unpardonable act.  He gave the money bodily to the dishonest groom.
 'Keep this for me,' he said, 'until I call for it to-morrow.  It is a
 great sum, and by that you will judge that I have not condemned you.'
 And he strode away ruffling, as if he had done something generous.  It
 was a desperate stroke to re-enter at the point of the bayonet into his
 self-esteem; and, like all such, it was fruitless in the end.  He got to
 bed with the devil, it appeared: kicked and tumbled till the grey of the
 morning; and then fell inopportunely into a leaden slumber, and awoke to
 find it ten.  To miss the appointment with old Killian after all, had
 been too tragic a miscarriage: and he hurried with all his might, found
 the groom (for a wonder) faithful to his trust, and arrived only a few
 minutes before noon in the guest-chamber of the Morning Star.  Killian
 was there in his Sunday's best and looking very gaunt and rigid; a lawyer
 from Brandenau stood sentinel over his outspread papers; and the groom
 and the landlord of the inn were called to serve as witnesses.  The
 obvious deference of that great man, the innkeeper, plainly affected the
 old farmer with surprise; but it was not until Otto had taken the pen and
 signed that the truth flashed upon him fully.  Then, indeed, he was
 beside himself.
 
 'His Highness!' he cried, 'His Highness!' and repeated the exclamation
 till his mind had grappled fairly with the facts.  Then he turned to the
 witnesses.  'Gentlemen,' he said, 'you dwell in a country highly favoured
 by God; for of all generous gentlemen, I will say it on my conscience,
 this one is the king.  I am an old man, and I have seen good and bad, and
 the year of the great famine; but a more excellent gentleman, no, never.'
 
 'We know that,' cried the landlord, 'we know that well in Grunewald.  If
 we saw more of his Highness we should be the better pleased.'
 
 'It is the kindest Prince,' began the groom, and suddenly closed his
 mouth upon a sob, so that every one turned to gaze upon his emotion--Otto
 not last; Otto struck with remorse, to see the man so grateful.
 
 Then it was the lawyer's turn to pay a compliment.  'I do not know what
 Providence may hold in store,' he said, 'but this day should be a bright
 one in the annals of your reign.  The shouts of armies could not be more
 eloquent than the emotion on these honest faces.'  And the Brandenau
 lawyer bowed, skipped, stepped back, and took snuff, with the air of a
 man who has found and seized an opportunity.
 
 'Well, young gentleman,' said Killian, 'if you will pardon me the
 plainness of calling you a gentleman, many a good day's work you have
 done, I doubt not, but never a better, or one that will be better
 blessed; and whatever, sir, may be your happiness and triumph in that
 high sphere to which you have been called, it will be none the worse,
 sir, for an old man's blessing!'
 
 The scene had almost assumed the proportions of an ovation; and when the
 Prince escaped he had but one thought: to go wherever he was most sure of
 praise.  His conduct at the board of council occurred to him as a fair
 chapter; and this evoked the memory of Gotthold.  To Gotthold he would
 go.
 
 Gotthold was in the library as usual, and laid down his pen, a little
 angrily, on Otto's entrance.  'Well,' he said, 'here you are.'
 
 'Well,' returned Otto, 'we made a revolution, I believe.'
 
 'It is what I fear,' returned the Doctor.
 
 'How?' said Otto.  'Fear?  Fear is the burnt child.  I have learned my
 strength and the weakness of the others; and I now mean to govern.'
 
 Gotthold said nothing, but he looked down and smoothed his chin.
 
 'You disapprove?' cried Otto.  'You are a weather-cock.'
 
 'On the contrary,' replied the Doctor.  'My observation has confirmed my
 fears.  It will not do, Otto, not do.'
 
 'What will not do?' demanded the Prince, with a sickening stab of pain.
 
 'None of it,' answered Gotthold.  'You are unfitted for a life of action;
 you lack the stamina, the habit, the restraint, the patience.  Your wife
 is greatly better, vastly better; and though she is in bad hands,
 displays a very different aptitude.  She is a woman of affairs; you
 are--dear boy, you are yourself.  I bid you back to your amusements; like
 a smiling dominie, I give you holidays for life.  Yes,' he continued,
 'there is a day appointed for all when they shall turn again upon their
 own philosophy.  I had grown to disbelieve impartially in all; and if in
 the atlas of the sciences there were two charts I disbelieved in more
 than all the rest, they were politics and morals.  I had a sneaking
 kindness for your vices; as they were negative, they flattered my
 philosophy; and I called them almost virtues.  Well, Otto, I was wrong; I
 have forsworn my sceptical philosophy; and I perceive your faults to be
 unpardonable.  You are unfit to be a Prince, unfit to be a husband.  And
 I give you my word, I would rather see a man capably doing evil than
 blundering about good.'
 
 Otto was still silent, in extreme dudgeon.
 
 Presently the Doctor resumed: 'I will take the smaller matter first: your
 conduct to your wife.  You went, I hear, and had an explanation.  That
 may have been right or wrong; I know not; at least, you had stirred her
 temper.  At the council she insults you; well, you insult her back--a man
 to a woman, a husband to his wife, in public!  Next upon the back of
 this, you propose--the story runs like wildfire--to recall the power of
 signature.  Can she ever forgive that? a woman--a young woman--ambitious,
 conscious of talents beyond yours?  Never, Otto.  And to sum all, at such
 a crisis in your married life, you get into a window corner with that
 ogling dame von Rosen.  I do not dream that there was any harm; but I do
 say it was an idle disrespect to your wife.  Why, man, the woman is not
 decent.'
 
 'Gotthold,' said Otto, 'I will hear no evil of the Countess.'
 
 'You will certainly hear no good of her,' returned Gotthold; 'and if you
 wish your wife to be the pink of nicety, you should clear your court of
 demi-reputations.'
 
 'The commonplace injustice of a by-word,' Otto cried.  'The partiality of
 sex.  She is a demirep; what then is Gondremark?  Were she a man--'
 
 'It would be all one,' retorted Gotthold roughly.  'When I see a man,
 come to years of wisdom, who speaks in double-meanings and is the
 braggart of his vices, I spit on the other side.  "You, my friend," say
 I, "are not even a gentleman."  Well, she's not even a lady.'
 
 'She is the best friend I have, and I choose that she shall be
 respected,' Otto said.
 
 'If she is your friend, so much the worse,' replied the Doctor.  'It will
 not stop there.'
 
 'Ah!' cried Otto, 'there is the charity of virtue!  All evil in the
 spotted fruit.  But I can tell you, sir, that you do Madame von Rosen
 prodigal injustice.'
 
 'You can tell me!' said the Doctor shrewdly.  'Have you, tried? have you
 been riding the marches?'
 
 The blood came into Otto's face.
 
 'Ah!' cried Gotthold, 'look at your wife and blush!  There's a wife for a
 man to marry and then lose!  She's a carnation, Otto.  The soul is in her
 eyes.'
 
 'You have changed your note for Seraphina, I perceive,' said Otto.
 
 'Changed it!' cried the Doctor, with a flush.  'Why, when was it
 different?  But I own I admired her at the council.  When she sat there
 silent, tapping with her foot, I admired her as I might a hurricane.
 Were I one of those who venture upon matrimony, there had been the prize
 to tempt me!  She invites, as Mexico invited Cortez; the enterprise is
 hard, the natives are unfriendly--I believe them cruel too--but the
 metropolis is paved with gold and the breeze blows out of paradise.  Yes,
 I could desire to be that conqueror.  But to philander with von Rosen!
 never!  Senses?  I discard them; what are they?--pruritus!  Curiosity?
 Reach me my Anatomy!'
 
 'To whom do you address yourself?' cried Otto.  'Surely you, of all men,
 know that I love my wife!'
 
 'O, love!' cried Gotthold; 'love is a great word; it is in all the
 dictionaries.  If you had loved, she would have paid you back.  What does
 she ask?  A little ardour!'
 
 'It is hard to love for two,' replied the Prince.
 
 'Hard?  Why, there's the touchstone!  O, I know my poets!' cried the
 Doctor.  'We are but dust and fire, too and to endure life's scorching;
 and love, like the shadow of a great rock, should lend shelter and
 refreshment, not to the lover only, but to his mistress and to the
 children that reward them; and their very friends should seek repose in
 the fringes of that peace.  Love is not love that cannot build a home.
 And you call it love to grudge and quarrel and pick faults?  You call it
 love to thwart her to her face, and bandy insults?  Love!'
 
 'Gotthold, you are unjust.  I was then fighting for my country,' said the
 Prince.
 
 'Ay, and there's the worst of all,' returned the Doctor.  'You could not
 even see that you were wrong; that being where they were, retreat was
 ruin.'
 
 Why, you supported me!' cried Otto.
 
 'I did.  I was a fool like you,' replied Gotthold.  'But now my eyes are
 open.  If you go on as you have started, disgrace this fellow Gondremark,
 and publish the scandal of your divided house, there will befall a most
 abominable thing in Grunewald.  A revolution, friend--a revolution.'
 
 'You speak strangely for a red,' said Otto.
 
 'A red republican, but not a revolutionary,' returned the Doctor.  'An
 ugly thing is a Grunewalder drunk!  One man alone can save the country
 from this pass, and that is the double-dealer Gondremark, with whom I
 conjure you to make peace.  It will not be you; it never can be
 you:--you, who can do nothing, as your wife said, but trade upon your
 station--you, who spent the hours in begging money!  And in God's name,
 what for?  Why money?  What mystery of idiocy was this?'
 
 'It was to no ill end.  It was to buy a farm,' quoth Otto sulkily.
 
 'To buy a farm!' cried Gotthold.  'Buy a farm!'
 
 'Well, what then?' returned Otto. 'I have bought it, if you come to
 that.'
 
 Gotthold fairly bounded on his seat.  'And how that?' he cried.
 
 'How?' repeated Otto, startled.
 
 'Ay, verily, how!' returned the Doctor.  'How came you by the money?'
 
 The Prince's countenance darkened.  'That is my affair,' said he.
 
 'You see you are ashamed,' retorted Gotthold.  'And so you bought a farm
 in the hour of our country's need--doubtless to be ready for the
 abdication; and I put it that you stole the funds.  There are not three
 ways of getting money: there are but two: to earn and steal.  And now,
 when you have combined Charles the Fifth and Long-fingered Tom, you come
 to me to fortify your vanity!  But I will clear my mind upon this matter:
 until I know the right and wrong of the transaction, I put my hand behind
 my back.  A man may be the pitifullest prince; he must be a spotless
 gentleman.'
 
 The Prince had gotten to his feet, as pale as paper.  Gotthold,' he said,
 'you drive me beyond bounds.  Beware, sir, beware!'
 
 'Do you threaten me, friend Otto?' asked the Doctor grimly.  'That would
 be a strange conclusion.'
 
 'When have you ever known me use my power in any private animosity?'
 cried Otto.  'To any private man your words were an unpardonable insult,
 but at me you shoot in full security, and I must turn aside to compliment
 you on your plainness.  I must do more than pardon, I must admire,
 because you have faced this--this formidable monarch, like a Nathan
 before David.  You have uprooted an old kindness, sir, with an unsparing
 hand.  You leave me very bare.  My last bond is broken; and though I take
 Heaven to witness that I sought to do the right, I have this reward: to
 find myself alone.  You say I am no gentleman; yet the sneers have been
 upon your side; and though I can very well perceive where you have lodged
 your sympathies, I will forbear the taunt.'
 
 'Otto, are you insane?' cried Gotthold, leaping up.  'Because I ask you
 how you came by certain moneys, and because you refuse--'
 
 'Herr von Hohenstockwitz, I have ceased to invite your aid in my
 affairs,' said Otto.  'I have heard all that I desire, and you have
 sufficiently trampled on my vanity.  It may be that I cannot govern, it
 may be that I cannot love--you tell me so with every mark of honesty; but
 God has granted me one virtue, and I can still forgive.  I forgive you;
 even in this hour of passion, I can perceive my faults and your excuses;
 and if I desire that in future I may be spared your conversation, it is
 not, sir, from resentment--not resentment--but, by Heaven, because no man
 on earth could endure to be so rated.  You have the satisfaction to see
 your sovereign weep; and that person whom you have so often taunted with
 his happiness reduced to the last pitch of solitude and misery.  No,--I
 will hear nothing; I claim the last word, sir, as your Prince; and that
 last word shall be--forgiveness.'
 
 And with that Otto was gone from the apartment, and Doctor Gotthold was
 left alone with the most conflicting sentiments of sorrow, remorse, and
 merriment; walking to and fro before his table, and asking himself, with
 hands uplifted, which of the pair of them was most to blame for this
 unhappy rupture.  Presently, he took from a cupboard a bottle of Rhine
 wine and a goblet of the deep Bohemian ruby.  The first glass a little
 warmed and comforted his bosom; with the second he began to look down
 upon these troubles from a sunny mountain; yet a while, and filled with
 this false comfort and contemplating life throughout a golden medium, he
 owned to himself, with a flush, a smile, and a half-pleasurable sigh,
 that he had been somewhat over plain in dealing with his cousin.  'He
 said the truth, too,' added the penitent librarian, 'for in my monkish
 fashion I adore the Princess.'  And then, with a still deepening flush
 and a certain stealth, although he sat all alone in that great gallery,
 he toasted Seraphina to the dregs.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI--PROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE FIRST
 SHE BEGUILES THE BARON
 
 
 At a sufficiently late hour, or to be more exact, at three in the
 afternoon, Madame von Rosen issued on the world.  She swept downstairs
 and out across the garden, a black mantilla thrown over her head, and the
 long train of her black velvet dress ruthlessly sweeping in the dirt.
 
 At the other end of that long garden, and back to back with the villa of
 the Countess, stood the large mansion where the Prime Minister transacted
 his affairs and pleasures.  This distance, which was enough for decency
 by the easy canons of Mittwalden, the Countess swiftly traversed, opened
 a little door with a key, mounted a flight of stairs, and entered
 unceremoniously into Gondremark's study.  It was a large and very high
 apartment; books all about the walls, papers on the table, papers on the
 floor; here and there a picture, somewhat scant of drapery; a great fire
 glowing and flaming in the blue tiled hearth; and the daylight streaming
 through a cupola above.  In the midst of this sat the great Baron
 Gondremark in his shirt-sleeves, his business for that day fairly at an
 end, and the hour arrived for relaxation.  His expression, his very
 nature, seemed to have undergone a fundamental change.  Gondremark at
 home appeared the very antipode of Gondremark on duty.  He had an air of
 massive jollity that well became him; grossness and geniality sat upon
 his features; and along with his manners, he had laid aside his sly and
 sinister expression.  He lolled there, sunning his bulk before the fire,
 a noble animal.
 
 'Hey!' he cried.  'At last!'
 
 The Countess stepped into the room in silence, threw herself on a chair,
 and crossed her legs.  In her lace and velvet, with a good display of
 smooth black stocking and of snowy petticoat, and with the refined
 profile of her face and slender plumpness of her body, she showed in
 singular contrast to the big, black, intellectual satyr by the fire.
 
 'How often do you send for me?' she cried.  'It is compromising.'
 
 Gondremark laughed.  'Speaking of that,' said he, 'what in the devil's
 name were you about?  You were not home till morning.'
 
 'I was giving alms,' she said.
 
 The Baron again laughed loud and long, for in his shirt-sleeves he was a
 very mirthful creature.  'It is fortunate I am not jealous,' he remarked.
 'But you know my way: pleasure and liberty go hand in hand.  I believe
 what I believe; it is not much, but I believe it.--But now to business.
 Have you not read my letter?'
 
 'No,' she said; 'my head ached.'
 
 'Ah, well! then I have news indeed!' cried Gondremark.  'I was mad to see
 you all last night and all this morning: for yesterday afternoon I
 brought my long business to a head; the ship has come home; one more dead
 lift, and I shall cease to fetch and carry for the Princess Ratafia.
 Yes, 'tis done.  I have the order all in Ratafia's hand; I carry it on my
 heart.  At the hour of twelve to-night, Prince Featherhead is to be taken
 in his bed and, like the bambino, whipped into a chariot; and by next
 morning he will command a most romantic prospect from the donjon of the
 Felsenburg.  Farewell, Featherhead!  The war goes on, the girl is in my
 hand; I have long been indispensable, but now I shall be sole.  I have
 long,' he added exultingly, 'long carried this intrigue upon my
 shoulders, like Samson with the gates of Gaza; now I discharge that
 burthen.'
 
 She had sprung to her feet a little paler.  'Is this true?' she cried.
 
 'I tell you a fact,' he asseverated.  'The trick is played.'
 
 'I will never believe it,' she said.  'An order in her own hand?  I will
 never believe it, Heinrich.'
 
 'I swear to you,' said he.
 
 'O, what do you care for oaths--or I either?  What would you swear by?
 Wine, women, and song?  It is not binding,' she said.  She had come quite
 close up to him and laid her hand upon his arm.  'As for the order--no,
 Heinrich, never!  I will never believe it.  I will die ere I believe it.
 You have some secret purpose--what, I cannot guess--but not one word of
 it is true.'
 
 'Shall I show it you?' he asked.
 
 'You cannot,' she answered.  'There is no such thing.'
 
 'Incorrigible Sadducee!' he cried.  'Well, I will convert you; you shall
 see the order.'  He moved to a chair where he had thrown his coat, and
 then drawing forth and holding out a paper, 'Read,' said he.
 
 She took it greedily, and her eye flashed as she perused it.
 
 'Hey!' cried the Baron, 'there falls a dynasty, and it was I that felled
 it; and I and you inherit!'  He seemed to swell in stature; and next
 moment, with a laugh, he put his hand forward.  Give me the dagger,' said
 he.
 
 But she whisked the paper suddenly behind her back and faced him,
 lowering.  'No, no,' she said.  'You and I have first a point to settle.
 Do you suppose me blind?  She could never have given that paper but to
 one man, and that man her lover.  Here you stand--her lover, her
 accomplice, her master--O, I well believe it, for I know your power.  But
 what am I?' she cried; 'I, whom you deceive!'
 
 'Jealousy!' cried Gondremark.  'Anna, I would never have believed it!
 But I declare to you by all that's credible that I am not her lover.  I
 might be, I suppose; but I never yet durst risk the declaration.  The
 chit is so unreal; a mincing doll; she will and she will not; there is no
 counting on her, by God!  And hitherto I have had my own way without, and
 keep the lover in reserve.  And I say, Anna,' he added with severity,
 'you must break yourself of this new fit, my girl; there must be no
 combustion.  I keep the creature under the belief that I adore her; and
 if she caught a breath of you and me, she is such a fool, prude, and dog
 in the manger, that she is capable of spoiling all.'
 
 'All very fine,' returned the lady.  'With whom do you pass your days?
 and which am I to believe, your words or your actions?'
 
 'Anna, the devil take you, are you blind?' cried Gondremark.  'You know
 me.  Am I likely to care for such a preciosa?  'Tis hard that we should
 have been together for so long, and you should still take me for a
 troubadour.  But if there is one thing that I despise and deprecate, it
 is all such figures in Berlin wool.  Give me a human woman--like myself.
 You are my mate; you were made for me; you amuse me like the play.  And
 what have I to gain that I should pretend to you?  If I do not love you,
 what use are you to me?  Why, none.  It is as clear as noonday.'
 
 'Do you love me, Heinrich?' she asked, languishing.  'Do you truly?'
 
 'I tell you,' he cried, 'I love you next after myself.  I should be all
 abroad if I had lost you.'
 
 'Well, then,' said she, folding up the paper and putting it calmly in her
 pocket, 'I will believe you, and I join the plot.  Count upon me.  At
 midnight, did you say?  It is Gordon, I see, that you have charged with
 it.  Excellent; he will stick at nothing--'
 
 Gondremark watched her suspiciously.  'Why do you take the paper?' he
 demanded.  'Give it here.'
 
 'No,' she returned; 'I mean to keep it.  It is I who must prepare the
 stroke; you cannot manage it without me; and to do my best I must possess
 the paper.  Where shall I find Gordon?  In his rooms?'  She spoke with a
 rather feverish self-possession.
 
 'Anna,' he said sternly, the black, bilious countenance of his palace
 _role_ taking the place of the more open favour of his hours at home, 'I
 ask you for that paper.  Once, twice, and thrice.'
 
 'Heinrich,' she returned, looking him in the face, 'take care.  I will
 put up with no dictation.'
 
 Both looked dangerous; and the silence lasted for a measurable interval
 of time.  Then she made haste to have the first word; and with a laugh
 that rang clear and honest, 'Do not be a child,' she said.  'I wonder at
 you.  If your assurances are true, you can have no reason to mistrust me,
 nor I to play you false.  The difficulty is to get the Prince out of the
 palace without scandal.  His valets are devoted; his chamberlain a slave;
 and yet one cry might ruin all.'
 
 'They must be overpowered,' he said, following her to the new ground,
 'and disappear along with him.'
 
 'And your whole scheme along with them!' she cried.  'He does not take
 his servants when he goes a-hunting: a child could read the truth.  No,
 no; the plan is idiotic; it must be Ratafia's.  But hear me.  You know
 the Prince worships me?'
 
 'I know,' he said.  'Poor Featherhead, I cross his destiny!'
 
 'Well now,' she continued, 'what if I bring him alone out of the palace,
 to some quiet corner of the Park--the Flying Mercury, for instance?
 Gordon can be posted in the thicket; the carriage wait behind the temple;
 not a cry, not a scuffle, not a footfall; simply, the Prince
 vanishes!--What do you say?  Am I an able ally?  Are my _beaux yuex_ of
 service?  Ah, Heinrich, do not lose your Anna!--she has power!'
 
 He struck with his open hand upon the chimney.  'Witch!' he said, 'there
 is not your match for devilry in Europe.  Service! the thing runs on
 wheels.'
 
 'Kiss me, then, and let me go.  I must not miss my Featherhead,' she
 said.
 
 'Stay, stay,' said the Baron; 'not so fast.  I wish, upon my soul, that I
 could trust you; but you are, out and in, so whimsical a devil that I
 dare not.  Hang it, Anna, no; it's not possible!'
 
 'You doubt me, Heinrich?' she cried.
 
 'Doubt is not the word,' said he.  'I know you.  Once you were clear of
 me with that paper in your pocket, who knows what you would do with
 it?--not you, at least--nor I.  You see,' he added, shaking his head
 paternally upon the Countess, 'you are as vicious as a monkey.'
 
 'I swear to you,' she cried, 'by my salvation . . . '
 
 'I have no curiosity to hear you swearing,' said the Baron.
 
 'You think that I have no religion?  You suppose me destitute of honour.
 Well,' she said, 'see here: I will not argue, but I tell you once for
 all: leave me this order, and the Prince shall be arrested--take it from
 me, and, as certain as I speak, I will upset the coach.  Trust me, or
 fear me: take your choice.'  And she offered him the paper.
 
 The Baron, in a great contention of mind, stood irresolute, weighing the
 two dangers.  Once his hand advanced, then dropped.  'Well,' he said,
 'since trust is what you call it . . .'
 
 'No more,' she interrupted, 'Do not spoil your attitude.  And now since
 you have behaved like a good sort of fellow in the dark, I will
 condescend to tell you why.  I go to the palace to arrange with Gordon;
 but how is Gordon to obey me?  And how can I foresee the hours?  It may
 be midnight; ay, and it may be nightfall; all's a chance; and to act, I
 must be free and hold the strings of the adventure.  And now,' she cried,
 'your Vivien goes.  Dub me your knight!'  And she held out her arms and
 smiled upon him radiant.
 
 'Well,' he said, when he had kissed her, 'every man must have his folly;
 I thank God mine is no worse.  Off with you!  I have given a child a
 squib.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII--PROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE SECOND
 SHE INFORMS THE PRINCE
 
 
 It was the first impulse of Madame von Rosen to return to her own villa
 and revise her toilette.  Whatever else should come of this adventure, it
 was her firm design to pay a visit to the Princess.  And before that
 woman, so little beloved, the Countess would appear at no disadvantage.
 It was the work of minutes.  Von Rosen had the captain's eye in matters
 of the toilette; she was none of those who hang in Fabian helplessness
 among their finery and, after hours, come forth upon the world as
 dowdies.  A glance, a loosened curl, a studied and admired disorder in
 the hair, a bit of lace, a touch of colour, a yellow rose in the bosom;
 and the instant picture was complete.
 
 'That will do,' she said.  'Bid my carriage follow me to the palace.  In
 half an hour it should be there in waiting.'
 
 The night was beginning to fall and the shops to shine with lamps along
 the tree-beshadowed thorough-fares of Otto's capital, when the Countess
 started on her high emprise.  She was jocund at heart; pleasure and
 interest had winged her beauty, and she knew it.  She paused before the
 glowing jeweller's; she remarked and praised a costume in the milliner's
 window; and when she reached the lime-tree walk, with its high,
 umbrageous arches and stir of passers-by in the dim alleys, she took her
 place upon a bench and began to dally with the pleasures of the hour.  It
 was cold, but she did not feel it, being warm within; her thoughts, in
 that dark corner, shone like the gold and rubies at the jewellers; her
 ears, which heard the brushing of so many footfalls, transposed it into
 music.
 
 What was she to do?  She held the paper by which all depended.  Otto and
 Gondremark and Ratafia, and the state itself, hung light in her balances,
 as light as dust; her little finger laid in either scale would set all
 flying: and she hugged herself upon her huge preponderance, and then
 laughed aloud to think how giddily it might be used.  The vertigo of
 omnipotence, the disease of Caesars, shook her reason.  'O the mad
 world!' she thought, and laughed aloud in exultation.
 
 A child, finger in mouth, had paused a little way from where she sat, and
 stared with cloudy interest upon this laughing lady.  She called it
 nearer; but the child hung back.  Instantly, with that curious passion
 which you may see any woman in the world display, on the most odd
 occasions, for a similar end, the Countess bent herself with singleness
 of mind to overcome this diffidence; and presently, sure enough, the
 child was seated on her knee, thumbing and glowering at her watch.
 
 'If you had a clay bear and a china monkey,' asked Von Rosen, 'which
 would you prefer to break?'
 
 'But I have neither,' said the child.
 
 'Well,' she said, 'here is a bright florin, with which you may purchase
 both the one and the other; and I shall give it you at once, if you will
 answer my question.  The clay bear or the china monkey--come?'
 
 But the unbreeched soothsayer only stared upon the florin with big eyes;
 the oracle could not be persuaded to reply; and the Countess kissed him
 lightly, gave him the florin, set him down upon the path, and resumed her
 way with swinging and elastic gait.
 
 'Which shall I break?' she wondered; and she passed her hand with delight
 among the careful disarrangement of her locks.  'Which?' and she
 consulted heaven with her bright eyes.  'Do I love both or neither?  A
 little--passionately--not at all?  Both or neither--both, I believe; but
 at least I will make hay of Ratafia.'
 
 By the time she had passed the iron gates, mounted the drive, and set her
 foot upon the broad flagged terrace, the night had come completely; the
 palace front was thick with lighted windows; and along the balustrade,
 the lamp on every twentieth baluster shone clear.  A few withered tracks
 of sunset, amber and glow-worm green, still lingered in the western sky;
 and she paused once again to watch them fading.
 
 'And to think,' she said, 'that here am I--destiny embodied, a norn, a
 fate, a providence--and have no guess upon which side I shall declare
 myself!  What other woman in my place would not be prejudiced, and think
 herself committed?  But, thank Heaven!  I was born just!'  Otto's windows
 were bright among the rest, and she looked on them with rising
 tenderness.  'How does it feel to be deserted?' she thought.  'Poor dear
 fool!  The girl deserves that he should see this order.'
 
 Without more delay, she passed into the palace and asked for an audience
 of Prince Otto.  The Prince, she was told, was in his own apartment, and
 desired to be private.  She sent her name.  A man presently returned with
 word that the Prince tendered his apologies, but could see no one.  'Then
 I will write,' she said, and scribbled a few lines alleging urgency of
 life and death.  'Help me, my Prince,' she added; 'none but you can help
 me.'  This time the messenger returned more speedily, and begged the
 Countess to follow him: the Prince was graciously pleased to receive the
 Frau Grafin von Rosen.
 
 Otto sat by the fire in his large armoury, weapons faintly glittering all
 about him in the changeful light.  His face was disfigured by the marks
 of weeping; he looked sour and sad; nor did he rise to greet his visitor,
 but bowed, and bade the man begone.  That kind of general tenderness
 which served the Countess for both heart and conscience, sharply smote
 her at this spectacle of grief and weakness; she began immediately to
 enter into the spirit of her part; and as soon as they were alone, taking
 one step forward and with a magnificent gesture--'Up!' she cried.
 
 'Madame von Rosen,' replied Otto dully, 'you have used strong words.  You
 speak of life and death.  Pray, madam, who is threatened?  Who is there,'
 he added bitterly, 'so destitute that even Otto of Grunewald can assist
 him?'
 
 'First learn,' said she, 'the names of the conspirators; the Princess and
 the Baron Gondremark.  Can you not guess the rest?'  And then, as he
 maintained his silence--'You!' she cried, pointing at him with her
 finger.  ''Tis you they threaten!  Your rascal and mine have laid their
 heads together and condemned you.  But they reckoned without you and me.
 We make a _partie carree_, Prince, in love and politics.  They lead an
 ace, but we shall trump it.  Come, partner, shall I draw my card?'
 
 'Madam,' he said, 'explain yourself.  Indeed I fail to comprehend.'
 
 'See, then,' said she; and handed him the order.
 
 He took it, looked upon it with a start; and then, still without speech,
 he put his hand before his face.  She waited for a word in vain.
 
 'What!' she cried, 'do you take the thing down-heartedly?  As well seek
 wine in a milk-pail as love in that girl's heart!  Be done with this, and
 be a man.  After the league of the lions, let us have a conspiracy of
 mice, and pull this piece of machinery to ground.  You were brisk enough
 last night when nothing was at stake and all was frolic.  Well, here is
 better sport; here is life indeed.'
 
 He got to his feet with some alacrity, and his face, which was a little
 flushed, bore the marks of resolution.
 
 'Madame von Rosen,' said he, 'I am neither unconscious nor ungrateful;
 this is the true continuation of your friendship; but I see that I must
 disappoint your expectations.  You seem to expect from me some effort of
 resistance; but why should I resist?  I have not much to gain; and now
 that I have read this paper, and the last of a fool's paradise is
 shattered, it would be hyperbolical to speak of loss in the same breath
 with Otto of Grunewald.  I have no party, no policy; no pride, nor
 anything to be proud of.  For what benefit or principle under Heaven do
 you expect me to contend?  Or would you have me bite and scratch like a
 trapped weasel?  No, madam; signify to those who sent you my readiness to
 go.  I would at least avoid a scandal.'
 
 'You go?--of your own will, you go?' she cried.
 
 'I cannot say so much, perhaps,' he answered; 'but I go with good
 alacrity.  I have desired a change some time; behold one offered me!
 Shall I refuse?  Thank God, I am not so destitute of humour as to make a
 tragedy of such a farce.'  He flicked the order on the table.  'You may
 signify my readiness,' he added grandly.
 
 'Ah,' she said, 'you are more angry than you own.'
 
 'I, madam? angry?' he cried.  'You rave!  I have no cause for anger.  In
 every way I have been taught my weakness, my instability, and my
 unfitness for the world.  I am a plexus of weaknesses, an impotent
 Prince, a doubtful gentleman; and you yourself, indulgent as you are,
 have twice reproved my levity.  And shall I be angry?  I may feel the
 unkindness, but I have sufficient honesty of mind to see the reasons of
 this _coup d'etat_.'
 
 'From whom have you got this?' she cried in wonder.  'You think you have
 not behaved well?  My Prince, were you not young and handsome, I should
 detest you for your virtues.  You push them to the verge of commonplace.
 And this ingratitude--'
 
 'Understand me, Madame von Rosen,' returned the Prince, flushing a little
 darker, 'there can be here no talk of gratitude, none of pride.  You are
 here, by what circumstance I know not, but doubtless led by your
 kindness, mixed up in what regards my family alone.  You have no
 knowledge what my wife, your sovereign, may have suffered; it is not for
 you--no, nor for me--to judge.  I own myself in fault; and were it
 otherwise, a man were a very empty boaster who should talk of love and
 start before a small humiliation.  It is in all the copybooks that one
 should die to please his lady-love; and shall a man not go to prison?'
 
 'Love?  And what has love to do with being sent to gaol?' exclaimed the
 Countess, appealing to the walls and roof.  'Heaven knows I think as much
 of love as any one; my life would prove it; but I admit no love, at least
 for a man, that is not equally returned.  The rest is moonshine.'
 
 'I think of love more absolutely, madam, though I am certain no more
 tenderly, than a lady to whom I am indebted for such kindnesses,'
 returned the Prince.  'But this is unavailing.  We are not here to hold a
 court of troubadours.'
 
 'Still,' she replied, 'there is one thing you forget.  If she conspires
 with Gondremark against your liberty, she may conspire with him against
 your honour also.'
 
 'My honour?' he repeated.  'For a woman, you surprise me.  If I have
 failed to gain her love or play my part of husband, what right is left
 me? or what honour can remain in such a scene of defeat?  No honour that
 I recognise.  I am become a stranger.  If my wife no longer loves me, I
 will go to prison, since she wills it; if she love another, where should
 I be more in place? or whose fault is it but mine?  You speak, Madame von
 Rosen, like too many women, with a man's tongue.  Had I myself fallen
 into temptation (as, Heaven knows, I might) I should have trembled, but
 still hoped and asked for her forgiveness; and yet mine had been a
 treason in the teeth of love.  But let me tell you, madam,' he pursued,
 with rising irritation, 'where a husband by futility, facility, and
 ill-timed humours has outwearied his wife's patience, I will suffer
 neither man nor woman to misjudge her.  She is free; the man has been
 found wanting.'
 
 'Because she loves you not?' the Countess cried.  'You know she is
 incapable of such a feeling.'
 
 'Rather, it was I who was born incapable of inspiring it,' said Otto.
 
 Madame von Rosen broke into sudden laughter.  'Fool,' she cried, 'I am in
 love with you myself!'
 
 'Ah, madam, you are most compassionate,' the Prince retorted, smiling.
 'But this is waste debate.  I know my purpose.  Perhaps, to equal you in
 frankness, I know and embrace my advantage.  I am not without the spirit
 of adventure.  I am in a false position--so recognised by public
 acclamation: do you grudge me, then, my issue?'
 
 'If your mind is made up, why should I dissuade you?' said the Countess.
 'I own, with a bare face, I am the gainer.  Go, you take my heart with
 you, or more of it than I desire; I shall not sleep at night for thinking
 of your misery.  But do not be afraid; I would not spoil you, you are
 such a fool and hero.'
 
 'Alas! madam,' cried the Prince, 'and your unlucky money!  I did amiss to
 take it, but you are a wonderful persuader.  And I thank God, I can still
 offer you the fair equivalent.'  He took some papers from the chimney.
 'Here, madam, are the title-deeds,' he said; 'where I am going, they can
 certainly be of no use to me, and I have now no other hope of making up
 to you your kindness.  You made the loan without formality, obeying your
 kind heart.  The parts are somewhat changed; the sun of this Prince of
 Grunewald is upon the point of setting; and I know you better than to
 doubt you will once more waive ceremony, and accept the best that he can
 give you.  If I may look for any pleasure in the coming time, it will be
 to remember that the peasant is secure, and my most generous friend no
 loser.'
 
 'Do you not understand my odious position?' cried the Countess.  'Dear
 Prince, it is upon your fall that I begin my fortune.'
 
 'It was the more like you to tempt me to resistance,' returned Otto.
 'But this cannot alter our relations; and I must, for the last time, lay
 my commands upon you in the character of Prince.'  And with his loftiest
 dignity, he forced the deeds on her acceptance.
 
 'I hate the very touch of them,' she cried.
 
 There followed upon this a little silence.  'At what time,' resumed Otto,
 '(if indeed you know) am I to be arrested?'
 
 'Your Highness, when you please!' exclaimed the Countess.  'Or, if you
 choose to tear that paper, never!'
 
 'I would rather it were done quickly,' said the Prince.  'I shall take
 but time to leave a letter for the Princess.'
 
 'Well,' said the Countess, 'I have advised you to resist; at the same
 time, if you intend to be dumb before your shearers, I must say that I
 ought to set about arranging your arrest.  I offered'--she hesitated--'I
 offered to manage it, intending, my dear friend--intending, upon my soul,
 to be of use to you.  Well, if you will not profit by my goodwill, then
 be of use to me; and as soon as ever you feel ready, go to the Flying
 Mercury where we met last night.  It will be none the worse for you; and
 to make it quite plain, it will be better for the rest of us.'
 
 'Dear madam, certainly,' said Otto.  'If I am prepared for the chief
 evil, I shall not quarrel with details.  Go, then, with my best
 gratitude; and when I have written a few lines of leave-taking, I shall
 immediately hasten to keep tryst.  To-night I shall not meet so dangerous
 a cavalier,' he added, with a smiling gallantry.
 
 As soon as Madame von Rosen was gone, he made a great call upon his
 self-command.  He was face to face with a miserable passage where, if it
 were possible, he desired to carry himself with dignity.  As to the main
 fact, he never swerved or faltered; he had come so heart-sick and so
 cruelly humiliated from his talk with Gotthold, that he embraced the
 notion of imprisonment with something bordering on relief.  Here was, at
 least, a step which he thought blameless; here was a way out of his
 troubles.  He sat down to write to Seraphina; and his anger blazed.  The
 tale of his forbearances mounted, in his eyes, to something monstrous;
 still more monstrous, the coldness, egoism, and cruelty that had required
 and thus requited them.  The pen which he had taken shook in his hand.
 He was amazed to find his resignation fled, but it was gone beyond his
 recall.  In a few white-hot words, he bade adieu, dubbing desperation by
 the name of love, and calling his wrath forgiveness; then he cast but one
 look of leave-taking on the place that had been his for so long and was
 now to be his no longer; and hurried forth--love's prisoner--or pride's.
 
 He took that private passage which he had trodden so often in less
 momentous hours.  The porter let him out; and the bountiful, cold air of
 the night and the pure glory of the stars received him on the threshold.
 He looked round him, breathing deep of earth's plain fragrance; he looked
 up into the great array of heaven, and was quieted.  His little turgid
 life dwindled to its true proportions; and he saw himself (that great
 flame-hearted martyr!) stand like a speck under the cool cupola of the
 night.  Thus he felt his careless injuries already soothed; the live air
 of out-of-doors, the quiet of the world, as if by their silent music,
 sobering and dwarfing his emotions.
 
 'Well, I forgive her,' he said.  'If it be of any use to her, I forgive.'
 
 And with brisk steps he crossed the garden, issued upon the Park, and
 came to the Flying Mercury.  A dark figure moved forward from the shadow
 of the pedestal.
 
 'I have to ask your pardon, sir,' a voice observed, 'but if I am right in
 taking you for the Prince, I was given to understand that you would be
 prepared to meet me.'
 
 'Herr Gordon, I believe?' said Otto.
 
 'Herr Oberst Gordon,' replied that officer.  'This is rather a ticklish
 business for a man to be embarked in; and to find that all is to go
 pleasantly is a great relief to me.  The carriage is at hand; shall I
 have the honour of following your Highness?'
 
 'Colonel,' said the Prince, 'I have now come to that happy moment of my
 life when I have orders to receive but none to give.'
 
 'A most philosophical remark,' returned the Colonel.  'Begad, a very
 pertinent remark! it might be Plutarch.  I am not a drop's blood to your
 Highness, or indeed to any one in this principality; or else I should
 dislike my orders.  But as it is, and since there is nothing unnatural or
 unbecoming on my side, and your Highness takes it in good part, I begin
 to believe we may have a capital time together, sir--a capital time.  For
 a gaoler is only a fellow-captive.'
 
 'May I inquire, Herr Gordon,' asked Otto, 'what led you to accept this
 dangerous and I would fain hope thankless office?'
 
 'Very natural, I am sure,' replied the officer of fortune.  'My pay is,
 in the meanwhile, doubled.'
 
 'Well, sir, I will not presume to criticise,' returned the Prince.  'And
 I perceive the carriage.'
 
 Sure enough, at the intersection of two alleys of the Park, a coach and
 four, conspicuous by its lanterns, stood in waiting.  And a little way
 off about a score of lancers were drawn up under the shadow of the trees.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII--PROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE THIRD
 SHE ENLIGHTENS SERAPHINA
 
 
 When Madame von Rosen left the Prince, she hurried straight to Colonel
 Gordon; and not content with directing the arrangements, she had herself
 accompanied the soldier of fortune to the Flying Mercury.  The Colonel
 gave her his arm, and the talk between this pair of conspirators ran high
 and lively.  The Countess, indeed, was in a whirl of pleasure and
 excitement; her tongue stumbled upon laughter, her eyes shone, the colour
 that was usually wanting now perfected her face.  It would have taken
 little more to bring Gordon to her feet--or so, at least, she believed,
 disdaining the idea.
 
 Hidden among some lilac bushes, she enjoyed the great decorum of the
 arrest, and heard the dialogue of the two men die away along the path.
 Soon after, the rolling of a carriage and the beat of hoofs arose in the
 still air of the night, and passed speedily farther and fainter into
 silence.  The Prince was gone.
 
 Madame von Rosen consulted her watch.  She had still, she thought, time
 enough for the tit-bit of her evening; and hurrying to the palace, winged
 by the fear of Gondremark's arrival, she sent her name and a pressing
 request for a reception to the Princess Seraphina.  As the Countess von
 Rosen unqualified, she was sure to be refused; but as an emissary of the
 Baron's, for so she chose to style herself, she gained immediate entry.
 
 The Princess sat alone at table, making a feint of dining.  Her cheeks
 were mottled, her eyes heavy; she had neither slept nor eaten; even her
 dress had been neglected.  In short, she was out of health, out of looks,
 out of heart, and hag-ridden by her conscience.  The Countess drew a
 swift comparison, and shone brighter in beauty.
 
 'You come, madam, _de la part de Monsieur le Baron_,' drawled the
 Princess.  'Be seated!  What have you to say?'
 
 'To say?' repeated Madame von Rosen, 'O, much to say!  Much to say that I
 would rather not, and much to leave unsaid that I would rather say.  For
 I am like St. Paul, your Highness, and always wish to do the things I
 should not.  Well! to be categorical--that is the word?--I took the
 Prince your order.  He could not credit his senses.  "Ah," he cried "dear
 Madame von Rosen, it is not possible--it cannot be I must hear it from
 your lips.  My wife is a poor girl misled, she is only silly, she is not
 cruel."  "_Mon Prince_," said I, "a girl--and therefore cruel; youth
 kills flies."--He had such pain to understand it!'
 
 'Madame von Rosen,' said the Princess, in most steadfast tones, but with
 a rose of anger in her face, 'who sent you here, and for what purpose?
 Tell your errand.'
 
 'O, madam, I believe you understand me very well,' returned von Rosen.
 'I have not your philosophy.  I wear my heart upon my sleeve, excuse the
 indecency!  It is a very little one,' she laughed, 'and I so often change
 the sleeve!'
 
 'Am I to understand the Prince has been arrested?' asked the Princess,
 rising.
 
 'While you sat there dining!' cried the Countess, still nonchalantly
 seated.
 
 'You have discharged your errand,' was the reply; 'I will not detain
 you.'
 
 'O no, madam,' said the Countess, 'with your permission, I have not yet
 done.  I have borne much this evening in your service.  I have suffered.
 I was made to suffer in your service.'  She unfolded her fan as she
 spoke.  Quick as her pulses beat, the fan waved languidly.  She betrayed
 her emotion only by the brightness of her eyes and face, and by the
 almost insolent triumph with which she looked down upon the Princess.
 There were old scores of rivalry between them in more than one field; so
 at least von Rosen felt; and now she was to have her hour of victory in
 them all.
 
 'You are no servant, Madame von Rosen, of mine,' said Seraphina.
 
 'No, madam, indeed,' returned the Countess; 'but we both serve the same
 person, as you know--or if you do not, then I have the pleasure of
 informing you.  Your conduct is so light--so light,' she repeated, the
 fan wavering higher like a butterfly, 'that perhaps you do not truly
 understand.'  The Countess rolled her fan together, laid it in her lap,
 and rose to a less languorous position.  'Indeed,' she continued, 'I
 should be sorry to see any young woman in your situation.  You began with
 every advantage--birth, a suitable marriage--quite pretty too--and see
 what you have come to!  My poor girl, to think of it!  But there is
 nothing that does so much harm,' observed the Countess finely, 'as
 giddiness of mind.'  And she once more unfurled the fan, and approvingly
 fanned herself.
 
 'I will no longer permit you to forget yourself,' cried Seraphina.  'I
 think you are mad.'
 
 'Not mad,' returned von Rosen.  'Sane enough to know you dare not break
 with me to-night, and to profit by the knowledge.  I left my poor, pretty
 Prince Charming crying his eyes out for a wooden doll.  My heart is soft;
 I love my pretty Prince; you will never understand it, but I long to give
 my Prince his doll, dry his poor eyes, and send him off happy.  O, you
 immature fool!' the Countess cried, rising to her feet, and pointing at
 the Princess the closed fan that now began to tremble in her hand.  'O
 wooden doll!' she cried, 'have you a heart, or blood, of any nature?
 This is a man, child--a man who loves you.  O, it will not happen twice!
 it is not common; beautiful and clever women look in vain for it.  And
 you, you pitiful schoolgirl, tread this jewel under foot! you, stupid
 with your vanity!  Before you try to govern kingdoms, you should first be
 able to behave yourself at home; home is the woman's kingdom.'  She
 paused and laughed a little, strangely to hear and look upon.  'I will
 tell you one of the things,' she said, 'that were to stay unspoken.  Von
 Rosen is a better women than you, my Princess, though you will never have
 the pain of understanding it; and when I took the Prince your order, and
 looked upon his face, my soul was melted--O, I am frank--here, within my
 arms, I offered him repose!'  She advanced a step superbly as she spoke,
 with outstretched arms; and Seraphina shrank.  'Do not be alarmed!' the
 Countess cried; 'I am not offering that hermitage to you; in all the
 world there is but one who wants to, and him you have dismissed!  "If it
 will give her pleasure I should wear the martyr's crown," he cried, "I
 will embrace the thorns."  I tell you--I am quite frank--I put the order
 in his power and begged him to resist.  You, who have betrayed your
 husband, may betray me to Gondremark; my Prince would betray no one.
 Understand it plainly,' she cried, ''tis of his pure forbearance that you
 sit there; he had the power--I gave it him--to change the parts; and he
 refused, and went to prison in your place.'
 
 The Princess spoke with some distress.  'Your violence shocks me and
 pains me,' she began, 'but I cannot be angry with what at least does
 honour to the mistaken kindness of your heart: it was right for me to
 know this.  I will condescend to tell you.  It was with deep regret that
 I was driven to this step.  I admire in many ways the Prince--I admit his
 amiability.  It was our great misfortune, it was perhaps somewhat of my
 fault, that we were so unsuited to each other; but I have a regard, a
 sincere regard, for all his qualities.  As a private person I should
 think as you do.  It is difficult, I know, to make allowances for state
 considerations.  I have only with deep reluctance obeyed the call of a
 superior duty; and so soon as I dare do it for the safety of the state, I
 promise you the Prince shall be released.  Many in my situation would
 have resented your freedoms.  I am not'--and she looked for a moment
 rather piteously upon the Countess--'I am not altogether so inhuman as
 you think.'
 
 'And you can put these troubles of the state,' the Countess cried, 'to
 weigh with a man's love?'
 
 'Madame von Rosen, these troubles are affairs of life and death to many;
 to the Prince, and perhaps even to yourself, among the number,' replied
 the Princess, with dignity.  'I have learned, madam, although still so
 young, in a hard school, that my own feelings must everywhere come last.'
 
 'O callow innocence!' exclaimed the other.  'Is it possible you do not
 know, or do not suspect, the intrigue in which you move?  I find it in my
 heart to pity you!  We are both women after all--poor girl, poor
 girl!--and who is born a woman is born a fool.  And though I hate all
 women--come, for the common folly, I forgive you.  Your Highness'--she
 dropped a deep stage curtsey and resumed her fan--'I am going to insult
 you, to betray one who is called my lover, and if it pleases you to use
 the power I now put unreservedly into your hands, to ruin my dear self.
 O what a French comedy!  You betray, I betray, they betray.  It is now my
 cue.  The letter, yes.  Behold the letter, madam, its seal unbroken as I
 found it by my bed this morning; for I was out of humour, and I get many,
 too many, of these favours.  For your own sake, for the sake of my Prince
 Charming, for the sake of this great principality that sits so heavy on
 your conscience, open it and read!'
 
 'Am I to understand,' inquired the Princess, 'that this letter in any way
 regards me?'
 
 'You see I have not opened it,' replied von Rosen; 'but 'tis mine, and I
 beg you to experiment.'
 
 'I cannot look at it till you have,' returned Seraphina, very seriously.
 'There may be matter there not meant for me to see; it is a private
 letter.'
 
 The Countess tore it open, glanced it through, and tossed it back; and
 the Princess, taking up the sheet, recognised the hand of Gondremark, and
 read with a sickening shock the following lines:--
 
     'Dearest Anna, come at once.  Ratafia has done the deed, her husband
     is to be packed to prison.  This puts the minx entirely in my power;
     _le tour est joue_; she will now go steady in harness, or I will know
     the reason why.  Come.
 
                                                                 HEINRICH.'
 
 'Command yourself, madam,' said the Countess, watching with some alarm
 the white face of Seraphina.  'It is in vain for you to fight with
 Gondremark; he has more strings than mere court favour, and could bring
 you down to-morrow with a word.  I would not have betrayed him otherwise;
 but Heinrich is a man, and plays with all of you like marionnettes.  And
 now at least you see for what you sacrificed my Prince.  Madam, will you
 take some wine?  I have been cruel.'
 
 'Not cruel, madam--salutary,' said Seraphina, with a phantom smile.  'No,
 I thank you, I require no attentions.  The first surprise affected me:
 will you give me time a little?  I must think.'
 
 She took her head between her hands, and contemplated for a while the
 hurricane confusion of her thoughts.
 
 'This information reaches me,' she said, 'when I have need of it.  I
 would not do as you have done, but yet I thank you.  I have been much
 deceived in Baron Gondremark.'
 
 'O, madam, leave Gondremark, and think upon the Prince!' cried von Rosen.
 
 'You speak once more as a private person,' said the Princess; 'nor do I
 blame you.  But my own thoughts are more distracted.  However, as I
 believe you are truly a friend to my--to the--as I believe,' she said,
 'you are a friend to Otto, I shall put the order for his release into
 your hands this moment.  Give me the ink-dish.  There!'  And she wrote
 hastily, steadying her arm upon the table, for she trembled like a reed.
 'Remember; madam,' she resumed, handing her the order, 'this must not be
 used nor spoken of at present; till I have seen the Baron, any hurried
 step--I lose myself in thinking.  The suddenness has shaken me.'
 
 'I promise you I will not use it,' said the Countess, 'till you give me
 leave, although I wish the Prince could be informed of it, to comfort his
 poor heart.  And O, I had forgotten, he has left a letter.  Suffer me,
 madam, I will bring it you.  This is the door, I think?'  And she sought
 to open it.
 
 'The bolt is pushed,' said Seraphina, flushing.
 
 'O!  O!' cried the Countess.
 
 A silence fell between them.
 
 'I will get it for myself,' said Seraphina; 'and in the meanwhile I beg
 you to leave me.  I thank you, I am sure, but I shall be obliged if you
 will leave me.'
 
 The Countess deeply curtseyed, and withdrew.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV--RELATES THE CAUSE AND OUTBREAK OF THE REVOLUTION
 
 
 Brave as she was, and brave by intellect, the Princess, when first she
 was alone, clung to the table for support.  The four corners of her
 universe had fallen.  She had never liked nor trusted Gondremark
 completely; she had still held it possible to find him false to
 friendship; but from that to finding him devoid of all those public
 virtues for which she had honoured him, a mere commonplace intriguer,
 using her for his own ends, the step was wide and the descent giddy.
 Light and darkness succeeded each other in her brain; now she believed,
 and now she could not.  She turned, blindly groping for the note.  But
 von Rosen, who had not forgotten to take the warrant from the Prince, had
 remembered to recover her note from the Princess: von Rosen was an old
 campaigner, whose most violent emotion aroused rather than clouded the
 vigour of her reason.
 
 The thought recalled to Seraphina the remembrance of the other
 letter--Otto's.  She rose and went speedily, her brain still wheeling,
 and burst into the Prince's armoury.  The old chamberlain was there in
 waiting; and the sight of another face, prying (or so she felt) on her
 distress, struck Seraphina into childish anger.
 
 'Go!' she cried; and then, when the old man was already half-way to the
 door, 'Stay!' she added.  'As soon as Baron Gondremark arrives, let him
 attend me here.'
 
 'It shall be so directed,' said the chamberlain.
 
 'There was a letter . . . ' she began, and paused.
 
 'Her Highness,' said the chamberlain, 'will, find a letter on the table.
 I had received no orders, or her Highness had been spared this trouble.'
 
 'No, no, no,' she cried.  'I thank you.  I desire to be alone.'
 
 And then, when he was gone, she leaped upon the letter.  Her mind was
 still obscured; like the moon upon a night of clouds and wind, her reason
 shone and was darkened, and she read the words by flashes.
 
     'Seraphina,' the Prince wrote, 'I will write no syllable of reproach.
     I have seen your order, and I go.  What else is left me?  I have
     wasted my love, and have no more.  To say that I forgive you is not
     needful; at least, we are now separate for ever; by your own act, you
     free me from my willing bondage: I go free to prison.  This is the
     last that you will hear of me in love or anger.  I have gone out of
     your life; you may breathe easy; you have now rid yourself of the
     husband who allowed you to desert him, of the Prince who gave you his
     rights, and of the married lover who made it his pride to defend you
     in your absence.  How you have requited him, your own heart more
     loudly tells you than my words.  There is a day coming when your vain
     dreams will roll away like clouds, and you will find yourself alone.
     Then you will remember
 
                                                                     OTTO.'
 
 She read with a great horror on her mind; that day, of which he wrote,
 was come.  She was alone; she had been false, she had been cruel; remorse
 rolled in upon her; and then with a more piercing note, vanity bounded on
 the stage of consciousness.  She a dupe! she helpless! she to have
 betrayed herself in seeking to betray her husband! she to have lived
 these years upon flattery, grossly swallowing the bolus, like a clown
 with sharpers! she--Seraphina!  Her swift mind drank the consequences;
 she foresaw the coming fall, her public shame; she saw the odium,
 disgrace, and folly of her story flaunt through Europe.  She recalled the
 scandal she had so royally braved; and alas! she had now no courage to
 confront it with.  To be thought the mistress of that man: perhaps for
 that. . . . She closed her eyes on agonising vistas.  Swift as thought
 she had snatched a bright dagger from the weapons that shone along the
 wall.  Ay, she would escape.  From that world-wide theatre of nodding
 heads and buzzing whisperers, in which she now beheld herself unpitiably
 martyred, one door stood open.  At any cost, through any stress of
 suffering, that greasy laughter should be stifled.  She closed her eyes,
 breathed a wordless prayer, and pressed the weapon to her bosom.
 
 At the astonishing sharpness of the prick, she gave a cry and awoke to a
 sense of undeserved escape.  A little ruby spot of blood was the reward
 of that great act of desperation; but the pain had braced her like a
 tonic, and her whole design of suicide had passed away.
 
 At the same instant regular feet drew near along the gallery, and she
 knew the tread of the big Baron, so often gladly welcome, and even now
 rallying her spirits like a call to battle.  She concealed the dagger in
 the folds of her skirt; and drawing her stature up, she stood
 firm-footed, radiant with anger, waiting for the foe.
 
 The Baron was announced, and entered.  To him, Seraphina was a hated
 task: like the schoolboy with his Virgil, he had neither will nor leisure
 to remark her beauties; but when he now beheld her standing illuminated
 by her passion, new feelings flashed upon him, a frank admiration, a
 brief sparkle of desire.  He noted both with joy; they were means.  'If I
 have to play the lover,' thought he, for that was his constant
 preoccupation, 'I believe I can put soul into it.'  Meanwhile, with his
 usual ponderous grace, he bent before the lady.
 
 'I propose,' she said in a strange voice, not known to her till then,
 'that we release the Prince and do not prosecute the war.'
 
 'Ah, madam,' he replied, ''tis as I knew it would be!  Your heart, I
 knew, would wound you when we came to this distasteful but most necessary
 step.  Ah, madam, believe me, I am not unworthy to be your ally; I know
 you have qualities to which I am a stranger, and count them the best
 weapons in the armoury of our alliance:--the girl in the queen--pity,
 love, tenderness, laughter; the smile that can reward.  I can only
 command; I am the frowner.  But you!  And you have the fortitude to
 command these comely weaknesses, to tread them down at the call of
 reason.  How often have I not admired it even to yourself!  Ay, even to
 yourself,' he added tenderly, dwelling, it seemed, in memory on hours of
 more private admiration.  'But now, madam--'
 
 'But now, Herr von Gondremark, the time for these declarations has gone
 by,' she cried.  'Are you true to me? are you false?  Look in your heart
 and answer: it is your heart I want to know.'
 
 'It has come,' thought Gondremark.  'You, madam!' he cried, starting
 back--with fear, you would have said, and yet a timid joy.  'You!
 yourself, you bid me look into my heart?'
 
 'Do you suppose I fear?' she cried, and looked at him with such a
 heightened colour, such bright eyes, and a smile of so abstruse a
 meaning, that the Baron discarded his last doubt.
 
 'Ah, madam!' he cried, plumping on his knees.  'Seraphina!  Do you permit
 me? have you divined my secret?  It is true--I put my life with joy into
 your power--I love you, love with ardour, as an equal, as a mistress, as
 a brother-in-arms, as an adored, desired, sweet-hearted woman.  O Bride!'
 he cried, waxing dithyrambic, 'bride of my reason and my senses, have
 pity, have pity on my love!'
 
 She heard him with wonder, rage, and then contempt.  His words offended
 her to sickness; his appearance, as he grovelled bulkily upon the floor,
 moved her to such laughter as we laugh in nightmares.
 
 'O shame!' she cried.  'Absurd and odious!  What would the Countess say?'
 
 That great Baron Gondremark, the excellent politician, remained for some
 little time upon his knees in a frame of mind which perhaps we are
 allowed to pity.  His vanity, within his iron bosom, bled and raved.  If
 he could have blotted all, if he could have withdrawn part, if he had not
 called her bride--with a roaring in his ears, he thus regretfully
 reviewed his declaration.  He got to his feet tottering; and then, in
 that first moment when a dumb agony finds a vent in words, and the tongue
 betrays the inmost and worst of a man, he permitted himself a retort
 which, for six weeks to follow, he was to repent at leisure.
 
 'Ah,' said he, 'the Countess?  Now I perceive the reason of your
 Highness's disorder.'
 
 The lackey-like insolence of the words was driven home by a more insolent
 manner.  There fell upon Seraphina one of those storm-clouds which had
 already blackened upon her reason; she heard herself cry out; and when
 the cloud dispersed, flung the blood-stained dagger on the floor, and saw
 Gondremark reeling back with open mouth and clapping his hand upon the
 wound.  The next moment, with oaths that she had never heard, he leaped
 at her in savage passion; clutched her as she recoiled; and in the very
 act, stumbled and drooped.  She had scarce time to fear his murderous
 onslaught ere he fell before her feet.
 
 He rose upon one elbow; she still staring upon him, white with horror.
 
 'Anna!' he cried, 'Anna!  Help!'
 
 And then his utterance failed him, and he fell back, to all appearance
 dead.
 
 Seraphina ran to and fro in the room; she wrung her hands and cried
 aloud; within she was all one uproar of terror, and conscious of no
 articulate wish but to awake.
 
 There came a knocking at the door; and she sprang to it and held it,
 panting like a beast, and with the strength of madness in her arms, till
 she had pushed the bolt.  At this success a certain calm fell upon her
 reason.  She went back and looked upon her victim, the knocking growing
 louder.  O yes, he was dead.  She had killed him.  He had called upon von
 Rosen with his latest breath; ah! who would call on Seraphina?  She had
 killed him.  She, whose irresolute hand could scarce prick blood from her
 own bosom, had found strength to cast down that great colossus at a blow.
 
 All this while the knocking was growing more uproarious and more unlike
 the staid career of life in such a palace.  Scandal was at the door, with
 what a fatal following she dreaded to conceive; and at the same time
 among the voices that now began to summon her by name, she recognised the
 Chancellor's.  He or another, somebody must be the first.
 
 'Is Herr von Greisengesang without?' she called.
 
 'Your Highness--yes!' the old gentleman answered.  'We have heard cries,
 a fall.  Is anything amiss?'
 
 'Nothing,' replied Seraphina 'I desire to speak with you.  Send off the
 rest.'  She panted between each phrase; but her mind was clear.  She let
 the looped curtain down upon both sides before she drew the bolt; and,
 thus secure from any sudden eyeshot from without, admitted the obsequious
 Chancellor, and again made fast the door.
 
 Greisengesang clumsily revolved among the wings of the curtain, so that
 she was clear of it as soon as he.
 
 'My God!' he cried 'The Baron!'
 
 'I have killed him,' she said.  'O, killed him!'
 
 'Dear me,' said the old gentleman, 'this is most unprecedented.  Lovers'
 quarrels,' he added ruefully, 'redintegratio--' and then paused.  'But,
 my dear madam,' he broke out again, 'in the name of all that is
 practical, what are we to do?  This is exceedingly grave; morally, madam,
 it is appalling.  I take the liberty, your Highness, for one moment, of
 addressing you as a daughter, a loved although respected daughter; and I
 must say that I cannot conceal from you that this is morally most
 questionable.  And, O dear me, we have a dead body!'
 
 She had watched him closely; hope fell to contempt; she drew away her
 skirts from his weakness, and, in the act, her own strength returned to
 her.
 
 'See if he be dead,' she said; not one word of explanation or defence;
 she had scorned to justify herself before so poor a creature: 'See if he
 be dead' was all.
 
 With the greatest compunction, the Chancellor drew near; and as he did so
 the wounded Baron rolled his eyes.
 
 'He lives,' cried the old courtier, turning effusively to Seraphina.
 'Madam, he still lives.'
 
 'Help him, then,' returned the Princess, standing fixed.  'Bind up his
 wound.'
 
 'Madam, I have no means,' protested the Chancellor.
 
 'Can you not take your handkerchief, your neck-cloth, anything?' she
 cried; and at the same moment, from her light muslin gown she rent off a
 flounce and tossed it on the floor.  'Take that,' she said, and for the
 first time directly faced Greisengesang.
 
 But the Chancellor held up his hands and turned away his head in agony.
 The grasp of the falling Baron had torn down the dainty fabric of the
 bodice; and--'O Highness!' cried Greisengesang, appalled, 'the terrible
 disorder of your toilette!'
 
 'Take up that flounce,' she said; 'the man may die.'
 
 Greisengesang turned in a flutter to the Baron, and attempted some
 innocent and bungling measures.  'He still breathes,' he kept saying.
 'All is not yet over; he is not yet gone.'
 
 'And now,' said she 'if that is all you can do, begone and get some
 porters; he must instantly go home.'
 
 'Madam,' cried the Chancellor, 'if this most melancholy sight were seen
 in town--O dear, the State would fall!' he piped.
 
 'There is a litter in the Palace,' she replied.  'It is your part to see
 him safe.  I lay commands upon you.  On your life it stands.'
 
 'I see it, dear Highness,' he jerked.  'Clearly I see it.  But how? what
 men?  The Prince's servants--yes.  They had a personal affection.  They
 will be true, if any.'
 
 'O, not them!' she cried.  'Take Sabra, my own man.'
 
 'Sabra!  The grand-mason?' returned the Chancellor, aghast.  'If he but
 saw this, he would sound the tocsin--we should all be butchered.'
 
 She measured the depth of her abasement steadily.  'Take whom you must,'
 she said, 'and bring the litter here.'
 
 Once she was alone she ran to the Baron, and with a sickening heart
 sought to allay the flux of blood.  The touch of the skin of that great
 charlatan revolted her to the toes; the wound, in her ignorant eyes,
 looked deathly; yet she contended with her shuddering, and, with more
 skill at least than the Chancellor's, staunched the welling injury.  An
 eye unprejudiced with hate would have admired the Baron in his swoon; he
 looked so great and shapely; it was so powerful a machine that lay
 arrested; and his features, cleared for the moment both of temper and
 dissimulation, were seen to be so purely modelled.  But it was not thus
 with Seraphina.  Her victim, as he lay outspread, twitching a little, his
 big chest unbared, fixed her with his ugliness; and her mind flitted for
 a glimpse to Otto.
 
 Rumours began to sound about the Palace of feet running and of voices
 raised; the echoes of the great arched staircase were voluble of some
 confusion; and then the gallery jarred with a quick and heavy tramp.  It
 was the Chancellor, followed by four of Otto's valets and a litter.  The
 servants, when they were admitted, stared at the dishevelled Princess and
 the wounded man; speech was denied them, but their thoughts were riddled
 with profanity.  Gondremark was bundled in; the curtains of the litter
 were lowered; the bearers carried it forth, and the Chancellor followed
 behind with a white face.
 
 Seraphina ran to the window.  Pressing her face upon the pane, she could
 see the terrace, where the lights contended; thence, the avenue of lamps
 that joined the Palace and town; and overhead the hollow night and the
 larger stars.  Presently the small procession issued from the Palace,
 crossed the parade, and began to thread the glittering alley: the
 swinging couch with its four porters, the much-pondering Chancellor
 behind.  She watched them dwindle with strange thoughts: her eyes fixed
 upon the scene, her mind still glancing right and left on the overthrow
 of her life and hopes.  There was no one left in whom she might confide;
 none whose hand was friendly, or on whom she dared to reckon for the
 barest loyalty.  With the fall of Gondremark, her party, her brief
 popularity, had fallen.  So she sat crouched upon the window-seat, her
 brow to the cool pane; her dress in tatters, barely shielding her; her
 mind revolving bitter thoughts.
 
 Meanwhile, consequences were fast mounting; and in the deceptive quiet of
 the night, downfall and red revolt were brewing.  The litter had passed
 forth between the iron gates and entered on the streets of the town.  By
 what flying panic, by what thrill of air communicated, who shall say? but
 the passing bustle in the Palace had already reached and re-echoed in the
 region of the burghers.  Rumour, with her loud whisper, hissed about the
 town; men left their homes without knowing why; knots formed along the
 boulevard; under the rare lamps and the great limes the crowd grew
 blacker.
 
 And now through the midst of that expectant company, the unusual sight of
 a closed litter was observed approaching, and trotting hard behind it
 that great dignitary Cancellarius Greisengesang.  Silence looked on as it
 went by; and as soon as it was passed, the whispering seethed over like a
 boiling pot.  The knots were sundered; and gradually, one following
 another, the whole mob began to form into a procession and escort the
 curtained litter.  Soon spokesmen, a little bolder than their mates,
 began to ply the Chancellor with questions.  Never had he more need of
 that great art of falsehood, by whose exercise he had so richly lived.
 And yet now he stumbled, the master passion, fear, betraying him.  He was
 pressed; he became incoherent; and then from the jolting litter came a
 groan.  In the instant hubbub and the gathering of the crowd as to a
 natural signal, the clear-eyed quavering Chancellor heard the catch of
 the clock before it strikes the hour of doom; and for ten seconds he
 forgot himself.  This shall atone for many sins.  He plucked a bearer by
 the sleeve.  'Bid the Princess flee.  All is lost,' he whispered.  And
 the next moment he was babbling for his life among the multitude.
 
 Five minutes later the wild-eyed servant burst into the armoury.  'All is
 lost!' he cried.  'The Chancellor bids you flee.'  And at the same time,
 looking through the window, Seraphina saw the black rush of the populace
 begin to invade the lamplit avenue.
 
 'Thank you, Georg,' she said.  'I thank you.  Go.'  And as the man still
 lingered, 'I bid you go,' she added.  'Save yourself.'
 
 Down by the private passage, and just some two hours later, Amalia
 Seraphina, the last Princess, followed Otto Johann Friedrich, the last
 Prince of Grunewald.
 
 
 
 
 BOOK III--FORTUNATE MISFORTUNE
 
 
 CHAPTER I--PRINCESS CINDERELLA
 
 
 The porter, drawn by the growing turmoil, had vanished from the postern,
 and the door stood open on the darkness of the night.  As Seraphina fled
 up the terraces, the cries and loud footing of the mob drew nearer the
 doomed palace; the rush was like the rush of cavalry; the sound of
 shattering lamps tingled above the rest; and, overtowering all, she heard
 her own name bandied among the shouters.  A bugle sounded at the door of
 the guard-room; one gun was fired; and then with the yell of hundreds,
 Mittwalden Palace was carried at a rush.
 
 Sped by these dire sounds and voices, the Princess scaled the long
 garden, skimming like a bird the starlit stairways; crossed the Park,
 which was in that place narrow; and plunged upon the farther side into
 the rude shelter of the forest.  So, at a bound, she left the discretion
 and the cheerful lamps of Palace evenings; ceased utterly to be a
 sovereign lady; and, falling from the whole height of civilisation, ran
 forth into the woods, a ragged Cinderella.
 
 She went direct before her through an open tract of the forest, full of
 brush and birches, and where the starlight guided her; and, beyond that
 again, must thread the columned blackness of a pine grove joining
 overhead the thatch of its long branches.  At that hour the place was
 breathless; a horror of night like a presence occupied that dungeon of
 the wood; and she went groping, knocking against the boles--her ear,
 betweenwhiles, strained to aching and yet unrewarded.
 
 But the slope of the ground was upward, and encouraged her; and presently
 she issued on a rocky hill that stood forth above the sea of forest.  All
 around were other hill-tops, big and little; sable vales of forest
 between; overhead the open heaven and the brilliancy of countless stars;
 and along the western sky the dim forms of mountains.  The glory of the
 great night laid hold upon her; her eyes shone with stars; she dipped her
 sight into the coolness and brightness of the sky, as she might have
 dipped her wrist into a spring; and her heart, at that ethereal shock,
 began to move more soberly.  The sun that sails overhead, ploughing into
 gold the fields of daylight azure and uttering the signal to man's
 myriads, has no word apart for man the individual; and the moon, like a
 violin, only praises and laments our private destiny.  The stars alone,
 cheerful whisperers, confer quietly with each of us like friends; they
 give ear to our sorrows smilingly, like wise old men, rich in tolerance;
 and by their double scale, so small to the eye, so vast to the
 imagination, they keep before the mind the double character of man's
 nature and fate.
 
 There sat the Princess, beautifully looking upon beauty, in council with
 these glad advisers.  Bright like pictures, clear like a voice in the
 porches of her ear, memory re-enacted the tumult of the evening: the
 Countess and the dancing fan, the big Baron on his knees, the blood on
 the polished floor, the knocking, the swing of the litter down the avenue
 of lamps, the messenger, the cries of the charging mob; and yet all were
 far away and phantasmal, and she was still healingly conscious of the
 peace and glory of the night.  She looked towards Mittwalden; and above
 the hill-top, which already hid it from her view, a throbbing redness
 hinted of fire.  Better so: better so, that she should fall with tragic
 greatness, lit by a blazing palace!  She felt not a trace of pity for
 Gondremark or of concern for Grunewald: that period of her life was
 closed for ever, a wrench of wounded vanity alone surviving.  She had but
 one clear idea: to flee;--and another, obscure and half-rejected,
 although still obeyed: to flee in the direction of the Felsenburg.  She
 had a duty to perform, she must free Otto--so her mind said, very coldly;
 but her heart embraced the notion of that duty even with ardour, and her
 hands began to yearn for the grasp of kindness.
 
 She rose, with a start of recollection, and plunged down the slope into
 the covert.  The woods received and closed upon her.  Once more, she
 wandered and hasted in a blot, uncheered, unpiloted.  Here and there,
 indeed, through rents in the wood-roof, a glimmer attracted her; here and
 there a tree stood out among its neighbours by some force of outline;
 here and there a brushing among the leaves, a notable blackness, a dim
 shine, relieved, only to exaggerate, the solid oppression of the night
 and silence.  And betweenwhiles, the unfeatured darkness would redouble
 and the whole ear of night appear to be gloating on her steps.  Now she
 would stand still, and the silence, would grow and grow, till it weighed
 upon her breathing; and then she would address herself again to run,
 stumbling, falling, and still hurrying the more.  And presently the whole
 wood rocked and began to run along with her.  The noise of her own mad
 passage through the silence spread and echoed, and filled the night with
 terror.  Panic hunted her: Panic from the trees reached forth with
 clutching branches; the darkness was lit up and peopled with strange
 forms and faces.  She strangled and fled before her fears.  And yet in
 the last fortress, reason, blown upon by these gusts of terror, still
 shone with a troubled light.  She knew, yet could not act upon her
 knowledge; she knew that she must stop, and yet she still ran.
 
 She was already near madness, when she broke suddenly into a narrow
 clearing.  At the same time the din grew louder, and she became conscious
 of vague forms and fields of whiteness.  And with that the earth gave
 way; she fell and found her feet again with an incredible shock to her
 senses, and her mind was swallowed up.
 
 When she came again to herself, she was standing to the mid-leg in an icy
 eddy of a brook, and leaning with one hand on the rock from which it
 poured.  The spray had wet her hair.  She saw the white cascade, the
 stars wavering in the shaken pool, foam flitting, and high overhead the
 tall pines on either hand serenely drinking starshine; and in the sudden
 quiet of her spirit she heard with joy the firm plunge of the cataract in
 the pool.  She scrambled forth dripping.  In the face of her proved
 weakness, to adventure again upon the horror of blackness in the groves
 were a suicide of life or reason.  But here, in the alley of the brook,
 with the kind stars above her, and the moon presently swimming into
 sight, she could await the coming of day without alarm.
 
 This lane of pine-trees ran very rapidly down-hill and wound among the
 woods; but it was a wider thoroughfare than the brook needed, and here
 and there were little dimpling lawns and coves of the forest, where the
 starshine slumbered.  Such a lawn she paced, taking patience bravely; and
 now she looked up the hill and saw the brook coming down to her in a
 series of cascades; and now approached the margin, where it welled among
 the rushes silently; and now gazed at the great company of heaven with an
 enduring wonder.  The early evening had fallen chill, but the night was
 now temperate; out of the recesses of the wood there came mild airs as
 from a deep and peaceful breathing; and the dew was heavy on the grass
 and the tight-shut daisies.  This was the girl's first night under the
 naked heaven; and now that her fears were overpast, she was touched to
 the soul by its serene amenity and peace.  Kindly the host of heaven
 blinked down upon that wandering Princess; and the honest brook had no
 words but to encourage her.
 
 At last she began to be aware of a wonderful revolution, compared to
 which the fire of Mittwalden Palace was but the crack and flash of a
 percussion-cap.  The countenance with which the pines regarded her began
 insensibly to change; the grass too, short as it was, and the whole
 winding staircase of the brook's course, began to wear a solemn freshness
 of appearance.  And this slow transfiguration reached her heart, and
 played upon it, and transpierced it with a serious thrill.  She looked
 all about; the whole face of nature looked back, brimful of meaning,
 finger on lip, leaking its glad secret.  She looked up.  Heaven was
 almost emptied of stars.  Such as still lingered shone with a changed and
 waning brightness, and began to faint in their stations.  And the colour
 of the sky itself was the most wonderful; for the rich blue of the night
 had now melted and softened and brightened; and there had succeeded in
 its place a hue that has no name, and that is never seen but as the
 herald of morning.  'O!' she cried, joy catching at her voice, 'O! it is
 the dawn!'
 
 In a breath she passed over the brook, and looped up her skirts and
 fairly ran in the dim alleys.  As she ran, her ears were aware of many
 pipings, more beautiful than music; in the small dish-shaped houses in
 the fork of giant arms, where they had lain all night, lover by lover,
 warmly pressed, the bright-eyed, big-hearted singers began to awaken for
 the day.  Her heart melted and flowed forth to them in kindness.  And
 they, from their small and high perches in the clerestories of the wood
 cathedral, peered down sidelong at the ragged Princess as she flitted
 below them on the carpet of the moss and tassel.
 
 Soon she had struggled to a certain hill-top, and saw far before her the
 silent inflooding of the day.  Out of the East it welled and whitened;
 the darkness trembled into light; and the stars were extinguished like
 the street-lamps of a human city.  The whiteness brightened into silver,
 the silver warmed into gold, the gold kindled into pure and living fire;
 and the face of the East was barred with elemental scarlet.  The day drew
 its first long breath, steady and chill; and for leagues around the woods
 sighed and shivered.  And then, at one bound, the sun had floated up; and
 her startled eyes received day's first arrow, and quailed under the
 buffet.  On every side, the shadows leaped from their ambush and fell
 prone.  The day was come, plain and garish; and up the steep and solitary
 eastern heaven, the sun, victorious over his competitors, continued
 slowly and royally to mount.
 
 Seraphina drooped for a little, leaning on a pine, the shrill joy of the
 woodlands mocking her.  The shelter of the night, the thrilling and
 joyous changes of the dawn, were over; and now, in the hot eye of the
 day, she turned uneasily and looked sighingly about her.  Some way off
 among the lower woods, a pillar of smoke was mounting and melting in the
 gold and blue.  There, surely enough, were human folk, the
 hearth-surrounders.  Man's fingers had laid the twigs; it was man's
 breath that had quickened and encouraged the baby flames; and now, as the
 fire caught, it would be playing ruddily on the face of its creator.  At
 the thought, she felt a-cold and little and lost in that great
 out-of-doors.  The electric shock of the young sun-beams and the unhuman
 beauty of the woods began to irk and daunt her.  The covert of the house,
 the decent privacy of rooms, the swept and regulated fire, all that
 denotes or beautifies the home life of man, began to draw her as with
 cords.  The pillar of smoke was now risen into some stream of moving air;
 it began to lean out sideways in a pennon; and thereupon, as though the
 change had been a summons, Seraphina plunged once more into the labyrinth
 of the wood.
 
 She left day upon the high ground.  In the lower groves there still
 lingered the blue early twilight and the seizing freshness of the dew.
 But here and there, above this field of shadow, the head of a great
 outspread pine was already glorious with day; and here and there, through
 the breaches of the hills, the sun-beams made a great and luminous entry.
 Here Seraphina hastened along forest paths.  She had lost sight of the
 pilot smoke, which blew another way, and conducted herself in that great
 wilderness by the direction of the sun.  But presently fresh signs
 bespoke the neighbourhood of man; felled trunks, white slivers from the
 axe, bundles of green boughs, and stacks of firewood.  These guided her
 forward; until she came forth at last upon the clearing whence the smoke
 arose.  A hut stood in the clear shadow, hard by a brook which made a
 series of inconsiderable falls; and on the threshold the Princess saw a
 sun-burnt and hard-featured woodman, standing with his hands behind his
 back and gazing skyward.
 
 She went to him directly: a beautiful, bright-eyed, and haggard vision;
 splendidly arrayed and pitifully tattered; the diamond ear-drops still
 glittering in her ears; and with the movement of her coming, one small
 breast showing and hiding among the ragged covert of the laces.  At that
 ambiguous hour, and coming as she did from the great silence of the
 forest, the man drew back from the Princess as from something elfin.
 
 'I am cold,' she said, 'and weary.  Let me rest beside your fire.'
 
 The woodman was visibly commoved, but answered nothing.
 
 'I will pay,' she said, and then repented of the words, catching perhaps
 a spark of terror from his frightened eyes.  But, as usual, her courage
 rekindled brighter for the check.  She put him from the door and entered;
 and he followed her in superstitious wonder.
 
 Within, the hut was rough and dark; but on the stone that served as
 hearth, twigs and a few dry branches burned with the brisk sounds and all
 the variable beauty of fire.  The very sight of it composed her; she
 crouched hard by on the earth floor and shivered in the glow, and looked
 upon the eating blaze with admiration.  The woodman was still staring at
 his guest: at the wreck of the rich dress, the bare arms, the bedraggled
 laces and the gems.  He found no word to utter.
 
 'Give me food,' said she,--'here, by the fire.'
 
 He set down a pitcher of coarse wine, bread, a piece of cheese, and a
 handful of raw onions.  The bread was hard and sour, the cheese like
 leather; even the onion, which ranks with the truffle and the nectarine
 in the chief place of honour of earth's fruits, is not perhaps a dish for
 princesses when raw.  But she ate, if not with appetite, with courage;
 and when she had eaten, did not disdain the pitcher.  In all her life
 before, she had not tasted of gross food nor drunk after another; but a
 brave woman far more readily accepts a change of circumstances than the
 bravest man.  All that while, the woodman continued to observe her
 furtively, many low thoughts of fear and greed contending in his eyes.
 She read them clearly, and she knew she must begone.
 
 Presently she arose and offered him a florin.
 
 'Will that repay you?' she asked.
 
 But here the man found his tongue.  'I must have more than that,' said
 he.
 
 'It is all I have to give you,' she returned, and passed him by serenely.
 
 Yet her heart trembled, for she saw his hand stretched forth as if to
 arrest her, and his unsteady eyes wandering to his axe.  A beaten path
 led westward from the clearing, and she swiftly followed it.  She did not
 glance behind her.  But as soon as the least turning of the path had
 concealed her from the woodman's eyes, she slipped among the trees and
 ran till she deemed herself in safety.
 
 By this time the strong sunshine pierced in a thousand places the
 pine-thatch of the forest, fired the red boles, irradiated the cool
 aisles of shadow, and burned in jewels on the grass.  The gum of these
 trees was dearer to the senses than the gums of Araby; each pine, in the
 lusty morning sunlight, burned its own wood-incense; and now and then a
 breeze would rise and toss these rooted censers, and send shade and
 sun-gem flitting, swift as swallows, thick as bees; and wake a brushing
 bustle of sounds that murmured and went by.
 
 On she passed, and up and down, in sun and shadow; now aloft on the bare
 ridge among the rocks and birches, with the lizards and the snakes; and
 anon in the deep grove among sunless pillars.  Now she followed wandering
 wood-paths, in the maze of valleys; and again, from a hill-top, beheld
 the distant mountains and the great birds circling under the sky.  She
 would see afar off a nestling hamlet, and go round to avoid it.  Below,
 she traced the course of the foam of mountain torrents.  Nearer hand, she
 saw where the tender springs welled up in silence, or oozed in green
 moss; or in the more favoured hollows a whole family of infant rivers
 would combine, and tinkle in the stones, and lie in pools to be a
 bathing-place for sparrows, or fall from the sheer rock in rods of
 crystal.  Upon all these things, as she still sped along in the bright
 air, she looked with a rapture of surprise and a joyful fainting of the
 heart; they seemed so novel, they touched so strangely home, they were so
 hued and scented, they were so beset and canopied by the dome of the blue
 air of heaven.
 
 At length, when she was well weary, she came upon a wide and shallow
 pool.  Stones stood in it, like islands; bulrushes fringed the coast; the
 floor was paved with the pine needles; and the pines themselves, whose
 roots made promontories, looked down silently on their green images.  She
 crept to the margin and beheld herself with wonder, a hollow and
 bright-eyed phantom, in the ruins of her palace robe.  The breeze now
 shook her image; now it would be marred with flies; and at that she
 smiled; and from the fading circles, her counterpart smiled back to her
 and looked kind.  She sat long in the warm sun, and pitied her bare arms
 that were all bruised and marred with falling, and marvelled to see that
 she was dirty, and could not grow to believe that she had gone so long in
 such a strange disorder.
 
 Then, with a sigh, she addressed herself to make a toilette by that
 forest mirror, washed herself pure from all the stains of her adventure,
 took off her jewels and wrapped them in her handkerchief, re-arranged the
 tatters of her dress, and took down the folds of her hair.  She shook it
 round her face, and the pool repeated her thus veiled.  Her hair had
 smelt like violets, she remembered Otto saying; and so now she tried to
 smell it, and then shook her head, and laughed a little, sadly, to
 herself.
 
 The laugh was returned upon her in a childish echo.
 
 She looked up; and lo! two children looking on,--a small girl and a yet
 smaller boy, standing, like playthings, by the pool, below a spreading
 pine.  Seraphina was not fond of children, and now she was startled to
 the heart.
 
 'Who are you?' she cried hoarsely.
 
 The mites huddled together and drew back; and Seraphina's heart
 reproached her that she should have frightened things so quaint and
 little, and yet alive with senses.  She thought upon the birds and looked
 again at her two visitors; so little larger and so far more innocent.  On
 their clear faces, as in a pool, she saw the reflection of their fears.
 With gracious purpose she arose.
 
 'Come,' she said, 'do not be afraid of me,' and took a step towards them.
 
 But alas! at the first moment, the two poor babes in the wood turned and
 ran helter-skelter from the Princess.
 
 The most desolate pang was struck into the girl's heart.  Here she was,
 twenty-two--soon twenty-three--and not a creature loved her; none but
 Otto; and would even he forgive?  If she began weeping in these woods
 alone, it would mean death or madness.  Hastily she trod the thoughts out
 like a burning paper; hastily rolled up her locks, and with terror
 dogging her, and her whole bosom sick with grief, resumed her journey.
 
 Past ten in the forenoon, she struck a high-road, marching in that place
 uphill between two stately groves, a river of sunlight; and here, dead
 weary, careless of consequences, and taking some courage from the human
 and civilised neighbourhood of the road, she stretched herself on the
 green margin in the shadow of a tree.  Sleep closed on her, at first with
 a horror of fainting, but when she ceased to struggle, kindly embracing
 her.  So she was taken home for a little, from all her toils and sorrows,
 to her Father's arms.  And there in the meanwhile her body lay exposed by
 the highwayside, in tattered finery; and on either hand from the woods
 the birds came flying by and calling upon others, and debated in their
 own tongue this strange appearance.
 
 The sun pursued his journey; the shadow flitted from her feet, shrank
 higher and higher, and was upon the point of leaving her altogether, when
 the rumble of a coach was signalled to and fro by the birds.  The road in
 that part was very steep; the rumble drew near with great deliberation;
 and ten minutes passed before a gentleman appeared, walking with a sober
 elderly gait upon the grassy margin of the highway, and looking
 pleasantly around him as he walked.  From time to time he paused, took
 out his note-book and made an entry with a pencil; and any spy who had
 been near enough would have heard him mumbling words as though he were a
 poet testing verses.  The voice of the wheels was still faint, and it was
 plain the traveller had far outstripped his carriage.
 
 He had drawn very near to where the Princess lay asleep, before his eye
 alighted on her; but when it did he started, pocketed his note-book, and
 approached.  There was a milestone close to where she lay; and he sat
 down on that and coolly studied her.  She lay upon one side, all curled
 and sunken, her brow on one bare arm, the other stretched out, limp and
 dimpled.  Her young body, like a thing thrown down, had scarce a mark of
 life.  Her breathing stirred her not.  The deadliest fatigue was thus
 confessed in every language of the sleeping flesh.  The traveller smiled
 grimly.  As though he had looked upon a statue, he made a grudging
 inventory of her charms: the figure in that touching freedom of
 forgetfulness surprised him; the flush of slumber became her like a
 flower.
 
 'Upon my word,' he thought, 'I did not think the girl could be so pretty.
 And to think,' he added, 'that I am under obligation not to use one word
 of this!'  He put forth his stick and touched her; and at that she awoke,
 sat up with a cry, and looked upon him wildly.
 
 'I trust your Highness has slept well,' he said, nodding.
 
 But she only uttered sounds.
 
 'Compose yourself,' said he, giving her certainly a brave example in his
 own demeanour.  'My chaise is close at hand; and I shall have, I trust,
 the singular entertainment of abducting a sovereign Princess.'
 
 'Sir John!' she said, at last.
 
 'At your Highness's disposal,' he replied.
 
 She sprang to her feet.  'O!' she cried, 'have you come from Mittwalden?'
 
 'This morning,' he returned, 'I left it; and if there is any one less
 likely to return to it than yourself, behold him!'
 
 'The Baron--' she began, and paused.
 
 'Madam,' he answered, 'it was well meant, and you are quite a Judith; but
 after the hours that have elapsed, you will probably be relieved to hear
 that he is fairly well.  I took his news this morning ere I left.  Doing
 fairly well, they said, but suffering acutely.  Hey?--acutely.  They
 could hear his groans in the next room.'
 
 'And the Prince,' she asked, 'is anything known of him?'
 
 'It is reported,' replied Sir John, with the same pleasurable
 deliberation, 'that upon that point your Highness is the best authority.'
 
 'Sir John,' she said eagerly, 'you were generous enough to speak about
 your carriage.  Will you, I beseech you, will you take me to the
 Felsenburg?  I have business there of an extreme importance.'
 
 'I can refuse you nothing,' replied the old gentleman, gravely and
 seriously enough.  'Whatever, madam, it is in my power to do for you,
 that shall be done with pleasure.  As soon as my chaise shall overtake
 us, it is yours to carry you where you will.  But,' added he, reverting
 to his former manner, 'I observe you ask me nothing of the Palace.'
 
 'I do not care,' she said.  'I thought I saw it burning.'
 
 'Prodigious!' said the Baronet.  'You thought?  And can the loss of forty
 toilettes leave you cold?  Well, madam, I admire your fortitude.  And the
 state, too?  As I left, the government was sitting,--the new government,
 of which at least two members must be known to you by name: Sabra, who
 had, I believe, the benefit of being formed in your employment--a
 footman, am I right?--and our old friend the Chancellor, in something of
 a subaltern position.  But in these convulsions the last shall be first,
 and the first last.'
 
 'Sir John,' she said, with an air of perfect honesty, 'I am sure you mean
 most kindly, but these matters have no interest for me.'
 
 The Baronet was so utterly discountenanced that he hailed the appearance
 of his chaise with welcome, and, by way of saying something, proposed
 that they should walk back to meet it.  So it was done; and he helped her
 in with courtesy, mounted to her side, and from various receptacles (for
 the chaise was most completely fitted out) produced fruits and truffled
 liver, beautiful white bread, and a bottle of delicate wine.  With these
 he served her like a father, coaxing and praising her to fresh exertions;
 and during all that time, as though silenced by the laws of hospitality,
 he was not guilty of the shadow of a sneer.  Indeed his kindness seemed
 so genuine that Seraphina was moved to gratitude.
 
 'Sir John,' she said, 'you hate me in your heart; why are you so kind to
 me?'
 
 'Ah, my good lady,' said he, with no disclaimer of the accusation, 'I
 have the honour to be much your husband's friend, and somewhat his
 admirer.'
 
 'You!' she cried.  'They told me you wrote cruelly of both of us.'
 
 'Such was the strange path by which we grew acquainted,' said Sir John.
 'I had written, madam, with particular cruelty (since that shall be the
 phrase) of your fair self.  Your husband set me at liberty, gave me a
 passport, ordered a carriage, and then, with the most boyish spirit,
 challenged me to fight.  Knowing the nature of his married life, I
 thought the dash and loyalty he showed delightful.  "Do not be afraid,"
 says he; "if I am killed, there is nobody to miss me."  It appears you
 subsequently thought of that yourself.  But I digress.  I explained to
 him it was impossible that I could fight!  "Not if I strike you?" says
 he.  Very droll; I wish I could have put it in my book.  However, I was
 conquered, took the young gentleman to my high favour, and tore up my
 bits of scandal on the spot.  That is one of the little favours, madam,
 that you owe your husband.'
 
 Seraphina sat for some while in silence.  She could bear to be misjudged
 without a pang by those whom she contemned; she had none of Otto's
 eagerness to be approved, but went her own way straight and head in air.
 To Sir John, however, after what he had said, and as her husband's
 friend, she was prepared to stoop.
 
 'What do you think of me?' she asked abruptly.
 
 'I have told you already,' said Sir John: 'I think you want another glass
 of my good wine.'
 
 'Come,' she said, 'this is unlike you.  You are not wont to be afraid.
 You say that you admire my husband: in his name, be honest.'
 
 'I admire your courage,' said the Baronet.  'Beyond that, as you have
 guessed, and indeed said, our natures are not sympathetic.'
 
 'You spoke of scandal,' pursued Seraphina.  'Was the scandal great?'
 
 'It was considerable,' said Sir John.
 
 'And you believed it?' she demanded.
 
 'O, madam,' said Sir John, 'the question!'
 
 'Thank you for that answer!' cried Seraphina.  'And now here, I will tell
 you, upon my honour, upon my soul, in spite of all the scandal in this
 world, I am as true a wife as ever stood.'
 
 'We should probably not agree upon a definition,' observed Sir John.
 
 'O!' she cried, 'I have abominably used him--I know that; it is not that
 I mean.  But if you admire my husband, I insist that you shall understand
 me: I can look him in the face without a blush.'
 
 'It may be, madam,' said Sir John; 'nor have I presumed to think the
 contrary.'
 
 'You will not believe me?' she cried.  'You think I am a guilty wife?
 You think he was my lover?'
 
 'Madam,' returned the Baronet, 'when I tore up my papers, I promised your
 good husband to concern myself no more with your affairs; and I assure
 you for the last time that I have no desire to judge you.'
 
 'But you will not acquit me!  Ah!' she cried, '_he_ will--he knows me
 better!'
 
 Sir John smiled.
 
 'You smile at my distress?' asked Seraphina.
 
 'At your woman's coolness,' said Sir John.  'A man would scarce have had
 the courage of that cry, which was, for all that, very natural, and I
 make no doubt quite true.  But remark, madam--since you do me the honour
 to consult me gravely--I have no pity for what you call your distresses.
 You have been completely selfish, and now reap the consequence.  Had you
 once thought of your husband, instead of singly thinking of yourself, you
 would not now have been alone, a fugitive, with blood upon your hands,
 and hearing from a morose old Englishman truth more bitter than scandal.'
 
 'I thank you,' she said, quivering.  'This is very true.  Will you stop
 the carriage?'
 
 'No, child,' said Sir John, 'not until I see you mistress of yourself.'
 
 There was a long pause, during which the carriage rolled by rock and
 woodland.
 
 'And now,' she resumed, with perfect steadiness, 'will you consider me
 composed?  I request you, as a gentleman, to let me out.'
 
 'I think you do unwisely,' he replied.  'Continue, if you please, to use
 my carriage.'
 
 'Sir John,' she said, 'if death were sitting on that pile of stones, I
 would alight!  I do not blame, I thank you; I now know how I appear to
 others; but sooner than draw breath beside a man who can so think of me,
 I would--O!' she cried, and was silent.
 
 Sir John pulled the string, alighted, and offered her his hand; but she
 refused the help.
 
 The road had now issued from the valleys in which it had been winding,
 and come to that part of its course where it runs, like a cornice, along
 the brow of the steep northward face of Grunewald.  The place where they
 had alighted was at a salient angle; a bold rock and some wind-tortured
 pine-trees overhung it from above; far below the blue plains lay forth
 and melted into heaven; and before them the road, by a succession of bold
 zigzags, was seen mounting to where a tower upon a tall cliff closed the
 view.
 
 'There,' said the Baronet, pointing to the tower, 'you see the
 Felsenburg, your goal.  I wish you a good journey, and regret I cannot be
 of more assistance.'
 
 He mounted to his place and gave a signal, and the carriage rolled away.
 
 Seraphina stood by the wayside, gazing before her with blind eyes.  Sir
 John she had dismissed already from her mind: she hated him, that was
 enough; for whatever Seraphina hated or contemned fell instantly to
 Lilliputian smallness, and was thenceforward steadily ignored in thought.
 And now she had matter for concern indeed.  Her interview with Otto,
 which she had never yet forgiven him, began to appear before her in a
 very different light.  He had come to her, still thrilling under recent
 insult, and not yet breathed from fighting her own cause; and how that
 knowledge changed the value of his words!  Yes, he must have loved her!
 this was a brave feeling--it was no mere weakness of the will.  And she,
 was she incapable of love?  It would appear so; and she swallowed her
 tears, and yearned to see Otto, to explain all, to ask pity upon her
 knees for her transgressions, and, if all else were now beyond the reach
 of reparation, to restore at least the liberty of which she had deprived
 him.
 
 Swiftly she sped along the highway, and, as the road wound out and in
 about the bluffs and gullies of the mountain, saw and lost by glimpses
 the tall tower that stood before and above her, purpled by the mountain
 air.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--TREATS OF A CHRISTIAN VIRTUE
 
 
 When Otto mounted to his rolling prison he found another occupant in a
 corner of the front seat; but as this person hung his head and the
 brightness of the carriage lamps shone outward, the Prince could only see
 it was a man.  The Colonel followed his prisoner and clapped-to the door;
 and at that the four horses broke immediately into a swinging trot.
 
 'Gentlemen,' said the Colonel, after some little while had passed, 'if we
 are to travel in silence, we might as well be at home.  I appear, of
 course, in an invidious character; but I am a man of taste, fond of books
 and solidly informing talk, and unfortunately condemned for life to the
 guard-room.  Gentlemen, this is my chance: don't spoil it for me.  I have
 here the pick of the whole court, barring lovely woman; I have a great
 author in the person of the Doctor--'
 
 'Gotthold!' cried Otto.
 
 'It appears,' said the Doctor bitterly, 'that we must go together.  Your
 Highness had not calculated upon that.'
 
 'What do you infer?' cried Otto; 'that I had you arrested?'
 
 'The inference is simple,' said the Doctor.
 
 'Colonel Gordon,' said the Prince, 'oblige me so far, and set me right
 with Herr von Hohenstockwitz.'
 
 'Gentlemen,' said the Colonel, 'you are both arrested on the same warrant
 in the name of the Princess Seraphina, acting regent, countersigned by
 Prime Minister Freiherr von Gondremark, and dated the day before
 yesterday, the twelfth.  I reveal to you the secrets of the
 prison-house,' he added.
 
 'Otto,' said Gotthold, 'I ask you to pardon my suspicions.'
 
 'Gotthold,' said the Prince, 'I am not certain I can grant you that.'
 
 'Your Highness is, I am sure, far too magnanimous to hesitate,' said the
 Colonel.  'But allow me: we speak at home in my religion of the means of
 grace: and I now propose to offer them.'  So saying, the Colonel lighted
 a bright lamp which he attached to one side of the carriage, and from
 below the front seat produced a goodly basket adorned with the long necks
 of bottles.  '_Tu spem reducis_--how does it go, Doctor?' he asked gaily.
 'I am, in a sense, your host; and I am sure you are both far too
 considerate of my embarrassing position to refuse to do me honour.
 Gentlemen, I drink to the Prince!'
 
 'Colonel,' said Otto, 'we have a jovial entertainer.  I drink to Colonel
 Gordon.'
 
 Thereupon all three took their wine very pleasantly; and even as they did
 so, the carriage with a lurch turned into the high-road and began to make
 better speed.
 
 All was bright within; the wine had coloured Gotthold's cheek; dim forms
 of forest trees, dwindling and spiring, scarves of the starry sky, now
 wide and now narrow, raced past the windows, through one that was left
 open the air of the woods came in with a nocturnal raciness; and the roll
 of wheels and the tune of the trotting horses sounded merrily on the ear.
 Toast followed toast; glass after glass was bowed across and emptied by
 the trio; and presently there began to fall upon them a luxurious spell,
 under the influence of which little but the sound of quiet and
 confidential laughter interrupted the long intervals of meditative
 silence.
 
 'Otto,' said Gotthold, after one of these seasons of quiet, 'I do not ask
 you to forgive me.  Were the parts reversed, I could not forgive you.'
 
 'Well,' said Otto, 'it is a phrase we use.  I do forgive you, but your
 words and your suspicions rankle; and not yours alone.  It is idle,
 Colonel Gordon, in view of the order you are carrying out, to conceal
 from you the dissensions of my family; they have gone so far that they
 are now public property.  Well, gentlemen, can I forgive my wife?  I can,
 of course, and do; but in what sense?  I would certainly not stoop to any
 revenge; as certainly I could not think of her but as one changed beyond
 my recognition.'
 
 'Allow me,' returned the Colonel.  'You will permit me to hope that I am
 addressing Christians?  We are all conscious, I trust, that we are
 miserable sinners.'
 
 'I disown the consciousness,' said Gotthold.  'Warmed with this good
 fluid, I deny your thesis.'
 
 'How, sir?  You never did anything wrong? and I heard you asking pardon
 but this moment, not of your God, sir, but of a common fellow-worm!' the
 Colonel cried.
 
 'I own you have me; you are expert in argument, Herr Oberst,' said the
 Doctor.
 
 'Begad, sir, I am proud to hear you say so,' said the Colonel.  'I was
 well grounded indeed at Aberdeen.  And as for this matter of forgiveness,
 it comes, sir, of loose views and (what is if anything more dangerous) a
 regular life.  A sound creed and a bad morality, that's the root of
 wisdom.  You two gentlemen are too good to be forgiving.'
 
 'The paradox is somewhat forced,' said Gotthold.
 
 'Pardon me, Colonel,' said the Prince; 'I readily acquit you of any
 design of offence, but your words bite like satire.  Is this a time, do
 you think, when I can wish to hear myself called good, now that I am
 paying the penalty (and am willing like yourself to think it just) of my
 prolonged misconduct?'
 
 'O, pardon me!' cried the Colonel.  'You have never been expelled from
 the divinity hall; you have never been broke.  I was: broke for a neglect
 of military duty.  To tell you the open truth, your Highness, I was the
 worse of drink; it's a thing I never do now,' he added, taking out his
 glass.  'But a man, you see, who has really tasted the defects of his own
 character, as I have, and has come to regard himself as a kind of blind
 teetotum knocking about life, begins to learn a very different view about
 forgiveness.  I will talk of not forgiving others, sir, when I have made
 out to forgive myself, and not before; and the date is like to be a long
 one.  My father, the Reverend Alexander Gordon, was a good man, and
 damned hard upon others.  I am what they call a bad one, and that is just
 the difference.  The man who cannot forgive any mortal thing is a green
 hand in life.'
 
 'And yet I have heard of you, Colonel, as a duellist,' said Gotthold.
 
 'A different thing, sir,' replied the soldier.  'Professional etiquette.
 And I trust without unchristian feeling.'
 
 Presently after the Colonel fell into a deep sleep and his companions
 looked upon each other, smiling.
 
 'An odd fish,' said Gotthold.
 
 'And a strange guardian,' said the Prince.  'Yet what he said was true.'
 
 'Rightly looked upon,' mused Gotthold, 'it is ourselves that we cannot
 forgive, when we refuse forgiveness to our friend.  Some strand of our
 own misdoing is involved in every quarrel.'
 
 'Are there not offences that disgrace the pardoner?' asked Otto.  'Are
 there not bounds of self-respect?'
 
 'Otto,' said Gotthold, 'does any man respect himself?  To this poor waif
 of a soldier of fortune we may seem respectable gentlemen; but to
 ourselves, what are we unless a pasteboard portico and a deliquium of
 deadly weaknesses within?'
 
 'I? yes,' said Otto; 'but you, Gotthold--you, with your interminable
 industry, your keen mind, your books--serving mankind, scorning pleasures
 and temptations!  You do not know how I envy you.'
 
 'Otto,' said the Doctor, 'in one word, and a bitter one to say: I am a
 secret tippler.  Yes, I drink too much.  The habit has robbed these very
 books, to which you praise my devotion, of the merits that they should
 have had.  It has spoiled my temper.  When I spoke to you the other day,
 how much of my warmth was in the cause of virtue? how much was the fever
 of last night's wine?  Ay, as my poor fellow-sot there said, and as I
 vaingloriously denied, we are all miserable sinners, put here for a
 moment, knowing the good, choosing the evil, standing naked and ashamed
 in the eye of God.'
 
 'Is it so?' said Otto.  'Why, then, what are we?  Are the very best--'
 
 'There is no best in man,' said Gotthold.  'I am not better, it is likely
 I am not worse, than you or that poor sleeper.  I was a sham, and now you
 know me: that is all.'
 
 'And yet it has not changed my love,' returned Otto softly.  'Our
 misdeeds do not change us.  Gotthold, fill your glass.  Let us drink to
 what is good in this bad business; let us drink to our old affection;
 and, when we have done so, forgive your too just grounds of offence, and
 drink with me to my wife, whom I have so misused, who has so misused me,
 and whom I have left, I fear, I greatly fear, in danger.  What matters it
 how bad we are, if others can still love us, and we can still love
 others?'
 
 'Ay!' replied the Doctor.  'It is very well said.  It is the true answer
 to the pessimist, and the standing miracle of mankind.  So you still love
 me? and so you can forgive your wife?  Why, then, we may bid conscience
 "Down, dog," like an ill-trained puppy yapping at shadows.'
 
 The pair fell into silence, the Doctor tapping on his empty glass.
 
 The carriage swung forth out of the valleys on that open balcony of
 high-road that runs along the front of Grunewald, looking down on
 Gerolstein.  Far below, a white waterfall was shining to the stars from
 the falling skirts of forest, and beyond that, the night stood naked
 above the plain.  On the other hand, the lamp-light skimmed the face of
 the precipices, and the dwarf pine-trees twinkled with all their needles,
 and were gone again into the wake.  The granite roadway thundered under
 wheels and hoofs; and at times, by reason of its continual winding, Otto
 could see the escort on the other side of a ravine, riding well together
 in the night.  Presently the Felsenburg came plainly in view, some way
 above them, on a bold projection of the mountain, and planting its bulk
 against the starry sky.
 
 'See, Gotthold,' said the Prince, 'our destination.'
 
 Gotthold awoke as from a trance.
 
 'I was thinking,' said he, 'if there is any danger, why did you not
 resist?  I was told you came of your free will; but should you not be
 there to help her?'
 
 The colour faded from the Prince's cheeks.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--PROVIDENCE VON ROSEN: ACT THE LAST
 IN WHICH SHE GALLOPS OFF
 
 
 When the busy Countess came forth from her interview with Seraphina, it
 is not too much to say that she was beginning to be terribly afraid.  She
 paused in the corridor and reckoned up her doings with an eye to
 Gondremark.  The fan was in requisition in an instant; but her disquiet
 was beyond the reach of fanning.  'The girl has lost her head,' she
 thought; and then dismally, 'I have gone too far.'  She instantly decided
 on secession.  Now the _Mons Sacer_ of the Frau von Rosen was a certain
 rustic villa in the forest, called by herself, in a smart attack of
 poesy, Tannen Zauber, and by everybody else plain Kleinbrunn.
 
 Thither, upon the thought, she furiously drove, passing Gondremark at the
 entrance to the Palace avenue, but feigning not to observe him; and as
 Kleinbrunn was seven good miles away, and in the bottom of a narrow dell,
 she passed the night without any rumour of the outbreak reaching her; and
 the glow of the conflagration was concealed by intervening hills.  Frau
 von Rosen did not sleep well; she was seriously uneasy as to the results
 of her delightful evening, and saw herself condemned to quite a lengthy
 sojourn in her deserts and a long defensive correspondence, ere she could
 venture to return to Gondremark.  On the other hand, she examined, by way
 of pastime, the deeds she had received from Otto; and even here saw cause
 for disappointment.  In these troublous days she had no taste for landed
 property, and she was convinced, besides, that Otto had paid dearer than
 the farm was worth.  Lastly, the order for the Prince's release fairly
 burned her meddling fingers.
 
 All things considered, the next day beheld an elegant and beautiful lady,
 in a riding-habit and a flapping hat, draw bridle at the gate of the
 Felsenburg, not perhaps with any clear idea of her purpose, but with her
 usual experimental views on life.  Governor Gordon, summoned to the gate,
 welcomed the omnipotent Countess with his most gallant bearing, though it
 was wonderful how old he looked in the morning.
 
 'Ah, Governor,' she said, 'we have surprises for you, sir,' and nodded at
 him meaningly.
 
 'Eh, madam, leave me my prisoners,' he said; 'and if you will but join
 the band, begad, I'll be happy for life.'
 
 'You would spoil me, would you not?' she asked.
 
 'I would try, I would try,' returned the Governor, and he offered her his
 arm.
 
 She took it, picked up her skirt, and drew him close to her.  'I have
 come to see the Prince,' she said.  'Now, infidel! on business.  A
 message from that stupid Gondremark, who keeps me running like a courier.
 Do I look like one, Herr Gordon?' And she planted her eyes in him.
 
 'You look like an angel, ma'am,' returned the Governor, with a great air
 of finished gallantry.
 
 The Countess laughed.  'An angel on horseback!' she said.  'Quick work.'
 
 'You came, you saw, you conquered,' flourished Gordon, in high good
 humour with his own wit and grace.  'We toasted you, madam, in the
 carriage, in an excellent good glass of wine; toasted you fathom deep;
 the finest woman, with, begad, the finest eyes in Grunewald.  I never saw
 the like of them but once, in my own country, when I was a young fool at
 College: Thomasina Haig her name was.  I give you my word of honour, she
 was as like you as two peas.'
 
 'And so you were merry in the carriage?' asked the Countess, gracefully
 dissembling a yawn.
 
 'We were; we had a very pleasant conversation; but we took perhaps a
 glass more than that fine fellow of a Prince has been accustomed to,'
 said the Governor; 'and I observe this morning that he seems a little off
 his mettle.  We'll get him mellow again ere bedtime.  This is his door.'
 
 'Well,' she whispered, 'let me get my breath.  No, no; wait.  Have the
 door ready to open.'  And the Countess, standing like one inspired, shook
 out her fine voice in 'Lascia ch'io pianga'; and when she had reached the
 proper point, and lyrically uttered forth her sighings after liberty, the
 door, at a sign, was flung wide open, and she swam into the Prince's
 sight, bright-eyed, and with her colour somewhat freshened by the
 exercise of singing.  It was a great dramatic entrance, and to the
 somewhat doleful prisoner within the sight was sunshine.
 
 'Ah, madam,' he cried, running to her--'you here!'
 
 She looked meaningly at Gordon; and as soon as the door was closed she
 fell on Otto's neck.  'To see you here!' she moaned and clung to him.
 
 But the Prince stood somewhat stiffly in that enviable situation, and the
 Countess instantly recovered from her outburst.
 
 'Poor child,' she said, 'poor child!  Sit down beside me here, and tell
 me all about it.  My heart really bleeds to see you.  How does time go?'
 
 'Madam,' replied the Prince, sitting down beside her, his gallantry
 recovered, 'the time will now go all too quickly till you leave.  But I
 must ask you for the news.  I have most bitterly condemned myself for my
 inertia of last night.  You wisely counselled me; it was my duty to
 resist.  You wisely and nobly counselled me; I have since thought of it
 with wonder.  You have a noble heart.'
 
 'Otto,' she said, 'spare me.  Was it even right, I wonder?  I have
 duties, too, you poor child; and when I see you they all melt--all my
 good resolutions fly away.'
 
 'And mine still come too late,' he replied, sighing.  'O, what would I
 not give to have resisted?  What would I not give for freedom?'
 
 'Well, what would you give?' she asked; and the red fan was spread; only
 her eyes, as if from over battlements, brightly surveyed him.
 
 'I?  What do you mean?  Madam, you have some news for me,' he cried.
 
 'O, O!' said madam dubiously.
 
 He was at her feet.  'Do not trifle with my hopes,' he pleaded.  'Tell
 me, dearest Madame von Rosen, tell me!  You cannot be cruel: it is not in
 your nature.  Give?  I can give nothing; I have nothing; I can only plead
 in mercy.'
 
 'Do not,' she said; 'it is not fair.  Otto, you know my weakness.  Spare
 me.  Be generous.'
 
 'O, madam,' he said, 'it is for you to be generous, to have pity.'  He
 took her hand and pressed it; he plied her with caresses and appeals.
 The Countess had a most enjoyable sham siege, and then relented.  She
 sprang to her feet, she tore her dress open, and, all warm from her
 bosom, threw the order on the floor.
 
 'There!' she cried.  'I forced it from her.  Use it, and I am ruined!'
 And she turned away as if to veil the force of her emotions.
 
 Otto sprang upon the paper, read it, and cried out aloud.  'O, God bless
 her!' he said, 'God bless her.'  And he kissed the writing.
 
 Von Rosen was a singularly good-natured woman, but her part was now
 beyond her.  'Ingrate!' she cried; 'I wrung it from her, I betrayed my
 trust to get it, and 'tis she you thank!'
 
 'Can you blame me?' said the Prince.  'I love her.'
 
 'I see that,' she said.  'And I?'
 
 'You, Madame von Rosen?  You are my dearest, my kindest, and most
 generous of friends,' he said, approaching her.  'You would be a perfect
 friend, if you were not so lovely.  You have a great sense of humour, you
 cannot be unconscious of your charm, and you amuse yourself at times by
 playing on my weakness; and at times I can take pleasure in the comedy.
 But not to-day: to-day you will be the true, the serious, the manly
 friend, and you will suffer me to forget that you are lovely and that I
 am weak.  Come, dear Countess, let me to-day repose in you entirely.'
 
 He held out his hand, smiling, and she took it frankly.  'I vow you have
 bewitched me,' she said; and then with a laugh, 'I break my staff!' she
 added; 'and I must pay you my best compliment.  You made a difficult
 speech.  You are as adroit, dear Prince, as I am--charming.'  And as she
 said the word with a great curtsey, she justified it.
 
 'You hardly keep the bargain, madam, when you make yourself so
 beautiful,' said the Prince, bowing.
 
 'It was my last arrow,' she returned.  'I am disarmed.  Blank cartridge,
 _O mon Prince_!  And now I tell you, if you choose to leave this prison,
 you can, and I am ruined.  Choose!'
 
 'Madame von Rosen,' replied Otto, 'I choose, and I will go.  My duty
 points me, duty still neglected by this Featherhead.  But do not fear to
 be a loser.  I propose instead that you should take me with you, a bear
 in chains, to Baron Gondremark.  I am become perfectly unscrupulous: to
 save my wife I will do all, all he can ask or fancy.  He shall be filled;
 were he huge as leviathan and greedy as the grave, I will content him.
 And you, the fairy of our pantomime, shall have the credit.'
 
 'Done!' she cried.  'Admirable!  Prince Charming no longer--Prince
 Sorcerer, Prince Solon!  Let us go this moment.  Stay,' she cried,
 pausing.  'I beg dear Prince, to give you back these deeds.  'Twas you
 who liked the farm--I have not seen it; and it was you who wished to
 benefit the peasants.  And, besides,' she added, with a comical change of
 tone, 'I should prefer the ready money.'
 
 Both laughed.  'Here I am, once more a farmer,' said Otto, accepting the
 papers, 'but overwhelmed in debt.'
 
 The Countess touched a bell, and the Governor appeared.
 
 'Governor,' she said, 'I am going to elope with his Highness.  The result
 of our talk has been a thorough understanding, and the _coup d'etat_ is
 over.  Here is the order.'
 
 Colonel Gordon adjusted silver spectacles upon his nose.  'Yes,' he said,
 'the Princess: very right.  But the warrant, madam, was countersigned.'
 
 'By Heinrich!' said von Rosen.  'Well, and here am I to represent him.'
 
 'Well, your Highness,' resumed the soldier of fortune, 'I must
 congratulate you upon my loss.  You have been cut out by beauty, and I am
 left lamenting.  The Doctor still remains to me: _probus_, _doctus_,
 _lepidus_, _jucundus_: a man of books.'
 
 'Ay, there is nothing about poor Gotthold,' said the Prince.
 
 'The Governor's consolation?  Would you leave him bare?' asked von Rosen.
 
 'And, your Highness,' resumed Gordon, 'may I trust that in the course of
 this temporary obscuration, you have found me discharge my part with
 suitable respect and, I may add, tact?  I adopted purposely a
 cheerfulness of manner; mirth, it appeared to me, and a good glass of
 wine, were the fit alleviations.'
 
 'Colonel,' said Otto, holding out his hand, 'your society was of itself
 enough.  I do not merely thank you for your pleasant spirits; I have to
 thank you, besides, for some philosophy, of which I stood in need.  I
 trust I do not see you for the last time; and in the meanwhile, as a
 memento of our strange acquaintance, let me offer you these verses on
 which I was but now engaged.  I am so little of a poet, and was so ill
 inspired by prison bars, that they have some claim to be at least a
 curiosity.'
 
 The Colonel's countenance lighted as he took the paper; the silver
 spectacles were hurriedly replaced.  'Ha!' he said, 'Alexandrines, the
 tragic metre.  I shall cherish this, your Highness, like a relic; no more
 suitable offering, although I say it, could be made. "_Dieux de l'immense
 plaine et des vastes forets_."  Very good,' he said, 'very good indeed!
 "_Et du geolier lui-meme apprendre des lecons_."  Most handsome, begad!'
 
 'Come, Governor,' cried the Countess, 'you can read his poetry when we
 are gone.  Open your grudging portals.'
 
 'I ask your pardon,' said the Colonel.  'To a man of my character and
 tastes, these verses, this handsome reference--most moving, I assure you.
 Can I offer you an escort?'
 
 'No, no,' replied the Countess.  'We go incogniti, as we arrived.  We
 ride together; the Prince will take my servant's horse.  Hurry and
 privacy, Herr Oberst, that is all we seek.' And she began impatiently to
 lead the way.
 
 But Otto had still to bid farewell to Dr. Gotthold; and the Governor
 following, with his spectacles in one hand and the paper in the other,
 had still to communicate his treasured verses, piece by piece, as he
 succeeded in deciphering the manuscript, to all he came across; and still
 his enthusiasm mounted.  'I declare,' he cried at last, with the air of
 one who has at length divined a mystery, 'they remind me of Robbie
 Burns!'
 
 But there is an end to all things; and at length Otto was walking by the
 side of Madame von Rosen, along that mountain wall, her servant following
 with both the horses, and all about them sunlight, and breeze, and flying
 bird, and the vast regions of the air, and the capacious prospect:
 wildwood and climbing pinnacle, and the sound and voice of mountain
 torrents, at their hand: and far below them, green melting into sapphire
 on the plains.
 
 They walked at first in silence; for Otto's mind was full of the delight
 of liberty and nature, and still, betweenwhiles, he was preparing his
 interview with Gondremark.  But when the first rough promontory of the
 rock was turned, and the Felsenburg concealed behind its bulk, the lady
 paused.
 
 'Here,' she said, 'I will dismount poor Karl, and you and I must ply our
 spurs.  I love a wild ride with a good companion.'
 
 As she spoke, a carriage came into sight round the corner next below them
 in the order of the road.  It came heavily creaking, and a little ahead
 of it a traveller was soberly walking, note-book in hand.
 
 'It is Sir John,' cried Otto, and he hailed him.
 
 The Baronet pocketed his note-book, stared through an eye-glass, and then
 waved his stick; and he on his side, and the Countess and the Prince on
 theirs, advanced with somewhat quicker steps.  They met at the re-entrant
 angle, where a thin stream sprayed across a boulder and was scattered in
 rain among the brush; and the Baronet saluted the Prince with much
 punctilio.  To the Countess, on the other hand, he bowed with a kind of
 sneering wonder.
 
 'Is it possible, madam, that you have not heard the news?' he asked.
 
 'What news?' she cried.
 
 'News of the first order,' returned Sir John: 'a revolution in the State,
 a Republic declared, the palace burned to the ground, the Princess in
 flight, Gondremark wounded--'
 
 'Heinrich wounded?' she screamed.
 
 'Wounded and suffering acutely,' said Sir John.  'His groans--'
 
 There fell from the lady's lips an oath so potent that, in smoother
 hours, it would have made her hearers jump.  She ran to her horse,
 scrambled to the saddle, and, yet half seated, dashed down the road at
 full gallop.  The groom, after a pause of wonder, followed her.  The rush
 of her impetuous passage almost scared the carriage horses over the verge
 of the steep hill; and still she clattered further, and the crags echoed
 to her flight, and still the groom flogged vainly in pursuit of her.  At
 the fourth corner, a woman trailing slowly up leaped back with a cry and
 escaped death by a hand's-breadth.  But the Countess wasted neither
 glance nor thought upon the incident.  Out and in, about the bluffs of
 the mountain wall, she fled, loose-reined, and still the groom toiled in
 her pursuit.
 
 'A most impulsive lady!' said Sir John.  'Who would have thought she
 cared for him?'  And before the words were uttered, he was struggling in
 the Prince's grasp.
 
 'My wife! the Princess?  What of her?'
 
 'She is down the road,' he gasped.  'I left her twenty minutes back.'
 
 And next moment, the choked author stood alone, and the Prince on foot
 was racing down the hill behind the Countess.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--BABES IN THE WOOD
 
 
 While the feet of the Prince continued to run swiftly, his heart, which
 had at first by far outstripped his running, soon began to linger and
 hang back.  Not that he ceased to pity the misfortune or to yearn for the
 sight of Seraphina; but the memory of her obdurate coldness awoke within
 him, and woke in turn his own habitual diffidence of self.  Had Sir John
 been given time to tell him all, had he even known that she was speeding
 to the Felsenburg, he would have gone to her with ardour.  As it was, he
 began to see himself once more intruding, profiting, perhaps, by her
 misfortune, and now that she was fallen, proffering unloved caresses to
 the wife who had spurned him in prosperity.  The sore spots upon his
 vanity began to burn; once more, his anger assumed the carriage of a
 hostile generosity; he would utterly forgive indeed; he would help, save,
 and comfort his unloving wife; but all with distant self-denial, imposing
 silence on his heart, respecting Seraphina's disaffection as he would the
 innocence of a child.  So, when at length he turned a corner and beheld
 the Princess, it was his first thought to reassure her of the purity of
 his respect, and he at once ceased running and stood still.  She, upon
 her part, began to run to him with a little cry; then, seeing him pause,
 she paused also, smitten with remorse; and at length, with the most
 guilty timidity, walked nearly up to where he stood.
 
 'Otto,' she said, 'I have ruined all!'
 
 'Seraphina!' he cried with a sob, but did not move, partly withheld by
 his resolutions, partly struck stupid at the sight of her weariness and
 disorder.  Had she stood silent, they had soon been locked in an embrace.
 But she too had prepared herself against the interview, and must spoil
 the golden hour with protestations.
 
 'All!' she went on, 'I have ruined all!  But, Otto, in kindness you must
 hear me--not justify, but own, my faults.  I have been taught so cruelly;
 I have had such time for thought, and see the world so changed.  I have
 been blind, stone-blind; I have let all true good go by me, and lived on
 shadows.  But when this dream fell, and I had betrayed you, and thought I
 had killed--'  She paused.  'I thought I had killed Gondremark,' she said
 with a deep flush, 'and I found myself alone, as you said.'
 
 The mention of the name of Gondremark pricked the Princes generosity like
 a spur.  'Well,' he cried, 'and whose fault was it but mine?  It was my
 duty to be beside you, loved or not.  But I was a skulker in the grain,
 and found it easier to desert than to oppose you.  I could never learn
 that better part of love, to fight love's battles.  But yet the love was
 there.  And now when this toy kingdom of ours has fallen, first of all by
 my demerits, and next by your inexperience, and we are here alone
 together, as poor as Job and merely a man and a woman--let me conjure you
 to forgive the weakness and to repose in the love.  Do not mistake me!'
 he cried, seeing her about to speak, and imposing silence with uplifted
 hand.  'My love is changed; it is purged of any conjugal pretension; it
 does not ask, does not hope, does not wish for a return in kind.  You may
 forget for ever that part in which you found me so distasteful, and
 accept without embarrassment the affection of a brother.'
 
 'You are too generous, Otto,' she said.  'I know that I have forfeited
 your love.  I cannot take this sacrifice.  You had far better leave me.
 O, go away, and leave me to my fate!'
 
 'O no!' said Otto; 'we must first of all escape out of this hornet's
 nest, to which I led you.  My honour is engaged.  I said but now we were
 as poor as Job; and behold! not many miles from here I have a house of my
 own to which I will conduct you.  Otto the Prince being down, we must try
 what luck remains to Otto the Hunter.  Come, Seraphina; show that you
 forgive me, and let us set about this business of escape in the best
 spirits possible.  You used to say, my dear, that, except as a husband
 and a prince, I was a pleasant fellow.  I am neither now, and you may
 like my company without remorse.  Come, then; it were idle to be
 captured.  Can you still walk?  Forth, then,' said he, and he began to
 lead the way.
 
 A little below where they stood, a good-sized brook passed below the
 road, which overleapt it in a single arch.  On one bank of that
 loquacious water a foot-path descended a green dell.  Here it was rocky
 and stony, and lay on the steep scarps of the ravine; here it was choked
 with brambles; and there, in fairy haughs, it lay for a few paces evenly
 on the green turf.  Like a sponge, the hillside oozed with well-water.
 The burn kept growing both in force and volume; at every leap it fell
 with heavier plunges and span more widely in the pool.  Great had been
 the labours of that stream, and great and agreeable the changes it had
 wrought.  It had cut through dykes of stubborn rock, and now, like a
 blowing dolphin, spouted through the orifice; along all its humble
 coasts, it had undermined and rafted-down the goodlier timber of the
 forest; and on these rough clearings it now set and tended primrose
 gardens, and planted woods of willow, and made a favourite of the silver
 birch.  Through all these friendly features the path, its human acolyte,
 conducted our two wanderers downward,--Otto before, still pausing at the
 more difficult passages to lend assistance; the Princess following.  From
 time to time, when he turned to help her, her face would lighten upon
 his--her eyes, half desperately, woo him.  He saw, but dared not
 understand.  'She does not love me,' he told himself, with magnanimity.
 'This is remorse or gratitude; I were no gentleman, no, nor yet a man, if
 I presumed upon these pitiful concessions.'
 
 Some way down the glen, the stream, already grown to a good bulk of
 water, was rudely dammed across, and about a third of it abducted in a
 wooden trough.  Gaily the pure water, air's first cousin, fleeted along
 the rude aqueduct, whose sides and floor it had made green with grasses.
 The path, bearing it close company, threaded a wilderness of briar and
 wild-rose.  And presently, a little in front, the brown top of a mill and
 the tall mill-wheel, spraying diamonds, arose in the narrows of the glen;
 at the same time the snoring music of the saws broke the silence.
 
 The miller, hearing steps, came forth to his door, and both he and Otto
 started.
 
 'Good-morning, miller,' said the Prince.  'You were right, it seems, and
 I was wrong.  I give you the news, and bid you to Mittwalden.  My throne
 has fallen--great was the fall of it!--and your good friends of the
 Phoenix bear the rule.'
 
 The red-faced miller looked supreme astonishment.  'And your Highness?'
 he gasped.
 
 'My Highness is running away,' replied Otto, 'straight for the frontier.'
 
 'Leaving Grunewald?' cried the man.  'Your father's son?  It's not to be
 permitted!'
 
 'Do you arrest us, friend?' asked Otto, smiling.
 
 'Arrest you?  I?' exclaimed the man.  'For what does your Highness take
 me?  Why, sir, I make sure there is not a man in Grunewald would lay
 hands upon you.'
 
 'O, many, many,' said the Prince; 'but from you, who were bold with me in
 my greatness, I should even look for aid in my distress.'
 
 The miller became the colour of beetroot.  'You may say so indeed,' said
 he.  'And meanwhile, will you and your lady step into my house.'
 
 'We have not time for that,' replied the Prince; 'but if you would oblige
 us with a cup of wine without here, you will give a pleasure and a
 service, both in one.'
 
 The miller once more coloured to the nape.  He hastened to bring forth
 wine in a pitcher and three bright crystal tumblers.  'Your Highness must
 not suppose,' he said, as he filled them, 'that I am an habitual drinker.
 The time when I had the misfortune to encounter you, I was a trifle
 overtaken, I allow; but a more sober man than I am in my ordinary, I do
 not know where you are to look for; and even this glass that I drink to
 you (and to the lady) is quite an unusual recreation.'
 
 The wine was drunk with due rustic courtesies; and then, refusing further
 hospitality, Otto and Seraphina once more proceeded to descend the glen,
 which now began to open and to be invaded by the taller trees.
 
 'I owed that man a reparation,' said the Prince; 'for when we met I was
 in the wrong and put a sore affront upon him.  I judge by myself,
 perhaps; but I begin to think that no one is the better for a
 humiliation.'
 
 'But some have to be taught so,' she replied.
 
 'Well, well,' he said, with a painful embarrassment.  'Well, well.  But
 let us think of safety.  My miller is all very good, but I do not pin my
 faith to him.  To follow down this stream will bring us, but after
 innumerable windings, to my house.  Here, up this glade, there lies a
 cross-cut--the world's end for solitude--the very deer scarce visit it.
 Are you too tired, or could you pass that way?'
 
 'Choose the path, Otto.  I will follow you,' she said.
 
 'No,' he replied, with a singular imbecility of manner and appearance,
 'but I meant the path was rough.  It lies, all the way, by glade and
 dingle, and the dingles are both deep and thorny.'
 
 'Lead on,' she said.  'Are you not Otto the Hunter?'
 
 They had now burst across a veil of underwood, and were come into a lawn
 among the forest, very green and innocent, and solemnly surrounded by
 trees.  Otto paused on the margin, looking about him with delight; then
 his glance returned to Seraphina, as she stood framed in that silvan
 pleasantness and looking at her husband with undecipherable eyes.  A
 weakness both of the body and mind fell on him like the beginnings of
 sleep; the cords of his activity were relaxed, his eyes clung to her.
 'Let us rest,' he said; and he made her sit down, and himself sat down
 beside her on the slope of an inconsiderable mound.
 
 She sat with her eyes downcast, her slim hand dabbling in grass, like a
 maid waiting for love's summons.  The sound of the wind in the forest
 swelled and sank, and drew near them with a running rush, and died away
 and away in the distance into fainting whispers.  Nearer hand, a bird out
 of the deep covert uttered broken and anxious notes.  All this seemed but
 a halting prelude to speech.  To Otto it seemed as if the whole frame of
 nature were waiting for his words; and yet his pride kept him silent.
 The longer he watched that slender and pale hand plucking at the grasses,
 the harder and rougher grew the fight between pride and its kindly
 adversary.
 
 'Seraphina,' he said at last, 'it is right you should know one thing: I
 never . . .'  He was about to say 'doubted you,' but was that true?  And,
 if true, was it generous to speak of it?  Silence succeeded.
 
 'I pray you, tell it me,' she said; 'tell it me, in pity.'
 
 'I mean only this,' he resumed, 'that I understand all, and do not blame
 you.  I understand how the brave woman must look down on the weak man.  I
 think you were wrong in some things; but I have tried to understand it,
 and I do.  I do not need to forget or to forgive, Seraphina, for I have
 understood.'
 
 'I know what I have done,' she said.  'I am not so weak that I can be
 deceived with kind speeches.  I know what I have been--I see myself.  I
 am not worth your anger, how much less to be forgiven!  In all this
 downfall and misery, I see only me and you: you, as you have been always;
 me, as I was--me, above all!  O yes, I see myself: and what can I think?'
 
 'Ah, then, let us reverse the parts!' said Otto.  'It is ourselves we
 cannot forgive, when we deny forgiveness to another--so a friend told me
 last night.  On these terms, Seraphina, you see how generously _I_ have
 forgiven myself.  But am not I to be forgiven?  Come, then, forgive
 yourself--and me.'
 
 She did not answer in words, but reached out her hand to him quickly.  He
 took it; and as the smooth fingers settled and nestled in his, love ran
 to and fro between them in tender and transforming currents.
 
 'Seraphina,' he cried, 'O, forget the past!  Let me serve and help you;
 let me be your servant; it is enough for me to serve you and to be near
 you; let me be near you, dear--do not send me away.'  He hurried his
 pleading like the speech of a frightened child.  'It is not love,' he
 went on; 'I do not ask for love; my love is enough . . .'
 
 'Otto!' she said, as if in pain.
 
 He looked up into her face.  It was wrung with the very ecstasy of
 tenderness and anguish; on her features, and most of all in her changed
 eyes, there shone the very light of love.
 
 'Seraphina?' he cried aloud, and with a sudden, tuneless voice,
 'Seraphina?'
 
 'Look round you at this glade,' she cried, 'and where the leaves are
 coming on young trees, and the flowers begin to blossom.  This is where
 we meet, meet for the first time; it is so much better to forget and to
 be born again.  O what a pit there is for sins--God's mercy, man's
 oblivion!'
 
 'Seraphina,' he said, 'let it be so, indeed; let all that was be merely
 the abuse of dreaming; let me begin again, a stranger.  I have dreamed,
 in a long dream, that I adored a girl unkind and beautiful; in all things
 my superior, but still cold, like ice.  And again I dreamed, and thought
 she changed and melted, glowed and turned to me.  And I--who had no merit
 but a love, slavish and unerect--lay close, and durst not move for fear
 of waking.'
 
 'Lie close,' she said, with a deep thrill of speech.
 
 So they spake in the spring woods; and meanwhile, in Mittwalden
 Rath-haus, the Republic was declared.
 
 
 
 
 BIBLIOGRAPHICAL POSTSCRIPT TO COMPLETE THE STORY
 
 
 The reader well informed in modern history will not require details as to
 the fate of the Republic.  The best account is to be found in the memoirs
 of Herr Greisengesang (7 Bande: Leipzig), by our passing acquaintance the
 licentiate Roederer.  Herr Roederer, with too much of an author's
 licence, makes a great figure of his hero--poses him, indeed, to be the
 centre-piece and cloud-compeller of the whole.  But, with due allowance
 for this bias, the book is able and complete.
 
 The reader is of course acquainted with the vigorous and bracing pages of
 Sir John (2 vols., London: Longman, Hurst, Rees, Orme and Brown).  Sir
 John, who plays but a tooth-comb in the orchestra of this historical
 romance, blows in his own book the big bassoon.  His character is there
 drawn at large; and the sympathy of Landor has countersigned the
 admiration of the public.  One point, however, calls for explanation; the
 chapter on Grunewald was torn by the hand of the author in the palace
 gardens; how comes it, then, to figure at full length among my more
 modest pages, the Lion of the caravan?  That eminent literatus was a man
 of method; 'Juvenal by double entry,' he was once profanely called; and
 when he tore the sheets in question, it was rather, as he has since
 explained, in the search for some dramatic evidence of his sincerity,
 than with the thought of practical deletion.  At that time, indeed, he
 was possessed of two blotted scrolls and a fair copy in double.  But the
 chapter, as the reader knows, was honestly omitted from the famous
 'Memoirs on the various Courts of Europe.'  It has been mine to give it
 to the public.
 
 Bibliography still helps us with a further glimpse of our characters.  I
 have here before me a small volume (printed for private circulation: no
 printer's name; n.d.), 'Poesies par Frederic et Amelie.'  Mine is a
 presentation copy, obtained for me by Mr. Bain in the Haymarket; and the
 name of the first owner is written on the fly-leaf in the hand of Prince
 Otto himself.  The modest epigraph--'Le rime n'est pas riche'--may be
 attributed, with a good show of likelihood, to the same collaborator.  It
 is strikingly appropriate, and I have found the volume very dreary.
 Those pieces in which I seem to trace the hand of the Princess are
 particularly dull and conscientious.  But the booklet had a fair success
 with that public for which it was designed; and I have come across some
 evidences of a second venture of the same sort, now unprocurable.  Here,
 at least, we may take leave of Otto and Seraphina--what do I say? of
 Frederic and Amelie--ageing together peaceably at the court of the wife's
 father, jingling French rhymes and correcting joint proofs.
 
 Still following the book-lists, I perceive that Mr. Swinburne has
 dedicated a rousing lyric and some vigorous sonnets to the memory of
 Gondremark; that name appears twice at least in Victor Hugo's
 trumpet-blasts of patriot enumeration; and I came latterly, when I
 supposed my task already ended, on a trace of the fallen politician and
 his Countess.  It is in the 'Diary of J. Hogg Cotterill, Esq.' (that very
 interesting work).  Mr. Cotterill, being at Naples, is introduced (May
 27th) to 'a Baron and Baroness Gondremark--he a man who once made a
 noise--she still beautiful--both witty.  She complimented me much upon my
 French--should never have known me to be English--had known my uncle, Sir
 John, in Germany--recognised in me, as a family trait, some of his _grand
 air_ and studious courtesy--asked me to call.'  And again (May 30th),
 'visited the Baronne de Gondremark--much gratified--a most _refined_,
 _intelligent_ woman, quite of the old school, now, _helas_! extinct--had
 read my _Remarks on Sicily_--it reminds her of my uncle, but with more of
 grace--I feared she thought there was less energy--assured no--a softer
 style of presentation, more of the _literary grace_, but the same firm
 grasp of circumstance and force of thought--in short, just Buttonhole's
 opinion.  Much encouraged.  I have a real esteem for this patrician
 lady.'  The acquaintance lasted some time; and when Mr. Cotterill left in
 the suite of Lord Protocol, and, as he is careful to inform us, in
 Admiral Yardarm's flag-ship, one of his chief causes of regret is to
 leave 'that most _spirituelle_ and sympathetic lady, who already regards
 me as a younger brother.'
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the Chatto and Windus 1911 edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                                 LAY MORALS
 
 
                              And Other Papers
 
                                     BY
                           ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 
 
                             [Picture: Graphic]
 
                               A NEW EDITION
                             WITH A PREFACE BY
                               MRS. STEVENSON
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                              CHATTO & WINDUS
                                    1911
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                           _All rights reserved._
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 BY MRS. ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON {0}
 
 
 In our long voyage on the yacht _Casco_, we visited many islands; I
 believe on every one we found the scourge of leprosy.  In the Marquesas
 there was a regular leper settlement, though the persons living there
 seemed free to wander where they wished, fishing on the beach, or
 visiting friends in the villages.  I remember one afternoon, at Anaho,
 when my husband and I, tired after a long quest for shells, sat down on
 the sand to rest awhile, a native man stepped out from under some
 cocoanut trees, regarding us hesitatingly as though fearful of intruding.
 My husband waved an invitation to the stranger to join us, offering his
 cigarette to the man in the island fashion.  The cigarette was accepted
 and, after a puff or two, courteously passed back again according to
 native etiquette.  The hand that held it was the maimed hand of a leper.
 To my consternation my husband took the cigarette and smoked it out.
 Afterwards when we were alone and I spoke of my horror he said, I could
 not mortify the man.  And if you think I _liked_ doing itthat was
 another reason; because I _didnt_ want to.
 
 Another day, while we were still anchored in Anaho Bay, a messenger from
 round a distant headland came in a whale-boat with an urgent request that
 we go to see a young white girl who was ill with some mysterious malady.
 We had supposed that, with the beach-comber Charley the red, we were
 the only white people on our side of the island.  Though there was much
 wind that day and the sea ran high, we started at once, impelled partly
 by curiosity and partly by the pathetic nature of the message.
 Fortunately we took our luncheon with us, eating it on the beach before
 we went up to the house where the sick girl lay.  Our hostess, the girls
 mother, met us with regrets that we had already lunched, saying, I have
 a most excellent cook; here he is, now.  She turned, as she spoke, to an
 elderly Chinaman who was plainly in an advanced stage of leprosy.  When
 the man was gone, my husband asked if she had no fear of contagion.  I
 dont believe in contagion, was her reply.  But there was little doubt
 as to what ailed her daughter.  She was certainly suffering from leprosy.
 We could only advise that the girl be taken to the French post at Santa
 Maria Bay where there was a doctor.
 
 On our return to the _Casco_ we confessed to each other with what alarm
 and repugnance we touched the miserable girl.  We talked long that
 evening of Father Damien, his sublime heroism, and his martyrdom which
 was already nearing its sad end.  Beyond all noble qualities my husband
 placed courage.  The more he saw of leprosy, and he saw much in the
 islands, the higher rose his admiration for the simple priest of Molokai.
 I must see Molokai, he said many times.  I must somehow manage to see
 Molokai.
 
 In January 1889, we arrived in Honolulu, settling in a pleasant cottage
 by the sea to rest until we were ready to return to England.  The _Casco_
 we sent back to San Francisco with the captain.  But the knowledge that
 every few days some vessel was leaving Honolulu to cruise among islands
 we had not seen, and now should never see, was more than we could bear.
 First we engaged passage on a missionary ship, but changed our mindsmy
 husband would not be allowed to smoke on board, for one reasonand
 chartered the trading schooner _Equator_.  This was thought too rough a
 voyage for my mother-in-law, as indeed it would have been; so she was
 sent, somewhat protesting, back to Scotland.
 
 My husband was still intent on seeing Molokai.  After the waste of much
 time and red tape, he finally received an official permission to visit
 the leper settlement.  It did not occur to him it would be necessary to
 get a separate official permission to _leave_ Molokai; hence he was
 nearly left behind when the vessel sailed out.  He only saved himself by
 a prodigious leap which landed him on board the boat, whence nothing but
 force could dislodge him.  By the doctors orders he took gloves to wear
 as a precautionary measure against contagion, but they were never worn.
 At first he avoided shaking hands, but when he played croquet with the
 young leper girls he would not listen to the Mother Superiors warning
 that he must wear gloves.  He thought it might remind them of their
 condition.  What will you do if you find you have contracted leprosy? I
 asked.  Do? he replied; why, you and I would spend the rest of our
 lives in Molokai and become humble followers of Father Damien.  As Mr.
 Balfour says in the Life of Stevenson, he was as stern with his family as
 he was with himself, and as exacting.
 
 He talked very little to us of the tragedy of Molokai, though I could see
 it lay heavy on his spirits; but of the great work begun by Father Damien
 and carried on by his successors he spoke fully.  He had followed the
 life of the priest like a detective until there seemed nothing more to
 learn.  Mother Mary Ann, the Mother Superior, he could never mention
 without deep emotion.  One of the first things he did on his return to
 Honolulu was to send her a grand piano for the use of her girlsthe girls
 with whom he had played croquet.  He also sent toys, sewing materials,
 small tools for the younger children, and other things that I have
 forgotten.  After his death a letter was found among his papers, of which
 I have only the last few lines.  I cannot suppose you remember me, but I
 wont forget you, nor God wont forget you for your kindness to the blind
 white leper at Molokai.
 
 During my husbands absence I had made every preparation for our voyage
 on the _Equator_, so but little time was lost before we found ourselves
 on board, our sails set for the south.  The _Equator_, which had easily
 lived through the great Samoan hurricane, made no such phenomenal runs as
 the _Casco_, but we could trust her, and she had no tricks and ways
 that we did not understand.  We liked the sailors, we loved the ship and
 her captain, so it was with heart-felt regret we said farewell in the
 harbour of Apia after a long and perfect cruise.
 
 After reading the letters that awaited us in Apia, we looked over the
 newspapers.  Our indignation may be imagined when we read in one item
 that, owing to the publication of a letter by a well-known Honolulu
 missionary, depicting Father Damien as a dirty old peasant who had
 contracted leprosy through his immoral habits, the project to erect a
 monument to his memory would be abandoned.  Ill not believe it, said
 my husband, unless I see it with my own eyes; for it is too damnable for
 belief!
 
 But see it he did, in spite of his incredulity, for in Sydney, a month or
 two later, the very journal containing the letter condemnatory of Father
 Damien was among the first we chanced to open.  I shall never forget my
 husbands ferocity of indignation, his leaping stride as he paced the
 room holding the offending paper at arms-length before his eyes that
 burned and sparkled with a peculiar flashing light.  His cousin Mr.
 Balfour, in his _Life of Robert Louis Stevenson_, says: his eyes . . .
 when he was moved to anger or any fierce emotion seemed literally to
 blaze and glow with a burning light.  In another moment he disappeared
 through the doorway, and I could hear him, in his own room, pulling his
 chair to the table, and the sound of his inkstand being dragged towards
 him.
 
 That afternoon he called us togethermy son, my daughter, and
 myselfsaying that he had something serious to lay before us.  He went
 over the circumstances succinctly, and then we three had the incomparable
 experience of hearing its author read aloud the defence of Father Damien
 while it was still red-hot from his indignant soul.
 
 As we sat, dazed and overcome by emotion, he pointed out to us that the
 subject-matter was libellous in the highest degree, and the publication
 of the article might cause the loss of his entire substance.  Without our
 concurrence he would not take such a risk.  There was no dissenting
 voice; how could there be?  The paper was published with almost no change
 or revision, though afterwards my husband said he considered this a
 mistake.  He thought he should have waited for his anger to cool, when he
 might have been more impersonal and less egotistic.
 
 The next day he consulted an eminent lawyer, more from curiosity than
 from any other reason.  Mr. MosesI think that was his namewas at first
 inclined to be jocular.  I remember his smiling question: Have you
 called him a hell-hound or an atheist?  Otherwise there is no libel.
 But when he looked over the manuscript his countenance changed.  This is
 a serious affair, he said; however, no one will publish it for you.
 In that Mr. Moses was right; no one dared publish the pamphlet.  But that
 difficulty was soon overcome.  My husband hired a printer by the day, and
 the work was rushed through.  We then, my daughter, my son, and myself,
 were set to work helping address the pamphlets, which were scattered far
 and wide.
 
 Father Damien was vindicated by a stranger, a man of another country and
 another religion from his own.
 
                                                             F. V. DE G. S.
 
 
 
 
 Contents:
 
 
    Preface by Mrs. Robert Louis Stevenson
    Lay Morals
    Father Damien
    The Pentland Rising
       I.  The Causes of the Revolt
       II.  The Beginning
       III.  The March of the Rebels
       IV.  Rullion Green
       V.  A Record of Blood
    The Day After To-morrow
    College Papers
       I.  Edinburgh Students in 1824
       II.  The Modern Student
       III.  Debating Societies
    Criticisms
       I.  Lord Lyttons Fables in Song
       II.  Salvinis Macbeth
       III.  Bagsters Pilgrims Progress
    Sketches
       I.  The Satirist
       II.  Nuits Blanches
       III.  The Wreath of Immortelles
       IV.  Nurses
       V.  A Character
   The Great North Road
       I.  Nance at the Green Dragon
       II.  In which Mr. Archer is Installed
       III.  Jonathan Holdaway
       IV.  Mingling Threads
       V.  Life in the Castle
       IV.  The Bad Half-Crown
       VII.  The Bleaching-Green
       VIII.  The Mail Guard
    The Young Chevalier
       Prologue: The Wine-Sellers Wife
       I.  The Prince
    Heathercat
       I.  Traqairs of Montroymont
       II.  Francie
       III.  The Hill-End of Drumlowe
 
 
 
 
 LAY MORALS
 
 
 _The following chapters of a projected treatise on Ethics were drafted at
 Edinburgh in the spring of_ 1879.  _They are unrevised_, _and must not be
 taken as representing_, _either as to matter or form_, _their authors
 final thoughts_; _but they contain much that is essentially
 characteristic of his mind_.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                _Copyright in the United States of America_.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 The problem of education is twofold: first to know, and then to utter.
 Every one who lives any semblance of an inner life thinks more nobly and
 profoundly than he speaks; and the best of teachers can impart only
 broken images of the truth which they perceive.  Speech which goes from
 one to another between two natures, and, what is worse, between two
 experiences, is doubly relative.  The speaker buries his meaning; it is
 for the hearer to dig it up again; and all speech, written or spoken, is
 in a dead language until it finds a willing and prepared hearer.  Such,
 moreover, is the complexity of life, that when we condescend upon details
 in our advice, we may be sure we condescend on error; and the best of
 education is to throw out some magnanimous hints.  No man was ever so
 poor that he could express all he has in him by words, looks, or actions;
 his true knowledge is eternally incommunicable, for it is a knowledge of
 himself; and his best wisdom comes to him by no process of the mind, but
 in a supreme self-dictation, which keeps varying from hour to hour in its
 dictates with the variation of events and circumstances.
 
 A few men of picked nature, full of faith, courage, and contempt for
 others, try earnestly to set forth as much as they can grasp of this
 inner law; but the vast majority, when they come to advise the young,
 must be content to retail certain doctrines which have been already
 retailed to them in their own youth.  Every generation has to educate
 another which it has brought upon the stage.  People who readily accept
 the responsibility of parentship, having very different matters in their
 eye, are apt to feel rueful when that responsibility falls due.  What are
 they to tell the child about life and conduct, subjects on which they
 have themselves so few and such confused opinions?  Indeed, I do not
 know; the least said, perhaps, the soonest mended; and yet the child
 keeps asking, and the parent must find some words to say in his own
 defence.  Where does he find them? and what are they when found?
 
 As a matter of experience, and in nine hundred and ninety-nine cases out
 of a thousand, he will instil into his wide-eyed brat three bad things:
 the terror of public opinion, and, flowing from that as a fountain, the
 desire of wealth and applause.  Besides these, or what might be deduced
 as corollaries from these, he will teach not much else of any effective
 value: some dim notions of divinity, perhaps, and book-keeping, and how
 to walk through a quadrille.
 
 But, you may tell me, the young people are taught to be Christians.  It
 may be want of penetration, but I have not yet been able to perceive it.
 As an honest man, whatever we teach, and be it good or evil, it is not
 the doctrine of Christ.  What he taught (and in this he is like all other
 teachers worthy of the name) was not a code of rules, but a ruling
 spirit; not truths, but a spirit of truth; not views, but a view.  What
 he showed us was an attitude of mind.  Towards the many considerations on
 which conduct is built, each man stands in a certain relation.  He takes
 life on a certain principle.  He has a compass in his spirit which points
 in a certain direction.  It is the attitude, the relation, the point of
 the compass, that is the whole body and gist of what he has to teach us;
 in this, the details are comprehended; out of this the specific precepts
 issue, and by this, and this only, can they be explained and applied.
 And thus, to learn aright from any teacher, we must first of all, like a
 historical artist, think ourselves into sympathy with his position and,
 in the technical phrase, create his character.  A historian confronted
 with some ambiguous politician, or an actor charged with a part, have but
 one pre-occupation; they must search all round and upon every side, and
 grope for some central conception which is to explain and justify the
 most extreme details; until that is found, the politician is an enigma,
 or perhaps a quack, and the part a tissue of fustian sentiment and big
 words; but once that is found, all enters into a plan, a human nature
 appears, the politician or the stage-king is understood from point to
 point, from end to end.  This is a degree of trouble which will be gladly
 taken by a very humble artist; but not even the terror of eternal fire
 can teach a business man to bend his imagination to such athletic
 efforts.  Yet without this, all is vain; until we understand the whole,
 we shall understand none of the parts; and otherwise we have no more than
 broken images and scattered words; the meaning remains buried; and the
 language in which our prophet speaks to us is a dead language in our
 ears.
 
 Take a few of Christs sayings and compare them with our current
 doctrines.
 
 Ye cannot, he says, _serve God and Mammon_.  Cannot?  And our whole
 system is to teach us how we can!
 
 _The children of this world are wiser in their generation than the
 children of light_.  Are they?  I had been led to understand the
 reverse: that the Christian merchant, for example, prospered exceedingly
 in his affairs; that honesty was the best policy; that an author of
 repute had written a conclusive treatise How to make the best of both
 worlds.  Of both worlds indeed!  Which am I to believe thenChrist or
 the author of repute?
 
 _Take no thought for the morrow_.  Ask the Successful Merchant;
 interrogate your own heart; and you will have to admit that this is not
 only a silly but an immoral position.  All we believe, all we hope, all
 we honour in ourselves or our contemporaries, stands condemned in this
 one sentence, or, if you take the other view, condemns the sentence as
 unwise and inhumane.  We are not then of the same mind that was in
 Christ.  We disagree with Christ.  Either Christ meant nothing, or else
 he or we must be in the wrong.  Well says Thoreau, speaking of some texts
 from the New Testament, and finding a strange echo of another style which
 the reader may recognise: Let but one of these sentences be rightly read
 from any pulpit in the land, and there would not be left one stone of
 that meeting-house upon another.
 
 It may be objected that these are what are called hard sayings; and
 that a man, or an education, may be very sufficiently Christian although
 it leave some of these sayings upon one side.  But this is a very gross
 delusion.  Although truth is difficult to state, it is both easy and
 agreeable to receive, and the mind runs out to meet it ere the phrase be
 done.  The universe, in relation to what any man can say of it, is plain,
 patent and staringly comprehensible.  In itself, it is a great and
 travailing ocean, unsounded, unvoyageable, an eternal mystery to man; or,
 let us say, it is a monstrous and impassable mountain, one side of which,
 and a few near slopes and foothills, we can dimly study with these mortal
 eyes.  But what any man can say of it, even in his highest utterance,
 must have relation to this little and plain corner, which is no less
 visible to us than to him.  We are looking on the same map; it will go
 hard if we cannot follow the demonstration.  The longest and most
 abstruse flight of a philosopher becomes clear and shallow, in the flash
 of a moment, when we suddenly perceive the aspect and drift of his
 intention.  The longest argument is but a finger pointed; once we get our
 own finger rightly parallel, and we see what the man meant, whether it be
 a new star or an old street-lamp.  And briefly, if a saying is hard to
 understand, it is because we are thinking of something else.
 
 But to be a true disciple is to think of the same things as our prophet,
 and to think of different things in the same order.  To be of the same
 mind with another is to see all things in the same perspective; it is not
 to agree in a few indifferent matters near at hand and not much debated;
 it is to follow him in his farthest flights, to see the force of his
 hyperboles, to stand so exactly in the centre of his vision that whatever
 he may express, your eyes will light at once on the original, that
 whatever he may see to declare, your mind will at once accept.  You do
 not belong to the school of any philosopher, because you agree with him
 that theft is, on the whole, objectionable, or that the sun is overhead
 at noon.  It is by the hard sayings that discipleship is tested.  We are
 all agreed about the middling and indifferent parts of knowledge and
 morality; even the most soaring spirits too often take them tamely upon
 trust.  But the man, the philosopher or the moralist, does not stand upon
 these chance adhesions; and the purpose of any system looks towards those
 extreme points where it steps valiantly beyond tradition and returns with
 some covert hint of things outside.  Then only can you be certain that
 the words are not words of course, nor mere echoes of the past; then only
 are you sure that if he be indicating anything at all, it is a star and
 not a street-lamp; then only do you touch the heart of the mystery, since
 it was for these that the author wrote his book.
 
 Now, every now and then, and indeed surprisingly often, Christ finds a
 word that transcends all common-place morality; every now and then he
 quits the beaten track to pioneer the unexpressed, and throws out a
 pregnant and magnanimous hyperbole; for it is only by some bold poetry of
 thought that men can be strung up above the level of everyday conceptions
 to take a broader look upon experience or accept some higher principle of
 conduct.  To a man who is of the same mind that was in Christ, who stands
 at some centre not too far from his, and looks at the world and conduct
 from some not dissimilar or, at least, not opposing attitudeor, shortly,
 to a man who is of Christs philosophyevery such saying should come home
 with a thrill of joy and corroboration; he should feel each one below his
 feet as another sure foundation in the flux of time and chance; each
 should be another proof that in the torrent of the years and generations,
 where doctrines and great armaments and empires are swept away and
 swallowed, he stands immovable, holding by the eternal stars.  But alas!
 at this juncture of the ages it is not so with us; on each and every such
 occasion our whole fellowship of Christians falls back in disapproving
 wonder and implicitly denies the saying.  Christians! the farce is
 impudently broad.  Let us stand up in the sight of heaven and confess.
 The ethics that we hold are those of Benjamin Franklin.  _Honesty is the
 best policy_, is perhaps a hard saying; it is certainly one by which a
 wise man of these days will not too curiously direct his steps; but I
 think it shows a glimmer of meaning to even our most dimmed
 intelligences; I think we perceive a principle behind it; I think,
 without hyperbole, we are of the same mind that was in Benjamin Franklin.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 But, I may be told, we teach the ten commandments, where a world of
 morals lies condensed, the very pith and epitome of all ethics and
 religion; and a young man with these precepts engraved upon his mind must
 follow after profit with some conscience and Christianity of method.  A
 man cannot go very far astray who neither dishonours his parents, nor
 kills, nor commits adultery, nor steals, nor bears false witness; for
 these things, rightly thought out, cover a vast field of duty.
 
 Alas! what is a precept?  It is at best an illustration; it is case law
 at the best which can be learned by precept.  The letter is not only
 dead, but killing; the spirit which underlies, and cannot be uttered,
 alone is true and helpful.  This is trite to sickness; but familiarity
 has a cunning disenchantment; in a day or two she can steal all beauty
 from the mountain tops; and the most startling words begin to fall dead
 upon the ear after several repetitions.  If you see a thing too often,
 you no longer see it; if you hear a thing too often, you no longer hear
 it.  Our attention requires to be surprised; and to carry a fort by
 assault, or to gain a thoughtful hearing from the ruck of mankind, are
 feats of about an equal difficulty and must be tried by not dissimilar
 means.  The whole Bible has thus lost its message for the common run of
 hearers; it has become mere words of course; and the parson may bawl
 himself scarlet and beat the pulpit like a thing possessed, but his
 hearers will continue to nod; they are strangely at peace, they know all
 he has to say; ring the old bell as you choose, it is still the old bell
 and it cannot startle their composure.  And so with this byword about the
 letter and the spirit.  It is quite true, no doubt; but it has no meaning
 in the world to any man of us.  Alas! it has just this meaning, and
 neither more nor less: that while the spirit is true, the letter is
 eternally false.
 
 The shadow of a great oak lies abroad upon the ground at noon, perfect,
 clear, and stable like the earth.  But let a man set himself to mark out
 the boundary with cords and pegs, and were he never so nimble and never
 so exact, what with the multiplicity of the leaves and the progression of
 the shadow as it flees before the travelling sun, long ere he has made
 the circuit the whole figure will have changed.  Life may be compared,
 not to a single tree, but to a great and complicated forest; circumstance
 is more swiftly changing than a shadow, language much more inexact than
 the tools of a surveyor; from day to day the trees fall and are renewed;
 the very essences are fleeting as we look; and the whole world of leaves
 is swinging tempest-tossed among the winds of time.  Look now for your
 shadows.  O man of formul, is this a place for you?  Have you fitted the
 spirit to a single case?  Alas, in the cycle of the ages when shall such
 another be proposed for the judgment of man?  Now when the sun shines and
 the winds blow, the wood is filled with an innumerable multitude of
 shadows, tumultuously tossed and changing; and at every gust the whole
 carpet leaps and becomes new.  Can you or your heart say more?
 
 Look back now, for a moment, on your own brief experience of life; and
 although you lived it feelingly in your own person, and had every step of
 conduct burned in by pains and joys upon your memory, tell me what
 definite lesson does experience hand on from youth to manhood, or from
 both to age?  The settled tenor which first strikes the eye is but the
 shadow of a delusion.  This is gone; that never truly was; and you
 yourself are altered beyond recognition.  Times and men and circumstances
 change about your changing character, with a speed of which no earthly
 hurricane affords an image.  What was the best yesterday, is it still the
 best in this changed theatre of a to-morrow?  Will your own Past truly
 guide you in your own violent and unexpected Future?  And if this be
 questionable, with what humble, with what hopeless eyes, should we not
 watch other men driving beside us on their unknown careers, seeing with
 unlike eyes, impelled by different gales, doing and suffering in another
 sphere of things?
 
 And as the authentic clue to such a labyrinth and change of scene, do you
 offer me these two score words? these five bald prohibitions?  For the
 moral precepts are no more than five; the first four deal rather with
 matters of observance than of conduct; the tenth, _Thou shalt not covet_,
 stands upon another basis, and shall be spoken of ere long.  The Jews, to
 whom they were first given, in the course of years began to find these
 precepts insufficient; and made an addition of no less than six hundred
 and fifty others!  They hoped to make a pocket-book of reference on
 morals, which should stand to life in some such relation, say, as Hoyle
 stands in to the scientific game of whist.  The comparison is just, and
 condemns the design; for those who play by rule will never be more than
 tolerable players; and you and I would like to play our game in life to
 the noblest and the most divine advantage.  Yet if the Jews took a petty
 and huckstering view of conduct, what view do we take ourselves, who
 callously leave youth to go forth into the enchanted forest, full of
 spells and dire chimeras, with no guidance more complete than is afforded
 by these five precepts?
 
 _Honour thy father and thy mother_.  Yes, but does that mean to obey? and
 if so, how long and how far?  _Thou shall not kill_.  Yet the very
 intention and purport of the prohibition may be best fulfilled by
 killing.  _Thou shall not commit adultery_.  But some of the ugliest
 adulteries are committed in the bed of marriage and under the sanction of
 religion and law.  _Thou shalt not bear false witness_.  How? by speech
 or by silence also? or even by a smile?  _Thou shalt not steal_.  Ah,
 that indeed!  But what is _to steal_?
 
 To steal?  It is another word to be construed; and who is to be our
 guide?  The police will give us one construction, leaving the word only
 that least minimum of meaning without which society would fall in pieces;
 but surely we must take some higher sense than this; surely we hope more
 than a bare subsistence for mankind; surely we wish mankind to prosper
 and go on from strength to strength, and ourselves to live rightly in the
 eye of some more exacting potentate than a policeman.  The approval or
 the disapproval of the police must be eternally indifferent to a man who
 is both valorous and good.  There is extreme discomfort, but no shame, in
 the condemnation of the law.  The law represents that modicum of morality
 which can be squeezed out of the ruck of mankind; but what is that to me,
 who aim higher and seek to be my own more stringent judge?  I observe
 with pleasure that no brave man has ever given a rush for such
 considerations.  The Japanese have a nobler and more sentimental feeling
 for this social bond into which we all are born when we come into the
 world, and whose comforts and protection we all indifferently share
 throughout our lives:but even to them, no more than to our Western
 saints and heroes, does the law of the state supersede the higher law of
 duty.  Without hesitation and without remorse, they transgress the
 stiffest enactments rather than abstain from doing right.  But the
 accidental superior duty being thus fulfilled, they at once return in
 allegiance to the common duty of all citizens; and hasten to denounce
 themselves; and value at an equal rate their just crime and their equally
 just submission to its punishment.
 
 The evading of the police will not long satisfy an active conscience or a
 thoughtful head.  But to show you how one or the other may trouble a man,
 and what a vast extent of frontier is left unridden by this invaluable
 eighth commandment, let me tell you a few pages out of a young mans
 life.
 
 He was a friend of mine; a young man like others; generous, flighty, as
 variable as youth itself, but always with some high motions and on the
 search for higher thoughts of life.  I should tell you at once that he
 thoroughly agrees with the eighth commandment.  But he got hold of some
 unsettling works, the New Testament among others, and this loosened his
 views of life and led him into many perplexities.  As he was the son of a
 man in a certain position, and well off, my friend had enjoyed from the
 first the advantages of education, nay, he had been kept alive through a
 sickly childhood by constant watchfulness, comforts, and change of air;
 for all of which he was indebted to his fathers wealth.
 
 At college he met other lads more diligent than himself, who followed the
 plough in summer-time to pay their college fees in winter; and this
 inequality struck him with some force.  He was at that age of a
 conversible temper, and insatiably curious in the aspects of life; and he
 spent much of his time scraping acquaintance with all classes of man- and
 woman-kind.  In this way he came upon many depressed ambitions, and many
 intelligences stunted for want of opportunity; and this also struck him.
 He began to perceive that life was a handicap upon strange, wrong-sided
 principles; and not, as he had been told, a fair and equal race.  He
 began to tremble that he himself had been unjustly favoured, when he saw
 all the avenues of wealth, and power, and comfort closed against so many
 of his superiors and equals, and held unwearyingly open before so idle,
 so desultory, and so dissolute a being as himself.  There sat a youth
 beside him on the college benches, who had only one shirt to his back,
 and, at intervals sufficiently far apart, must stay at home to have it
 washed.  It was my friends principle to stay away as often as he dared;
 for I fear he was no friend to learning.  But there was something that
 came home to him sharply, in this fellow who had to give over study till
 his shirt was washed, and the scores of others who had never an
 opportunity at all.  _If one of these could take his place_, he thought;
 and the thought tore away a bandage from his eyes.  He was eaten by the
 shame of his discoveries, and despised himself as an unworthy favourite
 and a creature of the back-stairs of Fortune.  He could no longer see
 without confusion one of these brave young fellows battling up-hill
 against adversity.  Had he not filched that fellows birthright?  At best
 was he not coldly profiting by the injustice of society, and greedily
 devouring stolen goods?  The money, indeed, belonged to his father, who
 had worked, and thought, and given up his liberty to earn it; but by what
 justice could the money belong to my friend, who had, as yet, done
 nothing but help to squander it?  A more sturdy honesty, joined to a more
 even and impartial temperament, would have drawn from these
 considerations a new force of industry, that this equivocal position
 might be brought as swiftly as possible to an end, and some good services
 to mankind justify the appropriation of expense.  It was not so with my
 friend, who was only unsettled and discouraged, and filled full of that
 trumpeting anger with which young men regard injustices in the first
 blush of youth; although in a few years they will tamely acquiesce in
 their existence, and knowingly profit by their complications.  Yet all
 this while he suffered many indignant pangs.  And once, when he put on
 his boots, like any other unripe donkey, to run away from home, it was
 his best consolation that he was now, at a single plunge, to free himself
 from the responsibility of this wealth that was not his, and do battle
 equally against his fellows in the warfare of life.
 
 Some time after this, falling into ill-health, he was sent at great
 expense to a more favourable climate; and then I think his perplexities
 were thickest.  When he thought of all the other young men of singular
 promise, upright, good, the prop of families, who must remain at home to
 die, and with all their possibilities be lost to life and mankind; and
 how he, by one more unmerited favour, was chosen out from all these
 others to survive; he felt as if there were no life, no labour, no
 devotion of soul and body, that could repay and justify these
 partialities.  A religious lady, to whom he communicated these
 reflections, could see no force in them whatever.  It was Gods will,
 said she.  But he knew it was by Gods will that Joan of Arc was burnt at
 Rouen, which cleared neither Bedford nor Bishop Cauchon; and again, by
 Gods will that Christ was crucified outside Jerusalem, which excused
 neither the rancour of the priests nor the timidity of Pilate.  He knew,
 moreover, that although the possibility of this favour he was now
 enjoying issued from his circumstances, its acceptance was the act of his
 own will; and he had accepted it greedily, longing for rest and sunshine.
 And hence this allegation of Gods providence did little to relieve his
 scruples.  I promise you he had a very troubled mind.  And I would not
 laugh if I were you, though while he was thus making mountains out of
 what you think molehills, he were still (as perhaps he was) contentedly
 practising many other things that to you seem black as hell.  Every man
 is his own judge and mountain-guide through life.  There is an old story
 of a mote and a beam, apparently not true, but worthy perhaps of some
 consideration.  I should, if I were you, give some consideration to these
 scruples of his, and if I were he, I should do the like by yours; for it
 is not unlikely that there may be something under both.  In the meantime
 you must hear how my friend acted.  Like many invalids, he supposed that
 he would die.  Now, should he die, he saw no means of repaying this huge
 loan which, by the hands of his father, mankind had advanced him for his
 sickness.  In that case it would be lost money.  So he determined that
 the advance should be as small as possible; and, so long as he continued
 to doubt his recovery, lived in an upper room, and grudged himself all
 but necessaries.  But so soon as he began to perceive a change for the
 better, he felt justified in spending more freely, to speed and brighten
 his return to health, and trusted in the future to lend a help to
 mankind, as mankind, out of its treasury, had lent a help to him.
 
 I do not say but that my friend was a little too curious and partial in
 his view; nor thought too much of himself and too little of his parents;
 but I do say that here are some scruples which tormented my friend in his
 youth, and still, perhaps, at odd times give him a prick in the midst of
 his enjoyments, and which after all have some foundation in justice, and
 point, in their confused way, to some more honourable honesty within the
 reach of man.  And at least, is not this an unusual gloss upon the eighth
 commandment?  And what sort of comfort, guidance, or illumination did
 that precept afford my friend throughout these contentions?  Thou shalt
 not steal.  With all my heart!  But _am_ I stealing?
 
 The truly quaint materialism of our view of life disables us from
 pursuing any transaction to an end.  You can make no one understand that
 his bargain is anything more than a bargain, whereas in point of fact it
 is a link in the policy of mankind, and either a good or an evil to the
 world.  We have a sort of blindness which prevents us from seeing
 anything but sovereigns.  If one man agrees to give another so many
 shillings for so many hours work, and then wilfully gives him a certain
 proportion of the price in bad money and only the remainder in good, we
 can see with half an eye that this man is a thief.  But if the other
 spends a certain proportion of the hours in smoking a pipe of tobacco,
 and a certain other proportion in looking at the sky, or the clock, or
 trying to recall an air, or in meditation on his own past adventures, and
 only the remainder in downright work such as he is paid to do, is he,
 because the theft is one of time and not of money,is he any the less a
 thief?  The one gave a bad shilling, the other an imperfect hour; but
 both broke the bargain, and each is a thief.  In piecework, which is what
 most of us do, the case is none the less plain for being even less
 material.  If you forge a bad knife, you have wasted some of mankinds
 iron, and then, with unrivalled cynicism, you pocket some of mankinds
 money for your trouble.  Is there any man so blind who cannot see that
 this is theft?  Again, if you carelessly cultivate a farm, you have been
 playing fast and loose with mankinds resources against hunger; there
 will be less bread in consequence, and for lack of that bread somebody
 will die next winter: a grim consideration.  And you must not hope to
 shuffle out of blame because you got less money for your less quantity of
 bread; for although a theft be partly punished, it is none the less a
 theft for that.  You took the farm against competitors; there were others
 ready to shoulder the responsibility and be answerable for the tale of
 loaves; but it was you who took it.  By the act you came under a tacit
 bargain with mankind to cultivate that farm with your best endeavour; you
 were under no superintendence, you were on parole; and you have broke
 your bargain, and to all who look closely, and yourself among the rest if
 you have moral eyesight, you are a thief.  Or take the case of men of
 letters.  Every piece of work which is not as good as you can make it,
 which you have palmed off imperfect, meagrely thought, niggardly in
 execution, upon mankind who is your paymaster on parole and in a sense
 your pupil, every hasty or slovenly or untrue performance, should rise up
 against you in the court of your own heart and condemn you for a thief.
 Have you a salary?  If you trifle with your health, and so render
 yourself less capable for duty, and still touch, and still greedily
 pocket the emolumentwhat are you but a thief?  Have you double accounts?
 do you by any time-honoured juggle, deceit, or ambiguous process, gain
 more from those who deal with you than it you were bargaining and dealing
 face to face in front of God?What are you but a thief?  Lastly, if you
 fill an office, or produce an article, which, in your heart of hearts,
 you think a delusion and a fraud upon mankind, and still draw your salary
 and go through the sham manuvres of this office, or still book your
 profits and keep on flooding the world with these injurious goods?though
 you were old, and bald, and the first at church, and a baronet, what are
 you but a thief?  These may seem hard words and mere curiosities of the
 intellect, in an age when the spirit of honesty is so sparingly
 cultivated that all business is conducted upon lies and so-called customs
 of the trade, that not a man bestows two thoughts on the utility or
 honourableness of his pursuit.  I would say less if I thought less.  But
 looking to my own reason and the right of things, I can only avow that I
 am a thief myself, and that I passionately suspect my neighbours of the
 same guilt.
 
 Where did you hear that it was easy to be honest?  Do you find that in
 your Bible?  Easy!  It is easy to be an ass and follow the multitude like
 a blind, besotted bull in a stampede; and that, I am well aware, is what
 you and Mrs. Grundy mean by being honest.  But it will not bear the
 stress of time nor the scrutiny of conscience.  Even before the lowest of
 all tribunals,before a court of law, whose business it is, not to keep
 men right, or within a thousand miles of right, but to withhold them from
 going so tragically wrong that they will pull down the whole jointed
 fabric of society by their misdeedseven before a court of law, as we
 begin to see in these last days, our easy view of following at each
 others tails, alike to good and evil, is beginning to be reproved and
 punished, and declared no honesty at all, but open theft and swindling;
 and simpletons who have gone on through life with a quiet conscience may
 learn suddenly, from the lips of a judge, that the custom of the trade
 may be a custom of the devil.  You thought it was easy to be honest.  Did
 you think it was easy to be just and kind and truthful?  Did you think
 the whole duty of aspiring man was as simple as a horn-pipe? and you
 could walk through life like a gentleman and a hero, with no more concern
 than it takes to go to church or to address a circular?  And yet all this
 time you had the eighth commandment! and, what makes it richer, you would
 not have broken it for the world!
 
 The truth is, that these commandments by themselves are of little use in
 private judgment.  If compression is what you want, you have their whole
 spirit compressed into the golden rule; and yet there expressed with more
 significance, since the law is there spiritually and not materially
 stated.  And in truth, four out of these ten commands, from the sixth to
 the ninth, are rather legal than ethical.  The police-court is their
 proper home.  A magistrate cannot tell whether you love your neighbour as
 yourself, but he can tell more or less whether you have murdered, or
 stolen, or committed adultery, or held up your hand and testified to that
 which was not; and these things, for rough practical tests, are as good
 as can be found.  And perhaps, therefore, the best condensation of the
 Jewish moral law is in the maxims of the priests, neminem ldere and
 suum cuique tribuere.  But all this granted, it becomes only the more
 plain that they are inadequate in the sphere of personal morality; that
 while they tell the magistrate roughly when to punish, they can never
 direct an anxious sinner what to do.
 
 Only Polonius, or the like solemn sort of ass, can offer us a succinct
 proverb by way of advice, and not burst out blushing in our faces.  We
 grant them one and all and for all that they are worth; it is something
 above and beyond that we desire.  Christ was in general a great enemy to
 such a way of teaching; we rarely find him meddling with any of these
 plump commands but it was to open them out, and lift his hearers from the
 letter to the spirit.  For morals are a personal affair; in the war of
 righteousness every man fights for his own hand; all the six hundred
 precepts of the Mishna cannot shake my private judgment; my magistracy of
 myself is an indefeasible charge, and my decisions absolute for the time
 and case.  The moralist is not a judge of appeal, but an advocate who
 pleads at my tribunal.  He has to show not the law, but that the law
 applies.  Can he convince me? then he gains the cause.  And thus you find
 Christ giving various counsels to varying people, and often jealously
 careful to avoid definite precept.  Is he asked, for example, to divide a
 heritage?  He refuses: and the best advice that he will offer is but a
 paraphrase of that tenth commandment which figures so strangely among the
 rest.  _Take heed, and beware of covetousness_.  If you complain that
 this is vague, I have failed to carry you along with me in my argument.
 For no definite precept can be more than an illustration, though its
 truth were resplendent like the sun, and it was announced from heaven by
 the voice of God.  And life is so intricate and changing, that perhaps
 not twenty times, or perhaps not twice in the ages, shall we find that
 nice consent of circumstances to which alone it can apply.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 Although the world and life have in a sense become commonplace to our
 experience, it is but in an external torpor; the true sentiment slumbers
 within us; and we have but to reflect on ourselves or our surroundings to
 rekindle our astonishment.  No length of habit can blunt our first
 surprise.  Of the world I have but little to say in this connection; a
 few strokes shall suffice.  We inhabit a dead ember swimming wide in the
 blank of space, dizzily spinning as it swims, and lighted up from several
 million miles away by a more horrible hell-fire than was ever conceived
 by the theological imagination.  Yet the dead ember is a green,
 commodious dwelling-place; and the reverberation of this hell-fire ripens
 flower and fruit and mildly warms us on summer eves upon the lawn.  Far
 off on all hands other dead embers, other flaming suns, wheel and race in
 the apparent void; the nearest is out of call, the farthest so far that
 the heart sickens in the effort to conceive the distance.  Shipwrecked
 seamen on the deep, though they bestride but the truncheon of a boom, are
 safe and near at home compared with mankind on its bullet.  Even to us
 who have known no other, it seems a strange, if not an appalling, place
 of residence.
 
 But far stranger is the resident, man, a creature compact of wonders
 that, after centuries of custom, is still wonderful to himself.  He
 inhabits a body which he is continually outliving, discarding and
 renewing.  Food and sleep, by an unknown alchemy, restore his spirits and
 the freshness of his countenance.  Hair grows on him like grass; his
 eyes, his brain, his sinews, thirst for action; he joys to see and touch
 and hear, to partake the sun and wind, to sit down and intently ponder on
 his astonishing attributes and situation, to rise up and run, to perform
 the strange and revolting round of physical functions.  The sight of a
 flower, the note of a bird, will often move him deeply; yet he looks
 unconcerned on the impassable distances and portentous bonfires of the
 universe.  He comprehends, he designs, he tames nature, rides the sea,
 ploughs, climbs the air in a balloon, makes vast inquiries, begins
 interminable labours, joins himself into federations and populous cities,
 spends his days to deliver the ends of the earth or to benefit unborn
 posterity; and yet knows himself for a piece of unsurpassed fragility and
 the creature of a few days.  His sight, which conducts him, which takes
 notice of the farthest stars, which is miraculous in every way and a
 thing defying explanation or belief, is yet lodged in a piece of jelly,
 and can be extinguished with a touch.  His heart, which all through life
 so indomitably, so athletically labours, is but a capsule, and may be
 stopped with a pin.  His whole body, for all its savage energies, its
 leaping and its winged desires, may yet be tamed and conquered by a
 draught of air or a sprinkling of cold dew.  What he calls death, which
 is the seeming arrest of everything, and the ruin and hateful
 transformation of the visible body, lies in wait for him outwardly in a
 thousand accidents, and grows up in secret diseases from within.  He is
 still learning to be a man when his faculties are already beginning to
 decline; he has not yet understood himself or his position before he
 inevitably dies.  And yet this mad, chimerical creature can take no
 thought of his last end, lives as though he were eternal, plunges with
 his vulnerable body into the shock of war, and daily affronts death with
 unconcern.  He cannot take a step without pain or pleasure.  His life is
 a tissue of sensations, which he distinguishes as they seem to come more
 directly from himself or his surroundings.  He is conscious of himself as
 a joyer or a sufferer, as that which craves, chooses, and is satisfied;
 conscious of his surroundings as it were of an inexhaustible purveyor,
 the source of aspects, inspirations, wonders, cruel knocks and
 transporting caresses.  Thus he goes on his way, stumbling among delights
 and agonies.
 
 Matter is a far-fetched theory, and materialism is without a root in man.
 To him everything is important in the degree to which it moves him.  The
 telegraph wires and posts, the electricity speeding from clerk to clerk,
 the clerks, the glad or sorrowful import of the message, and the paper on
 which it is finally brought to him at home, are all equally facts, all
 equally exist for man.  A word or a thought can wound him as acutely as a
 knife of steel.  If he thinks he is loved, he will rise up and glory to
 himself, although he be in a distant land and short of necessary bread.
 Does he think he is not loved?he may have the woman at his beck, and
 there is not a joy for him in all the world.  Indeed, if we are to make
 any account of this figment of reason, the distinction between material
 and immaterial, we shall conclude that the life of each man as an
 individual is immaterial, although the continuation and prospects of
 mankind as a race turn upon material conditions.  The physical business
 of each mans body is transacted for him; like a sybarite, he has
 attentive valets in his own viscera; he breathes, he sweats, he digests
 without an effort, or so much as a consenting volition; for the most part
 he even eats, not with a wakeful consciousness, but as it were between
 two thoughts.  His life is centred among other and more important
 considerations; touch him in his honour or his love, creatures of the
 imagination which attach him to mankind or to an individual man or woman;
 cross him in his piety which connects his soul with heaven; and he turns
 from his food, he loathes his breath, and with a magnanimous emotion cuts
 the knots of his existence and frees himself at a blow from the web of
 pains and pleasures.
 
 It follows that man is twofold at least; that he is not a rounded and
 autonomous empire; but that in the same body with him there dwell other
 powers tributary but independent.  If I now behold one walking in a
 garden, curiously coloured and illuminated by the sun, digesting his food
 with elaborate chemistry, breathing, circulating blood, directing himself
 by the sight of his eyes, accommodating his body by a thousand delicate
 balancings to the wind and the uneven surface of the path, and all the
 time, perhaps, with his mind engaged about America, or the dog-star, or
 the attributes of Godwhat am I to say, or how am I to describe the thing
 I see?  Is that truly a man, in the rigorous meaning of the word? or is
 it not a man and something else?  What, then, are we to count the
 centre-bit and axle of a being so variously compounded?  It is a question
 much debated.  Some read his history in a certain intricacy of nerve and
 the success of successive digestions; others find him an exiled piece of
 heaven blown upon and determined by the breath of God; and both schools
 of theorists will scream like scalded children at a word of doubt.  Yet
 either of these views, however plausible, is beside the question; either
 may be right; and I care not; I ask a more particular answer, and to a
 more immediate point.  What is the man?  There is Something that was
 before hunger and that remains behind after a meal.  It may or may not be
 engaged in any given act or passion, but when it is, it changes,
 heightens, and sanctifies.  Thus it is not engaged in lust, where
 satisfaction ends the chapter; and it is engaged in love, where no
 satisfaction can blunt the edge of the desire, and where age, sickness,
 or alienation may deface what was desirable without diminishing the
 sentiment.  This something, which is the man, is a permanence which
 abides through the vicissitudes of passion, now overwhelmed and now
 triumphant, now unconscious of itself in the immediate distress of
 appetite or pain, now rising unclouded above all.  So, to the man, his
 own central self fades and grows clear again amid the tumult of the
 senses, like a revolving Pharos in the night.  It is forgotten; it is
 hid, it seems, for ever; and yet in the next calm hour he shall behold
 himself once more, shining and unmoved among changes and storm.
 
 Mankind, in the sense of the creeping mass that is born and eats, that
 generates and dies, is but the aggregate of the outer and lower sides of
 man.  This inner consciousness, this lantern alternately obscured and
 shining, to and by which the individual exists and must order his
 conduct, is something special to himself and not common to the race.  His
 joys delight, his sorrows wound him, according as _this_ is interested or
 indifferent in the affair; according as they arise in an imperial war or
 in a broil conducted by the tributary chieftains of the mind.  He may
 lose all, and _this_ not suffer; he may lose what is materially a trifle,
 and _this_ leap in his bosom with a cruel pang.  I do not speak of it to
 hardened theorists: the living man knows keenly what it is I mean.
 
 Perceive at last that thou hast in thee something better and more divine
 than the things which cause the various effects, and, as it were, pull
 thee by the strings.  What is that now in thy mind? is it fear, or
 suspicion, or desire, or anything of that kind?  Thus far Marcus
 Aurelius, in one of the most notable passages in any book.  Here is a
 question worthy to be answered.  What is in thy mind?  What is the
 utterance of your inmost self when, in a quiet hour, it can be heard
 intelligibly?  It is something beyond the compass of your thinking,
 inasmuch as it is yourself; but is it not of a higher spirit than you had
 dreamed betweenwhiles, and erect above all base considerations?  This
 soul seems hardly touched with our infirmities; we can find in it
 certainly no fear, suspicion, or desire; we are only consciousand that
 as though we read it in the eyes of some one elseof a great and
 unqualified readiness.  A readiness to what? to pass over and look beyond
 the objects of desire and fear, for something else.  And this something
 else? this something which is apart from desire and fear, to which all
 the kingdoms of the world and the immediate death of the body are alike
 indifferent and beside the point, and which yet regards conductby what
 name are we to call it?  It may be the love of God; or it may be an
 inherited (and certainly well concealed) instinct to preserve self and
 propagate the race; I am not, for the moment, averse to either theory;
 but it will save time to call it righteousness.  By so doing I intend no
 subterfuge to beg a question; I am indeed ready, and more than willing,
 to accept the rigid consequence, and lay aside, as far as the treachery
 of the reason will permit, all former meanings attached to the word
 righteousness.  What is right is that for which a mans central self is
 ever ready to sacrifice immediate or distant interests; what is wrong is
 what the central self discards or rejects as incompatible with the fixed
 design of righteousness.
 
 To make this admission is to lay aside all hope of definition.  That
 which is right upon this theory is intimately dictated to each man by
 himself, but can never be rigorously set forth in language, and never,
 above all, imposed upon another.  The conscience has, then, a vision like
 that of the eyes, which is incommunicable, and for the most part
 illuminates none but its possessor.  When many people perceive the same
 or any cognate facts, they agree upon a word as symbol; and hence we have
 such words as _tree_, _star_, _love_, _honour_, or _death_; hence also we
 have this word _right_, which, like the others, we all understand, most
 of us understand differently, and none can express succinctly otherwise.
 Yet even on the straitest view, we can make some steps towards
 comprehension of our own superior thoughts.  For it is an incredible and
 most bewildering fact that a man, through life, is on variable terms with
 himself; he is aware of tiffs and reconciliations; the intimacy is at
 times almost suspended, at times it is renewed again with joy.  As we
 said before, his inner self or soul appears to him by successive
 revelations, and is frequently obscured.  It is from a study of these
 alternations that we can alone hope to discover, even dimly, what seems
 right and what seems wrong to this veiled prophet of ourself.
 
 All that is in the man in the larger sense, what we call impression as
 well as what we call intuition, so far as my argument looks, we must
 accept.  It is not wrong to desire food, or exercise, or beautiful
 surroundings, or the love of sex, or interest which is the food of the
 mind.  All these are craved; all these should be craved; to none of these
 in itself does the soul demur; where there comes an undeniable want, we
 recognise a demand of nature.  Yet we know that these natural demands may
 be superseded; for the demands which are common to mankind make but a
 shadowy consideration in comparison to the demands of the individual
 soul.  Food is almost the first prerequisite; and yet a high character
 will go without food to the ruin and death of the body rather than gain
 it in a manner which the spirit disavows.  Pascal laid aside mathematics;
 Origen doctored his body with a knife; every day some one is thus
 mortifying his dearest interests and desires, and, in Christs words,
 entering maim into the Kingdom of Heaven.  This is to supersede the
 lesser and less harmonious affections by renunciation; and though by this
 ascetic path we may get to heaven, we cannot get thither a whole and
 perfect man.  But there is another way, to supersede them by
 reconciliation, in which the soul and all the faculties and senses pursue
 a common route and share in one desire.  Thus, man is tormented by a very
 imperious physical desire; it spoils his rest, it is not to be denied;
 the doctors will tell you, not I, how it is a physical need, like the
 want of food or slumber.  In the satisfaction of this desire, as it first
 appears, the soul sparingly takes part; nay, it oft unsparingly regrets
 and disapproves the satisfaction.  But let the man learn to love a woman
 as far as he is capable of love; and for this random affection of the
 body there is substituted a steady determination, a consent of all his
 powers and faculties, which supersedes, adopts, and commands the other.
 The desire survives, strengthened, perhaps, but taught obedience and
 changed in scope and character.  Life is no longer a tale of betrayals
 and regrets; for the man now lives as a whole; his consciousness now
 moves on uninterrupted like a river; through all the extremes and ups and
 downs of passion, he remains approvingly conscious of himself.
 
 Now to me, this seems a type of that rightness which the soul demands.
 It demands that we shall not live alternately with our opposing
 tendencies in continual see-saw of passion and disgust, but seek some
 path on which the tendencies shall no longer oppose, but serve each other
 to a common end.  It demands that we shall not pursue broken ends, but
 great and comprehensive purposes, in which soul and body may unite like
 notes in a harmonious chord.  That were indeed a way of peace and
 pleasure, that were indeed a heaven upon earth.  It does not demand,
 however, or, to speak in measure, it does not demand of me, that I should
 starve my appetites for no purpose under heaven but as a purpose in
 itself; or, in a weak despair, pluck out the eye that I have not yet
 learned to guide and enjoy with wisdom.  The soul demands unity of
 purpose, not the dismemberment of man; it seeks to roll up all his
 strength and sweetness, all his passion and wisdom, into one, and make of
 him a perfect man exulting in perfection.  To conclude ascetically is to
 give up, and not to solve, the problem.  The ascetic and the creeping
 hog, although they are at different poles, have equally failed in life.
 The one has sacrificed his crew; the other brings back his seamen in a
 cock-boat, and has lost the ship.  I believe there are not many
 sea-captains who would plume themselves on either result as a success.
 
 But if it is righteousness thus to fuse together our divisive impulses
 and march with one mind through life, there is plainly one thing more
 unrighteous than all others, and one declension which is irretrievable
 and draws on the rest.  And this is to lose consciousness of oneself.  In
 the best of times, it is but by flashes, when our whole nature is clear,
 strong and conscious, and events conspire to leave us free, that we enjoy
 communion with our soul.  At the worst, we are so fallen and passive that
 we may say shortly we have none.  An arctic torpor seizes upon men.
 Although built of nerves, and set adrift in a stimulating world, they
 develop a tendency to go bodily to sleep; consciousness becomes engrossed
 among the reflex and mechanical parts of life; and soon loses both the
 will and power to look higher considerations in the face.  This is ruin;
 this is the last failure in life; this is temporal damnation, damnation
 on the spot and without the form of judgment.  What shall it profit a
 man if he gain the whole world and _lose himself_?
 
 It is to keep a man awake, to keep him alive to his own soul and its
 fixed design of righteousness, that the better part of moral and
 religious education is directed; not only that of words and doctors, but
 the sharp ferule of calamity under which we are all Gods scholars till
 we die.  If, as teachers, we are to say anything to the purpose, we must
 say what will remind the pupil of his soul; we must speak that souls
 dialect; we must talk of life and conduct as his soul would have him
 think of them.  If, from some conformity between us and the pupil, or
 perhaps among all men, we do in truth speak in such a dialect and express
 such views, beyond question we shall touch in him a spring; beyond
 question he will recognise the dialect as one that he himself has spoken
 in his better hours; beyond question he will cry, I had forgotten, but
 now I remember; I too have eyes, and I had forgot to use them!  I too
 have a soul of my own, arrogantly upright, and to that I will listen and
 conform.  In short, say to him anything that he has once thought, or
 been upon the point of thinking, or show him any view of life that he has
 once clearly seen, or been upon the point of clearly seeing; and you have
 done your part and may leave him to complete the education for himself.
 
 Now, the view taught at the present time seems to me to want greatness;
 and the dialect in which alone it can be intelligibly uttered is not the
 dialect of my soul.  It is a sort of postponement of life; nothing quite
 is, but something different is to be; we are to keep our eyes upon the
 indirect from the cradle to the grave.  We are to regulate our conduct
 not by desire, but by a politic eye upon the future; and to value acts as
 they will bring us money or good opinion; as they will bring us, in one
 word, _profit_.  We must be what is called respectable, and offend no one
 by our carriage; it will not do to make oneself conspicuouswho knows?
 even in virtue? says the Christian parent!  And we must be what is called
 prudent and make money; not only because it is pleasant to have money,
 but because that also is a part of respectability, and we cannot hope to
 be received in society without decent possessions.  Received in society!
 as if that were the kingdom of heaven!  There is dear Mr. So-and-so;look
 at him!so much respectedso much looked up toquite the Christian
 merchant!  And we must cut our conduct as strictly as possible after the
 pattern of Mr. So-and-so; and lay our whole lives to make money and be
 strictly decent.  Besides these holy injunctions, which form by far the
 greater part of a youths training in our Christian homes, there are at
 least two other doctrines.  We are to live just now as well as we can,
 but scrape at last into heaven, where we shall be good.  We are to worry
 through the week in a lay, disreputable way, but, to make matters square,
 live a different life on Sunday.
 
 The train of thought we have been following gives us a key to all these
 positions, without stepping aside to justify them on their own ground.
 It is because we have been disgusted fifty times with physical squalls,
 and fifty times torn between conflicting impulses, that we teach people
 this indirect and tactical procedure in life, and to judge by remote
 consequences instead of the immediate face of things.  The very desire to
 act as our own souls would have us, coupled with a pathetic disbelief in
 ourselves, moves us to follow the example of others; perhaps, who knows?
 they may be on the right track; and the more our patterns are in number,
 the better seems the chance; until, if we be acting in concert with a
 whole civilised nation, there are surely a majority of chances that we
 must be acting right.  And again, how true it is that we can never behave
 as we wish in this tormented sphere, and can only aspire to different and
 more favourable circumstances, in order to stand out and be ourselves
 wholly and rightly!  And yet once more, if in the hurry and pressure of
 affairs and passions you tend to nod and become drowsy, here are
 twenty-four hours of Sunday set apart for you to hold counsel with your
 soul and look around you on the possibilities of life.
 
 This is not, of course, all that is to be, or even should be, said for
 these doctrines.  Only, in the course of this chapter, the reader and I
 have agreed upon a few catchwords, and been looking at morals on a
 certain system; it was a pity to lose an opportunity of testing the
 catchwords, and seeing whether, by this system as well as by others,
 current doctrines could show any probable justification.  If the
 doctrines had come too badly out of the trial, it would have condemned
 the system.  Our sight of the world is very narrow; the mind but a
 pedestrian instrument; theres nothing new under the sun, as Solomon
 says, except the man himself; and though that changes the aspect of
 everything else, yet he must see the same things as other people, only
 from a different side.
 
 And now, having admitted so much, let us turn to criticism.
 
 If you teach a man to keep his eyes upon what others think of him,
 unthinkingly to lead the life and hold the principles of the majority of
 his contemporaries, you must discredit in his eyes the one authoritative
 voice of his own soul.  He may be a docile citizen; he will never be a
 man.  It is ours, on the other hand, to disregard this babble and
 chattering of other men better and worse than we are, and to walk
 straight before us by what light we have.  They may be right; but so,
 before heaven, are we.  They may know; but we know also, and by that
 knowledge we must stand or fall.  There is such a thing as loyalty to a
 mans own better self; and from those who have not that, God help me, how
 am I to look for loyalty to others?  The most dull, the most imbecile, at
 a certain moment turn round, at a certain point will hear no further
 argument, but stand unflinching by their own dumb, irrational sense of
 right.  It is not only by steel or fire, but through contempt and blame,
 that the martyr fulfils the calling of his dear soul.  Be glad if you are
 not tried by such extremities.  But although all the world ranged
 themselves in one line to tell you This is wrong, be you your own
 faithful vassal and the ambassador of Godthrow down the glove and answer
 This is right.  Do you think you are only declaring yourself?  Perhaps
 in some dim way, like a child who delivers a message not fully
 understood, you are opening wider the straits of prejudice and preparing
 mankind for some truer and more spiritual grasp of truth; perhaps, as you
 stand forth for your own judgment, you are covering a thousand weak ones
 with your body; perhaps, by this declaration alone, you have avoided the
 guilt of false witness against humanity and the little ones unborn.  It
 is good, I believe, to be respectable, but much nobler to respect oneself
 and utter the voice of God.  God, if there be any God, speaks daily in a
 new language by the tongues of men; the thoughts and habits of each fresh
 generation and each new-coined spirit throw another light upon the
 universe and contain another commentary on the printed Bibles; every
 scruple, every true dissent, every glimpse of something new, is a letter
 of Gods alphabet; and though there is a grave responsibility for all who
 speak, is there none for those who unrighteously keep silence and
 conform?  Is not that also to conceal and cloak Gods counsel?  And how
 should we regard the man of science who suppressed all facts that would
 not tally with the orthodoxy of the hour?
 
 Wrong?  You are as surely wrong as the sun rose this morning round the
 revolving shoulder of the world.  Not truth, but truthfulness, is the
 good of your endeavour.  For when will men receive that first part and
 prerequisite of truth, that, by the order of things, by the greatness of
 the universe, by the darkness and partiality of mans experience, by the
 inviolate secrecy of God, kept close in His most open revelations, every
 man is, and to the end of the ages must be, wrong?  Wrong to the
 universe; wrong to mankind; wrong to God.  And yet in another sense, and
 that plainer and nearer, every man of men, who wishes truly, must be
 right.  He is right to himself, and in the measure of his sagacity and
 candour.  That let him do in all sincerity and zeal, not sparing a
 thought for contrary opinions; that, for what it is worth, let him
 proclaim.  Be not afraid; although he be wrong, so also is the dead,
 stuffed Dagon he insults.  For the voice of God, whatever it is, is not
 that stammering, inept tradition which the people holds.  These truths
 survive in travesty, swamped in a world of spiritual darkness and
 confusion; and what a few comprehend and faithfully hold, the many, in
 their dead jargon, repeat, degrade, and misinterpret.
 
 So far of Respectability; what the Covenanters used to call rank
 conformity: the deadliest gag and wet blanket that can be laid on men.
 And now of Profit.  And this doctrine is perhaps the more redoubtable,
 because it harms all sorts of men; not only the heroic and self-reliant,
 but the obedient, cowlike squadrons.  A man, by this doctrine, looks to
 consequences at the second, or third, or fiftieth turn.  He chooses his
 end, and for that, with wily turns and through a great sea of tedium,
 steers this mortal bark.  There may be political wisdom in such a view;
 but I am persuaded there can spring no great moral zeal.  To look thus
 obliquely upon life is the very recipe for moral slumber.  Our intention
 and endeavour should be directed, not on some vague end of money or
 applause, which shall come to us by a ricochet in a month or a year, or
 twenty years, but on the act itself; not on the approval of others, but
 on the rightness of that act.  At every instant, at every step in life,
 the point has to be decided, our soul has to be saved, heaven has to be
 gained or lost.  At every step our spirits must applaud, at every step we
 must set down the foot and sound the trumpet.  This have I done, we
 must say; right or wrong, this have I done, in unfeigned honour of
 intention, as to myself and God.  The profit of every act should be
 this, that it was right for us to do it.  Any other profit than that, if
 it involved a kingdom or the woman I love, ought, if I were Gods upright
 soldier, to leave me untempted.
 
 It is the mark of what we call a righteous decision, that it is made
 directly and for its own sake.  The whole man, mind and body, having come
 to an agreement, tyrannically dictates conduct.  There are two
 dispositions eternally opposed: that in which we recognise that one thing
 is wrong and another right, and that in which, not seeing any clear
 distinction, we fall back on the consideration of consequences.  The
 truth is, by the scope of our present teaching, nothing is thought very
 wrong and nothing very right, except a few actions which have the
 disadvantage of being disrespectable when found out; the more serious
 part of men inclining to think all things _rather wrong_, the more jovial
 to suppose them _right enough for practical purposes_.  I will engage my
 head, they do not find that view in their own hearts; they have taken it
 up in a dark despair; they are but troubled sleepers talking in their
 sleep.  The soul, or my soul at least, thinks very distinctly upon many
 points of right and wrong, and often differs flatly with what is held out
 as the thought of corporate humanity in the code of society or the code
 of law.  Am I to suppose myself a monster?  I have only to read books,
 the Christian Gospels for example, to think myself a monster no longer;
 and instead I think the mass of people are merely speaking in their
 sleep.
 
 It is a commonplace, enshrined, if I mistake not, even in school
 copy-books, that honour is to be sought and not fame.  I ask no other
 admission; we are to seek honour, upright walking with our own conscience
 every hour of the day, and not fame, the consequence, the far-off
 reverberation of our footsteps.  The walk, not the rumour of the walk, is
 what concerns righteousness.  Better disrespectable honour than
 dishonourable fame.  Better useless or seemingly hurtful honour, than
 dishonour ruling empires and filling the mouths of thousands.  For the
 man must walk by what he sees, and leave the issue with God who made him
 and taught him by the fortune of his life.  You would not dishonour
 yourself for money; which is at least tangible; would you do it, then,
 for a doubtful forecast in politics, or another persons theory in
 morals?
 
 So intricate is the scheme of our affairs, that no man can calculate the
 bearing of his own behaviour even on those immediately around him, how
 much less upon the world at large or on succeeding generations!  To walk
 by external prudence and the rule of consequences would require, not a
 man, but God.  All that we know to guide us in this changing labyrinth is
 our soul with its fixed design of righteousness, and a few old precepts
 which commend themselves to that.  The precepts are vague when we
 endeavour to apply them; consequences are more entangled than a wisp of
 string, and their confusion is unrestingly in change; we must hold to
 what we know and walk by it.  We must walk by faith, indeed, and not by
 knowledge.
 
 You do not love another because he is wealthy or wise or eminently
 respectable: you love him because you love him; that is love, and any
 other only a derision and grimace.  It should be the same with all our
 actions.  If we were to conceive a perfect man, it should be one who was
 never torn between conflicting impulses, but who, on the absolute consent
 of all his parts and faculties, submitted in every action of his life to
 a self-dictation as absolute and unreasoned as that which bids him love
 one woman and be true to her till death.  But we should not conceive him
 as sagacious, ascetical, playing off his appetites against each other,
 turning the wing of public respectable immorality instead of riding it
 directly down, or advancing toward his end through a thousand sinister
 compromises and considerations.  The one man might be wily, might be
 adroit, might be wise, might be respectable, might be gloriously useful;
 it is the other man who would be good.
 
 The soul asks honour and not fame; to be upright, not to be successful;
 to be good, not prosperous; to be essentially, not outwardly,
 respectable.  Does your soul ask profit?  Does it ask money?  Does it ask
 the approval of the indifferent herd?  I believe not.  For my own part, I
 want but little money, I hope; and I do not want to be decent at all, but
 to be good.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 We have spoken of that supreme self-dictation which keeps varying from
 hour to hour in its dictates with the variation of events and
 circumstances.  Now, for us, that is ultimate.  It may be founded on some
 reasonable process, but it is not a process which we can follow or
 comprehend.  And moreover the dictation is not continuous, or not
 continuous except in very lively and well-living natures; and
 between-whiles we must brush along without it.  Practice is a more
 intricate and desperate business than the toughest theorising; life is an
 affair of cavalry, where rapid judgment and prompt action are alone
 possible and right.  As a matter of fact, there is no one so upright but
 he is influenced by the worlds chatter; and no one so headlong but he
 requires to consider consequences and to keep an eye on profit.  For the
 soul adopts all affections and appetites without exception, and cares
 only to combine them for some common purpose which shall interest all.
 Now, respect for the opinion of others, the study of consequences, and
 the desire of power and comfort, are all undeniably factors in the nature
 of man; and the more undeniably since we find that, in our current
 doctrines, they have swallowed up the others and are thought to conclude
 in themselves all the worthy parts of man.  These, then, must also be
 suffered to affect conduct in the practical domain, much or little
 according as they are forcibly or feebly present to the mind of each.
 
 Now, a mans view of the universe is mostly a view of the civilised
 society in which he lives.  Other men and women are so much more grossly
 and so much more intimately palpable to his perceptions, that they stand
 between him and all the rest; they are larger to his eye than the sun, he
 hears them more plainly than thunder, with them, by them, and for them,
 he must live and die.  And hence the laws that affect his intercourse
 with his fellow-men, although merely customary and the creatures of a
 generation, are more clearly and continually before his mind than those
 which bind him into the eternal system of things, support him in his
 upright progress on this whirling ball, or keep up the fire of his bodily
 life.  And hence it is that money stands in the first rank of
 considerations and so powerfully affects the choice.  For our society is
 built with money for mortar; money is present in every joint of
 circumstance; it might be named the social atmosphere, since, in society,
 it is by that alone that men continue to live, and only through that or
 chance that they can reach or affect one another.  Money gives us food,
 shelter, and privacy; it permits us to be clean in person, opens for us
 the doors of the theatre, gains us books for study or pleasure, enables
 us to help the distresses of others, and puts us above necessity so that
 we can choose the best in life.  If we love, it enables us to meet and
 live with the loved one, or even to prolong her health and life; if we
 have scruples, it gives us an opportunity to be honest; if we have any
 bright designs, here is what will smooth the way to their accomplishment.
 Penury is the worst slavery, and will soon lead to death.
 
 But money is only a means; it presupposes a man to use it.  The rich can
 go where he pleases, but perhaps please himself nowhere.  He can buy a
 library or visit the whole world, but perhaps has neither patience to
 read nor intelligence to see.  The table may be loaded and the appetite
 wanting; the purse may be full, and the heart empty.  He may have gained
 the world and lost himself; and with all his wealth around him, in a
 great house and spacious and beautiful demesne, he may live as blank a
 life as any tattered ditcher.  Without an appetite, without an
 aspiration, void of appreciation, bankrupt of desire and hope, there, in
 his great house, let him sit and look upon his fingers.  It is perhaps a
 more fortunate destiny to have a taste for collecting shells than to be
 born a millionaire.  Although neither is to be despised, it is always
 better policy to learn an interest than to make a thousand pounds; for
 the money will soon be spent, or perhaps you may feel no joy in spending
 it; but the interest remains imperishable and ever new.  To become a
 botanist, a geologist, a social philosopher, an antiquary, or an artist,
 is to enlarge ones possessions in the universe by an incalculably higher
 degree, and by a far surer sort of property, than to purchase a farm of
 many acres.  You had perhaps two thousand a year before the transaction;
 perhaps you have two thousand five hundred after it.  That represents
 your gain in the one case.  But in the other, you have thrown down a
 barrier which concealed significance and beauty.  The blind man has
 learned to see.  The prisoner has opened up a window in his cell and
 beholds enchanting prospects; he will never again be a prisoner as he
 was; he can watch clouds and changing seasons, ships on the river,
 travellers on the road, and the stars at night; happy prisoner! his eyes
 have broken jail!  And again he who has learned to love an art or science
 has wisely laid up riches against the day of riches; if prosperity come,
 he will not enter poor into his inheritance; he will not slumber and
 forget himself in the lap of money, or spend his hours in counting idle
 treasures, but be up and briskly doing; he will have the true alchemic
 touch, which is not that of Midas, but which transmutes dead money into
 living delight and satisfaction.  _tre et pas avoir_to be, not to
 possessthat is the problem of life.  To be wealthy, a rich nature is the
 first requisite and money but the second.  To be of a quick and healthy
 blood, to share in all honourable curiosities, to be rich in admiration
 and free from envy, to rejoice greatly in the good of others, to love
 with such generosity of heart that your love is still a dear possession
 in absence or unkindnessthese are the gifts of fortune which money
 cannot buy and without which money can buy nothing.  For what can a man
 possess, or what can he enjoy, except himself?  If he enlarge his nature,
 it is then that he enlarges his estates.  If his nature be happy and
 valiant, he will enjoy the universe as if it were his park and orchard.
 
 But money is not only to be spent; it has also to be earned.  It is not
 merely a convenience or a necessary in social life; but it is the coin in
 which mankind pays his wages to the individual man.  And from this side,
 the question of money has a very different scope and application.  For no
 man can be honest who does not work.  Service for service.  If the farmer
 buys corn, and the labourer ploughs and reaps, and the baker sweats in
 his hot bakery, plainly you who eat must do something in your turn.  It
 is not enough to take off your hat, or to thank God upon your knees for
 the admirable constitution of society and your own convenient situation
 in its upper and more ornamental stories.  Neither is it enough to buy
 the loaf with a sixpence; for then you are only changing the point of the
 inquiry; and you must first have _bought the sixpence_.  Service for
 service: how have you bought your sixpences?  A man of spirit desires
 certainty in a thing of such a nature; he must see to it that there is
 some reciprocity between him and mankind; that he pays his expenditure in
 service; that he has not a lions share in profit and a drones in
 labour; and is not a sleeping partner and mere costly incubus on the
 great mercantile concern of mankind.
 
 Services differ so widely with different gifts, and some are so
 inappreciable to external tests, that this is not only a matter for the
 private conscience, but one which even there must be leniently and
 trustfully considered.  For remember how many serve mankind who do no
 more than meditate; and how many are precious to their friends for no
 more than a sweet and joyous temper.  To perform the function of a man of
 letters it is not necessary to write; nay, it is perhaps better to be a
 living book.  So long as we love we serve; so long as we are loved by
 others, I would almost say that we are indispensable; and no man is
 useless while he has a friend.  The true services of life are inestimable
 in money, and are never paid.  Kind words and caresses, high and wise
 thoughts, humane designs, tender behaviour to the weak and suffering, and
 all the charities of mans existence, are neither bought nor sold.
 
 Yet the dearest and readiest, if not the most just, criterion of a mans
 services, is the wage that mankind pays him or, briefly, what he earns.
 There at least there can be no ambiguity.  St. Paul is fully and freely
 entitled to his earnings as a tentmaker, and Socrates fully and freely
 entitled to his earnings as a sculptor, although the true business of
 each was not only something different, but something which remained
 unpaid.  A man cannot forget that he is not superintended, and serves
 mankind on parole.  He would like, when challenged by his own conscience,
 to reply: I have done so much work, and no less, with my own hands and
 brain, and taken so much profit, and no more, for my own personal
 delight.  And though St. Paul, if he had possessed a private fortune,
 would probably have scorned to waste his time in making tents, yet of all
 sacrifices to public opinion none can be more easily pardoned than that
 by which a man, already spiritually useful to the world, should restrict
 the field of his chief usefulness to perform services more apparent, and
 possess a livelihood that neither stupidity nor malice could call in
 question.  Like all sacrifices to public opinion and mere external
 decency, this would certainly be wrong; for the soul should rest
 contented with its own approval and indissuadably pursue its own calling.
 Yet, so grave and delicate is the question, that a man may well hesitate
 before he decides it for himself; he may well fear that he sets too high
 a valuation on his own endeavours after good; he may well condescend upon
 a humbler duty, where others than himself shall judge the service and
 proportion the wage.
 
 And yet it is to this very responsibility that the rich are born.  They
 can shuffle off the duty on no other; they are their own paymasters on
 parole; and must pay themselves fair wages and no more.  For I suppose
 that in the course of ages, and through reform and civil war and
 invasion, mankind was pursuing some other and more general design than to
 set one or two Englishmen of the nineteenth century beyond the reach of
 needs and duties.  Society was scarce put together, and defended with so
 much eloquence and blood, for the convenience of two or three
 millionaires and a few hundred other persons of wealth and position.  It
 is plain that if mankind thus acted and suffered during all these
 generations, they hoped some benefit, some ease, some wellbeing, for
 themselves and their descendants; that if they supported law and order,
 it was to secure fair-play for all; that if they denied themselves in the
 present, they must have had some designs upon the future.  Now, a great
 hereditary fortune is a miracle of mans wisdom and mankinds
 forbearance; it has not only been amassed and handed down, it has been
 suffered to be amassed and handed down; and surely in such a
 consideration as this, its possessor should find only a new spur to
 activity and honour, that with all this power of service he should not
 prove unserviceable, and that this mass of treasure should return in
 benefits upon the race.  If he had twenty, or thirty, or a hundred
 thousand at his bankers, or if all Yorkshire or all California were his
 to manage or to sell, he would still be morally penniless, and have the
 world to begin like Whittington, until he had found some way of serving
 mankind.  His wage is physically in his own hand; but, in honour, that
 wage must still be earned.  He is only steward on parole of what is
 called his fortune.  He must honourably perform his stewardship.  He must
 estimate his own services and allow himself a salary in proportion, for
 that will be one among his functions.  And while he will then be free to
 spend that salary, great or little, on his own private pleasures, the
 rest of his fortune he but holds and disposes under trust for mankind; it
 is not his, because he has not earned it; it cannot be his, because his
 services have already been paid; but year by year it is his to
 distribute, whether to help individuals whose birthright and outfit have
 been swallowed up in his, or to further public works and institutions.
 
 At this rate, short of inspiration, it seems hardly possible to be both
 rich and honest; and the millionaire is under a far more continuous
 temptation to thieve than the labourer who gets his shilling daily for
 despicable toils.  Are you surprised?  It is even so.  And you repeat it
 every Sunday in your churches.  It is easier for a camel to pass through
 the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the kingdom of God.  I
 have heard this and similar texts ingeniously explained away and brushed
 from the path of the aspiring Christian by the tender Great-heart of the
 parish.  One excellent clergyman told us that the eye of a needle meant
 a low, Oriental postern through which camels could not pass till they
 were unloadedwhich is very likely just; and then went on, bravely
 confounding the kingdom of God with heaven, the future paradise, to
 show that of course no rich person could expect to carry his riches
 beyond the gravewhich, of course, he could not and never did.  Various
 greedy sinners of the congregation drank in the comfortable doctrine with
 relief.  It was worth the while having come to church that Sunday
 morning!  All was plain.  The Bible, as usual, meant nothing in
 particular; it was merely an obscure and figurative school-copybook; and
 if a man were only respectable, he was a man after Gods own heart.
 
 Alas! I fear not.  And though this matter of a mans services is one for
 his own conscience, there are some cases in which it is difficult to
 restrain the mind from judging.  Thus I shall be very easily persuaded
 that a man has earned his daily bread; and if he has but a friend or two
 to whom his company is delightful at heart, I am more than persuaded at
 once.  But it will be very hard to persuade me that any one has earned an
 income of a hundred thousand.  What he is to his friends, he still would
 be if he were made penniless to-morrow; for as to the courtiers of luxury
 and power, I will neither consider them friends, nor indeed consider them
 at all.  What he does for mankind there are most likely hundreds who
 would do the same, as effectually for the race and as pleasurably to
 themselves, for the merest fraction of this monstrous wage.  Why it is
 paid, I am, therefore, unable to conceive, and as the man pays it
 himself, out of funds in his detention, I have a certain backwardness to
 think him honest.
 
 At least, we have gained a very obvious point: that _what a man spends
 upon himself_, _he shall have earned by services to the race_.  Thence
 flows a principle for the outset of life, which is a little different
 from that taught in the present day.  I am addressing the middle and the
 upper classes; those who have already been fostered and prepared for life
 at some expense; those who have some choice before them, and can pick
 professions; and above all, those who are what is called independent, and
 need do nothing unless pushed by honour or ambition.  In this particular
 the poor are happy; among them, when a lad comes to his strength, he must
 take the work that offers, and can take it with an easy conscience.  But
 in the richer classes the question is complicated by the number of
 opportunities and a variety of considerations.  Here, then, this
 principle of ours comes in helpfully.  The young man has to seek, not a
 road to wealth, but an opportunity of service; not money, but honest
 work.  If he has some strong propensity, some calling of nature, some
 over-weening interest in any special field of industry, inquiry, or art,
 he will do right to obey the impulse; and that for two reasons: the first
 external, because there he will render the best services; the second
 personal, because a demand of his own nature is to him without appeal
 whenever it can be satisfied with the consent of his other faculties and
 appetites.  If he has no such elective taste, by the very principle on
 which he chooses any pursuit at all he must choose the most honest and
 serviceable, and not the most highly remunerated.  We have here an
 external problem, not from or to ourself, but flowing from the
 constitution of society; and we have our own soul with its fixed design
 of righteousness.  All that can be done is to present the problem in
 proper terms, and leave it to the soul of the individual.  Now, the
 problem to the poor is one of necessity: to earn wherewithal to live,
 they must find remunerative labour.  But the problem to the rich is one
 of honour: having the wherewithal, they must find serviceable labour.
 Each has to earn his daily bread: the one, because he has not yet got it
 to eat; the other, who has already eaten it, because he has not yet
 earned it.
 
 Of course, what is true of bread is true of luxuries and comforts,
 whether for the body or the mind.  But the consideration of luxuries
 leads us to a new aspect of the whole question, and to a second
 proposition no less true, and maybe no less startling, than the last.
 
 At the present day, we, of the easier classes, are in a state of surfeit
 and disgrace after meat.  Plethora has filled us with indifference; and
 we are covered from head to foot with the callosities of habitual
 opulence.  Born into what is called a certain rank, we live, as the
 saying is, up to our station.  We squander without enjoyment, because our
 fathers squandered.  We eat of the best, not from delicacy, but from
 brazen habit.  We do not keenly enjoy or eagerly desire the presence of a
 luxury; we are unaccustomed to its absence.  And not only do we squander
 money from habit, but still more pitifully waste it in ostentation.  I
 can think of no more melancholy disgrace for a creature who professes
 either reason or pleasure for his guide, than to spend the smallest
 fraction of his income upon that which he does not desire; and to keep a
 carriage in which you do not wish to drive, or a butler of whom you are
 afraid, is a pathetic kind of folly.  Money, being a means of happiness,
 should make both parties happy when it changes hands; rightly disposed,
 it should be twice blessed in its employment; and buyer and seller should
 alike have their twenty shillings worth of profit out of every pound.
 Benjamin Franklin went through life an altered man, because he once paid
 too dearly for a penny whistle.  My concern springs usually from a deeper
 source, to wit, from having bought a whistle when I did not want one.  I
 find I regret this, or would regret it if I gave myself the time, not
 only on personal but on moral and philanthropical considerations.  For,
 first, in a world where money is wanting to buy books for eager students
 and food and medicine for pining children, and where a large majority are
 starved in their most immediate desires, it is surely base, stupid, and
 cruel to squander money when I am pushed by no appetite and enjoy no
 return of genuine satisfaction.  My philanthropy is wide enough in scope
 to include myself; and when I have made myself happy, I have at least one
 good argument that I have acted rightly; but where that is not so, and I
 have bought and not enjoyed, my mouth is closed, and I conceive that I
 have robbed the poor.  And, second, anything I buy or use which I do not
 sincerely want or cannot vividly enjoy, disturbs the balance of supply
 and demand, and contributes to remove industrious hands from the
 production of what is useful or pleasurable and to keep them busy upon
 ropes of sand and things that are a weariness to the flesh.  That
 extravagance is truly sinful, and a very silly sin to boot, in which we
 impoverish mankind and ourselves.  It is another question for each mans
 heart.  He knows if he can enjoy what he buys and uses; if he cannot, he
 is a dog in the manger; nay, it he cannot, I contend he is a thief, for
 nothing really belongs to a man which he cannot use.  Proprietor is
 connected with propriety; and that only is the mans which is proper to
 his wants and faculties.
 
 A youth, in choosing a career, must not be alarmed by poverty.  Want is a
 sore thing, but poverty does not imply want.  It remains to be seen
 whether with half his present income, or a third, he cannot, in the most
 generous sense, live as fully as at present.  He is a fool who objects to
 luxuries; but he is also a fool who does not protest against the waste of
 luxuries on those who do not desire and cannot enjoy them.  It remains to
 be seen, by each man who would live a true life to himself and not a
 merely specious life to society, how many luxuries he truly wants and to
 how many he merely submits as to a social propriety; and all these last
 he will immediately forswear.  Let him do this, and he will be surprised
 to find how little money it requires to keep him in complete contentment
 and activity of mind and senses.  Life at any level among the easy
 classes is conceived upon a principle of rivalry, where each man and each
 household must ape the tastes and emulate the display of others.  One is
 delicate in eating, another in wine, a third in furniture or works of art
 or dress; and I, who care nothing for any of these refinements, who am
 perhaps a plain athletic creature and love exercise, beef, beer, flannel
 shirts and a camp bed, am yet called upon to assimilate all these other
 tastes and make these foreign occasions of expenditure my own.  It may be
 cynical: I am sure I shall be told it is selfish; but I will spend my
 money as I please and for my own intimate personal gratification, and
 should count myself a nincompoop indeed to lay out the colour of a
 halfpenny on any fancied social decency or duty.  I shall not wear gloves
 unless my hands are cold, or unless I am born with a delight in them.
 Dress is my own affair, and that of one other in the world; that, in fact
 and for an obvious reason, of any woman who shall chance to be in love
 with me.  I shall lodge where I have a mind.  If I do not ask society to
 live with me, they must be silent; and even if I do, they have no further
 right but to refuse the invitation!  There is a kind of idea abroad that
 a man must live up to his station, that his house, his table, and his
 toilette, shall be in a ratio of equivalence, and equally imposing to the
 world.  If this is in the Bible, the passage has eluded my inquiries.  If
 it is not in the Bible, it is nowhere but in the heart of the fool.
 Throw aside this fancy.  See what you want, and spend upon that;
 distinguish what you do not care about, and spend nothing upon that.
 There are not many people who can differentiate wines above a certain and
 that not at all a high price.  Are you sure you are one of these?  Are
 you sure you prefer cigars at sixpence each to pipes at some fraction of
 a farthing?  Are you sure you wish to keep a gig?  Do you care about
 where you sleep, or are you not as much at your ease in a cheap lodging
 as in an Elizabethan manor-house?  Do you enjoy fine clothes?  It is not
 possible to answer these questions without a trial; and there is nothing
 more obvious to my mind, than that a man who has not experienced some ups
 and downs, and been forced to live more cheaply than in his fathers
 house, has still his education to begin.  Let the experiment be made, and
 he will find to his surprise that he has been eating beyond his appetite
 up to that hour; that the cheap lodging, the cheap tobacco, the rough
 country clothes, the plain table, have not only no power to damp his
 spirits, but perhaps give him as keen pleasure in the using as the
 dainties that he took, betwixt sleep and waking, in his former callous
 and somnambulous submission to wealth.
 
 The true Bohemian, a creature lost to view under the imaginary Bohemians
 of literature, is exactly described by such a principle of life.  The
 Bohemian of the novel, who drinks more than is good for him and prefers
 anything to work, and wears strange clothes, is for the most part a
 respectable Bohemian, respectable in disrespectability, living for the
 outside, and an adventurer.  But the man I mean lives wholly to himself,
 does what he wishes, and not what is thought proper, buys what he wants
 for himself, and not what is thought proper, works at what he believes he
 can do well and not what will bring him in money or favour.  You may be
 the most respectable of men, and yet a true Bohemian.  And the test is
 this: a Bohemian, for as poor as he may be, is always open-handed to his
 friends; he knows what he can do with money and how he can do without it,
 a far rarer and more useful knowledge; he has had less, and continued to
 live in some contentment; and hence he cares not to keep more, and shares
 his sovereign or his shilling with a friend.  The poor, if they are
 generous, are Bohemian in virtue of their birth.  Do you know where
 beggars go?  Not to the great houses where people sit dazed among their
 thousands, but to the doors of poor men who have seen the world; and it
 was the widow who had only two mites, who cast half her fortune into the
 treasury.
 
 But a young man who elects to save on dress or on lodging, or who in any
 way falls out of the level of expenditure which is common to his level in
 society, falls out of society altogether.  I suppose the young man to
 have chosen his career on honourable principles; he finds his talents and
 instincts can be best contented in a certain pursuit; in a certain
 industry, he is sure that he is serving mankind with a healthy and
 becoming service; and he is not sure that he would be doing so, or doing
 so equally well, in any other industry within his reach.  Then that is
 his true sphere in life; not the one in which he was born to his father,
 but the one which is proper to his talents and instincts.  And suppose he
 does fall out of society, is that a cause of sorrow?  Is your heart so
 dead that you prefer the recognition of many to the love of a few?  Do
 you think society loves you?  Put it to the proof.  Decline in material
 expenditure, and you will find they care no more for you than for the
 Khan of Tartary.  You will lose no friends.  If you had any, you will
 keep them.  Only those who were friends to your coat and equipage will
 disappear; the smiling faces will disappear as by enchantment; but the
 kind hearts will remain steadfastly kind.  Are you so lost, are you so
 dead, are you so little sure of your own soul and your own footing upon
 solid fact, that you prefer before goodness and happiness the countenance
 of sundry diners-out, who will flee from you at a report of ruin, who
 will drop you with insult at a shadow of disgrace, who do not know you
 and do not care to know you but by sight, and whom you in your turn
 neither know nor care to know in a more human manner?  Is it not the
 principle of society, openly avowed, that friendship must not interfere
 with business; which being paraphrased, means simply that a consideration
 of money goes before any consideration of affection known to this
 cold-blooded gang, that they have not even the honour of thieves, and
 will rook their nearest and dearest as readily as a stranger?  I hope I
 would go as far as most to serve a friend; but I declare openly I would
 not put on my hat to do a pleasure to society.  I may starve my appetites
 and control my temper for the sake of those I love; but society shall
 take me as I choose to be, or go without me.  Neither they nor I will
 lose; for where there is no love, it is both laborious and unprofitable
 to associate.
 
 But it is obvious that if it is only right for a man to spend money on
 that which he can truly and thoroughly enjoy, the doctrine applies with
 equal force to the rich and to the poor, to the man who has amassed many
 thousands as well as to the youth precariously beginning life.  And it
 may be asked, Is not this merely preparing misers, who are not the best
 of company?  But the principle was this: that which a man has not fairly
 earned, and, further, that which he cannot fully enjoy, does not belong
 to him, but is a part of mankinds treasure which he holds as steward on
 parole.  To mankind, then, it must be made profitable; and how this
 should be done is, once more, a problem which each man must solve for
 himself, and about which none has a right to judge him.  Yet there are a
 few considerations which are very obvious and may here be stated.
 Mankind is not only the whole in general, but every one in particular.
 Every man or woman is one of mankinds dear possessions; to his or her
 just brain, and kind heart, and active hands, mankind intrusts some of
 its hopes for the future; he or she is a possible well-spring of good
 acts and source of blessings to the race.  This money which you do not
 need, which, in a rigid sense, you do not want, may therefore be returned
 not only in public benefactions to the race, but in private kindnesses.
 Your wife, your children, your friends stand nearest to you, and should
 be helped the first.  There at least there can be little imposture, for
 you know their necessities of your own knowledge.  And consider, if all
 the world did as you did, and according to their means extended help in
 the circle of their affections, there would be no more crying want in
 times of plenty and no more cold, mechanical charity given with a doubt
 and received with confusion.  Would not this simple rule make a new world
 out of the old and cruel one which we inhabit?
 
                                 * * * * *
 
           [_After two more sentences the fragment breaks off_.]
 
 
 
 
 FATHER DAMIEN
 AN OPEN LETTER TO THE REVEREND DR. HYDE OF HONOLULU
 
 
                                                                    SYDNEY,
                                                       _February_ 25, 1890.
 
 Sir,It may probably occur to you that we have met, and visited, and
 conversed; on my side, with interest.  You may remember that you have
 done me several courtesies, for which I was prepared to be grateful.  But
 there are duties which come before gratitude, and offences which justly
 divide friends, far more acquaintances.  Your letter to the Reverend H.
 B. Gage is a document which, in my sight, if you had filled me with bread
 when I was starving, if you had sat up to nurse my father when he lay
 a-dying, would yet absolve me from the bonds of gratitude.  You know
 enough, doubtless, of the process of canonisation to be aware that, a
 hundred years after the death of Damien, there will appear a man charged
 with the painful office of the _devils advocate_.  After that noble
 brother of mine, and of all frail clay, shall have lain a century at
 rest, one shall accuse, one defend him.  The circumstance is unusual that
 the devils advocate should be a volunteer, should be a member of a sect
 immediately rival, and should make haste to take upon himself his ugly
 office ere the bones are cold; unusual, and of a taste which I shall
 leave my readers free to qualify; unusual, and to me inspiring.  If I
 have at all learned the trade of using words to convey truth and to
 arouse emotion, you have at last furnished me with a subject.  For it is
 in the interest of all mankind, and the cause of public decency in every
 quarter of the world, not only that Damien should be righted, but that
 you and your letter should be displayed at length, in their true colours,
 to the public eye.
 
 To do this properly, I must begin by quoting you at large: I shall then
 proceed to criticise your utterance from several points of view, divine
 and human, in the course of which I shall attempt to draw again, and with
 more specification, the character of the dead saint whom it has pleased
 you to vilify: so much being done, I shall say farewell to you for ever.
 
                                                                 HONOLULU,
                                                         _August_ 2, 1889.
 
     Rev. H. B. GAGE.
 
     Dear Brother,In answer to your inquiries about Father Damien, I can
     only reply that we who knew the man are surprised at the extravagant
     newspaper laudations, as if he was a most saintly philanthropist.
     The simple truth is, he was a coarse, dirty man, head-strong and
     bigoted.  He was not sent to Molokai, but went there without orders;
     did not stay at the leper settlement (before he became one himself),
     but circulated freely over the whole island (less than half the
     island is devoted to the lepers), and he came often to Honolulu.  He
     had no hand in the reforms and improvements inaugurated, which were
     the work of our Board of Health, as occasion required and means were
     provided.  He was not a pure man in his relations with women, and the
     leprosy of which he died should be attributed to his vices and
     carelessness.  Others have done much for the lepers, our own
     ministers, the government physicians, and so forth, but never with
     the Catholic idea of meriting eternal life.Yours, etc.,
 
                                                         C. M. HYDE. {65}
 
 To deal fitly with a letter so extraordinary, I must draw at the outset
 on my private knowledge of the signatory and his sect.  It may offend
 others; scarcely you, who have been so busy to collect, so bold to
 publish, gossip on your rivals.  And this is perhaps the moment when I
 may best explain to you the character of what you are to read: I conceive
 you as a man quite beyond and below the reticences of civility: with what
 measure you mete, with that shall it be measured you again; with you, at
 last, I rejoice to feel the button off the foil and to plunge home.  And
 if in aught that I shall say I should offend others, your colleagues,
 whom I respect and remember with affection, I can but offer them my
 regret; I am not free, I am inspired by the consideration of interests
 far more large; and such pain as can be inflicted by anything from me
 must be indeed trifling when compared with the pain with which they read
 your letter.  It is not the hangman, but the criminal, that brings
 dishonour on the house.
 
 You belong, sir, to a sectI believe my sect, and that in which my
 ancestors labouredwhich has enjoyed, and partly failed to utilise, an
 exceptional advantage in the islands of Hawaii.  The first missionaries
 came; they found the land already self-purged of its old and bloody
 faith; they were embraced, almost on their arrival, with enthusiasm; what
 troubles they supported came far more from whites than from Hawaiians;
 and to these last they stood (in a rough figure) in the shoes of God.
 This is not the place to enter into the degree or causes of their
 failure, such as it is.  One element alone is pertinent, and must here be
 plainly dealt with.  In the course of their evangelical calling, theyor
 too many of themgrew rich.  It may be news to you that the houses of
 missionaries are a cause of mocking on the streets of Honolulu.  It will
 at least be news to you, that when I returned your civil visit, the
 driver of my cab commented on the size, the taste, and the comfort of
 your home.  It would have been news certainly to myself, had any one told
 me that afternoon that I should live to drag such matter into print.  But
 you see, sir, how you degrade better men to your own level; and it is
 needful that those who are to judge betwixt you and me, betwixt Damien
 and the devils advocate, should understand your letter to have been
 penned in a house which could raise, and that very justly, the envy and
 the comments of the passers-by.  I think (to employ a phrase of yours
 which I admire) it should be attributed to you that you have never
 visited the scene of Damiens life and death.  If you had, and had
 recalled it, and looked about your pleasant rooms, even your pen perhaps
 would have been stayed.
 
 Your sect (and remember, as far as any sect avows me, it is mine) has not
 done ill in a worldly sense in the Hawaiian Kingdom.  When calamity
 befell their innocent parishioners, when leprosy descended and took root
 in the Eight Islands, a _quid pro quo_ was to be looked for.  To that
 prosperous mission, and to you, as one of its adornments, God had sent at
 last an opportunity.  I know I am touching here upon a nerve acutely
 sensitive.  I know that others of your colleagues look back on the
 inertia of your Church, and the intrusive and decisive heroism of Damien,
 with something almost to be called remorse.  I am sure it is so with
 yourself; I am persuaded your letter was inspired by a certain envy, not
 essentially ignoble, and the one human trait to be espied in that
 performance.  You were thinking of the lost chance, the past day; of that
 which should have been conceived and was not; of the service due and not
 rendered.  Time was, said the voice in your ear, in your pleasant room,
 as you sat raging and writing; and if the words written were base beyond
 parallel, the rage, I am happy to repeatit is the only compliment I
 shall pay youthe rage was almost virtuous.  But, sir, when we have
 failed, and another has succeeded; when we have stood by, and another has
 stepped in; when we sit and grow bulky in our charming mansions, and a
 plain, uncouth peasant steps into the battle, under the eyes of God, and
 succours the afflicted, and consoles the dying, and is himself afflicted
 in his turn, and dies upon the field of honourthe battle cannot be
 retrieved as your unhappy irritation has suggested.  It is a lost battle,
 and lost for ever.  One thing remained to you in your defeatsome rags of
 common honour; and these you have made haste to cast away.
 
 Common honour; not the honour of having done anything right, but the
 honour of not having done aught conspicuously foul; the honour of the
 inert: that was what remained to you.  We are not all expected to be
 Damiens; a man may conceive his duty more narrowly, he may love his
 comforts better; and none will cast a stone at him for that.  But will a
 gentleman of your reverend profession allow me an example from the fields
 of gallantry?  When two gentlemen compete for the favour of a lady, and
 the one succeeds and the other is rejected, and (as will sometimes
 happen) matter damaging to the successful rivals credit reaches the ear
 of the defeated, it is held by plain men of no pretensions that his mouth
 is, in the circumstance, almost necessarily closed.  Your Church and
 Damiens were in Hawaii upon a rivalry to do well: to help, to edify, to
 set divine examples.  You having (in one huge instance) failed, and
 Damien succeeded, I marvel it should not have occurred to you that you
 were doomed to silence; that when you had been outstripped in that high
 rivalry, and sat inglorious in the midst of your wellbeing, in your
 pleasant roomand Damien, crowned with glories and horrors, toiled and
 rotted in that pigsty of his under the cliffs of Kalawaoyou, the elect
 who would not, were the last man on earth to collect and propagate gossip
 on the volunteer who would and did.
 
 I think I see youfor I try to see you in the flesh as I write these
 sentencesI think I see you leap at the word pigsty, a hyperbolical
 expression at the best.  He had no hand in the reforms, he was a
 coarse, dirty man; these were your own words; and you may think it
 possible that I am come to support you with fresh evidence.  In a sense,
 it is even so.  Damien has been too much depicted with a conventional
 halo and conventional features; so drawn by men who perhaps had not the
 eye to remark or the pen to express the individual; or who perhaps were
 only blinded and silenced by generous admiration, such as I partly envy
 for myselfsuch as you, if your soul were enlightened, would envy on your
 bended knees.  It is the least defect of such a method of portraiture
 that it makes the path easy for the devils advocate, and leaves for the
 misuse of the slanderer a considerable field of truth.  For the truth
 that is suppressed by friends is the readiest weapon of the enemy.  The
 world, in your despite, may perhaps owe you something, if your letter be
 the means of substituting once for all a credible likeness for a wax
 abstraction.  For, if that world at all remember you, on the day when
 Damien of Molokai shall be named Saint, it will be in virtue of one work:
 your letter to the Reverend H. B. Gage.
 
 You may ask on what authority I speak.  It was my inclement destiny to
 become acquainted, not with Damien, but with Dr. Hyde.  When I visited
 the lazaretto, Damien was already in his resting grave.  But such
 information as I have, I gathered on the spot in conversation with those
 who knew him well and long: some indeed who revered his memory; but
 others who had sparred and wrangled with him, who beheld him with no
 halo, who perhaps regarded him with small respect, and through whose
 unprepared and scarcely partial communications the plain, human features
 of the man shone on me convincingly.  These gave me what knowledge I
 possess; and I learnt it in that scene where it could be most completely
 and sensitively understoodKalawao, which you have never visited, about
 which you have never so much as endeavoured to inform yourself; for,
 brief as your letter is, you have found the means to stumble into that
 confession.  _Less than one-half_ of the island, you say, is devoted
 to the lepers.  Molokai_Molokai ahina_, the grey, lofty, and most
 desolate islandalong all its northern side plunges a front of precipice
 into a sea of unusual profundity.  This range of cliff is, from east to
 west, the true end and frontier of the island.  Only in one spot there
 projects into the ocean a certain triangular and rugged down, grassy,
 stony, windy, and rising in the midst into a hill with a dead crater: the
 whole bearing to the cliff that overhangs it somewhat the same relation
 as a bracket to a wall.  With this hint you will now be able to pick out
 the leper station on a map; you will be able to judge how much of Molokai
 is thus cut off between the surf and precipice, whether less than a half,
 or less than a quarter, or a fifth, or a tenthor, say, a twentieth; and
 the next time you burst into print you will be in a position to share
 with us the issue of your calculations.
 
 I imagine you to be one of those persons who talk with cheerfulness of
 that place which oxen and wain-ropes could not drag you to behold.  You,
 who do not even know its situation on the map, probably denounce
 sensational descriptions, stretching your limbs the while in your
 pleasant parlour on Beretania Street.  When I was pulled ashore there one
 early morning, there sat with me in the boat two sisters, bidding
 farewell (in humble imitation of Damien) to the lights and joys of human
 life.  One of these wept silently; I could not withhold myself from
 joining her.  Had you been there, it is my belief that nature would have
 triumphed even in you; and as the boat drew but a little nearer, and you
 beheld the stairs crowded with abominable deformations of our common
 manhood, and saw yourself landing in the midst of such a population as
 only now and then surrounds us in the horror of a nightmarewhat a
 haggard eye you would have rolled over your reluctant shoulder towards
 the house on Beretania Street!  Had you gone on; had you found every
 fourth face a blot upon the landscape; had you visited the hospital and
 seen the butt-ends of human beings lying there almost unrecognisable, but
 still breathing, still thinking, still remembering; you would have
 understood that life in the lazaretto is an ordeal from which the nerves
 of a mans spirit shrink, even as his eye quails under the brightness of
 the sun; you would have felt it was (even to-day) a pitiful place to
 visit and a hell to dwell in.  It is not the fear of possible infection.
 That seems a little thing when compared with the pain, the pity, and the
 disgust of the visitors surroundings, and the atmosphere of affliction,
 disease, and physical disgrace in which he breathes.  I do not think I am
 a man more than usually timid; but I never recall the days and nights I
 spent upon that island promontory (eight days and seven nights), without
 heartfelt thankfulness that I am somewhere else.  I find in my diary that
 I speak of my stay as a grinding experience: I have once jotted in the
 margin, _Harrowing_ is the word; and when the _Mokolii_ bore me at last
 towards the outer world, I kept repeating to myself, with a new
 conception of their pregnancy, those simple words of the song
 
     Tis the most distressful country that ever yet was seen.
 
 And observe: that which I saw and suffered from was a settlement purged,
 bettered, beautified; the new village built, the hospital and the
 Bishop-Home excellently arranged; the sisters, the doctor, and the
 missionaries, all indefatigable in their noble tasks.  It was a different
 place when Damien came there and made his great renunciation, and slept
 that first night under a tree amidst his rotting brethren: alone with
 pestilence; and looking forward (with what courage, with what pitiful
 sinkings of dread, God only knows) to a lifetime of dressing sores and
 stumps.
 
 You will say, perhaps, I am too sensitive, that sights as painful abound
 in cancer hospitals and are confronted daily by doctors and nurses.  I
 have long learned to admire and envy the doctors and the nurses.  But
 there is no cancer hospital so large and populous as Kalawao and
 Kalaupapa; and in such a matter every fresh case, like every inch of
 length in the pipe of an organ, deepens the note of the impression; for
 what daunts the onlooker is that monstrous sum of human suffering by
 which he stands surrounded.  Lastly, no doctor or nurse is called upon to
 enter once for all the doors of that gehenna; they do not say farewell,
 they need not abandon hope, on its sad threshold; they but go for a time
 to their high calling, and can look forward as they go to relief, to
 recreation, and to rest.  But Damien shut-to with his own hand the doors
 of his own sepulchre.
 
 I shall now extract three passages from my diary at Kalawao.
 
 _A_.  Damien is dead and already somewhat ungratefully remembered in the
 field of his labours and sufferings.  He was a good man, but very
 officious, says one.  Another tells me he had fallen (as other priests
 so easily do) into something of the ways and habits of thought of a
 Kanaka; but he had the wit to recognise the fact, and the good sense to
 laugh at [over] it.  A plain man it seems he was; I cannot find he was
 a popular.
 
 _B_.  After Ragsdales death [Ragsdale was a famous Luna, or overseer,
 of the unruly settlement] there followed a brief term of office by
 Father Damien which served only to publish the weakness of that noble
 man.  He was rough in his ways, and he had no control.  Authority was
 relaxed; Damiens life was threatened, and he was soon eager to resign.
 
 _C_.  Of Damien I begin to have an idea.  He seems to have been a man of
 the peasant class, certainly of the peasant type: shrewd, ignorant and
 bigoted, yet with an open mind, and capable of receiving and digesting a
 reproof if it were bluntly administered; superbly generous in the least
 thing as well as in the greatest, and as ready to give his last shirt
 (although not without human grumbling) as he had been to sacrifice his
 life; essentially indiscreet and officious, which made him a troublesome
 colleague; domineering in all his ways, which made him incurably
 unpopular with the Kanakas, but yet destitute of real authority, so that
 his boys laughed at him and he must carry out his wishes by the means of
 bribes.  He learned to have a mania for doctoring; and set up the Kanakas
 against the remedies of his regular rivals: perhaps (if anything matter
 at all in the treatment of such a disease) the worst thing that he did,
 and certainly the easiest.  The best and worst of the man appear very
 plainly in his dealings with Mr. Chapmans money; he had originally laid
 it out [intended to lay it out] entirely for the benefit of Catholics,
 and even so not wisely; but after a long, plain talk, he admitted his
 error fully and revised the list.  The sad state of the boys home is in
 part the result of his lack of control; in part, of his own slovenly ways
 and false ideas of hygiene.  Brother officials used to call it Damiens
 Chinatown.  Well, they would say, your China-town keeps growing.
 And he would laugh with perfect good-nature, and adhere to his errors
 with perfect obstinacy.  So much I have gathered of truth about this
 plain, noble human brother and father of ours; his imperfections are the
 traits of his face, by which we know him for our fellow; his martyrdom
 and his example nothing can lessen or annul; and only a person here on
 the spot can properly appreciate their greatness.
 
 I have set down these private passages, as you perceive, without
 correction; thanks to you, the public has them in their bluntness.  They
 are almost a list of the mans faults, for it is rather these that I was
 seeking: with his virtues, with the heroic profile of his life, I and the
 world were already sufficiently acquainted.  I was besides a little
 suspicious of Catholic testimony; in no ill sense, but merely because
 Damiens admirers and disciples were the least likely to be critical.  I
 know you will be more suspicious still; and the facts set down above were
 one and all collected from the lips of Protestants who had opposed the
 father in his life.  Yet I am strangely deceived, or they build up the
 image of a man, with all his weaknesses, essentially heroic, and alive
 with rugged honesty, generosity, and mirth.
 
 Take it for what it is, rough private jottings of the worst sides of
 Damiens character, collected from the lips of those who had laboured
 with and (in your own phrase) knew the man;though I question whether
 Damien would have said that he knew you.  Take it, and observe with
 wonder how well you were served by your gossips, how ill by your
 intelligence and sympathy; in how many points of fact we are at one, and
 how widely our appreciations vary.  There is something wrong here; either
 with you or me.  It is possible, for instance, that you, who seem to have
 so many ears in Kalawao, had heard of the affair of Mr. Chapmans money,
 and were singly struck by Damiens intended wrong-doing.  I was struck
 with that also, and set it fairly down; but I was struck much more by the
 fact that he had the honesty of mind to be convinced.  I may here tell
 you that it was a long business; that one of his colleagues sat with him
 late into the night, multiplying arguments and accusations; that the
 father listened as usual with perfect good-nature and perfect
 obstinacy; but at the last, when he was persuadedYes, said he, I am
 very much obliged to you; you have done me a service; it would have been
 a theft.  There are many (not Catholics merely) who require their heroes
 and saints to be infallible; to these the story will be painful; not to
 the true lovers, patrons, and servants of mankind.
 
 And I take it, this is a type of our division; that you are one of those
 who have an eye for faults and failures; that you take a pleasure to find
 and publish them; and that, having found them, you make haste to forget
 the overvailing virtues and the real success which had alone introduced
 them to your knowledge.  It is a dangerous frame of mind.  That you may
 understand how dangerous, and into what a situation it has already
 brought you, we will (if you please) go hand-in-hand through the
 different phrases of your letter, and candidly examine each from the
 point of view of its truth, its appositeness, and its charity.
 
 Damien was _coarse_.
 
 It is very possible.  You make us sorry for the lepers, who had only a
 coarse old peasant for their friend and father.  But you, who were so
 refined, why were you not there, to cheer them with the lights of
 culture?  Or may I remind you that we have some reason to doubt if John
 the Baptist were genteel; and in the case of Peter, on whose career you
 doubtless dwell approvingly in the pulpit, no doubt at all he was a
 coarse, headstrong fisherman!  Yet even in our Protestant Bibles Peter
 is called Saint.
 
 Damien was _dirty_.
 
 He was.  Think of the poor lepers annoyed with this dirty comrade!  But
 the clean Dr. Hyde was at his food in a fine house.
 
 Damien was _headstrong_.
 
 I believe you are right again; and I thank God for his strong head and
 heart.
 
 Damien was _bigoted_.
 
 I am not fond of bigots myself, because they are not fond of me.  But
 what is meant by bigotry, that we should regard it as a blemish in a
 priest?  Damien believed his own religion with the simplicity of a
 peasant or a child; as I would I could suppose that you do.  For this, I
 wonder at him some way off; and had that been his only character, should
 have avoided him in life.  But the point of interest in Damien, which has
 caused him to be so much talked about and made him at last the subject of
 your pen and mine, was that, in him, his bigotry, his intense and narrow
 faith, wrought potently for good, and strengthened him to be one of the
 worlds heroes and exemplars.
 
 Damien _was not sent to Molokai_, _but went there without orders_.
 
 Is this a misreading? or do you really mean the words for blame?  I have
 heard Christ, in the pulpits of our Church, held up for imitation on the
 ground that His sacrifice was voluntary.  Does Dr. Hyde think otherwise?
 
 Damien _did not stay at the settlement_, _etc._
 
 It is true he was allowed many indulgences.  Am I to understand that you
 blame the father for profiting by these, or the officers for granting
 them?  In either case, it is a mighty Spartan standard to issue from the
 house on Beretania Street; and I am convinced you will find yourself with
 few supporters.
 
 Damien _had no hand in the reforms_, _etc._
 
 I think even you will admit that I have already been frank in my
 description of the man I am defending; but before I take you up upon this
 head, I will be franker still, and tell you that perhaps nowhere in the
 world can a man taste a more pleasurable sense of contrast than when he
 passes from Damiens Chinatown at Kalawao to the beautiful Bishop-Home
 at Kalaupapa.  At this point, in my desire to make all fair for you, I
 will break my rule and adduce Catholic testimony.  Here is a passage from
 my diary about my visit to the Chinatown, from which you will see how it
 is (even now) regarded by its own officials: We went round all the
 dormitories, refectories, etc.dark and dingy enough, with a superficial
 cleanliness, which he [Mr. Dutton, the lay-brother] did not seek to
 defend.  It is almost decent, said he; the sisters will make that all
 right when we get them here.  And yet I gathered it was already better
 since Damien was dead, and far better than when he was there alone and
 had his own (not always excellent) way.  I have now come far enough to
 meet you on a common ground of fact; and I tell you that, to a mind not
 prejudiced by jealousy, all the reforms of the lazaretto, and even those
 which he most vigorously opposed, are properly the work of Damien.  They
 are the evidence of his success; they are what his heroism provoked from
 the reluctant and the careless.  Many were before him in the field; Mr.
 Meyer, for instance, of whose faithful work we hear too little: there
 have been many since; and some had more worldly wisdom, though none had
 more devotion, than our saint.  Before his day, even you will confess,
 they had effected little.  It was his part, by one striking act of
 martyrdom, to direct all mens eyes on that distressful country.  At a
 blow, and with the price of his life, he made the place illustrious and
 public.  And that, if you will consider largely, was the one reform
 needful; pregnant of all that should succeed.  It brought money; it
 brought (best individual addition of them all) the sisters; it brought
 supervision, for public opinion and public interest landed with the man
 at Kalawao.  If ever any man brought reforms, and died to bring them, it
 was he.  There is not a clean cup or towel in the Bishop-Home, but dirty
 Damien washed it.
 
 Damien _was not a pure man in his relations with women_, _etc._
 
 How do you know that?  Is this the nature of the conversation in that
 house on Beretania Street which the cabman envied, driving past?racy
 details of the misconduct of the poor peasant priest, toiling under the
 cliffs of Molokai?
 
 Many have visited the station before me; they seem not to have heard the
 rumour.  When I was there I heard many shocking tales, for my informants
 were men speaking with the plainness of the laity; and I heard plenty of
 complaints of Damien.  Why was this never mentioned? and how came it to
 you in the retirement of your clerical parlour?
 
 But I must not even seem to deceive you.  This scandal, when I read it in
 your letter, was not new to me.  I had heard it once before; and I must
 tell you how.  There came to Samoa a man from Honolulu; he, in a
 public-house on the beach, volunteered the statement that Damien had
 contracted the disease from having connection with the female lepers;
 and I find a joy in telling you how the report was welcomed in a
 public-house.  A man sprang to his feet; I am not at liberty to give his
 name, but from what I heard I doubt if you would care to have him to
 dinner in Beretania Street.  You miserable little (here is a word I
 dare not print, it would so shock your ears).  You miserable little,
 he cried, if the story were a thousand times true, cant you see you are
 a million times a lowerfor daring to repeat it?  I wish it could be
 told of you that when the report reached you in your house, perhaps after
 family worship, you had found in your soul enough holy anger to receive
 it with the same expressions; ay, even with that one which I dare not
 print; it would not need to have been blotted away, like Uncle Tobys
 oath, by the tears of the recording angel; it would have been counted to
 you for your brightest righteousness.  But you have deliberately chosen
 the part of the man from Honolulu, and you have played it with
 improvements of your own.  The man from Honolulumiserable, leering
 creaturecommunicated the tale to a rude knot of beach-combing drinkers
 in a public-house, where (I will so far agree with your temperance
 opinions) man is not always at his noblest; and the man from Honolulu had
 himself been drinkingdrinking, we may charitably fancy, to excess.  It
 was to your Dear Brother, the Reverend H. B. Gage, that you chose to
 communicate the sickening story; and the blue ribbon which adorns your
 portly bosom forbids me to allow you the extenuating plea that you were
 drunk when it was done.  Your dear brothera brother indeedmade haste
 to deliver up your letter (as a means of grace, perhaps) to the religious
 papers; where, after many months, I found and read and wondered at it;
 and whence I have now reproduced it for the wonder of others.  And you
 and your dear brother have, by this cycle of operations, built up a
 contrast very edifying to examine in detail.  The man whom you would not
 care to have to dinner, on the one side; on the other, the Reverend Dr.
 Hyde and the Reverend H. B. Gage: the Apia bar-room, the Honolulu manse.
 
 But I fear you scarce appreciate how you appear to your fellow-men; and
 to bring it home to you, I will suppose your story to be true.  I will
 supposeand God forgive me for supposing itthat Damien faltered and
 stumbled in his narrow path of duty; I will suppose that, in the horror
 of his isolation, perhaps in the fever of incipient disease, he, who was
 doing so much more than he had sworn, failed in the letter of his
 priestly oathhe, who was so much a better man than either you or me, who
 did what we have never dreamed of daringhe too tasted of our common
 frailty.  O, Iago, the pity of it!  The least tender should be moved to
 tears; the most incredulous to prayer.  And all that you could do was to
 pen your letter to the Reverend H. B. Gage!
 
 Is it growing at all clear to you what a picture you have drawn of your
 own heart?  I will try yet once again to make it clearer.  You had a
 father: suppose this tale were about him, and some informant brought it
 to you, proof in hand: I am not making too high an estimate of your
 emotional nature when I suppose you would regret the circumstance? that
 you would feel the tale of frailty the more keenly since it shamed the
 author of your days? and that the last thing you would do would be to
 publish it in the religious press?  Well, the man who tried to do what
 Damien did, is my father, and the father of the man in the Apia bar, and
 the father of all who love goodness; and he was your father too, if God
 had given you grace to see it.
 
 
 
 
 THE PENTLAND RISING
 A PAGE OF HISTORY
 1666
 
 
     A cloud of witnesses lyes here,
     Who for Christs interest did appear.
 
                             _Inscription on Battlefield at Rullion Green_.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER ITHE CAUSES OF THE REVOLT
 
 
     Halt, passenger; take heed what thou dost see,
     This tomb doth show for what some men did die.
 
                         _Monument_, _Greyfriars Churchyard_,_ Edinburgh_,
                                                            16611668. {85}
 
 Two hundred years ago a tragedy was enacted in Scotland, the memory
 whereof has been in great measure lost or obscured by the deep tragedies
 which followed it.  It is, as it were, the evening of the night of
 persecutiona sort of twilight, dark indeed to us, but light as the
 noonday when compared with the midnight gloom which followed.  This fact,
 of its being the very threshold of persecution, lends it, however, an
 additional interest.
 
 The prejudices of the people against Episcopacy were out of measure
 increased, says Bishop Burnet, by the new incumbents who were put in
 the places of the ejected preachers, and were generally very mean and
 despicable in all respects.  They were the worst preachers I ever heard;
 they were ignorant to a reproach; and many of them were openly vicious.
 They . . . were indeed the dreg and refuse of the northern parts.  Those
 of them who arose above contempt or scandal were men of such violent
 tempers that they were as much hated as the others were despised. {86}
 It was little to be wondered at, from this account that the country-folk
 refused to go to the parish church, and chose rather to listen to outed
 ministers in the fields.  But this was not to be allowed, and their
 persecutors at last fell on the method of calling a roll of the
 parishioners names every Sabbath, and marking a fine of twenty shillings
 Scots to the name of each absenter.  In this way very large debts were
 incurred by persons altogether unable to pay.  Besides this, landlords
 were fined for their tenants absences, tenants for their landlords,
 masters for their servants, servants for their masters, even though
 they themselves were perfectly regular in their attendance.  And as the
 curates were allowed to fine with the sanction of any common soldier, it
 may be imagined that often the pretexts were neither very sufficient nor
 well proven.
 
 When the fines could not be paid at once, Bibles, clothes, and household
 utensils were seized upon, or a number of soldiers, proportionate to his
 wealth, were quartered on the offender.  The coarse and drunken privates
 filled the houses with woe; snatched the bread from the children to feed
 their dogs; shocked the principles, scorned the scruples, and blasphemed
 the religion of their humble hosts; and when they had reduced them to
 destitution, sold the furniture, and burned down the roof-tree which was
 consecrated to the peasants by the name of Home.  For all this attention
 each of these soldiers received from his unwilling landlord a certain sum
 of money per daythree shillings sterling, according to _Naphtali_.  And
 frequently they were forced to pay quartering money for more men than
 were in reality cessed on them.  At that time it was no strange thing
 to behold a strong man begging for money to pay his fines, and many
 others who were deep in arrears, or who had attracted attention in some
 other way, were forced to flee from their homes, and take refuge from
 arrest and imprisonment among the wild mosses of the uplands. {87a}
 
 One example in particular we may cite:
 
 John Neilson, the Laird of Corsack, a worthy man, was, unfortunately for
 himself, a Nonconformist.  First he was fined in four hundred pounds
 Scots, and then through cessing he lost nineteen hundred and ninety-three
 pounds Scots.  He was next obliged to leave his house and flee from place
 to place, during which wanderings he lost his horse.  His wife and
 children were turned out of doors, and then his tenants were fined till
 they too were almost ruined.  As a final stroke, they drove away all his
 cattle to Glasgow and sold them. {87b}  Surely it was time that something
 were done to alleviate so much sorrow, to overthrow such tyranny.
 
 About this time too there arrived in Galloway a person calling himself
 Captain Andrew Gray, and advising the people to revolt.  He displayed
 some documents purporting to be from the northern Covenanters, and
 stating that they were prepared to join in any enterprise commenced by
 their southern brethren.  The leader of the persecutors was Sir James
 Turner, an officer afterwards degraded for his share in the matter.  He
 was naturally fierce, but was mad when he was drunk, and that was very
 often, said Bishop Burnet.  He was a learned man, but had always been
 in armies, and knew no other rule but to obey orders.  He told me he had
 no regard to any law, but acted, as he was commanded, in a military way.
 {88}
 
 This was the state of matters, when an outrage was committed which gave
 spirit and determination to the oppressed countrymen, lit the flame of
 insubordination, and for the time at least recoiled on those who
 perpetrated it with redoubled force.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IITHE BEGINNING
 
 
     I love no warres,
     I love no jarres,
     Nor strifes fire.
     May discord cease,
     Lets live in peace:
     This I desire.
 
     If it must be
     Warre we must see
     (So fates conspire),
     May we not feel
     The force of steel:
     This I desire.
 
                                                      T. JACKSON, 1651 {89}
 
 Upon Tuesday, November 13th, 1666, Corporal George Deanes and three other
 soldiers set upon an old man in the clachan of Dalry and demanded the
 payment of his fines.  On the old mans refusing to pay, they forced a
 large party of his neighbours to go with them and thresh his corn.  The
 field was a certain distance out of the clachan, and four persons,
 disguised as countrymen, who had been out on the moors all night, met
 this mournful drove of slaves, compelled by the four soldiers to work for
 the ruin of their friend.  However, chided to the bone by their night on
 the hills, and worn out by want of food, they proceeded to the village
 inn to refresh themselves.  Suddenly some people rushed into the room
 where they were sitting, and told them that the soldiers were about to
 roast the old man, naked, on his own girdle.  This was too much for them
 to stand, and they repaired immediately to the scene of this gross
 outrage, and at first merely requested that the captive should be
 released.  On the refusal of the two soldiers who were in the front room,
 high words were given and taken on both sides, and the other two rushed
 forth from an adjoining chamber and made at the countrymen with drawn
 swords.  One of the latter, John MLellan of Barscob, drew a pistol and
 shot the corporal in the body.  The pieces of tobacco-pipe with which it
 was loaded, to the number of ten at least, entered him, and he was so
 much disturbed that he never appears to have recovered, for we find long
 afterwards a petition to the Privy Council requesting a pension for him.
 The other soldiers then laid down their arms, the old man was rescued,
 and the rebellion was commenced. {90}
 
 And now we must turn to Sir James Turners memoirs of himself; for,
 strange to say, this extraordinary man was remarkably fond of literary
 composition, and wrote, besides the amusing account of his own adventures
 just mentioned, a large number of essays and short biographies, and a
 work on war, entitled _Pallas Armata_.  The following are some of the
 shorter pieces Magick, Friendship, Imprisonment, Anger,
 Revenge, Duells, Cruelty, A Defence of some of the Ceremonies of
 the English Liturgieto witBowing at the Name of Jesus, The frequent
 repetition of the Lords Prayer and Good Lord deliver us, Of the
 Doxologie, Of Surplesses, Rotchets, Canonnicall Coats, etc.  From what
 we know of his character we should expect Anger and Cruelty to be
 very full and instructive.  But what earthly right he had to meddle with
 ecclesiastical subjects it is hard to see.
 
 Upon the 12th of the month he had received some information concerning
 Grays proceedings, but as it was excessively indefinite in its
 character, he paid no attention to it.  On the evening of the 14th,
 Corporal Deanes was brought into Dumfries, who affirmed stoutly that he
 had been shot while refusing to sign the Covenanta story rendered
 singularly unlikely by the after conduct of the rebels.  Sir James
 instantly dispatched orders to the cessed soldiers either to come to
 Dumfries or meet him on the way to Dalry, and commanded the thirteen or
 fourteen men in the town with him to come at nine next morning to his
 lodging for supplies.
 
 On the morning of Thursday the rebels arrived at Dumfries with 50 horse
 and 150 foot.  Neilson of Corsack, and Gray, who commanded, with a
 considerable troop, entered the town, and surrounded Sir James Turners
 lodging.  Though it was between eight and nine oclock, that worthy,
 being unwell, was still in bed, but rose at once and went to the window.
 
 Neilson and some others cried, You may have fair quarter.
 
 I need no quarter, replied Sir James; nor can I be a prisoner, seeing
 there is no war declared.  On being told, however, that he must either
 be a prisoner or die, he came down, and went into the street in his
 night-shirt.  Here Gray showed himself very desirous of killing him, but
 he was overruled by Corsack.  However, he was taken away a prisoner,
 Captain Gray mounting him on his own horse, though, as Turner naively
 remarks, there was good reason for it, for he mounted himself on a farre
 better one of mine.  A large coffer containing his clothes and money,
 together with all his papers, were taken away by the rebels.  They robbed
 Master Chalmers, the Episcopalian minister of Dumfries, of his horse,
 drank the Kings health at the market cross, and then left Dumfries. {92}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIITHE MARCH OF THE REBELS
 
 
     Stay, passenger, take notice what thou reads,
     At Edinburgh lie our bodies, here our heads;
     Our right hands stood at Lanark, these we want,
     Because with them we signed the Covenant.
 
                                 _Epitaph on a Tombstone at Hamilton_. {93}
 
 On Friday the 16th, Bailie Irvine of Dumfries came to the Council at
 Edinburgh, and gave information concerning this horrid rebellion.  In
 the absence of Rothes, Sharpe presidedmuch to the wrath of some members;
 and as he imagined his own safety endangered, his measures were most
 energetic.  Dalzell was ordered away to the West, the guards round the
 city were doubled, officers and soldiers were forced to take the oath of
 allegiance, and all lodgers were commanded to give in their names.
 Sharpe, surrounded with all these guards and precautions,
 trembledtrembled as he trembled when the avengers of blood drew him from
 his chariot on Magus Muir,for he knew how he had sold his trust, how he
 had betrayed his charge, and he felt that against him must their chiefest
 hatred be directed, against him their direst thunder-bolts be forged.
 But even in his fear the apostate Presbyterian was unrelenting,
 unpityingly harsh; he published in his manifesto no promise of pardon, no
 inducement to submission.  He said, If you submit not you must die, but
 never added, If you submit you may live! {94a}
 
 Meantime the insurgents proceeded on their way.  At Carsphairn they were
 deserted by Captain Gray, who, doubtless in a fit of oblivion, neglected
 to leave behind him the coffer containing Sir Jamess money.  Who he was
 is a mystery, unsolved by any historian; his papers were evidently
 forgeriesthat, and his final flight, appear to indicate that he was an
 agent of the Royalists, for either the King or the Duke of York was heard
 to say, That, if he might have his wish, he would have them all turn
 rebels and go to arms. {94b}
 
 Upon the 18th day of the month they left Carsphairn and marched onwards.
 
 Turner was always lodged by his captors at a good inn, frequently at the
 best of which their halting-place could boast.  Here many visits were
 paid to him by the ministers and officers of the insurgent force.  In his
 description of these interviews he displays a vein of satiric severity,
 admitting any kindness that was done to him with some qualifying souvenir
 of former harshness, and gloating over any injury, mistake, or folly,
 which it was his chance to suffer or to hear.  He appears,
 notwithstanding all this, to have been on pretty good terms with his
 cruel phanaticks, as the following extract sufficiently proves:
 
 Most of the foot were lodged about the church or churchyard, and order
 given to ring bells next morning for a sermon to be preached by Mr.
 Welch.  Maxwell of Morith, and Major MCullough invited me to heare that
 phanatick sermon (for soe they merrilie called it).  They said that
 preaching might prove an effectual meane to turne me, which they
 heartilie wished.  I answered to them that I was under guards, and that
 if they intended to heare that sermon, it was probable I might likewise,
 for it was not like my guards wold goe to church and leave me alone at my
 lodgeings.  Bot to what they said of my conversion, I said it wold be
 hard to turne a Turner.  Bot because I founde them in a merrie humour, I
 said, if I did not come to heare Mr. Welch preach, then they might fine
 me in fortie shillings Scots, which was double the suome of what I had
 exacted from the phanatics. {95}
 
 This took place at Ochiltree, on the 22nd day of the month.  The
 following is recounted by this personage with malicious glee, and
 certainly, if authentic, it is a sad proof of how chaff is mixed with
 wheat, and how ignorant, almost impious, persons were engaged in this
 movement; nevertheless we give it, for we wish to present with
 impartiality all the alleged facts to the reader:
 
 Towards the evening Mr. Robinsone and Mr. Crukshank gaue me a visite; I
 called for some ale purposelie to heare one of them blesse it.  It fell
 Mr. Robinsone to seeke the blessing, who said one of the most bombastick
 graces that ever I heard in my life.  He summoned God Allmightie very
 imperiouslie to be their secondarie (for that was his language).  And
 if, said he, thou wilt not be our Secondarie, we will not fight for
 thee at all, for it is not our cause bot thy cause; and if thou wilt not
 fight for our cause and thy oune cause, then we are not obliged to fight
 for it.  They say, said he, that Dukes, Earles, and Lords are coming
 with the Kings General against us, bot they shall be nothing bot a
 threshing to us.  This grace did more fullie satisfie me of the folly
 and injustice of their cause, then the ale did quench my thirst. {96a}
 
 Frequently the rebels made a halt near some roadside alehouse, or in some
 convenient park, where Colonel Wallace, who had now taken the command,
 would review the horse and foot, during which time Turner was sent either
 into the alehouse or round the shoulder of the hill, to prevent him from
 seeing the disorders which were likely to arise.  He was, at last, on the
 25th day of the month, between Douglas and Lanark, permitted to behold
 their evolutions.  I found their horse did consist of four hundreth and
 fortie, and the foot of five hundreth and upwards. . . . The horsemen
 were armed for most part with suord and pistoll, some onlie with suord.
 The foot with musket, pike, sith (scythe), forke, and suord; and some
 with suords great and long.  He admired much the proficiency of their
 cavalry, and marvelled how they had attained to it in so short a time.
 {96b}
 
 At Douglas, which they had just left on the morning of this great
 wapinshaw, they were chargedawful picture of depravity!with the theft
 of a silver spoon and a nightgown.  Could it be expected that while the
 whole country swarmed with robbers of every description, such a rare
 opportunity for plunder should be lost by roguesthat among a thousand
 men, even though fighting for religion, there should not be one Achan in
 the camp?  At Lanark a declaration was drawn up and signed by the chief
 rebels.  In it occurs the following:
 
 The just sense whereof the sufferings of the countrymade us choose,
 rather to betake ourselves to the fields for self-defence, than to stay
 at home, burdened daily with the calamities of others, and tortured with
 the fears of our own approaching misery. {97}
 
 The whole body, too, swore the Covenant, to which ceremony the epitaph at
 the head of this chapter seems to refer.
 
 A report that Dalzell was approaching drove them from Lanark to Bathgate,
 where, on the evening of Monday the 26th, the wearied army stopped.  But
 at twelve oclock the cry, which served them for a trumpet, of Horse!
 horse! and Mount the prisoner! resounded through the night-shrouded
 town, and called the peasants from their well-earned rest to toil onwards
 in their march.  The wind howled fiercely over the moorland; a close,
 thick, wetting rain descended.  Chilled to the bone, worn out with long
 fatigue, sinking to the knees in mire, onward they marched to
 destruction.  One by one the weary peasants fell off from their ranks to
 sleep, and die in the rain-soaked moor, or to seek some house by the
 wayside wherein to hide till daybreak.  One by one at first, then in
 gradually increasing numbers, at every shelter that was seen, whole
 troops left the waning squadrons, and rushed to hide themselves from the
 ferocity of the tempest.  To right and left nought could be descried but
 the broad expanse of the moor, and the figures of their fellow-rebels,
 seen dimly through the murky night, plodding onwards through the sinking
 moss.  Those who kept togethera miserable fewoften halted to rest
 themselves, and to allow their lagging comrades to overtake them.  Then
 onward they went again, still hoping for assistance, reinforcement, and
 supplies; onward again, through the wind, and the rain, and the
 darknessonward to their defeat at Pentland, and their scaffold at
 Edinburgh.  It was calculated that they lost one half of their army on
 that disastrous night-march.
 
 Next night they reached the village of Colinton, four miles from
 Edinburgh, where they halted for the last time. {98}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVRULLION GREEN
 
 
     From Covenanters with uplifted hands,
     From Remonstrators with associate bands,
              Good Lord, deliver us!
 
                                         _Royalist Rhyme_, KIRKTON, p. 127.
 
 Late on the fourth night of November, exactly twenty-four days before
 Rullion Green, Richard and George Chaplain, merchants in Haddington,
 beheld four men, clad like West-country Whigamores, standing round some
 object on the ground.  It was at the two-mile cross, and within that
 distance from their homes.  At last, to their horror, they discovered
 that the recumbent figure was a livid corpse, swathed in a blood-stained
 winding-sheet. {99}  Many thought that this apparition was a portent of
 the deaths connected with the Pentland Rising.
 
 On the morning of Wednesday, the 28th of November 1666, they left
 Colinton and marched to Rullion Green.  There they arrived about sunset.
 The position was a strong one.  On the summit of a bare, heathery spur of
 the Pentlands are two hillocks, and between them lies a narrow band of
 flat marshy ground.  On the highest of the two moundsthat nearest the
 Pentlands, and on the left hand of the main bodywas the greater part of
 the cavalry, under Major Learmont; on the other Barscob and the Galloway
 gentlemen; and in the centre Colonel Wallace and the weak, half-armed
 infantry.  Their position was further strengthened by the depth of the
 valley below, and the deep chasm-like course of the Rullion Burn.
 
 The sun, going down behind the Pentlands, cast golden lights and blue
 shadows on their snow-clad summits, slanted obliquely into the rich plain
 before them, bathing with rosy splendour the leafless, snow-sprinkled
 trees, and fading gradually into shadow in the distance.  To the south,
 too, they beheld a deep-shaded amphitheatre of heather and bracken; the
 course of the Esk, near Penicuik, winding about at the foot of its gorge;
 the broad, brown expanse of Maw Moss; and, fading into blue
 indistinctness in the south, the wild heath-clad Peeblesshire hills.  In
 sooth, that scene was fair, and many a yearning glance was cast over that
 peaceful evening scene from the spot where the rebels awaited their
 defeat; and when the fight was over, many a noble fellow lifted his head
 from the blood-stained heather to strive with darkening eyeballs to
 behold that landscape, over which, as over his life and his cause, the
 shadows of night and of gloom were falling and thickening.
 
 It was while waiting on this spot that the fear-inspiring cry was raised:
 The enemy!  Here come the enemy!
 
 Unwilling to believe their own doomfor our insurgents still hoped for
 success in some negotiations for peace which had been carried on at
 Colintonthey called out, They are some of our own.
 
 They are too blacke (_i.e._ numerous), fie! fie! for ground to draw up
 on, cried Wallace, fully realising the want of space for his men, and
 proving that it was not till after this time that his forces were finally
 arranged. {101a}
 
 First of all the battle was commenced by fifty Royalist horse sent
 obliquely across the hill to attack the left wing of the rebels.  An
 equal number of Learmonts men met them, and, after a struggle, drove
 them back.  The course of the Rullion Burn prevented almost all pursuit,
 and Wallace, on perceiving it, dispatched a body of foot to occupy both
 the burn and some ruined sheep-walls on the farther side.
 
 Dalzell changed his position, and drew up his army at the foot of the
 hill, on the top of which were his foes.  He then dispatched a mingled
 body of infantry and cavalry to attack Wallaces outpost, but they also
 were driven back.  A third charge produced a still more disastrous
 effect, for Dalzell had to check the pursuit of his men by a
 reinforcement.
 
 These repeated checks bred a panic in the Lieutenant-Generals ranks, for
 several of his men flung down their arms.  Urged by such fatal symptoms,
 and by the approaching night, he deployed his men, and closed in
 overwhelming numbers on the centre and right flank of the insurgent army.
 In the increasing twilight the burning matches of the firelocks,
 shimmering on barrel, halbert, and cuirass, lent to the approaching army
 a picturesque effect, like a huge, many-armed giant breathing flame into
 the darkness.
 
 Placed on an overhanging hill, Welch and Semple cried aloud, The God of
 Jacob! The God of Jacob! and prayed with uplifted hands for victory.
 {101b}
 
 But still the Royalist troops closed in.
 
 Captain John Paton was observed by Dalzell, who determined to capture him
 with his own hands.  Accordingly he charged forward, presenting his
 pistols.  Paton fired, but the balls hopped off Dalzells buff coat and
 fell into his boot.  With the superstition peculiar to his age, the
 Nonconformist concluded that his adversary was rendered bullet-proof by
 enchantment, and, pulling some small silver coins from his pocket,
 charged his pistol therewith.  Dalzell, seeing this, and supposing, it is
 likely, that Paton was putting in larger balls, hid behind his servant,
 who was killed. {102}
 
 Meantime the outposts were forced, and the army of Wallace was enveloped
 in the embrace of a hideous boa-constrictortightening, closing, crushing
 every semblance of life from the victim enclosed in his toils.  The
 flanking parties of horse were forced in upon the centre, and though, as
 even Turner grants, they fought with desperation, a general flight was
 the result.
 
 But when they fell there was none to sing their coronach or wail the
 death-wail over them.  Those who sacrificed themselves for the peace, the
 liberty, and the religion of their fellow-countrymen, lay bleaching in
 the field of death for long, and when at last they were buried by
 charity, the peasants dug up their bodies, desecrated their graves, and
 cast them once more upon the open heath for the sorry value of their
 winding-sheets!
 
 _Inscription on stone at Rullion Green_:
 
                                      HERE
                                  AND NEAR TO
                              THIS PLACE LYES THE
                          REVEREND MR JOHN CROOKSHANK
                            AND MR ANDREW MCCORMICK
                          MINISTERS OF THE GOSPEL AND
                       ABOUT FIFTY OTHER TRUE COVENANTED
                             PRESBYTERIANS WHO WERE
                       KILLED IN THIS PLACE IN THEIR OWN
                       INOCENT SELF DEFENCE AND DEFFENCE
                               OF THE COVENANTED
                             WORK OF REFORMATION BY
                             THOMAS DALZEEL OF BINS
                            UPON THE 28 OF NOVEMBER
                          1666.  REV. 12. 11. ERECTED
                                 SEPT. 28 1738.
 
                              _Back of stone_:
 
     A Cloud of Witnesses lyes here,
     Who for Christs Interest did appear,
     For to restore true Liberty,
     Oerturnd then by tyranny.
     And by proud Prelats who did Rage
     Against the Lords Own heritage.
     They sacrificed were for the laws
     Of Christ their king, his noble cause.
     These heroes fought with great renown;
     By falling got the Martyrs crown. {103}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VA RECORD OF BLOOD
 
 
     They cut his hands ere he was dead,
     And after that struck of his head.
     His blood under the altar cries
     For vengeance on Christs enemies.
 
                          _Epitaph on Tomb at Longcross of Clermont_. {104}
 
 Master Andrew Murray, an outed minister, residing in the Potterrow, on
 the morning after the defeat, heard the sounds of cheering and the march
 of many feet beneath his window.  He gazed out.  With colours flying, and
 with music sounding, Dalzell, victorious, entered Edinburgh.  But his
 banners were dyed in blood, and a band of prisoners were marched within
 his ranks.  The old man knew it all.  That martial and triumphant strain
 was the death-knell of his friends and of their cause, the rust-hued
 spots upon the flags were the tokens of their courage and their death,
 and the prisoners were the miserable remnant spared from death in battle
 to die upon the scaffold.  Poor old man! he had outlived all joy.  Had he
 lived longer he would have seen increasing torment and increasing woe; he
 would have seen the clouds, then but gathering in mist, cast a more than
 midnight darkness over his native hills, and have fallen a victim to
 those bloody persecutions which, later, sent their red memorials to the
 sea by many a burn.  By a merciful Providence all this was spared to
 himhe fell beneath the first blow; and ere four days had passed since
 Rullion Green, the aged minister of God was gathered to is fathers.
 {105a}
 
 When Sharpe first heard of the rebellion, he applied to Sir Alexander
 Ramsay, the Provost, for soldiers to guard his house.  Disliking their
 occupation, the soldiers gave him an ugly time of it.  All the night
 through they kept up a continuous series of alarms and incursions,
 cries of Stand! Give fire! etc., which forced the prelate to flee
 to the Castle in the morning, hoping there to find the rest which was
 denied him at home. {105b}  Now, however, when all danger to himself was
 past, Sharpe came out in his true colours, and scant was the justice
 likely to be shown to the foes of Scottish Episcopacy when the Primate
 was by.  The prisoners were lodged in Haddos Hole, a part of St. Giles
 Cathedral, where, by the kindness of Bishop Wishart, to his credit be it
 spoken, they were amply supplied with food. {105c}
 
 Some people urged, in the Council, that the promise of quarter which had
 been given on the field of battle should protect the lives of the
 miserable men.  Sir John Gilmoure, the greatest lawyer, gave no
 opinioncertainly a suggestive circumstancebut Lord Lee declared that
 this would not interfere with their legal trial, so to bloody executions
 they went. {105d}  To the number of thirty they were condemned and
 executed; while two of them, Hugh MKail, a young minister, and Neilson
 of Corsack, were tortured with the boots.
 
 The goods of those who perished were confiscated, and their bodies were
 dismembered and distributed to different parts of the country; the heads
 of Major MCulloch and the two Gordons, it was resolved, says Kirkton,
 should be pitched on the gate of Kirkcudbright; the two Hamiltons and
 Strongs head should be affixed at Hamilton, and Captain Arnots sett on
 the Watter Gate at Edinburgh.  The armes of all the ten, because they
 hade with uplifted hands renewed the Covenant at Lanark, were sent to the
 people of that town to expiate that crime, by placing these arms on the
 top of the prison. {106}  Among these was John Neilson, the Laird of
 Corsack, who saved Turners life at Dumfries; in return for which service
 Sir James attempted, though without success, to get the poor man
 reprieved.  One of the condemned died of his wounds between the day of
 condemnation and the day of execution.  None of them, says Kirkton,
 would save their life by taking the declaration and renouncing the
 Covenant, though it was offered to them. . . . But never men died in
 Scotland so much lamented by the people, not only spectators, but those
 in the country.  When Knockbreck and his brother were turned over, they
 clasped each other in their armes, and so endured the pangs of death.
 When Humphrey Colquhoun died, he spoke not like an ordinary citizen, but
 like a heavenly minister, relating his comfortable Christian experiences,
 and called for his Bible, and laid it on his wounded arm, and read John
 iii. 8, and spoke upon it to the admiration of all.  But most of all,
 when Mr. MKail died, there was such a lamentation as was never known in
 Scotland before; not one dry cheek upon all the street, or in all the
 numberless windows in the mercate place. {107a}
 
 The following passage from this speech speaks for itself and its author:
 
 Hereafter I will not talk with flesh and blood, nor think on the worlds
 consolations.  Farewell to all my friends, whose company hath been
 refreshful to me in my pilgrimage.  I have done with the light of the sun
 and the moon; welcome eternal light, eternal life, everlasting love,
 everlasting praise, everlasting glory.  Praise to Him that sits upon the
 throne, and to the Lamb for ever!  Bless the Lord, O my soul, that hath
 pardoned all my iniquities in the blood of His Son, and healed all my
 diseases.  Bless Him, O all ye His angels that excel in strength, ye
 ministers of His that do His pleasure.  Bless the Lord, O my soul!
 {107b}
 
 After having ascended the gallows ladder he again broke forth in the
 following words of touching eloquence: And now I leave off to speak any
 more to creatures, and begin my intercourse with God, which shall never
 be broken off.  Farewell father and mother, friends and relations!
 Farewell the world and all delights!  Farewell meat and drink!  Farewell
 sun, moon, and stars!Welcome God and Father!  Welcome sweet Jesus
 Christ, the Mediator of the new covenant!  Welcome blessed Spirit of
 grace and God of all consolation!  Welcome glory!  Welcome eternal life!
 Welcome Death! {107c}
 
 At Glasgow, too, where some were executed, they caused the soldiers to
 beat the drums and blow the trumpets on their closing ears.  Hideous
 refinement of revenge!  Even the last words which drop from the lips of a
 dying manwords surely the most sincere and the most unbiassed which
 mortal mouth can uttereven these were looked upon as poisoned and as
 poisonous.  Drown their last accents, was the cry, lest they should
 lead the crowd to take their part, or at the least to mourn their doom!
 {108a}  But, after all, perhaps it was more merciful than one would
 thinkunintentionally so, of course; perhaps the storm of harsh and
 fiercely jubilant noises, the clanging of trumpets, the rattling of
 drums, and the hootings and jeerings of an unfeeling mob, which were the
 last they heard on earth, might, when the mortal fight was over, when the
 river of death was passed, add tenfold sweetness to the hymning of the
 angels, tenfold peacefulness to the shores which they had reached.
 
 Not content with the cruelty of these executions, some even of the
 peasantry, though these were confined to the shire of Mid-Lothian,
 pursued, captured, plundered, and murdered the miserable fugitives who
 fell in their way.  One strange story have we of these times of blood and
 persecution: Kirkton the historian and popular tradition tell us alike of
 a flame which often would arise from the grave, in a moss near Carnwath,
 of some of those poor rebels: of how it crept along the ground; of how it
 covered the house of their murderer; and of how it scared him with its
 lurid glare.
 
 Hear Daniel Defoe: {108b}
 
     If the poor people were by these insupportable violences made
     desperate, and driven to all the extremities of a wild despair, who
     can justly reflect on them when they read in the Word of God That
     oppression makes a wise man mad?  And therefore were there no other
     original of the insurrection known by the name of the Rising of
     Pentland, it was nothing but what the intolerable oppressions of
     those times might have justified to all the world, nature having
     dictated to all people a right of defence when illegally and
     arbitrarily attacked in a manner not justifiable either by laws of
     nature, the laws of God, or the laws of the country.
 
 Bear this remonstrance of Defoes in mind, and though it is the fashion
 of the day to jeer and to mock, to execrate and to contemn, the noble
 band of Covenantersthough the bitter laugh at their old-world religious
 views, the curl of the lip at their merits, and the chilling silence on
 their bravery and their determination, are but too rife through all
 societybe charitable to what was evil and honest to what was good about
 the Pentland insurgents, who fought for life and liberty, for country and
 religion, on the 28th of November 1666, now just two hundred years ago.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
 EDINBURGH, 28_th November_ 1866.
 
 
 
 
 THE DAY AFTER TO-MORROW
 
 
 History is much decried; it is a tissue of errors, we are told, no doubt
 correctly; and rival historians expose each others blunders with
 gratification.  Yet the worst historian has a clearer view of the period
 he studies than the best of us can hope to form of that in which we live.
 The obscurest epoch is to-day; and that for a thousand reasons of
 inchoate tendency, conflicting report, and sheer mass and multiplicity of
 experience; but chiefly, perhaps, by reason of an insidious shifting of
 landmarks.  Parties and ideas continually move, but not by measurable
 marches on a stable course; the political soil itself steals forth by
 imperceptible degrees, like a travelling glacier, carrying on its bosom
 not only political parties but their flag-posts and cantonments; so that
 what appears to be an eternal city founded on hills is but a flying
 island of Laputa.  It is for this reason in particular that we are all
 becoming Socialists without knowing it; by which I would not in the least
 refer to the acute case of Mr. Hyndman and his horn-blowing supporters,
 sounding their trumps of a Sunday within the walls of our individualist
 Jerichobut to the stealthy change that has come over the spirit of
 Englishmen and English legislation.  A little while ago, and we were
 still for liberty; crowd a few more thousands on the bench of
 Government, we seemed to cry; keep her head direct on liberty, and we
 cannot help but come to port.  This is over; _laisser faire_ declines in
 favour; our legislation grows authoritative, grows philanthropical,
 bristles with new duties and new penalties, and casts a spawn of
 inspectors, who now begin, note-book in hand, to darken the face of
 England.  It may be right or wrong, we are not trying that; but one thing
 it is beyond doubt: it is Socialism in action, and the strange thing is
 that we scarcely know it.
 
 Liberty has served us a long while, and it may be time to seek new
 altars.  Like all other principles, she has been proved to be
 self-exclusive in the long run.  She has taken wages besides (like all
 other virtues) and dutifully served Mammon; so that many things we were
 accustomed to admire as the benefits of freedom and common to all were
 truly benefits of wealth, and took their value from our neighbours
 poverty.  A few shocks of logic, a few disclosures (in the journalistic
 phrase) of what the freedom of manufacturers, landlords, or shipowners
 may imply for operatives, tenants, or seamen, and we not unnaturally
 begin to turn to that other pole of hope, beneficent tyranny.  Freedom,
 to be desirable, involves kindness, wisdom, and all the virtues of the
 free; but the free man as we have seen him in action has been, as of
 yore, only the master of many helots; and the slaves are still ill-fed,
 ill-clad, ill-taught, ill-housed, insolently treated, and driven to their
 mines and workshops by the lash of famine.  So much, in other mens
 affairs, we have begun to see clearly; we have begun to despair of virtue
 in these other men, and from our seat in Parliament begin to discharge
 upon them, thick as arrows, the host of our inspectors.  The landlord has
 long shaken his head over the manufacturer; those who do business on land
 have lost all trust in the virtues of the shipowner; the professions look
 askance upon the retail traders and have even started their co-operative
 stores to ruin them; and from out the smoke-wreaths of Birmingham a
 finger has begun to write upon the wall the condemnation of the landlord.
 Thus, piece by piece, do we condemn each other, and yet not perceive the
 conclusion, that our whole estate is somewhat damnable.  Thus, piece by
 piece, each acting against his neighbour, each sawing away the branch on
 which some other interest is seated, do we apply in detail our
 Socialistic remedies, and yet not perceive that we are all labouring
 together to bring in Socialism at large.  A tendency so stupid and so
 selfish is like to prove invincible; and if Socialism be at all a
 practicable rule of life, there is every chance that our grand-children
 will see the day and taste the pleasures of existence in something far
 liker an ant-heap than any previous human polity.  And this not in the
 least because of the voice of Mr. Hyndman or the horns of his followers;
 but by the mere glacier movement of the political soil, bearing forward
 on its bosom, apparently undisturbed, the proud camps of Whig and Tory.
 If Mr. Hyndman were a man of keen humour, which is far from my conception
 of his character, he might rest from his troubling and look on: the walls
 of Jericho begin already to crumble and dissolve.  That great servile
 war, the Armageddon of money and numbers, to which we looked forward when
 young, becomes more and more unlikely; and we may rather look to see a
 peaceable and blindfold evolution, the work of dull men immersed in
 political tactics and dead to political results.
 
 The principal scene of this comedy lies, of course, in the House of
 Commons; it is there, besides, that the details of this new evolution (if
 it proceed) will fall to be decided; so that the state of Parliament is
 not only diagnostic of the present but fatefully prophetic of the future.
 Well, we all know what Parliament is, and we are all ashamed of it.  We
 may pardon it some faults, indeed, on the ground of Irish obstructiona
 bitter trial, which it supports with notable good humour.  But the excuse
 is merely local; it cannot apply to similar bodies in America and France;
 and what are we to say of these?  President Clevelands letter may serve
 as a picture of the one; a glance at almost any paper will convince us of
 the weakness of the other.  Decay appears to have seized on the organ of
 popular government in every land; and this just at the moment when we
 begin to bring to it, as to an oracle of justice, the whole skein of our
 private affairs to be unravelled, and ask it, like a new Messiah, to take
 upon itself our frailties and play for us the part that should be played
 by our own virtues.  For that, in few words, is the case.  We cannot
 trust ourselves to behave with decency; we cannot trust our consciences;
 and the remedy proposed is to elect a round number of our neighbours,
 pretty much at random, and say to these: Be ye our conscience; make laws
 so wise, and continue from year to year to administer them so wisely,
 that they shall save us from ourselves and make us righteous and happy,
 world without end.  Amen.  And who can look twice at the British
 Parliament and then seriously bring it such a task?  I am not advancing
 this as an argument against Socialism: once again, nothing is further
 from my mind.  There are great truths in Socialism, or no one, not even
 Mr. Hyndman, would be found to hold it; and if it came, and did one-tenth
 part of what it offers, I for one should make it welcome.  But if it is
 to come, we may as well have some notion of what it will be like; and the
 first thing to grasp is that our new polity will be designed and
 administered (to put it courteously) with something short of inspiration.
 It will be made, or will grow, in a human parliament; and the one thing
 that will not very hugely change is human nature.  The Anarchists think
 otherwise, from which it is only plain that they have not carried to the
 study of history the lamp of human sympathy.
 
 Given, then, our new polity, with its new waggon-load of laws, what
 headmarks must we look for in the life?  We chafe a good deal at that
 excellent thing, the income-tax, because it brings into our affairs the
 prying fingers, and exposes us to the tart words, of the official.  The
 official, in all degrees, is already something of a terror to many of us.
 I would not willingly have to do with even a police-constable in any
 other spirit than that of kindness.  I still remember in my dreams the
 eye-glass of a certain _attach_ at a certain embassyan eyeglass that
 was a standing indignity to all on whom it looked; and my next most
 disagreeable remembrance is of a bracing, Republican postman in the city
 of San Francisco.  I lived in that city among working folk, and what my
 neighbours accepted at the postmans handsnay, what I took from him
 myselfit is still distasteful to recall.  The bourgeois, residing in the
 upper parts of society, has but few opportunities of tasting this
 peculiar bowl; but about the income-tax, as I have said, or perhaps about
 a patent, or in the halls of an embassy at the hands of my friend of the
 eye-glass, he occasionally sets his lips to it; and he may thus imagine
 (if he has that faculty of imagination, without which most faculties are
 void) how it tastes to his poorer neighbours, who must drain it to the
 dregs.  In every contact with authority, with their employer, with the
 police, with the School Board officer, in the hospital, or in the
 workhouse, they have equally the occasion to appreciate the light-hearted
 civility of the man in office; and as an experimentalist in several
 out-of-the-way provinces of life, I may say it has but to be felt to be
 appreciated.  Well, this golden age of which we are speaking will be the
 golden age of officials.  In all our concerns it will be their beloved
 duty to meddle, with what tact, with what obliging words, analogy will
 aid us to imagine.  It is likely these gentlemen will be periodically
 elected; they will therefore have their turn of being underneath, which
 does not always sweeten mens conditions.  The laws they will have to
 administer will be no clearer than those we know to-day, and the body
 which is to regulate their administration no wiser than the British
 Parliament.  So that upon all hands we may look for a form of servitude
 most galling to the bloodservitude to many and changing masters, and for
 all the slights that accompany the rule of jack-in-office.  And if the
 Socialistic programme be carried out with the least fulness, we shall
 have lost a thing, in most respects not much to be regretted, but as a
 moderator of oppression, a thing nearly invaluablethe newspaper.  For
 the independent journal is a creature of capital and competition; it
 stands and falls with millionaires and railway bonds and all the abuses
 and glories of to-day; and as soon as the State has fairly taken its bent
 to authority and philanthropy, and laid the least touch on private
 property, the days of the independent journal are numbered.  State
 railways may be good things and so may State bakeries; but a State
 newspaper will never be a very trenchant critic of the State officials.
 
 But again, these officials would have no sinecure.  Crime would perhaps
 be less, for some of the motives of crime we may suppose would pass away.
 But if Socialism were carried out with any fulness, there would be more
 contraventions.  We see already new sins ringing up like mustardSchool
 Board sins, factory sins, Merchant Shipping Act sinsnone of which I
 would be thought to except against in particular, but all of which, taken
 together, show us that Socialism can be a hard master even in the
 beginning.  If it go on to such heights as we hear proposed and lauded,
 if it come actually to its ideal of the ant-heap, ruled with iron
 justice, the number of new contraventions will be out of all proportion
 multiplied.  Take the case of work alone.  Man is an idle animal.  He is
 at least as intelligent as the ant; but generations of advisers have in
 vain recommended him the ants example.  Of those who are found truly
 indefatigable in business, some are misers; some are the practisers of
 delightful industries, like gardening; some are students, artists,
 inventors, or discoverers, men lured forward by successive hopes; and the
 rest are those who live by games of skill or hazardfinanciers,
 billiard-players, gamblers, and the like.  But in unloved toils, even
 under the prick of necessity, no man is continually sedulous.  Once
 eliminate the fear of starvation, once eliminate or bound the hope of
 riches, and we shall see plenty of skulking and malingering.  Society
 will then be something not wholly unlike a cotton plantation in the old
 days; with cheerful, careless, demoralised slaves, with elected
 overseers, and, instead of the planter, a chaotic popular assembly.  If
 the blood be purposeful and the soil strong, such a plantation may
 succeed, and be, indeed, a busy ant-heap, with full granaries and long
 hours of leisure.  But even then I think the whip will be in the
 overseers hands, and not in vain.  For, when it comes to be a question
 of each man doing his own share or the rest doing more, prettiness of
 sentiment will be forgotten.  To dock the skulkers food is not enough;
 many will rather eat haws and starve on petty pilferings than put their
 shoulder to the wheel for one hour daily.  For such as these, then, the
 whip will be in the overseers hand; and his own sense of justice and the
 superintendence of a chaotic popular assembly will be the only checks on
 its employment.  Now, you may be an industrious man and a good citizen,
 and yet not love, nor yet be loved by, Dr. Fell the inspector.  It is
 admitted by private soldiers that the disfavour of a sergeant is an evil
 not to be combated; offend the sergeant, they say, and in a brief while
 you will either be disgraced or have deserted.  And the sergeant can no
 longer appeal to the lash.  But if these things go on, we shall see, or
 our sons shall see, what it is to have offended an inspector.
 
 This for the unfortunate.  But with the fortunate also, even those whom
 the inspector loves, it may not be altogether well.  It is concluded that
 in such a state of society, supposing it to be financially sound, the
 level of comfort will be high.  It does not follow: there are strange
 depths of idleness in man, a too-easily-got sufficiency, as in the case
 of the sago-eaters, often quenching the desire for all besides; and it is
 possible that the men of the richest ant-heaps may sink even into
 squalor.  But suppose they do not; suppose our tricksy instrument of
 human nature, when we play upon it this new tune, should respond kindly;
 suppose no one to be damped and none exasperated by the new conditions,
 the whole enterprise to be financially sounda vaulting suppositionand
 all the inhabitants to dwell together in a golden mean of comfort: we
 have yet to ask ourselves if this be what man desire, or if it be what
 man will even deign to accept for a continuance.  It is certain that man
 loves to eat, it is not certain that he loves that only or that best.  He
 is supposed to love comfort; it is not a love, at least, that he is
 faithful to.  He is supposed to love happiness; it is my contention that
 he rather loves excitement.  Danger, enterprise, hope, the novel, the
 aleatory, are dearer to man than regular meals.  He does not think so
 when he is hungry, but he thinks so again as soon as he is fed; and on
 the hypothesis of a successful ant-heap, he would never go hungry.  It
 would be always after dinner in that society, as, in the land of the
 Lotos-eaters, it was always afternoon; and food, which, when we have it
 not, seems all-important, drops in our esteem, as soon as we have it, to
 a mere prerequisite of living.
 
 That for which man lives is not the same thing for all individuals nor in
 all ages; yet it has a common base; what he seeks and what he must have
 is that which will seize and hold his attention.  Regular meals and
 weatherproof lodgings will not do this long.  Play in its wide sense, as
 the artificial induction of sensation, including all games and all arts,
 will, indeed, go far to keep him conscious of himself; but in the end he
 wearies for realities.  Study or experiment, to some rare natures, is the
 unbroken pastime of a life.  These are enviable natures; people shut in
 the house by sickness often bitterly envy them; but the commoner man
 cannot continue to exist upon such altitudes: his feet itch for physical
 adventure; his blood boils for physical dangers, pleasures, and triumphs;
 his fancy, the looker after new things, cannot continue to look for them
 in books and crucibles, but must seek them on the breathing stage of
 life.  Pinches, buffets, the glow of hope, the shock of disappointment,
 furious contention with obstacles: these are the true elixir for all
 vital spirits, these are what they seek alike in their romantic
 enterprises and their unromantic dissipations.  When they are taken in
 some pinch closer than the common, they cry, Catch me here again! and
 sure enough you catch them there againperhaps before the week is out.
 It is as old as _Robinson Crusoe_; as old as man.  Our race has not been
 strained for all these ages through that sieve of dangers that we call
 Natural Selection, to sit down with patience in the tedium of safety; the
 voices of its fathers call it forth.  Already in our society as it
 exists, the bourgeois is too much cottoned about for any zest in living;
 he sits in his parlour out of reach of any danger, often out of reach of
 any vicissitude but one of health; and there he yawns.  If the people in
 the next villa took pot-shots at him, he might be killed indeed, but so
 long as he escaped he would find his blood oxygenated and his views of
 the world brighter.  If Mr. Mallock, on his way to the publishers, should
 have his skirts pinned to a wall by a javelin, it would not occur to
 himat least for several hoursto ask if life were worth living; and if
 such peril were a daily matter, he would ask it never more; he would have
 other things to think about, he would be living indeednot lying in a box
 with cotton, safe, but immeasurably dull.  The aleatory, whether it touch
 life, or fortune, or renownwhether we explore Africa or only toss for
 halfpencethat is what I conceive men to love best, and that is what we
 are seeking to exclude from mens existences.  Of all forms of the
 aleatory, that which most commonly attends our working menthe danger of
 misery from want of workis the least inspiriting: it does not whip the
 blood, it does not evoke the glory of contest; it is tragic, but it is
 passive; and yet, in so far as it is aleatory, and a peril sensibly
 touching them, it does truly season the mens lives.  Of those who fail,
 I do not speakdespair should be sacred; but to those who even modestly
 succeed, the changes of their life bring interest: a job found, a
 shilling saved, a dainty earned, all these are wells of pleasure
 springing afresh for the successful poor; and it is not from these but
 from the villa-dweller that we hear complaints of the unworthiness of
 life.  Much, then, as the average of the proletariat would gain in this
 new state of life, they would also lose a certain something, which would
 not be missed in the beginning, but would be missed progressively and
 progressively lamented.  Soon there would be a looking back: there would
 be tales of the old world humming in young mens ears, tales of the tramp
 and the pedlar, and the hopeful emigrant.  And in the stall-fed life of
 the successful ant-heapwith its regular meals, regular duties, regular
 pleasures, an even course of life, and fear excludedthe vicissitudes,
 delights, and havens of to-day will seem of epic breadth.  This may seem
 a shallow observation; but the springs by which men are moved lie much on
 the surface.  Bread, I believe, has always been considered first, but the
 circus comes close upon its heels.  Bread we suppose to be given amply;
 the cry for circuses will be the louder, and if the life of our
 descendants be such as we have conceived, there are two beloved pleasures
 on which they will be likely to fall back: the pleasures of intrigue and
 of sedition.
 
 In all this I have supposed the ant-heap to be financially sound.  I am
 no economist, only a writer of fiction; but even as such, I know one
 thing that bears on the economic questionI know the imperfection of
 mans faculty for business.  The Anarchists, who count some rugged
 elements of common sense among what seem to me their tragic errors, have
 said upon this matter all that I could wish to say, and condemned
 beforehand great economical polities.  So far it is obvious that they are
 right; they may be right also in predicting a period of communal
 independence, and they may even be right in thinking that desirable.  But
 the rise of communes is none the less the end of economic equality, just
 when we were told it was beginning.  Communes will not be all equal in
 extent, nor in quality of soil, nor in growth of population; nor will the
 surplus produce of all be equally marketable.  It will be the old story
 of competing interests, only with a new unit; and, as it appears to me, a
 new, inevitable danger.  For the merchant and the manufacturer, in this
 new world, will be a sovereign commune; it is a sovereign power that will
 see its crops undersold, and its manufactures worsted in the market.  And
 all the more dangerous that the sovereign power should be small.  Great
 powers are slow to stir; national affronts, even with the aid of
 newspapers, filter slowly into popular consciousness; national losses are
 so unequally shared, that one part of the population will be counting its
 gains while another sits by a cold hearth.  But in the sovereign commune
 all will be centralised and sensitive.  When jealousy springs up, when
 (let us say) the commune of Poole has overreached the commune of
 Dorchester, irritation will run like quicksilver throughout the body
 politic; each man in Dorchester will have to suffer directly in his diet
 and his dress; even the secretary, who drafts the official
 correspondence, will sit down to his task embittered, as a man who has
 dined ill and may expect to dine worse; and thus a business difference
 between communes will take on much the same colour as a dispute between
 diggers in the lawless West, and will lead as directly to the arbitrament
 of blows.  So that the establishment of the communal system will not only
 reintroduce all the injustices and heart-burnings of economic inequality,
 but will, in all human likelihood, inaugurate a world of hedgerow
 warfare.  Dorchester will march on Poole, Sherborne on Dorchester,
 Wimborne on both; the waggons will be fired on as they follow the
 highway, the trains wrecked on the lines, the ploughman will go armed
 into the field of tillage; and if we have not a return of ballad
 literature, the local press at least will celebrate in a high vein the
 victory of Cerne Abbas or the reverse of Toller Porcorum.  At least this
 will not be dull; when I was younger, I could have welcomed such a world
 with relief; but it is the New-Old with a vengeance, and irresistibly
 suggests the growth of military powers and the foundation of new empires.
 
 
 
 
 COLLEGE PAPERS
 
 
 CHAPTER IEDINBURGH STUDENTS IN 1824
 
 
 On the 2nd of January 1824 was issued the prospectus of the _Lapsus
 Lingu_; _or_, _the College Tatler_; and on the 7th the first number
 appeared.  On Friday the 2nd of April _Mr. Tatler_ became speechless.
 Its history was not all one success; for the editor (who applies to
 himself the words of Iago, I am nothing if I am not critical)
 overstepped the bounds of caution, and found himself seriously embroiled
 with the powers that were.  There appeared in No. XVI. a most bitter
 satire upon Sir John Leslie, in which he was compared to Falstaff,
 charged with puffing himself, and very prettily censured for publishing
 only the first volume of a class-book, and making all purchasers pay for
 both.  Sir John Leslie took up the matter angrily, visited Carfrae the
 publisher, and threatened him with an action, till he was forced to turn
 the hapless _Lapsus_ out of doors.  The maltreated periodical found
 shelter in the shop of Huie, Infirmary Street; and No. XVII. was duly
 issued from the new office.  No. XVII. beheld _Mr. Tatlers_ humiliation,
 in which, with fulsome apology and not very credible assurances of
 respect and admiration, he disclaims the article in question, and
 advertises a new issue of No. XVI. with all objectionable matter omitted.
 This, with pleasing euphemism, he terms in a later advertisement, a new
 and improved edition.  This was the only remarkable adventure of _Mr.
 Tatlers_ brief existence; unless we consider as such a silly Chaldee
 manuscript in imitation of _Blackwood_, and a letter of reproof from a
 divinity student on the impiety of the same dull effusion.  He laments
 the near approach of his end in pathetic terms.  How shall we summon up
 sufficient courage, says he, to look for the last time on our beloved
 little devil and his inestimable proof-sheet?  How shall we be able to
 pass No. 14 Infirmary Street and feel that all its attractions are over?
 How shall we bid farewell for ever to that excellent man, with the long
 greatcoat, wooden leg and wooden board, who acts as our representative at
 the gate of _Alma Mater_?  But alas! he had no choice: _Mr. Tatler_,
 whose career, he says himself, had been successful, passed peacefully
 away, and has ever since dumbly implored the bringing home of bell and
 burial.
 
 _Alter et idem_.  A very different affair was the _Lapsus Lingu_ from
 the _Edinburgh University Magazine_.  The two prospectuses alone, laid
 side by side, would indicate the march of luxury and the repeal of the
 paper duty.  The penny bi-weekly broadside of session 18284 was almost
 wholly dedicated to Momus.  Epigrams, pointless letters, amorous verses,
 and University grievances are the continual burthen of the song.  But
 _Mr. Tatler_ was not without a vein of hearty humour; and his pages
 afford what is much better: to wit, a good picture of student life as it
 then was.  The students of those polite days insisted on retaining their
 hats in the class-room.  There was a cab-stance in front of the College;
 and Carriage Entrance was posted above the main arch, on what the
 writer pleases to call coarse, unclassic boards.  The benches of the
 Speculative then, as now, were red; but all other Societies (the
 Dialectic is the only survivor) met downstairs, in some rooms of which
 it is pointedly said that nothing else could conveniently be made of
 them.  However horrible these dungeons may have been, it is certain that
 they were paid for, and that far too heavily for the taste of session
 18234, which found enough calls upon its purse for porter and toasted
 cheese at Ambroses, or cranberry tarts and ginger-wine at Doulls.
 Duelling was still a possibility; so much so that when two medicals fell
 to fisticuffs in Adam Square, it was seriously hinted that single combat
 would be the result.  Last and most wonderful of all, Gall and Spurzheim
 were in every ones mouth; and the Law student, after having exhausted
 Byrons poetry and Scotts novels, informed the ladies of his belief in
 phrenology.  In the present day he would dilate on Red as a rose is
 she, and then mention that he attends Old Greyfriars, as a tacit claim
 to intellectual superiority.  I do not know that the advance is much.
 
 But _Mr. Tatlers_ best performances were three short papers in which he
 hit off pretty smartly the idiosyncrasies of the _Divinity_, the
 _Medical_, and the _Law_ of session 18234.  The fact that there was
 no notice of the _Arts_ seems to suggest that they stood in the same
 intermediate position as they do nowthe epitome of student-kind.  _Mr.
 Tatlers_ satire is, on the whole, good-humoured, and has not grown
 superannuated in _all_ its limbs.  His descriptions may limp at some
 points, but there are certain broad traits that apply equally well to
 session 18701.  He shows us the _Divinity_ of the periodtall, pale, and
 slenderhis collar greasy, and his coat bare about the seamshis white
 neckcloth serving four days, and regularly turned the thirdthe rim of
 his hat deficient in wooland a weighty volume of theology under his
 arm.  He was the man to buy cheap a snuff-box, or a dozen of pencils,
 or a six-bladed knife, or a quarter of a hundred quills, at any of the
 public sale-rooms.  He was noted for cheap purchases, and for exceeding
 the legal tender in halfpence.  He haunted the darkest and remotest
 corner of the Theatre Gallery.  He was to be seen issuing from aerial
 lodging-houses.  Withal, says mine author, there were many good points
 about him: he paid his landladys bill, read his Bible, went twice to
 church on Sunday, seldom swore, was not often tipsy, and bought the
 _Lapsus Lingu_.
 
 The _Medical_, again, wore a white greatcoat, and consequently talked
 loud(there is something very delicious in that _consequently_).  He
 wore his hat on one side.  He was active, volatile, and went to the top
 of Arthurs Seat on the Sunday forenoon.  He was as quiet in a debating
 society as he was loud in the streets.  He was reckless and imprudent:
 yesterday he insisted on your sharing a bottle of claret with him (and
 claret was claret then, before the cheap-and-nasty treaty), and to-morrow
 he asks you for the loan of a penny to buy the last number of the
 _Lapsus_.
 
 The student of _Law_, again, was a learned man.  He had turned over the
 leaves of Justinians _Institutes_, and knew that they were written in
 Latin.  He was well acquainted with the title-page of Blackstones
 _Commentaries_, and _argal_ (as the gravedigger in _Hamlet_ says) he was
 not a person to be laughed at.  He attended the Parliament House in the
 character of a critic, and could give you stale sneers at all the
 celebrated speakers.  He was the terror of essayists at the Speculative
 or the Forensic.  In social qualities he seems to have stood unrivalled.
 Even in the police-office we find him shining with undiminished lustre.
 If a _Charlie_ should find him rather noisy at an untimely hour, and
 venture to take him into custody, he appears next morning like a Daniel
 come to judgment.  He opens his mouth to speak, and the divine precepts
 of unchanging justice and Scots law flow from his tongue.  The magistrate
 listens in amazement, and fines him only a couple of guineas.
 
 Such then were our predecessors and their College Magazine.  Barclay,
 Ambrose, Young Amos, and Fergusson were to them what the Caf, the
 Rainbow, and Rutherfords are to us.  An hours reading in these old
 pages absolutely confuses us, there is so much that is similar and so
 much that is different; the follies and amusements are so like our own,
 and the manner of frolicking and enjoying are so changed, that one pauses
 and looks about him in philosophic judgment.  The muddy quadrangle is
 thick with living students; but in our eyes it swarms also with the
 phantasmal white greatcoats and tilted hats of 1824.  Two races meet:
 races alike and diverse.  Two performances are played before our eyes;
 but the change seems merely of impersonators, of scenery, of costume.
 Plot and passion are the same.  It is the fall of the spun shilling
 whether seventy-one or twenty-four has the best of it.
 
 In a future number we hope to give a glance at the individualities of the
 present, and see whether the cast shall be head or tailwhether we or the
 readers of the _Lapsus_ stand higher in the balance.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IITHE MODERN STUDENT CONSIDERED GENERALLY
 
 
 We have now reached the difficult portion of our task.  _Mr. Tatler_, for
 all that we care, may have been as virulent as he liked about the
 students of a former; but for the iron to touch our sacred selves, for a
 brother of the Guild to betray its most privy infirmities, let such a
 Judas look to himself as he passes on his way to the Scots Law or the
 Diagnostic, below the solitary lamp at the corner of the dark quadrangle.
 We confess that this idea alarms us.  We enter a protest.  We bind
 ourselves over verbally to keep the peace.  We hope, moreover, that
 having thus made you secret to our misgivings, you will excuse us if we
 be dull, and set that down to caution which you might before have charged
 to the account of stupidity.
 
 The natural tendency of civilisation is to obliterate those distinctions
 which are the best salt of life.  All the fine old professional flavour
 in language has evaporated.  Your very gravedigger has forgotten his
 avocation in his electorship, and would quibble on the Franchise over
 Ophelias grave, instead of more appropriately discussing the duration of
 bodies under ground.  From this tendency, from this gradual attrition of
 life, in which everything pointed and characteristic is being rubbed
 down, till the whole world begins to slip between our fingers in smooth
 undistinguishable sands, from this, we say, it follows that we must not
 attempt to join _Mr. Taller_ in his simple division of students into
 _Law_, _Divinity_, and _Medical_.  Nowadays the Faculties may shake hands
 over their follies; and, like Mrs. Frail and Mrs. Foresight (in _Love for
 Love_) they may stand in the doors of opposite class-rooms, crying:
 Sister, SisterSister everyway!  A few restrictions, indeed, remain to
 influence the followers of individual branches of study.  The Divinity,
 for example, must be an avowed believer; and as this, in the present day,
 is unhappily considered by many as a confession of weakness, he is fain
 to choose one of two ways of gilding the distasteful orthodox bolus.
 Some swallow it in a thin jelly of metaphysics; for it is even a credit
 to believe in God on the evidence of some crack-jaw philosopher, although
 it is a decided slur to believe in Him on His own authority.  Others
 again (and this we think the worst method), finding German grammar a
 somewhat dry morsel, run their own little heresy as a proof of
 independence; and deny one of the cardinal doctrines that they may hold
 the others without being laughed at.
 
 Besides, however, such influences as these, there is little more
 distinction between the faculties than the traditionary ideal, handed
 down through a long sequence of students, and getting rounder and more
 featureless at each successive session.  The plague of uniformity has
 descended on the College.  Students (and indeed all sorts and conditions
 of men) now require their faculty and character hung round their neck on
 a placard, like the scenes in Shakespeares theatre.  And in the midst of
 all this weary sameness, not the least common feature is the gravity of
 every face.  No more does the merry medical run eagerly in the clear
 winter morning up the rugged sides of Arthurs Seat, and hear the church
 bells begin and thicken and die away below him among the gathered smoke
 of the city.  He will not break Sunday to so little purpose.  He no
 longer finds pleasure in the mere output of his surplus energy.  He
 husbands his strength, and lays out walks, and reading, and amusement
 with deep consideration, so that he may get as much work and pleasure out
 of his body as he can, and waste none of his energy on mere impulse, or
 such flat enjoyment as an excursion in the country.
 
 See the quadrangle in the interregnum of classes, in those two or three
 minutes when it is full of passing students, and we think you will admit
 that, if we have not made it an habitation of dragons, we have at least
 transformed it into a court for owls.  Solemnity broods heavily over
 the enclosure; and wherever you seek it, you will find a dearth of
 merriment, an absence of real youthful enjoyment.  You might as well try
 
     To move wild laughter in the throat of death
 
 as to excite any healthy stir among the bulk of this staid company.
 
 The studious congregate about the doors of the different classes,
 debating the matter of the lecture, or comparing note-books.  A reserved
 rivalry sunders them.  Here are some deep in Greek particles: there,
 others are already inhabitants of that land
 
     Where entity and quiddity,
     Like ghosts of defunct bodies fly
     Where Truth in person does appear
     Like words congealed in northern air.
 
 But none of them seem to find any relish for their studiesno pedantic
 love of this subject or that lights up their eyesscience and learning
 are only means for a livelihood, which they have considerately embraced
 and which they solemnly pursue.  Labours pale priests, their lips seem
 incapable of laughter, except in the way of polite recognition of
 professorial wit.  The stains of ink are chronic on their meagre fingers.
 They walk like Saul among the asses.
 
 The dandies are not less subdued.  In 1824 there was a noisy dapper
 dandyism abroad.  Vulgar, as we should now think, but yet geniala matter
 of white greatcoats and loud voicesstrangely different from the stately
 frippery that is rife at present.  These men are out of their element in
 the quadrangle.  Even the small remains of boisterous humour, which still
 clings to any collection of young men, jars painfully on their morbid
 sensibilities; and they beat a hasty retreat to resume their perfunctory
 march along Princes Street.  Flirtation is to them a great social duty, a
 painful obligation, which they perform on every occasion in the same
 chill official manner, and with the same commonplace advances, the same
 dogged observance of traditional behaviour.  The shape of their raiment
 is a burden almost greater than they can bear, and they halt in their
 walk to preserve the due adjustment of their trouser-knees, till one
 would fancy he had mixed in a procession of Jacobs.  We speak, of course,
 for ourselves; but we would as soon associate with a herd of sprightly
 apes as with these gloomy modern beaux.  Alas, that our Mirabels, our
 Valentines, even our Brummels, should have left their mantles upon
 nothing more amusing!
 
 Nor are the fast men less constrained.  Solemnity, even in dissipation,
 is the order of the day; and they go to the devil with a perverse
 seriousness, a systematic rationalism of wickedness that would have
 surprised the simpler sinners of old.  Some of these men whom we see
 gravely conversing on the steps have but a slender acquaintance with each
 other.  Their intercourse consists principally of mutual bulletins of
 depravity; and, week after week, as they meet they reckon up their items
 of transgression, and give an abstract of their downward progress for
 approval and encouragement.  These folk form a freemasonry of their own.
 An oath is the shibboleth of their sinister fellowship.  Once they hear a
 man swear, it is wonderful how their tongues loosen and their bashful
 spirits take enlargement, under the consciousness of brotherhood.  There
 is no folly, no pardoning warmth of temper about them; they are as
 steady-going and systematic in their own way as the studious in theirs.
 
 Not that we are without merry men.  No.  We shall not be ungrateful to
 those, whose grimaces, whose ironical laughter, whose active feet in the
 College Anthem have beguiled so many weary hours and added a pleasant
 variety to the strain of close attention.  But even these are too
 evidently professional in their antics.  They go about cogitating puns
 and inventing tricks.  It is their vocation, Hal.  They are the
 gratuitous jesters of the class-room; and, like the clown when he leaves
 the stage, their merriment too often sinks as the bell rings the hour of
 liberty, and they pass forth by the Post-Office, grave and sedate, and
 meditating fresh gambols for the morrow.
 
 This is the impression left on the mind of any observing student by too
 many of his fellows.  They seem all frigid old men; and one pauses to
 think how such an unnatural state of matters is produced.  We feel
 inclined to blame for it the unfortunate absence of _University feeling_
 which is so marked a characteristic of our Edinburgh students.
 Academical interests are so few and far betweenstudents, as students,
 have so little in common, except a peevish rivalrythere is such an
 entire want of broad college sympathies and ordinary college friendships,
 that we fancy that no University in the kingdom is in so poor a plight.
 Our system is full of anomalies.  A, who cut B whilst he was a shabby
 student, curries sedulously up to him and cudgels his memory for
 anecdotes about him when he becomes the great so-and-so.  Let there be an
 end of this shy, proud reserve on the one hand, and this shuddering fine
 ladyism on the other; and we think we shall find both ourselves and the
 College bettered.  Let it be a sufficient reason for intercourse that two
 men sit together on the same benches.  Let the great A be held excused
 for nodding to the shabby B in Princes Street, if he can say, That
 fellow is a student.  Once this could be brought about, we think you
 would find the whole heart of the University beat faster.  We think you
 would find a fusion among the students, a growth of common feelings, an
 increasing sympathy between class and class, whose influence (in such a
 heterogeneous company as ours) might be of incalculable value in all
 branches of politics and social progress.  It would do more than this.
 If we could find some method of making the University a real mother to
 her sonssomething beyond a building of class-rooms, a Senatus and a
 lottery of somewhat shabby prizeswe should strike a death-blow at the
 constrained and unnatural attitude of our Society.  At present we are not
 a united body, but a loose gathering of individuals, whose inherent
 attraction is allowed to condense them into little knots and coteries.
 Our last snowball riot read us a plain lesson on our condition.  There
 was no party spiritno unity of interests.  A few, who were mischievously
 inclined, marched off to the College of Surgeons in a pretentious file;
 but even before they reached their destination the feeble inspiration had
 died out in many, and their numbers were sadly thinned.  Some followed
 strange gods in the direction of Drummond Street, and others slunk back
 to meek good-boyism at the feet of the Professors.  The same is visible
 in better things.  As you send a man to an English University that he may
 have his prejudices rubbed off, you might send him to Edinburgh that he
 may have them ingrainedrendered indeliblefostered by sympathy into
 living principles of his spirit.  And the reason of it is quite plain.
 From this absence of University feeling it comes that a mans friendships
 are always the direct and immediate results of these very prejudices.  A
 common weakness is the best master of ceremonies in our quadrangle: a
 mutual vice is the readiest introduction.  The studious associate with
 the studious alonethe dandies with the dandies.  There is nothing to
 force them to rub shoulders with the others; and so they grow day by day
 more wedded to their own original opinions and affections.  They see
 through the same spectacles continually.  All broad sentiments, all real
 catholic humanity expires; and the mind gets gradually stiffened into one
 positionbecomes so habituated to a contracted atmosphere, that it
 shudders and withers under the least draught of the free air that
 circulates in the general field of mankind.
 
 Specialism in Society then is, we think, one cause of our present state.
 Specialism in study is another.  We doubt whether this has ever been a
 good thing since the world began; but we are sure it is much worse now
 than it was.  Formerly, when a man became a specialist, it was out of
 affection for his subject.  With a somewhat grand devotion he left all
 the world of Science to follow his true love; and he contrived to find
 that strange pedantic interest which inspired the man who
 
     Settled _Hotis_ businesslet it be
        Properly based _Oun_
     Gave us the doctrine of the enclitic _De_,
        Dead from the waist down.
 
 Nowadays it is quite different.  Our pedantry wants even the saving
 clause of Enthusiasm.  The election is now matter of necessity and not of
 choice.  Knowledge is now too broad a field for your Jack-of-all-Trades;
 and, from beautifully utilitarian reasons, he makes his choice, draws his
 pen through a dozen branches of study, and beholdJohn the Specialist.
 That this is the way to be wealthy we shall not deny; but we hold that it
 is _not_ the way to be healthy or wise.  The whole mind becomes narrowed
 and circumscribed to one punctual spot of knowledge.  A rank unhealthy
 soil breeds a harvest of prejudices.  Feeling himself above others in his
 one little branchin the classification of toadstools, or Carthaginian
 historyhe waxes great in his own eyes and looks down on others.  Having
 all his sympathies educated in one way, they die out in every other; and
 he is apt to remain a peevish, narrow, and intolerant bigot.  Dilettante
 is now a term of reproach; but there is a certain form of dilettantism to
 which no one can object.  It is this that we want among our students.  We
 wish them to abandon no subject until they have seen and felt its
 meritto act under a general interest in all branches of knowledge, not a
 commercial eagerness to excel in one.
 
 In both these directions our sympathies are constipated.  We are apostles
 of our own caste and our own subject of study, instead of being, as we
 should, true men and _loving_ students.  Of course both of these could be
 corrected by the students themselves; but this is nothing to the purpose:
 it is more important to ask whether the Senatus or the body of alumni
 could do nothing towards the growth of better feeling and wider
 sentiments.  Perhaps in another paper we may say something upon this
 head.
 
 One other word, however, before we have done.  What shall we be when we
 grow really old?  Of yore, a man was thought to lay on restrictions and
 acquire new deadweight of mournful experience with every year, till he
 looked back on his youth as the very summer of impulse and freedom.  We
 please ourselves with thinking that it cannot be so with us.  We would
 fain hope that, as we have begun in one way, we may end in another; and
 that when we are in fact the octogenarians that we _seem_ at present,
 there shall be no merrier men on earth.  It is pleasant to picture us,
 sunning ourselves in Princes Street of a morning, or chirping over our
 evening cups, with all the merriment that we wanted in youth.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIDEBATING SOCIETIES
 
 
 A debating society is at first somewhat of a disappointment.  You do not
 often find the youthful Demosthenes chewing his pebbles in the same room
 with you; or, even if you do, you will probably think the performance
 little to be admired.  As a general rule, the members speak shamefully
 ill.  The subjects of debate are heavy; and so are the fines.  The Ballot
 Questionoldest of dialectic nightmaresis often found astride of a
 somnolent sederunt.  The Greeks and Romans, too, are reserved as sort of
 _general-utility_ men, to do all the dirty work of illustration; and they
 fill as many functions as the famous waterfall scene at the Princesss,
 which I found doing duty on one evening as a gorge in Peru, a haunt of
 German robbers, and a peaceful vale in the Scottish borders.  There is a
 sad absence of striking argument or real lively discussion.  Indeed, you
 feel a growing contempt for your fellow-members; and it is not until you
 rise yourself to hawk and hesitate and sit shamefully down again, amid
 eleemosynary applause, that you begin to find your level and value others
 rightly.  Even then, even when failure has damped your critical ardour,
 you will see many things to be laughed at in the deportment of your
 rivals.
 
 Most laughable, perhaps, are your indefatigable strivers after eloquence.
 They are of those who pursue with eagerness the phantoms of hope, and
 who, since they expect that the deficiencies of last sentence will be
 supplied by the next, have been recommended by Dr. Samuel Johnson to
 attend to the History of Rasselas, Prince of Abyssinia.  They are
 characterised by a hectic hopefulness.  Nothing damps them.  They rise
 from the ruins of one abortive sentence, to launch forth into another
 with unabated vigour.  They have all the manner of an orator.  From the
 tone of their voice, you would expect a splendid periodand lo! a string
 of broken-backed, disjointed clauses, eked out with stammerings and
 throat-clearings.  They possess the art (learned from the pulpit) of
 rounding an uneuphonious sentence by dwelling on a single syllableof
 striking a balance in a top-heavy period by lengthening out a word into a
 melancholy quaver.  Withal, they never cease to hope.  Even at last, even
 when they have exhausted all their ideas, even after the would-be
 peroration has finally refused to perorate, they remain upon their feet
 with their mouths open, waiting for some further inspiration, like
 Chaucers widows son in the dung-hole, after
 
     His throat was kit unto the nekk bone,
 
 in vain expectation of that seed that was to be laid upon his tongue, and
 give him renewed and clearer utterance.
 
 These men may have something to say, if they could only say itindeed
 they generally have; but the next class are people who, having nothing to
 say, are cursed with a facility and an unhappy command of words, that
 makes them the prime nuisances of the society they affect.  They try to
 cover their absence of matter by an unwholesome vitality of delivery.
 They look triumphantly round the room, as if courting applause, after a
 torrent of diluted truism.  They talk in a circle, harping on the same
 dull round of argument, and returning again and again to the same remark
 with the same sprightliness, the same irritating appearance of novelty.
 
 After this set, any one is tolerable; so we shall merely hint at a few
 other varieties.  There is your man who is pre-eminently conscientious,
 whose face beams with sincerity as he opens on the negative, and who
 votes on the affirmative at the end, looking round the room with an air
 of chastened pride.  There is also the irrelevant speaker, who rises,
 emits a joke or two, and then sits down again, without ever attempting to
 tackle the subject of debate.  Again, we have men who ride pick-a-back on
 their family reputation, or, if their family have none, identify
 themselves with some well-known statesman, use his opinions, and lend him
 their patronage on all occasions.  This is a dangerous plan, and serves
 oftener, I am afraid, to point a difference than to adorn a speech.
 
 But alas! a striking failure may be reached without tempting Providence
 by any of these ambitious tricks.  Our own stature will be found high
 enough for shame.  The success of three simple sentences lures us into a
 fatal parenthesis in the fourth, from whose shut brackets we may never
 disentangle the thread of our discourse.  A momentary flush tempts us
 into a quotation; and we may be left helpless in the middle of one of
 Popes couplets, a white film gathering before our eyes, and our kind
 friends charitably trying to cover our disgrace by a feeble round of
 applause.  _Amis lecteurs_, this is a painful topic.  It is possible that
 we too, we, the potent, grave, and reverend editor, may have suffered
 these things, and drunk as deep as any of the cup of shameful failure.
 Let us dwell no longer on so delicate a subject.
 
 In spite, however, of these disagreeables, I should recommend any student
 to suffer them with Spartan courage, as the benefits he receives should
 repay him an hundredfold for them all.  The life of the debating society
 is a handy antidote to the life of the classroom and quadrangle.  Nothing
 could be conceived more excellent as a weapon against many of those
 _peccant humours_ that we have been railing against in the jeremiad of
 our last College Paperparticularly in the field of intellect.  It is a
 sad sight to see our heather-scented students, our boys of seventeen,
 coming up to College with determined views_rous_ in speculationhaving
 gauged the vanity of philosophy or learned to shun it as the middle-man
 of heresya company of determined, deliberate opinionists, not to be
 moved by all the sleights of logic.  What have such men to do with study?
 If their minds are made up irrevocably, why burn the studious lamp in
 search of further confirmation?  Every set opinion I hear a student
 deliver I feel a certain lowering of my regard.  He who studies, he who
 is yet employed in groping for his premises, should keep his mind fluent
 and sensitive, keen to mark flaws, and willing to surrender untenable
 positions.  He should keep himself teachable, or cease the expensive
 farce of being taught.  It is to further this docile spirit that we
 desire to press the claims of debating societies.  It is as a means of
 melting down this museum of premature petrifactions into living and
 impressionable soul that we insist on their utility.  If we could once
 prevail on our students to feel no shame in avowing an uncertain attitude
 towards any subject, if we could teach them that it was unnecessary for
 every lad to have his _opinionette_ on every topic, we should have gone a
 far way towards bracing the intellectual tone of the coming race of
 thinkers; and this it is which debating societies are so well fitted to
 perform.
 
 We there meet people of every shade of opinion, and make friends with
 them.  We are taught to rail against a man the whole session through, and
 then hob-a-nob with him at the concluding entertainment.  We find men of
 talent far exceeding our own, whose conclusions are widely different from
 ours; and we are thus taught to distrust ourselves.  But the best means
 of all towards catholicity is that wholesome rule which some folk are
 most inclined to condemnI mean the law of _obliged speeches_.  Your
 senior member commands; and you must take the affirmative or the
 negative, just as suits his best convenience.  This tends to the most
 perfect liberality.  It is no good hearing the arguments of an opponent,
 for in good verity you rarely follow them; and even if you do take the
 trouble to listen, it is merely in a captious search for weaknesses.
 This is proved, I fear, in every debate; when you hear each speaker
 arguing out his own prepared _spcialit_ (he never intended speaking, of
 course, until some remarks of, etc.), arguing out, I say, his own
 _coached-up_ subject without the least attention to what has gone before,
 as utterly at sea about the drift of his adversarys speech as Panurge
 when he argued with Thaumaste, and merely linking his own prelection to
 the last by a few flippant criticisms.  Now, as the rule stands, you are
 saddled with the side you disapprove, and so you are forced, by regard
 for your own fame, to argue out, to feel with, to elaborate completely,
 the case as it stands against yourself; and what a fund of wisdom do you
 not turn up in this idle digging of the vineyard!  How many new
 difficulties take form before your eyes? how many superannuated arguments
 cripple finally into limbo, under the glance of your enforced
 eclecticism!
 
 Nor is this the only merit of Debating Societies.  They tend also to
 foster taste, and to promote friendship between University men.  This
 last, as we have had occasion before to say, is the great requirement of
 our student life; and it will therefore be no waste of time if we devote
 a paragraph to this subject in its connection with Debating Societies.
 At present they partake too much of the nature of a _clique_.  Friends
 propose friends, and mutual friends second them, until the society
 degenerates into a sort of family party.  You may confirm old
 acquaintances, but you can rarely make new ones.  You find yourself in
 the atmosphere of your own daily intercourse.  Now, this is an
 unfortunate circumstance, which it seems to me might readily be
 rectified.  Our Principal has shown himself so friendly towards all
 College improvements that I cherish the hope of seeing shortly realised a
 certain suggestion, which is not a new one with me, and which must often
 have been proposed and canvassed heretoforeI mean, a real _University
 Debating Society_, patronised by the Senatus, presided over by the
 Professors, to which every one might gain ready admittance on sight of
 his matriculation ticket, where it would be a favour and not a necessity
 to speak, and where the obscure student might have another object for
 attendance besides the mere desire to save his fines: to wit, the chance
 of drawing on himself the favourable consideration of his teachers.  This
 would be merely following in the good tendency, which has been so
 noticeable during all this session, to increase and multiply student
 societies and clubs of every sort.  Nor would it be a matter of much
 difficulty.  The united societies would form a nucleus: one of the
 class-rooms at first, and perhaps afterwards the great hall above the
 library, might be the place of meeting.  There would be no want of
 attendance or enthusiasm, I am sure; for it is a very different thing to
 speak under the bushel of a private club on the one hand, and, on the
 other, in a public place, where a happy period or a subtle argument may
 do the speaker permanent service in after life.  Such a club might end,
 perhaps, by rivalling the Union at Cambridge or the Union at Oxford.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVTHE PHILOSOPHY OF UMBRELLAS {151}
 
 
 It is wonderful to think what a turn has been given to our whole Society
 by the fact that we live under the sign of Aquariusthat our climate is
 essentially wet.  A mere arbitrary distinction, like the walking-swords
 of yore, might have remained the symbol of foresight and respectability,
 had not the raw mists and dropping showers of our island pointed the
 inclination of Society to another exponent of those virtues.  A ribbon of
 the Legion of Honour or a string of medals may prove a persons courage;
 a title may prove his birth; a professorial chair his study and
 acquirement; but it is the habitual carriage of the umbrella that is the
 stamp of Respectability.  The umbrella has become the acknowledged index
 of social position.
 
 Robinson Crusoe presents us with a touching instance of the hankering
 after them inherent in the civilised and educated mind.  To the
 superficial, the hot suns of Juan Fernandez may sufficiently account for
 his quaint choice of a luxury; but surely one who had borne the hard
 labour of a seaman under the tropics for all these years could have
 supported an excursion after goats or a peaceful _constitutional_ arm in
 arm with the nude Friday.  No, it was not this: the memory of a vanished
 respectability called for some outward manifestation, and the result
 wasan umbrella.  A pious castaway might have rigged up a belfry and
 solaced his Sunday mornings with the mimicry of church-bells; but Crusoe
 was rather a moralist than a pietist, and his leaf-umbrella is as fine an
 example of the civilised mind striving to express itself under adverse
 circumstances as we have ever met with.
 
 It is not for nothing, either, that the umbrella has become the very
 foremost badge of modern civilisationthe Urim and Thummim of
 respectability.  Its pregnant symbolism has taken its rise in the most
 natural manner.  Consider, for a moment, when umbrellas were first
 introduced into this country, what manner of men would use them, and what
 class would adhere to the useless but ornamental cane.  The first,
 without doubt, would be the hypochondriacal, out of solicitude for their
 health, or the frugal, out of care for their raiment; the second, it is
 equally plain, would include the fop, the fool, and the Bobadil.  Any one
 acquainted with the growth of Society, and knowing out of what small
 seeds of cause are produced great revolutions, and wholly new conditions
 of intercourse, sees from this simple thought how the carriage of an
 umbrella came to indicate frugality, judicious regard for bodily welfare,
 and scorn for mere outward adornment, and, in one word, all those homely
 and solid virtues implied in the term RESPECTABILITY.  Not that the
 umbrellas costliness has nothing to do with its great influence.  Its
 possession, besides symbolising (as we have already indicated) the change
 from wild Esau to plain Jacob dwelling in tents, implies a certain
 comfortable provision of fortune.  It is not every one that can expose
 twenty-six shillings worth of property to so many chances of loss and
 theft.  So strongly do we feel on this point, indeed, that we are almost
 inclined to consider all who possess really well-conditioned umbrellas as
 worthy of the Franchise.  They have a qualification standing in their
 lobbies; they carry a sufficient stake in the common-weal below their
 arm.  One who bears with him an umbrellasuch a complicated structure of
 whalebone, of silk, and of cane, that it becomes a very microcosm of
 modern industryis necessarily a man of peace.  A half-crown cane may be
 applied to an offenders head on a very moderate provocation; but a
 six-and-twenty shilling silk is a possession too precious to be
 adventured in the shock of war.
 
 These are but a few glances at how umbrellas (in the general) came to
 their present high estate.  But the true Umbrella-Philosopher meets with
 far stranger applications as he goes about the streets.
 
 Umbrellas, like faces, acquire a certain sympathy with the individual who
 carries them: indeed, they are far more capable of betraying his trust;
 for whereas a face is given to us so far ready made, and all our power
 over it is in frowning, and laughing, and grimacing, during the first
 three or four decades of life, each umbrella is selected from a whole
 shopful, as being most consonant to the purchasers disposition.  An
 undoubted power of diagnosis rests with the practised
 Umbrella-Philosopher.  O you who lisp, and amble, and change the fashion
 of your countenancesyou who conceal all these, how little do you think
 that you left a proof of your weakness in our umbrella-standthat even
 now, as you shake out the folds to meet the thickening snow, we read in
 its ivory handle the outward and visible sign of your snobbery, or from
 the exposed gingham of its cover detect, through coat and waistcoat, the
 hidden hypocrisy of the _dickey_!  But alas! even the umbrella is no
 certain criterion.  The falsity and the folly of the human race have
 degraded that graceful symbol to the ends of dishonesty; and while some
 umbrellas, from carelessness in selection, are not strikingly
 characteristic (for it is only in what a man loves that he displays his
 real nature), others, from certain prudential motives, are chosen
 directly opposite to the persons disposition.  A mendacious umbrella is
 a sign of great moral degradation.  Hypocrisy naturally shelters itself
 below a silk; while the fast youth goes to visit his religious friends
 armed with the decent and reputable gingham.  May it not be said of the
 bearers of these inappropriate umbrellas that they go about the streets
 with a lie in their right hand?
 
 The kings of Siam, as we read, besides having a graduated social scale of
 umbrellas (which was a good thing), prevented the great bulk of their
 subjects from having any at all, which was certainly a bad thing.  We
 should be sorry to believe that this Eastern legislator was a foolthe
 idea of an aristocracy of umbrellas is too philosophic to have originated
 in a nobodyand we have accordingly taken exceeding pains to find out the
 reason of this harsh restriction.  We think we have succeeded; but, while
 admiring the principle at which he aimed, and while cordially recognising
 in the Siamese potentate the only man before ourselves who had taken a
 real grasp of the umbrella, we must be allowed to point out how
 unphilosophically the great man acted in this particular.  His object,
 plainly, was to prevent any unworthy persons from bearing the sacred
 symbol of domestic virtues.  We cannot excuse his limiting these virtues
 to the circle of his court.  We must only remember that such was the
 feeling of the age in which he lived.  Liberalism had not yet raised the
 war-cry of the working classes.  But here was his mistake: it was a
 needless regulation.  Except in a very few cases of hypocrisy joined to a
 powerful intellect, men, not by nature _umbrellarians_, have tried again
 and again to become so by art, and yet have failedhave expended their
 patrimony in the purchase of umbrella after umbrella, and yet have
 systematically lost them, and have finally, with contrite spirits and
 shrunken purses, given up their vain struggle, and relied on theft and
 borrowing for the remainder of their lives.  This is the most remarkable
 fact that we have had occasion to notice; and yet we challenge the candid
 reader to call it in question.  Now, as there cannot be any _moral
 selection_ in a mere dead piece of furnitureas the umbrella cannot be
 supposed to have an affinity for individual men equal and reciprocal to
 that which men certainly feel toward individual umbrellaswe took the
 trouble of consulting a scientific friend as to whether there was any
 possible physical explanation of the phenomenon.  He was unable to supply
 a plausible theory, or even hypothesis; but we extract from his letter
 the following interesting passage relative to the physical peculiarities
 of umbrellas: Not the least important, and by far the most curious
 property of the umbrella, is the energy which it displays in affecting
 the atmospheric strata.  There is no fact in meteorology better
 establishedindeed, it is almost the only one on which meteorologists are
 agreedthan that the carriage of an umbrella produces desiccation of the
 air; while if it be left at home, aqueous vapour is largely produced, and
 is soon deposited in the form of rain.  No theory, my friend continues,
 competent to explain this hygrometric law has been given (as far as I am
 aware) by Herschel, Dove, Glaisher, Tait, Buchan, or any other writer;
 nor do I pretend to supply the defect.  I venture, however, to throw out
 the conjecture that it will be ultimately found to belong to the same
 class of natural laws as that agreeable to which a slice of toast always
 descends with the buttered surface downwards.
 
 But it is time to draw to a close.  We could expatiate much longer upon
 this topic, but want of space constrains us to leave unfinished these few
 desultory remarksslender contributions towards a subject which has
 fallen sadly backward, and which, we grieve to say, was better understood
 by the king of Siam in 1686 than by all the philosophers of to-day.  If,
 however, we have awakened in any rational mind an interest in the
 symbolism of umbrellasin any generous heart a more complete sympathy
 with the dumb companion of his daily walkor in any grasping spirit a
 pure notion of respectability strong enough to make him expend his
 six-and-twenty shillingswe shall have deserved well of the world, to say
 nothing of the many industrious persons employed in the manufacture of
 the article.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VTHE PHILOSOPHY OF NOMENCLATURE
 
 
     How many Csars and Pompeys, by mere inspirations of the names, have
     been rendered worthy of them?  And how many are there, who might have
     done exceeding well in the world, had not their characters and
     spirits been totally depressed and Nicodemusd into
     nothing?_Tristram Shandy_, vol. I. chap xix.
 
 Such were the views of the late Walter Shandy, Esq., Turkey merchant.  To
 the best of my belief, Mr. Shandy is the first who fairly pointed out the
 incalculable influence of nomenclature upon the whole lifewho seems
 first to have recognised the one child, happy in an heroic appellation,
 soaring upwards on the wings of fortune, and the other, like the dead
 sailor in his shotted hammock, haled down by sheer weight of name into
 the abysses of social failure.  Solomon possibly had his eye on some such
 theory when he said that a good name is better than precious ointment;
 and perhaps we may trace a similar spirit in the compilers of the English
 Catechism, and the affectionate interest with which they linger round the
 catechumens name at the very threshold of their work.  But, be these as
 they may, I think no one can censure me for appending, in pursuance of
 the expressed wish of his son, the Turkey merchants name to his system,
 and pronouncing, without further preface, a short epitome of the
 Shandean Philosophy of Nomenclature.
 
 To begin, then: the influence of our name makes itself felt from the very
 cradle.  As a schoolboy I remember the pride with which I hailed Robin
 Hood, Robert Bruce, and Robert le Diable as my name-fellows; and the
 feeling of sore disappointment that fell on my heart when I found a
 freebooter or a general who did not share with me a single one of my
 numerous _prnomina_.  Look at the delight with which two children find
 they have the same name.  They are friends from that moment forth; they
 have a bond of union stronger than exchange of nuts and sweetmeats.  This
 feeling, I own, wears off in later life.  Our names lose their freshness
 and interest, become trite and indifferent.  But this, dear reader, is
 merely one of the sad effects of those shades of the prison-house which
 come gradually betwixt us and nature with advancing years; it affords no
 weapon against the philosophy of names.
 
 In after life, although we fail to trace its working, that name which
 careless godfathers lightly applied to your unconscious infancy will have
 been moulding your character, and influencing with irresistible power the
 whole course of your earthly fortunes.  But the last name, overlooked by
 Mr. Shandy, is no whit less important as a condition of success.  Family
 names, we must recollect, are but inherited nicknames; and if the
 _sobriquet_ were applicable to the ancestor, it is most likely applicable
 to the descendant also.  You would not expect to find Mr. MPhun acting
 as a mute, or Mr. MLumpha excelling as a professor of dancing.
 Therefore, in what follows, we shall consider names, independent of
 whether they are first or last.  And to begin with, look what a pull
 _Cromwell_ had over _Pym_the one name full of a resonant imperialism,
 the other, mean, pettifogging, and unheroic to a degree.  Who would
 expect eloquence from _Pym_who would read poems by _Pym_who would bow
 to the opinion of _Pym_?  He might have been a dentist, but he should
 never have aspired to be a statesman.  I can only wonder that he
 succeeded as he did.  Pym and Habakkuk stand first upon the roll of men
 who have triumphed, by sheer force of genius, over the most unfavourable
 appellations.  But even these have suffered; and, had they been more
 fitly named, the one might have been Lord Protector, and the other have
 shared the laurels with Isaiah.  In this matter we must not forget that
 all our great poets have borne great names.  Chaucer, Spenser,
 Shakespeare, Milton, Pope, Wordsworth, Shelleywhat a constellation of
 lordly words!  Not a single common-place name among themnot a Brown, not
 a Jones, not a Robinson; they are all names that one would stop and look
 at on a door-plate.  Now, imagine if _Pepys_ had tried to clamber somehow
 into the enclosure of poetry, what a blot would that word have made upon
 the list!  The thing was impossible.  In the first place a certain
 natural consciousness that men would have held him down to the level of
 his name, would have prevented him from rising above the Pepsine
 standard, and so haply withheld him altogether from attempting verse.
 Next, the booksellers would refuse to publish, and the world to read
 them, on the mere evidence of the fatal appellation.  And now, before I
 close this section, I must say one word as to _punnable_ names, names
 that stand alone, that have a significance and life apart from him that
 bears them.  These are the bitterest of all.  One friend of mine goes
 bowed and humbled through life under the weight of this misfortune; for
 it is an awful thing when a mans name is a joke, when he cannot be
 mentioned without exciting merriment, and when even the intimation of his
 death bids fair to carry laughter into many a home.
 
 So much for people who are badly named.  Now for people who are _too_
 well named, who go top-heavy from the font, who are baptized into a false
 position, and find themselves beginning life eclipsed under the fame of
 some of the great ones of the past.  A man, for instance, called William
 Shakespeare could never dare to write plays.  He is thrown into too
 humbling an apposition with the author of _Hamlet_.  Its own name coming
 after is such an anti-climax.  The plays of William Shakespeare? says
 the readerO no!  The plays of William Shakespeare Cockerill, and he
 throws the book aside.  In wise pursuance of such views, Mr. John Milton
 Hengler, who not long since delighted us in this favoured town, has never
 attempted to write an epic, but has chosen a new path, and has excelled
 upon the tight-rope.  A marked example of triumph over this is the case
 of Mr. Dante Gabriel Rossetti.  On the face of the matter, I should have
 advised him to imitate the pleasing modesty of the last-named gentleman,
 and confine his ambition to the sawdust.  But Mr. Rossetti has triumphed.
 He has even dared to translate from his mighty name-father; and the voice
 of fame supports him in his boldness.
 
 Dear readers, one might write a year upon this matter.  A lifetime of
 comparison and research could scarce suffice for its elucidation.  So
 here, if it please you, we shall let it rest.  Slight as these notes have
 been, I would that the great founder of the system had been alive to see
 them.  How he had warmed and brightened, how his persuasive eloquence
 would have fallen on the ears of Toby; and what a letter of praise and
 sympathy would not the editor have received before the month was out!
 Alas, the thing was not to be.  Walter Shandy died and was duly buried,
 while yet his theory lay forgotten and neglected by his
 fellow-countrymen.  But, reader, the day will come, I hope, when a
 paternal government will stamp out, as seeds of national weakness, all
 depressing patronymics, and when godfathers and godmothers will soberly
 and earnestly debate the interest of the nameless one, and not rush
 blindfold to the christening.  In these days there shall be written a
 Godfathers Assistant, in shape of a dictionary of names, with their
 concomitant virtues and vices; and this book shall be scattered broadcast
 through the land, and shall be on the table of every one eligible for
 godfathership, until such a thing as a vicious or untoward appellation
 shall have ceased from off the face of the earth.
 
 
 
 
 CRITICISMS
 
 
 CHAPTER ILORD LYTTONS FABLES IN SONG
 
 
 It seems as if Lord Lytton, in this new book of his, had found the form
 most natural to his talent.  In some ways, indeed, it may be held
 inferior to _Chronicles and Characters_; we look in vain for anything
 like the terrible intensity of the night-scene in _Irene_, or for any
 such passages of massive and memorable writing as appeared, here and
 there, in the earlier work, and made it not altogether unworthy of its
 model, Hugos _Legend of the Ages_.  But it becomes evident, on the most
 hasty retrospect, that this earlier work was a step on the way towards
 the later.  It seems as if the author had been feeling about for his
 definite medium, and was already, in the language of the childs game,
 growing hot.  There are many pieces in _Chronicles and Characters_ that
 might be detached from their original setting, and embodied, as they
 stand, among the _Fables in Song_.
 
 For the term Fable is not very easy to define rigorously.  In the most
 typical form some moral precept is set forth by means of a conception
 purely fantastic, and usually somewhat trivial into the bargain; there is
 something playful about it, that will not support a very exacting
 criticism, and the lesson must be apprehended by the fancy at half a
 hint.  Such is the great mass of the old stories of wise animals or
 foolish men that have amused our childhood.  But we should expect the
 fable, in company with other and more important literary forms, to be
 more and more loosely, or at least largely, comprehended as time went on,
 and so to degenerate in conception from this original type.  That
 depended for much of its piquancy on the very fact that it was fantastic:
 the point of the thing lay in a sort of humorous inappropriateness; and
 it is natural enough that pleasantry of this description should become
 less common, as men learn to suspect some serious analogy underneath.
 Thus a comical story of an ape touches us quite differently after the
 proposition of Mr. Darwins theory.  Moreover, there lay, perhaps, at the
 bottom of this primitive sort of fable, a humanity, a tenderness of rough
 truths; so that at the end of some story, in which vice or folly had met
 with its destined punishment, the fabulist might be able to assure his
 auditors, as we have often to assure tearful children on the like
 occasions, that they may dry their eyes, for none of it was true.
 
 But this benefit of fiction becomes lost with more sophisticated hearers
 and authors: a man is no longer the dupe of his own artifice, and cannot
 deal playfully with truths that are a matter of bitter concern to him in
 his life.  And hence, in the progressive centralisation of modern
 thought, we should expect the old form of fable to fall gradually into
 desuetude, and be gradually succeeded by another, which is a fable in all
 points except that it is not altogether fabulous.  And this new form,
 such as we should expect, and such as we do indeed find, still presents
 the essential character of brevity; as in any other fable also, there is,
 underlying and animating the brief action, a moral idea; and as in any
 other fable, the object is to bring this home to the reader through the
 intellect rather than through the feelings; so that, without being very
 deeply moved or interested by the characters of the piece, we should
 recognise vividly the hinges on which the little plot revolves.  But the
 fabulist now seeks analogies where before he merely sought humorous
 situations.  There will be now a logical nexus between the moral
 expressed and the machinery employed to express it.  The machinery, in
 fact, as this change is developed, becomes less and less fabulous.  We
 find ourselves in presence of quite a serious, if quite a miniature
 division of creative literature; and sometimes we have the lesson
 embodied in a sober, everyday narration, as in the parables of the New
 Testament, and sometimes merely the statement or, at most, the
 collocation of significant facts in life, the reader being left to
 resolve for himself the vague, troublesome, and not yet definitely moral
 sentiment which has been thus created.  And step by step with the
 development of this change, yet another is developed: the moral tends to
 become more indeterminate and large.  It ceases to be possible to append
 it, in a tag, to the bottom of the piece, as one might write the name
 below a caricature; and the fable begins to take rank with all other
 forms of creative literature, as something too ambitious, in spite of its
 miniature dimensions, to be resumed in any succinct formula without the
 loss of all that is deepest and most suggestive in it.
 
 Now it is in this widest sense that Lord Lytton understands the term;
 there are examples in his two pleasant volumes of all the forms already
 mentioned, and even of another which can only be admitted among fables by
 the utmost possible leniency of construction.  Composure, Et Ctera,
 and several more, are merely similes poetically elaborated.  So, too, is
 the pathetic story of the grandfather and grandchild: the child, having
 treasured away an icicle and forgotten it for ten minutes, comes back to
 find it already nearly melted, and no longer beautiful: at the same time,
 the grandfather has just remembered and taken out a bundle of
 love-letters, which he too had stored away in years gone by, and then
 long neglected; and, behold! the letters are as faded and sorrowfully
 disappointing as the icicle.  This is merely a simile poetically worked
 out; and yet it is in such as these, and some others, to be mentioned
 further on, that the author seems at his best.  Wherever he has really
 written after the old model, there is something to be deprecated: in
 spite of all the spirit and freshness, in spite of his happy assumption
 of that cheerful acceptation of things as they are, which, rightly or
 wrongly, we come to attribute to the ideal fabulist, there is ever a
 sense as of something a little out of place.  A form of literature so
 very innocent and primitive looks a little over-written in Lord Lyttons
 conscious and highly-coloured style.  It may be bad taste, but sometimes
 we should prefer a few sentences of plain prose narration, and a little
 Bewick by way of tail-piece.  So that it is not among those fables that
 conform most nearly to the old model, but one had nearly said among those
 that most widely differ from it, that we find the most satisfactory
 examples of the authors manner.
 
 In the mere matter of ingenuity, the metaphysical fables are the most
 remarkable; such as that of the windmill who imagined that it was he who
 raised the wind; or that of the grocers balance (Cogito ergo sum) who
 considered himself endowed with free-will, reason, and an infallible
 practical judgment; until, one fine day, the police made a descent upon
 the shop, and find the weights false and the scales unequal; and the
 whole thing is broken up for old iron.  Capital fables, also, in the same
 ironical spirit, are Prometheus Unbound, the tale of the vainglorying
 of a champagne-cork, and Teleology, where a nettle justifies the ways
 of God to nettles while all goes well with it, and, upon a change of
 luck, promptly changes its divinity.
 
 In all these there is still plenty of the fabulous if you will, although,
 even here, there may be two opinions possible; but there is another
 group, of an order of merit perhaps still higher, where we look in vain
 for any such playful liberties with Nature.  Thus we have Conservation
 of Force; where a musician, thinking of a certain picture, improvises in
 the twilight; a poet, hearing the music, goes home inspired, and writes a
 poem; and then a painter, under the influence of this poem, paints
 another picture, thus lineally descended from the first.  This is
 fiction, but not what we have been used to call fable.  We miss the
 incredible element, the point of audacity with which the fabulist was
 wont to mock at his readers.  And still more so is this the case with
 others.  The Horse and the Fly states one of the unanswerable problems
 of life in quite a realistic and straightforward way.  A fly startles a
 cab-horse, the coach is overset; a newly-married pair within and the
 driver, a man with a wife and family, are all killed.  The horse
 continues to gallop off in the loose traces, and ends the tragedy by
 running over an only child; and there is some little pathetic detail here
 introduced in the telling, that makes the readers indignation very
 white-hot against some one.  It remains to be seen who that some one is
 to be: the fly?  Nay, but on closer inspection, it appears that the fly,
 actuated by maternal instinct, was only seeking a place for her eggs: is
 maternal instinct, then, sole author of these mischiefs all?  Whos in
 the Right? one of the best fables in the book, is somewhat in the same
 vein.  After a battle has been won, a group of officers assemble inside a
 battery, and debate together who should have the honour of the success;
 the Prince, the general staff, the cavalry, the engineer who posted the
 battery in which they then stand talking, are successively named: the
 sergeant, who pointed the guns, sneers to himself at the mention of the
 engineer; and, close by, the gunner, who had applied the match, passes
 away with a smile of triumph, since it was through his hand that the
 victorious blow had been dealt.  Meanwhile, the cannon claims the honour
 over the gunner; the cannon-ball, who actually goes forth on the dread
 mission, claims it over the cannon, who remains idly behind; the powder
 reminds the cannon-ball that, but for him, it would still be lying on the
 arsenal floor; and the match caps the discussion; powder, cannon-ball,
 and cannon would be all equally vain and ineffectual without fire.  Just
 then there comes on a shower of rain, which wets the powder and puts out
 the match, and completes this lesson of dependence, by indicating the
 negative conditions which are as necessary for any effect, in their
 absence, as is the presence of this great fraternity of positive
 conditions, not any one of which can claim priority over any other.  But
 the fable does not end here, as perhaps, in all logical strictness, it
 should.  It wanders off into a discussion as to which is the truer
 greatness, that of the vanquished fire or that of the victorious rain.
 And the speech of the rain is charming:
 
     Lo, with my little drops I bless again
     And beautify the fields which thou didst blast!
     Rend, wither, waste, and ruin, what thou wilt,
     But call not Greatness what the Gods call Guilt.
     Blossoms and grass from blood in battle spilt,
     And poppied corn, I bring.
     Mid mouldering Babels, to oblivion built,
     My violets spring.
     Little by little my small drops have strength
     To deck with green delights the grateful earth.
 
 And so forth, not quite germane (it seems to me) to the matter in hand,
 but welcome for its own sake.
 
 Best of all are the fables that deal more immediately with the emotions.
 There is, for instance, that of The Two Travellers, which is profoundly
 moving in conception, although by no means as well written as some
 others.  In this, one of the two, fearfully frost-bitten, saves his life
 out of the snow at the cost of all that was comely in his body; just as,
 long before, the other, who has now quietly resigned himself to death,
 had violently freed himself from Love at the cost of all that was finest
 and fairest in his character.  Very graceful and sweet is the fable (if
 so it should be called) in which the author sings the praises of that
 kindly perspective, which lets a wheat-stalk near the eye cover twenty
 leagues of distant country, and makes the humble circle about a mans
 hearth more to him than all the possibilities of the external world.  The
 companion fable to this is also excellent.  It tells us of a man who had,
 all his life through, entertained a passion for certain blue hills on the
 far horizon, and had promised himself to travel thither ere he died, and
 become familiar with these distant friends.  At last, in some political
 trouble, he is banished to the very place of his dreams.  He arrives
 there overnight, and, when he rises and goes forth in the morning, there
 sure enough are the blue hills, only now they have changed places with
 him, and smile across to him, distant as ever, from the old home whence
 he has come.  Such a story might have been very cynically treated; but it
 is not so done, the whole tone is kindly and consolatory, and the
 disenchanted man submissively takes the lesson, and understands that
 things far away are to be loved for their own sake, and that the
 unattainable is not truly unattainable, when we can make the beauty of it
 our own.  Indeed, throughout all these two volumes, though there is much
 practical scepticism, and much irony on abstract questions, this kindly
 and consolatory spirit is never absent.  There is much that is cheerful
 and, after a sedate, fireside fashion, hopeful.  No one will be
 discouraged by reading the book; but the ground of all this hopefulness
 and cheerfulness remains to the end somewhat vague.  It does not seem to
 arise from any practical belief in the future either of the individual or
 the race, but rather from the profound personal contentment of the
 writer.  This is, I suppose, all we must look for in the case.  It is as
 much as we can expect, if the fabulist shall prove a shrewd and cheerful
 fellow-wayfarer, one with whom the world does not seem to have gone much
 amiss, but who has yet laughingly learned something of its evil.  It will
 depend much, of course, upon our own character and circumstances, whether
 the encounter will be agreeable and bracing to the spirits, or offend us
 as an ill-timed mockery.  But where, as here, there is a little tincture
 of bitterness along with the good-nature, where it is plainly not the
 humour of a man cheerfully ignorant, but of one who looks on, tolerant
 and superior and smilingly attentive, upon the good and bad of our
 existence, it will go hardly if we do not catch some reflection of the
 same spirit to help us on our way.  There is here no impertinent and
 lying proclamation of peacenone of the cheap optimism of the well-to-do;
 what we find here is a view of life that would be even grievous, were it
 not enlivened with this abiding cheerfulness, and ever and anon redeemed
 by a stroke of pathos.
 
 It is natural enough, I suppose, that we should find wanting in this book
 some of the intenser qualities of the authors work; and their absence is
 made up for by much happy description after a quieter fashion.  The burst
 of jubilation over the departure of the snow, which forms the prelude to
 The Thistle, is full of spirit and of pleasant images.  The speech of
 the forest in Sans Souci is inspired by a beautiful sentiment for
 nature of the modern sort, and pleases us more, I think, as poetry should
 please us, than anything in _Chronicles and Characters_.  There are some
 admirable felicities of expression here and there; as that of the hill,
 whose summit
 
              Did print
     The azure air with pines.
 
 Moreover, I do not recollect in the authors former work any symptom of
 that sympathetic treatment of still life, which is noticeable now and
 again in the fables; and perhaps most noticeably, when he sketches the
 burned letters as they hover along the gusty flue, Thin, sable veils,
 wherein a restless spark Yet trembled.  But the description is at its
 best when the subjects are unpleasant, or even grisly.  There are a few
 capital lines in this key on the last spasm of the battle before alluded
 to.  Surely nothing could be better, in its own way, than the fish in
 The Last Cruise of the Arrogant, the shadowy, side-faced, silent
 things, that come butting and staring with lidless eyes at the sunken
 steam-engine.  And although, in yet another, we are told, pleasantly
 enough, how the water went down into the valleys, where it set itself
 gaily to saw wood, and on into the plains, where it would soberly carry
 grain to town; yet the real strength of the fable is when it dealt with
 the shut pool in which certain unfortunate raindrops are imprisoned among
 slugs and snails, and in the company of an old toad.  The sodden
 contentment of the fallen acorn is strangely significant; and it is
 astonishing how unpleasantly we are startled by the appearance of her
 horrible lover, the maggot.
 
 And now for a last word, about the style.  This is not easy to criticise.
 It is impossible to deny to it rapidity, spirit, and a full sound; the
 lines are never lame, and the sense is carried forward with an
 uninterrupted, impetuous rush.  But it is not equal.  After passages of
 really admirable versification, the author falls back upon a sort of
 loose, cavalry manner, not unlike the style of some of Mr. Brownings
 minor pieces, and almost inseparable from wordiness, and an easy
 acceptation of somewhat cheap finish.  There is nothing here of that
 compression which is the note of a really sovereign style.  It is unfair,
 perhaps, to set a not remarkable passage from Lord Lytton side by side
 with one of the signal masterpieces of another, and a very perfect poet;
 and yet it is interesting, when we see how the portraiture of a dog,
 detailed through thirty odd lines, is frittered down and finally almost
 lost in the mere laxity of the style, to compare it with the clear,
 simple, vigorous delineation that Burns, in four couplets, has given us
 of the ploughmans collie.  It is interesting, at first, and then it
 becomes a little irritating; for when we think of other passages so much
 more finished and adroit, we cannot help feeling, that with a little more
 ardour after perfection of form, criticism would have found nothing left
 for her to censure.  A similar mark of precipitate work is the number of
 adjectives tumultuously heaped together, sometimes to help out the sense,
 and sometimes (as one cannot but suspect) to help out the sound of the
 verses.  I do not believe, for instance, that Lord Lytton himself would
 defend the lines in which we are told how Laocon Revealed to Roman
 crowds, now _Christian_ grown, That _Pagan_ anguish which, in _Parian_
 stone, The _Rhodian_ artist, and so on.  It is not only that this is bad
 in itself; but that it is unworthy of the company in which it is found;
 that such verses should not have appeared with the name of a good
 versifier like Lord Lytton.  We must take exception, also, in conclusion,
 to the excess of alliteration.  Alliteration is so liable to be abused
 that we can scarcely be too sparing of it; and yet it is a trick that
 seems to grow upon the author with years.  It is a pity to see fine
 verses, such as some in Demos, absolutely spoiled by the recurrence of
 one wearisome consonant.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IISALVINIS MACBETH
 
 
 Salvini closed his short visit to Edinburgh by a performance of
 _Macbeth_.  It was, perhaps, from a sentiment of local colour that he
 chose to play the Scottish usurper for the first time before Scotsmen;
 and the audience were not insensible of the privilege.  Few things,
 indeed, can move a stronger interest than to see a great creation taking
 shape for the first time.  If it is not purely artistic, the sentiment is
 surely human.  And the thought that you are before all the world, and
 have the start of so many others as eager as yourself, at least keeps you
 in a more unbearable suspense before the curtain rises, if it does not
 enhance the delight with which you follow the performance and see the
 actor bend up each corporal agent to realise a masterpiece of a few
 hours duration.  With a player so variable as Salvini, who trusts to the
 feelings of the moment for so much detail, and who, night after night,
 does the same thing differently but always well, it can never be safe to
 pass judgment after a single hearing.  And this is more particularly true
 of last weeks _Macbeth_; for the whole third act was marred by a
 grievously humorous misadventure.  Several minutes too soon the ghost of
 Banquo joined the party, and after having sat helpless a while at a
 table, was ignominiously withdrawn.  Twice was this ghostly
 Jack-in-the-box obtruded on the stage before his time; twice removed
 again; and yet he showed so little hurry when he was really wanted, that,
 after an awkward pause, Macbeth had to begin his apostrophe to empty air.
 The arrival of the belated spectre in the middle, with a jerk that made
 him nod all over, was the last accident in the chapter, and worthily
 topped the whole.  It may be imagined how lamely matters went throughout
 these cross purposes.
 
 In spite of this, and some other hitches, Salvinis Macbeth had an
 emphatic success.  The creation is worthy of a place beside the same
 artists Othello and Hamlet.  It is the simplest and most unsympathetic
 of the three; but the absence of the finer lineaments of Hamlet is
 redeemed by gusto, breadth, and a headlong unity.  Salvini sees nothing
 great in Macbeth beyond the royalty of muscle, and that courage which
 comes of strong and copious circulation.  The moral smallness of the man
 is insisted on from the first, in the shudder of uncontrollable jealousy
 with which he sees Duncan embracing Banquo.  He may have some northern
 poetry of speech, but he has not much logical understanding.  In his
 dealings with the supernatural powers he is like a savage with his
 fetich, trusting them beyond bounds while all goes well, and whenever he
 is crossed, casting his belief aside and calling fate into the list.
 For his wife, he is little more than an agent, a frame of bone and sinew
 for her fiery spirit to command.  The nature of his feeling towards her
 is rendered with a most precise and delicate touch.  He always yields to
 the womans fascination; and yet his caresses (and we know how much
 meaning Salvini can give to a caress) are singularly hard and unloving.
 Sometimes he lays his hand on her as he might take hold of any one who
 happened to be nearest to him at a moment of excitement.  Love has fallen
 out of this marriage by the way, and left a curious friendship.  Only
 onceat the very moment when she is showing herself so little a woman and
 so much a high-spirited manonly once is he very deeply stirred towards
 her; and that finds expression in the strange and horrible transport of
 admiration, doubly strange and horrible on Salvinis lipsBring forth
 men-children only!
 
 The murder scene, as was to be expected, pleased the audience best.
 Macbeths voice, in the talk with his wife, was a thing not to be
 forgotten; and when he spoke of his hangmans hands he seemed to have
 blood in his utterance.  Never for a moment, even in the very article of
 the murder, does he possess his own soul.  He is a man on wires.  From
 first to last it is an exhibition of hideous cowardice.  For, after all,
 it is not here, but in broad daylight, with the exhilaration of conflict,
 where he can assure himself at every blow he has the longest sword and
 the heaviest hand, that this mans physical bravery can keep him up; he
 is an unwieldy ship, and needs plenty of way on before he will steer.
 
 In the banquet scene, while the first murderer gives account of what he
 has done, there comes a flash of truculent joy at the twenty trenchd
 gashes on Banquos head.  Thus Macbeth makes welcome to his imagination
 those very details of physical horror which are so soon to turn sour in
 him.  As he runs out to embrace these cruel circumstances, as he seeks to
 realise to his minds eye the reassuring spectacle of his dead enemy, he
 is dressing out the phantom to terrify himself; and his imagination,
 playing the part of justice, is to commend to his own lips the
 ingredients of his poisoned chalice.  With the recollection of Hamlet
 and his fathers spirit still fresh upon him, and the holy awe with which
 that good man encountered things not dreamt of in his philosophy, it was
 not possible to avoid looking for resemblances between the two
 apparitions and the two men haunted.  But there are none to be found.
 Macbeth has a purely physical dislike for Banquos spirit and the twenty
 trenchd gashes.  He is afraid of he knows not what.  He is abject, and
 again blustering.  In the end he so far forgets himself, his terror, and
 the nature of what is before him, that he rushes upon it as he would upon
 a man.  When his wife tells him he needs repose, there is something
 really childish in the way he looks about the room, and, seeing nothing,
 with an expression of almost sensual relief, plucks up heart enough to go
 to bed.  And what is the upshot of the visitation?  It is written in
 Shakespeare, but should be read with the commentary of Salvinis voice
 and expression:O! _siam nell opra ancor fanciulli_We are yet but
 young in deed.  Circle below circle.  He is looking with horrible
 satisfaction into the mouth of hell.  There may still be a prick to-day;
 but to-morrow conscience will be dead, and he may move untroubled in this
 element of blood.
 
 In the fifth act we see this lowest circle reached; and it is Salvinis
 finest moment throughout the play.  From the first he was admirably made
 up, and looked Macbeth to the full as perfectly as ever he looked
 Othello.  From the first moment he steps upon the stage you can see this
 character is a creation to the fullest meaning of the phrase; for the man
 before you is a type you know well already.  He arrives with Banquo on
 the heath, fair and red-bearded, sparing of gesture, full of pride and
 the sense of animal wellbeing, and satisfied after the battle like a
 beast who has eaten his fill.  But in the fifth act there is a change.
 This is still the big, burly, fleshly, handsome-looking Thane; here is
 still the same face which in the earlier acts could be superficially
 good-humoured and sometimes royally courteous.  But now the atmosphere of
 blood, which pervades the whole tragedy, has entered into the man and
 subdued him to its own nature; and an indescribable degradation, a
 slackness and puffiness, has overtaken his features.  He has breathed the
 air of carnage, and supped full of horrors.  Lady Macbeth complains of
 the smell of blood on her hand: Macbeth makes no complainthe has ceased
 to notice it now; but the same smell is in his nostrils.  A contained
 fury and disgust possesses him.  He taunts the messenger and the doctor
 as people would taunt their mortal enemies.  And, indeed, as he knows
 right well, every one is his enemy now, except his wife.  About her he
 questions the doctor with something like a last human anxiety; and, in
 tones of grisly mystery, asks him if he can minister to a mind
 diseased.  When the news of her death is brought him, he is staggered
 and falls into a seat; but somehow it is not anything we can call grief
 that he displays.  There had been two of them against God and man; and
 now, when there is only one, it makes perhaps less difference than he had
 expected.  And so her death is not only an affliction, but one more
 disillusion; and he redoubles in bitterness.  The speech that follows,
 given with tragic cynicism in every word, is a dirge, not so much for her
 as for himself.  From that time forth there is nothing human left in him,
 only the fiend of Scotland, Macduffs hell-hound, whom, with a stern
 glee, we see baited like a bear and hunted down like a wolf.  He is
 inspired and set above fate by a demoniacal energy, a lust of wounds and
 slaughter.  Even after he meets Macduff his courage does not fail; but
 when he hears the Thane was not born of woman, all virtue goes out of
 him; and though he speaks sounding words of defiance, the last combat is
 little better than a suicide.
 
 The whole performance is, as I said, so full of gusto and a headlong
 unity; the personality of Macbeth is so sharp and powerful; and within
 these somewhat narrow limits there is so much play and saliency that, so
 far as concerns Salvini himself, a third great success seems indubitable.
 Unfortunately, however, a great actor cannot fill more than a very small
 fraction of the boards; and though Banquos ghost will probably be more
 seasonable in his future apparitions, there are some more inherent
 difficulties in the piece.  The company at large did not distinguish
 themselves.  Macduff, to the huge delight of the gallery, out-Macduffd
 the average ranter.  The lady who filled the principal female part has
 done better on other occasions, but I fear she has not metal for what she
 tried last week.  Not to succeed in the sleep-walking scene is to make a
 memorable failure.  As it was given, it succeeded in being wrong in art
 without being true to nature.
 
 And there is yet another difficulty, happily easy to reform, which
 somewhat interfered with the success of the performance.  At the end of
 the incantation scene the Italian translator has made Macbeth fall
 insensible upon the stage.  This is a change of questionable propriety
 from a psychological point of view; while in point of view of effect it
 leaves the stage for some moments empty of all business.  To remedy this,
 a bevy of green ballet-girls came forth and pointed their toes about the
 prostrate king.  A dance of High Church curates, or a hornpipe by Mr. T.
 P. Cooke, would not be more out of the key; though the gravity of a Scots
 audience was not to be overcome, and they merely expressed their
 disapprobation by a round of moderate hisses, a similar irruption of
 Christmas fairies would most likely convulse a London theatre from pit to
 gallery with inextinguishable laughter.  It is, I am told, the Italian
 tradition; but it is one more honoured in the breach than the observance.
 With the total disappearance of these damsels, with a stronger Lady
 Macbeth, and, if possible, with some compression of those scenes in which
 Salvini does not appear, and the spectator is left at the mercy of
 Macduffs and Duncans, the play would go twice as well, and we should be
 better able to follow and enjoy an admirable work of dramatic art.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIBAGSTERS PILGRIMS PROGRESS
 
 
 I have here before me an edition of the _Pilgrims Progress_, bound in
 green, without a date, and described as illustrated by nearly three
 hundred engravings, and memoir of Bunyan.  On the outside it is lettered
 Bagsters Illustrated Edition, and after the authors apology, facing
 the first page of the tale, a folding pictorial Plan of the Road is
 marked as drawn by the late Mr. T. Conder, and engraved by J. Basire.
 No further information is anywhere vouchsafed; perhaps the publishers had
 judged the work too unimportant; and we are still left ignorant whether
 or not we owe the woodcuts in the body of the volume to the same hand
 that drew the plan.  It seems, however, more than probable.  The literal
 particularity of mind which, in the map, laid down the flower-plots in
 the devils garden, and carefully introduced the court-house in the town
 of Vanity, is closely paralleled in many of the cuts; and in both, the
 architecture of the buildings and the disposition of the gardens have a
 kindred and entirely English air.  Whoever he was, the author of these
 wonderful little pictures may lay claim to be the best illustrator of
 Bunyan. {183}  They are not only good illustrations, like so many others;
 but they are like so few, good illustrations of Bunyan.  Their spirit, in
 defect and quality, is still the same as his own.  The designer also has
 lain down and dreamed a dream, as literal, as quaint, and almost as
 apposite as Bunyans; and text and pictures make but the two sides of the
 same homespun yet impassioned story.  To do justice to the designs, it
 will be necessary to say, for the hundredth time, a word or two about the
 masterpiece which they adorn.
 
 All allegories have a tendency to escape from the purpose of their
 creators; and as the characters and incidents become more and more
 interesting in themselves, the moral, which these were to show forth,
 falls more and more into neglect.  An architect may command a wreath of
 vine-leaves round the cornice of a monument; but if, as each leaf came
 from the chisel, it took proper life and fluttered freely on the wall,
 and if the vine grew, and the building were hidden over with foliage and
 fruit, the architect would stand in much the same situation as the writer
 of allegories.  The _Fary Queen_ was an allegory, I am willing to
 believe; but it survives as an imaginative tale in incomparable verse.
 The case of Bunyan is widely different; and yet in this also Allegory,
 poor nymph, although never quite forgotten, is sometimes rudely thrust
 against the wall.  Bunyan was fervently in earnest; with his fingers in
 his ears, he ran on, straight for his mark.  He tells us himself, in the
 conclusion to the first part, that he did not fear to raise a laugh;
 indeed, he feared nothing, and said anything; and he was greatly served
 in this by a certain rustic privilege of his style, which, like the talk
 of strong uneducated men, when it does not impress by its force, still
 charms by its simplicity.  The mere story and the allegorical design
 enjoyed perhaps his equal favour.  He believed in both with an energy of
 faith that was capable of moving mountains.  And we have to remark in
 him, not the parts where inspiration fails and is supplied by cold and
 merely decorative invention, but the parts where faith has grown to be
 credulity, and his characters become so real to him that he forgets the
 end of their creation.  We can follow him step by step into the trap
 which he lays for himself by his own entire good faith and triumphant
 literality of vision, till the trap closes and shuts him in an
 inconsistency.  The allegories of the Interpreter and of the Shepherds of
 the Delectable Mountains are all actually performed, like stage-plays,
 before the pilgrims.  The son of Mr. Great-grace visibly tumbles hills
 about with his words.  Adam the First has his condemnation written
 visibly on his forehead, so that Faithful reads it.  At the very instant
 the net closes round the pilgrims, the white robe falls from the black
 mans body.  Despair getteth him a grievous crab-tree cudgel; it was
 in sunshiny weather that he had his fits; and the birds in the grove
 about the House Beautiful, our country birds, only sing their little
 pious verses at the spring, when the flowers appear and the sun shines
 warm.  I often, says Piety, go out to hear them; we also ofttimes
 keep them tame on our house.  The post between Beulah and the Celestial
 City sounds his horn, as you may yet hear in country places.  Madam
 Bubble, that tall, comely dame, something of a swarthy complexion, in
 very pleasant attire, but old, gives you a smile at the end of each
 sentencea real woman she; we all know her.  Christiana dying gave Mr.
 Stand-fast a ring, for no possible reason in the allegory, merely
 because the touch was human and affecting.  Look at Great-heart, with his
 soldierly ways, garrison ways, as I had almost called them; with his
 taste in weapons; his delight in any that he found to be a man of his
 hands; his chivalrous point of honour, letting Giant Maul get up again
 when he was down, a thing fairly flying in the teeth of the moral; above
 all, with his language in the inimitable tale of Mr. Fearing: I thought
 I should have lost my manchicken-heartedat last he came in, and I
 will say that for my lord, he carried it wonderful lovingly to him.
 This is no Independent minister; this is a stout, honest, big-busted
 ancient, adjusting his shoulder-belts, twirling his long moustaches as he
 speaks.  Last and most remarkable, My sword, says the dying
 Valiant-for-Truth, he in whom Great-heart delighted, my sword I give to
 him that shall succeed me in my pilgrimage, _and my courage and skill to
 him that can get it_.  And after this boast, more arrogantly unorthodox
 than was ever dreamed of by the rejected Ignorance, we are told that all
 the trumpets sounded for him on the other side.
 
 In every page the book is stamped with the same energy of vision and the
 same energy of belief.  The quality is equally and indifferently
 displayed in the spirit of the fighting, the tenderness of the pathos,
 the startling vigour and strangeness of the incidents, the natural strain
 of the conversations, and the humanity and charm of the characters.
 Trivial talk over a meal, the dying words of heroes, the delights of
 Beulah or the Celestial City, Apollyon and my Lord Hate-good,
 Great-heart, and Mr. Worldly-Wiseman, all have been imagined with the
 same clearness, all written of with equal gusto and precision, all
 created in the same mixed element, of simplicity that is almost comical,
 and art that, for its purpose, is faultless.
 
 It was in much the same spirit that our artist sat down to his drawings.
 He is by nature a Bunyan of the pencil.  He, too, will draw anything,
 from a butcher at work on a dead sheep, up to the courts of Heaven.  A
 Lamb for Supper is the name of one of his designs, Their Glorious
 Entry of another.  He has the same disregard for the ridiculous, and
 enjoys somewhat of the same privilege of style, so that we are pleased
 even when we laugh the most.  He is literal to the verge of folly.  If
 dust is to be raised from the unswept parlour, you may be sure it will
 fly abundantly in the picture.  If Faithful is to lie as dead before
 Moses, dead he shall lie with a warrantdead and stiff like granite; nay
 (and here the artist must enhance upon the symbolism of the author), it
 is with the identical stone tables of the law that Moses fells the
 sinner.  Good and bad people, whom we at once distinguish in the text by
 their names, Hopeful, Honest, and Valiant-for-Truth, on the one hand, as
 against By-ends, Sir Having Greedy, and the Lord Old-man on the other,
 are in these drawings as simply distinguished by their costume.  Good
 people, when not armed _cap--pie_, wear a speckled tunic girt about the
 waist, and low hats, apparently of straw.  Bad people swagger in
 tail-coats and chimney-pots, a few with knee-breeches, but the large
 majority in trousers, and for all the world like guests at a
 garden-party.  Worldly-Wiseman alone, by some inexplicable quirk, stands
 before Christian in laced hat, embroidered waistcoat, and trunk-hose.
 But above all examples of this artists intrepidity, commend me to the
 print entitled Christian Finds it Deep.  A great darkness and horror,
 says the text, have fallen on the pilgrim; it is the comfortless deathbed
 with which Bunyan so strikingly concludes the sorrows and conflicts of
 his hero.  How to represent this worthily the artist knew not; and yet he
 was determined to represent it somehow.  This was how he did: Hopeful is
 still shown to his neck above the water of death; but Christian has
 bodily disappeared, and a blot of solid blackness indicates his place.
 
 As you continue to look at these pictures, about an inch square for the
 most part, sometimes printed three or more to the page, and each having a
 printed legend of its own, however trivial the event recorded, you will
 soon become aware of two things: first, that the man can draw, and,
 second, that he possesses the gift of an imagination.  Obstinate
 reviles, says the legend; and you should see Obstinate reviling.  He
 warily retraces his steps; and there is Christian, posting through the
 plain, terror and speed in every muscle.  Mercy yearns to go shows you
 a plain interior with packing going forward, and, right in the middle,
 Mercy yearning to goevery line of the girls figure yearning.  In The
 Chamber called Peace we see a simple English room, bed with white
 curtains, window valance and door, as may be found in many thousand
 unpretentious houses; but far off, through the open window, we behold the
 sun uprising out of a great plain, and Christian hails it with his hand:
 
     Where am I now! is this the love and care
     Of Jesus, for the men that pilgrims are!
     Thus to provide!  That I should be forgiven!
     And dwell already the next door to heaven!
 
 A page or two further, from the top of the House Beautiful, the damsels
 point his gaze toward the Delectable Mountains: The Prospect, so the
 cut is ticketedand I shall be surprised, if on less than a square inch
 of paper you can show me one so wide and fair.  Down a cross road on an
 English plain, a cathedral city outlined on the horizon, a hazel shaw
 upon the left, comes Madam Wanton dancing with her fair enchanted cup,
 and Faithful, book in hand, half pauses.  The cut is perfect as a symbol;
 the giddy movement of the sorceress, the uncertain poise of the man
 struck to the heart by a temptation, the contrast of that even plain of
 life whereon he journeys with the bold, ideal bearing of the wantonthe
 artist who invented and portrayed this had not merely read Bunyan, he had
 also thoughtfully lived.  The Delectable MountainsI continue skimming
 the first partare not on the whole happily rendered.  Once, and once
 only, the note is struck, when Christian and Hopeful are seen coming,
 shoulder-high, through a thicket of green shrubsbox, perhaps, or
 perfumed nutmeg; while behind them, domed or pointed, the hills stand
 ranged against the sky.  A little further, and we come to that
 masterpiece of Bunyans insight into life, the Enchanted Ground; where,
 in a few traits, he has set down the latter end of such a number of the
 would-be good; where his allegory goes so deep that, to people looking
 seriously on life, it cuts like satire.  The true significance of this
 invention lies, of course, far out of the way of drawing; only one
 feature, the great tedium of the land, the growing weariness in
 well-doing, may be somewhat represented in a symbol.  The pilgrims are
 near the end: Two Miles Yet, says the legend.  The road goes ploughing
 up and down over a rolling heath; the wayfarers, with outstretched arms,
 are already sunk to the knees over the brow of the nearest hill; they
 have just passed a milestone with the cipher two; from overhead a great,
 piled, summer cumulus, as of a slumberous summer afternoon, beshadows
 them: two miles! it might be hundreds.  In dealing with the Land of
 Beulah the artist lags, in both parts, miserably behind the text, but in
 the distant prospect of the Celestial City more than regains his own.
 You will remember when Christian and Hopeful with desire fell sick.
 Effect of the Sunbeams is the artists title.  Against the sky, upon a
 cliffy mountain, the radiant temple beams upon them over deep, subjacent
 woods; they, behind a mound, as if seeking shelter from the splendourone
 prostrate on his face, one kneeling, and with hands ecstatically
 liftedyearn with passion after that immortal city.  Turn the page, and
 we behold them walking by the very shores of death; Heaven, from this
 nigher view, has risen half-way to the zenith, and sheds a wider glory;
 and the two pilgrims, dark against that brightness, walk and sing out of
 the fulness of their hearts.  No cut more thoroughly illustrates at once
 the merit and the weakness of the artist.  Each pilgrim sings with a book
 in his graspa family Bible at the least for bigness; tomes so recklessly
 enormous that our second, impulse is to laughter.  And yet that is not
 the first thought, nor perhaps the last.  Something in the attitude of
 the manikinsfaces they have none, they are too small for thatsomething
 in the way they swing these monstrous volumes to their singing, something
 perhaps borrowed from the text, some subtle differentiation from the cut
 that went before and the cut that follows aftersomething, at least,
 speaks clearly of a fearful joy, of Heaven seen from the deathbed, of the
 horror of the last passage no less than of the glorious coming home.
 There is that in the action of one of them which always reminds me, with
 a difference, of that haunting last glimpse of Thomas Idle, travelling to
 Tyburn in the cart.  Next come the Shining Ones, wooden and trivial
 enough; the pilgrims pass into the river; the blot already mentioned
 settles over and obliterates Christian.  In two more cuts we behold them
 drawing nearer to the other shore; and then, between two radiant angels,
 one of whom points upward, we see them mounting in new weeds, their
 former lendings left behind them on the inky river.  More angels meet
 them; Heaven is displayed, and if no better, certainly no worse, than it
 has been shown by othersa place, at least, infinitely populous and
 glorious with lighta place that haunts solemnly the hearts of children.
 And then this symbolic draughtsman once more strikes into his proper
 vein.  Three cuts conclude the first part.  In the first the gates close,
 black against the glory struggling from within.  The second shows us
 Ignorancealas! poor Arminian!hailing, in a sad twilight, the ferryman
 Vain-Hope; and in the third we behold him, bound hand and foot, and black
 already with the hue of his eternal fate, carried high over the
 mountain-tops of the world by two angels of the anger of the Lord.
 Carried to Another Place, the artist enigmatically names his platea
 terrible design.
 
 Wherever he touches on the black side of the supernatural his pencil
 grows more daring and incisive.  He has many true inventions in the
 perilous and diabolic; he has many startling nightmares realised.  It is
 not easy to select the best; some may like one and some another; the
 nude, depilated devil bounding and casting darts against the Wicket Gate;
 the scroll of flying horrors that hang over Christian by the Mouth of
 Hell; the horned shade that comes behind him whispering blasphemies; the
 daylight breaking through that rent cave-mouth of the mountains and
 falling chill adown the haunted tunnel; Christians further progress
 along the causeway, between the two black pools, where, at every yard or
 two, a gin, a pitfall, or a snare awaits the passer-byloathsome white
 devilkins harbouring close under the bank to work the springes, Christian
 himself pausing and pricking with his swords point at the nearest noose,
 and pale discomfortable mountains rising on the farther side; or yet
 again, the two ill-favoured ones that beset the first of Christians
 journey, with the frog-like structure of the skull, the frog-like
 limberness of limbscrafty, slippery, lustful-looking devils, drawn
 always in outline as though possessed of a dim, infernal luminosity.
 Horrid fellows are they, one and all; horrid fellows and horrific scenes.
 In another spirit that Good-Conscience to whom Mr. Honest had spoken in
 his lifetime, a cowled, grey, awful figure, one hand pointing to the
 heavenly shore, realises, I will not say all, but some at least of the
 strange impressiveness of Bunyans words.  It is no easy nor pleasant
 thing to speak in ones lifetime with Good-Conscience; he is an austere,
 unearthly friend, whom maybe Torquemada knew; and the folds of his
 raiment are not merely claustral, but have something of the horror of the
 pall.  Be not afraid, however; with the hand of that appearance Mr.
 Honest will get safe across.
 
 Yet perhaps it is in sequences that this artist best displays himself.
 He loves to look at either side of a thing: as, for instance, when he
 shows us both sides of the wallGrace Inextinguishable on the one side,
 with the devil vainly pouring buckets on the flame, and The Oil of
 Grace on the other, where the Holy Spirit, vessel in hand, still
 secretly supplies the fire.  He loves, also, to show us the same event
 twice over, and to repeat his instantaneous photographs at the interval
 of but a moment.  So we have, first, the whole troop of pilgrims coming
 up to Valiant, and Great-heart to the front, spear in hand and parleying;
 and next, the same cross-roads, from a more distant view, the convoy now
 scattered and looking safely and curiously on, and Valiant handing over
 for inspection his right Jerusalem blade.  It is true that this
 designer has no great care after consistency: Apollyons spear is laid
 by, his quiver of darts will disappear, whenever they might hinder the
 designers freedom; and the fiends tail is blobbed or forked at his good
 pleasure.  But this is not unsuitable to the illustration of the fervent
 Bunyan, breathing hurry and momentary inspiration.  He, with his hot
 purpose, hunting sinners with a lasso, shall himself forget the things
 that he has written yesterday.  He shall first slay Heedless in the
 Valley of the Shadow, and then take leave of him talking in his sleep, as
 if nothing had happened, in an arbour on the Enchanted Ground.  And
 again, in his rhymed prologue, he shall assign some of the glory of the
 siege of Doubting Castle to his favourite Valiant-for-the-Truth, who did
 not meet with the besiegers till long after, at that dangerous corner by
 Deadmans Lane.  And, with all inconsistencies and freedoms, there is a
 power shown in these sequences of cuts: a power of joining on one action
 or one humour to another; a power of following out the moods, even of the
 dismal subterhuman fiends engendered by the artists fancy; a power of
 sustained continuous realisation, step by step, in natures order, that
 can tell a story, in all its ins and outs, its pauses and surprises,
 fully and figuratively, like the art of words.
 
 One such sequence is the fight of Christian and Apollyonsix cuts, weird
 and fiery, like the text.  The pilgrim is throughout a pale and stockish
 figure; but the devil covers a multitude of defects.  There is no better
 devil of the conventional order than our artists Apollyon, with his
 mane, his wings, his bestial legs, his changing and terrifying
 expression, his infernal energy to slay.  In cut the first you see him
 afar off, still obscure in form, but already formidable in suggestion.
 Cut the second, The Fiend in Discourse, represents him, not reasoning,
 railing rather, shaking his spear at the pilgrim, his shoulder advanced,
 his tail writhing in the air, his foot ready for a spring, while
 Christian stands back a little, timidly defensive.  The third illustrates
 these magnificent words: Then Apollyon straddled quite over the whole
 breadth of the way, and said, I am void of fear in this matter: prepare
 thyself to die; for I swear by my infernal den that thou shalt go no
 farther: here will I spill thy soul!  And with that he threw a flaming
 dart at his breast.  In the cut he throws a dart with either hand,
 belching pointed flames out of his mouth, spreading his broad vans, and
 straddling the while across the path, as only a fiend can straddle who
 has just sworn by his infernal den.  The defence will not be long against
 such vice, such flames, such red-hot nether energy.  And in the fourth
 cut, to be sure, he has leaped bodily upon his victim, sped by foot and
 pinion, and roaring as he leaps.  The fifth shows the climacteric of the
 battle; Christian has reached nimbly out and got his sword, and dealt
 that deadly home-thrust, the fiend still stretched upon him, but giving
 back, as one that had received his mortal wound.  The raised head, the
 bellowing mouth, the paw clapped upon the sword, the one wing relaxed in
 agony, all realise vividly these words of the text.  In the sixth and
 last, the trivial armed figure of the pilgrim is seen kneeling with
 clasped hands on the betrodden scene of contest and among the shivers of
 the darts; while just at the margin the hinder quarters and the tail of
 Apollyon are whisking off, indignant and discounted.
 
 In one point only do these pictures seem to be unworthy of the text, and
 that point is one rather of the difference of arts than the difference of
 artists.  Throughout his best and worst, in his highest and most divine
 imaginations as in the narrowest sallies of his sectarianism, the
 human-hearted piety of Bunyan touches and ennobles, convinces, accuses
 the reader.  Through no art beside the art of words can the kindness of a
 mans affections be expressed.  In the cuts you shall find faithfully
 parodied the quaintness and the power, the triviality and the surprising
 freshness of the authors fancy; there you shall find him out-stripped in
 ready symbolism and the art of bringing things essentially invisible
 before the eyes: but to feel the contact of essential goodness, to be
 made in love with piety, the book must be read and not the prints
 examined.
 
 Farewell should not be taken with a grudge; nor can I dismiss in any
 other words than those of gratitude a series of pictures which have, to
 one at least, been the visible embodiment of Bunyan from childhood up,
 and shown him, through all his years, Great-heart lungeing at Giant Maul,
 and Apollyon breathing fire at Christian, and every turn and town along
 the road to the Celestial City, and that bright place itself, seen as to
 a stave of music, shining afar off upon the hill-top, the candle of the
 world.
 
 
 
 
 SKETCHES
 
 
 I.  THE SATIRIST
 
 
 My companion enjoyed a cheap reputation for wit and insight.  He was by
 habit and repute a satirist.  If he did occasionally condemn anything or
 anybody who richly deserved it, and whose demerits had hitherto escaped,
 it was simply because he condemned everything and everybody.  While I was
 with him he disposed of St. Paul with an epigram, shook my reverence for
 Shakespeare in a neat antithesis, and fell foul of the Almighty Himself,
 on the score of one or two out of the ten commandments.  Nothing escaped
 his blighting censure.  At every sentence he overthrew an idol, or
 lowered my estimation of a friend.  I saw everything with new eyes, and
 could only marvel at my former blindness.  How was it possible that I had
 not before observed As false hair, Bs selfishness, or Cs boorish
 manners?  I and my companion, methought, walked the streets like a couple
 of gods among a swarm of vermin; for every one we saw seemed to bear
 openly upon his brow the mark of the apocalyptic beast.  I half expected
 that these miserable beings, like the people of Lystra, would recognise
 their betters and force us to the altar; in which case, warned by the
 late of Paul and Barnabas, I do not know that my modesty would have
 prevailed upon me to decline.  But there was no need for such churlish
 virtue.  More blinded than the Lycaonians, the people saw no divinity in
 our gait; and as our temporary godhead lay more in the way of observing
 than healing their infirmities, we were content to pass them by in scorn.
 
 I could not leave my companion, not from regard or even from interest,
 but from a very natural feeling, inseparable from the case.  To
 understand it, let us take a simile.  Suppose yourself walking down the
 street with a man who continues to sprinkle the crowd out of a flask of
 vitriol.  You would be much diverted with the grimaces and contortions of
 his victims; and at the same time you would fear to leave his arm until
 his bottle was empty, knowing that, when once among the crowd, you would
 run a good chance yourself of baptism with his biting liquor.  Now my
 companions vitriol was inexhaustible.
 
 It was perhaps the consciousness of this, the knowledge that I was being
 anointed already out of the vials of his wrath, that made me fall to
 criticising the critic, whenever we had parted.
 
 After all, I thought, our satirist has just gone far enough into his
 neighbours to find that the outside is false, without caring to go
 farther and discover what is really true.  He is content to find that
 things are not what they seem, and broadly generalises from it that they
 do not exist at all.  He sees our virtues are not what they pretend they
 are; and, on the strength of that, he denies us the possession of virtue
 altogether.  He has learnt the first lesson, that no man is wholly good;
 but he has not even suspected that there is another equally true, to wit,
 that no man is wholly bad.  Like the inmate of a coloured star, he has
 eyes for one colour alone.  He has a keen scent after evil, but his
 nostrils are plugged against all good, as people plugged their nostrils
 before going about the streets of the plague-struck city.
 
 Why does he do this?  It is most unreasonable to flee the knowledge of
 good like the infection of a horrible disease, and batten and grow fat in
 the real atmosphere of a lazar-house.  This was my first thought; but my
 second was not like unto it, and I saw that our satirist was wise, wise
 in his generation, like the unjust steward.  He does not want light,
 because the darkness is more pleasant.  He does not wish to see the good,
 because he is happier without it.  I recollect that when I walked with
 him, I was in a state of divine exaltation, such as Adam and Eve must
 have enjoyed when the savour of the fruit was still unfaded between their
 lips; and I recognise that this must be the mans habitual state.  He has
 the forbidden fruit in his waist-coat pocket, and can make himself a god
 as often and as long as he likes.  He has raised himself upon a glorious
 pedestal above his fellows; he has touched the summit of ambition; and he
 envies neither King nor Kaiser, Prophet nor Priest, content in an
 elevation as high as theirs, and much more easily attained.  Yes, certes,
 much more easily attained.  He has not risen by climbing himself, but by
 pushing others down.  He has grown great in his own estimation, not by
 blowing himself out, and risking the fate of sops frog, but simply by
 the habitual use of a diminishing glass on everybody else.  And I think
 altogether that his is a better, a safer, and a surer recipe than most
 others.
 
 After all, however, looking back on what I have written, I detect a
 spirit suspiciously like his own.  All through, I have been comparing
 myself with our satirist, and all through, I have had the best of the
 comparison.  Well, well, contagion is as often mental as physical; and I
 do not think my readers, who have all been under his lash, will blame me
 very much for giving the headsman a mouthful of his own sawdust.
 
 
 
 II.  NUITS BLANCHES
 
 
 If any one should know the pleasure and pain of a sleepless night, it
 should be I.  I remember, so long ago, the sickly child that woke from
 his few hours slumber with the sweat of a nightmare on his brow, to lie
 awake and listen and long for the first signs of life among the silent
 streets.  These nights of pain and weariness are graven on my mind; and
 so when the same thing happened to me again, everything that I heard or
 saw was rather a recollection than a discovery.
 
 Weighed upon by the opaque and almost sensible darkness, I listened
 eagerly for anything to break the sepulchral quiet.  But nothing came,
 save, perhaps, an emphatic crack from the old cabinet that was made by
 Deacon Brodie, or the dry rustle of the coals on the extinguished fire.
 It was a calm; or I know that I should have heard in the roar and clatter
 of the storm, as I have not heard it for so many years, the wild career
 of a horseman, always scouring up from the distance and passing swiftly
 below the window; yet always returning again from the place whence first
 he came, as though, baffled by some higher power, he had retraced his
 steps to gain impetus for another and another attempt.
 
 As I lay there, there arose out of the utter stillness the rumbling of a
 carriage a very great way off, that drew near, and passed within a few
 streets of the house, and died away as gradually as it had arisen.  This,
 too, was as a reminiscence.
 
 I rose and lifted a corner of the blind.  Over the black belt of the
 garden I saw the long line of Queen Street, with here and there a lighted
 window.  How often before had my nurse lifted me out of bed and pointed
 them out to me, while we wondered together if, there also, there were
 children that could not sleep, and if these lighted oblongs were signs of
 those that waited like us for the morning.
 
 I went out into the lobby, and looked down into the great deep well of
 the staircase.  For what cause I know not, just as it used to be in the
 old days that the feverish child might be the better served, a peep of
 gas illuminated a narrow circle far below me.  But where I was, all was
 darkness and silence, save the dry monotonous ticking of the clock that
 came ceaselessly up to my ear.
 
 The final crown of it all, however, the last touch of reproduction on the
 pictures of my memory, was the arrival of that time for which, all night
 through, I waited and longed of old.  It was my custom, as the hours
 dragged on, to repeat the question, When will the carts come in? and
 repeat it again and again until at last those sounds arose in the street
 that I have heard once more this morning.  The road before our house is a
 great thoroughfare for early carts.  I know not, and I never have known,
 what they carry, whence they come, or whither they go.  But I know that,
 long ere dawn, and for hours together, they stream continuously past,
 with the same rolling and jerking of wheels and the same clink of horses
 feet.  It was not for nothing that they made the burthen of my wishes all
 night through.  They are really the first throbbings of life, the
 harbingers of day; and it pleases you as much to hear them as it must
 please a shipwrecked seaman once again to grasp a hand of flesh and blood
 after years of miserable solitude.  They have the freshness of the
 daylight life about them.  You can hear the carters cracking their whips
 and crying hoarsely to their horses or to one another; and sometimes even
 a peal of healthy, harsh horse-laughter comes up to you through the
 darkness.  There is now an end of mystery and fear.  Like the knocking at
 the door in _Macbeth_, {205} or the cry of the watchman in the _Tour de
 Nesle_, they show that the horrible csura is over and the nightmares
 have fled away, because the day is breaking and the ordinary life of men
 is beginning to bestir itself among the streets.
 
 In the middle of it all I fell asleep, to be wakened by the officious
 knocking at my door, and I find myself twelve years older than I had
 dreamed myself all night.
 
 
 
 III.  THE WREATH OF IMMORTELLES
 
 
 It is all very well to talk of death as a pleasant potion of
 immortality, but the most of us, I suspect, are of queasy stomachs,
 and find it none of the sweetest. {206a}  The graveyard may be cloak-room
 to Heaven; but we must admit that it is a very ugly and offensive
 vestibule in itself, however fair may be the life to which it leads.  And
 though Enoch and Elias went into the temple through a gate which
 certainly may be called Beautiful, the rest of us have to find our way to
 it through Ezekiels low-bowed door and the vault full of creeping things
 and all manner of abominable beasts.  Nevertheless, there is a certain
 frame of mind to which a cemetery is, if not an antidote, at least an
 alleviation.  If you are in a fit of the blues, go nowhere else.  It was
 in obedience to this wise regulation that the other morning found me
 lighting my pipe at the entrance to Old Greyfriars, thoroughly sick of
 the town, the country, and myself.
 
 Two of the men were talking at the gate, one of them carrying a spade in
 hands still crusted with the soil of graves.  Their very aspect was
 delightful to me; and I crept nearer to them, thinking to pick up some
 snatch of sexton gossip, some talk fit for a charnel, {206b} something,
 in fine, worthy of that fastidious logician, that adept in coroners law,
 who has come down to us as the patron of Yaughans liquor, and the very
 prince of gravediggers.  Scots people in general are so much wrapped up
 in their profession that I had a good chance of overhearing such
 conversation: the talk of fish-mongers running usually on stockfish and
 haddocks; while of the Scots sexton I could repeat stories and speeches
 that positively smell of the graveyard.  But on this occasion I was
 doomed to disappointment.  My two friends were far into the region of
 generalities.  Their profession was forgotten in their electorship.
 Politics had engulfed the narrower economy of grave-digging.  Na, na,
 said the one, yere a wrang.  The English and Irish Churches,
 answered the other, in a tone as if he had made the remark before, and it
 had been called in questionThe English and Irish Churches have
 _impoverished_ the country.
 
 Such are the results of education, thought I as I passed beside them
 and came fairly among the tombs.  Here, at least, there were no
 commonplace politics, no diluted this-mornings leader, to distract or
 offend me.  The old shabby church showed, as usual, its quaint extent of
 roofage and the relievo skeleton on one gable, still blackened with the
 fire of thirty years ago.  A chill dank mist lay over all.  The Old
 Greyfriars churchyard was in perfection that morning, and one could go
 round and reckon up the associations with no fear of vulgar interruption.
 On this stone the Covenant was signed.  In that vault, as the story goes,
 John Knox took hiding in some Reformation broil.  From that window Burke
 the murderer looked out many a time across the tombs, and perhaps o
 nights let himself down over the sill to rob some new-made grave.
 Certainly he would have a selection here.  The very walks have been
 carried over forgotten resting-places; and the whole ground is uneven,
 because (as I was once quaintly told) when the wood rots it stands to
 reason the soil should fall in, which, from the law of gravitation, is
 certainly beyond denial.  But it is round the boundary that there are the
 finest tombs.  The whole irregular space is, as it were, fringed with
 quaint old monuments, rich in deaths-heads and scythes and hour-glasses,
 and doubly rich in pious epitaphs and Latin mottoesrich in them to such
 an extent that their proper space has run over, and they have crawled
 end-long up the shafts of columns and ensconced themselves in all sorts
 of odd corners among the sculpture.  These tombs raise their backs
 against the rabble of squalid dwelling-houses, and every here and there a
 clothes-pole projects between two monuments its fluttering trophy of
 white and yellow and red.  With a grim irony they recall the banners in
 the Invalides, banners as appropriate perhaps over the sepulchres of
 tailors and weavers as these others above the dust of armies.  Why they
 put things out to dry on that particular morning it was hard to imagine.
 The grass was grey with drops of rain, the headstones black with
 moisture.  Yet, in despite of weather and common sense, there they hung
 between the tombs; and beyond them I could see through open windows into
 miserable rooms where whole families were born and fed, and slept and
 died.  At one a girl sat singing merrily with her back to the graveyard;
 and from another came the shrill tones of a scolding woman.  Every here
 and there was a town garden full of sickly flowers, or a pile of crockery
 inside upon the window-seat.  But you do not grasp the full connection
 between these houses of the dead and the living, the unnatural marriage
 of stately sepulchres and squalid houses, till, lower down, where the
 road has sunk far below the surface of the cemetery, and the very roofs
 are scarcely on a level with its wall, you observe that a proprietor has
 taken advantage of a tall monument and trained a chimney-stack against
 its back.  It startles you to see the red, modern pots peering over the
 shoulder of the tomb.
 
 A man was at work on a grave, his spade clinking away the drift of bones
 that permeates the thin brown soil; but my first disappointment had
 taught me to expect little from Greyfriars sextons, and I passed him by
 in silence.  A slater on the slope of a neighbouring roof eyed me
 curiously.  A lean black cat, looking as if it had battened on strange
 meats, slipped past me.  A little boy at a window put his finger to his
 nose in so offensive a manner that I was put upon my dignity, and turned
 grandly off to read old epitaphs and peer through the gratings into the
 shadow of vaults.
 
 Just then I saw two women coming down a path, one of them old, and the
 other younger, with a child in her arms.  Both had faces eaten with
 famine and hardened with sin, and both had reached that stage of
 degradation, much lower in a woman than a man, when all care for dress is
 lost.  As they came down they neared a grave, where some pious friend or
 relative had laid a wreath of immortelles, and put a bell glass over it,
 as is the custom.  The effect of that ring of dull yellow among so many
 blackened and dusty sculptures was more pleasant than it is in modern
 cemeteries, where every second mound can boast a similar coronal; and
 here, where it was the exception and not the rule, I could even fancy the
 drops of moisture that dimmed the covering were the tears of those who
 laid it where it was.  As the two women came up to it, one of them
 kneeled down on the wet grass and looked long and silently through the
 clouded shade, while the second stood above her, gently oscillating to
 and fro to lull the muling baby.  I was struck a great way off with
 something religious in the attitude of these two unkempt and haggard
 women; and I drew near faster, but still cautiously, to hear what they
 were saying.  Surely on them the spirit of death and decay had descended;
 I had no education to dread here: should I not have a chance of seeing
 nature?  Alas! a pawnbroker could not have been more practical and
 commonplace, for this was what the kneeling woman said to the woman
 uprightthis and nothing more: Eh, what extravagance!
 
 O nineteenth century, wonderful art thou indeedwonderful, but wearisome
 in thy stale and deadly uniformity.  Thy men are more like numerals than
 men.  They must bear their idiosyncrasies or their professions written on
 a placard about their neck, like the scenery in Shakespeares theatre.
 Thy precepts of economy have pierced into the lowest ranks of life; and
 there is now a decorum in vice, a respectability among the disreputable,
 a pure spirit of Philistinism among the waifs and strays of thy Bohemia.
 For lo! thy very gravediggers talk politics; and thy castaways kneel upon
 new graves, to discuss the cost of the monument and grumble at the
 improvidence of love.
 
 Such was the elegant apostrophe that I made as I went out of the gates
 again, happily satisfied in myself, and feeling that I alone of all whom
 I had seen was able to profit by the silent poem of these green mounds
 and blackened headstones.
 
 
 
 IV.  NURSES
 
 
 I knew one once, and the room where, lonely and old, she waited for
 death.  It was pleasant enough, high up above the lane, and looking forth
 upon a hill-side, covered all day with sheets and yellow blankets, and
 with long lines of underclothing fluttering between the battered posts.
 There were any number of cheap prints, and a drawing by one of her
 children, and there were flowers in the window, and a sickly canary
 withered into consumption in an ornamental cage.  The bed, with its
 checked coverlid, was in a closet.  A great Bible lay on the table; and
 her drawers were full of scones, which it was her pleasure to give to
 young visitors such as I was then.
 
 You may not think this a melancholy picture; but the canary, and the cat,
 and the white mouse that she had for a while, and that died, were all
 indications of the want that ate into her heart.  I think I know a little
 of what that old woman felt; and I am as sure as if I had seen her, that
 she sat many an hour in silent tears, with the big Bible open before her
 clouded eyes.
 
 If you could look back upon her life, and feel the great chain that had
 linked her to one child after another, sometimes to be wrenched suddenly
 through, and sometimes, which is infinitely worse, to be torn gradually
 off through years of growing neglect, or perhaps growing dislike!  She
 had, like the mother, overcome that natural repugnancerepugnance which
 no man can conquertowards the infirm and helpless mass of putty of the
 earlier stage.  She had spent her best and happiest years in tending,
 watching, and learning to love like a mother this child, with which she
 has no connection and to which she has no tie.  Perhaps she refused some
 sweetheart (such things have been), or put him off and off, until he lost
 heart and turned to some one else, all for fear of leaving this creature
 that had wound itself about her heart.  And the end of it allher months
 warning, and a present perhaps, and the rest of the life to vain regret.
 Or, worse still, to see the child gradually forgetting and forsaking her,
 fostered in disrespect and neglect on the plea of growing manliness, and
 at last beginning to treat her as a servant whom he had treated a few
 years before as a mother.  She sees the Bible or the Psalm-book, which
 with gladness and love unutterable in her heart she had bought for him
 years ago out of her slender savings, neglected for some newer gift of
 his father, lying in dust in the lumber-room or given away to a poor
 child, and the act applauded for its unfeeling charity.  Little wonder if
 she becomes hurt and angry, and attempts to tyrannise and to grasp her
 old power back again.  We are not all patient Grizzels, by good fortune,
 but the most of us human beings with feelings and tempers of our own.
 
 And so, in the end, behold her in the room that I described.  Very likely
 and very naturally, in some fling of feverish misery or recoil of
 thwarted love, she has quarrelled with her old employers and the children
 are forbidden to see her or to speak to her; or at best she gets her rent
 paid and a little to herself, and now and then her late charges are sent
 up (with another nurse, perhaps) to pay her a short visit.  How bright
 these visits seem as she looks forward to them on her lonely bed!  How
 unsatisfactory their realisation, when the forgetful child, half
 wondering, checks with every word and action the outpouring of her
 maternal love!  How bitter and restless the memories that they leave
 behind!  And for the rest, what else has she?to watch them with eager
 eyes as they go to school, to sit in church where she can see them every
 Sunday, to be passed some day unnoticed in the street, or deliberately
 cut because the great man or the great woman are with friends before whom
 they are ashamed to recognise the old woman that loved them.
 
 When she goes home that night, how lonely will the room appear to her!
 Perhaps the neighbours may hear her sobbing to herself in the dark, with
 the fire burnt out for want of fuel, and the candle still unlit upon the
 table.
 
 And it is for this that they live, these quasi-mothersmothers in
 everything but the travail and the thanks.  It is for this that they have
 remained virtuous in youth, living the dull life of a household servant.
 It is for this that they refused the old sweetheart, and have no fireside
 or offspring of their own.
 
 I believe in a better state of things, that there will be no more nurses,
 and that every mother will nurse her own offspring; for what can be more
 hardening and demoralising than to call forth the tenderest feelings of a
 womans heart and cherish them yourself as long as you need them, as long
 as your children require a nurse to love them, and then to blight and
 thwart and destroy them, whenever your own use for them is at an end.
 This may be Utopian; but it is always a little thing if one mother or two
 mothers can be brought to feel more tenderly to those who share their
 toil and have no part in their reward.
 
 
 
 V.  A CHARACTER
 
 
 The man has a red, bloated face, and his figure is short and squat.  So
 far there is nothing in him to notice, but when you see his eyes, you can
 read in these hard and shallow orbs a depravity beyond measure depraved,
 a thirst after wickedness, the pure, disinterested love of Hell for its
 own sake.  The other night, in the street, I was watching an omnibus
 passing with lit-up windows, when I heard some one coughing at my side as
 though he would cough his soul out; and turning round, I saw him stopping
 under a lamp, with a brown greatcoat buttoned round him and his whole
 face convulsed.  It seemed as if he could not live long; and so the sight
 set my mind upon a train of thought, as I finished my cigar up and down
 the lighted streets.
 
 He is old, but all these years have not yet quenched his thirst for evil,
 and his eyes still delight themselves in wickedness.  He is dumb; but he
 will not let that hinder his foul trade, or perhaps I should say, his yet
 fouler amusement, and he has pressed a slate into the service of
 corruption.  Look at him, and he will sign to you with his bloated head,
 and when you go to him in answer to the sign, thinking perhaps that the
 poor dumb man has lost his way, you will see what he writes upon his
 slate.  He haunts the doors of schools, and shows such inscriptions as
 these to the innocent children that come out.  He hangs about
 picture-galleries, and makes the noblest pictures the text for some
 silent homily of vice.  His industry is a lesson to ourselves.  Is it not
 wonderful how he can triumph over his infirmities and do such an amount
 of harm without a tongue?  Wonderful industrystrange, fruitless,
 pleasureless toil?  Must not the very devil feel a soft emotion to see
 his disinterested and laborious service?  Ah, but the devil knows better
 than this: he knows that this man is penetrated with the love of evil and
 that all his pleasure is shut up in wickedness: he recognises him,
 perhaps, as a fit type for mankind of his satanic self, and watches over
 his effigy as we might watch over a favourite likeness.  As the business
 man comes to love the toil, which he only looked upon at first as a
 ladder towards other desires and less unnatural gratifications, so the
 dumb man has felt the charm of his trade and fallen captivated before the
 eyes of sin.  It is a mistake when preachers tell us that vice is hideous
 and loathsome; for even vice has her Hrsel and her devotees, who love
 her for her own sake.
 
 
 
 
 THE GREAT NORTH ROAD
 
 
 CHAPTER INANCE AT THE GREEN DRAGON
 
 
 Nance Holdaway was on her knees before the fire blowing the green wood
 that voluminously smoked upon the dogs, and only now and then shot forth
 a smothered flame; her knees already ached and her eyes smarted, for she
 had been some while at this ungrateful task, but her mind was gone far
 away to meet the coming stranger.  Now she met him in the wood, now at
 the castle gate, now in the kitchen by candle-light; each fresh
 presentment eclipsed the one before; a form so elegant, manners so
 sedate, a countenance so brave and comely, a voice so winning and
 resolutesure such a man was never seen!  The thick-coming fancies poured
 and brightened in her head like the smoke and flames upon the hearth.
 
 Presently the heavy foot of her uncle Jonathan was heard upon the stair,
 and as he entered the room she bent the closer to her work.  He glanced
 at the green fagots with a sneer, and looked askance at the bed and the
 white sheets, at the strip of carpet laid, like an island, on the great
 expanse of the stone floor, and at the broken glazing of the casement
 clumsily repaired with paper.
 
 Leave that fire a-be, he cried.  What, have I toiled all my life to
 turn innkeeper at the hind end?  Leave it a-be, I say.
 
 La, uncle, it doesnt burn a bit; it only smokes, said Nance, looking
 up from her position.
 
 You are come of decent people on both sides, returned the old man.
 Who are you to blow the coals for any Robin-run-agate?  Get up, get on
 your hood, make yourself useful, and be off to the Green Dragon.
 
 I thought you was to go yourself, Nance faltered.
 
 So did I, quoth Jonathan; but it appears I was mistook.
 
 The very excess of her eagerness alarmed her, and she began to hang back.
 I think I would rather not, dear uncle, she said.  Night is at hand,
 and I think, dear, I would rather not.
 
 Now you look here, replied Jonathan, I have my lords orders, have I
 not?  Little he gives me, but its all my livelihood.  And do you fancy,
 if I disobey my lord, Im likely to turn round for a lass like you?  No,
 Ive that hell-fire of pain in my old knee, I wouldnt walk a mile, not
 for King George upon his bended knees.  And he walked to the window and
 looked down the steep scarp to where the river foamed in the bottom of
 the dell.
 
 Nance stayed for no more bidding.  In her own room, by the glimmer of the
 twilight, she washed her hands and pulled on her Sunday mittens; adjusted
 her black hood, and tied a dozen times its cherry ribbons; and in less
 than ten minutes, with a fluttering heart and excellently bright eyes,
 she passed forth under the arch and over the bridge, into the thickening
 shadows of the groves.  A well-marked wheel-track conducted her.  The
 wood, which upon both sides of the river dell was a mere scrambling
 thicket of hazel, hawthorn, and holly, boasted on the level of more
 considerable timber.  Beeches came to a good growth, with here and there
 an oak; and the track now passed under a high arcade of branches, and now
 ran under the open sky in glades.  As the girl proceeded these glades
 became more frequent, the trees began again to decline in size, and the
 wood to degenerate into furzy coverts.  Last of all there was a fringe of
 elders; and beyond that the track came forth upon an open, rolling
 moorland, dotted with wind-bowed and scanty bushes, and all golden brown
 with the winter, like a grouse.  Right over against the girl the last red
 embers of the sunset burned under horizontal clouds; the night fell clear
 and still and frosty, and the track in low and marshy passages began to
 crackle under foot with ice.
 
 Some half a mile beyond the borders of the wood the lights of the Green
 Dragon hove in sight, and running close beside them, very faint in the
 dying dusk, the pale ribbon of the Great North Road.  It was the back of
 the post-house that was presented to Nance Holdaway; and as she continued
 to draw near and the night to fall more completely, she became aware of
 an unusual brightness and bustle.  A post-chaise stood in the yard, its
 lamps already lighted: light shone hospitably in the windows and from the
 open door; moving lights and shadows testified to the activity of
 servants bearing lanterns.  The clank of pails, the stamping of hoofs on
 the firm causeway, the jingle of harness, and, last of all, the energetic
 hissing of a groom, began to fall upon her ear.  By the stir you would
 have thought the mail was at the door, but it was still too early in the
 night.  The down mail was not due at the Green Dragon for hard upon an
 hour; the up mail from Scotland not before two in the black morning.
 
 Nance entered the yard somewhat dazzled.  Sam, the tall ostler, was
 polishing a curb-chain wit sand; the lantern at his feet letting up
 spouts of candle-light through the holes with which its conical roof was
 peppered.
 
 Hey, miss, said he jocularly, you wont look at me any more, now you
 have gentry at the castle.
 
 Her cheeks burned with anger.
 
 Thats my lords chay, the man continued, nodding at the chaise, Lord
 Windermoors.  Came all in a flusterdinner, bowl of punch, and put the
 horses to. For all the world like a runaway match, my dearbar the bride.
 He brought Mr. Archer in the chay with him.
 
 Is that Holdaway? cried the landlord from the lighted entry, where he
 stood shading his eyes.
 
 Only me, sir, answered Nance.
 
 O, you, Miss Nance, he said.  Well, come in quick, my pretty.  My lord
 is waiting for your uncle.
 
 And he ushered Nance into a room cased with yellow wainscot and lighted
 by tall candles, where two gentlemen sat at a table finishing a bowl of
 punch.  One of these was stout, elderly, and irascible, with a face like
 a full moon, well dyed with liquor, thick tremulous lips, a short, purple
 hand, in which he brandished a long pipe, and an abrupt and gobbling
 utterance.  This was my Lord Windermoor.  In his companion Nance beheld a
 younger man, tall, quiet, grave, demurely dressed, and wearing his own
 hair.  Her glance but lighted on him, and she flushed, for in that second
 she made sure that she had twice betrayed herselfbetrayed by the
 involuntary flash of her black eyes her secret impatience to behold this
 new companion, and, what was far worse, betrayed her disappointment in
 the realisation of her dreams.  He, meanwhile, as if unconscious,
 continued to regard her with unmoved decorum.
 
 O, a man of wood, thought Nance.
 
 Whatwhat? said his lordship.  Who is this?
 
 If you please, my lord, I am Holdaways niece, replied Nance, with a
 curtsey.
 
 Should have been here himself, observed his lordship.  Well, you tell
 Holdaway that Im aground, not a stivernot a stiver.  Im running from
 the beaglesgoing abroad, tell Holdaway.  And he need look for no more
 wages: glad of em myself, if I could get em.  He can live in the castle
 if he likes, or go to the devil.  O, and here is Mr. Archer; and I
 recommend him to take him ina friend of mineand Mr. Archer will pay, as
 I wrote.  And I regard that in the light of a precious good thing for
 Holdaway, let me tell you, and a set-off against the wages.
 
 But O, my lord! cried Nance, we live upon the wages, and what are we
 to do without?
 
 What am I to do?what am I to do? replied Lord Windermoor with some
 exasperation.  I have no wages.  And there is Mr. Archer.  And if
 Holdaway doesnt like it, he can go to the devil, and you with him!and
 you with him!
 
 And yet, my lord, said Mr. Archer, these good people will have as keen
 a sense of loss as you or I; keener, perhaps, since they have done
 nothing to deserve it.
 
 Deserve it? cried the peer.  What?  What?  If a rascally highwayman
 comes up to me with a confounded pistol, do you say that Ive deserved
 it?  How often am I to tell you, sir, that I was cheatedthat I was
 cheated?
 
 You are happy in the belief, returned Mr. Archer gravely.
 
 Archer, you would be the death of me! exclaimed his lordship.  You
 know youre drunk; you know it, sir; and yet you cant get up a spark of
 animation.
 
 I have drunk fair, my lord, replied the younger man; but I own I am
 conscious of no exhilaration.
 
 If you had as black a look-out as me, sir, cried the peer, you would
 be very glad of a little innocent exhilaration, let me tell you.  I am
 glad of itglad of it, and I only wish I was drunker.  For let me tell
 you its a cruel hard thing upon a man of my time of life and my
 position, to be brought down to beggary because the world is full of
 thieves and rascalsthieves and rascals.  What?  For all I know, you may
 be a thief and a rascal yourself; and I would fight you for a pinch of
 snuffa pinch of snuff, exclaimed his lordship.
 
 Here Mr. Archer turned to Nance Holdaway with a pleasant smile, so full
 of sweetness, kindness, and composure that, at one bound, her dreams
 returned to her.  My good Miss Holdaway, said he, if you are willing
 to show me the road, I am even eager to be gone.  As for his lordship and
 myself, compose yourself; there is no fear; this is his lordships way.
 
 What? what? cried his lordship.  My way?  Ish no such a thing, my
 way.
 
 Come, my lord, cried Archer; you and I very thoroughly understand each
 other; and let me suggest, it is time that both of us were gone.  The
 mail will soon be due.  Here, then, my lord, I take my leave of you, with
 the most earnest assurance of my gratitude for the past, and a sincere
 offer of any services I may be able to render in the future.
 
 Archer, exclaimed Lord Windermoor, I love you like a son.  Le s have
 another bowl.
 
 My lord, for both our sakes, you will excuse me, replied Mr. Archer.
 We both require caution; we must both, for some while at least, avoid
 the chance of a pursuit.
 
 Archer, quoth his lordship, this is a rank ingratishood.  What?  Im
 to go firing away in the dark in the cold pochaise, and not so much as a
 game of cart possible, unless I stop and play with the postillion, the
 postillion; and the whole country swarming with thieves and rascals and
 highwaymen.
 
 I beg your lordships pardon, put in the landlord, who now appeared in
 the doorway to announce the chaise, but this part of the North Road is
 known for safety.  There has not been a robbery, to call a robbery, this
 five years time.  Further south, of course, its nearer London, and
 another story, he added.
 
 Well, then, if thats so, concluded my lord, le s have tother bowl
 and a pack of cards.
 
 My lord, you forget, said Archer, I might still gain; but it is hardly
 possible for me to lose.
 
 Think Im a sharper? inquired the peer.  Genlemans paroles all I
 ask.
 
 But Mr. Archer was proof against these blandishments, and said farewell
 gravely enough to Lord Windermoor, shaking his hand and at the same time
 bowing very low.  You will never know, says he, the service you have
 done me.  And with that, and before my lord had finally taken up his
 meaning, he had slipped about the table, touched Nance lightly but
 imperiously on the arm, and left the room.  In face of the outbreak of
 his lordships lamentations she made haste to follow the truant.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIN WHICH MR. ARCHER IS INSTALLED
 
 
 The chaise had been driven round to the front door; the courtyard lay all
 deserted, and only lit by a lantern set upon a window-sill.  Through this
 Nance rapidly led the way, and began to ascend the swellings of the moor
 with a heart that somewhat fluttered in her bosom.  She was not afraid,
 but in the course of these last passages with Lord Windermoor Mr. Archer
 had ascended to that pedestal on which her fancy waited to instal him.
 The reality, she felt, excelled her dreams, and this cold night walk was
 the first romantic incident in her experience.
 
 It was the rule in these days to see gentlemen unsteady after dinner, yet
 Nance was both surprised and amused when her companion, who had spoken so
 soberly, began to stumble and waver by her side with the most airy
 divagations.  Sometimes he would get so close to her that she must edge
 away; and at others lurch clear out of the track and plough among deep
 heather.  His courtesy and gravity meanwhile remained unaltered.  He
 asked her how far they had to go; whether the way lay all upon the
 moorland, and when he learned they had to pass a wood expressed his
 pleasure.  For, said he, I am passionately fond of trees.  Trees and
 fair lawns, if you consider of it rightly, are the ornaments of nature,
 as palaces and fine approaches  And here he stumbled into a patch of
 slough and nearly fell.  The girl had hard work not to laugh, but at
 heart she was lost in admiration for one who talked so elegantly.
 
 They had got to about a quarter of a mile from the Green Dragon, and
 were near the summit of the rise, when a sudden rush of wheels arrested
 them.  Turning and looking back, they saw the post-house, now much
 declined in brightness; and speeding away northward the two tremulous
 bright dots of my Lord Windermoors chaise-lamps.  Mr. Archer followed
 these yellow and unsteady stars until they dwindled into points and
 disappeared.
 
 There goes my only friend, he said.  Death has cut off those that
 loved me, and change of fortune estranged my flatterers; and but for you,
 poor bankrupt, my life is as lonely as this moor.
 
 The tone of his voice affected both of them.  They stood there on the
 side of the moor, and became thrillingly conscious of the void waste of
 the night, without a feature for the eye, and except for the fainting
 whisper of the carriage-wheels without a murmur for the ear.  And
 instantly, like a mockery, there broke out, very far away, but clear and
 jolly, the note of the mail-guards horn.  Over the hills was his air.
 It rose to the two watchers on the moor with the most cheerful sentiment
 of human company and travel, and at the same time in and around the
 Green Dragon it woke up a great bustle of lights running to and fro and
 clattering hoofs.  Presently after, out of the darkness to southward, the
 mail grew near with a growing rumble.  Its lamps were very large and
 bright, and threw their radiance forward in overlapping cones; the four
 cantering horses swarmed and steamed; the body of the coach followed like
 a great shadow; and this lit picture slid with a sort of ineffectual
 swiftness over the black field of night, and was eclipsed by the
 buildings of the Green Dragon.
 
 Mr. Archer turned abruptly and resumed his former walk; only that he was
 now more steady, kept better alongside his young conductor, and had
 fallen into a silence broken by sighs.  Nance waxed very pitiful over his
 fate, contrasting an imaginary past of courts and great society, and
 perhaps the King himself, with the tumbledown ruin in a wood to which she
 was now conducting him.
 
 You must try, sir, to keep your spirits up, said she.  To be sure this
 is a great change for one like you; but who knows the future?
 
 Mr. Archer turned towards her in the darkness, and she could clearly
 perceive that he smiled upon her very kindly.  There spoke a sweet
 nature, said he, and I must thank you for these words.  But I would not
 have you fancy that I regret the past for any happiness found in it, or
 that I fear the simplicity and hardship of the country.  I am a man that
 has been much tossed about in life; now up, now down; and do you think
 that I shall not be able to support what you supportyou who are kind,
 and therefore know how to feel pain; who are beautiful, and therefore
 hope; who are young, and therefore (or am I the more mistaken?)
 discontented?
 
 Nay, sir, not that, at least, said Nance; not discontented.  If I were
 to be discontented, how should I look those that have real sorrows in the
 face?  I have faults enough, but not that fault; and I have my merits
 too, for I have a good opinion of myself.  But for beauty, I am not so
 simple but that I can tell a banter from a compliment.
 
 Nay, nay, said Mr. Archer, I had half forgotten; grief is selfish, and
 I was thinking of myself and not of you, or I had never blurted out so
 bold a piece of praise.  Tis the best proof of my sincerity.  But come,
 now, I would lay a wager you are no coward?
 
 Indeed, sir, I am not more afraid than another, said Nance.  None of
 my blood are given to fear.
 
 And you are honest? he returned.
 
 I will answer for that, said she.
 
 Well, then, to be brave, to be honest, to be kind, and to be contented,
 since you say you are sois not that to fill up a great part of virtue?
 
 I fear you are but a flatterer, said Nance, but she did not say it
 clearly, for what with bewilderment and satisfaction, her heart was quite
 oppressed.
 
 There could be no harm, certainly, in these grave compliments; but yet
 they charmed and frightened her, and to find favour, for reasons however
 obscure, in the eyes of this elegant, serious, and most unfortunate young
 gentleman, was a giddy elevation, was almost an apotheosis, for a country
 maid.
 
 But she was to be no more exercised; for Mr. Archer, disclaiming any
 thought of flattery, turned off to other subjects, and held her all
 through the wood in conversation, addressing her with an air of perfect
 sincerity, and listening to her answers with every mark of interest.  Had
 open flattery continued, Nance would have soon found refuge in good
 sense; but the more subtle lure she could not suspect, much less avoid.
 It was the first time she had ever taken part in a conversation
 illuminated by any ideas.  All was then true that she had heard and
 dreamed of gentlemen; they were a race apart, like deities knowing good
 and evil.  And then there burst upon her soul a divine thought, hopes
 glorious sunrise: since she could understand, since it seemed that she
 too, even she, could interest this sorrowful Apollo, might she not learn?
 or was she not learning?  Would not her soul awake and put forth wings?
 Was she not, in fact, an enchanted princess, waiting but a touch to
 become royal?  She saw herself transformed, radiantly attired, but in the
 most exquisite taste: her face grown longer and more refined; her tint
 etherealised; and she heard herself with delighted wonder talking like a
 book.
 
 Meanwhile they had arrived at where the track comes out above the river
 dell, and saw in front of them the castle, faintly shadowed on the night,
 covering with its broken battlements a bold projection of the bank, and
 showing at the extreme end, where were the habitable tower and wing, some
 crevices of candle-light.  Hence she called loudly upon her uncle, and he
 was seen to issue, lantern in hand, from the tower door, and, where the
 ruins did not intervene, to pick his way over the swarded courtyard,
 avoiding treacherous cellars and winding among blocks of fallen masonry.
 The arch of the great gate was still entire, flanked by two tottering
 bastions, and it was here that Jonathan met them, standing at the edge of
 the bridge, bent somewhat forward, and blinking at them through the glow
 of his own lantern.  Mr. Archer greeted him with civility; but the old
 man was in no humour of compliance.  He guided the newcomer across the
 court-yard, looking sharply and quickly in his face, and grumbling all
 the time about the cold, and the discomfort and dilapidation of the
 castle.  He was sure he hoped that Mr. Archer would like it; but in truth
 he could not think what brought him there.  Doubtless he had a good
 reasonthis with a look of cunning scrutinybut, indeed, the place was
 quite unfit for any person of repute; he himself was eaten up with the
 rheumatics.  It was the most rheumaticky place in England, and some fine
 day the whole habitable part (to call it habitable) would fetch away
 bodily and go down the slope into the river.  He had seen the cracks
 widening; there was a plaguy issue in the bank below; he thought a spring
 was mining it; it might be to-morrow, it might be next day; but they were
 all sure of a come-down sooner or later.  And that is a poor death,
 said he, for any one, let alone a gentleman, to have a whole old ruin
 dumped upon his belly.  Have a care to your left there; these cellar
 vaults have all broke down, and the grass and hemlock hide em.  Well,
 sir, here is welcome to you, such as it is, and wishing you well away.
 
 And with that Jonathan ushered his guest through the tower door, and down
 three steps on the left hand into the kitchen or common room of the
 castle.  It was a huge, low room, as large as a meadow, occupying the
 whole width of the habitable wing, with six barred windows looking on the
 court, and two into the river valley.  A dresser, a table, and a few
 chairs stood dotted here and there upon the uneven flags.  Under the
 great chimney a good fire burned in an iron fire-basket; a high old
 settee, rudely carved with figures and Gothic lettering, flanked it on
 either side; there was a hinge table and a stone bench in the chimney
 corner, and above the arch hung guns, axes, lanterns, and great sheaves
 of rusty keys.
 
 Jonathan looked about him, holding up the lantern, and shrugged his
 shoulders, with a pitying grimace.  Here it is, he said.  See the damp
 on the floor, look at the moss; where theres moss you may be sure that
 its rheumaticky.  Try and get near that fire for to warm yourself; itll
 blow the coat off your back.  And with a young gentleman with a face like
 yours, as pale as a tallow-candle, Id be afeard of a churchyard cough
 and a galloping decline, says Jonathan, naming the maladies with gloomy
 gusto, or the cold might strike and turn your blood, he added.
 
 Mr. Archer fairly laughed.  My good Mr. Holdaway, said he, I was born
 with that same tallow-candle face, and the only fear that you inspire me
 with is the fear that I intrude unwelcomely upon your private hours.  But
 I think I can promise you that I am very little troublesome, and I am
 inclined to hope that the terms which I can offer may still pay you the
 derangement.
 
 Yes, the terms, said Jonathan, I was thinking of that.  As you say,
 they are very small, and he shook his head.
 
 Unhappily, I can afford no more, said Mr. Archer.  But this we have
 arranged already, he added with a certain stiffness; and as I am aware
 that Miss Holdaway has matter to communicate, I will, if you permit,
 retire at once.  To-night I must bivouac; to-morrow my trunk is to follow
 from the Dragon.  So if you will show me to my room I shall wish you a
 good slumber and a better awakening.
 
 Jonathan silently gave the lantern to Nance, and she, turning and
 curtseying in the doorway, proceeded to conduct their guest up the broad
 winding staircase of the tower.  He followed with a very brooding face.
 
 Alas! cried Nance, as she entered the room, your fire black out, and,
 setting down the lantern, she clapped upon her knees before the chimney
 and began to rearrange the charred and still smouldering remains.  Mr.
 Archer looked about the gaunt apartment with a sort of shudder.  The
 great height, the bare stone, the shattered windows, the aspect of the
 uncurtained bed, with one of its four fluted columns broken short, all
 struck a chill upon his fancy.  From this dismal survey his eyes returned
 to Nance crouching before the fire, the candle in one hand and artfully
 puffing at the embers; the flames as they broke forth played upon the
 soft outline of her cheekshe was alive and young, coloured with the
 bright hues of life, and a woman.  He looked upon her, softening; and
 then sat down and continued to admire the picture.
 
 There, sir, said she, getting upon her feet, your fire is doing
 bravely now.  Good-night.
 
 He rose and held out his hand.  Come, said he, you are my only friend
 in these parts, and you must shake hands.
 
 She brushed her hand upon her skirt and offered it, blushing.
 
 God bless you, my dear, said he.
 
 And then, when he was alone, he opened one of the windows, and stared
 down into the dark valley.  A gentle wimpling of the river among stones
 ascended to his ear; the trees upon the other bank stood very black
 against the sky; farther away an owl was hooting.  It was dreary and
 cold, and as he turned back to the hearth and the fine glow of fire,
 Heavens! said he to himself, what an unfortunate destiny is mine!
 
 He went to bed, but sleep only visited his pillow in uneasy snatches.
 Outbreaks of loud speech came up the staircase; he heard the old stones
 of the castle crack in the frosty night with sharp reverberations, and
 the bed complained under his tossings.  Lastly, far on into the morning,
 he awakened from a doze to hear, very far off, in the extreme and
 breathless quiet, a wailing flourish on the horn.  The down mail was
 drawing near to the Green Dragon.  He sat up in bed; the sound was
 tragical by distance, and the modulation appealed to his ear like human
 speech.  It seemed to call upon him with a dreary insistenceto call him
 far away, to address him personally, and to have a meaning that he failed
 to seize.  It was thus, at least, in this nodding castle, in a cold, miry
 woodland, and so far from men and society, that the traffic on the Great
 North Road spoke to him in the intervals of slumber.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIJONATHAN HOLDAWAY
 
 
 Nance descended the tower stair, pausing at every step.  She was in no
 hurry to confront her uncle with bad news, and she must dwell a little
 longer on the rich note of Mr. Archers voice, the charm of his kind
 words, and the beauty of his manner and person.  But, once at the
 stair-foot, she threw aside the spell and recovered her sensible and
 workaday self.
 
 Jonathan was seated in the middle of the settle, a mug of ale beside him,
 in the attitude of one prepared for trouble; but he did not speak, and
 suffered her to fetch her supper and eat of it, with a very excellent
 appetite, in silence.  When she had done, she, too, drew a tankard of
 home-brewed, and came and planted herself in front of him upon the
 settle.
 
 Well? said Jonathan.
 
 My lord has run away, said Nance.
 
 What? cried the old man.
 
 Abroad, she continued; run away from creditors.  He said he had not a
 stiver, but he was drunk enough.  He said you might live on in the
 castle, and Mr. Archer would pay you; but you was to look for no more
 wages, since he would be glad of them himself.
 
 Jonathans face contracted; the flush of a black, bilious anger mounted
 to the roots of his hair; he gave an inarticulate cry, leapt upon his
 feet, and began rapidly pacing the stone floor.  At first he kept his
 hands behind his back in a tight knot; then he began to gesticulate as he
 turned.
 
 This manthis lord, he shouted, who is he?  He was born with a gold
 spoon in his mouth, and I with a dirty straw.  He rolled in his coach
 when he was a baby.  I have dug and toiled and laboured since I was that
 highthat high.  And he shouted again.  Im bent and broke, and full of
 pains.  D ye think I dont know the taste of sweat?  Manys the gallon
 Ive drunk of itay, in the midwinter, toiling like a slave.  All
 through, what has my life been?  Bend, bend, bend my old creaking back
 till it would ache like breaking; wade about in the foul mire, never a
 dry stitch; empty belly, sore hands, hat off to my Lord Redface; kicks
 and hapence; and now, here, at the hind end, when Im worn to my poor
 bones, a kick and done with it.  He walked a little while in silence,
 and then, extending his hand, Now you, Nance Holdaway, says he, you
 come of my blood, and youre a good girl.  When that man was a boy, I
 used to carry his gun for him.  I carried the gun all day on my two feet,
 and many a stitch I had, and chewed a bullet for.  He rode upon a horse,
 with feathers in his hat; but it was him that had the shots and took the
 game home.  Did I complain?  Not I.  I knew my station.  What did I ask,
 but just the chance to live and die honest?  Nance Holdaway, dont let
 them deny it to medont let them do it.  Ive been as poor as Job, and
 as honest as the day, but now, my girl, you mark these words of mine, Im
 getting tired of it.
 
 I wouldnt say such words, at least, said Nance.
 
 You wouldnt? said the old man grimly.  Well, and did I when I was
 your age?  Wait till your backs broke and your hands tremble, and your
 eyes fail, and youre weary of the battle and ask no more but to lie down
 in your bed and give the ghost up like an honest man; and then let there
 up and come some insolent, ungodly fellowah! if I had him in these
 hands!  Wheres my money that you gambled? I should say.  Wheres my
 money that you drank and diced?  Thief! is what I would say; Thief!
 he roared, Thief
 
 Mr. Archer will hear you if you dont take care, said Nance, and I
 would be ashamed, for one, that he should hear a brave, old, honest,
 hard-working man like Jonathan Holdaway talk nonsense like a boy.
 
 D ye think I mind for Mr. Archer? he cried shrilly, with a clack of
 laughter; and then he came close up to her, stooped down with his two
 palms upon his knees, and looked her in the eyes, with a strange hard
 expression, something like a smile.  Do I mind for God, my girl? he
 said; thats what its come to be now, do I mind for God?
 
 Uncle Jonathan, she said, getting up and taking him by the arm; you
 sit down again, where you were sitting.  There, sit still; Ill have no
 more of this; youll do yourself a mischief.  Come, take a drink of this
 good ale, and Ill warm a tankard for you.  La, well pull through,
 youll see.  Im young, as you say, and its my turn to carry the bundle;
 and dont you worry your bile, or well have sickness, too, as well as
 sorrow.
 
 D ye think that Id forgotten you? said Jonathan, with something like
 a groan; and thereupon his teeth clicked to, and he sat silent with the
 tankard in his hand and staring straight before him.
 
 Why, says Nance, setting on the ale to mull, men are always children,
 they say, however old; and if ever I heard a thing like this, to set to
 and make yourself sick, just when the moneys failing.  Keep a good heart
 up; you havent kept a good heart these seventy years, nigh hand, to
 break down about a pound or two.  Heres this Mr. Archer come to lodge,
 that you disliked so much.  Well, now you see it was a clear Providence.
 Come, lets think upon our mercies.  And here is the ale mulling lovely;
 smell of it; Ill take a drop myself, it smells so sweet.  And, Uncle
 Jonathan, you let me say one word.  Youve lost more than money before
 now; you lost my aunt, and bore it like a man.  Bear this.
 
 His face once more contracted; his fist doubled, and shot forth into the
 air, and trembled.  Let them look out! he shouted.  Here, I warn all
 men; Ive done with this foul kennel of knaves.  Let them look out!
 
 Hush, hush! for pitys sake, cried Nance.
 
 And then all of a sudden he dropped his face into his hands, and broke
 out with a great hiccoughing dry sob that was horrible to hear.  O, he
 cried, my God, if my son hadnt left me, if my Dick was here! and the
 sobs shook him; Nance sitting still and watching him, with distress.  O,
 if he were here to help his father! he went on again.  If I had a son
 like other fathers, he would save me now, when all is breaking down; O,
 he would save me!  Ay, but where is he?  Raking taverns, a thief perhaps.
 My curse be on him! he added, rising again into wrath.
 
 Hush! cried Nance, springing to her feet: your boy, your dead wifes
 boyAunt Susans baby that she lovedwould you curse him?  O, God
 forbid!
 
 The energy of her address surprised him from his mood.  He looked upon
 her, tearless and confused.  Let me go to my bed, he said at last, and
 he rose, and, shaking as with ague, but quite silent, lighted his candle,
 and left the kitchen.
 
 Poor Nance! the pleasant current of her dreams was all diverted.  She
 beheld a golden city, where she aspired to dwell; she had spoken with a
 deity, and had told herself that she might rise to be his equal; and now
 the earthly ligaments that bound her down had been tightened.  She was
 like a tree looking skyward, her roots were in the ground.  It seemed to
 her a thing so coarse, so rustic, to be thus concerned about a loss in
 money; when Mr. Archer, fallen from the sky-level of counts and nobles,
 faced his changed destiny with so immovable a courage.  To weary of
 honesty; that, at least, no one could do, but even to name it was already
 a disgrace; and she beheld in fancy her uncle, and the young lad, all
 laced and feathered, hand upon hip, bestriding his small horse.  The
 opposition seemed to perpetuate itself from generation to generation; one
 side still doomed to the clumsy and the servile, the other born to
 beauty.
 
 She thought of the golden zones in which gentlemen were bred, and figured
 with so excellent a grace; zones in which wisdom and smooth words, white
 linen and slim hands, were the mark of the desired inhabitants; where low
 temptations were unknown, and honesty no virtue, but a thing as natural
 as breathing.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVMINGLING THREADS
 
 
 It was nearly seven before Mr. Archer left his apartment.  On the landing
 he found another door beside his own opening on a roofless corridor, and
 presently he was walking on the top of the ruins.  On one hand he could
 look down a good depth into the green court-yard; on the other his eye
 roved along the downward course of the river, the wet woods all smoking,
 the shadows long and blue, the mists golden and rosy in the sun, here and
 there the water flashing across an obstacle.  His heart expanded and
 softened to a grateful melancholy, and with his eye fixed upon the
 distance, and no thought of present danger, he continued to stroll along
 the elevated and treacherous promenade.
 
 A terror-stricken cry rose to him from the courtyard.  He looked down,
 and saw in a glimpse Nance standing below with hands clasped in horror
 and his own foot trembling on the margin of a gulf.  He recoiled and
 leant against a pillar, quaking from head to foot, and covering his face
 with his hands; and Nance had time to run round by the stair and rejoin
 him where he stood before he had changed a line of his position.
 
 Ah! he cried, and clutched her wrist; dont leave me.  The place
 rocks; I have no head for altitudes.
 
 Sit down against that pillar, said Nance.  Dont you be afraid; I
 wont leave you, and dont look up or down: look straight at me.  How
 white you are!
 
 The gulf, he said, and closed his eyes again and shuddered.
 
 Why, said Nance, what a poor climber you must be!  That was where my
 cousin Dick used to get out of the castle after Uncle Jonathan had shut
 the gate.  Ive been down there myself with him helping me.  I wouldnt
 try with you, she said, and laughed merrily.
 
 The sound of her laughter was sincere and musical, and perhaps its beauty
 barbed the offence to Mr. Archer.  The blood came into his face with a
 quick jet, and then left it paler than before.  It is a physical
 weakness, he said harshly, and very droll, no doubt, but one that I can
 conquer on necessity.  See, I am still shaking.  Well, I advance to the
 battlements and look down.  Show me your cousins path.
 
 He would go sure-foot along that little ledge, said Nance, pointing as
 she spoke; then out through the breach and down by yonder buttress.  It
 is easier coming back, of course, because you see where you are going.
 From the buttress foot a sheep-walk goes along the scarpsee, you can
 follow it from here in the dry grass.  And now, sir, she added, with a
 touch of womanly pity, I would come away from here if I were you, for
 indeed you are not fit.
 
 Sure enough Mr. Archers pallor and agitation had continued to increase;
 his cheeks were deathly, his clenched fingers trembled pitifully.  The
 weakness is physical, he sighed, and had nearly fallen.  Nance led him
 from the spot, and he was no sooner back in the tower-stair, than he fell
 heavily against the wall and put his arm across his eyes.  A cup of
 brandy had to be brought him before he could descend to breakfast; and
 the perfection of Nances dream was for the first time troubled.
 
 Jonathan was waiting for them at table, with yellow, blood-shot eyes and
 a peculiar dusky complexion.  He hardly waited till they found their
 seats, before, raising one hand, and stooping with his mouth above his
 plate, he put up a prayer for a blessing on the food and a spirit of
 gratitude in the eaters, and thereupon, and without more civility, fell
 to.  But it was notable that he was no less speedily satisfied than he
 had been greedy to begin.  He pushed his plate away and drummed upon the
 table.
 
 These are silly prayers, said he, that they teach us.  Eat and be
 thankful, thats no such wonder.  Speak to me of starvingtheres the
 touch.  Youre a man, they tell me, Mr. Archer, that has met with some
 reverses?
 
 I have met with many, replied Mr. Archer.
 
 Ha! said Jonathan.  None reckons but the last.  Now, see; I tried to
 make this girl here understand me.
 
 Uncle, said Nance, what should Mr. Archer care for your concerns?  He
 hath troubles of his own, and came to be at peace, I think.
 
 I tried to make her understand me, repeated Jonathan doggedly; and now
 Ill try you.  Do you think this world is fair?
 
 Fair and false! quoth Mr. Archer.
 
 The old man laughed immoderately.  Good, said he, very good, but what
 I mean is this: do you know what it is to get up early and go to bed
 late, and never take so much as a holiday but four: and one of these your
 own marriage day, and the other three the funerals of folk you loved, and
 all that, to have a quiet old age in shelter, and bread for your old
 belly, and a bed to lay your crazy bones upon, with a clear conscience?
 
 Sir, said Mr. Archer, with an inclination of his head, you portray a
 very brave existence.
 
 Well, continued Jonathan, and in the end thieves deceive you, thieves
 rob and rook you, thieves turn you out in your old age and send you
 begging.  What have you got for all your honesty?  A fine return!  You
 that might have stole scores of pounds, there you are out in the rain
 with your rheumatics!
 
 Mr. Archer had forgotten to eat; with his hand upon his chin he was
 studying the old mans countenance.  And you conclude? he asked.
 
 Conclude! cried Jonathan.  I conclude Ill be upsides with them.
 
 Ay, said the other, we are all tempted to revenge.
 
 You have lost money? asked Jonathan.
 
 A great estate, said Archer quietly.
 
 See now! says Jonathan, and where is it?
 
 Nay, I sometimes think that every one has had his share of it but me,
 was the reply.  All England hath paid his taxes with my patrimony: I was
 a sheep that left my wool on every briar.
 
 And you sit down under that? cried the old man.  Come now, Mr. Archer,
 you and me belong to different stations; and I know mineno man
 betterbut since we have both been rooked, and are both sore with it,
 why, heres my hand with a very good heart, and I ask for yours, and no
 offence, I hope.
 
 There is surely no offence, my friend, returned Mr. Archer, as they
 shook hands across the table; for, believe me, my sympathies are quite
 acquired to you.  This life is an arena where we fight with beasts; and,
 indeed, he added, sighing, I sometimes marvel why we go down to it
 unarmed.
 
 In the meanwhile a creaking of ungreased axles had been heard descending
 through the wood; and presently after, the door opened, and the tall
 ostler entered the kitchen carrying one end of Mr. Archers trunk.  The
 other was carried by an aged beggar man of that district, known and
 welcome for some twenty miles about under the name of Old Cumberland.
 Each was soon perched upon a settle, with a cup of ale; and the ostler,
 who valued himself upon his affability, began to entertain the company,
 still with half an eye on Nance, to whom in gallant terms he expressly
 dedicated every sip of ale.  First he told of the trouble they had to get
 his Lordship started in the chaise; and how he had dropped a rouleau of
 gold on the threshold, and the passage and doorstep had been strewn with
 guinea-pieces.  At this old Jonathan looked at Mr. Archer.  Next the
 visitor turned to news of a more thrilling character: how the down mail
 had been stopped again near Grantham by three men on horsebacka white
 and two bays; how they had handkerchiefs on their faces; how Tom the
 guards blunderbuss missed fire, but he swore he had winged one of them
 with a pistol; and how they had got clean away with seventy pounds in
 money, some valuable papers, and a watch or two.
 
 Brave! brave! cried Jonathan in ecstasy.  Seventy pounds!  O, its
 brave!
 
 Well, I dont see the great bravery, observed the ostler,
 misapprehending him.  Three men, and you may call that three to one.
 Ill call it brave when some one stops the mail single-handed; thats a
 risk.
 
 And why should they hesitate? inquired Mr. Archer.  The poor souls who
 are fallen to such a way of life, pray what have they to lose?  If they
 get the money, well; but if a ball should put them from their troubles,
 why, so better.
 
 Well, sir, said the ostler, I believe youll find they wont agree
 with you.  They count on a good fling, you see; or who would risk it?And
 heres my best respects to you, Miss Nance.
 
 And I forgot the part of cowardice, resumed Mr. Archer.  All men
 fear.
 
 O, surely not! cried Nance.
 
 All men, reiterated Mr. Archer.
 
 Ay, thats a true word, observed Old Cumberland, and a thief, anyway,
 for its a cowards trade.
 
 But these fellows, now, said Jonathan, with a curious, appealing
 mannerthese fellows with their seventy pounds!  Perhaps, Mr. Archer,
 they were no true thieves after all, but just people who had been robbed
 and tried to get their own again.  What was that you said, about all
 England and the taxes?  One takes, another gives; why, thats almost
 fair.  If Ive been rooked and robbed, and the coat taken off my back, I
 call it almost fair to take anothers.
 
 Ask Old Cumberland, observed the ostler; you ask Old Cumberland, Miss
 Nance! and he bestowed a wink upon his favoured fair one.
 
 Why that? asked Jonathan.
 
 He had his coat takenay, and his shirt too, returned the ostler.
 
 Is that so? cried Jonathan eagerly.  Was you robbed too?
 
 That was I, replied Cumberland, with a warrant!  I was a well-to-do
 man when I was young.
 
 Ay!  See that! says Jonathan.  And you dont long for a revenge?
 
 Eh!  Not me! answered the beggar.  Its too long ago.  But if youll
 give me another mug of your good ale, my pretty lady, I wont say no to
 that.
 
 And shalt have!  And shalt have! cried Jonathan.  Or brandy even, if
 you like it better.
 
 And as Cumberland did like it better, and the ostler chimed in, the party
 pledged each other in a dram of brandy before separating.
 
 As for Nance, she slipped forth into the ruins, partly to avoid the
 ostlers gallantries, partly to lament over the defects of Mr. Archer.
 Plainly, he was no hero.  She pitied him; she began to feel a protecting
 interest mingle with and almost supersede her admiration, and was at the
 same time disappointed and yet drawn to him.  She was, indeed, conscious
 of such unshaken fortitude in her own heart, that she was almost tempted
 by an occasion to be bold for two.  She saw herself, in a brave attitude,
 shielding her imperfect hero from the world; and she saw, like a piece of
 heaven, his gratitude for her protection.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VLIFE IN THE CASTLE
 
 
 From that day forth the life of these three persons in the ruin ran very
 smoothly.  Mr. Archer now sat by the fire with a book, and now passed
 whole days abroad, returning late, dead weary.  His manner was a mask;
 but it was half transparent; through the even tenor of his gravity and
 courtesy profound revolutions of feeling were betrayed, seasons of numb
 despair, of restlessness, of aching temper.  For days he would say
 nothing beyond his usual courtesies and solemn compliments; and then, all
 of a sudden, some fine evening beside the kitchen fire, he would fall
 into a vein of elegant gossip, tell of strange and interesting events,
 the secrets of families, brave deeds of war, the miraculous discovery of
 crime, the visitations of the dead.  Nance and her uncle would sit till
 the small hours with eyes wide open: Jonathan applauding the unexpected
 incidents with many a slap of his big hand; Nance, perhaps, more pleased
 with the narrators eloquence and wise reflections; and then, again, days
 would follow of abstraction, of listless humming, of frequent apologies
 and long hours of silence.  Once only, and then after a week of
 unrelieved melancholy, he went over to the Green Dragon, spent the
 afternoon with the landlord and a bowl of punch, and returned as on the
 first night, devious in step but courteous and unperturbed of speech.
 
 If he seemed more natural and more at his ease it was when he found Nance
 alone; and, laying by some of his reserve, talked before her rather than
 to her of his destiny, character and hopes.  To Nance these interviews
 were but a doubtful privilege.  At times he would seem to take a pleasure
 in her presence, to consult her gravely, to hear and to discuss her
 counsels; at times even, but these were rare and brief, he would talk of
 herself, praise the qualities that she possessed, touch indulgently on
 her defects, and lend her books to read and even examine her upon her
 reading; but far more often he would fall into a half unconsciousness,
 put her a question and then answer it himself, drop into the veiled tone
 of voice of one soliloquising, and leave her at last as though he had
 forgotten her existence.  It was odd, too, that in all this random
 converse, not a fact of his past life, and scarce a name, should ever
 cross his lips.  A profound reserve kept watch upon his most unguarded
 moments.  He spoke continually of himself, indeed, but still in enigmas;
 a veiled prophet of egoism.
 
 The base of Nances feelings for Mr. Archer was admiration as for a
 superior being; and with this, his treatment, consciously or not,
 accorded happily.  When he forgot her, she took the blame upon herself.
 His formal politeness was so exquisite that this essential brutality
 stood excused.  His compliments, besides, were always grave and rational;
 he would offer reason for his praise, convict her of merit, and thus
 disarm suspicion.  Nay, and the very hours when he forgot and remembered
 her alternately could by the ardent fallacies of youth be read in the
 light of an attention.  She might be far from his confidence; but still
 she was nearer it than any one.  He might ignore her presence, but yet he
 sought it.
 
 Moreover, she, upon her side, was conscious of one point of superiority.
 Beside this rather dismal, rather effeminate man, who recoiled from a
 worm, who grew giddy on the castle wall, who bore so helplessly the
 weight of his misfortunes, she felt herself a head and shoulders taller
 in cheerful and sterling courage.  She could walk head in air along the
 most precarious rafter; her hand feared neither the grossness nor the
 harshness of lifes web, but was thrust cheerfully, if need were, into
 the briar bush, and could take hold of any crawling horror.  Ruin was
 mining the walls of her cottage, as already it had mined and subverted
 Mr. Archers palace.  Well, she faced it with a bright countenance and a
 busy hand.  She had got some washing, some rough seamstress work from the
 Green Dragon, and from another neighbour ten miles away across the
 moor.  At this she cheerfully laboured, and from that height she could
 afford to pity the useless talents and poor attitude of Mr. Archer.  It
 did not change her admiration, but it made it bearable.  He was above her
 in all ways; but she was above him in one.  She kept it to herself, and
 hugged it.  When, like all young creatures, she made long stories to
 justify, to nourish, and to forecast the course of her affection, it was
 this private superiority that made all rosy, that cut the knot, and that,
 at last, in some great situation, fetched to her knees the dazzling but
 imperfect hero.  With this pretty exercise she beguiled the hours of
 labour, and consoled herself for Mr. Archers bearing.
 
 Pity was her weapon and her weakness.  To accept the loved ones faults,
 although it has an air of freedom, is to kiss the chain, and this pity it
 was which, lying nearer to her heart, lent the one element of true
 emotion to a fanciful and merely brain-sick love.
 
 Thus it fell out one day that she had gone to the Green Dragon and
 brought back thence a letter to Mr. Archer.  He, upon seeing it, winced
 like a man under the knife: pain, shame, sorrow, and the most trenchant
 edge of mortification cut into his heart and wrung the steady composure
 of his face.
 
 Dear heart! have you bad news? she cried.
 
 But he only replied by a gesture and fled to his room, and when, later
 on, she ventured to refer to it, he stopped her on the threshold, as if
 with words prepared beforehand.  There are some pains, said he, too
 acute for consolation, or I would bring them to my kind consoler.  Let
 the memory of that letter, if you please, be buried.  And then as she
 continued to gaze at him, being, in spite of herself, pained by his
 elaborate phrase, doubtfully sincere in word and manner: Let it be
 enough, he added haughtily, that if this matter wring my heart, it doth
 not touch my conscience.  I am a man, I would have you to know, who
 suffers undeservedly.
 
 He had never spoken so directly: never with so convincing an emotion; and
 her heart thrilled for him.  She could have taken his pains and died of
 them with joy.
 
 Meanwhile she was left without support.  Jonathan now swore by his
 lodger, and lived for him.  He was a fine talker.  He knew the finest
 sight of stories; he was a man and a gentleman, take him for all in all,
 and a perfect credit to Old England.  Such were the old mans declared
 sentiments, and sure enough he clung to Mr. Archers side, hung upon his
 utterance when he spoke, and watched him with unwearing interest when he
 was silent.  And yet his feeling was not clear; in the partial wreck of
 his mind, which was leaning to decay, some after-thought was strongly
 present.  As he gazed in Mr. Archers face a sudden brightness would
 kindle in his rheumy eyes, his eye-brows would lift as with a sudden
 thought, his mouth would open as though to speak, and close again on
 silence.  Once or twice he even called Mr. Archer mysteriously forth into
 the dark courtyard, took him by the button, and laid a demonstrative
 finger on his chest; but there his ideas or his courage failed him; he
 would shufflingly excuse himself and return to his position by the fire
 without a word of explanation.  The good man was growing old, said Mr.
 Archer with a suspicion of a shrug.  But the good man had his idea, and
 even when he was alone the name of Mr. Archer fell from his lips
 continually in the course of mumbled and gesticulative conversation.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VITHE BAD HALF-CROWN
 
 
 However early Nance arose, and she was no sluggard, the old man, who had
 begun to outlive the earthly habit of slumber, would usually have been up
 long before, the fire would be burning brightly, and she would see him
 wandering among the ruins, lantern in hand, and talking assiduously to
 himself.  One day, however, after he had returned late from the market
 town, she found that she had stolen a march upon that indefatigable early
 riser.  The kitchen was all blackness.  She crossed the castle-yard to
 the wood-cellar, her steps printing the thick hoarfrost.  A scathing
 breeze blew out of the north-east and slowly carried a regiment of black
 and tattered clouds over the face of heaven, which was already kindled
 with the wild light of morning, but where she walked, in shelter of the
 ruins, the flame of her candle burned steady.  The extreme cold smote
 upon her conscience.  She could not bear to think this bitter business
 fell usually to the lot of one so old as Jonathan, and made desperate
 resolutions to be earlier in the future.
 
 The fire was a good blaze before he entered, limping dismally into the
 kitchen.  Nance, said he, I be all knotted up with the rheumatics;
 will you rub me a bit?  She came and rubbed him where and how he bade
 her.  This is a cruel thing that old age should be rheumaticky, said
 he.  When I was young I stood my turn of the teethache like a man! for
 why? because it couldnt last for ever; but these rheumatics come to live
 and die with you.  Your aunt was took before the time came; never had an
 ache to mention.  Now I lie all night in my single bed and the blood
 never warms in me; this knee of mine it seems like lighted up with
 rheumatics; it seems as though you could see to sew by it; and all the
 strings of my old body ache, as if devils was pulling em.  Thank you
 kindly; thats someways easier now, but an old man, my dear, has little
 to look for; its pain, pain, pain to the end of the business, and Ill
 never be rightly warm again till I get under the sod, he said, and
 looked down at her with a face so aged and weary that she had nearly
 wept.
 
 I lay awake all night, he continued; I do so mostly, and a long walk
 kills me.  Eh, deary me, to think that life should run to such a puddle!
 And I remember long syne when I was strong, and the blood all hot and
 good about me, and I loved to run, toodeary me, to run!  Well, thats
 all by.  Youd better pray to be took early, Nance, and not live on till
 you get to be like me, and are robbed in your grey old age, your cold,
 shivering, dark old age, thats like a winters morning; and he bitterly
 shuddered, spreading his hands before the fire.
 
 Come now, said Nance, the more you say the less youll like it, Uncle
 Jonathan; but if I were you I would be proud for to have lived all your
 days honest and beloved, and come near the end with your good name: isnt
 that a fine thing to be proud of?  Mr. Archer was telling me in some
 strange land they used to run races each with a lighted candle, and the
 art was to keep the candle burning.  Well, now, I thought that was like
 life: a mans good conscience is the flame he gets to carry, and if he
 comes to the winning-post with that still burning, why, take it how you
 will, the mans a heroeven if he was low-born like you and me.
 
 Did Mr. Archer tell you that? asked Jonathan.
 
 No, dear, said she, thats my own thought about it.  He told me of the
 race.  But see, now, she continued, putting on the porridge, you say
 old age is a hard season, but so is youth.  Youre half out of the
 battle, I would say; you loved my aunt and got her, and buried her, and
 some of these days soon youll go to meet her; and take her my love and
 tell her I tried to take good care of you; for so I do, Uncle Jonathan.
 
 Jonathan struck with his fist upon the settle.  D ye think I want to
 die, ye vixen? he shouted.  I want to live ten hundred years.
 
 This was a mystery beyond Nances penetration, and she stared in wonder
 as she made the porridge.
 
 I want to live, he continued, I want to live and to grow rich.  I want
 to drive my carriage and to dice in hells and see the ring, I do.  Is
 this a life that I lived?  I want to be a rake, d ye understand?  I want
 to know what things are like.  I dont want to die like a blind kitten,
 and me seventy-six.
 
 O fie! said Nance.
 
 The old man thrust out his jaw at her, with the grimace of an irreverent
 schoolboy.  Upon that aged face it seemed a blasphemy.  Then he took out
 of his bosom a long leather purse, and emptying its contents on the
 settle, began to count and recount the pieces, ringing and examining
 each, and suddenly he leapt like a young man.  What! he screamed.
 Bad?  O Lord!  Im robbed again!  And falling on his knees before the
 settle he began to pour forth the most dreadful curses on the head of his
 deceiver.  His eyes were shut, for to him this vile solemnity was prayer.
 He held up the bad half-crown in his right hand, as though he were
 displaying it to Heaven, and what increased the horror of the scene, the
 curses he invoked were those whose efficacy he had tastedold age and
 poverty, rheumatism and an ungrateful son.  Nance listened appalled; then
 she sprang forward and dragged down his arm and laid her hand upon his
 mouth.
 
 Whist! she cried.  Whist ye, for Gods sake!  O my man, whist ye!  If
 Heaven were to hear; if poor Aunt Susan were to hear!  Think, she may be
 listening.  And with the histrionism of strong emotion she pointed to a
 corner of the kitchen.
 
 His eyes followed her finger.  He looked there for a little, thinking,
 blinking; then he got stiffly to his feet and resumed his place upon the
 settle, the bad piece still in his hand.  So he sat for some time,
 looking upon the half-crown, and now wondering to himself on the
 injustice and partiality of the law, now computing again and again the
 nature of his loss.  So he was still sitting when Mr. Archer entered the
 kitchen.  At this a light came into his face, and after some seconds of
 rumination he dispatched Nance upon an errand.
 
 Mr. Archer, said he, as soon as they were alone together, would you
 give me a guinea-piece for silver?
 
 Why, sir, I believe I can, said Mr. Archer.
 
 And the exchange was just effected when Nance re-entered the apartment.
 The blood shot into her face.
 
 Whats to do here? she asked rudely.
 
 Nothing, my dearie, said old Jonathan, with a touch of whine.
 
 Whats to do? she said again.
 
 Your uncle was but changing me a piece of gold, returned Mr. Archer.
 
 Let me see what he hath given you, Mr. Archer, replied the girl.  I
 had a bad piece, and I fear it is mixed up among the good.
 
 Well, well, replied Mr. Archer, smiling, I must take the merchants
 risk of it.  The money is now mixed.
 
 I know my piece, quoth Nance.  Come, let me see your silver, Mr.
 Archer.  If I have to get it by a theft Ill see that money, she cried.
 
 Nay, child, if you put as much passion to be honest as the world to
 steal, I must give way, though I betray myself, said Mr. Archer.  There
 it is as I received it.
 
 Nance quickly found the bad half-crown.
 
 Give him another, she said, looking Jonathan in the face; and when that
 had been done, she walked over to the chimney and flung the guilty piece
 into the reddest of the fire.  Its base constituents began immediately to
 run; even as she watched it the disc crumbled, and the lineaments of the
 King became confused.  Jonathan, who had followed close behind, beheld
 these changes from over her shoulder, and his face darkened sorely.
 
 Now, said she, come back to table, and to-day it is I that shall say
 grace, as I used to do in the old times, day about with Dick; and
 covering her eyes with one hand, O Lord, said she with deep emotion,
 make us thankful; and, O Lord, deliver us from evil!  For the love of
 the poor souls that watch for us in heaven, O deliver us from evil.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIITHE BLEACHING-GREEN
 
 
 The year moved on to March; and March, though it blew bitter keen from
 the North Sea, yet blinked kindly between whiles on the river dell.  The
 mire dried up in the closest covert; life ran in the bare branches, and
 the air of the afternoon would be suddenly sweet with the fragrance of
 new grass.
 
 Above and below the castle the river crooked like the letter S.  The
 lower loop was to the left, and embraced the high and steep projection
 which was crowned by the ruins; the upper loop enclosed a lawny
 promontory, fringed by thorn and willow.  It was easy to reach it from
 the castle side, for the river ran in this part very quietly among
 innumerable boulders and over dam-like walls of rock.  The place was all
 enclosed, the wind a stranger, the turf smooth and solid; so it was
 chosen by Nance to be her bleaching-green.
 
 One day she brought a bucketful of linen, and had but begun to wring and
 lay them out when Mr. Archer stepped from the thicket on the far side,
 drew very deliberately near, and sat down in silence on the grass.  Nance
 looked up to greet him with a smile, but finding her smile was not
 returned, she fell into embarrassment and stuck the more busily to her
 employment.  Man or woman, the whole world looks well at any work to
 which they are accustomed; but the girl was ashamed of what she did.  She
 was ashamed, besides, of the sun-bonnet that so well became her, and
 ashamed of her bare arms, which were her greatest beauty.
 
 Nausicaa, said Mr. Archer at last, I find you like Nausicaa.
 
 And who was she? asked Nance, and laughed in spite of herself, an empty
 and embarrassed laugh, that sounded in Mr. Archers ears, indeed, like
 music, but to her own like the last grossness of rusticity.
 
 She was a princess of the Grecian islands, he replied.  A king, being
 shipwrecked, found her washing by the shore.  Certainly I, too, was
 shipwrecked, he continued, plucking at the grass.  There was never a
 more desperate castawayto fall from polite life, fortune, a shrine of
 honour, a grateful conscience, duties willingly taken up and faithfully
 discharged; and to fall to thisidleness, poverty, inutility, remorse.
 He seemed to have forgotten her presence, but here he remembered her
 again.  Nance, said he, would you have a man sit down and suffer or
 rise up and strive?
 
 Nay, she said.  I would always rather see him doing.
 
 Ha! said Mr. Archer, but yet you speak from an imperfect knowledge.
 Conceive a man damned to a choice of only evilmisconduct upon either
 side, not a fault behind him, and yet naught before him but this choice
 of sins.  How would you say then?
 
 I would say that he was much deceived, Mr. Archer, returned Nance.  I
 would say there was a third choice, and that the right one.
 
 I tell you, said Mr. Archer, the man I have in view hath two ways
 open, and no more.  One to wait, like a poor mewling baby, till Fate save
 or ruin him; the other to take his troubles in his hand, and to perish or
 be saved at once.  It is no point of morals; both are wrong.  Either way
 this step-child of Providence must fall; which shall he choose, by doing
 or not doing?
 
 Fall, then, is what I would say, replied Nance.  Fall where you will,
 but do it!  For O, Mr. Archer, she continued, stooping to her work, you
 that are good and kind, and so wise, it doth sometimes go against my
 heart to see you live on here like a sheep in a turnip-field!  If you
 were braver and here she paused, conscience-smitten.
 
 Do I, indeed, lack courage? inquired Mr. Archer of himself.  Courage,
 the footstool of the virtues, upon which they stand?  Courage, that a
 poor private carrying a musket has to spare of; that does not fail a
 weasel or a rat; that is a brutish faculty?  I to fail there, I wonder?
 But what is courage, then?  The constancy to endure oneself or to see
 others suffer?  The itch of ill-advised activity: mere
 shuttle-wittedness, or to be still and patient?  To inquire of the
 significance of words is to rob ourselves of what we seem to know, and
 yet, of all things, certainly to stand still is the least heroic.
 Nance, he said, did you ever hear of _Hamlet_?
 
 Never, said Nance.
 
 Tis an old play, returned Mr. Archer, and frequently enacted.  This
 while I have been talking Hamlet.  You must know this Hamlet was a Prince
 among the Danes, and he told her the play in a very good style, here and
 there quoting a verse or two with solemn emphasis.
 
 It is strange, said Nance; he was then a very poor creature?
 
 That was what he could not tell, said Mr. Archer.  Look at me, am I as
 poor a creature?
 
 She looked, and what she saw was the familiar thought of all her hours;
 the tall figure very plainly habited in black, the spotless ruffles, the
 slim hands; the long, well-shapen, serious, shaven face, the wide and
 somewhat thin-lipped mouth, the dark eyes that were so full of depth and
 change and colour.  He was gazing at her with his brows a little knit,
 his chin upon one hand and that elbow resting on his knee.
 
 Ye look a man! she cried, ay, and should be a great one!  The more
 shame to you to lie here idle like a dog before the fire.
 
 My fair Holdaway, quoth Mr. Archer, you are much set on action.  I
 cannot dig, to beg I am ashamed.  He continued, looking at her with a
 half-absent fixity, Tis a strange thing, certainly, that in my years of
 fortune I should never taste happiness, and now when I am broke, enjoy so
 much of it, for was I ever happier than to-day?  Was the grass softer,
 the stream pleasanter in sound, the air milder, the heart more at peace?
 Why should I not sink?  To digwhy, after all, it should be easy.  To
 take a mate, too?  Love is of all grades since Jupiter; love fails to
 none; and childrenbut here he passed his hand suddenly over his eyes.
 O fool and coward, fool and coward! he said bitterly; can you forget
 your fetters?  You did not know that I was fettered, Nance? he asked,
 again addressing her.
 
 But Nance was somewhat sore.  I know you keep talking, she said, and,
 turning half away from him, began to wring out a sheet across her
 shoulder.  I wonder you are not wearied of your voice.  When the hands
 lie abed the tongue takes a walk.
 
 Mr. Archer laughed unpleasantly, rose and moved to the waters edge.  In
 this part the body of the river poured across a little narrow fell, ran
 some ten feet very smoothly over a bed of pebbles, then getting wind, as
 it were, of another shelf of rock which barred the channel, began, by
 imperceptible degrees, to separate towards either shore in dancing
 currents, and to leave the middle clear and stagnant.  The set towards
 either side was nearly equal; about one half of the whole water plunged
 on the side of the castle, through a narrow gullet; about one half ran
 ripping past the margin of the green and slipped across a babbling rapid.
 
 Here, said Mr. Archer, after he had looked for some time at the fine
 and shifting demarcation of these currents, come here and see me try my
 fortune.
 
 I am not like a man, said Nance; I have no time to waste.
 
 Come here, he said again.  I ask you seriously, Nance.  We are not
 always childish when we seem so.
 
 She drew a little nearer.
 
 Now, said he, you see these two channelschoose one.
 
 Ill choose the nearest, to save time, said Nance.
 
 Well, that shall be for action, returned Mr. Archer.  And since I wish
 to have the odds against me, not only the other channel but yon stagnant
 water in the midst shall be for lying still.  You see this? he
 continued, pulling up a withered rush.  I break it in three.  I shall
 put each separately at the top of the upper fall, and according as they
 go by your way or by the other I shall guide my life.
 
 This is very silly, said Nance, with a movement of her shoulders.
 
 I do not think it so, said Mr. Archer.
 
 And then, she resumed, if you are to try your fortune, why not
 evenly?
 
 Nay, returned Mr. Archer with a smile, no man can put complete
 reliance in blind fate; he must still cog the dice.
 
 By this time he had got upon the rock beside the upper fall, and, bidding
 her look out, dropped a piece of rush into the middle of the intake.  The
 rusty fragment was sucked at once over the fall, came up again far on the
 right hand, leaned ever more and more in the same direction, and
 disappeared under the hanging grasses on the castle side.
 
 One, said Mr. Archer, one for standing still.
 
 But the next launch had a different fate, and after hanging for a while
 about the edge of the stagnant water, steadily approached the
 bleaching-green and danced down the rapid under Nances eyes.
 
 One for me, she cried with some exultation; and then she observed that
 Mr. Archer had grown pale, and was kneeling on the rock, with his hand
 raised like a person petrified.  Why, said she, you do not mind it, do
 you?
 
 Does a man not mind a throw of dice by which a fortune hangs? said Mr.
 Archer, rather hoarsely.  And this is more than fortune.  Nance, if you
 have any kindness for my fate, put up a prayer before I launch the next
 one.
 
 A prayer, she cried, about a game like this?  I would not be so
 heathen.
 
 Well, said he, then without, and he closed his eyes and dropped the
 piece of rush.  This time there was no doubt.  It went for the rapid as
 straight as any arrow.
 
 Action then! said Mr. Archer, getting to his feet; and then God
 forgive us, he added, almost to himself.
 
 God forgive us, indeed, cried Nance, for wasting the good daylight!
 But come, Mr. Archer, if I see you look so serious I shall begin to think
 you was in earnest.
 
 Nay, he said, turning upon her suddenly, with a full smile; but is not
 this good advice?  I have consulted God and demigod; the nymph of the
 river, and what I far more admire and trust, my blue-eyed Minerva.  Both
 have said the same.  My own heart was telling it already.  Action, then,
 be mine; and into the deep sea with all this paralysing casuistry.  I am
 happy to-day for the first time.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIIITHE MAIL GUARD
 
 
 Somewhere about two in the morning a squall had burst upon the castle, a
 clap of screaming wind that made the towers rock, and a copious drift of
 rain that streamed from the windows.  The wind soon blew itself out, but
 the day broke cloudy and dripping, and when the little party assembled at
 breakfast their humours appeared to have changed with the change of
 weather.  Nance had been brooding on the scene at the river-side,
 applying it in various ways to her particular aspirations, and the
 result, which was hardly to her mind, had taken the colour out of her
 cheeks.  Mr. Archer, too, was somewhat absent, his thoughts were of a
 mingled strain; and even upon his usually impassive countenance there
 were betrayed successive depths of depression and starts of exultation,
 which the girl translated in terms of her own hopes and fears.  But
 Jonathan was the most altered: he was strangely silent, hardly passing a
 word, and watched Mr. Archer with an eager and furtive eye.  It seemed as
 if the idea that had so long hovered before him had now taken a more
 solid shape, and, while it still attracted, somewhat alarmed his
 imagination.
 
 At this rate, conversation languished into a silence which was only
 broken by the gentle and ghostly noises of the rain on the stone roof and
 about all that field of ruins; and they were all relieved when the note
 of a man whistling and the sound of approaching footsteps in the grassy
 court announced a visitor.  It was the ostler from the Green Dragon
 bringing a letter for Mr. Archer.  Nance saw her heros face contract and
 then relax again at sight of it; and she thought that she knew why, for
 the sprawling, gross black characters of the address were easily
 distinguishable from the fine writing on the former letter that had so
 much disturbed him.  He opened it and began to read; while the ostler sat
 down to table with a pot of ale, and proceeded to make himself agreeable
 after his fashion.
 
 Fine doings down our way, Miss Nance, said he.  I havent been abed
 this blessed night.
 
 Nance expressed a polite interest, but her eye was on Mr. Archer, who was
 reading his letter with a face of such extreme indifference that she was
 tempted to suspect him of assumption.
 
 Yes, continued the ostler, not been the like of it this fifteen years:
 the North Mail stopped at the three stones.
 
 Jonathans cup was at his lip, but at this moment he choked with a great
 splutter; and Mr. Archer, as if startled by the noise, made so sudden a
 movement that one corner of the sheet tore off and stayed between his
 finger and thumb.  It was some little time before the old man was
 sufficiently recovered to beg the ostler to go on, and he still kept
 coughing and crying and rubbing his eyes.  Mr. Archer, on his side, laid
 the letter down, and, putting his hands in his pocket, listened gravely
 to the tale.
 
 Yes, resumed Sam, the North Mail was stopped by a single horseman;
 dash my wig, but I admire him!  There were four insides and two out, and
 poor Tom Oglethorpe, the guard.  Tom showed himself a man; let fly his
 blunderbuss at him; had him covered, too, and could swear to that; but
 the Captain never let on, up with a pistol and fetched poor Tom a bullet
 through the body.  Tom, he squelched upon the seat, all over blood.  Up
 comes the Captain to the window.  Oblige me, says he, with what you
 have.  Would you believe it?  Not a man says cheep!not them.  Thy
 hands over thy head.  Four watches, rings, snuff-boxes, seven-and-forty
 pounds overhead in gold.  One Dicksee, a grazier, tries it on: gives him
 a guinea.  Beg your pardon, says the Captain, I think too highly of
 you to take it at your hand.  I will not take less than ten from such a
 gentleman.  This Dicksee had his money in his stocking, but there was
 the pistol at his eye.  Down he goes, offs with his stocking, and there
 was thirty golden guineas.  Now, says the Captain, youve tried it on
 with me, but I scorns the advantage.  Ten I said, he says, and ten I
 take.  So, dash my buttons, I call that man a man! cried Sam in cordial
 admiration.
 
 Well, and then? says Mr. Archer.
 
 Then, resumed Sam, that old fat fagot Engleton, him as held the
 ribbons and drew up like a lamb when he was told to, picks up his cattle,
 and drives off again.  Down they came to the Dragon, all singing like
 as if they was scalded, and poor Tom saying nothing.  You would a
 thought they had all lost the Kings crown to hear them.  Down gets this
 Dicksee.  Postmaster, he says, taking him by the arm, this is a most
 abominable thing, he says.  Down gets a Major Clayton, and gets the old
 man by the other arm.  Weve been robbed, he cries, robbed!  Down
 gets the others, and all around the old man telling their story, and what
 they had lost, and how they was all as good as ruined; till at last Old
 Engleton says, says he, How about Oglethorpe? says he.  Ay, says the
 others, how about the guard?  Well, with that we bousted him down, as
 white as a rag and all blooded like a sop.  I thought he was dead.  Well,
 he aint dead; but hes dying, I fancy.
 
 Did you say four watches? said Jonathan.
 
 Four, I think.  I wish it had been forty, cried Sam.  Such a party of
 soused herrings I never did seenot a man among them bar poor Tom.  But
 us that are the servants on the road have all the risk and none of the
 profit.
 
 And this brave fellow, asked Mr. Archer, very quietly, this
 Oglethorpehow is he now?
 
 Well, sir, with my respects, I take it he has a hole bang through him,
 said Sam.  The doctor hasnt been yet.  Hed a been bright and early
 if it had been a passenger.  But, doctor or no, Ill make a good guess
 that Tom wont see to-morrow.  Hell die on a Sunday, will poor Tom; and
 they do say thats fortunate.
 
 Did Tom see him that did it? asked Jonathan.
 
 Well, he saw him, replied Sam, but not to swear by.  Said he was a
 very tall man, and very big, and had a ankerchief about his face, and a
 very quick shot, and sat his horse like a thorough gentleman, as he is.
 
 A gentleman! cried Nance.  The dirty knave!
 
 Well, I calls a man like that a gentleman, returned the ostler; thats
 what I mean by a gentleman.
 
 You dont know much of them, then, said Nance.
 
 A gentleman would scorn to stoop to such a thing.  I call my uncle a
 better gentleman than any thief.
 
 And you would be right, said Mr. Archer.
 
 How many snuff-boxes did he get? asked Jonathan.
 
 O, dang me if I know, said Sam; I didnt take an inventory.
 
 I will go back with you, if you please, said Mr. Archer.  I should
 like to see poor Oglethorpe.  He has behaved well.
 
 At your service, sir, said Sam, jumping to his feet.  I dare to say a
 gentleman like you would not forget a poor fellow like Tomno, nor a
 plain man like me, sir, that went without his sleep to nurse him.  And
 excuse me, sir, added Sam, you wont forget about the letter neither?
 
 Surely not, said Mr. Archer.
 
 Oglethorpe lay in a low bed, one of several in a long garret of the inn.
 The rain soaked in places through the roof and fell in minute drops;
 there was but one small window; the beds were occupied by servants, the
 air of the garret was both close and chilly.  Mr. Archers heart sank at
 the threshold to see a man lying perhaps mortally hurt in so poor a
 sick-room, and as he drew near the low bed he took his hat off.  The
 guard was a big, blowsy, innocent-looking soul with a thick lip and a
 broad nose, comically turned up; his cheeks were crimson, and when Mr.
 Archer laid a finger on his brow he found him burning with fever.
 
 I fear you suffer much, he said, with a catch in his voice, as he sat
 down on the bedside.
 
 I suppose I do, sir, returned Oglethorpe; it is main sore.
 
 I am used to wounds and wounded men, returned the visitor.  I have
 been in the wars and nursed brave fellows before now; and, if you will
 suffer me, I propose to stay beside you till the doctor comes.
 
 It is very good of you, sir, I am sure, said Oglethorpe.  The trouble
 is they wont none of them let me drink.
 
 If you will not tell the doctor, said Mr. Archer, I will give you some
 water.  They say it is bad for a green wound, but in the Low Countries we
 all drank water when we found the chance, and I could never perceive we
 were the worse for it.
 
 Been wounded yourself, sir, perhaps? called Oglethorpe.
 
 Twice, said Mr. Archer, and was as proud of these hurts as any lady of
 her bracelets.  Tis a fine thing to smart for ones duty; even in the
 pangs of it there is contentment.
 
 Ah, well! replied the guard, if youve been shot yourself, that
 explains.  But as for contentment, why, sir, you see, it smarts, as you
 say.  And then, I have a good wife, you see, and a bit of a brata little
 thing, so high.
 
 Dont move, said Mr. Archer.
 
 No, sir, I will not, and thank you kindly, said Oglethorpe.  At York
 they are.  A very good lass is my wifefar too good for me.  And the
 little rascalwell, I dont know how to say it, but he sort of comes
 round you.  If I were to go, sir, it would be hard on my poor girlmain
 hard on her!
 
 Ay, you must feel bitter hardly to the rogue that laid you here, said
 Archer.
 
 Why, no, sir, more against Engleton and the passengers, replied the
 guard.  He played his hand, if you come to look at it; and I wish he had
 shot worse, or me better.  And yet Ill go to my grave but what I covered
 him, he cried.  It looks like witchcraft.  Ill go to my grave but what
 he was drove full of slugs like a pepper-box.
 
 Quietly, said Mr. Archer, you must not excite yourself.  These
 deceptions are very usual in war; the eye, in the moment of alert, is
 hardly to be trusted, and when the smoke blows away you see the man you
 fired at, taking aim, it may be, at yourself.  You should observe, too,
 that you were in the dark night, and somewhat dazzled by the lamps, and
 that the sudden stopping of the mail had jolted you.  In such
 circumstances a man may miss, ay, even with a blunder-buss, and no blame
 attach to his marksmanship. . . .
 
 
 
 
 THE YOUNG CHEVALIER
 
 
 PROLOGUETHE WINE-SELLERS WIFE
 
 
 There was a wine-sellers shop, as you went down to the river in the city
 of the Anti-popes.  There a man was served with good wine of the country
 and plain country fare; and the place being clean and quiet, with a
 prospect on the river, certain gentlemen who dwelt in that city in
 attendance on a great personage made it a practice (when they had any
 silver in their purses) to come and eat there and be private.
 
 They called the wine-seller Paradou.  He was built more like a bullock
 than a man, huge in bone and brawn, high in colour, and with a hand like
 a baby for size.  Marie-Madeleine was the name of his wife; she was of
 Marseilles, a city of entrancing women, nor was any fairer than herself.
 She was tall, being almost of a height with Paradou; full-girdled,
 point-device in every form, with an exquisite delicacy in the face; her
 nose and nostrils a delight to look at from the fineness of the
 sculpture, her eyes inclined a hairs-breadth inward, her colour between
 dark and fair, and laid on even like a flowers.  A faint rose dwelt in
 it, as though she had been found unawares bathing, and had blushed from
 head to foot.  She was of a grave countenance, rarely smiling; yet it
 seemed to be written upon every part of her that she rejoiced in life.
 Her husband loved the heels of her feet and the knuckles of her fingers;
 he loved her like a glutton and a brute; his love hung about her like an
 atmosphere; one that came by chance into the wine-shop was aware of that
 passion; and it might be said that by the strength of it the woman had
 been drugged or spell-bound.  She knew not if she loved or loathed him;
 he was always in her eyes like something monstrousmonstrous in his love,
 monstrous in his person, horrific but imposing in his violence; and her
 sentiment swung back and forward from desire to sickness.  But the mean,
 where it dwelt chiefly, was an apathetic fascination, partly of horror;
 as of Europa in mid ocean with her bull.
 
 On the 10th November 1749 there sat two of the foreign gentlemen in the
 wine-sellers shop.  They were both handsome men of a good presence,
 richly dressed.  The first was swarthy and long and lean, with an alert,
 black look, and a mole upon his cheek.  The other was more fair.  He
 seemed very easy and sedate, and a little melancholy for so young a man,
 but his smile was charming.  In his grey eyes there was much abstraction,
 as of one recalling fondly that which was past and lost.  Yet there was
 strength and swiftness in his limbs; and his mouth set straight across
 his face, the under lip a thought upon side, like that of a man
 accustomed to resolve.  These two talked together in a rude outlandish
 speech that no frequenter of that wine-shop understood.  The swarthy man
 answered to the name of _Ballantrae_; he of the dreamy eyes was sometimes
 called _Balmile_, and sometimes _my Lord_, or _my Lord Gladsmuir_; but
 when the title was given him, he seemed to put it by as if in jesting,
 not without bitterness.
 
 The mistral blew in the city.  The first day of that wind, they say in
 the countries where its voice is heard, it blows away all the dust, the
 second all the stones, and the third it blows back others from the
 mountains.  It was now come to the third day; outside the pebbles flew
 like hail, and the face of the river was puckered, and the very
 building-stones in the walls of houses seemed to be curdled with the
 savage cold and fury of that continuous blast.  It could be heard to hoot
 in all the chimneys of the city; it swept about the wine-shop, filling
 the room with eddies; the chill and gritty touch of it passed between the
 nearest clothes and the bare flesh; and the two gentlemen at the far
 table kept their mantles loose about their shoulders.  The roughness of
 these outer hulls, for they were plain travellers cloaks that had seen
 service, set the greater mark of richness on what showed below of their
 laced clothes; for the one was in scarlet and the other in violet and
 white, like men come from a scene of ceremony; as indeed they were.
 
 It chanced that these fine clothes were not without their influence on
 the scene which followed, and which makes the prologue of our tale.  For
 a long time Balmile was in the habit to come to the wine-shop and eat a
 meal or drink a measure of wine; sometimes with a comrade; more often
 alone, when he would sit and dream and drum upon the table, and the
 thoughts would show in the mans face in little glooms and lightenings,
 like the sun and the clouds upon a water.  For a long time
 Marie-Madeleine had observed him apart.  His sadness, the beauty of his
 smile when by any chance he remembered her existence and addressed her,
 the changes of his mind signalled forth by an abstruse play of feature,
 the mere fact that he was foreign and a thing detached from the local and
 the accustomed, insensibly attracted and affected her.  Kindness was
 ready in her mind; it but lacked the touch of an occasion to effervesce
 and crystallise.  Now Balmile had come hitherto in a very poor plain
 habit; and this day of the mistral, when his mantle was just open, and
 she saw beneath it the glancing of the violet and the velvet and the
 silver, and the clustering fineness of the lace, it seemed to set the man
 in a new light, with which he shone resplendent to her fancy.
 
 The high inhuman note of the wind, the violence and continuity of its
 outpouring, and the fierce touch of it upon mans whole periphery,
 accelerated the functions of the mind.  It set thoughts whirling, as it
 whirled the trees of the forest; it stirred them up in flights, as it
 stirred up the dust in chambers.  As brief as sparks, the fancies
 glittered and succeeded each other in the mind of Marie-Madeleine; and
 the grave man with the smile, and the bright clothes under the plain
 mantle, haunted her with incongruous explanations.  She considered him,
 the unknown, the speaker of an unknown tongue, the hero (as she placed
 him) of an unknown romance, the dweller upon unknown memories.  She
 recalled him sitting there alone, so immersed, so stupefied; yet she was
 sure he was not stupid.  She recalled one day when he had remained a long
 time motionless, with parted lips, like one in the act of starting up,
 his eyes fixed on vacancy.  Any one else must have looked foolish; but
 not he.  She tried to conceive what manner of memory had thus entranced
 him; she forged for him a past; she showed him to herself in every light
 of heroism and greatness and misfortune; she brooded with petulant
 intensity on all she knew and guessed of him.  Yet, though she was
 already gone so deep, she was still unashamed, still unalarmed; her
 thoughts were still disinterested; she had still to reach the stage at
 whichbeside the image of that other whom we love to contemplate and to
 adornwe place the image of ourself and behold them together with
 delight.
 
 She stood within the counter, her hands clasped behind her back, her
 shoulders pressed against the wall, her feet braced out.  Her face was
 bright with the wind and her own thoughts; as a fire in a similar day of
 tempest glows and brightens on a hearth, so she seemed to glow, standing
 there, and to breathe out energy.  It was the first time Ballantrae had
 visited that wine-sellers, the first time he had seen the wife; and his
 eyes were true to her.
 
 I perceive your reason for carrying me to this very draughty tavern, he
 said at last.
 
 I believe it is propinquity, returned Balmile.
 
 You play dark, said Ballantrae, but have a care!  Be more frank with
 me, or I will cut you out.  I go through no form of qualifying my threat,
 which would be commonplace and not conscientious.  There is only one
 point in these campaigns: that is the degree of admiration offered by the
 man; and to our hostess I am in a posture to make victorious love.
 
 If you think you have the time, or the game worth the candle, replied
 the other with a shrug.
 
 One would suppose you were never at the pains to observe her, said
 Ballantrae.
 
 I am not very observant, said Balmile.  She seems comely.
 
 You very dear and dull dog! cried Ballantrae; chastity is the most
 besotting of the virtues.  Why, she has a look in her face beyond
 singing!  I believe, if you was to push me hard, I might trace it home to
 a trifle of a squint.  What matters?  The height of beauty is in the
 touch thats wrong, thats the modulation in a tune.  Tis the devil we
 all love; I owe many a conquest to my molehe touched it as he spoke
 with a smile, and his eyes glittered;we are all hunchbacks, and beauty
 is only that kind of deformity that I happen to admire.  But come!
 Because you are chaste, for which I am sure I pay you my respects, that
 is no reason why you should be blind.  Look at her, look at the delicious
 nose of her, look at her cheek, look at her ear, look at her hand and
 wristlook at the whole baggage from heels to crown, and tell me if she
 wouldnt melt on a mans tongue.
 
 As Ballantrae spoke, half jesting, half enthusiastic, Balmile was
 constrained to do as he was bidden.  He looked at the woman, admired her
 excellences, and was at the same time ashamed for himself and his
 companion.  So it befell that when Marie-Madeleine raised her eyes, she
 met those of the subject of her contemplations fixed directly on herself
 with a look that is unmistakable, the look of a person measuring and
 valuing anotherand, to clench the false impression, that his glance was
 instantly and guiltily withdrawn.  The blood beat back upon her heart and
 leaped again; her obscure thoughts flashed clear before her; she flew in
 fancy straight to his arms like a wanton, and fled again on the instant
 like a nymph.  And at that moment there chanced an interruption, which
 not only spared her embarrassment, but set the last consecration on her
 now articulate love.
 
 Into the wine-shop there came a French gentleman, arrayed in the last
 refinement of the fashion, though a little tumbled by his passage in the
 wind.  It was to be judged he had come from the same formal gathering at
 which the others had preceded him; and perhaps that he had gone there in
 the hope to meet with them, for he came up to Ballantrae with
 unceremonious eagerness.
 
 At last, here you are! he cried in French.  I thought I was to miss
 you altogether.
 
 The Scotsmen rose, and Ballantrae, after the first greetings, laid his
 hand on his companions shoulder.
 
 My lord, said he, allow me to present to you one of my best friends
 and one of our best soldiers, the Lord Viscount Gladsmuir.
 
 The two bowed with the elaborate elegance of the period.
 
 _Monseigneur_, said Balmile, _je nai pas la prtention de maffubler
 dun titre que la mauvaise fortune de mon roi ne me permet pas de porter
 comma il sied_.  _Je mappelle_, _pour vous servir_, _Blair de Balmile
 tout court_.  [My lord, I have not the effrontery to cumber myself with
 a title which the ill fortunes of my king will not suffer me to bear the
 way it should be.  I call myself, at your service, plain Blair of
 Balmile.]
 
 _Monsieur le Vicomte ou monsieur Blr de Balmal_, replied the
 newcomer, _le nom ny fait rien_, _et lon connat vos beaux faits_.
 [The name matters nothing, your gallant actions are known.]
 
 A few more ceremonies, and these three, sitting down together to the
 table, called for wine.  It was the happiness of Marie-Madeleine to wait
 unobserved upon the prince of her desires.  She poured the wine, he drank
 of it; and that link between them seemed to her, for the moment, close as
 a caress.  Though they lowered their tones, she surprised great names
 passing in their conversation, names of kings, the names of de Gesvre and
 Belle-Isle; and the man who dealt in these high matters, and she who was
 now coupled with him in her own thoughts, seemed to swim in mid air in a
 transfiguration.  Love is a crude core, but it has singular and
 far-reaching fringes; in that passionate attraction for the stranger that
 now swayed and mastered her, his harsh incomprehensible language, and
 these names of grandees in his talk, were each an element.
 
 The Frenchman stayed not long, but it was plain he left behind him matter
 of much interest to his companions; they spoke together earnestly, their
 heads down, the woman of the wine-shop totally forgotten; and they were
 still so occupied when Paradou returned.
 
 This mans love was unsleeping.  The even bluster of the mistral, with
 which he had been combating some hours, had not suspended, though it had
 embittered, that predominant passion.  His first look was for his wife, a
 look of hope and suspicion, menace and humility and love, that made the
 over-blooming brute appear for the moment almost beautiful.  She returned
 his glance, at first as though she knew him not, then with a swiftly
 waxing coldness of intent; and at last, without changing their direction,
 she had closed her eyes.
 
 There passed across her mind during that period much that Paradou could
 not have understood had it been told to him in words: chiefly the sense
 of an enlightening contrast betwixt the man who talked of kings and the
 man who kept a wine-shop, betwixt the love she yearned for and that to
 which she had been long exposed like a victim bound upon the altar.
 There swelled upon her, swifter than the Rhone, a tide of abhorrence and
 disgust.  She had succumbed to the monster, humbling herself below
 animals; and now she loved a hero, aspiring to the semi-divine.  It was
 in the pang of that humiliating thought that she had closed her eyes.
 
 Paradouquick as beasts are quick, to translate silencefelt the insult
 through his blood; his inarticulate soul bellowed within him for revenge.
 He glanced about the shop.  He saw the two indifferent gentlemen deep in
 talk, and passed them over: his fancy flying not so high.  There was but
 one other present, a country lout who stood swallowing his wine, equally
 unobserved by all and unobservingto him he dealt a glance of murderous
 suspicion, and turned direct upon his wife.  The wine-shop had lain
 hitherto, a space of shelter, the scene of a few ceremonial passages and
 some whispered conversation, in the howling river of the wind; the clock
 had not yet ticked a score of times since Paradous appearance; and now,
 as he suddenly gave tongue, it seemed as though the mistral had entered
 at his heels.
 
 What ails you, woman? he cried, smiting on the counter.
 
 Nothing ails me, she replied.  It was strange; but she spoke and stood
 at that moment like a lady of degree, drawn upward by her aspirations.
 
 You speak to me, by God, as though you scorned me! cried the husband.
 
 The mans passion was always formidable; she had often looked on upon its
 violence with a thrill, it had been one ingredient in her fascination;
 and she was now surprised to behold him, as from afar off, gesticulating
 but impotent.  His fury might be dangerous like a torrent or a gust of
 wind, but it was inhuman; it might be feared or braved, it should never
 be respected.  And with that there came in her a sudden glow of courage
 and that readiness to die which attends so closely upon all strong
 passions.
 
 I do scorn you, she said.
 
 What is that? he cried.
 
 I scorn you, she repeated, smiling.
 
 You love another man! said he.
 
 With all my soul, was her reply.
 
 The wine-seller roared aloud so that the house rang and shook with it.
 
 Is this the? he cried, using a foul word, common in the South; and he
 seized the young countryman and dashed him to the ground.  There he lay
 for the least interval of time insensible; thence fled from the house,
 the most terrified person in the county.  The heavy measure had escaped
 from his hands, splashing the wine high upon the wall.  Paradou caught
 it.  And you? he roared to his wife, giving her the same name in the
 feminine, and he aimed at her the deadly missile.  She expected it,
 motionless, with radiant eyes.
 
 But before it sped, Paradou was met by another adversary, and the
 unconscious rivals stood confronted.  It was hard to say at that moment
 which appeared the more formidable.  In Paradou, the whole muddy and
 truculent depths of the half-man were stirred to frenzy; the lust of
 destruction raged in him; there was not a feature in his face but it
 talked murder.  Balmile had dropped his cloak: he shone out at once in
 his finery, and stood to his full stature; girt in mind and body all his
 resources, all his temper, perfectly in command in his face the light of
 battle.  Neither spoke; there was no blow nor threat of one; it was war
 reduced to its last element, the spiritual; and the huge wine-seller
 slowly lowered his weapon.  Balmile was a noble, he a commoner; Balmile
 exulted in an honourable cause.  Paradou already perhaps began to be
 ashamed of his violence.  Of a sudden, at least, the tortured brute
 turned and fled from the shop in the footsteps of his former victim, to
 whose continued flight his reappearance added wings.
 
 So soon as Balmile appeared between her husband and herself,
 Marie-Madeleine transferred to him her eyes.  It might be her last
 moment, and she fed upon that face; reading there inimitable courage and
 illimitable valour to protect.  And when the momentary peril was gone by,
 and the champion turned a little awkwardly towards her whom he had
 rescued, it was to meet, and quail before, a gaze of admiration more
 distinct than words.  He bowed, he stammered, his words failed him; he
 who had crossed the floor a moment ago, like a young god, to smite,
 returned like one discomfited; got somehow to his place by the table,
 muffled himself again in his discarded cloak, and for a last touch of the
 ridiculous, seeking for anything to restore his countenance, drank of the
 wine before him, deep as a porter after a heavy lift.  It was little
 wonder if Ballantrae, reading the scene with malevolent eyes, laughed out
 loud and brief, and drank with raised glass, To the champion of the
 Fair.
 
 Marie-Madeleine stood in her old place within the counter; she disdained
 the mocking laughter; it fell on her ears, but it did not reach her
 spirit.  For her, the world of living persons was all resumed again into
 one pair, as in the days of Eden; there was but the one end in life, the
 one hope before her, the one thing needful, the one thing possibleto be
 his.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER ITHE PRINCE
 
 
 That same night there was in the city of Avignon a young man in distress
 of mind.  Now he sat, now walked in a high apartment, full of draughts
 and shadows.  A single candle made the darkness visible; and the light
 scarce sufficed to show upon the wall, where they had been recently and
 rudely nailed, a few miniatures and a copper medal of the young mans
 head.  The same was being sold that year in London, to admiring
 thousands.  The original was fair; he had beautiful brown eyes, a
 beautiful bright open face; a little feminine, a little hard, a little
 weak; still full of the light of youth, but already beginning to be
 vulgarised; a sordid bloom come upon it, the lines coarsened with a touch
 of puffiness.  He was dressed, as for a gala, in peach-colour and silver;
 his breast sparkled with stars and was bright with ribbons; for he had
 held a levee in the afternoon and received a distinguished personage
 incognito.  Now he sat with a bowed head, now walked precipitately to and
 fro, now went and gazed from the uncurtained window, where the wind was
 still blowing, and the lights winked in the darkness.
 
 The bells of Avignon rose into song as he was gazing; and the high notes
 and the deep tossed and drowned, boomed suddenly near or were suddenly
 swallowed up, in the current of the mistral.  Tears sprang in the pale
 blue eyes; the expression of his face was changed to that of a more
 active misery, it seemed as if the voices of the bells reached, and
 touched and pained him, in a waste of vacancy where even pain was
 welcome.  Outside in the night they continued to sound on, swelling and
 fainting; and the listener heard in his memory, as it were their
 harmonies, joy-bells clashing in a northern city, and the acclamations of
 a multitude, the cries of battle, the gross voices of cannon, the stridor
 of an animated life.  And then all died away, and he stood face to face
 with himself in the waste of vacancy, and a horror came upon his mind,
 and a faintness on his brain, such as seizes men upon the brink of
 cliffs.
 
 On the table, by the side of the candle, stood a tray of glasses, a
 bottle, and a silver bell.  He went thither swiftly, then his hand
 lowered first above the bell, then settled on the bottle.  Slowly he
 filled a glass, slowly drank it out; and, as a tide of animal warmth
 recomforted the recesses of his nature, stood there smiling at himself.
 He remembered he was young; the funeral curtains rose, and he saw his
 life shine and broaden and flow out majestically, like a river sunward.
 The smile still on his lips, he lit a second candle and a third; a fire
 stood ready built in a chimney, he lit that also; and the fir-cones and
 the gnarled olive billets were swift to break in flame and to crackle on
 the hearth, and the room brightened and enlarged about him like his
 hopes.  To and fro, to and fro, he went, his hands lightly clasped, his
 breath deeply and pleasurably taken.  Victory walked with him; he marched
 to crowns and empires among shouting followers; glory was his dress.  And
 presently again the shadows closed upon the solitary.  Under the gilt of
 flame and candle-light, the stone walls of the apartment showed down bare
 and cold; behind the depicted triumph loomed up the actual failure:
 defeat, the long distress of the flight, exile, despair, broken
 followers, mourning faces, empty pockets, friends estranged.  The memory
 of his father rose in his mind: he, too, estranged and defied; despair
 sharpened into wrath.  There was one who had led armies in the field, who
 had staked his life upon the family enterprise, a man of action and
 experience, of the open air, the camp, the court, the council-room; and
 he was to accept direction from an old, pompous gentleman in a home in
 Italy, and buzzed about by priests?  A pretty king, if he had not a
 martial son to lean upon!  A king at all?
 
 There was a weaver (of all people) joined me at St. Ninians; he was more
 of a man than my papa! he thought.  I saw him lie doubled in his blood
 and a grenadier below himand he died for my papa!  All died for him, or
 risked the dying, and I lay for him all those months in the rain and
 skulked in heather like a fox; and now he writes me his advice! calls me
 Carlucciome, the man of the house, the only king in that kings race.
 He ground his teeth.  The only king in Europe!  Who else?  Who has done
 and suffered except me? who has lain and run and hidden with his faithful
 subjects, like a second Bruce?  Not my accursed cousin, Louis of France,
 at least, the lewd effeminate traitor!  And filling the glass to the
 brim, he drank a kings damnation.  Ah, if he had the power of Louis,
 what a king were here!
 
 The minutes followed each other into the past, and still he persevered in
 this debilitating cycle of emotions, still fed the fire of his excitement
 with driblets of Rhine wine: a boy at odds with life, a boy with a spark
 of the heroic, which he was now burning out and drowning down in futile
 reverie and solitary excess.
 
 From two rooms beyond, the sudden sound of a raised voice attracted him.
 
 By . . .
 
 
 
 
 HEATHERCAT
 
 
 CHAPTER ITRAQUAIRS OF MONTROYMONT
 
 
 The period of this tale is in the heat of the _killing-time_; the scene
 laid for the most part in solitary hills and morasses, haunted only by
 the so-called Mountain Wanderers, the dragoons that came in chase of
 them, the women that wept on their dead bodies, and the wild birds of the
 moorland that have cried there since the beginning.  It is a land of many
 rain-clouds; a land of much mute history, written there in prehistoric
 symbols.  Strange green raths are to be seen commonly in the country,
 above all by the kirkyards; barrows of the dead, standing stones; beside
 these, the faint, durable footprints and handmarks of the Roman; and an
 antiquity older perhaps than any, and still living and activea complete
 Celtic nomenclature and a scarce-mingled Celtic population.  These rugged
 and grey hills were once included in the boundaries of the Caledonian
 Forest.  Merlin sat here below his apple-tree and lamented Gwendolen;
 here spoke with Kentigern; here fell into his enchanted trance.  And the
 legend of his slumber seems to body forth the story of that Celtic race,
 deprived for so many centuries of their authentic speech, surviving with
 their ancestral inheritance of melancholy perversity and patient,
 unfortunate courage.
 
 The Traquairs of Montroymont (_Mons Romanus_, as the erudite expound it)
 had long held their seat about the head-waters of the Dule and in the
 back parts of the moorland parish of Balweary.  For two hundred years
 they had enjoyed in these upland quarters a certain decency (almost to be
 named distinction) of repute; and the annals of their house, or what is
 remembered of them, were obscure and bloody.  Ninian Traquair was
 cruallie slochtered by the Crozers at the kirk-door of Balweary, anno
 1482.  Francis killed Simon Ruthven of Drumshoreland, anno 1540; bought
 letters of slayers at the widow and heir, and, by a barbarous form of
 compounding, married (without tocher) Simons daughter Grizzel, which is
 the way the Traquairs and Ruthvens came first to an intermarriage.  About
 the last Traquair and Ruthven marriage, it is the business of this book,
 among many other things, to tell.
 
 The Traquairs were always strong for the Covenant; for the King also, but
 the Covenant first; and it began to be ill days for Montroymont when the
 Bishops came in and the dragoons at the heels of them.  Ninian (then
 laird) was an anxious husband of himself and the property, as the times
 required, and it may be said of him, that he lost both.  He was heavily
 suspected of the Pentland Hills rebellion.  When it came the length of
 Bothwell Brig, he stood his trial before the Secret Council, and was
 convicted of talking with some insurgents by the wayside, the subject of
 the conversation not very clearly appearing, and of the reset and
 maintenance of one Gale, a gardener man, who was seen before Bothwell
 with a musket, and afterwards, for a continuance of months, delved the
 garden at Montroymont.  Matters went very ill with Ninian at the Council;
 some of the lords were clear for treason; and even the boot was talked
 of.  But he was spared that torture; and at last, having pretty good
 friendship among great men, he came off with a fine of seven thousand
 marks, that caused the estate to groan.  In this case, as in so many
 others, it was the wife that made the trouble.  She was a great keeper of
 conventicles; would ride ten miles to one, and when she was fined,
 rejoiced greatly to suffer for the Kirk; but it was rather her husband
 that suffered.  She had their only son, Francis, baptized privately by
 the hands of Mr. Kidd; there was that much the more to pay for!  She
 could neither be driven nor wiled into the parish kirk; as for taking the
 sacrament at the hands of any Episcopalian curate, and tenfold more at
 those of Curate Haddo, there was nothing further from her purposes; and
 Montroymont had to put his hand in his pocket month by month and year by
 year.  Once, indeed, the little lady was cast in prison, and the laird,
 worthy, heavy, uninterested man, had to ride up and take her place; from
 which he was not discharged under nine months and a sharp fine.  It
 scarce seemed she had any gratitude to him; she came out of gaol herself,
 and plunged immediately deeper in conventicles, resetting recusants, and
 all her old, expensive folly, only with greater vigour and openness,
 because Montroymont was safe in the Tolbooth and she had no witness to
 consider.  When he was liberated and came back, with his fingers singed,
 in December 1680, and late in the black night, my lady was from home.  He
 came into the house at his alighting, with a riding-rod yet in his hand;
 and, on the servant-maid telling him, caught her by the scruff of the
 neck, beat her violently, flung her down in the passageway, and went
 upstairs to his bed fasting and without a light.  It was three in the
 morning when my lady returned from that conventicle, and, hearing of the
 assault (because the maid had sat up for her, weeping), went to their
 common chamber with a lantern in hand and stamping with her shoes so as
 to wake the dead; it was supposed, by those that heard her, from a design
 to have it out with the good man at once.  The house-servants gathered on
 the stair, because it was a main interest with them to know which of
 these two was the better horse; and for the space of two hours they were
 heard to go at the matter, hammer and tongs.  Montroymont alleged he was
 at the end of possibilities; it was no longer within his power to pay the
 annual rents; she had served him basely by keeping conventicles while he
 lay in prison for her sake; his friends were weary, and there was nothing
 else before him but the entire loss of the family lands, and to begin
 life again by the wayside as a common beggar.  She took him up very sharp
 and high: called upon him, if he were a Christian? and which he most
 considered, the loss of a few dirty, miry glebes, or of his soul?
 Presently he was heard to weep, and my ladys voice to go on continually
 like a running burn, only the words indistinguishable; whereupon it was
 supposed a victory for her ladyship, and the domestics took themselves to
 bed.  The next day Traquair appeared like a man who had gone under the
 harrows; and his lady wife thenceforward continued in her old course
 without the least deflection.
 
 Thenceforward Ninian went on his way without complaint, and suffered his
 wife to go on hers without remonstrance.  He still minded his estate, of
 which it might be said he took daily a fresh farewell, and counted it
 already lost; looking ruefully on the acres and the graves of his
 fathers, on the moorlands where the wild-fowl consorted, the low,
 gurgling pool of the trout, and the high, windy place of the calling
 curlewsthings that were yet his for the day and would be anothers
 to-morrow; coming back again, and sitting ciphering till the dusk at his
 approaching ruin, which no device of arithmetic could postpone beyond a
 year or two.  He was essentially the simple ancient man, the farmer and
 landholder; he would have been content to watch the seasons come and go,
 and his cattle increase, until the limit of age; he would have been
 content at any time to die, if he could have left the estates
 undiminished to an heir-male of his ancestors, that duty standing first
 in his instinctive calendar.  And now he saw everywhere the image of the
 new proprietor come to meet him, and go sowing and reaping, or fowling
 for his pleasure on the red moors, or eating the very gooseberries in the
 Place garden; and saw always, on the other hand, the figure of Francis go
 forth, a beggar, into the broad world.
 
 It was in vain the poor gentleman sought to moderate; took every test and
 took advantage of every indulgence; went and drank with the dragoons in
 Balweary; attended the communion and came regularly to the church to
 Curate Haddo, with his son beside him.  The mad, raging, Presbyterian
 zealot of a wife at home made all of no avail; and indeed the house must
 have fallen years before if it had not been for the secret indulgence of
 the curate, who had a great sympathy with the laird, and winked hard at
 the doings in Montroymont.  This curate was a man very ill reputed in the
 countryside, and indeed in all Scotland.  Infamous Haddo is Shields
 expression.  But Patrick Walker is more copious.  Curate Hall Haddo,
 says he, _sub voce_ Peden, or _Hell_ Haddo, as he was more justly to be
 called, a pokeful of old condemned errors and the filthy vile lusts of
 the flesh, a published whore-monger, a common gross drunkard, continually
 and godlessly scraping and skirling on a fiddle, continually breathing
 flames against the remnant of Israel.  But the Lord put an end to his
 piping, and all these offences were composed into one bloody grave.  No
 doubt this was written to excuse his slaughter; and I have never heard it
 claimed for Walker that he was either a just witness or an indulgent
 judge.  At least, in a merely human character, Haddo comes off not wholly
 amiss in the matter of these Traquairs: not that he showed any graces of
 the Christian, but had a sort of Pagan decency, which might almost tempt
 one to be concerned about his sudden, violent, and unprepared fate.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIFRANCIE
 
 
 Francie was eleven years old, shy, secret, and rather childish of his
 age, though not backward in schooling, which had been pushed on far by a
 private governor, one MBrair, a forfeited minister harboured in that
 capacity at Montroymont.  The boy, already much employed in secret by his
 mother, was the most apt hand conceivable to run upon a message, to carry
 food to lurking fugitives, or to stand sentry on the skyline above a
 conventicle.  It seemed no place on the moorlands was so naked but what
 he would find cover there; and as he knew every hag, boulder, and
 heather-bush in a circuit of seven miles about Montroymont, there was
 scarce any spot but what he could leave or approach it unseen.  This
 dexterity had won him a reputation in that part of the country; and among
 the many children employed in these dangerous affairs, he passed under
 the by-name of Heathercat.
 
 How much his father knew of this employment might be doubted.  He took
 much forethought for the boys future, seeing he was like to be left so
 poorly, and would sometimes assist at his lessons, sighing heavily,
 yawning deep, and now and again patting Francie on the shoulder if he
 seemed to be doing ill, by way of a private, kind encouragement.  But a
 great part of the day was passed in aimless wanderings with his eyes
 sealed, or in his cabinet sitting bemused over the particulars of the
 coming bankruptcy; and the boy would be absent a dozen times for once
 that his father would observe it.
 
 On 2nd of July 1682 the boy had an errand from his mother, which must be
 kept private from all, the father included in the first of them.
 Crossing the braes, he hears the clatter of a horses shoes, and claps
 down incontinent in a hag by the wayside.  And presently he spied his
 father come riding from one direction, and Curate Haddo walking from
 another; and Montroymont leaning down from the saddle, and Haddo getting
 on his toes (for he was a little, ruddy, bald-pated man, more like a
 dwarf), they greeted kindly, and came to a halt within two fathoms of the
 child.
 
 Montroymont, the curate said, the deils in t but Ill have to
 denunciate your leddy again.
 
 Deils in t indeed! says the laird.
 
 Man! can ye no induce her to come to the kirk? pursues Haddo; or to a
 communion at the least of it?  For the conventicles, let be! and the same
 for yon solemn fule, MBrair: I can blink at them.  But shes got to come
 to the kirk, Montroymont.
 
 Dinna speak of it, says the laird.  I can do nothing with her.
 
 Couldnt ye try the stick to her? it works wonders whiles, suggested
 Haddo.  No?  Im wae to hear it.  And I suppose ye ken where youre
 going?
 
 Fine! said Montroymont.  Fine do I ken where: bankrupcy and the Bass
 Rock!
 
 Praise to my bones that I never married! cried the curate.  Well, its
 a grievous thing to me to see an auld house dung down that was here
 before Flodden Field.  But naebody can say it was with my wish.
 
 No more they can, Haddo! says the laird.  A good friend yeve been to
 me, first and last.  I can give you that character with a clear
 conscience.
 
 Whereupon they separated, and Montroymont rode briskly down into the Dule
 Valley.  But of the curate Francis was not to be quit so easily.  He went
 on with his little, brisk steps to the corner of a dyke, and stopped and
 whistled and waved upon a lassie that was herding cattle there.  This
 Janet MClour was a big lass, being taller than the curate; and what made
 her look the more so, she was kilted very high.  It seemed for a while
 she would not come, and Francie heard her calling Haddo a daft auld
 fule, and saw her running and dodging him among the whins and hags till
 he was fairly blown.  But at the last he gets a bottle from his
 plaid-neuk and holds it up to her; whereupon she came at once into a
 composition, and the pair sat, drinking of the bottle, and daffing and
 laughing together, on a mound of heather.  The boy had scarce heard of
 these vanities, or he might have been minded of a nymph and satyr, if
 anybody could have taken long-leggit Janet for a nymph.  But they seemed
 to be huge friends, he thought; and was the more surprised, when the
 curate had taken his leave, to see the lassie fling stones after him with
 screeches of laughter, and Haddo turn about and caper, and shake his
 staff at her, and laugh louder than herself.  A wonderful merry pair,
 they seemed; and when Francie had crawled out of the hag, he had a great
 deal to consider in his mind.  It was possible they were all fallen in
 error about Mr. Haddo, he reflectedhaving seen him so tender with
 Montroymont, and so kind and playful with the lass Janet; and he had a
 temptation to go out of his road and question her herself upon the
 matter.  But he had a strong spirit of duty on him; and plodded on
 instead over the braes till he came near the House of Cairngorm.  There,
 in a hollow place by the burnside that was shaded by some birks, he was
 aware of a barefoot boy, perhaps a matter of three years older than
 himself.  The two approached with the precautions of a pair of strange
 dogs, looking at each other queerly.
 
 Its ill weather on the hills, said the stranger, giving the watchword.
 
 For a season, said Francie, but the Lord will appear.
 
 Richt, said the barefoot boy; whare ye frae?
 
 The Leddy Montroymont, says Francie.
 
 Hae, then! says the stranger, and handed him a folded paper, and they
 stood and looked at each other again.  Its unco het, said the boy.
 
 Dooms het, says Francie.
 
 What do they ca ye? says the other.
 
 Francie, says he.  Im young Montroymont.  They ca me Heathercat.
 
 Im Jock Crozer, said the boy.  And there was another pause, while each
 rolled a stone under his foot.
 
 Cast your jaiket and Ill fecht ye for a bawbee, cried the elder boy
 with sudden violence, and dramatically throwing back his jacket.
 
 Na, Ive nae time the now, said Francie, with a sharp thrill of alarm,
 because Crozer was much the heavier boy.
 
 Yere feared.  Heathercat indeed! said Crozer, for among this infantile
 army of spies and messengers, the fame of Crozer had gone forth and was
 resented by his rivals.  And with that they separated.
 
 On his way home Francie was a good deal occupied with the recollection of
 this untoward incident.  The challenge had been fairly offered and basely
 refused: the tale would be carried all over the country, and the lustre
 of the name of Heathercat be dimmed.  But the scene between Curate Haddo
 and Janet MClour had also given him much to think of: and he was still
 puzzling over the case of the curate, and why such ill words were said of
 him, and why, if he were so merry-spirited, he should yet preach so dry,
 when coming over a knowe, whom should he see but Janet, sitting with her
 back to him, minding her cattle!  He was always a great child for secret,
 stealthy ways, having been employed by his mother on errands when the
 same was necessary; and he came behind the lass without her hearing.
 
 Jennet, says he.
 
 Keep me, cries Janet, springing up.  O, its you, Maister Francie!
 Save us, what a fricht ye gied me.
 
 Ay, its me, said Francie.  Ive been thinking, Jennet; I saw you and
 the curate a while back
 
 Brat! cried Janet, and coloured up crimson; and the one moment made as
 if she would have stricken him with a ragged stick she had to chase her
 bestial with, and the next was begging and praying that he would mention
 it to none.  It was naebodys business, whatever, she said; it would
 just start a clash in the country; and there would be nothing left for
 her but to drown herself in Dule Water.
 
 Why? says Francie.
 
 The girl looked at him and grew scarlet again.
 
 And it isna that, anyway, continued Francie.  It was just that he
 seemed so good to yelike our Father in heaven, I thought; and I thought
 that mebbe, perhaps, we had all been wrong about him from the first.  But
 Ill have to tell Mr. MBrair; Im under a kind of a bargain to him to
 tell him all.
 
 Tell it to the divil if ye like for me! cried the lass.  Ive naething
 to be ashamed of.  Tell MBrair to mind his ain affairs, she cried
 again: theyll be hot eneugh for him, if Haddie likes!  And so strode
 off, shoving her beasts before her, and ever and again looking back and
 crying angry words to the boy, where he stood mystified.
 
 By the time he had got home his mind was made up that he would say
 nothing to his mother.  My Lady Montroymont was in the keeping-room,
 reading a godly book; she was a wonderful frail little wife to make so
 much noise in the world and be able to steer about that patient sheep her
 husband; her eyes were like sloes, the fingers of her hands were like
 tobacco-pipe shanks, her mouth shut tight like a trap; and even when she
 was the most serious, and still more when she was angry, there hung about
 her face the terrifying semblance of a smile.
 
 Have ye gotten the billet, Francie said she; and when he had handed it
 over, and she had read and burned it, Did you see anybody? she asked.
 
 I saw the laird, said Francie.
 
 He didna see you, though? asked his mother.
 
 Deil a fear, from Francie.
 
 Francie! she cried.  Whats that I hear? an aith?  The Lord forgive
 me, have I broughten forth a brand for the burning, a fagot for
 hell-fire?
 
 Im very sorry, maam, said Francie.  I humbly beg the Lords pardon,
 and yours, for my wickedness.
 
 Hm, grunted the lady.  Did ye see nobody else?
 
 No, maam, said Francie, with the face of an angel, except Jock
 Crozer, that gied me the billet.
 
 Jock Crozer! cried the lady.  Ill Crozer them!  Crozers indeed!  What
 next?  Are we to repose the lives of a suffering remnant in Crozers?  The
 whole clan of them wants hanging, and if I had my way of it, they wouldna
 want it long.  Are you aware, sir, that these Crozers killed your
 forebear at the kirk-door?
 
 You see, he was bigger n me, said Francie.
 
 Jock Crozer! continued the lady.  Thatll be Clements son, the
 biggest thief and reiver in the country-side.  To trust a note to him!
 But Ill give the benefit of my opinions to Lady Whitecross when we two
 forgather.  Let her look to herself!  I have no patience with
 half-hearted carlines, that complies on the Lords day morning with the
 kirk, and comes taigling the same night to the conventicle.  The one or
 the other! is what I say: hell or heavenHaddies abominations or the
 pure word of God dreeping from the lips of Mr. Arnot,
 
     Like honey from the honeycomb
        That dreepeth, sweeter far.
 
 My lady was now fairly launched, and that upon two congenial subjects:
 the deficiencies of the Lady Whitecross and the turpitudes of the whole
 Crozer racewhich, indeed, had never been conspicuous for respectability.
 She pursued the pair of them for twenty minutes on the clock with
 wonderful animation and detail, something of the pulpit manner, and the
 spirit of one possessed.  O hellish compliance! she exclaimed.  I
 would not suffer a complier to break bread with Christian folk.  Of all
 the sins of this day there is not one so God-defying, so
 Christ-humiliating, as damnable compliance: the boy standing before her
 meanwhile, and brokenly pursuing other thoughts, mainly of Haddo and
 Janet, and Jock Crozer stripping off his jacket.  And yet, with all his
 distraction, it might be argued that he heard too much: his father and
 himself being compliersthat is to say, attending the church of the
 parish as the law required.
 
 Presently, the ladys passion beginning to decline, or her flux of ill
 words to be exhausted, she dismissed her audience.  Francie bowed low,
 left the room, closed the door behind him: and then turned him about in
 the passage-way, and with a low voice, but a prodigious deal of
 sentiment, repeated the name of the evil one twenty times over, to the
 end of which, for the greater efficacy, he tacked on damnable and
 hellish.  _Fas est ab hoste doceri_disrespect is made more pungent by
 quotation; and there is no doubt but he felt relieved, and went upstairs
 into his tutors chamber with a quiet mind.  MBrair sat by the cheek of
 the peat-fire and shivered, for he had a quartan ague and this was his
 day.  The great night-cap and plaid, the dark unshaven cheeks of the man,
 and the white, thin hands that held the plaid about his chittering body,
 made a sorrowful picture.  But Francie knew and loved him; came straight
 in, nestled close to the refugee, and told his story.  MBrair had been
 at the College with Haddo; the Presbytery had licensed both on the same
 day; and at this tale, told with so much innocency by the boy, the heart
 of the tutor was commoved.
 
 Woe upon him!  Woe upon that man! he cried.  O the unfaithful
 shepherd!  O the hireling and apostate minister!  Make my matters hot for
 me? quo she! the shameless limmer!  And true it is, that he could repose
 me in that nasty, stinking hole, the Canongate Tolbooth, from which your
 mother drew me outthe Lord reward her for it!or to that cold, unbieldy,
 marine place of the Bass Rock, which, with my delicate kist, would be
 fair ruin to me.  But I will be valiant in my Masters service.  I have a
 duty here: a duty to my God, to myself, and to Haddo: in His strength, I
 will perform it.
 
 Then he straitly discharged Francie to repeat the tale, and bade him in
 the future to avert his very eyes from the doings of the curate.  You
 must go to his place of idolatry; look upon him there! says he, but
 nowhere else.  Avert your eyes, close your ears, pass him by like a three
 days corp.  He is like that damnable monster Basiliscus, which
 defilesyea, poisons!by the sight.All which was hardly claratory to
 the boys mind.
 
 Presently Montroymont came home, and called up the stairs to Francie.
 Traquair was a good shot and swordsman: and it was his pleasure to walk
 with his son over the braes of the moorfowl, or to teach him arms in the
 back court, when they made a mighty comely pair, the child being so lean,
 and light, and active, and the laird himself a man of a manly, pretty
 stature, his hair (the periwig being laid aside) showing already white
 with many anxieties, and his face of an even, flaccid red.  But this day
 Francies heart was not in the fencing.
 
 Sir, says he, suddenly lowering his point, will ye tell me a thing if
 I was to ask it?
 
 Ask away, says the father.
 
 Well, its this, said Francie: Why do you and me comply if its so
 wicked?
 
 Ay, ye have the cant of it too! cries Montroymont.  But Ill tell ye
 for all that.  Its to try and see if we can keep the rigging on this
 house, Francie.  If she had her way, we would be beggar-folk, and hold
 our hands out by the wayside.  When ye hear herwhen ye hear folk, he
 corrected himself briskly, call me a coward, and one that betrayed the
 Lord, and I kenna what else, just mind it was to keep a bed to ye to
 sleep in and a bite for ye to eat.On guard! he cried, and the lesson
 proceeded again till they were called to supper.
 
 Theres another thing yet, said Francie, stopping his father.  Theres
 another thing that I am not sure that I am very caring for.  Sheshe
 sends me errands.
 
 Obey her, then, as is your bounden duty, said Traquair.
 
 Ay, but wait till I tell ye, says the boy.  If I was to see you I was
 to hide.
 
 Montroymont sighed.  Well, and thats good of her too, said he.  The
 less that I ken of thir doings the better for me; and the best thing you
 can do is just to obey her, and see and be a good son to her, the same as
 ye are to me, Francie.
 
 At the tenderness of this expression the heart of Francie swelled within
 his bosom, and his remorse was poured out.  Faither! he cried, I said
 deil to-day; manys the time I said it, and _damnable_ too, and
 _hellitsh_.  I ken theyre all right; theyre beeblical.  But I didna say
 them beeblically; I said them for sweir wordsthats the truth of it.
 
 Hout, ye silly bairn! said the father, dinna do it nae mair, and come
 in by to your supper.  And he took the boy, and drew him close to him a
 moment, as they went through the door, with something very fond and
 secret, like a caress between a pair of lovers.
 
 The next day MBrair was abroad in the afternoon, and had a long advising
 with Janet on the braes where she herded cattle.  What passed was never
 wholly known; but the lass wept bitterly, and fell on her knees to him
 among the whins.  The same night, as soon as it was dark, he took the
 road again for Balweary.  In the Kirkton, where the dragoons quartered,
 he saw many lights, and heard the noise of a ranting song and people
 laughing grossly, which was highly offensive to his mind.  He gave it the
 wider berth, keeping among fields; and came down at last by the
 water-side, where the manse stands solitary between the river and the
 road.  He tapped at the back door, and the old woman called upon him to
 come in, and guided him through the house to the study, as they still
 called it, though there was little enough study there in Haddos days,
 and more song-books than theology.
 
 Heres yin to speak wi ye, Mr. Haddie! cries the old wife.
 
 And MBrair, opening the door and entering, found the little, round, red
 man seated in one chair and his feet upon another.  A clear fire and a
 tallow dip lighted him barely.  He was taking tobacco in a pipe, and
 smiling to himself; and a brandy-bottle and glass, and his fiddle and
 bow, were beside him on the table.
 
 Hech, Patey MBriar, is this you? said he, a trifle tipsily.  Step in
 by, man, and have a drop brandy: for the stomachs sake!  Even the deil
 can quote Scriptureeh, Patey?
 
 I will neither eat nor drink with you, replied MBrair.  I am come
 upon my Masters errand: woe be upon me if I should anyways mince the
 same.  Hall Haddo, I summon you to quit this kirk which you encumber.
 
 Muckle obleeged! says Haddo, winking.
 
 You and me have been to kirk and market together, pursued MBrair; we
 have had blessed seasons in the kirk, we have sat in the same
 teaching-rooms and read in the same book; and I know you still retain for
 me some carnal kindness.  It would be my shame if I denied it; I live
 here at your mercy and by your favour, and glory to acknowledge it.  You
 have pity on my wretched body, which is but grass, and must soon be
 trodden under: but O, Haddo! how much greater is the yearning with which
 I yearn after and pity your immortal soul!  Come now, let us reason
 together!  I drop all points of controversy, weighty though these be; I
 take your defaced and damnified kirk on your own terms; and I ask you,
 Are you a worthy minister?  The communion season approaches; how can you
 pronounce thir solemn words, The elders will now bring forrit the
 elements, and not quail?  A parishioner may be summoned to-night; you
 may have to rise from your miserable orgies; and I ask you, Haddo, what
 does your conscience tell you?  Are you fit?  Are you fit to smooth the
 pillow of a parting Christian?  And if the summons should be for
 yourself, how then?
 
 Haddo was startled out of all composure and the better part of his
 temper.  Whats this of it? he cried.  Im no waur than my neebours.
 I never set up to be speeritual; I never did.  Im a plain, canty
 creature; godliness is cheerfulness, says I; give me my fiddle and a
 dram, and I wouldna hairm a flee.
 
 And I repeat my question, said MBrair: Are you fitfit for this great
 charge? fit to carry and save souls?
 
 Fit?  Blethers!  As fits yoursel, cried Haddo.
 
 Are you so great a self-deceiver? said MBrair.  Wretched man,
 trampler upon Gods covenants, crucifier of your Lord afresh.  I will
 ding you to the earth with one word: How about the young woman, Janet
 MClour?
 
 Weel, what about her? what do I ken? cries Haddo.  MBrair, ye daft
 auld wife, I tell ye as trues truth, I never meddled her.  It was just
 daffing, I tell ye: daffing, and nae mair: a piece of fun, like!  Im no
 denying but what Im fond of fun, sma blame to me!  But for onything
 sarioushout, man, it might come to a deposeetion!  Ill sweir it to ye.
 Wheres a Bible, till you hear me sweir?
 
 There is nae Bible in your study, said MBrair severely.
 
 And Haddo, after a few distracted turns, was constrained to accept the
 fact.
 
 Weel, and suppose there isna? he cried, stamping.  What mair can ye
 say of us, but just that Im fond of my joke, and sos she?  I declare to
 God, by what I ken, she might be the Virgin Maryif she would just keep
 clear of the dragoons.  But me! na, deil haet o me!
 
 She is penitent at least, says MBrair.
 
 Do you mean to actually up and tell me to my face that she accused me?
 cried the curate.
 
 I canna just say that, replied MBrair.  But I rebuked her in the name
 of God, and she repented before me on her bended knees.
 
 Weel, I daursay shes been ower far wi the dragoons, said Haddo.  I
 never denied that.  I ken naething by it.
 
 Man, you but show your nakedness the more plainly, said MBrair.
 Poor, blind, besotted creatureand I see you stoytering on the brink of
 dissolution: your light out, and your hours numbered.  Awake, man! he
 shouted with a formidable voice, awake, or it be ower late.
 
 Be damned if I stand this! exclaimed Haddo, casting his tobacco-pipe
 violently on the table, where it was smashed in pieces.  Out of my house
 with ye, or Ill call for the dragoons.
 
 The speerit of the Lord is upon me, said MBrair with solemn ecstasy.
 I sist you to compear before the Great White Throne, and I warn you the
 summons shall be bloody and sudden.
 
 And at this, with more agility than could have been expected, he got
 clear of the room and slammed the door behind him in the face of the
 pursuing curate.  The next Lords day the curate was ill, and the kirk
 closed, but for all his ill words, Mr. MBrair abode unmolested in the
 house of Montroymont.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIITHE HILL-END OF DRUMLOWE
 
 
 This was a bit of a steep broken hill that overlooked upon the west a
 moorish valley, full of ink-black pools.  These presently drained into a
 burn that made off, with little noise and no celerity of pace, about the
 corner of the hill.  On the far side the ground swelled into a bare
 heath, black with junipers, and spotted with the presence of the standing
 stones for which the place was famous.  They were many in that part,
 shapeless, white with lichenyou would have said with age: and had made
 their abode there for untold centuries, since first the heathens shouted
 for their installation.  The ancients had hallowed them to some ill
 religion, and their neighbourhood had long been avoided by the prudent
 before the fall of day; but of late, on the upspringing of new
 requirements, these lonely stones on the moor had again become a place of
 assembly.  A watchful picket on the Hill-end commanded all the northern
 and eastern approaches; and such was the disposition of the ground, that
 by certain cunningly posted sentries the west also could be made secure
 against surprise: there was no place in the country where a conventicle
 could meet with more quiet of mind or a more certain retreat open, in the
 case of interference from the dragoons.  The minister spoke from a knowe
 close to the edge of the ring, and poured out the words God gave him on
 the very threshold of the devils of yore.  When they pitched a tent
 (which was often in wet weather, upon a communion occasion) it was rigged
 over the huge isolated pillar that had the name of Anes-Errand, none knew
 why.  And the congregation sat partly clustered on the slope below, and
 partly among the idolatrous monoliths and on the turfy soil of the Ring
 itself.  In truth the situation was well qualified to give a zest to
 Christian doctrines, had there been any wanted.  But these congregations
 assembled under conditions at once so formidable and romantic as made a
 zealot of the most cold.  They were the last of the faithful; God, who
 had averted His face from all other countries of the world, still leaned
 from heaven to observe, with swelling sympathy, the doings of His
 moorland remnant; Christ was by them with His eternal wounds, with
 dropping tears; the Holy Ghost (never perfectly realised nor firmly
 adopted by Protestant imaginations) was dimly supposed to be in the heart
 of each and on the lips of the minister.  And over against them was the
 army of the hierarchies, from the men Charles and James Stuart, on to
 King Lewie and the Emperor; and the scarlet Pope, and the muckle black
 devil himself, peering out the red mouth of hell in an ecstasy of hate
 and hope.  One pull more! he seemed to cry; one pull more, and its
 done.  Theres only Clydesdale and the Stewartry, and the three
 Bailiaries of Ayr, left for God.  And with such an august assistance of
 powers and principalities looking on at the last conflict of good and
 evil, it was scarce possible to spare a thought to those old, infirm,
 debile, _ab agendo_ devils whose holy place they were now violating.
 
 There might have been three hundred to four hundred present.  At least
 there were three hundred horses tethered for the most part in the ring;
 though some of the hearers on the outskirts of the crowd stood with their
 bridles in their hand, ready to mount at the first signal.  The circle of
 faces was strangely characteristic; long, serious, strongly marked, the
 tackle standing out in the lean brown cheeks, the mouth set and the eyes
 shining with a fierce enthusiasm; the shepherd, the labouring man, and
 the rarer laird, stood there in their broad blue bonnets or laced hats,
 and presenting an essential identity of type.  From time to time a
 long-drawn groan of adhesion rose in this audience, and was propagated
 like a wave to the outskirts, and died away among the keepers of the
 horses.  It had a name; it was called a holy groan.
 
 A squall came up; a great volley of flying mist went out before it and
 whelmed the scene; the wind stormed with a sudden fierceness that carried
 away the ministers voice and twitched his tails and made him stagger,
 and turned the congregation for a moment into a mere pother of blowing
 plaid-ends and prancing horses; and the rain followed and was dashed
 straight into their faces.  Men and women panted aloud in the shock of
 that violent shower-bath; the teeth were bared along all the line in an
 involuntary grimace; plaids, mantles, and riding-coats were proved vain,
 and the worshippers felt the water stream on their naked flesh.  The
 minister, reinforcing his great and shrill voice, continued to contend
 against and triumph over the rising of the squall and the dashing of the
 rain.
 
 In that day ye may go thirty mile and not hear a crawing cock, he said;
 and fifty mile and not get a light to your pipe; and an hundred mile and
 not see a smoking house.  For therell be naething in all Scotland but
 deid mens banes and blackness, and the living anger of the Lord.  O,
 where to find a bieldO sirs, where to find a bield from the wind of the
 Lords anger?  Do ye call _this_ a wind?  Bethankit!  Sirs, this is but a
 temporary dispensation; this is but a puff of wind, this is but a spit of
 rain and by with it.  Already theres a blue bow in the west, and the sun
 will take the crown of the causeway again, and your thingsll be dried
 upon ye, and your flesh will be warm upon your bones.  But O, sirs, sirs!
 for the day of the Lords anger!
 
 His rhetoric was set forth with an ear-piercing elocution, and a voice
 that sometimes crashed like cannon.  Such as it was, it was the gift of
 all hill-preachers, to a singular degree of likeness or identity.  Their
 images scarce ranged beyond the red horizon of the moor and the rainy
 hill-top, the shepherd and his sheep, a fowling-piece, a spade, a pipe, a
 dunghill, a crowing cock, the shining and the withdrawal of the sun.  An
 occasional pathos of simple humanity, and frequent patches of big
 Biblical words, relieved the homely tissue.  It was a poetry apart;
 bleak, austere, but genuine, and redolent of the soil.
 
 A little before the coming of the squall there was a different scene
 enacting at the outposts.  For the most part, the sentinels were faithful
 to their important duty; the Hill-end of Drumlowe was known to be a safe
 meeting-place; and the out-pickets on this particular day had been
 somewhat lax from the beginning, and grew laxer during the inordinate
 length of the discourse.  Francie lay there in his appointed hiding-hole,
 looking abroad between two whin-bushes.  His view was across the course
 of the burn, then over a piece of plain moorland, to a gap between two
 hills; nothing moved but grouse, and some cattle who slowly traversed his
 field of view, heading northward: he heard the psalms, and sang words of
 his own to the savage and melancholy music; for he had his own design in
 hand, and terror and cowardice prevailed in his bosom alternately, like
 the hot and the cold fit of an ague.  Courage was uppermost during the
 singing, which he accompanied through all its length with this impromptu
 strain:
 
     And I will ding Jock Crozer down
        No later than the day.
 
 Presently the voice of the preacher came to him in wafts, at the winds
 will, as by the opening and shutting of a door; wild spasms of screaming,
 as of some undiscerned gigantic hill-bird stirred with inordinate
 passion, succeeded to intervals of silence; and Francie heard them with a
 critical ear.  Ay, he thought at last, hell do; he has the bit in his
 mou fairly.
 
 He had observed that his friend, or rather his enemy, Jock Crozer, had
 been established at a very critical part of the line of outposts; namely,
 where the burn issues by an abrupt gorge from the semicircle of high
 moors.  If anything was calculated to nerve him to battle it was this.
 The post was important; next to the Hill-end itself, it might be called
 the key to the position; and it was where the cover was bad, and in which
 it was most natural to place a child.  It should have been Heathercats;
 why had it been given to Crozer?  An exquisite fear of what should be the
 answer passed through his marrow every time he faced the question.  Was
 it possible that Crozer could have boasted? that there were rumours
 abroad to hisHeathercatsdiscredit? that his honour was publicly
 sullied?  All the world went dark about him at the thought; he sank
 without a struggle into the midnight pool of despair; and every time he
 so sank, he brought back with himnot drowned heroism indeed, but
 half-drowned courage by the locks.  His heart beat very slowly as he
 deserted his station, and began to crawl towards that of Crozer.
 Something pulled him back, and it was not the sense of duty, but a
 remembrance of Crozers build and hateful readiness of fist.  Duty, as he
 conceived it, pointed him forward on the rueful path that he was
 travelling.  Duty bade him redeem his name if he were able, at the risk
 of broken bones; and his bones and every tooth in his head ached by
 anticipation.  An awful subsidiary fear whispered him that if he were
 hurt, he should disgrace himself by weeping.  He consoled himself,
 boy-like, with the consideration that he was not yet committed; he could
 easily steal over unseen to Crozers post, and he had a continuous
 private idea that he would very probably steal back again.  His course
 took him so near the minister that he could hear some of his words: What
 news, minister, of Claverse?  Hes going round like a roaring rampaging
 lion. . . .
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                 * * * * *
 
          Printed by T. and A. CONSTABLE, Printers to His Majesty
                     at the Edinburgh University Press.
 
 
 
 
 Footnotes:
 
 
 {0}  With special reference to _Father Damien_, pp. 6381.
 
 {65}  From the Sydney _Presbyterian_, October 26, 1889.
 
 {85}  _Theater of Mortality_, p. 10; Edin. 1713.
 
 {86}  _History of My Own Times_, beginning 1660, by Bishop Gilbert
 Burnet, p. 158.
 
 {87a}  Wodrows _Church History_, Book II. chap. i. sect. I.
 
 {87b}  Crookshanks _Church History_, 1751, second ed. p. 202.
 
 {88}  Burnet, p. 348.
 
 {89}  _Fullers Historie of the Holy Warre_, fourth ed. 1651.
 
 {90}  Wodrow, vol. ii. p. 17.
 
 {92}  Sir J. Turners _Memoirs_, pp. 14850.
 
 {93}  _A Cloud of Witnesses_, p. 376.
 
 {94a}  Wodrow, pp. 19, 20.
 
 {94b}  _A Hind Let Loose_, p. 123.
 
 {95}  Turner, p. 163.
 
 {96a}  Turner, p. 198.
 
 {96b}  _Ibid._ p. 167.
 
 {97}  Wodrow, p. 29.
 
 {98}  Turner, Wodrow, and _Church History_ by James Kirkton, an outed
 minister of the period.
 
 {99}  Kirkton, p. 244.
 
 {101a}  Kirkton.
 
 {101b}  Turner.
 
 {102}  Kirkton.
 
 {103}  Kirkton.
 
 {104}  _Cloud of Witnesses_, p. 389; Edin. 1765.
 
 {105a}  Kirkton, p. 247.
 
 {105b}  Ibid. p. 254.
 
 {105c}  _Ibid._ p. 247.
 
 {105d}  _Ibid._ pp. 247, 248.
 
 {106}  Kirkton, p. 248.
 
 {107a}  Kirkton, p. 249.
 
 {107b}  _Naphtali_, p. 205; Glasgow, 1721.
 
 {107c}  Wodrow, p. 59.
 
 {108a}  Kirkton, p. 246.
 
 {108b}  Defoes _History of the Church of Scotland_.
 
 {151}  This paper was written in collaboration with James Waiter
 Ferrier, and if reprinted this is to be stated, though his principal
 collaboration was to lie back in an easy-chair and laugh.[R.L.S., Oct.
 25, 1894.]
 
 {183}  The illustrator was, in fact, a lady, Miss Eunice Bagster, eldest
 daughter of the publisher, Samuel Bagster; except in the case of the cuts
 depicting the fight with Apollyon, which were designed by her brother,
 Mr. Jonathan Bagster.  The edition was published in 1845.  I am indebted
 for this information to the kindness of Mr. Robert Bagster, the present
 managing director of the firm.[SIR SIDNEY COLVINS NOTE.]
 
 {205}  See a short essay of De Quinceys.
 
 {206a}  _Religio Medici_, Part ii.
 
 {206b}  _Duchess of Malfi_.
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the Chatto and Windus 1911 edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                                 LAY MORALS
 
 
                              And Other Papers
 
                                     BY
                           ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 
 
                             [Picture: Graphic]
 
                               A NEW EDITION
                             WITH A PREFACE BY
                               MRS. STEVENSON
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                              CHATTO & WINDUS
                                    1911
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                           _All rights reserved._
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 BY MRS. ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON {0}
 
 
 In our long voyage on the yacht _Casco_, we visited many islands; I
 believe on every one we found the scourge of leprosy.  In the Marquesas
 there was a regular leper settlement, though the persons living there
 seemed free to wander where they wished, fishing on the beach, or
 visiting friends in the villages.  I remember one afternoon, at Anaho,
 when my husband and I, tired after a long quest for shells, sat down on
 the sand to rest awhile, a native man stepped out from under some
 cocoanut trees, regarding us hesitatingly as though fearful of intruding.
 My husband waved an invitation to the stranger to join us, offering his
 cigarette to the man in the island fashion.  The cigarette was accepted
 and, after a puff or two, courteously passed back again according to
 native etiquette.  The hand that held it was the maimed hand of a leper.
 To my consternation my husband took the cigarette and smoked it out.
 Afterwards when we were alone and I spoke of my horror he said, 'I could
 not mortify the man.  And if you think I _liked_ doing it--that was
 another reason; because I _didn't_ want to.'
 
 Another day, while we were still anchored in Anaho Bay, a messenger from
 round a distant headland came in a whale-boat with an urgent request that
 we go to see a young white girl who was ill with some mysterious malady.
 We had supposed that, with the beach-comber 'Charley the red,' we were
 the only white people on our side of the island.  Though there was much
 wind that day and the sea ran high, we started at once, impelled partly
 by curiosity and partly by the pathetic nature of the message.
 Fortunately we took our luncheon with us, eating it on the beach before
 we went up to the house where the sick girl lay.  Our hostess, the girl's
 mother, met us with regrets that we had already lunched, saying, 'I have
 a most excellent cook; here he is, now.'  She turned, as she spoke, to an
 elderly Chinaman who was plainly in an advanced stage of leprosy.  When
 the man was gone, my husband asked if she had no fear of contagion.  'I
 don't believe in contagion,' was her reply.  But there was little doubt
 as to what ailed her daughter.  She was certainly suffering from leprosy.
 We could only advise that the girl be taken to the French post at Santa
 Maria Bay where there was a doctor.
 
 On our return to the _Casco_ we confessed to each other with what alarm
 and repugnance we touched the miserable girl.  We talked long that
 evening of Father Damien, his sublime heroism, and his martyrdom which
 was already nearing its sad end.  Beyond all noble qualities my husband
 placed courage.  The more he saw of leprosy, and he saw much in the
 islands, the higher rose his admiration for the simple priest of Molokai.
 'I must see Molokai,' he said many times.  'I must somehow manage to see
 Molokai.'
 
 In January 1889, we arrived in Honolulu, settling in a pleasant cottage
 by the sea to rest until we were ready to return to England.  The _Casco_
 we sent back to San Francisco with the captain.  But the knowledge that
 every few days some vessel was leaving Honolulu to cruise among islands
 we had not seen, and now should never see, was more than we could bear.
 First we engaged passage on a missionary ship, but changed our minds--my
 husband would not be allowed to smoke on board, for one reason--and
 chartered the trading schooner _Equator_.  This was thought too rough a
 voyage for my mother-in-law, as indeed it would have been; so she was
 sent, somewhat protesting, back to Scotland.
 
 My husband was still intent on seeing Molokai.  After the waste of much
 time and red tape, he finally received an official permission to visit
 the leper settlement.  It did not occur to him it would be necessary to
 get a separate official permission to _leave_ Molokai; hence he was
 nearly left behind when the vessel sailed out.  He only saved himself by
 a prodigious leap which landed him on board the boat, whence nothing but
 force could dislodge him.  By the doctor's orders he took gloves to wear
 as a precautionary measure against contagion, but they were never worn.
 At first he avoided shaking hands, but when he played croquet with the
 young leper girls he would not listen to the Mother Superior's warning
 that he must wear gloves.  He thought it might remind them of their
 condition.  'What will you do if you find you have contracted leprosy?' I
 asked.  'Do?' he replied; 'why, you and I would spend the rest of our
 lives in Molokai and become humble followers of Father Damien.'  As Mr.
 Balfour says in the Life of Stevenson, he was as stern with his family as
 he was with himself, and as exacting.
 
 He talked very little to us of the tragedy of Molokai, though I could see
 it lay heavy on his spirits; but of the great work begun by Father Damien
 and carried on by his successors he spoke fully.  He had followed the
 life of the priest like a detective until there seemed nothing more to
 learn.  Mother Mary Ann, the Mother Superior, he could never mention
 without deep emotion.  One of the first things he did on his return to
 Honolulu was to send her a grand piano for the use of her girls--the
 girls with whom he had played croquet.  He also sent toys, sewing
 materials, small tools for the younger children, and other things that I
 have forgotten.  After his death a letter was found among his papers, of
 which I have only the last few lines.  'I cannot suppose you remember me,
 but I won't forget you, nor God won't forget you for your kindness to the
 blind white leper at Molokai.'
 
 During my husband's absence I had made every preparation for our voyage
 on the _Equator_, so but little time was lost before we found ourselves
 on board, our sails set for the south.  The _Equator_, which had easily
 lived through the great Samoan hurricane, made no such phenomenal runs as
 the _Casco_, but we could trust her, and she had no 'tricks and ways'
 that we did not understand.  We liked the sailors, we loved the ship and
 her captain, so it was with heart-felt regret we said farewell in the
 harbour of Apia after a long and perfect cruise.
 
 After reading the letters that awaited us in Apia, we looked over the
 newspapers.  Our indignation may be imagined when we read in one item
 that, owing to the publication of a letter by a well-known Honolulu
 missionary, depicting Father Damien as a dirty old peasant who had
 contracted leprosy through his immoral habits, the project to erect a
 monument to his memory would be abandoned.  'I'll not believe it,' said
 my husband, 'unless I see it with my own eyes; for it is too damnable for
 belief!'
 
 But see it he did, in spite of his incredulity, for in Sydney, a month or
 two later, the very journal containing the letter condemnatory of Father
 Damien was among the first we chanced to open.  I shall never forget my
 husband's ferocity of indignation, his leaping stride as he paced the
 room holding the offending paper at arm's-length before his eyes that
 burned and sparkled with a peculiar flashing light.  His cousin Mr.
 Balfour, in his _Life of Robert Louis Stevenson_, says: 'his eyes . . .
 when he was moved to anger or any fierce emotion seemed literally to
 blaze and glow with a burning light.'  In another moment he disappeared
 through the doorway, and I could hear him, in his own room, pulling his
 chair to the table, and the sound of his inkstand being dragged towards
 him.
 
 That afternoon he called us together--my son, my daughter, and
 myself--saying that he had something serious to lay before us.  He went
 over the circumstances succinctly, and then we three had the incomparable
 experience of hearing its author read aloud the defence of Father Damien
 while it was still red-hot from his indignant soul.
 
 As we sat, dazed and overcome by emotion, he pointed out to us that the
 subject-matter was libellous in the highest degree, and the publication
 of the article might cause the loss of his entire substance.  Without our
 concurrence he would not take such a risk.  There was no dissenting
 voice; how could there be?  The paper was published with almost no change
 or revision, though afterwards my husband said he considered this a
 mistake.  He thought he should have waited for his anger to cool, when he
 might have been more impersonal and less egotistic.
 
 The next day he consulted an eminent lawyer, more from curiosity than
 from any other reason.  Mr. Moses--I think that was his name--was at
 first inclined to be jocular.  I remember his smiling question: 'Have you
 called him a hell-hound or an atheist?  Otherwise there is no libel.'
 But when he looked over the manuscript his countenance changed.  'This is
 a serious affair,' he said; 'however, no one will publish it for you.'
 In that Mr. Moses was right; no one dared publish the pamphlet.  But that
 difficulty was soon overcome.  My husband hired a printer by the day, and
 the work was rushed through.  We then, my daughter, my son, and myself,
 were set to work helping address the pamphlets, which were scattered far
 and wide.
 
 Father Damien was vindicated by a stranger, a man of another country and
 another religion from his own.
 
                                                             F. V. DE G. S.
 
 
 
 
 Contents:
 
 
    Preface by Mrs. Robert Louis Stevenson
    Lay Morals
    Father Damien
    The Pentland Rising
       I.  The Causes of the Revolt
       II.  The Beginning
       III.  The March of the Rebels
       IV.  Rullion Green
       V.  A Record of Blood
    The Day After To-morrow
    College Papers
       I.  Edinburgh Students in 1824
       II.  The Modern Student
       III.  Debating Societies
    Criticisms
       I.  Lord Lytton's "Fables in Song"
       II.  Salvini's Macbeth
       III.  Bagster's "Pilgrim's Progress"
    Sketches
       I.  The Satirist
       II.  Nuits Blanches
       III.  The Wreath of Immortelles
       IV.  Nurses
       V.  A Character
   The Great North Road
       I.  Nance at the "Green Dragon"
       II.  In which Mr. Archer is Installed
       III.  Jonathan Holdaway
       IV.  Mingling Threads
       V.  Life in the Castle
       IV.  The Bad Half-Crown
       VII.  The Bleaching-Green
       VIII.  The Mail Guard
    The Young Chevalier
       Prologue: The Wine-Seller's Wife
       I.  The Prince
    Heathercat
       I.  Traqairs of Montroymont
       II.  Francie
       III.  The Hill-End of Drumlowe
 
 
 
 
 LAY MORALS
 
 
 _The following chapters of a projected treatise on Ethics were drafted at
 Edinburgh in the spring of_ 1879.  _They are unrevised_, _and must not be
 taken as representing_, _either as to matter or form_, _their author's
 final thoughts_; _but they contain much that is essentially
 characteristic of his mind_.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                _Copyright in the United States of America_.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 
 The problem of education is twofold: first to know, and then to utter.
 Every one who lives any semblance of an inner life thinks more nobly and
 profoundly than he speaks; and the best of teachers can impart only
 broken images of the truth which they perceive.  Speech which goes from
 one to another between two natures, and, what is worse, between two
 experiences, is doubly relative.  The speaker buries his meaning; it is
 for the hearer to dig it up again; and all speech, written or spoken, is
 in a dead language until it finds a willing and prepared hearer.  Such,
 moreover, is the complexity of life, that when we condescend upon details
 in our advice, we may be sure we condescend on error; and the best of
 education is to throw out some magnanimous hints.  No man was ever so
 poor that he could express all he has in him by words, looks, or actions;
 his true knowledge is eternally incommunicable, for it is a knowledge of
 himself; and his best wisdom comes to him by no process of the mind, but
 in a supreme self-dictation, which keeps varying from hour to hour in its
 dictates with the variation of events and circumstances.
 
 A few men of picked nature, full of faith, courage, and contempt for
 others, try earnestly to set forth as much as they can grasp of this
 inner law; but the vast majority, when they come to advise the young,
 must be content to retail certain doctrines which have been already
 retailed to them in their own youth.  Every generation has to educate
 another which it has brought upon the stage.  People who readily accept
 the responsibility of parentship, having very different matters in their
 eye, are apt to feel rueful when that responsibility falls due.  What are
 they to tell the child about life and conduct, subjects on which they
 have themselves so few and such confused opinions?  Indeed, I do not
 know; the least said, perhaps, the soonest mended; and yet the child
 keeps asking, and the parent must find some words to say in his own
 defence.  Where does he find them? and what are they when found?
 
 As a matter of experience, and in nine hundred and ninety-nine cases out
 of a thousand, he will instil into his wide-eyed brat three bad things:
 the terror of public opinion, and, flowing from that as a fountain, the
 desire of wealth and applause.  Besides these, or what might be deduced
 as corollaries from these, he will teach not much else of any effective
 value: some dim notions of divinity, perhaps, and book-keeping, and how
 to walk through a quadrille.
 
 But, you may tell me, the young people are taught to be Christians.  It
 may be want of penetration, but I have not yet been able to perceive it.
 As an honest man, whatever we teach, and be it good or evil, it is not
 the doctrine of Christ.  What he taught (and in this he is like all other
 teachers worthy of the name) was not a code of rules, but a ruling
 spirit; not truths, but a spirit of truth; not views, but a view.  What
 he showed us was an attitude of mind.  Towards the many considerations on
 which conduct is built, each man stands in a certain relation.  He takes
 life on a certain principle.  He has a compass in his spirit which points
 in a certain direction.  It is the attitude, the relation, the point of
 the compass, that is the whole body and gist of what he has to teach us;
 in this, the details are comprehended; out of this the specific precepts
 issue, and by this, and this only, can they be explained and applied.
 And thus, to learn aright from any teacher, we must first of all, like a
 historical artist, think ourselves into sympathy with his position and,
 in the technical phrase, create his character.  A historian confronted
 with some ambiguous politician, or an actor charged with a part, have but
 one pre-occupation; they must search all round and upon every side, and
 grope for some central conception which is to explain and justify the
 most extreme details; until that is found, the politician is an enigma,
 or perhaps a quack, and the part a tissue of fustian sentiment and big
 words; but once that is found, all enters into a plan, a human nature
 appears, the politician or the stage-king is understood from point to
 point, from end to end.  This is a degree of trouble which will be gladly
 taken by a very humble artist; but not even the terror of eternal fire
 can teach a business man to bend his imagination to such athletic
 efforts.  Yet without this, all is vain; until we understand the whole,
 we shall understand none of the parts; and otherwise we have no more than
 broken images and scattered words; the meaning remains buried; and the
 language in which our prophet speaks to us is a dead language in our
 ears.
 
 Take a few of Christ's sayings and compare them with our current
 doctrines.
 
 'Ye cannot,' he says, '_serve God and Mammon_.'  Cannot?  And our whole
 system is to teach us how we can!
 
 '_The children of this world are wiser in their generation than the
 children of light_.'  Are they?  I had been led to understand the
 reverse: that the Christian merchant, for example, prospered exceedingly
 in his affairs; that honesty was the best policy; that an author of
 repute had written a conclusive treatise 'How to make the best of both
 worlds.'  Of both worlds indeed!  Which am I to believe then--Christ or
 the author of repute?
 
 '_Take no thought for the morrow_.'  Ask the Successful Merchant;
 interrogate your own heart; and you will have to admit that this is not
 only a silly but an immoral position.  All we believe, all we hope, all
 we honour in ourselves or our contemporaries, stands condemned in this
 one sentence, or, if you take the other view, condemns the sentence as
 unwise and inhumane.  We are not then of the 'same mind that was in
 Christ.'  We disagree with Christ.  Either Christ meant nothing, or else
 he or we must be in the wrong.  Well says Thoreau, speaking of some texts
 from the New Testament, and finding a strange echo of another style which
 the reader may recognise: 'Let but one of these sentences be rightly read
 from any pulpit in the land, and there would not be left one stone of
 that meeting-house upon another.'
 
 It may be objected that these are what are called 'hard sayings'; and
 that a man, or an education, may be very sufficiently Christian although
 it leave some of these sayings upon one side.  But this is a very gross
 delusion.  Although truth is difficult to state, it is both easy and
 agreeable to receive, and the mind runs out to meet it ere the phrase be
 done.  The universe, in relation to what any man can say of it, is plain,
 patent and staringly comprehensible.  In itself, it is a great and
 travailing ocean, unsounded, unvoyageable, an eternal mystery to man; or,
 let us say, it is a monstrous and impassable mountain, one side of which,
 and a few near slopes and foothills, we can dimly study with these mortal
 eyes.  But what any man can say of it, even in his highest utterance,
 must have relation to this little and plain corner, which is no less
 visible to us than to him.  We are looking on the same map; it will go
 hard if we cannot follow the demonstration.  The longest and most
 abstruse flight of a philosopher becomes clear and shallow, in the flash
 of a moment, when we suddenly perceive the aspect and drift of his
 intention.  The longest argument is but a finger pointed; once we get our
 own finger rightly parallel, and we see what the man meant, whether it be
 a new star or an old street-lamp.  And briefly, if a saying is hard to
 understand, it is because we are thinking of something else.
 
 But to be a true disciple is to think of the same things as our prophet,
 and to think of different things in the same order.  To be of the same
 mind with another is to see all things in the same perspective; it is not
 to agree in a few indifferent matters near at hand and not much debated;
 it is to follow him in his farthest flights, to see the force of his
 hyperboles, to stand so exactly in the centre of his vision that whatever
 he may express, your eyes will light at once on the original, that
 whatever he may see to declare, your mind will at once accept.  You do
 not belong to the school of any philosopher, because you agree with him
 that theft is, on the whole, objectionable, or that the sun is overhead
 at noon.  It is by the hard sayings that discipleship is tested.  We are
 all agreed about the middling and indifferent parts of knowledge and
 morality; even the most soaring spirits too often take them tamely upon
 trust.  But the man, the philosopher or the moralist, does not stand upon
 these chance adhesions; and the purpose of any system looks towards those
 extreme points where it steps valiantly beyond tradition and returns with
 some covert hint of things outside.  Then only can you be certain that
 the words are not words of course, nor mere echoes of the past; then only
 are you sure that if he be indicating anything at all, it is a star and
 not a street-lamp; then only do you touch the heart of the mystery, since
 it was for these that the author wrote his book.
 
 Now, every now and then, and indeed surprisingly often, Christ finds a
 word that transcends all common-place morality; every now and then he
 quits the beaten track to pioneer the unexpressed, and throws out a
 pregnant and magnanimous hyperbole; for it is only by some bold poetry of
 thought that men can be strung up above the level of everyday conceptions
 to take a broader look upon experience or accept some higher principle of
 conduct.  To a man who is of the same mind that was in Christ, who stands
 at some centre not too far from his, and looks at the world and conduct
 from some not dissimilar or, at least, not opposing attitude--or,
 shortly, to a man who is of Christ's philosophy--every such saying should
 come home with a thrill of joy and corroboration; he should feel each one
 below his feet as another sure foundation in the flux of time and chance;
 each should be another proof that in the torrent of the years and
 generations, where doctrines and great armaments and empires are swept
 away and swallowed, he stands immovable, holding by the eternal stars.
 But alas! at this juncture of the ages it is not so with us; on each and
 every such occasion our whole fellowship of Christians falls back in
 disapproving wonder and implicitly denies the saying.  Christians! the
 farce is impudently broad.  Let us stand up in the sight of heaven and
 confess.  The ethics that we hold are those of Benjamin Franklin.
 _Honesty is the best policy_, is perhaps a hard saying; it is certainly
 one by which a wise man of these days will not too curiously direct his
 steps; but I think it shows a glimmer of meaning to even our most dimmed
 intelligences; I think we perceive a principle behind it; I think,
 without hyperbole, we are of the same mind that was in Benjamin Franklin.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 But, I may be told, we teach the ten commandments, where a world of
 morals lies condensed, the very pith and epitome of all ethics and
 religion; and a young man with these precepts engraved upon his mind must
 follow after profit with some conscience and Christianity of method.  A
 man cannot go very far astray who neither dishonours his parents, nor
 kills, nor commits adultery, nor steals, nor bears false witness; for
 these things, rightly thought out, cover a vast field of duty.
 
 Alas! what is a precept?  It is at best an illustration; it is case law
 at the best which can be learned by precept.  The letter is not only
 dead, but killing; the spirit which underlies, and cannot be uttered,
 alone is true and helpful.  This is trite to sickness; but familiarity
 has a cunning disenchantment; in a day or two she can steal all beauty
 from the mountain tops; and the most startling words begin to fall dead
 upon the ear after several repetitions.  If you see a thing too often,
 you no longer see it; if you hear a thing too often, you no longer hear
 it.  Our attention requires to be surprised; and to carry a fort by
 assault, or to gain a thoughtful hearing from the ruck of mankind, are
 feats of about an equal difficulty and must be tried by not dissimilar
 means.  The whole Bible has thus lost its message for the common run of
 hearers; it has become mere words of course; and the parson may bawl
 himself scarlet and beat the pulpit like a thing possessed, but his
 hearers will continue to nod; they are strangely at peace, they know all
 he has to say; ring the old bell as you choose, it is still the old bell
 and it cannot startle their composure.  And so with this byword about the
 letter and the spirit.  It is quite true, no doubt; but it has no meaning
 in the world to any man of us.  Alas! it has just this meaning, and
 neither more nor less: that while the spirit is true, the letter is
 eternally false.
 
 The shadow of a great oak lies abroad upon the ground at noon, perfect,
 clear, and stable like the earth.  But let a man set himself to mark out
 the boundary with cords and pegs, and were he never so nimble and never
 so exact, what with the multiplicity of the leaves and the progression of
 the shadow as it flees before the travelling sun, long ere he has made
 the circuit the whole figure will have changed.  Life may be compared,
 not to a single tree, but to a great and complicated forest; circumstance
 is more swiftly changing than a shadow, language much more inexact than
 the tools of a surveyor; from day to day the trees fall and are renewed;
 the very essences are fleeting as we look; and the whole world of leaves
 is swinging tempest-tossed among the winds of time.  Look now for your
 shadows.  O man of formulae, is this a place for you?  Have you fitted
 the spirit to a single case?  Alas, in the cycle of the ages when shall
 such another be proposed for the judgment of man?  Now when the sun
 shines and the winds blow, the wood is filled with an innumerable
 multitude of shadows, tumultuously tossed and changing; and at every gust
 the whole carpet leaps and becomes new.  Can you or your heart say more?
 
 Look back now, for a moment, on your own brief experience of life; and
 although you lived it feelingly in your own person, and had every step of
 conduct burned in by pains and joys upon your memory, tell me what
 definite lesson does experience hand on from youth to manhood, or from
 both to age?  The settled tenor which first strikes the eye is but the
 shadow of a delusion.  This is gone; that never truly was; and you
 yourself are altered beyond recognition.  Times and men and circumstances
 change about your changing character, with a speed of which no earthly
 hurricane affords an image.  What was the best yesterday, is it still the
 best in this changed theatre of a to-morrow?  Will your own Past truly
 guide you in your own violent and unexpected Future?  And if this be
 questionable, with what humble, with what hopeless eyes, should we not
 watch other men driving beside us on their unknown careers, seeing with
 unlike eyes, impelled by different gales, doing and suffering in another
 sphere of things?
 
 And as the authentic clue to such a labyrinth and change of scene, do you
 offer me these two score words? these five bald prohibitions?  For the
 moral precepts are no more than five; the first four deal rather with
 matters of observance than of conduct; the tenth, _Thou shalt not covet_,
 stands upon another basis, and shall be spoken of ere long.  The Jews, to
 whom they were first given, in the course of years began to find these
 precepts insufficient; and made an addition of no less than six hundred
 and fifty others!  They hoped to make a pocket-book of reference on
 morals, which should stand to life in some such relation, say, as Hoyle
 stands in to the scientific game of whist.  The comparison is just, and
 condemns the design; for those who play by rule will never be more than
 tolerable players; and you and I would like to play our game in life to
 the noblest and the most divine advantage.  Yet if the Jews took a petty
 and huckstering view of conduct, what view do we take ourselves, who
 callously leave youth to go forth into the enchanted forest, full of
 spells and dire chimeras, with no guidance more complete than is afforded
 by these five precepts?
 
 _Honour thy father and thy mother_.  Yes, but does that mean to obey? and
 if so, how long and how far?  _Thou shall not kill_.  Yet the very
 intention and purport of the prohibition may be best fulfilled by
 killing.  _Thou shall not commit adultery_.  But some of the ugliest
 adulteries are committed in the bed of marriage and under the sanction of
 religion and law.  _Thou shalt not bear false witness_.  How? by speech
 or by silence also? or even by a smile?  _Thou shalt not steal_.  Ah,
 that indeed!  But what is _to steal_?
 
 To steal?  It is another word to be construed; and who is to be our
 guide?  The police will give us one construction, leaving the word only
 that least minimum of meaning without which society would fall in pieces;
 but surely we must take some higher sense than this; surely we hope more
 than a bare subsistence for mankind; surely we wish mankind to prosper
 and go on from strength to strength, and ourselves to live rightly in the
 eye of some more exacting potentate than a policeman.  The approval or
 the disapproval of the police must be eternally indifferent to a man who
 is both valorous and good.  There is extreme discomfort, but no shame, in
 the condemnation of the law.  The law represents that modicum of morality
 which can be squeezed out of the ruck of mankind; but what is that to me,
 who aim higher and seek to be my own more stringent judge?  I observe
 with pleasure that no brave man has ever given a rush for such
 considerations.  The Japanese have a nobler and more sentimental feeling
 for this social bond into which we all are born when we come into the
 world, and whose comforts and protection we all indifferently share
 throughout our lives:--but even to them, no more than to our Western
 saints and heroes, does the law of the state supersede the higher law of
 duty.  Without hesitation and without remorse, they transgress the
 stiffest enactments rather than abstain from doing right.  But the
 accidental superior duty being thus fulfilled, they at once return in
 allegiance to the common duty of all citizens; and hasten to denounce
 themselves; and value at an equal rate their just crime and their equally
 just submission to its punishment.
 
 The evading of the police will not long satisfy an active conscience or a
 thoughtful head.  But to show you how one or the other may trouble a man,
 and what a vast extent of frontier is left unridden by this invaluable
 eighth commandment, let me tell you a few pages out of a young man's
 life.
 
 He was a friend of mine; a young man like others; generous, flighty, as
 variable as youth itself, but always with some high motions and on the
 search for higher thoughts of life.  I should tell you at once that he
 thoroughly agrees with the eighth commandment.  But he got hold of some
 unsettling works, the New Testament among others, and this loosened his
 views of life and led him into many perplexities.  As he was the son of a
 man in a certain position, and well off, my friend had enjoyed from the
 first the advantages of education, nay, he had been kept alive through a
 sickly childhood by constant watchfulness, comforts, and change of air;
 for all of which he was indebted to his father's wealth.
 
 At college he met other lads more diligent than himself, who followed the
 plough in summer-time to pay their college fees in winter; and this
 inequality struck him with some force.  He was at that age of a
 conversible temper, and insatiably curious in the aspects of life; and he
 spent much of his time scraping acquaintance with all classes of man- and
 woman-kind.  In this way he came upon many depressed ambitions, and many
 intelligences stunted for want of opportunity; and this also struck him.
 He began to perceive that life was a handicap upon strange, wrong-sided
 principles; and not, as he had been told, a fair and equal race.  He
 began to tremble that he himself had been unjustly favoured, when he saw
 all the avenues of wealth, and power, and comfort closed against so many
 of his superiors and equals, and held unwearyingly open before so idle,
 so desultory, and so dissolute a being as himself.  There sat a youth
 beside him on the college benches, who had only one shirt to his back,
 and, at intervals sufficiently far apart, must stay at home to have it
 washed.  It was my friend's principle to stay away as often as he dared;
 for I fear he was no friend to learning.  But there was something that
 came home to him sharply, in this fellow who had to give over study till
 his shirt was washed, and the scores of others who had never an
 opportunity at all.  _If one of these could take his place_, he thought;
 and the thought tore away a bandage from his eyes.  He was eaten by the
 shame of his discoveries, and despised himself as an unworthy favourite
 and a creature of the back-stairs of Fortune.  He could no longer see
 without confusion one of these brave young fellows battling up-hill
 against adversity.  Had he not filched that fellow's birthright?  At best
 was he not coldly profiting by the injustice of society, and greedily
 devouring stolen goods?  The money, indeed, belonged to his father, who
 had worked, and thought, and given up his liberty to earn it; but by what
 justice could the money belong to my friend, who had, as yet, done
 nothing but help to squander it?  A more sturdy honesty, joined to a more
 even and impartial temperament, would have drawn from these
 considerations a new force of industry, that this equivocal position
 might be brought as swiftly as possible to an end, and some good services
 to mankind justify the appropriation of expense.  It was not so with my
 friend, who was only unsettled and discouraged, and filled full of that
 trumpeting anger with which young men regard injustices in the first
 blush of youth; although in a few years they will tamely acquiesce in
 their existence, and knowingly profit by their complications.  Yet all
 this while he suffered many indignant pangs.  And once, when he put on
 his boots, like any other unripe donkey, to run away from home, it was
 his best consolation that he was now, at a single plunge, to free himself
 from the responsibility of this wealth that was not his, and do battle
 equally against his fellows in the warfare of life.
 
 Some time after this, falling into ill-health, he was sent at great
 expense to a more favourable climate; and then I think his perplexities
 were thickest.  When he thought of all the other young men of singular
 promise, upright, good, the prop of families, who must remain at home to
 die, and with all their possibilities be lost to life and mankind; and
 how he, by one more unmerited favour, was chosen out from all these
 others to survive; he felt as if there were no life, no labour, no
 devotion of soul and body, that could repay and justify these
 partialities.  A religious lady, to whom he communicated these
 reflections, could see no force in them whatever.  'It was God's will,'
 said she.  But he knew it was by God's will that Joan of Arc was burnt at
 Rouen, which cleared neither Bedford nor Bishop Cauchon; and again, by
 God's will that Christ was crucified outside Jerusalem, which excused
 neither the rancour of the priests nor the timidity of Pilate.  He knew,
 moreover, that although the possibility of this favour he was now
 enjoying issued from his circumstances, its acceptance was the act of his
 own will; and he had accepted it greedily, longing for rest and sunshine.
 And hence this allegation of God's providence did little to relieve his
 scruples.  I promise you he had a very troubled mind.  And I would not
 laugh if I were you, though while he was thus making mountains out of
 what you think molehills, he were still (as perhaps he was) contentedly
 practising many other things that to you seem black as hell.  Every man
 is his own judge and mountain-guide through life.  There is an old story
 of a mote and a beam, apparently not true, but worthy perhaps of some
 consideration.  I should, if I were you, give some consideration to these
 scruples of his, and if I were he, I should do the like by yours; for it
 is not unlikely that there may be something under both.  In the meantime
 you must hear how my friend acted.  Like many invalids, he supposed that
 he would die.  Now, should he die, he saw no means of repaying this huge
 loan which, by the hands of his father, mankind had advanced him for his
 sickness.  In that case it would be lost money.  So he determined that
 the advance should be as small as possible; and, so long as he continued
 to doubt his recovery, lived in an upper room, and grudged himself all
 but necessaries.  But so soon as he began to perceive a change for the
 better, he felt justified in spending more freely, to speed and brighten
 his return to health, and trusted in the future to lend a help to
 mankind, as mankind, out of its treasury, had lent a help to him.
 
 I do not say but that my friend was a little too curious and partial in
 his view; nor thought too much of himself and too little of his parents;
 but I do say that here are some scruples which tormented my friend in his
 youth, and still, perhaps, at odd times give him a prick in the midst of
 his enjoyments, and which after all have some foundation in justice, and
 point, in their confused way, to some more honourable honesty within the
 reach of man.  And at least, is not this an unusual gloss upon the eighth
 commandment?  And what sort of comfort, guidance, or illumination did
 that precept afford my friend throughout these contentions?  'Thou shalt
 not steal.'  With all my heart!  But _am_ I stealing?
 
 The truly quaint materialism of our view of life disables us from
 pursuing any transaction to an end.  You can make no one understand that
 his bargain is anything more than a bargain, whereas in point of fact it
 is a link in the policy of mankind, and either a good or an evil to the
 world.  We have a sort of blindness which prevents us from seeing
 anything but sovereigns.  If one man agrees to give another so many
 shillings for so many hours' work, and then wilfully gives him a certain
 proportion of the price in bad money and only the remainder in good, we
 can see with half an eye that this man is a thief.  But if the other
 spends a certain proportion of the hours in smoking a pipe of tobacco,
 and a certain other proportion in looking at the sky, or the clock, or
 trying to recall an air, or in meditation on his own past adventures, and
 only the remainder in downright work such as he is paid to do, is he,
 because the theft is one of time and not of money,--is he any the less a
 thief?  The one gave a bad shilling, the other an imperfect hour; but
 both broke the bargain, and each is a thief.  In piecework, which is what
 most of us do, the case is none the less plain for being even less
 material.  If you forge a bad knife, you have wasted some of mankind's
 iron, and then, with unrivalled cynicism, you pocket some of mankind's
 money for your trouble.  Is there any man so blind who cannot see that
 this is theft?  Again, if you carelessly cultivate a farm, you have been
 playing fast and loose with mankind's resources against hunger; there
 will be less bread in consequence, and for lack of that bread somebody
 will die next winter: a grim consideration.  And you must not hope to
 shuffle out of blame because you got less money for your less quantity of
 bread; for although a theft be partly punished, it is none the less a
 theft for that.  You took the farm against competitors; there were others
 ready to shoulder the responsibility and be answerable for the tale of
 loaves; but it was you who took it.  By the act you came under a tacit
 bargain with mankind to cultivate that farm with your best endeavour; you
 were under no superintendence, you were on parole; and you have broke
 your bargain, and to all who look closely, and yourself among the rest if
 you have moral eyesight, you are a thief.  Or take the case of men of
 letters.  Every piece of work which is not as good as you can make it,
 which you have palmed off imperfect, meagrely thought, niggardly in
 execution, upon mankind who is your paymaster on parole and in a sense
 your pupil, every hasty or slovenly or untrue performance, should rise up
 against you in the court of your own heart and condemn you for a thief.
 Have you a salary?  If you trifle with your health, and so render
 yourself less capable for duty, and still touch, and still greedily
 pocket the emolument--what are you but a thief?  Have you double
 accounts? do you by any time-honoured juggle, deceit, or ambiguous
 process, gain more from those who deal with you than it you were
 bargaining and dealing face to face in front of God?--What are you but a
 thief?  Lastly, if you fill an office, or produce an article, which, in
 your heart of hearts, you think a delusion and a fraud upon mankind, and
 still draw your salary and go through the sham manoeuvres of this office,
 or still book your profits and keep on flooding the world with these
 injurious goods?--though you were old, and bald, and the first at church,
 and a baronet, what are you but a thief?  These may seem hard words and
 mere curiosities of the intellect, in an age when the spirit of honesty
 is so sparingly cultivated that all business is conducted upon lies and
 so-called customs of the trade, that not a man bestows two thoughts on
 the utility or honourableness of his pursuit.  I would say less if I
 thought less.  But looking to my own reason and the right of things, I
 can only avow that I am a thief myself, and that I passionately suspect
 my neighbours of the same guilt.
 
 Where did you hear that it was easy to be honest?  Do you find that in
 your Bible?  Easy!  It is easy to be an ass and follow the multitude like
 a blind, besotted bull in a stampede; and that, I am well aware, is what
 you and Mrs. Grundy mean by being honest.  But it will not bear the
 stress of time nor the scrutiny of conscience.  Even before the lowest of
 all tribunals,--before a court of law, whose business it is, not to keep
 men right, or within a thousand miles of right, but to withhold them from
 going so tragically wrong that they will pull down the whole jointed
 fabric of society by their misdeeds--even before a court of law, as we
 begin to see in these last days, our easy view of following at each
 other's tails, alike to good and evil, is beginning to be reproved and
 punished, and declared no honesty at all, but open theft and swindling;
 and simpletons who have gone on through life with a quiet conscience may
 learn suddenly, from the lips of a judge, that the custom of the trade
 may be a custom of the devil.  You thought it was easy to be honest.  Did
 you think it was easy to be just and kind and truthful?  Did you think
 the whole duty of aspiring man was as simple as a horn-pipe? and you
 could walk through life like a gentleman and a hero, with no more concern
 than it takes to go to church or to address a circular?  And yet all this
 time you had the eighth commandment! and, what makes it richer, you would
 not have broken it for the world!
 
 The truth is, that these commandments by themselves are of little use in
 private judgment.  If compression is what you want, you have their whole
 spirit compressed into the golden rule; and yet there expressed with more
 significance, since the law is there spiritually and not materially
 stated.  And in truth, four out of these ten commands, from the sixth to
 the ninth, are rather legal than ethical.  The police-court is their
 proper home.  A magistrate cannot tell whether you love your neighbour as
 yourself, but he can tell more or less whether you have murdered, or
 stolen, or committed adultery, or held up your hand and testified to that
 which was not; and these things, for rough practical tests, are as good
 as can be found.  And perhaps, therefore, the best condensation of the
 Jewish moral law is in the maxims of the priests, 'neminem laedere' and
 'suum cuique tribuere.'  But all this granted, it becomes only the more
 plain that they are inadequate in the sphere of personal morality; that
 while they tell the magistrate roughly when to punish, they can never
 direct an anxious sinner what to do.
 
 Only Polonius, or the like solemn sort of ass, can offer us a succinct
 proverb by way of advice, and not burst out blushing in our faces.  We
 grant them one and all and for all that they are worth; it is something
 above and beyond that we desire.  Christ was in general a great enemy to
 such a way of teaching; we rarely find him meddling with any of these
 plump commands but it was to open them out, and lift his hearers from the
 letter to the spirit.  For morals are a personal affair; in the war of
 righteousness every man fights for his own hand; all the six hundred
 precepts of the Mishna cannot shake my private judgment; my magistracy of
 myself is an indefeasible charge, and my decisions absolute for the time
 and case.  The moralist is not a judge of appeal, but an advocate who
 pleads at my tribunal.  He has to show not the law, but that the law
 applies.  Can he convince me? then he gains the cause.  And thus you find
 Christ giving various counsels to varying people, and often jealously
 careful to avoid definite precept.  Is he asked, for example, to divide a
 heritage?  He refuses: and the best advice that he will offer is but a
 paraphrase of that tenth commandment which figures so strangely among the
 rest.  _Take heed, and beware of covetousness_.  If you complain that
 this is vague, I have failed to carry you along with me in my argument.
 For no definite precept can be more than an illustration, though its
 truth were resplendent like the sun, and it was announced from heaven by
 the voice of God.  And life is so intricate and changing, that perhaps
 not twenty times, or perhaps not twice in the ages, shall we find that
 nice consent of circumstances to which alone it can apply.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 Although the world and life have in a sense become commonplace to our
 experience, it is but in an external torpor; the true sentiment slumbers
 within us; and we have but to reflect on ourselves or our surroundings to
 rekindle our astonishment.  No length of habit can blunt our first
 surprise.  Of the world I have but little to say in this connection; a
 few strokes shall suffice.  We inhabit a dead ember swimming wide in the
 blank of space, dizzily spinning as it swims, and lighted up from several
 million miles away by a more horrible hell-fire than was ever conceived
 by the theological imagination.  Yet the dead ember is a green,
 commodious dwelling-place; and the reverberation of this hell-fire ripens
 flower and fruit and mildly warms us on summer eves upon the lawn.  Far
 off on all hands other dead embers, other flaming suns, wheel and race in
 the apparent void; the nearest is out of call, the farthest so far that
 the heart sickens in the effort to conceive the distance.  Shipwrecked
 seamen on the deep, though they bestride but the truncheon of a boom, are
 safe and near at home compared with mankind on its bullet.  Even to us
 who have known no other, it seems a strange, if not an appalling, place
 of residence.
 
 But far stranger is the resident, man, a creature compact of wonders
 that, after centuries of custom, is still wonderful to himself.  He
 inhabits a body which he is continually outliving, discarding and
 renewing.  Food and sleep, by an unknown alchemy, restore his spirits and
 the freshness of his countenance.  Hair grows on him like grass; his
 eyes, his brain, his sinews, thirst for action; he joys to see and touch
 and hear, to partake the sun and wind, to sit down and intently ponder on
 his astonishing attributes and situation, to rise up and run, to perform
 the strange and revolting round of physical functions.  The sight of a
 flower, the note of a bird, will often move him deeply; yet he looks
 unconcerned on the impassable distances and portentous bonfires of the
 universe.  He comprehends, he designs, he tames nature, rides the sea,
 ploughs, climbs the air in a balloon, makes vast inquiries, begins
 interminable labours, joins himself into federations and populous cities,
 spends his days to deliver the ends of the earth or to benefit unborn
 posterity; and yet knows himself for a piece of unsurpassed fragility and
 the creature of a few days.  His sight, which conducts him, which takes
 notice of the farthest stars, which is miraculous in every way and a
 thing defying explanation or belief, is yet lodged in a piece of jelly,
 and can be extinguished with a touch.  His heart, which all through life
 so indomitably, so athletically labours, is but a capsule, and may be
 stopped with a pin.  His whole body, for all its savage energies, its
 leaping and its winged desires, may yet be tamed and conquered by a
 draught of air or a sprinkling of cold dew.  What he calls death, which
 is the seeming arrest of everything, and the ruin and hateful
 transformation of the visible body, lies in wait for him outwardly in a
 thousand accidents, and grows up in secret diseases from within.  He is
 still learning to be a man when his faculties are already beginning to
 decline; he has not yet understood himself or his position before he
 inevitably dies.  And yet this mad, chimerical creature can take no
 thought of his last end, lives as though he were eternal, plunges with
 his vulnerable body into the shock of war, and daily affronts death with
 unconcern.  He cannot take a step without pain or pleasure.  His life is
 a tissue of sensations, which he distinguishes as they seem to come more
 directly from himself or his surroundings.  He is conscious of himself as
 a joyer or a sufferer, as that which craves, chooses, and is satisfied;
 conscious of his surroundings as it were of an inexhaustible purveyor,
 the source of aspects, inspirations, wonders, cruel knocks and
 transporting caresses.  Thus he goes on his way, stumbling among delights
 and agonies.
 
 Matter is a far-fetched theory, and materialism is without a root in man.
 To him everything is important in the degree to which it moves him.  The
 telegraph wires and posts, the electricity speeding from clerk to clerk,
 the clerks, the glad or sorrowful import of the message, and the paper on
 which it is finally brought to him at home, are all equally facts, all
 equally exist for man.  A word or a thought can wound him as acutely as a
 knife of steel.  If he thinks he is loved, he will rise up and glory to
 himself, although he be in a distant land and short of necessary bread.
 Does he think he is not loved?--he may have the woman at his beck, and
 there is not a joy for him in all the world.  Indeed, if we are to make
 any account of this figment of reason, the distinction between material
 and immaterial, we shall conclude that the life of each man as an
 individual is immaterial, although the continuation and prospects of
 mankind as a race turn upon material conditions.  The physical business
 of each man's body is transacted for him; like a sybarite, he has
 attentive valets in his own viscera; he breathes, he sweats, he digests
 without an effort, or so much as a consenting volition; for the most part
 he even eats, not with a wakeful consciousness, but as it were between
 two thoughts.  His life is centred among other and more important
 considerations; touch him in his honour or his love, creatures of the
 imagination which attach him to mankind or to an individual man or woman;
 cross him in his piety which connects his soul with heaven; and he turns
 from his food, he loathes his breath, and with a magnanimous emotion cuts
 the knots of his existence and frees himself at a blow from the web of
 pains and pleasures.
 
 It follows that man is twofold at least; that he is not a rounded and
 autonomous empire; but that in the same body with him there dwell other
 powers tributary but independent.  If I now behold one walking in a
 garden, curiously coloured and illuminated by the sun, digesting his food
 with elaborate chemistry, breathing, circulating blood, directing himself
 by the sight of his eyes, accommodating his body by a thousand delicate
 balancings to the wind and the uneven surface of the path, and all the
 time, perhaps, with his mind engaged about America, or the dog-star, or
 the attributes of God--what am I to say, or how am I to describe the
 thing I see?  Is that truly a man, in the rigorous meaning of the word?
 or is it not a man and something else?  What, then, are we to count the
 centre-bit and axle of a being so variously compounded?  It is a question
 much debated.  Some read his history in a certain intricacy of nerve and
 the success of successive digestions; others find him an exiled piece of
 heaven blown upon and determined by the breath of God; and both schools
 of theorists will scream like scalded children at a word of doubt.  Yet
 either of these views, however plausible, is beside the question; either
 may be right; and I care not; I ask a more particular answer, and to a
 more immediate point.  What is the man?  There is Something that was
 before hunger and that remains behind after a meal.  It may or may not be
 engaged in any given act or passion, but when it is, it changes,
 heightens, and sanctifies.  Thus it is not engaged in lust, where
 satisfaction ends the chapter; and it is engaged in love, where no
 satisfaction can blunt the edge of the desire, and where age, sickness,
 or alienation may deface what was desirable without diminishing the
 sentiment.  This something, which is the man, is a permanence which
 abides through the vicissitudes of passion, now overwhelmed and now
 triumphant, now unconscious of itself in the immediate distress of
 appetite or pain, now rising unclouded above all.  So, to the man, his
 own central self fades and grows clear again amid the tumult of the
 senses, like a revolving Pharos in the night.  It is forgotten; it is
 hid, it seems, for ever; and yet in the next calm hour he shall behold
 himself once more, shining and unmoved among changes and storm.
 
 Mankind, in the sense of the creeping mass that is born and eats, that
 generates and dies, is but the aggregate of the outer and lower sides of
 man.  This inner consciousness, this lantern alternately obscured and
 shining, to and by which the individual exists and must order his
 conduct, is something special to himself and not common to the race.  His
 joys delight, his sorrows wound him, according as _this_ is interested or
 indifferent in the affair; according as they arise in an imperial war or
 in a broil conducted by the tributary chieftains of the mind.  He may
 lose all, and _this_ not suffer; he may lose what is materially a trifle,
 and _this_ leap in his bosom with a cruel pang.  I do not speak of it to
 hardened theorists: the living man knows keenly what it is I mean.
 
 'Perceive at last that thou hast in thee something better and more divine
 than the things which cause the various effects, and, as it were, pull
 thee by the strings.  What is that now in thy mind? is it fear, or
 suspicion, or desire, or anything of that kind?'  Thus far Marcus
 Aurelius, in one of the most notable passages in any book.  Here is a
 question worthy to be answered.  What is in thy mind?  What is the
 utterance of your inmost self when, in a quiet hour, it can be heard
 intelligibly?  It is something beyond the compass of your thinking,
 inasmuch as it is yourself; but is it not of a higher spirit than you had
 dreamed betweenwhiles, and erect above all base considerations?  This
 soul seems hardly touched with our infirmities; we can find in it
 certainly no fear, suspicion, or desire; we are only conscious--and that
 as though we read it in the eyes of some one else--of a great and
 unqualified readiness.  A readiness to what? to pass over and look beyond
 the objects of desire and fear, for something else.  And this something
 else? this something which is apart from desire and fear, to which all
 the kingdoms of the world and the immediate death of the body are alike
 indifferent and beside the point, and which yet regards conduct--by what
 name are we to call it?  It may be the love of God; or it may be an
 inherited (and certainly well concealed) instinct to preserve self and
 propagate the race; I am not, for the moment, averse to either theory;
 but it will save time to call it righteousness.  By so doing I intend no
 subterfuge to beg a question; I am indeed ready, and more than willing,
 to accept the rigid consequence, and lay aside, as far as the treachery
 of the reason will permit, all former meanings attached to the word
 righteousness.  What is right is that for which a man's central self is
 ever ready to sacrifice immediate or distant interests; what is wrong is
 what the central self discards or rejects as incompatible with the fixed
 design of righteousness.
 
 To make this admission is to lay aside all hope of definition.  That
 which is right upon this theory is intimately dictated to each man by
 himself, but can never be rigorously set forth in language, and never,
 above all, imposed upon another.  The conscience has, then, a vision like
 that of the eyes, which is incommunicable, and for the most part
 illuminates none but its possessor.  When many people perceive the same
 or any cognate facts, they agree upon a word as symbol; and hence we have
 such words as _tree_, _star_, _love_, _honour_, or _death_; hence also we
 have this word _right_, which, like the others, we all understand, most
 of us understand differently, and none can express succinctly otherwise.
 Yet even on the straitest view, we can make some steps towards
 comprehension of our own superior thoughts.  For it is an incredible and
 most bewildering fact that a man, through life, is on variable terms with
 himself; he is aware of tiffs and reconciliations; the intimacy is at
 times almost suspended, at times it is renewed again with joy.  As we
 said before, his inner self or soul appears to him by successive
 revelations, and is frequently obscured.  It is from a study of these
 alternations that we can alone hope to discover, even dimly, what seems
 right and what seems wrong to this veiled prophet of ourself.
 
 All that is in the man in the larger sense, what we call impression as
 well as what we call intuition, so far as my argument looks, we must
 accept.  It is not wrong to desire food, or exercise, or beautiful
 surroundings, or the love of sex, or interest which is the food of the
 mind.  All these are craved; all these should be craved; to none of these
 in itself does the soul demur; where there comes an undeniable want, we
 recognise a demand of nature.  Yet we know that these natural demands may
 be superseded; for the demands which are common to mankind make but a
 shadowy consideration in comparison to the demands of the individual
 soul.  Food is almost the first prerequisite; and yet a high character
 will go without food to the ruin and death of the body rather than gain
 it in a manner which the spirit disavows.  Pascal laid aside mathematics;
 Origen doctored his body with a knife; every day some one is thus
 mortifying his dearest interests and desires, and, in Christ's words,
 entering maim into the Kingdom of Heaven.  This is to supersede the
 lesser and less harmonious affections by renunciation; and though by this
 ascetic path we may get to heaven, we cannot get thither a whole and
 perfect man.  But there is another way, to supersede them by
 reconciliation, in which the soul and all the faculties and senses pursue
 a common route and share in one desire.  Thus, man is tormented by a very
 imperious physical desire; it spoils his rest, it is not to be denied;
 the doctors will tell you, not I, how it is a physical need, like the
 want of food or slumber.  In the satisfaction of this desire, as it first
 appears, the soul sparingly takes part; nay, it oft unsparingly regrets
 and disapproves the satisfaction.  But let the man learn to love a woman
 as far as he is capable of love; and for this random affection of the
 body there is substituted a steady determination, a consent of all his
 powers and faculties, which supersedes, adopts, and commands the other.
 The desire survives, strengthened, perhaps, but taught obedience and
 changed in scope and character.  Life is no longer a tale of betrayals
 and regrets; for the man now lives as a whole; his consciousness now
 moves on uninterrupted like a river; through all the extremes and ups and
 downs of passion, he remains approvingly conscious of himself.
 
 Now to me, this seems a type of that rightness which the soul demands.
 It demands that we shall not live alternately with our opposing
 tendencies in continual see-saw of passion and disgust, but seek some
 path on which the tendencies shall no longer oppose, but serve each other
 to a common end.  It demands that we shall not pursue broken ends, but
 great and comprehensive purposes, in which soul and body may unite like
 notes in a harmonious chord.  That were indeed a way of peace and
 pleasure, that were indeed a heaven upon earth.  It does not demand,
 however, or, to speak in measure, it does not demand of me, that I should
 starve my appetites for no purpose under heaven but as a purpose in
 itself; or, in a weak despair, pluck out the eye that I have not yet
 learned to guide and enjoy with wisdom.  The soul demands unity of
 purpose, not the dismemberment of man; it seeks to roll up all his
 strength and sweetness, all his passion and wisdom, into one, and make of
 him a perfect man exulting in perfection.  To conclude ascetically is to
 give up, and not to solve, the problem.  The ascetic and the creeping
 hog, although they are at different poles, have equally failed in life.
 The one has sacrificed his crew; the other brings back his seamen in a
 cock-boat, and has lost the ship.  I believe there are not many
 sea-captains who would plume themselves on either result as a success.
 
 But if it is righteousness thus to fuse together our divisive impulses
 and march with one mind through life, there is plainly one thing more
 unrighteous than all others, and one declension which is irretrievable
 and draws on the rest.  And this is to lose consciousness of oneself.  In
 the best of times, it is but by flashes, when our whole nature is clear,
 strong and conscious, and events conspire to leave us free, that we enjoy
 communion with our soul.  At the worst, we are so fallen and passive that
 we may say shortly we have none.  An arctic torpor seizes upon men.
 Although built of nerves, and set adrift in a stimulating world, they
 develop a tendency to go bodily to sleep; consciousness becomes engrossed
 among the reflex and mechanical parts of life; and soon loses both the
 will and power to look higher considerations in the face.  This is ruin;
 this is the last failure in life; this is temporal damnation, damnation
 on the spot and without the form of judgment.  'What shall it profit a
 man if he gain the whole world and _lose himself_?'
 
 It is to keep a man awake, to keep him alive to his own soul and its
 fixed design of righteousness, that the better part of moral and
 religious education is directed; not only that of words and doctors, but
 the sharp ferule of calamity under which we are all God's scholars till
 we die.  If, as teachers, we are to say anything to the purpose, we must
 say what will remind the pupil of his soul; we must speak that soul's
 dialect; we must talk of life and conduct as his soul would have him
 think of them.  If, from some conformity between us and the pupil, or
 perhaps among all men, we do in truth speak in such a dialect and express
 such views, beyond question we shall touch in him a spring; beyond
 question he will recognise the dialect as one that he himself has spoken
 in his better hours; beyond question he will cry, 'I had forgotten, but
 now I remember; I too have eyes, and I had forgot to use them!  I too
 have a soul of my own, arrogantly upright, and to that I will listen and
 conform.'  In short, say to him anything that he has once thought, or
 been upon the point of thinking, or show him any view of life that he has
 once clearly seen, or been upon the point of clearly seeing; and you have
 done your part and may leave him to complete the education for himself.
 
 Now, the view taught at the present time seems to me to want greatness;
 and the dialect in which alone it can be intelligibly uttered is not the
 dialect of my soul.  It is a sort of postponement of life; nothing quite
 is, but something different is to be; we are to keep our eyes upon the
 indirect from the cradle to the grave.  We are to regulate our conduct
 not by desire, but by a politic eye upon the future; and to value acts as
 they will bring us money or good opinion; as they will bring us, in one
 word, _profit_.  We must be what is called respectable, and offend no one
 by our carriage; it will not do to make oneself conspicuous--who knows?
 even in virtue? says the Christian parent!  And we must be what is called
 prudent and make money; not only because it is pleasant to have money,
 but because that also is a part of respectability, and we cannot hope to
 be received in society without decent possessions.  Received in society!
 as if that were the kingdom of heaven!  There is dear Mr.
 So-and-so;--look at him!--so much respected--so much looked up to--quite
 the Christian merchant!  And we must cut our conduct as strictly as
 possible after the pattern of Mr. So-and-so; and lay our whole lives to
 make money and be strictly decent.  Besides these holy injunctions, which
 form by far the greater part of a youth's training in our Christian
 homes, there are at least two other doctrines.  We are to live just now
 as well as we can, but scrape at last into heaven, where we shall be
 good.  We are to worry through the week in a lay, disreputable way, but,
 to make matters square, live a different life on Sunday.
 
 The train of thought we have been following gives us a key to all these
 positions, without stepping aside to justify them on their own ground.
 It is because we have been disgusted fifty times with physical squalls,
 and fifty times torn between conflicting impulses, that we teach people
 this indirect and tactical procedure in life, and to judge by remote
 consequences instead of the immediate face of things.  The very desire to
 act as our own souls would have us, coupled with a pathetic disbelief in
 ourselves, moves us to follow the example of others; perhaps, who knows?
 they may be on the right track; and the more our patterns are in number,
 the better seems the chance; until, if we be acting in concert with a
 whole civilised nation, there are surely a majority of chances that we
 must be acting right.  And again, how true it is that we can never behave
 as we wish in this tormented sphere, and can only aspire to different and
 more favourable circumstances, in order to stand out and be ourselves
 wholly and rightly!  And yet once more, if in the hurry and pressure of
 affairs and passions you tend to nod and become drowsy, here are
 twenty-four hours of Sunday set apart for you to hold counsel with your
 soul and look around you on the possibilities of life.
 
 This is not, of course, all that is to be, or even should be, said for
 these doctrines.  Only, in the course of this chapter, the reader and I
 have agreed upon a few catchwords, and been looking at morals on a
 certain system; it was a pity to lose an opportunity of testing the
 catchwords, and seeing whether, by this system as well as by others,
 current doctrines could show any probable justification.  If the
 doctrines had come too badly out of the trial, it would have condemned
 the system.  Our sight of the world is very narrow; the mind but a
 pedestrian instrument; there's nothing new under the sun, as Solomon
 says, except the man himself; and though that changes the aspect of
 everything else, yet he must see the same things as other people, only
 from a different side.
 
 And now, having admitted so much, let us turn to criticism.
 
 If you teach a man to keep his eyes upon what others think of him,
 unthinkingly to lead the life and hold the principles of the majority of
 his contemporaries, you must discredit in his eyes the one authoritative
 voice of his own soul.  He may be a docile citizen; he will never be a
 man.  It is ours, on the other hand, to disregard this babble and
 chattering of other men better and worse than we are, and to walk
 straight before us by what light we have.  They may be right; but so,
 before heaven, are we.  They may know; but we know also, and by that
 knowledge we must stand or fall.  There is such a thing as loyalty to a
 man's own better self; and from those who have not that, God help me, how
 am I to look for loyalty to others?  The most dull, the most imbecile, at
 a certain moment turn round, at a certain point will hear no further
 argument, but stand unflinching by their own dumb, irrational sense of
 right.  It is not only by steel or fire, but through contempt and blame,
 that the martyr fulfils the calling of his dear soul.  Be glad if you are
 not tried by such extremities.  But although all the world ranged
 themselves in one line to tell you 'This is wrong,' be you your own
 faithful vassal and the ambassador of God--throw down the glove and
 answer 'This is right.'  Do you think you are only declaring yourself?
 Perhaps in some dim way, like a child who delivers a message not fully
 understood, you are opening wider the straits of prejudice and preparing
 mankind for some truer and more spiritual grasp of truth; perhaps, as you
 stand forth for your own judgment, you are covering a thousand weak ones
 with your body; perhaps, by this declaration alone, you have avoided the
 guilt of false witness against humanity and the little ones unborn.  It
 is good, I believe, to be respectable, but much nobler to respect oneself
 and utter the voice of God.  God, if there be any God, speaks daily in a
 new language by the tongues of men; the thoughts and habits of each fresh
 generation and each new-coined spirit throw another light upon the
 universe and contain another commentary on the printed Bibles; every
 scruple, every true dissent, every glimpse of something new, is a letter
 of God's alphabet; and though there is a grave responsibility for all who
 speak, is there none for those who unrighteously keep silence and
 conform?  Is not that also to conceal and cloak God's counsel?  And how
 should we regard the man of science who suppressed all facts that would
 not tally with the orthodoxy of the hour?
 
 Wrong?  You are as surely wrong as the sun rose this morning round the
 revolving shoulder of the world.  Not truth, but truthfulness, is the
 good of your endeavour.  For when will men receive that first part and
 prerequisite of truth, that, by the order of things, by the greatness of
 the universe, by the darkness and partiality of man's experience, by the
 inviolate secrecy of God, kept close in His most open revelations, every
 man is, and to the end of the ages must be, wrong?  Wrong to the
 universe; wrong to mankind; wrong to God.  And yet in another sense, and
 that plainer and nearer, every man of men, who wishes truly, must be
 right.  He is right to himself, and in the measure of his sagacity and
 candour.  That let him do in all sincerity and zeal, not sparing a
 thought for contrary opinions; that, for what it is worth, let him
 proclaim.  Be not afraid; although he be wrong, so also is the dead,
 stuffed Dagon he insults.  For the voice of God, whatever it is, is not
 that stammering, inept tradition which the people holds.  These truths
 survive in travesty, swamped in a world of spiritual darkness and
 confusion; and what a few comprehend and faithfully hold, the many, in
 their dead jargon, repeat, degrade, and misinterpret.
 
 So far of Respectability; what the Covenanters used to call 'rank
 conformity': the deadliest gag and wet blanket that can be laid on men.
 And now of Profit.  And this doctrine is perhaps the more redoubtable,
 because it harms all sorts of men; not only the heroic and self-reliant,
 but the obedient, cowlike squadrons.  A man, by this doctrine, looks to
 consequences at the second, or third, or fiftieth turn.  He chooses his
 end, and for that, with wily turns and through a great sea of tedium,
 steers this mortal bark.  There may be political wisdom in such a view;
 but I am persuaded there can spring no great moral zeal.  To look thus
 obliquely upon life is the very recipe for moral slumber.  Our intention
 and endeavour should be directed, not on some vague end of money or
 applause, which shall come to us by a ricochet in a month or a year, or
 twenty years, but on the act itself; not on the approval of others, but
 on the rightness of that act.  At every instant, at every step in life,
 the point has to be decided, our soul has to be saved, heaven has to be
 gained or lost.  At every step our spirits must applaud, at every step we
 must set down the foot and sound the trumpet.  'This have I done,' we
 must say; 'right or wrong, this have I done, in unfeigned honour of
 intention, as to myself and God.'  The profit of every act should be
 this, that it was right for us to do it.  Any other profit than that, if
 it involved a kingdom or the woman I love, ought, if I were God's upright
 soldier, to leave me untempted.
 
 It is the mark of what we call a righteous decision, that it is made
 directly and for its own sake.  The whole man, mind and body, having come
 to an agreement, tyrannically dictates conduct.  There are two
 dispositions eternally opposed: that in which we recognise that one thing
 is wrong and another right, and that in which, not seeing any clear
 distinction, we fall back on the consideration of consequences.  The
 truth is, by the scope of our present teaching, nothing is thought very
 wrong and nothing very right, except a few actions which have the
 disadvantage of being disrespectable when found out; the more serious
 part of men inclining to think all things _rather wrong_, the more jovial
 to suppose them _right enough for practical purposes_.  I will engage my
 head, they do not find that view in their own hearts; they have taken it
 up in a dark despair; they are but troubled sleepers talking in their
 sleep.  The soul, or my soul at least, thinks very distinctly upon many
 points of right and wrong, and often differs flatly with what is held out
 as the thought of corporate humanity in the code of society or the code
 of law.  Am I to suppose myself a monster?  I have only to read books,
 the Christian Gospels for example, to think myself a monster no longer;
 and instead I think the mass of people are merely speaking in their
 sleep.
 
 It is a commonplace, enshrined, if I mistake not, even in school
 copy-books, that honour is to be sought and not fame.  I ask no other
 admission; we are to seek honour, upright walking with our own conscience
 every hour of the day, and not fame, the consequence, the far-off
 reverberation of our footsteps.  The walk, not the rumour of the walk, is
 what concerns righteousness.  Better disrespectable honour than
 dishonourable fame.  Better useless or seemingly hurtful honour, than
 dishonour ruling empires and filling the mouths of thousands.  For the
 man must walk by what he sees, and leave the issue with God who made him
 and taught him by the fortune of his life.  You would not dishonour
 yourself for money; which is at least tangible; would you do it, then,
 for a doubtful forecast in politics, or another person's theory in
 morals?
 
 So intricate is the scheme of our affairs, that no man can calculate the
 bearing of his own behaviour even on those immediately around him, how
 much less upon the world at large or on succeeding generations!  To walk
 by external prudence and the rule of consequences would require, not a
 man, but God.  All that we know to guide us in this changing labyrinth is
 our soul with its fixed design of righteousness, and a few old precepts
 which commend themselves to that.  The precepts are vague when we
 endeavour to apply them; consequences are more entangled than a wisp of
 string, and their confusion is unrestingly in change; we must hold to
 what we know and walk by it.  We must walk by faith, indeed, and not by
 knowledge.
 
 You do not love another because he is wealthy or wise or eminently
 respectable: you love him because you love him; that is love, and any
 other only a derision and grimace.  It should be the same with all our
 actions.  If we were to conceive a perfect man, it should be one who was
 never torn between conflicting impulses, but who, on the absolute consent
 of all his parts and faculties, submitted in every action of his life to
 a self-dictation as absolute and unreasoned as that which bids him love
 one woman and be true to her till death.  But we should not conceive him
 as sagacious, ascetical, playing off his appetites against each other,
 turning the wing of public respectable immorality instead of riding it
 directly down, or advancing toward his end through a thousand sinister
 compromises and considerations.  The one man might be wily, might be
 adroit, might be wise, might be respectable, might be gloriously useful;
 it is the other man who would be good.
 
 The soul asks honour and not fame; to be upright, not to be successful;
 to be good, not prosperous; to be essentially, not outwardly,
 respectable.  Does your soul ask profit?  Does it ask money?  Does it ask
 the approval of the indifferent herd?  I believe not.  For my own part, I
 want but little money, I hope; and I do not want to be decent at all, but
 to be good.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 We have spoken of that supreme self-dictation which keeps varying from
 hour to hour in its dictates with the variation of events and
 circumstances.  Now, for us, that is ultimate.  It may be founded on some
 reasonable process, but it is not a process which we can follow or
 comprehend.  And moreover the dictation is not continuous, or not
 continuous except in very lively and well-living natures; and
 between-whiles we must brush along without it.  Practice is a more
 intricate and desperate business than the toughest theorising; life is an
 affair of cavalry, where rapid judgment and prompt action are alone
 possible and right.  As a matter of fact, there is no one so upright but
 he is influenced by the world's chatter; and no one so headlong but he
 requires to consider consequences and to keep an eye on profit.  For the
 soul adopts all affections and appetites without exception, and cares
 only to combine them for some common purpose which shall interest all.
 Now, respect for the opinion of others, the study of consequences, and
 the desire of power and comfort, are all undeniably factors in the nature
 of man; and the more undeniably since we find that, in our current
 doctrines, they have swallowed up the others and are thought to conclude
 in themselves all the worthy parts of man.  These, then, must also be
 suffered to affect conduct in the practical domain, much or little
 according as they are forcibly or feebly present to the mind of each.
 
 Now, a man's view of the universe is mostly a view of the civilised
 society in which he lives.  Other men and women are so much more grossly
 and so much more intimately palpable to his perceptions, that they stand
 between him and all the rest; they are larger to his eye than the sun, he
 hears them more plainly than thunder, with them, by them, and for them,
 he must live and die.  And hence the laws that affect his intercourse
 with his fellow-men, although merely customary and the creatures of a
 generation, are more clearly and continually before his mind than those
 which bind him into the eternal system of things, support him in his
 upright progress on this whirling ball, or keep up the fire of his bodily
 life.  And hence it is that money stands in the first rank of
 considerations and so powerfully affects the choice.  For our society is
 built with money for mortar; money is present in every joint of
 circumstance; it might be named the social atmosphere, since, in society,
 it is by that alone that men continue to live, and only through that or
 chance that they can reach or affect one another.  Money gives us food,
 shelter, and privacy; it permits us to be clean in person, opens for us
 the doors of the theatre, gains us books for study or pleasure, enables
 us to help the distresses of others, and puts us above necessity so that
 we can choose the best in life.  If we love, it enables us to meet and
 live with the loved one, or even to prolong her health and life; if we
 have scruples, it gives us an opportunity to be honest; if we have any
 bright designs, here is what will smooth the way to their accomplishment.
 Penury is the worst slavery, and will soon lead to death.
 
 But money is only a means; it presupposes a man to use it.  The rich can
 go where he pleases, but perhaps please himself nowhere.  He can buy a
 library or visit the whole world, but perhaps has neither patience to
 read nor intelligence to see.  The table may be loaded and the appetite
 wanting; the purse may be full, and the heart empty.  He may have gained
 the world and lost himself; and with all his wealth around him, in a
 great house and spacious and beautiful demesne, he may live as blank a
 life as any tattered ditcher.  Without an appetite, without an
 aspiration, void of appreciation, bankrupt of desire and hope, there, in
 his great house, let him sit and look upon his fingers.  It is perhaps a
 more fortunate destiny to have a taste for collecting shells than to be
 born a millionaire.  Although neither is to be despised, it is always
 better policy to learn an interest than to make a thousand pounds; for
 the money will soon be spent, or perhaps you may feel no joy in spending
 it; but the interest remains imperishable and ever new.  To become a
 botanist, a geologist, a social philosopher, an antiquary, or an artist,
 is to enlarge one's possessions in the universe by an incalculably higher
 degree, and by a far surer sort of property, than to purchase a farm of
 many acres.  You had perhaps two thousand a year before the transaction;
 perhaps you have two thousand five hundred after it.  That represents
 your gain in the one case.  But in the other, you have thrown down a
 barrier which concealed significance and beauty.  The blind man has
 learned to see.  The prisoner has opened up a window in his cell and
 beholds enchanting prospects; he will never again be a prisoner as he
 was; he can watch clouds and changing seasons, ships on the river,
 travellers on the road, and the stars at night; happy prisoner! his eyes
 have broken jail!  And again he who has learned to love an art or science
 has wisely laid up riches against the day of riches; if prosperity come,
 he will not enter poor into his inheritance; he will not slumber and
 forget himself in the lap of money, or spend his hours in counting idle
 treasures, but be up and briskly doing; he will have the true alchemic
 touch, which is not that of Midas, but which transmutes dead money into
 living delight and satisfaction.  _Etre et pas avoir_--to be, not to
 possess--that is the problem of life.  To be wealthy, a rich nature is
 the first requisite and money but the second.  To be of a quick and
 healthy blood, to share in all honourable curiosities, to be rich in
 admiration and free from envy, to rejoice greatly in the good of others,
 to love with such generosity of heart that your love is still a dear
 possession in absence or unkindness--these are the gifts of fortune which
 money cannot buy and without which money can buy nothing.  For what can a
 man possess, or what can he enjoy, except himself?  If he enlarge his
 nature, it is then that he enlarges his estates.  If his nature be happy
 and valiant, he will enjoy the universe as if it were his park and
 orchard.
 
 But money is not only to be spent; it has also to be earned.  It is not
 merely a convenience or a necessary in social life; but it is the coin in
 which mankind pays his wages to the individual man.  And from this side,
 the question of money has a very different scope and application.  For no
 man can be honest who does not work.  Service for service.  If the farmer
 buys corn, and the labourer ploughs and reaps, and the baker sweats in
 his hot bakery, plainly you who eat must do something in your turn.  It
 is not enough to take off your hat, or to thank God upon your knees for
 the admirable constitution of society and your own convenient situation
 in its upper and more ornamental stories.  Neither is it enough to buy
 the loaf with a sixpence; for then you are only changing the point of the
 inquiry; and you must first have _bought the sixpence_.  Service for
 service: how have you bought your sixpences?  A man of spirit desires
 certainty in a thing of such a nature; he must see to it that there is
 some reciprocity between him and mankind; that he pays his expenditure in
 service; that he has not a lion's share in profit and a drone's in
 labour; and is not a sleeping partner and mere costly incubus on the
 great mercantile concern of mankind.
 
 Services differ so widely with different gifts, and some are so
 inappreciable to external tests, that this is not only a matter for the
 private conscience, but one which even there must be leniently and
 trustfully considered.  For remember how many serve mankind who do no
 more than meditate; and how many are precious to their friends for no
 more than a sweet and joyous temper.  To perform the function of a man of
 letters it is not necessary to write; nay, it is perhaps better to be a
 living book.  So long as we love we serve; so long as we are loved by
 others, I would almost say that we are indispensable; and no man is
 useless while he has a friend.  The true services of life are inestimable
 in money, and are never paid.  Kind words and caresses, high and wise
 thoughts, humane designs, tender behaviour to the weak and suffering, and
 all the charities of man's existence, are neither bought nor sold.
 
 Yet the dearest and readiest, if not the most just, criterion of a man's
 services, is the wage that mankind pays him or, briefly, what he earns.
 There at least there can be no ambiguity.  St. Paul is fully and freely
 entitled to his earnings as a tentmaker, and Socrates fully and freely
 entitled to his earnings as a sculptor, although the true business of
 each was not only something different, but something which remained
 unpaid.  A man cannot forget that he is not superintended, and serves
 mankind on parole.  He would like, when challenged by his own conscience,
 to reply: 'I have done so much work, and no less, with my own hands and
 brain, and taken so much profit, and no more, for my own personal
 delight.'  And though St. Paul, if he had possessed a private fortune,
 would probably have scorned to waste his time in making tents, yet of all
 sacrifices to public opinion none can be more easily pardoned than that
 by which a man, already spiritually useful to the world, should restrict
 the field of his chief usefulness to perform services more apparent, and
 possess a livelihood that neither stupidity nor malice could call in
 question.  Like all sacrifices to public opinion and mere external
 decency, this would certainly be wrong; for the soul should rest
 contented with its own approval and indissuadably pursue its own calling.
 Yet, so grave and delicate is the question, that a man may well hesitate
 before he decides it for himself; he may well fear that he sets too high
 a valuation on his own endeavours after good; he may well condescend upon
 a humbler duty, where others than himself shall judge the service and
 proportion the wage.
 
 And yet it is to this very responsibility that the rich are born.  They
 can shuffle off the duty on no other; they are their own paymasters on
 parole; and must pay themselves fair wages and no more.  For I suppose
 that in the course of ages, and through reform and civil war and
 invasion, mankind was pursuing some other and more general design than to
 set one or two Englishmen of the nineteenth century beyond the reach of
 needs and duties.  Society was scarce put together, and defended with so
 much eloquence and blood, for the convenience of two or three
 millionaires and a few hundred other persons of wealth and position.  It
 is plain that if mankind thus acted and suffered during all these
 generations, they hoped some benefit, some ease, some wellbeing, for
 themselves and their descendants; that if they supported law and order,
 it was to secure fair-play for all; that if they denied themselves in the
 present, they must have had some designs upon the future.  Now, a great
 hereditary fortune is a miracle of man's wisdom and mankind's
 forbearance; it has not only been amassed and handed down, it has been
 suffered to be amassed and handed down; and surely in such a
 consideration as this, its possessor should find only a new spur to
 activity and honour, that with all this power of service he should not
 prove unserviceable, and that this mass of treasure should return in
 benefits upon the race.  If he had twenty, or thirty, or a hundred
 thousand at his banker's, or if all Yorkshire or all California were his
 to manage or to sell, he would still be morally penniless, and have the
 world to begin like Whittington, until he had found some way of serving
 mankind.  His wage is physically in his own hand; but, in honour, that
 wage must still be earned.  He is only steward on parole of what is
 called his fortune.  He must honourably perform his stewardship.  He must
 estimate his own services and allow himself a salary in proportion, for
 that will be one among his functions.  And while he will then be free to
 spend that salary, great or little, on his own private pleasures, the
 rest of his fortune he but holds and disposes under trust for mankind; it
 is not his, because he has not earned it; it cannot be his, because his
 services have already been paid; but year by year it is his to
 distribute, whether to help individuals whose birthright and outfit have
 been swallowed up in his, or to further public works and institutions.
 
 At this rate, short of inspiration, it seems hardly possible to be both
 rich and honest; and the millionaire is under a far more continuous
 temptation to thieve than the labourer who gets his shilling daily for
 despicable toils.  Are you surprised?  It is even so.  And you repeat it
 every Sunday in your churches.  'It is easier for a camel to pass through
 the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the kingdom of God.'  I
 have heard this and similar texts ingeniously explained away and brushed
 from the path of the aspiring Christian by the tender Great-heart of the
 parish.  One excellent clergyman told us that the 'eye of a needle' meant
 a low, Oriental postern through which camels could not pass till they
 were unloaded--which is very likely just; and then went on, bravely
 confounding the 'kingdom of God' with heaven, the future paradise, to
 show that of course no rich person could expect to carry his riches
 beyond the grave--which, of course, he could not and never did.  Various
 greedy sinners of the congregation drank in the comfortable doctrine with
 relief.  It was worth the while having come to church that Sunday
 morning!  All was plain.  The Bible, as usual, meant nothing in
 particular; it was merely an obscure and figurative school-copybook; and
 if a man were only respectable, he was a man after God's own heart.
 
 Alas! I fear not.  And though this matter of a man's services is one for
 his own conscience, there are some cases in which it is difficult to
 restrain the mind from judging.  Thus I shall be very easily persuaded
 that a man has earned his daily bread; and if he has but a friend or two
 to whom his company is delightful at heart, I am more than persuaded at
 once.  But it will be very hard to persuade me that any one has earned an
 income of a hundred thousand.  What he is to his friends, he still would
 be if he were made penniless to-morrow; for as to the courtiers of luxury
 and power, I will neither consider them friends, nor indeed consider them
 at all.  What he does for mankind there are most likely hundreds who
 would do the same, as effectually for the race and as pleasurably to
 themselves, for the merest fraction of this monstrous wage.  Why it is
 paid, I am, therefore, unable to conceive, and as the man pays it
 himself, out of funds in his detention, I have a certain backwardness to
 think him honest.
 
 At least, we have gained a very obvious point: that _what a man spends
 upon himself_, _he shall have earned by services to the race_.  Thence
 flows a principle for the outset of life, which is a little different
 from that taught in the present day.  I am addressing the middle and the
 upper classes; those who have already been fostered and prepared for life
 at some expense; those who have some choice before them, and can pick
 professions; and above all, those who are what is called independent, and
 need do nothing unless pushed by honour or ambition.  In this particular
 the poor are happy; among them, when a lad comes to his strength, he must
 take the work that offers, and can take it with an easy conscience.  But
 in the richer classes the question is complicated by the number of
 opportunities and a variety of considerations.  Here, then, this
 principle of ours comes in helpfully.  The young man has to seek, not a
 road to wealth, but an opportunity of service; not money, but honest
 work.  If he has some strong propensity, some calling of nature, some
 over-weening interest in any special field of industry, inquiry, or art,
 he will do right to obey the impulse; and that for two reasons: the first
 external, because there he will render the best services; the second
 personal, because a demand of his own nature is to him without appeal
 whenever it can be satisfied with the consent of his other faculties and
 appetites.  If he has no such elective taste, by the very principle on
 which he chooses any pursuit at all he must choose the most honest and
 serviceable, and not the most highly remunerated.  We have here an
 external problem, not from or to ourself, but flowing from the
 constitution of society; and we have our own soul with its fixed design
 of righteousness.  All that can be done is to present the problem in
 proper terms, and leave it to the soul of the individual.  Now, the
 problem to the poor is one of necessity: to earn wherewithal to live,
 they must find remunerative labour.  But the problem to the rich is one
 of honour: having the wherewithal, they must find serviceable labour.
 Each has to earn his daily bread: the one, because he has not yet got it
 to eat; the other, who has already eaten it, because he has not yet
 earned it.
 
 Of course, what is true of bread is true of luxuries and comforts,
 whether for the body or the mind.  But the consideration of luxuries
 leads us to a new aspect of the whole question, and to a second
 proposition no less true, and maybe no less startling, than the last.
 
 At the present day, we, of the easier classes, are in a state of surfeit
 and disgrace after meat.  Plethora has filled us with indifference; and
 we are covered from head to foot with the callosities of habitual
 opulence.  Born into what is called a certain rank, we live, as the
 saying is, up to our station.  We squander without enjoyment, because our
 fathers squandered.  We eat of the best, not from delicacy, but from
 brazen habit.  We do not keenly enjoy or eagerly desire the presence of a
 luxury; we are unaccustomed to its absence.  And not only do we squander
 money from habit, but still more pitifully waste it in ostentation.  I
 can think of no more melancholy disgrace for a creature who professes
 either reason or pleasure for his guide, than to spend the smallest
 fraction of his income upon that which he does not desire; and to keep a
 carriage in which you do not wish to drive, or a butler of whom you are
 afraid, is a pathetic kind of folly.  Money, being a means of happiness,
 should make both parties happy when it changes hands; rightly disposed,
 it should be twice blessed in its employment; and buyer and seller should
 alike have their twenty shillings worth of profit out of every pound.
 Benjamin Franklin went through life an altered man, because he once paid
 too dearly for a penny whistle.  My concern springs usually from a deeper
 source, to wit, from having bought a whistle when I did not want one.  I
 find I regret this, or would regret it if I gave myself the time, not
 only on personal but on moral and philanthropical considerations.  For,
 first, in a world where money is wanting to buy books for eager students
 and food and medicine for pining children, and where a large majority are
 starved in their most immediate desires, it is surely base, stupid, and
 cruel to squander money when I am pushed by no appetite and enjoy no
 return of genuine satisfaction.  My philanthropy is wide enough in scope
 to include myself; and when I have made myself happy, I have at least one
 good argument that I have acted rightly; but where that is not so, and I
 have bought and not enjoyed, my mouth is closed, and I conceive that I
 have robbed the poor.  And, second, anything I buy or use which I do not
 sincerely want or cannot vividly enjoy, disturbs the balance of supply
 and demand, and contributes to remove industrious hands from the
 production of what is useful or pleasurable and to keep them busy upon
 ropes of sand and things that are a weariness to the flesh.  That
 extravagance is truly sinful, and a very silly sin to boot, in which we
 impoverish mankind and ourselves.  It is another question for each man's
 heart.  He knows if he can enjoy what he buys and uses; if he cannot, he
 is a dog in the manger; nay, it he cannot, I contend he is a thief, for
 nothing really belongs to a man which he cannot use.  Proprietor is
 connected with propriety; and that only is the man's which is proper to
 his wants and faculties.
 
 A youth, in choosing a career, must not be alarmed by poverty.  Want is a
 sore thing, but poverty does not imply want.  It remains to be seen
 whether with half his present income, or a third, he cannot, in the most
 generous sense, live as fully as at present.  He is a fool who objects to
 luxuries; but he is also a fool who does not protest against the waste of
 luxuries on those who do not desire and cannot enjoy them.  It remains to
 be seen, by each man who would live a true life to himself and not a
 merely specious life to society, how many luxuries he truly wants and to
 how many he merely submits as to a social propriety; and all these last
 he will immediately forswear.  Let him do this, and he will be surprised
 to find how little money it requires to keep him in complete contentment
 and activity of mind and senses.  Life at any level among the easy
 classes is conceived upon a principle of rivalry, where each man and each
 household must ape the tastes and emulate the display of others.  One is
 delicate in eating, another in wine, a third in furniture or works of art
 or dress; and I, who care nothing for any of these refinements, who am
 perhaps a plain athletic creature and love exercise, beef, beer, flannel
 shirts and a camp bed, am yet called upon to assimilate all these other
 tastes and make these foreign occasions of expenditure my own.  It may be
 cynical: I am sure I shall be told it is selfish; but I will spend my
 money as I please and for my own intimate personal gratification, and
 should count myself a nincompoop indeed to lay out the colour of a
 halfpenny on any fancied social decency or duty.  I shall not wear gloves
 unless my hands are cold, or unless I am born with a delight in them.
 Dress is my own affair, and that of one other in the world; that, in fact
 and for an obvious reason, of any woman who shall chance to be in love
 with me.  I shall lodge where I have a mind.  If I do not ask society to
 live with me, they must be silent; and even if I do, they have no further
 right but to refuse the invitation!  There is a kind of idea abroad that
 a man must live up to his station, that his house, his table, and his
 toilette, shall be in a ratio of equivalence, and equally imposing to the
 world.  If this is in the Bible, the passage has eluded my inquiries.  If
 it is not in the Bible, it is nowhere but in the heart of the fool.
 Throw aside this fancy.  See what you want, and spend upon that;
 distinguish what you do not care about, and spend nothing upon that.
 There are not many people who can differentiate wines above a certain and
 that not at all a high price.  Are you sure you are one of these?  Are
 you sure you prefer cigars at sixpence each to pipes at some fraction of
 a farthing?  Are you sure you wish to keep a gig?  Do you care about
 where you sleep, or are you not as much at your ease in a cheap lodging
 as in an Elizabethan manor-house?  Do you enjoy fine clothes?  It is not
 possible to answer these questions without a trial; and there is nothing
 more obvious to my mind, than that a man who has not experienced some ups
 and downs, and been forced to live more cheaply than in his father's
 house, has still his education to begin.  Let the experiment be made, and
 he will find to his surprise that he has been eating beyond his appetite
 up to that hour; that the cheap lodging, the cheap tobacco, the rough
 country clothes, the plain table, have not only no power to damp his
 spirits, but perhaps give him as keen pleasure in the using as the
 dainties that he took, betwixt sleep and waking, in his former callous
 and somnambulous submission to wealth.
 
 The true Bohemian, a creature lost to view under the imaginary Bohemians
 of literature, is exactly described by such a principle of life.  The
 Bohemian of the novel, who drinks more than is good for him and prefers
 anything to work, and wears strange clothes, is for the most part a
 respectable Bohemian, respectable in disrespectability, living for the
 outside, and an adventurer.  But the man I mean lives wholly to himself,
 does what he wishes, and not what is thought proper, buys what he wants
 for himself, and not what is thought proper, works at what he believes he
 can do well and not what will bring him in money or favour.  You may be
 the most respectable of men, and yet a true Bohemian.  And the test is
 this: a Bohemian, for as poor as he may be, is always open-handed to his
 friends; he knows what he can do with money and how he can do without it,
 a far rarer and more useful knowledge; he has had less, and continued to
 live in some contentment; and hence he cares not to keep more, and shares
 his sovereign or his shilling with a friend.  The poor, if they are
 generous, are Bohemian in virtue of their birth.  Do you know where
 beggars go?  Not to the great houses where people sit dazed among their
 thousands, but to the doors of poor men who have seen the world; and it
 was the widow who had only two mites, who cast half her fortune into the
 treasury.
 
 But a young man who elects to save on dress or on lodging, or who in any
 way falls out of the level of expenditure which is common to his level in
 society, falls out of society altogether.  I suppose the young man to
 have chosen his career on honourable principles; he finds his talents and
 instincts can be best contented in a certain pursuit; in a certain
 industry, he is sure that he is serving mankind with a healthy and
 becoming service; and he is not sure that he would be doing so, or doing
 so equally well, in any other industry within his reach.  Then that is
 his true sphere in life; not the one in which he was born to his father,
 but the one which is proper to his talents and instincts.  And suppose he
 does fall out of society, is that a cause of sorrow?  Is your heart so
 dead that you prefer the recognition of many to the love of a few?  Do
 you think society loves you?  Put it to the proof.  Decline in material
 expenditure, and you will find they care no more for you than for the
 Khan of Tartary.  You will lose no friends.  If you had any, you will
 keep them.  Only those who were friends to your coat and equipage will
 disappear; the smiling faces will disappear as by enchantment; but the
 kind hearts will remain steadfastly kind.  Are you so lost, are you so
 dead, are you so little sure of your own soul and your own footing upon
 solid fact, that you prefer before goodness and happiness the countenance
 of sundry diners-out, who will flee from you at a report of ruin, who
 will drop you with insult at a shadow of disgrace, who do not know you
 and do not care to know you but by sight, and whom you in your turn
 neither know nor care to know in a more human manner?  Is it not the
 principle of society, openly avowed, that friendship must not interfere
 with business; which being paraphrased, means simply that a consideration
 of money goes before any consideration of affection known to this
 cold-blooded gang, that they have not even the honour of thieves, and
 will rook their nearest and dearest as readily as a stranger?  I hope I
 would go as far as most to serve a friend; but I declare openly I would
 not put on my hat to do a pleasure to society.  I may starve my appetites
 and control my temper for the sake of those I love; but society shall
 take me as I choose to be, or go without me.  Neither they nor I will
 lose; for where there is no love, it is both laborious and unprofitable
 to associate.
 
 But it is obvious that if it is only right for a man to spend money on
 that which he can truly and thoroughly enjoy, the doctrine applies with
 equal force to the rich and to the poor, to the man who has amassed many
 thousands as well as to the youth precariously beginning life.  And it
 may be asked, Is not this merely preparing misers, who are not the best
 of company?  But the principle was this: that which a man has not fairly
 earned, and, further, that which he cannot fully enjoy, does not belong
 to him, but is a part of mankind's treasure which he holds as steward on
 parole.  To mankind, then, it must be made profitable; and how this
 should be done is, once more, a problem which each man must solve for
 himself, and about which none has a right to judge him.  Yet there are a
 few considerations which are very obvious and may here be stated.
 Mankind is not only the whole in general, but every one in particular.
 Every man or woman is one of mankind's dear possessions; to his or her
 just brain, and kind heart, and active hands, mankind intrusts some of
 its hopes for the future; he or she is a possible well-spring of good
 acts and source of blessings to the race.  This money which you do not
 need, which, in a rigid sense, you do not want, may therefore be returned
 not only in public benefactions to the race, but in private kindnesses.
 Your wife, your children, your friends stand nearest to you, and should
 be helped the first.  There at least there can be little imposture, for
 you know their necessities of your own knowledge.  And consider, if all
 the world did as you did, and according to their means extended help in
 the circle of their affections, there would be no more crying want in
 times of plenty and no more cold, mechanical charity given with a doubt
 and received with confusion.  Would not this simple rule make a new world
 out of the old and cruel one which we inhabit?
 
                                 * * * * *
 
           [_After two more sentences the fragment breaks off_.]
 
 
 
 
 FATHER DAMIEN
 AN OPEN LETTER TO THE REVEREND DR. HYDE OF HONOLULU
 
 
                                                                    SYDNEY,
                                                       _February_ 25, 1890.
 
 Sir,--It may probably occur to you that we have met, and visited, and
 conversed; on my side, with interest.  You may remember that you have
 done me several courtesies, for which I was prepared to be grateful.  But
 there are duties which come before gratitude, and offences which justly
 divide friends, far more acquaintances.  Your letter to the Reverend H.
 B. Gage is a document which, in my sight, if you had filled me with bread
 when I was starving, if you had sat up to nurse my father when he lay
 a-dying, would yet absolve me from the bonds of gratitude.  You know
 enough, doubtless, of the process of canonisation to be aware that, a
 hundred years after the death of Damien, there will appear a man charged
 with the painful office of the _devil's advocate_.  After that noble
 brother of mine, and of all frail clay, shall have lain a century at
 rest, one shall accuse, one defend him.  The circumstance is unusual that
 the devil's advocate should be a volunteer, should be a member of a sect
 immediately rival, and should make haste to take upon himself his ugly
 office ere the bones are cold; unusual, and of a taste which I shall
 leave my readers free to qualify; unusual, and to me inspiring.  If I
 have at all learned the trade of using words to convey truth and to
 arouse emotion, you have at last furnished me with a subject.  For it is
 in the interest of all mankind, and the cause of public decency in every
 quarter of the world, not only that Damien should be righted, but that
 you and your letter should be displayed at length, in their true colours,
 to the public eye.
 
 To do this properly, I must begin by quoting you at large: I shall then
 proceed to criticise your utterance from several points of view, divine
 and human, in the course of which I shall attempt to draw again, and with
 more specification, the character of the dead saint whom it has pleased
 you to vilify: so much being done, I shall say farewell to you for ever.
 
                                                                 'HONOLULU,
                                                         '_August_ 2, 1889.
 
     'Rev. H. B. GAGE.
 
     'Dear Brother,--In answer to your inquiries about Father Damien, I
     can only reply that we who knew the man are surprised at the
     extravagant newspaper laudations, as if he was a most saintly
     philanthropist.  The simple truth is, he was a coarse, dirty man,
     head-strong and bigoted.  He was not sent to Molokai, but went there
     without orders; did not stay at the leper settlement (before he
     became one himself), but circulated freely over the whole island
     (less than half the island is devoted to the lepers), and he came
     often to Honolulu.  He had no hand in the reforms and improvements
     inaugurated, which were the work of our Board of Health, as occasion
     required and means were provided.  He was not a pure man in his
     relations with women, and the leprosy of which he died should be
     attributed to his vices and carelessness.  Others have done much for
     the lepers, our own ministers, the government physicians, and so
     forth, but never with the Catholic idea of meriting eternal
     life.--Yours, etc.,
 
                                                         'C. M. HYDE.' {65}
 
 To deal fitly with a letter so extraordinary, I must draw at the outset
 on my private knowledge of the signatory and his sect.  It may offend
 others; scarcely you, who have been so busy to collect, so bold to
 publish, gossip on your rivals.  And this is perhaps the moment when I
 may best explain to you the character of what you are to read: I conceive
 you as a man quite beyond and below the reticences of civility: with what
 measure you mete, with that shall it be measured you again; with you, at
 last, I rejoice to feel the button off the foil and to plunge home.  And
 if in aught that I shall say I should offend others, your colleagues,
 whom I respect and remember with affection, I can but offer them my
 regret; I am not free, I am inspired by the consideration of interests
 far more large; and such pain as can be inflicted by anything from me
 must be indeed trifling when compared with the pain with which they read
 your letter.  It is not the hangman, but the criminal, that brings
 dishonour on the house.
 
 You belong, sir, to a sect--I believe my sect, and that in which my
 ancestors laboured--which has enjoyed, and partly failed to utilise, an
 exceptional advantage in the islands of Hawaii.  The first missionaries
 came; they found the land already self-purged of its old and bloody
 faith; they were embraced, almost on their arrival, with enthusiasm; what
 troubles they supported came far more from whites than from Hawaiians;
 and to these last they stood (in a rough figure) in the shoes of God.
 This is not the place to enter into the degree or causes of their
 failure, such as it is.  One element alone is pertinent, and must here be
 plainly dealt with.  In the course of their evangelical calling, they--or
 too many of them--grew rich.  It may be news to you that the houses of
 missionaries are a cause of mocking on the streets of Honolulu.  It will
 at least be news to you, that when I returned your civil visit, the
 driver of my cab commented on the size, the taste, and the comfort of
 your home.  It would have been news certainly to myself, had any one told
 me that afternoon that I should live to drag such matter into print.  But
 you see, sir, how you degrade better men to your own level; and it is
 needful that those who are to judge betwixt you and me, betwixt Damien
 and the devil's advocate, should understand your letter to have been
 penned in a house which could raise, and that very justly, the envy and
 the comments of the passers-by.  I think (to employ a phrase of yours
 which I admire) it 'should be attributed' to you that you have never
 visited the scene of Damien's life and death.  If you had, and had
 recalled it, and looked about your pleasant rooms, even your pen perhaps
 would have been stayed.
 
 Your sect (and remember, as far as any sect avows me, it is mine) has not
 done ill in a worldly sense in the Hawaiian Kingdom.  When calamity
 befell their innocent parishioners, when leprosy descended and took root
 in the Eight Islands, a _quid pro quo_ was to be looked for.  To that
 prosperous mission, and to you, as one of its adornments, God had sent at
 last an opportunity.  I know I am touching here upon a nerve acutely
 sensitive.  I know that others of your colleagues look back on the
 inertia of your Church, and the intrusive and decisive heroism of Damien,
 with something almost to be called remorse.  I am sure it is so with
 yourself; I am persuaded your letter was inspired by a certain envy, not
 essentially ignoble, and the one human trait to be espied in that
 performance.  You were thinking of the lost chance, the past day; of that
 which should have been conceived and was not; of the service due and not
 rendered.  Time was, said the voice in your ear, in your pleasant room,
 as you sat raging and writing; and if the words written were base beyond
 parallel, the rage, I am happy to repeat--it is the only compliment I
 shall pay you--the rage was almost virtuous.  But, sir, when we have
 failed, and another has succeeded; when we have stood by, and another has
 stepped in; when we sit and grow bulky in our charming mansions, and a
 plain, uncouth peasant steps into the battle, under the eyes of God, and
 succours the afflicted, and consoles the dying, and is himself afflicted
 in his turn, and dies upon the field of honour--the battle cannot be
 retrieved as your unhappy irritation has suggested.  It is a lost battle,
 and lost for ever.  One thing remained to you in your defeat--some rags
 of common honour; and these you have made haste to cast away.
 
 Common honour; not the honour of having done anything right, but the
 honour of not having done aught conspicuously foul; the honour of the
 inert: that was what remained to you.  We are not all expected to be
 Damiens; a man may conceive his duty more narrowly, he may love his
 comforts better; and none will cast a stone at him for that.  But will a
 gentleman of your reverend profession allow me an example from the fields
 of gallantry?  When two gentlemen compete for the favour of a lady, and
 the one succeeds and the other is rejected, and (as will sometimes
 happen) matter damaging to the successful rival's credit reaches the ear
 of the defeated, it is held by plain men of no pretensions that his mouth
 is, in the circumstance, almost necessarily closed.  Your Church and
 Damien's were in Hawaii upon a rivalry to do well: to help, to edify, to
 set divine examples.  You having (in one huge instance) failed, and
 Damien succeeded, I marvel it should not have occurred to you that you
 were doomed to silence; that when you had been outstripped in that high
 rivalry, and sat inglorious in the midst of your wellbeing, in your
 pleasant room--and Damien, crowned with glories and horrors, toiled and
 rotted in that pigsty of his under the cliffs of Kalawao--you, the elect
 who would not, were the last man on earth to collect and propagate gossip
 on the volunteer who would and did.
 
 I think I see you--for I try to see you in the flesh as I write these
 sentences--I think I see you leap at the word pigsty, a hyperbolical
 expression at the best.  'He had no hand in the reforms,' he was 'a
 coarse, dirty man'; these were your own words; and you may think it
 possible that I am come to support you with fresh evidence.  In a sense,
 it is even so.  Damien has been too much depicted with a conventional
 halo and conventional features; so drawn by men who perhaps had not the
 eye to remark or the pen to express the individual; or who perhaps were
 only blinded and silenced by generous admiration, such as I partly envy
 for myself--such as you, if your soul were enlightened, would envy on
 your bended knees.  It is the least defect of such a method of
 portraiture that it makes the path easy for the devil's advocate, and
 leaves for the misuse of the slanderer a considerable field of truth.
 For the truth that is suppressed by friends is the readiest weapon of the
 enemy.  The world, in your despite, may perhaps owe you something, if
 your letter be the means of substituting once for all a credible likeness
 for a wax abstraction.  For, if that world at all remember you, on the
 day when Damien of Molokai shall be named Saint, it will be in virtue of
 one work: your letter to the Reverend H. B. Gage.
 
 You may ask on what authority I speak.  It was my inclement destiny to
 become acquainted, not with Damien, but with Dr. Hyde.  When I visited
 the lazaretto, Damien was already in his resting grave.  But such
 information as I have, I gathered on the spot in conversation with those
 who knew him well and long: some indeed who revered his memory; but
 others who had sparred and wrangled with him, who beheld him with no
 halo, who perhaps regarded him with small respect, and through whose
 unprepared and scarcely partial communications the plain, human features
 of the man shone on me convincingly.  These gave me what knowledge I
 possess; and I learnt it in that scene where it could be most completely
 and sensitively understood--Kalawao, which you have never visited, about
 which you have never so much as endeavoured to inform yourself; for,
 brief as your letter is, you have found the means to stumble into that
 confession.  '_Less than one-half_ of the island,' you say, 'is devoted
 to the lepers.'  Molokai--'_Molokai ahina_,' the 'grey,' lofty, and most
 desolate island--along all its northern side plunges a front of precipice
 into a sea of unusual profundity.  This range of cliff is, from east to
 west, the true end and frontier of the island.  Only in one spot there
 projects into the ocean a certain triangular and rugged down, grassy,
 stony, windy, and rising in the midst into a hill with a dead crater: the
 whole bearing to the cliff that overhangs it somewhat the same relation
 as a bracket to a wall.  With this hint you will now be able to pick out
 the leper station on a map; you will be able to judge how much of Molokai
 is thus cut off between the surf and precipice, whether less than a half,
 or less than a quarter, or a fifth, or a tenth--or, say, a twentieth; and
 the next time you burst into print you will be in a position to share
 with us the issue of your calculations.
 
 I imagine you to be one of those persons who talk with cheerfulness of
 that place which oxen and wain-ropes could not drag you to behold.  You,
 who do not even know its situation on the map, probably denounce
 sensational descriptions, stretching your limbs the while in your
 pleasant parlour on Beretania Street.  When I was pulled ashore there one
 early morning, there sat with me in the boat two sisters, bidding
 farewell (in humble imitation of Damien) to the lights and joys of human
 life.  One of these wept silently; I could not withhold myself from
 joining her.  Had you been there, it is my belief that nature would have
 triumphed even in you; and as the boat drew but a little nearer, and you
 beheld the stairs crowded with abominable deformations of our common
 manhood, and saw yourself landing in the midst of such a population as
 only now and then surrounds us in the horror of a nightmare--what a
 haggard eye you would have rolled over your reluctant shoulder towards
 the house on Beretania Street!  Had you gone on; had you found every
 fourth face a blot upon the landscape; had you visited the hospital and
 seen the butt-ends of human beings lying there almost unrecognisable, but
 still breathing, still thinking, still remembering; you would have
 understood that life in the lazaretto is an ordeal from which the nerves
 of a man's spirit shrink, even as his eye quails under the brightness of
 the sun; you would have felt it was (even to-day) a pitiful place to
 visit and a hell to dwell in.  It is not the fear of possible infection.
 That seems a little thing when compared with the pain, the pity, and the
 disgust of the visitor's surroundings, and the atmosphere of affliction,
 disease, and physical disgrace in which he breathes.  I do not think I am
 a man more than usually timid; but I never recall the days and nights I
 spent upon that island promontory (eight days and seven nights), without
 heartfelt thankfulness that I am somewhere else.  I find in my diary that
 I speak of my stay as a 'grinding experience': I have once jotted in the
 margin, '_Harrowing_ is the word'; and when the _Mokolii_ bore me at last
 towards the outer world, I kept repeating to myself, with a new
 conception of their pregnancy, those simple words of the song--
 
     ''Tis the most distressful country that ever yet was seen.'
 
 And observe: that which I saw and suffered from was a settlement purged,
 bettered, beautified; the new village built, the hospital and the
 Bishop-Home excellently arranged; the sisters, the doctor, and the
 missionaries, all indefatigable in their noble tasks.  It was a different
 place when Damien came there and made his great renunciation, and slept
 that first night under a tree amidst his rotting brethren: alone with
 pestilence; and looking forward (with what courage, with what pitiful
 sinkings of dread, God only knows) to a lifetime of dressing sores and
 stumps.
 
 You will say, perhaps, I am too sensitive, that sights as painful abound
 in cancer hospitals and are confronted daily by doctors and nurses.  I
 have long learned to admire and envy the doctors and the nurses.  But
 there is no cancer hospital so large and populous as Kalawao and
 Kalaupapa; and in such a matter every fresh case, like every inch of
 length in the pipe of an organ, deepens the note of the impression; for
 what daunts the onlooker is that monstrous sum of human suffering by
 which he stands surrounded.  Lastly, no doctor or nurse is called upon to
 enter once for all the doors of that gehenna; they do not say farewell,
 they need not abandon hope, on its sad threshold; they but go for a time
 to their high calling, and can look forward as they go to relief, to
 recreation, and to rest.  But Damien shut-to with his own hand the doors
 of his own sepulchre.
 
 I shall now extract three passages from my diary at Kalawao.
 
 _A_.  'Damien is dead and already somewhat ungratefully remembered in the
 field of his labours and sufferings.  "He was a good man, but very
 officious," says one.  Another tells me he had fallen (as other priests
 so easily do) into something of the ways and habits of thought of a
 Kanaka; but he had the wit to recognise the fact, and the good sense to
 laugh at' [over] 'it.  A plain man it seems he was; I cannot find he was
 a popular.'
 
 _B_.  'After Ragsdale's death' [Ragsdale was a famous Luna, or overseer,
 of the unruly settlement] 'there followed a brief term of office by
 Father Damien which served only to publish the weakness of that noble
 man.  He was rough in his ways, and he had no control.  Authority was
 relaxed; Damien's life was threatened, and he was soon eager to resign.'
 
 _C_.  'Of Damien I begin to have an idea.  He seems to have been a man of
 the peasant class, certainly of the peasant type: shrewd, ignorant and
 bigoted, yet with an open mind, and capable of receiving and digesting a
 reproof if it were bluntly administered; superbly generous in the least
 thing as well as in the greatest, and as ready to give his last shirt
 (although not without human grumbling) as he had been to sacrifice his
 life; essentially indiscreet and officious, which made him a troublesome
 colleague; domineering in all his ways, which made him incurably
 unpopular with the Kanakas, but yet destitute of real authority, so that
 his boys laughed at him and he must carry out his wishes by the means of
 bribes.  He learned to have a mania for doctoring; and set up the Kanakas
 against the remedies of his regular rivals: perhaps (if anything matter
 at all in the treatment of such a disease) the worst thing that he did,
 and certainly the easiest.  The best and worst of the man appear very
 plainly in his dealings with Mr. Chapman's money; he had originally laid
 it out' [intended to lay it out] 'entirely for the benefit of Catholics,
 and even so not wisely; but after a long, plain talk, he admitted his
 error fully and revised the list.  The sad state of the boys' home is in
 part the result of his lack of control; in part, of his own slovenly ways
 and false ideas of hygiene.  Brother officials used to call it "Damien's
 Chinatown."  "Well," they would say, "your China-town keeps growing."
 And he would laugh with perfect good-nature, and adhere to his errors
 with perfect obstinacy.  So much I have gathered of truth about this
 plain, noble human brother and father of ours; his imperfections are the
 traits of his face, by which we know him for our fellow; his martyrdom
 and his example nothing can lessen or annul; and only a person here on
 the spot can properly appreciate their greatness.'
 
 I have set down these private passages, as you perceive, without
 correction; thanks to you, the public has them in their bluntness.  They
 are almost a list of the man's faults, for it is rather these that I was
 seeking: with his virtues, with the heroic profile of his life, I and the
 world were already sufficiently acquainted.  I was besides a little
 suspicious of Catholic testimony; in no ill sense, but merely because
 Damien's admirers and disciples were the least likely to be critical.  I
 know you will be more suspicious still; and the facts set down above were
 one and all collected from the lips of Protestants who had opposed the
 father in his life.  Yet I am strangely deceived, or they build up the
 image of a man, with all his weaknesses, essentially heroic, and alive
 with rugged honesty, generosity, and mirth.
 
 Take it for what it is, rough private jottings of the worst sides of
 Damien's character, collected from the lips of those who had laboured
 with and (in your own phrase) 'knew the man';--though I question whether
 Damien would have said that he knew you.  Take it, and observe with
 wonder how well you were served by your gossips, how ill by your
 intelligence and sympathy; in how many points of fact we are at one, and
 how widely our appreciations vary.  There is something wrong here; either
 with you or me.  It is possible, for instance, that you, who seem to have
 so many ears in Kalawao, had heard of the affair of Mr. Chapman's money,
 and were singly struck by Damien's intended wrong-doing.  I was struck
 with that also, and set it fairly down; but I was struck much more by the
 fact that he had the honesty of mind to be convinced.  I may here tell
 you that it was a long business; that one of his colleagues sat with him
 late into the night, multiplying arguments and accusations; that the
 father listened as usual with 'perfect good-nature and perfect
 obstinacy'; but at the last, when he was persuaded--'Yes,' said he, 'I am
 very much obliged to you; you have done me a service; it would have been
 a theft.'  There are many (not Catholics merely) who require their heroes
 and saints to be infallible; to these the story will be painful; not to
 the true lovers, patrons, and servants of mankind.
 
 And I take it, this is a type of our division; that you are one of those
 who have an eye for faults and failures; that you take a pleasure to find
 and publish them; and that, having found them, you make haste to forget
 the overvailing virtues and the real success which had alone introduced
 them to your knowledge.  It is a dangerous frame of mind.  That you may
 understand how dangerous, and into what a situation it has already
 brought you, we will (if you please) go hand-in-hand through the
 different phrases of your letter, and candidly examine each from the
 point of view of its truth, its appositeness, and its charity.
 
 Damien was _coarse_.
 
 It is very possible.  You make us sorry for the lepers, who had only a
 coarse old peasant for their friend and father.  But you, who were so
 refined, why were you not there, to cheer them with the lights of
 culture?  Or may I remind you that we have some reason to doubt if John
 the Baptist were genteel; and in the case of Peter, on whose career you
 doubtless dwell approvingly in the pulpit, no doubt at all he was a
 'coarse, headstrong' fisherman!  Yet even in our Protestant Bibles Peter
 is called Saint.
 
 Damien was _dirty_.
 
 He was.  Think of the poor lepers annoyed with this dirty comrade!  But
 the clean Dr. Hyde was at his food in a fine house.
 
 Damien was _headstrong_.
 
 I believe you are right again; and I thank God for his strong head and
 heart.
 
 Damien was _bigoted_.
 
 I am not fond of bigots myself, because they are not fond of me.  But
 what is meant by bigotry, that we should regard it as a blemish in a
 priest?  Damien believed his own religion with the simplicity of a
 peasant or a child; as I would I could suppose that you do.  For this, I
 wonder at him some way off; and had that been his only character, should
 have avoided him in life.  But the point of interest in Damien, which has
 caused him to be so much talked about and made him at last the subject of
 your pen and mine, was that, in him, his bigotry, his intense and narrow
 faith, wrought potently for good, and strengthened him to be one of the
 world's heroes and exemplars.
 
 Damien _was not sent to Molokai_, _but went there without orders_.
 
 Is this a misreading? or do you really mean the words for blame?  I have
 heard Christ, in the pulpits of our Church, held up for imitation on the
 ground that His sacrifice was voluntary.  Does Dr. Hyde think otherwise?
 
 Damien _did not stay at the settlement_, _etc._
 
 It is true he was allowed many indulgences.  Am I to understand that you
 blame the father for profiting by these, or the officers for granting
 them?  In either case, it is a mighty Spartan standard to issue from the
 house on Beretania Street; and I am convinced you will find yourself with
 few supporters.
 
 Damien _had no hand in the reforms_, _etc._
 
 I think even you will admit that I have already been frank in my
 description of the man I am defending; but before I take you up upon this
 head, I will be franker still, and tell you that perhaps nowhere in the
 world can a man taste a more pleasurable sense of contrast than when he
 passes from Damien's 'Chinatown' at Kalawao to the beautiful Bishop-Home
 at Kalaupapa.  At this point, in my desire to make all fair for you, I
 will break my rule and adduce Catholic testimony.  Here is a passage from
 my diary about my visit to the Chinatown, from which you will see how it
 is (even now) regarded by its own officials: 'We went round all the
 dormitories, refectories, etc.--dark and dingy enough, with a superficial
 cleanliness, which he' [Mr. Dutton, the lay-brother] 'did not seek to
 defend.  "It is almost decent," said he; "the sisters will make that all
 right when we get them here."'  And yet I gathered it was already better
 since Damien was dead, and far better than when he was there alone and
 had his own (not always excellent) way.  I have now come far enough to
 meet you on a common ground of fact; and I tell you that, to a mind not
 prejudiced by jealousy, all the reforms of the lazaretto, and even those
 which he most vigorously opposed, are properly the work of Damien.  They
 are the evidence of his success; they are what his heroism provoked from
 the reluctant and the careless.  Many were before him in the field; Mr.
 Meyer, for instance, of whose faithful work we hear too little: there
 have been many since; and some had more worldly wisdom, though none had
 more devotion, than our saint.  Before his day, even you will confess,
 they had effected little.  It was his part, by one striking act of
 martyrdom, to direct all men's eyes on that distressful country.  At a
 blow, and with the price of his life, he made the place illustrious and
 public.  And that, if you will consider largely, was the one reform
 needful; pregnant of all that should succeed.  It brought money; it
 brought (best individual addition of them all) the sisters; it brought
 supervision, for public opinion and public interest landed with the man
 at Kalawao.  If ever any man brought reforms, and died to bring them, it
 was he.  There is not a clean cup or towel in the Bishop-Home, but dirty
 Damien washed it.
 
 Damien _was not a pure man in his relations with women_, _etc._
 
 How do you know that?  Is this the nature of the conversation in that
 house on Beretania Street which the cabman envied, driving past?--racy
 details of the misconduct of the poor peasant priest, toiling under the
 cliffs of Molokai?
 
 Many have visited the station before me; they seem not to have heard the
 rumour.  When I was there I heard many shocking tales, for my informants
 were men speaking with the plainness of the laity; and I heard plenty of
 complaints of Damien.  Why was this never mentioned? and how came it to
 you in the retirement of your clerical parlour?
 
 But I must not even seem to deceive you.  This scandal, when I read it in
 your letter, was not new to me.  I had heard it once before; and I must
 tell you how.  There came to Samoa a man from Honolulu; he, in a
 public-house on the beach, volunteered the statement that Damien had
 'contracted the disease from having connection with the female lepers';
 and I find a joy in telling you how the report was welcomed in a
 public-house.  A man sprang to his feet; I am not at liberty to give his
 name, but from what I heard I doubt if you would care to have him to
 dinner in Beretania Street.  'You miserable little--' (here is a word I
 dare not print, it would so shock your ears).  'You miserable little--,'
 he cried, 'if the story were a thousand times true, can't you see you are
 a million times a lower--for daring to repeat it?'  I wish it could be
 told of you that when the report reached you in your house, perhaps after
 family worship, you had found in your soul enough holy anger to receive
 it with the same expressions; ay, even with that one which I dare not
 print; it would not need to have been blotted away, like Uncle Toby's
 oath, by the tears of the recording angel; it would have been counted to
 you for your brightest righteousness.  But you have deliberately chosen
 the part of the man from Honolulu, and you have played it with
 improvements of your own.  The man from Honolulu--miserable, leering
 creature--communicated the tale to a rude knot of beach-combing drinkers
 in a public-house, where (I will so far agree with your temperance
 opinions) man is not always at his noblest; and the man from Honolulu had
 himself been drinking--drinking, we may charitably fancy, to excess.  It
 was to your 'Dear Brother, the Reverend H. B. Gage,' that you chose to
 communicate the sickening story; and the blue ribbon which adorns your
 portly bosom forbids me to allow you the extenuating plea that you were
 drunk when it was done.  Your 'dear brother'--a brother indeed--made
 haste to deliver up your letter (as a means of grace, perhaps) to the
 religious papers; where, after many months, I found and read and wondered
 at it; and whence I have now reproduced it for the wonder of others.  And
 you and your dear brother have, by this cycle of operations, built up a
 contrast very edifying to examine in detail.  The man whom you would not
 care to have to dinner, on the one side; on the other, the Reverend Dr.
 Hyde and the Reverend H. B. Gage: the Apia bar-room, the Honolulu manse.
 
 But I fear you scarce appreciate how you appear to your fellow-men; and
 to bring it home to you, I will suppose your story to be true.  I will
 suppose--and God forgive me for supposing it--that Damien faltered and
 stumbled in his narrow path of duty; I will suppose that, in the horror
 of his isolation, perhaps in the fever of incipient disease, he, who was
 doing so much more than he had sworn, failed in the letter of his
 priestly oath--he, who was so much a better man than either you or me,
 who did what we have never dreamed of daring--he too tasted of our common
 frailty.  'O, Iago, the pity of it!'  The least tender should be moved to
 tears; the most incredulous to prayer.  And all that you could do was to
 pen your letter to the Reverend H. B. Gage!
 
 Is it growing at all clear to you what a picture you have drawn of your
 own heart?  I will try yet once again to make it clearer.  You had a
 father: suppose this tale were about him, and some informant brought it
 to you, proof in hand: I am not making too high an estimate of your
 emotional nature when I suppose you would regret the circumstance? that
 you would feel the tale of frailty the more keenly since it shamed the
 author of your days? and that the last thing you would do would be to
 publish it in the religious press?  Well, the man who tried to do what
 Damien did, is my father, and the father of the man in the Apia bar, and
 the father of all who love goodness; and he was your father too, if God
 had given you grace to see it.
 
 
 
 
 THE PENTLAND RISING
 A PAGE OF HISTORY
 1666
 
 
     'A cloud of witnesses lyes here,
     Who for Christ's interest did appear.'
 
                             _Inscription on Battlefield at Rullion Green_.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I--THE CAUSES OF THE REVOLT
 
 
     'Halt, passenger; take heed what thou dost see,
     This tomb doth show for what some men did die.'
 
                         _Monument_, _Greyfriars' Churchyard_,_ Edinburgh_,
                                                            1661-1668. {85}
 
 Two hundred years ago a tragedy was enacted in Scotland, the memory
 whereof has been in great measure lost or obscured by the deep tragedies
 which followed it.  It is, as it were, the evening of the night of
 persecution--a sort of twilight, dark indeed to us, but light as the
 noonday when compared with the midnight gloom which followed.  This fact,
 of its being the very threshold of persecution, lends it, however, an
 additional interest.
 
 The prejudices of the people against Episcopacy were 'out of measure
 increased,' says Bishop Burnet, 'by the new incumbents who were put in
 the places of the ejected preachers, and were generally very mean and
 despicable in all respects.  They were the worst preachers I ever heard;
 they were ignorant to a reproach; and many of them were openly vicious.
 They . . . were indeed the dreg and refuse of the northern parts.  Those
 of them who arose above contempt or scandal were men of such violent
 tempers that they were as much hated as the others were despised.' {86}
 It was little to be wondered at, from this account that the country-folk
 refused to go to the parish church, and chose rather to listen to outed
 ministers in the fields.  But this was not to be allowed, and their
 persecutors at last fell on the method of calling a roll of the
 parishioners' names every Sabbath, and marking a fine of twenty shillings
 Scots to the name of each absenter.  In this way very large debts were
 incurred by persons altogether unable to pay.  Besides this, landlords
 were fined for their tenants' absences, tenants for their landlords',
 masters for their servants', servants for their masters', even though
 they themselves were perfectly regular in their attendance.  And as the
 curates were allowed to fine with the sanction of any common soldier, it
 may be imagined that often the pretexts were neither very sufficient nor
 well proven.
 
 When the fines could not be paid at once, Bibles, clothes, and household
 utensils were seized upon, or a number of soldiers, proportionate to his
 wealth, were quartered on the offender.  The coarse and drunken privates
 filled the houses with woe; snatched the bread from the children to feed
 their dogs; shocked the principles, scorned the scruples, and blasphemed
 the religion of their humble hosts; and when they had reduced them to
 destitution, sold the furniture, and burned down the roof-tree which was
 consecrated to the peasants by the name of Home.  For all this attention
 each of these soldiers received from his unwilling landlord a certain sum
 of money per day--three shillings sterling, according to _Naphtali_.  And
 frequently they were forced to pay quartering money for more men than
 were in reality 'cessed on them.'  At that time it was no strange thing
 to behold a strong man begging for money to pay his fines, and many
 others who were deep in arrears, or who had attracted attention in some
 other way, were forced to flee from their homes, and take refuge from
 arrest and imprisonment among the wild mosses of the uplands. {87a}
 
 One example in particular we may cite:
 
 John Neilson, the Laird of Corsack, a worthy man, was, unfortunately for
 himself, a Nonconformist.  First he was fined in four hundred pounds
 Scots, and then through cessing he lost nineteen hundred and ninety-three
 pounds Scots.  He was next obliged to leave his house and flee from place
 to place, during which wanderings he lost his horse.  His wife and
 children were turned out of doors, and then his tenants were fined till
 they too were almost ruined.  As a final stroke, they drove away all his
 cattle to Glasgow and sold them. {87b}  Surely it was time that something
 were done to alleviate so much sorrow, to overthrow such tyranny.
 
 About this time too there arrived in Galloway a person calling himself
 Captain Andrew Gray, and advising the people to revolt.  He displayed
 some documents purporting to be from the northern Covenanters, and
 stating that they were prepared to join in any enterprise commenced by
 their southern brethren.  The leader of the persecutors was Sir James
 Turner, an officer afterwards degraded for his share in the matter.  'He
 was naturally fierce, but was mad when he was drunk, and that was very
 often,' said Bishop Burnet.  'He was a learned man, but had always been
 in armies, and knew no other rule but to obey orders.  He told me he had
 no regard to any law, but acted, as he was commanded, in a military way.'
 {88}
 
 This was the state of matters, when an outrage was committed which gave
 spirit and determination to the oppressed countrymen, lit the flame of
 insubordination, and for the time at least recoiled on those who
 perpetrated it with redoubled force.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--THE BEGINNING
 
 
     I love no warres,
     I love no jarres,
     Nor strife's fire.
     May discord cease,
     Let's live in peace:
     This I desire.
 
     If it must be
     Warre we must see
     (So fates conspire),
     May we not feel
     The force of steel:
     This I desire.
 
                                                      T. JACKSON, 1651 {89}
 
 Upon Tuesday, November 13th, 1666, Corporal George Deanes and three other
 soldiers set upon an old man in the clachan of Dalry and demanded the
 payment of his fines.  On the old man's refusing to pay, they forced a
 large party of his neighbours to go with them and thresh his corn.  The
 field was a certain distance out of the clachan, and four persons,
 disguised as countrymen, who had been out on the moors all night, met
 this mournful drove of slaves, compelled by the four soldiers to work for
 the ruin of their friend.  However, chided to the bone by their night on
 the hills, and worn out by want of food, they proceeded to the village
 inn to refresh themselves.  Suddenly some people rushed into the room
 where they were sitting, and told them that the soldiers were about to
 roast the old man, naked, on his own girdle.  This was too much for them
 to stand, and they repaired immediately to the scene of this gross
 outrage, and at first merely requested that the captive should be
 released.  On the refusal of the two soldiers who were in the front room,
 high words were given and taken on both sides, and the other two rushed
 forth from an adjoining chamber and made at the countrymen with drawn
 swords.  One of the latter, John M'Lellan of Barscob, drew a pistol and
 shot the corporal in the body.  The pieces of tobacco-pipe with which it
 was loaded, to the number of ten at least, entered him, and he was so
 much disturbed that he never appears to have recovered, for we find long
 afterwards a petition to the Privy Council requesting a pension for him.
 The other soldiers then laid down their arms, the old man was rescued,
 and the rebellion was commenced. {90}
 
 And now we must turn to Sir James Turner's memoirs of himself; for,
 strange to say, this extraordinary man was remarkably fond of literary
 composition, and wrote, besides the amusing account of his own adventures
 just mentioned, a large number of essays and short biographies, and a
 work on war, entitled _Pallas Armata_.  The following are some of the
 shorter pieces 'Magick,' 'Friendship,' 'Imprisonment,' 'Anger,'
 'Revenge,' 'Duells,' 'Cruelty,' 'A Defence of some of the Ceremonies of
 the English Liturgie--to wit--Bowing at the Name of Jesus, The frequent
 repetition of the Lord's Prayer and Good Lord deliver us, Of the
 Doxologie, Of Surplesses, Rotchets, Canonnicall Coats,' etc.  From what
 we know of his character we should expect 'Anger' and 'Cruelty' to be
 very full and instructive.  But what earthly right he had to meddle with
 ecclesiastical subjects it is hard to see.
 
 Upon the 12th of the month he had received some information concerning
 Gray's proceedings, but as it was excessively indefinite in its
 character, he paid no attention to it.  On the evening of the 14th,
 Corporal Deanes was brought into Dumfries, who affirmed stoutly that he
 had been shot while refusing to sign the Covenant--a story rendered
 singularly unlikely by the after conduct of the rebels.  Sir James
 instantly dispatched orders to the cessed soldiers either to come to
 Dumfries or meet him on the way to Dalry, and commanded the thirteen or
 fourteen men in the town with him to come at nine next morning to his
 lodging for supplies.
 
 On the morning of Thursday the rebels arrived at Dumfries with 50 horse
 and 150 foot.  Neilson of Corsack, and Gray, who commanded, with a
 considerable troop, entered the town, and surrounded Sir James Turner's
 lodging.  Though it was between eight and nine o'clock, that worthy,
 being unwell, was still in bed, but rose at once and went to the window.
 
 Neilson and some others cried, 'You may have fair quarter.'
 
 'I need no quarter,' replied Sir James; 'nor can I be a prisoner, seeing
 there is no war declared.'  On being told, however, that he must either
 be a prisoner or die, he came down, and went into the street in his
 night-shirt.  Here Gray showed himself very desirous of killing him, but
 he was overruled by Corsack.  However, he was taken away a prisoner,
 Captain Gray mounting him on his own horse, though, as Turner naively
 remarks, 'there was good reason for it, for he mounted himself on a farre
 better one of mine.'  A large coffer containing his clothes and money,
 together with all his papers, were taken away by the rebels.  They robbed
 Master Chalmers, the Episcopalian minister of Dumfries, of his horse,
 drank the King's health at the market cross, and then left Dumfries. {92}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--THE MARCH OF THE REBELS
 
 
     'Stay, passenger, take notice what thou reads,
     At Edinburgh lie our bodies, here our heads;
     Our right hands stood at Lanark, these we want,
     Because with them we signed the Covenant.'
 
                                 _Epitaph on a Tombstone at Hamilton_. {93}
 
 On Friday the 16th, Bailie Irvine of Dumfries came to the Council at
 Edinburgh, and gave information concerning this 'horrid rebellion.'  In
 the absence of Rothes, Sharpe presided--much to the wrath of some
 members; and as he imagined his own safety endangered, his measures were
 most energetic.  Dalzell was ordered away to the West, the guards round
 the city were doubled, officers and soldiers were forced to take the oath
 of allegiance, and all lodgers were commanded to give in their names.
 Sharpe, surrounded with all these guards and precautions,
 trembled--trembled as he trembled when the avengers of blood drew him
 from his chariot on Magus Muir,--for he knew how he had sold his trust,
 how he had betrayed his charge, and he felt that against him must their
 chiefest hatred be directed, against him their direst thunder-bolts be
 forged.  But even in his fear the apostate Presbyterian was unrelenting,
 unpityingly harsh; he published in his manifesto no promise of pardon, no
 inducement to submission.  He said, 'If you submit not you must die,' but
 never added, 'If you submit you may live!' {94a}
 
 Meantime the insurgents proceeded on their way.  At Carsphairn they were
 deserted by Captain Gray, who, doubtless in a fit of oblivion, neglected
 to leave behind him the coffer containing Sir James's money.  Who he was
 is a mystery, unsolved by any historian; his papers were evidently
 forgeries--that, and his final flight, appear to indicate that he was an
 agent of the Royalists, for either the King or the Duke of York was heard
 to say, 'That, if he might have his wish, he would have them all turn
 rebels and go to arms.' {94b}
 
 Upon the 18th day of the month they left Carsphairn and marched onwards.
 
 Turner was always lodged by his captors at a good inn, frequently at the
 best of which their halting-place could boast.  Here many visits were
 paid to him by the ministers and officers of the insurgent force.  In his
 description of these interviews he displays a vein of satiric severity,
 admitting any kindness that was done to him with some qualifying souvenir
 of former harshness, and gloating over any injury, mistake, or folly,
 which it was his chance to suffer or to hear.  He appears,
 notwithstanding all this, to have been on pretty good terms with his
 cruel 'phanaticks,' as the following extract sufficiently proves:
 
 'Most of the foot were lodged about the church or churchyard, and order
 given to ring bells next morning for a sermon to be preached by Mr.
 Welch.  Maxwell of Morith, and Major M'Cullough invited me to heare "that
 phanatick sermon" (for soe they merrilie called it).  They said that
 preaching might prove an effectual meane to turne me, which they
 heartilie wished.  I answered to them that I was under guards, and that
 if they intended to heare that sermon, it was probable I might likewise,
 for it was not like my guards wold goe to church and leave me alone at my
 lodgeings.  Bot to what they said of my conversion, I said it wold be
 hard to turne a Turner.  Bot because I founde them in a merrie humour, I
 said, if I did not come to heare Mr. Welch preach, then they might fine
 me in fortie shillings Scots, which was double the suome of what I had
 exacted from the phanatics.' {95}
 
 This took place at Ochiltree, on the 22nd day of the month.  The
 following is recounted by this personage with malicious glee, and
 certainly, if authentic, it is a sad proof of how chaff is mixed with
 wheat, and how ignorant, almost impious, persons were engaged in this
 movement; nevertheless we give it, for we wish to present with
 impartiality all the alleged facts to the reader:
 
 'Towards the evening Mr. Robinsone and Mr. Crukshank gaue me a visite; I
 called for some ale purposelie to heare one of them blesse it.  It fell
 Mr. Robinsone to seeke the blessing, who said one of the most bombastick
 graces that ever I heard in my life.  He summoned God Allmightie very
 imperiouslie to be their secondarie (for that was his language).  "And
 if," said he, "thou wilt not be our Secondarie, we will not fight for
 thee at all, for it is not our cause bot thy cause; and if thou wilt not
 fight for our cause and thy oune cause, then we are not obliged to fight
 for it.  They say," said he, "that Dukes, Earles, and Lords are coming
 with the King's General against us, bot they shall be nothing bot a
 threshing to us."  This grace did more fullie satisfie me of the folly
 and injustice of their cause, then the ale did quench my thirst.' {96a}
 
 Frequently the rebels made a halt near some roadside alehouse, or in some
 convenient park, where Colonel Wallace, who had now taken the command,
 would review the horse and foot, during which time Turner was sent either
 into the alehouse or round the shoulder of the hill, to prevent him from
 seeing the disorders which were likely to arise.  He was, at last, on the
 25th day of the month, between Douglas and Lanark, permitted to behold
 their evolutions.  'I found their horse did consist of four hundreth and
 fortie, and the foot of five hundreth and upwards. . . . The horsemen
 were armed for most part with suord and pistoll, some onlie with suord.
 The foot with musket, pike, sith (scythe), forke, and suord; and some
 with suords great and long.'  He admired much the proficiency of their
 cavalry, and marvelled how they had attained to it in so short a time.
 {96b}
 
 At Douglas, which they had just left on the morning of this great
 wapinshaw, they were charged--awful picture of depravity!--with the theft
 of a silver spoon and a nightgown.  Could it be expected that while the
 whole country swarmed with robbers of every description, such a rare
 opportunity for plunder should be lost by rogues--that among a thousand
 men, even though fighting for religion, there should not be one Achan in
 the camp?  At Lanark a declaration was drawn up and signed by the chief
 rebels.  In it occurs the following:
 
 'The just sense whereof '--the sufferings of the country--'made us
 choose, rather to betake ourselves to the fields for self-defence, than
 to stay at home, burdened daily with the calamities of others, and
 tortured with the fears of our own approaching misery.' {97}
 
 The whole body, too, swore the Covenant, to which ceremony the epitaph at
 the head of this chapter seems to refer.
 
 A report that Dalzell was approaching drove them from Lanark to Bathgate,
 where, on the evening of Monday the 26th, the wearied army stopped.  But
 at twelve o'clock the cry, which served them for a trumpet, of 'Horse!
 horse!' and 'Mount the prisoner!' resounded through the night-shrouded
 town, and called the peasants from their well-earned rest to toil onwards
 in their march.  The wind howled fiercely over the moorland; a close,
 thick, wetting rain descended.  Chilled to the bone, worn out with long
 fatigue, sinking to the knees in mire, onward they marched to
 destruction.  One by one the weary peasants fell off from their ranks to
 sleep, and die in the rain-soaked moor, or to seek some house by the
 wayside wherein to hide till daybreak.  One by one at first, then in
 gradually increasing numbers, at every shelter that was seen, whole
 troops left the waning squadrons, and rushed to hide themselves from the
 ferocity of the tempest.  To right and left nought could be descried but
 the broad expanse of the moor, and the figures of their fellow-rebels,
 seen dimly through the murky night, plodding onwards through the sinking
 moss.  Those who kept together--a miserable few--often halted to rest
 themselves, and to allow their lagging comrades to overtake them.  Then
 onward they went again, still hoping for assistance, reinforcement, and
 supplies; onward again, through the wind, and the rain, and the
 darkness--onward to their defeat at Pentland, and their scaffold at
 Edinburgh.  It was calculated that they lost one half of their army on
 that disastrous night-march.
 
 Next night they reached the village of Colinton, four miles from
 Edinburgh, where they halted for the last time. {98}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--RULLION GREEN
 
 
     'From Covenanters with uplifted hands,
     From Remonstrators with associate bands,
              Good Lord, deliver us!'
 
                                         _Royalist Rhyme_, KIRKTON, p. 127.
 
 Late on the fourth night of November, exactly twenty-four days before
 Rullion Green, Richard and George Chaplain, merchants in Haddington,
 beheld four men, clad like West-country Whigamores, standing round some
 object on the ground.  It was at the two-mile cross, and within that
 distance from their homes.  At last, to their horror, they discovered
 that the recumbent figure was a livid corpse, swathed in a blood-stained
 winding-sheet. {99}  Many thought that this apparition was a portent of
 the deaths connected with the Pentland Rising.
 
 On the morning of Wednesday, the 28th of November 1666, they left
 Colinton and marched to Rullion Green.  There they arrived about sunset.
 The position was a strong one.  On the summit of a bare, heathery spur of
 the Pentlands are two hillocks, and between them lies a narrow band of
 flat marshy ground.  On the highest of the two mounds--that nearest the
 Pentlands, and on the left hand of the main body--was the greater part of
 the cavalry, under Major Learmont; on the other Barscob and the Galloway
 gentlemen; and in the centre Colonel Wallace and the weak, half-armed
 infantry.  Their position was further strengthened by the depth of the
 valley below, and the deep chasm-like course of the Rullion Burn.
 
 The sun, going down behind the Pentlands, cast golden lights and blue
 shadows on their snow-clad summits, slanted obliquely into the rich plain
 before them, bathing with rosy splendour the leafless, snow-sprinkled
 trees, and fading gradually into shadow in the distance.  To the south,
 too, they beheld a deep-shaded amphitheatre of heather and bracken; the
 course of the Esk, near Penicuik, winding about at the foot of its gorge;
 the broad, brown expanse of Maw Moss; and, fading into blue
 indistinctness in the south, the wild heath-clad Peeblesshire hills.  In
 sooth, that scene was fair, and many a yearning glance was cast over that
 peaceful evening scene from the spot where the rebels awaited their
 defeat; and when the fight was over, many a noble fellow lifted his head
 from the blood-stained heather to strive with darkening eyeballs to
 behold that landscape, over which, as over his life and his cause, the
 shadows of night and of gloom were falling and thickening.
 
 It was while waiting on this spot that the fear-inspiring cry was raised:
 'The enemy!  Here come the enemy!'
 
 Unwilling to believe their own doom--for our insurgents still hoped for
 success in some negotiations for peace which had been carried on at
 Colinton--they called out, 'They are some of our own.'
 
 'They are too blacke' (_i.e._ numerous), 'fie! fie! for ground to draw up
 on,' cried Wallace, fully realising the want of space for his men, and
 proving that it was not till after this time that his forces were finally
 arranged. {101a}
 
 First of all the battle was commenced by fifty Royalist horse sent
 obliquely across the hill to attack the left wing of the rebels.  An
 equal number of Learmont's men met them, and, after a struggle, drove
 them back.  The course of the Rullion Burn prevented almost all pursuit,
 and Wallace, on perceiving it, dispatched a body of foot to occupy both
 the burn and some ruined sheep-walls on the farther side.
 
 Dalzell changed his position, and drew up his army at the foot of the
 hill, on the top of which were his foes.  He then dispatched a mingled
 body of infantry and cavalry to attack Wallace's outpost, but they also
 were driven back.  A third charge produced a still more disastrous
 effect, for Dalzell had to check the pursuit of his men by a
 reinforcement.
 
 These repeated checks bred a panic in the Lieutenant-General's ranks, for
 several of his men flung down their arms.  Urged by such fatal symptoms,
 and by the approaching night, he deployed his men, and closed in
 overwhelming numbers on the centre and right flank of the insurgent army.
 In the increasing twilight the burning matches of the firelocks,
 shimmering on barrel, halbert, and cuirass, lent to the approaching army
 a picturesque effect, like a huge, many-armed giant breathing flame into
 the darkness.
 
 Placed on an overhanging hill, Welch and Semple cried aloud, 'The God of
 Jacob! The God of Jacob!' and prayed with uplifted hands for victory.
 {101b}
 
 But still the Royalist troops closed in.
 
 Captain John Paton was observed by Dalzell, who determined to capture him
 with his own hands.  Accordingly he charged forward, presenting his
 pistols.  Paton fired, but the balls hopped off Dalzell's buff coat and
 fell into his boot.  With the superstition peculiar to his age, the
 Nonconformist concluded that his adversary was rendered bullet-proof by
 enchantment, and, pulling some small silver coins from his pocket,
 charged his pistol therewith.  Dalzell, seeing this, and supposing, it is
 likely, that Paton was putting in larger balls, hid behind his servant,
 who was killed. {102}
 
 Meantime the outposts were forced, and the army of Wallace was enveloped
 in the embrace of a hideous boa-constrictor--tightening, closing,
 crushing every semblance of life from the victim enclosed in his toils.
 The flanking parties of horse were forced in upon the centre, and though,
 as even Turner grants, they fought with desperation, a general flight was
 the result.
 
 But when they fell there was none to sing their coronach or wail the
 death-wail over them.  Those who sacrificed themselves for the peace, the
 liberty, and the religion of their fellow-countrymen, lay bleaching in
 the field of death for long, and when at last they were buried by
 charity, the peasants dug up their bodies, desecrated their graves, and
 cast them once more upon the open heath for the sorry value of their
 winding-sheets!
 
 _Inscription on stone at Rullion Green_:
 
                                      HERE
                                  AND NEAR TO
                              THIS PLACE LYES THE
                          REVEREND MR JOHN CROOKSHANK
                            AND MR ANDREW MCCORMICK
                          MINISTERS OF THE GOSPEL AND
                       ABOUT FIFTY OTHER TRUE COVENANTED
                             PRESBYTERIANS WHO WERE
                       KILLED IN THIS PLACE IN THEIR OWN
                       INOCENT SELF DEFENCE AND DEFFENCE
                               OF THE COVENANTED
                             WORK OF REFORMATION BY
                             THOMAS DALZEEL OF BINS
                            UPON THE 28 OF NOVEMBER
                          1666.  REV. 12. 11. ERECTED
                                 SEPT. 28 1738.
 
                              _Back of stone_:
 
     A Cloud of Witnesses lyes here,
     Who for Christ's Interest did appear,
     For to restore true Liberty,
     O'erturned then by tyranny.
     And by proud Prelats who did Rage
     Against the Lord's Own heritage.
     They sacrificed were for the laws
     Of Christ their king, his noble cause.
     These heroes fought with great renown;
     By falling got the Martyr's crown. {103}
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V--A RECORD OF BLOOD
 
 
     'They cut his hands ere he was dead,
     And after that struck of his head.
     His blood under the altar cries
     For vengeance on Christ's enemies.'
 
                          _Epitaph on Tomb at Longcross of Clermont_. {104}
 
 Master Andrew Murray, an outed minister, residing in the Potterrow, on
 the morning after the defeat, heard the sounds of cheering and the march
 of many feet beneath his window.  He gazed out.  With colours flying, and
 with music sounding, Dalzell, victorious, entered Edinburgh.  But his
 banners were dyed in blood, and a band of prisoners were marched within
 his ranks.  The old man knew it all.  That martial and triumphant strain
 was the death-knell of his friends and of their cause, the rust-hued
 spots upon the flags were the tokens of their courage and their death,
 and the prisoners were the miserable remnant spared from death in battle
 to die upon the scaffold.  Poor old man! he had outlived all joy.  Had he
 lived longer he would have seen increasing torment and increasing woe; he
 would have seen the clouds, then but gathering in mist, cast a more than
 midnight darkness over his native hills, and have fallen a victim to
 those bloody persecutions which, later, sent their red memorials to the
 sea by many a burn.  By a merciful Providence all this was spared to
 him--he fell beneath the first blow; and ere four days had passed since
 Rullion Green, the aged minister of God was gathered to is fathers.
 {105a}
 
 When Sharpe first heard of the rebellion, he applied to Sir Alexander
 Ramsay, the Provost, for soldiers to guard his house.  Disliking their
 occupation, the soldiers gave him an ugly time of it.  All the night
 through they kept up a continuous series of 'alarms and incursions,'
 'cries of "Stand!" "Give fire!"' etc., which forced the prelate to flee
 to the Castle in the morning, hoping there to find the rest which was
 denied him at home. {105b}  Now, however, when all danger to himself was
 past, Sharpe came out in his true colours, and scant was the justice
 likely to be shown to the foes of Scottish Episcopacy when the Primate
 was by.  The prisoners were lodged in Haddo's Hole, a part of St. Giles'
 Cathedral, where, by the kindness of Bishop Wishart, to his credit be it
 spoken, they were amply supplied with food. {105c}
 
 Some people urged, in the Council, that the promise of quarter which had
 been given on the field of battle should protect the lives of the
 miserable men.  Sir John Gilmoure, the greatest lawyer, gave no
 opinion--certainly a suggestive circumstance--but Lord Lee declared that
 this would not interfere with their legal trial, 'so to bloody executions
 they went.' {105d}  To the number of thirty they were condemned and
 executed; while two of them, Hugh M'Kail, a young minister, and Neilson
 of Corsack, were tortured with the boots.
 
 The goods of those who perished were confiscated, and their bodies were
 dismembered and distributed to different parts of the country; 'the heads
 of Major M'Culloch and the two Gordons,' it was resolved, says Kirkton,
 'should be pitched on the gate of Kirkcudbright; the two Hamiltons and
 Strong's head should be affixed at Hamilton, and Captain Arnot's sett on
 the Watter Gate at Edinburgh.  The armes of all the ten, because they
 hade with uplifted hands renewed the Covenant at Lanark, were sent to the
 people of that town to expiate that crime, by placing these arms on the
 top of the prison.' {106}  Among these was John Neilson, the Laird of
 Corsack, who saved Turner's life at Dumfries; in return for which service
 Sir James attempted, though without success, to get the poor man
 reprieved.  One of the condemned died of his wounds between the day of
 condemnation and the day of execution.  'None of them,' says Kirkton,
 'would save their life by taking the declaration and renouncing the
 Covenant, though it was offered to them. . . . But never men died in
 Scotland so much lamented by the people, not only spectators, but those
 in the country.  When Knockbreck and his brother were turned over, they
 clasped each other in their armes, and so endured the pangs of death.
 When Humphrey Colquhoun died, he spoke not like an ordinary citizen, but
 like a heavenly minister, relating his comfortable Christian experiences,
 and called for his Bible, and laid it on his wounded arm, and read John
 iii. 8, and spoke upon it to the admiration of all.  But most of all,
 when Mr. M'Kail died, there was such a lamentation as was never known in
 Scotland before; not one dry cheek upon all the street, or in all the
 numberless windows in the mercate place.' {107a}
 
 The following passage from this speech speaks for itself and its author:
 
 'Hereafter I will not talk with flesh and blood, nor think on the world's
 consolations.  Farewell to all my friends, whose company hath been
 refreshful to me in my pilgrimage.  I have done with the light of the sun
 and the moon; welcome eternal light, eternal life, everlasting love,
 everlasting praise, everlasting glory.  Praise to Him that sits upon the
 throne, and to the Lamb for ever!  Bless the Lord, O my soul, that hath
 pardoned all my iniquities in the blood of His Son, and healed all my
 diseases.  Bless Him, O all ye His angels that excel in strength, ye
 ministers of His that do His pleasure.  Bless the Lord, O my soul!'
 {107b}
 
 After having ascended the gallows ladder he again broke forth in the
 following words of touching eloquence: 'And now I leave off to speak any
 more to creatures, and begin my intercourse with God, which shall never
 be broken off.  Farewell father and mother, friends and relations!
 Farewell the world and all delights!  Farewell meat and drink!  Farewell
 sun, moon, and stars!--Welcome God and Father!  Welcome sweet Jesus
 Christ, the Mediator of the new covenant!  Welcome blessed Spirit of
 grace and God of all consolation!  Welcome glory!  Welcome eternal life!
 Welcome Death!' {107c}
 
 At Glasgow, too, where some were executed, they caused the soldiers to
 beat the drums and blow the trumpets on their closing ears.  Hideous
 refinement of revenge!  Even the last words which drop from the lips of a
 dying man--words surely the most sincere and the most unbiassed which
 mortal mouth can utter--even these were looked upon as poisoned and as
 poisonous.  'Drown their last accents,' was the cry, 'lest they should
 lead the crowd to take their part, or at the least to mourn their doom!'
 {108a}  But, after all, perhaps it was more merciful than one would
 think--unintentionally so, of course; perhaps the storm of harsh and
 fiercely jubilant noises, the clanging of trumpets, the rattling of
 drums, and the hootings and jeerings of an unfeeling mob, which were the
 last they heard on earth, might, when the mortal fight was over, when the
 river of death was passed, add tenfold sweetness to the hymning of the
 angels, tenfold peacefulness to the shores which they had reached.
 
 Not content with the cruelty of these executions, some even of the
 peasantry, though these were confined to the shire of Mid-Lothian,
 pursued, captured, plundered, and murdered the miserable fugitives who
 fell in their way.  One strange story have we of these times of blood and
 persecution: Kirkton the historian and popular tradition tell us alike of
 a flame which often would arise from the grave, in a moss near Carnwath,
 of some of those poor rebels: of how it crept along the ground; of how it
 covered the house of their murderer; and of how it scared him with its
 lurid glare.
 
 Hear Daniel Defoe: {108b}
 
     'If the poor people were by these insupportable violences made
     desperate, and driven to all the extremities of a wild despair, who
     can justly reflect on them when they read in the Word of God "That
     oppression makes a wise man mad"?  And therefore were there no other
     original of the insurrection known by the name of the Rising of
     Pentland, it was nothing but what the intolerable oppressions of
     those times might have justified to all the world, nature having
     dictated to all people a right of defence when illegally and
     arbitrarily attacked in a manner not justifiable either by laws of
     nature, the laws of God, or the laws of the country.'
 
 Bear this remonstrance of Defoe's in mind, and though it is the fashion
 of the day to jeer and to mock, to execrate and to contemn, the noble
 band of Covenanters--though the bitter laugh at their old-world religious
 views, the curl of the lip at their merits, and the chilling silence on
 their bravery and their determination, are but too rife through all
 society--be charitable to what was evil and honest to what was good about
 the Pentland insurgents, who fought for life and liberty, for country and
 religion, on the 28th of November 1666, now just two hundred years ago.
 
                                 * * * * *
 
 EDINBURGH, 28_th November_ 1866.
 
 
 
 
 THE DAY AFTER TO-MORROW
 
 
 History is much decried; it is a tissue of errors, we are told, no doubt
 correctly; and rival historians expose each other's blunders with
 gratification.  Yet the worst historian has a clearer view of the period
 he studies than the best of us can hope to form of that in which we live.
 The obscurest epoch is to-day; and that for a thousand reasons of
 inchoate tendency, conflicting report, and sheer mass and multiplicity of
 experience; but chiefly, perhaps, by reason of an insidious shifting of
 landmarks.  Parties and ideas continually move, but not by measurable
 marches on a stable course; the political soil itself steals forth by
 imperceptible degrees, like a travelling glacier, carrying on its bosom
 not only political parties but their flag-posts and cantonments; so that
 what appears to be an eternal city founded on hills is but a flying
 island of Laputa.  It is for this reason in particular that we are all
 becoming Socialists without knowing it; by which I would not in the least
 refer to the acute case of Mr. Hyndman and his horn-blowing supporters,
 sounding their trumps of a Sunday within the walls of our individualist
 Jericho--but to the stealthy change that has come over the spirit of
 Englishmen and English legislation.  A little while ago, and we were
 still for liberty; 'crowd a few more thousands on the bench of
 Government,' we seemed to cry; 'keep her head direct on liberty, and we
 cannot help but come to port.'  This is over; _laisser faire_ declines in
 favour; our legislation grows authoritative, grows philanthropical,
 bristles with new duties and new penalties, and casts a spawn of
 inspectors, who now begin, note-book in hand, to darken the face of
 England.  It may be right or wrong, we are not trying that; but one thing
 it is beyond doubt: it is Socialism in action, and the strange thing is
 that we scarcely know it.
 
 Liberty has served us a long while, and it may be time to seek new
 altars.  Like all other principles, she has been proved to be
 self-exclusive in the long run.  She has taken wages besides (like all
 other virtues) and dutifully served Mammon; so that many things we were
 accustomed to admire as the benefits of freedom and common to all were
 truly benefits of wealth, and took their value from our neighbours'
 poverty.  A few shocks of logic, a few disclosures (in the journalistic
 phrase) of what the freedom of manufacturers, landlords, or shipowners
 may imply for operatives, tenants, or seamen, and we not unnaturally
 begin to turn to that other pole of hope, beneficent tyranny.  Freedom,
 to be desirable, involves kindness, wisdom, and all the virtues of the
 free; but the free man as we have seen him in action has been, as of
 yore, only the master of many helots; and the slaves are still ill-fed,
 ill-clad, ill-taught, ill-housed, insolently treated, and driven to their
 mines and workshops by the lash of famine.  So much, in other men's
 affairs, we have begun to see clearly; we have begun to despair of virtue
 in these other men, and from our seat in Parliament begin to discharge
 upon them, thick as arrows, the host of our inspectors.  The landlord has
 long shaken his head over the manufacturer; those who do business on land
 have lost all trust in the virtues of the shipowner; the professions look
 askance upon the retail traders and have even started their co-operative
 stores to ruin them; and from out the smoke-wreaths of Birmingham a
 finger has begun to write upon the wall the condemnation of the landlord.
 Thus, piece by piece, do we condemn each other, and yet not perceive the
 conclusion, that our whole estate is somewhat damnable.  Thus, piece by
 piece, each acting against his neighbour, each sawing away the branch on
 which some other interest is seated, do we apply in detail our
 Socialistic remedies, and yet not perceive that we are all labouring
 together to bring in Socialism at large.  A tendency so stupid and so
 selfish is like to prove invincible; and if Socialism be at all a
 practicable rule of life, there is every chance that our grand-children
 will see the day and taste the pleasures of existence in something far
 liker an ant-heap than any previous human polity.  And this not in the
 least because of the voice of Mr. Hyndman or the horns of his followers;
 but by the mere glacier movement of the political soil, bearing forward
 on its bosom, apparently undisturbed, the proud camps of Whig and Tory.
 If Mr. Hyndman were a man of keen humour, which is far from my conception
 of his character, he might rest from his troubling and look on: the walls
 of Jericho begin already to crumble and dissolve.  That great servile
 war, the Armageddon of money and numbers, to which we looked forward when
 young, becomes more and more unlikely; and we may rather look to see a
 peaceable and blindfold evolution, the work of dull men immersed in
 political tactics and dead to political results.
 
 The principal scene of this comedy lies, of course, in the House of
 Commons; it is there, besides, that the details of this new evolution (if
 it proceed) will fall to be decided; so that the state of Parliament is
 not only diagnostic of the present but fatefully prophetic of the future.
 Well, we all know what Parliament is, and we are all ashamed of it.  We
 may pardon it some faults, indeed, on the ground of Irish obstruction--a
 bitter trial, which it supports with notable good humour.  But the excuse
 is merely local; it cannot apply to similar bodies in America and France;
 and what are we to say of these?  President Cleveland's letter may serve
 as a picture of the one; a glance at almost any paper will convince us of
 the weakness of the other.  Decay appears to have seized on the organ of
 popular government in every land; and this just at the moment when we
 begin to bring to it, as to an oracle of justice, the whole skein of our
 private affairs to be unravelled, and ask it, like a new Messiah, to take
 upon itself our frailties and play for us the part that should be played
 by our own virtues.  For that, in few words, is the case.  We cannot
 trust ourselves to behave with decency; we cannot trust our consciences;
 and the remedy proposed is to elect a round number of our neighbours,
 pretty much at random, and say to these: 'Be ye our conscience; make laws
 so wise, and continue from year to year to administer them so wisely,
 that they shall save us from ourselves and make us righteous and happy,
 world without end.  Amen.'  And who can look twice at the British
 Parliament and then seriously bring it such a task?  I am not advancing
 this as an argument against Socialism: once again, nothing is further
 from my mind.  There are great truths in Socialism, or no one, not even
 Mr. Hyndman, would be found to hold it; and if it came, and did one-tenth
 part of what it offers, I for one should make it welcome.  But if it is
 to come, we may as well have some notion of what it will be like; and the
 first thing to grasp is that our new polity will be designed and
 administered (to put it courteously) with something short of inspiration.
 It will be made, or will grow, in a human parliament; and the one thing
 that will not very hugely change is human nature.  The Anarchists think
 otherwise, from which it is only plain that they have not carried to the
 study of history the lamp of human sympathy.
 
 Given, then, our new polity, with its new waggon-load of laws, what
 headmarks must we look for in the life?  We chafe a good deal at that
 excellent thing, the income-tax, because it brings into our affairs the
 prying fingers, and exposes us to the tart words, of the official.  The
 official, in all degrees, is already something of a terror to many of us.
 I would not willingly have to do with even a police-constable in any
 other spirit than that of kindness.  I still remember in my dreams the
 eye-glass of a certain _attache_ at a certain embassy--an eyeglass that
 was a standing indignity to all on whom it looked; and my next most
 disagreeable remembrance is of a bracing, Republican postman in the city
 of San Francisco.  I lived in that city among working folk, and what my
 neighbours accepted at the postman's hands--nay, what I took from him
 myself--it is still distasteful to recall.  The bourgeois, residing in
 the upper parts of society, has but few opportunities of tasting this
 peculiar bowl; but about the income-tax, as I have said, or perhaps about
 a patent, or in the halls of an embassy at the hands of my friend of the
 eye-glass, he occasionally sets his lips to it; and he may thus imagine
 (if he has that faculty of imagination, without which most faculties are
 void) how it tastes to his poorer neighbours, who must drain it to the
 dregs.  In every contact with authority, with their employer, with the
 police, with the School Board officer, in the hospital, or in the
 workhouse, they have equally the occasion to appreciate the light-hearted
 civility of the man in office; and as an experimentalist in several
 out-of-the-way provinces of life, I may say it has but to be felt to be
 appreciated.  Well, this golden age of which we are speaking will be the
 golden age of officials.  In all our concerns it will be their beloved
 duty to meddle, with what tact, with what obliging words, analogy will
 aid us to imagine.  It is likely these gentlemen will be periodically
 elected; they will therefore have their turn of being underneath, which
 does not always sweeten men's conditions.  The laws they will have to
 administer will be no clearer than those we know to-day, and the body
 which is to regulate their administration no wiser than the British
 Parliament.  So that upon all hands we may look for a form of servitude
 most galling to the blood--servitude to many and changing masters, and
 for all the slights that accompany the rule of jack-in-office.  And if
 the Socialistic programme be carried out with the least fulness, we shall
 have lost a thing, in most respects not much to be regretted, but as a
 moderator of oppression, a thing nearly invaluable--the newspaper.  For
 the independent journal is a creature of capital and competition; it
 stands and falls with millionaires and railway bonds and all the abuses
 and glories of to-day; and as soon as the State has fairly taken its bent
 to authority and philanthropy, and laid the least touch on private
 property, the days of the independent journal are numbered.  State
 railways may be good things and so may State bakeries; but a State
 newspaper will never be a very trenchant critic of the State officials.
 
 But again, these officials would have no sinecure.  Crime would perhaps
 be less, for some of the motives of crime we may suppose would pass away.
 But if Socialism were carried out with any fulness, there would be more
 contraventions.  We see already new sins ringing up like mustard--School
 Board sins, factory sins, Merchant Shipping Act sins--none of which I
 would be thought to except against in particular, but all of which, taken
 together, show us that Socialism can be a hard master even in the
 beginning.  If it go on to such heights as we hear proposed and lauded,
 if it come actually to its ideal of the ant-heap, ruled with iron
 justice, the number of new contraventions will be out of all proportion
 multiplied.  Take the case of work alone.  Man is an idle animal.  He is
 at least as intelligent as the ant; but generations of advisers have in
 vain recommended him the ant's example.  Of those who are found truly
 indefatigable in business, some are misers; some are the practisers of
 delightful industries, like gardening; some are students, artists,
 inventors, or discoverers, men lured forward by successive hopes; and the
 rest are those who live by games of skill or hazard--financiers,
 billiard-players, gamblers, and the like.  But in unloved toils, even
 under the prick of necessity, no man is continually sedulous.  Once
 eliminate the fear of starvation, once eliminate or bound the hope of
 riches, and we shall see plenty of skulking and malingering.  Society
 will then be something not wholly unlike a cotton plantation in the old
 days; with cheerful, careless, demoralised slaves, with elected
 overseers, and, instead of the planter, a chaotic popular assembly.  If
 the blood be purposeful and the soil strong, such a plantation may
 succeed, and be, indeed, a busy ant-heap, with full granaries and long
 hours of leisure.  But even then I think the whip will be in the
 overseer's hands, and not in vain.  For, when it comes to be a question
 of each man doing his own share or the rest doing more, prettiness of
 sentiment will be forgotten.  To dock the skulker's food is not enough;
 many will rather eat haws and starve on petty pilferings than put their
 shoulder to the wheel for one hour daily.  For such as these, then, the
 whip will be in the overseer's hand; and his own sense of justice and the
 superintendence of a chaotic popular assembly will be the only checks on
 its employment.  Now, you may be an industrious man and a good citizen,
 and yet not love, nor yet be loved by, Dr. Fell the inspector.  It is
 admitted by private soldiers that the disfavour of a sergeant is an evil
 not to be combated; offend the sergeant, they say, and in a brief while
 you will either be disgraced or have deserted.  And the sergeant can no
 longer appeal to the lash.  But if these things go on, we shall see, or
 our sons shall see, what it is to have offended an inspector.
 
 This for the unfortunate.  But with the fortunate also, even those whom
 the inspector loves, it may not be altogether well.  It is concluded that
 in such a state of society, supposing it to be financially sound, the
 level of comfort will be high.  It does not follow: there are strange
 depths of idleness in man, a too-easily-got sufficiency, as in the case
 of the sago-eaters, often quenching the desire for all besides; and it is
 possible that the men of the richest ant-heaps may sink even into
 squalor.  But suppose they do not; suppose our tricksy instrument of
 human nature, when we play upon it this new tune, should respond kindly;
 suppose no one to be damped and none exasperated by the new conditions,
 the whole enterprise to be financially sound--a vaulting supposition--and
 all the inhabitants to dwell together in a golden mean of comfort: we
 have yet to ask ourselves if this be what man desire, or if it be what
 man will even deign to accept for a continuance.  It is certain that man
 loves to eat, it is not certain that he loves that only or that best.  He
 is supposed to love comfort; it is not a love, at least, that he is
 faithful to.  He is supposed to love happiness; it is my contention that
 he rather loves excitement.  Danger, enterprise, hope, the novel, the
 aleatory, are dearer to man than regular meals.  He does not think so
 when he is hungry, but he thinks so again as soon as he is fed; and on
 the hypothesis of a successful ant-heap, he would never go hungry.  It
 would be always after dinner in that society, as, in the land of the
 Lotos-eaters, it was always afternoon; and food, which, when we have it
 not, seems all-important, drops in our esteem, as soon as we have it, to
 a mere prerequisite of living.
 
 That for which man lives is not the same thing for all individuals nor in
 all ages; yet it has a common base; what he seeks and what he must have
 is that which will seize and hold his attention.  Regular meals and
 weatherproof lodgings will not do this long.  Play in its wide sense, as
 the artificial induction of sensation, including all games and all arts,
 will, indeed, go far to keep him conscious of himself; but in the end he
 wearies for realities.  Study or experiment, to some rare natures, is the
 unbroken pastime of a life.  These are enviable natures; people shut in
 the house by sickness often bitterly envy them; but the commoner man
 cannot continue to exist upon such altitudes: his feet itch for physical
 adventure; his blood boils for physical dangers, pleasures, and triumphs;
 his fancy, the looker after new things, cannot continue to look for them
 in books and crucibles, but must seek them on the breathing stage of
 life.  Pinches, buffets, the glow of hope, the shock of disappointment,
 furious contention with obstacles: these are the true elixir for all
 vital spirits, these are what they seek alike in their romantic
 enterprises and their unromantic dissipations.  When they are taken in
 some pinch closer than the common, they cry, 'Catch me here again!' and
 sure enough you catch them there again--perhaps before the week is out.
 It is as old as _Robinson Crusoe_; as old as man.  Our race has not been
 strained for all these ages through that sieve of dangers that we call
 Natural Selection, to sit down with patience in the tedium of safety; the
 voices of its fathers call it forth.  Already in our society as it
 exists, the bourgeois is too much cottoned about for any zest in living;
 he sits in his parlour out of reach of any danger, often out of reach of
 any vicissitude but one of health; and there he yawns.  If the people in
 the next villa took pot-shots at him, he might be killed indeed, but so
 long as he escaped he would find his blood oxygenated and his views of
 the world brighter.  If Mr. Mallock, on his way to the publishers, should
 have his skirts pinned to a wall by a javelin, it would not occur to
 him--at least for several hours--to ask if life were worth living; and if
 such peril were a daily matter, he would ask it never more; he would have
 other things to think about, he would be living indeed--not lying in a
 box with cotton, safe, but immeasurably dull.  The aleatory, whether it
 touch life, or fortune, or renown--whether we explore Africa or only toss
 for halfpence--that is what I conceive men to love best, and that is what
 we are seeking to exclude from men's existences.  Of all forms of the
 aleatory, that which most commonly attends our working men--the danger of
 misery from want of work--is the least inspiriting: it does not whip the
 blood, it does not evoke the glory of contest; it is tragic, but it is
 passive; and yet, in so far as it is aleatory, and a peril sensibly
 touching them, it does truly season the men's lives.  Of those who fail,
 I do not speak--despair should be sacred; but to those who even modestly
 succeed, the changes of their life bring interest: a job found, a
 shilling saved, a dainty earned, all these are wells of pleasure
 springing afresh for the successful poor; and it is not from these but
 from the villa-dweller that we hear complaints of the unworthiness of
 life.  Much, then, as the average of the proletariat would gain in this
 new state of life, they would also lose a certain something, which would
 not be missed in the beginning, but would be missed progressively and
 progressively lamented.  Soon there would be a looking back: there would
 be tales of the old world humming in young men's ears, tales of the tramp
 and the pedlar, and the hopeful emigrant.  And in the stall-fed life of
 the successful ant-heap--with its regular meals, regular duties, regular
 pleasures, an even course of life, and fear excluded--the vicissitudes,
 delights, and havens of to-day will seem of epic breadth.  This may seem
 a shallow observation; but the springs by which men are moved lie much on
 the surface.  Bread, I believe, has always been considered first, but the
 circus comes close upon its heels.  Bread we suppose to be given amply;
 the cry for circuses will be the louder, and if the life of our
 descendants be such as we have conceived, there are two beloved pleasures
 on which they will be likely to fall back: the pleasures of intrigue and
 of sedition.
 
 In all this I have supposed the ant-heap to be financially sound.  I am
 no economist, only a writer of fiction; but even as such, I know one
 thing that bears on the economic question--I know the imperfection of
 man's faculty for business.  The Anarchists, who count some rugged
 elements of common sense among what seem to me their tragic errors, have
 said upon this matter all that I could wish to say, and condemned
 beforehand great economical polities.  So far it is obvious that they are
 right; they may be right also in predicting a period of communal
 independence, and they may even be right in thinking that desirable.  But
 the rise of communes is none the less the end of economic equality, just
 when we were told it was beginning.  Communes will not be all equal in
 extent, nor in quality of soil, nor in growth of population; nor will the
 surplus produce of all be equally marketable.  It will be the old story
 of competing interests, only with a new unit; and, as it appears to me, a
 new, inevitable danger.  For the merchant and the manufacturer, in this
 new world, will be a sovereign commune; it is a sovereign power that will
 see its crops undersold, and its manufactures worsted in the market.  And
 all the more dangerous that the sovereign power should be small.  Great
 powers are slow to stir; national affronts, even with the aid of
 newspapers, filter slowly into popular consciousness; national losses are
 so unequally shared, that one part of the population will be counting its
 gains while another sits by a cold hearth.  But in the sovereign commune
 all will be centralised and sensitive.  When jealousy springs up, when
 (let us say) the commune of Poole has overreached the commune of
 Dorchester, irritation will run like quicksilver throughout the body
 politic; each man in Dorchester will have to suffer directly in his diet
 and his dress; even the secretary, who drafts the official
 correspondence, will sit down to his task embittered, as a man who has
 dined ill and may expect to dine worse; and thus a business difference
 between communes will take on much the same colour as a dispute between
 diggers in the lawless West, and will lead as directly to the arbitrament
 of blows.  So that the establishment of the communal system will not only
 reintroduce all the injustices and heart-burnings of economic inequality,
 but will, in all human likelihood, inaugurate a world of hedgerow
 warfare.  Dorchester will march on Poole, Sherborne on Dorchester,
 Wimborne on both; the waggons will be fired on as they follow the
 highway, the trains wrecked on the lines, the ploughman will go armed
 into the field of tillage; and if we have not a return of ballad
 literature, the local press at least will celebrate in a high vein the
 victory of Cerne Abbas or the reverse of Toller Porcorum.  At least this
 will not be dull; when I was younger, I could have welcomed such a world
 with relief; but it is the New-Old with a vengeance, and irresistibly
 suggests the growth of military powers and the foundation of new empires.
 
 
 
 
 COLLEGE PAPERS
 
 
 CHAPTER I--EDINBURGH STUDENTS IN 1824
 
 
 On the 2nd of January 1824 was issued the prospectus of the _Lapsus
 Linguae_; _or_, _the College Tatler_; and on the 7th the first number
 appeared.  On Friday the 2nd of April '_Mr. Tatler_ became speechless.'
 Its history was not all one success; for the editor (who applies to
 himself the words of Iago, 'I am nothing if I am not critical')
 overstepped the bounds of caution, and found himself seriously embroiled
 with the powers that were.  There appeared in No. XVI. a most bitter
 satire upon Sir John Leslie, in which he was compared to Falstaff,
 charged with puffing himself, and very prettily censured for publishing
 only the first volume of a class-book, and making all purchasers pay for
 both.  Sir John Leslie took up the matter angrily, visited Carfrae the
 publisher, and threatened him with an action, till he was forced to turn
 the hapless _Lapsus_ out of doors.  The maltreated periodical found
 shelter in the shop of Huie, Infirmary Street; and No. XVII. was duly
 issued from the new office.  No. XVII. beheld _Mr. Tatler's_ humiliation,
 in which, with fulsome apology and not very credible assurances of
 respect and admiration, he disclaims the article in question, and
 advertises a new issue of No. XVI. with all objectionable matter omitted.
 This, with pleasing euphemism, he terms in a later advertisement, 'a new
 and improved edition.'  This was the only remarkable adventure of _Mr.
 Tatler's_ brief existence; unless we consider as such a silly Chaldee
 manuscript in imitation of _Blackwood_, and a letter of reproof from a
 divinity student on the impiety of the same dull effusion.  He laments
 the near approach of his end in pathetic terms.  'How shall we summon up
 sufficient courage,' says he, 'to look for the last time on our beloved
 little devil and his inestimable proof-sheet?  How shall we be able to
 pass No. 14 Infirmary Street and feel that all its attractions are over?
 How shall we bid farewell for ever to that excellent man, with the long
 greatcoat, wooden leg and wooden board, who acts as our representative at
 the gate of _Alma Mater_?'  But alas! he had no choice: _Mr. Tatler_,
 whose career, he says himself, had been successful, passed peacefully
 away, and has ever since dumbly implored 'the bringing home of bell and
 burial.'
 
 _Alter et idem_.  A very different affair was the _Lapsus Linguae_ from
 the _Edinburgh University Magazine_.  The two prospectuses alone, laid
 side by side, would indicate the march of luxury and the repeal of the
 paper duty.  The penny bi-weekly broadside of session 1828-4 was almost
 wholly dedicated to Momus.  Epigrams, pointless letters, amorous verses,
 and University grievances are the continual burthen of the song.  But
 _Mr. Tatler_ was not without a vein of hearty humour; and his pages
 afford what is much better: to wit, a good picture of student life as it
 then was.  The students of those polite days insisted on retaining their
 hats in the class-room.  There was a cab-stance in front of the College;
 and 'Carriage Entrance' was posted above the main arch, on what the
 writer pleases to call 'coarse, unclassic boards.'  The benches of the
 'Speculative' then, as now, were red; but all other Societies (the
 'Dialectic' is the only survivor) met downstairs, in some rooms of which
 it is pointedly said that 'nothing else could conveniently be made of
 them.'  However horrible these dungeons may have been, it is certain that
 they were paid for, and that far too heavily for the taste of session
 1823-4, which found enough calls upon its purse for porter and toasted
 cheese at Ambrose's, or cranberry tarts and ginger-wine at Doull's.
 Duelling was still a possibility; so much so that when two medicals fell
 to fisticuffs in Adam Square, it was seriously hinted that single combat
 would be the result.  Last and most wonderful of all, Gall and Spurzheim
 were in every one's mouth; and the Law student, after having exhausted
 Byron's poetry and Scott's novels, informed the ladies of his belief in
 phrenology.  In the present day he would dilate on 'Red as a rose is
 she,' and then mention that he attends Old Greyfriars', as a tacit claim
 to intellectual superiority.  I do not know that the advance is much.
 
 But _Mr. Tatler's_ best performances were three short papers in which he
 hit off pretty smartly the idiosyncrasies of the '_Divinity_,' the
 '_Medical_,' and the '_Law_' of session 1823-4.  The fact that there was
 no notice of the '_Arts_' seems to suggest that they stood in the same
 intermediate position as they do now--the epitome of student-kind.  _Mr.
 Tatler's_ satire is, on the whole, good-humoured, and has not grown
 superannuated in _all_ its limbs.  His descriptions may limp at some
 points, but there are certain broad traits that apply equally well to
 session 1870-1.  He shows us the _Divinity_ of the period--tall, pale,
 and slender--his collar greasy, and his coat bare about the seams--'his
 white neckcloth serving four days, and regularly turned the third'--'the
 rim of his hat deficient in wool'--and 'a weighty volume of theology
 under his arm.'  He was the man to buy cheap 'a snuff-box, or a dozen of
 pencils, or a six-bladed knife, or a quarter of a hundred quills,' at any
 of the public sale-rooms.  He was noted for cheap purchases, and for
 exceeding the legal tender in halfpence.  He haunted 'the darkest and
 remotest corner of the Theatre Gallery.'  He was to be seen issuing from
 'aerial lodging-houses.'  Withal, says mine author, 'there were many good
 points about him: he paid his landlady's bill, read his Bible, went twice
 to church on Sunday, seldom swore, was not often tipsy, and bought the
 _Lapsus Linguae_.'
 
 The _Medical_, again, 'wore a white greatcoat, and consequently talked
 loud'--(there is something very delicious in that _consequently_).  He
 wore his hat on one side.  He was active, volatile, and went to the top
 of Arthur's Seat on the Sunday forenoon.  He was as quiet in a debating
 society as he was loud in the streets.  He was reckless and imprudent:
 yesterday he insisted on your sharing a bottle of claret with him (and
 claret was claret then, before the cheap-and-nasty treaty), and to-morrow
 he asks you for the loan of a penny to buy the last number of the
 _Lapsus_.
 
 The student of _Law_, again, was a learned man.  'He had turned over the
 leaves of Justinian's _Institutes_, and knew that they were written in
 Latin.  He was well acquainted with the title-page of Blackstone's
 _Commentaries_, and _argal_ (as the gravedigger in _Hamlet_ says) he was
 not a person to be laughed at.'  He attended the Parliament House in the
 character of a critic, and could give you stale sneers at all the
 celebrated speakers.  He was the terror of essayists at the Speculative
 or the Forensic.  In social qualities he seems to have stood unrivalled.
 Even in the police-office we find him shining with undiminished lustre.
 'If a _Charlie_ should find him rather noisy at an untimely hour, and
 venture to take him into custody, he appears next morning like a Daniel
 come to judgment.  He opens his mouth to speak, and the divine precepts
 of unchanging justice and Scots law flow from his tongue.  The magistrate
 listens in amazement, and fines him only a couple of guineas.'
 
 Such then were our predecessors and their College Magazine.  Barclay,
 Ambrose, Young Amos, and Fergusson were to them what the Cafe, the
 Rainbow, and Rutherford's are to us.  An hour's reading in these old
 pages absolutely confuses us, there is so much that is similar and so
 much that is different; the follies and amusements are so like our own,
 and the manner of frolicking and enjoying are so changed, that one pauses
 and looks about him in philosophic judgment.  The muddy quadrangle is
 thick with living students; but in our eyes it swarms also with the
 phantasmal white greatcoats and tilted hats of 1824.  Two races meet:
 races alike and diverse.  Two performances are played before our eyes;
 but the change seems merely of impersonators, of scenery, of costume.
 Plot and passion are the same.  It is the fall of the spun shilling
 whether seventy-one or twenty-four has the best of it.
 
 In a future number we hope to give a glance at the individualities of the
 present, and see whether the cast shall be head or tail--whether we or
 the readers of the _Lapsus_ stand higher in the balance.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--THE MODERN STUDENT CONSIDERED GENERALLY
 
 
 We have now reached the difficult portion of our task.  _Mr. Tatler_, for
 all that we care, may have been as virulent as he liked about the
 students of a former; but for the iron to touch our sacred selves, for a
 brother of the Guild to betray its most privy infirmities, let such a
 Judas look to himself as he passes on his way to the Scots Law or the
 Diagnostic, below the solitary lamp at the corner of the dark quadrangle.
 We confess that this idea alarms us.  We enter a protest.  We bind
 ourselves over verbally to keep the peace.  We hope, moreover, that
 having thus made you secret to our misgivings, you will excuse us if we
 be dull, and set that down to caution which you might before have charged
 to the account of stupidity.
 
 The natural tendency of civilisation is to obliterate those distinctions
 which are the best salt of life.  All the fine old professional flavour
 in language has evaporated.  Your very gravedigger has forgotten his
 avocation in his electorship, and would quibble on the Franchise over
 Ophelia's grave, instead of more appropriately discussing the duration of
 bodies under ground.  From this tendency, from this gradual attrition of
 life, in which everything pointed and characteristic is being rubbed
 down, till the whole world begins to slip between our fingers in smooth
 undistinguishable sands, from this, we say, it follows that we must not
 attempt to join _Mr. Taller_ in his simple division of students into
 _Law_, _Divinity_, and _Medical_.  Nowadays the Faculties may shake hands
 over their follies; and, like Mrs. Frail and Mrs. Foresight (in _Love for
 Love_) they may stand in the doors of opposite class-rooms, crying:
 'Sister, Sister--Sister everyway!'  A few restrictions, indeed, remain to
 influence the followers of individual branches of study.  The Divinity,
 for example, must be an avowed believer; and as this, in the present day,
 is unhappily considered by many as a confession of weakness, he is fain
 to choose one of two ways of gilding the distasteful orthodox bolus.
 Some swallow it in a thin jelly of metaphysics; for it is even a credit
 to believe in God on the evidence of some crack-jaw philosopher, although
 it is a decided slur to believe in Him on His own authority.  Others
 again (and this we think the worst method), finding German grammar a
 somewhat dry morsel, run their own little heresy as a proof of
 independence; and deny one of the cardinal doctrines that they may hold
 the others without being laughed at.
 
 Besides, however, such influences as these, there is little more
 distinction between the faculties than the traditionary ideal, handed
 down through a long sequence of students, and getting rounder and more
 featureless at each successive session.  The plague of uniformity has
 descended on the College.  Students (and indeed all sorts and conditions
 of men) now require their faculty and character hung round their neck on
 a placard, like the scenes in Shakespeare's theatre.  And in the midst of
 all this weary sameness, not the least common feature is the gravity of
 every face.  No more does the merry medical run eagerly in the clear
 winter morning up the rugged sides of Arthur's Seat, and hear the church
 bells begin and thicken and die away below him among the gathered smoke
 of the city.  He will not break Sunday to so little purpose.  He no
 longer finds pleasure in the mere output of his surplus energy.  He
 husbands his strength, and lays out walks, and reading, and amusement
 with deep consideration, so that he may get as much work and pleasure out
 of his body as he can, and waste none of his energy on mere impulse, or
 such flat enjoyment as an excursion in the country.
 
 See the quadrangle in the interregnum of classes, in those two or three
 minutes when it is full of passing students, and we think you will admit
 that, if we have not made it 'an habitation of dragons,' we have at least
 transformed it into 'a court for owls.'  Solemnity broods heavily over
 the enclosure; and wherever you seek it, you will find a dearth of
 merriment, an absence of real youthful enjoyment.  You might as well try
 
     'To move wild laughter in the throat of death'
 
 as to excite any healthy stir among the bulk of this staid company.
 
 The studious congregate about the doors of the different classes,
 debating the matter of the lecture, or comparing note-books.  A reserved
 rivalry sunders them.  Here are some deep in Greek particles: there,
 others are already inhabitants of that land
 
     'Where entity and quiddity,
     'Like ghosts of defunct bodies fly--
     Where Truth in person does appear
     Like words congealed in northern air.'
 
 But none of them seem to find any relish for their studies--no pedantic
 love of this subject or that lights up their eyes--science and learning
 are only means for a livelihood, which they have considerately embraced
 and which they solemnly pursue.  'Labour's pale priests,' their lips seem
 incapable of laughter, except in the way of polite recognition of
 professorial wit.  The stains of ink are chronic on their meagre fingers.
 They walk like Saul among the asses.
 
 The dandies are not less subdued.  In 1824 there was a noisy dapper
 dandyism abroad.  Vulgar, as we should now think, but yet genial--a
 matter of white greatcoats and loud voices--strangely different from the
 stately frippery that is rife at present.  These men are out of their
 element in the quadrangle.  Even the small remains of boisterous humour,
 which still clings to any collection of young men, jars painfully on
 their morbid sensibilities; and they beat a hasty retreat to resume their
 perfunctory march along Princes Street.  Flirtation is to them a great
 social duty, a painful obligation, which they perform on every occasion
 in the same chill official manner, and with the same commonplace
 advances, the same dogged observance of traditional behaviour.  The shape
 of their raiment is a burden almost greater than they can bear, and they
 halt in their walk to preserve the due adjustment of their trouser-knees,
 till one would fancy he had mixed in a procession of Jacobs.  We speak,
 of course, for ourselves; but we would as soon associate with a herd of
 sprightly apes as with these gloomy modern beaux.  Alas, that our
 Mirabels, our Valentines, even our Brummels, should have left their
 mantles upon nothing more amusing!
 
 Nor are the fast men less constrained.  Solemnity, even in dissipation,
 is the order of the day; and they go to the devil with a perverse
 seriousness, a systematic rationalism of wickedness that would have
 surprised the simpler sinners of old.  Some of these men whom we see
 gravely conversing on the steps have but a slender acquaintance with each
 other.  Their intercourse consists principally of mutual bulletins of
 depravity; and, week after week, as they meet they reckon up their items
 of transgression, and give an abstract of their downward progress for
 approval and encouragement.  These folk form a freemasonry of their own.
 An oath is the shibboleth of their sinister fellowship.  Once they hear a
 man swear, it is wonderful how their tongues loosen and their bashful
 spirits take enlargement, under the consciousness of brotherhood.  There
 is no folly, no pardoning warmth of temper about them; they are as
 steady-going and systematic in their own way as the studious in theirs.
 
 Not that we are without merry men.  No.  We shall not be ungrateful to
 those, whose grimaces, whose ironical laughter, whose active feet in the
 'College Anthem' have beguiled so many weary hours and added a pleasant
 variety to the strain of close attention.  But even these are too
 evidently professional in their antics.  They go about cogitating puns
 and inventing tricks.  It is their vocation, Hal.  They are the
 gratuitous jesters of the class-room; and, like the clown when he leaves
 the stage, their merriment too often sinks as the bell rings the hour of
 liberty, and they pass forth by the Post-Office, grave and sedate, and
 meditating fresh gambols for the morrow.
 
 This is the impression left on the mind of any observing student by too
 many of his fellows.  They seem all frigid old men; and one pauses to
 think how such an unnatural state of matters is produced.  We feel
 inclined to blame for it the unfortunate absence of _University feeling_
 which is so marked a characteristic of our Edinburgh students.
 Academical interests are so few and far between--students, as students,
 have so little in common, except a peevish rivalry--there is such an
 entire want of broad college sympathies and ordinary college friendships,
 that we fancy that no University in the kingdom is in so poor a plight.
 Our system is full of anomalies.  A, who cut B whilst he was a shabby
 student, curries sedulously up to him and cudgels his memory for
 anecdotes about him when he becomes the great so-and-so.  Let there be an
 end of this shy, proud reserve on the one hand, and this shuddering fine
 ladyism on the other; and we think we shall find both ourselves and the
 College bettered.  Let it be a sufficient reason for intercourse that two
 men sit together on the same benches.  Let the great A be held excused
 for nodding to the shabby B in Princes Street, if he can say, 'That
 fellow is a student.'  Once this could be brought about, we think you
 would find the whole heart of the University beat faster.  We think you
 would find a fusion among the students, a growth of common feelings, an
 increasing sympathy between class and class, whose influence (in such a
 heterogeneous company as ours) might be of incalculable value in all
 branches of politics and social progress.  It would do more than this.
 If we could find some method of making the University a real mother to
 her sons--something beyond a building of class-rooms, a Senatus and a
 lottery of somewhat shabby prizes--we should strike a death-blow at the
 constrained and unnatural attitude of our Society.  At present we are not
 a united body, but a loose gathering of individuals, whose inherent
 attraction is allowed to condense them into little knots and coteries.
 Our last snowball riot read us a plain lesson on our condition.  There
 was no party spirit--no unity of interests.  A few, who were
 mischievously inclined, marched off to the College of Surgeons in a
 pretentious file; but even before they reached their destination the
 feeble inspiration had died out in many, and their numbers were sadly
 thinned.  Some followed strange gods in the direction of Drummond Street,
 and others slunk back to meek good-boyism at the feet of the Professors.
 The same is visible in better things.  As you send a man to an English
 University that he may have his prejudices rubbed off, you might send him
 to Edinburgh that he may have them ingrained--rendered
 indelible--fostered by sympathy into living principles of his spirit.
 And the reason of it is quite plain.  From this absence of University
 feeling it comes that a man's friendships are always the direct and
 immediate results of these very prejudices.  A common weakness is the
 best master of ceremonies in our quadrangle: a mutual vice is the
 readiest introduction.  The studious associate with the studious
 alone--the dandies with the dandies.  There is nothing to force them to
 rub shoulders with the others; and so they grow day by day more wedded to
 their own original opinions and affections.  They see through the same
 spectacles continually.  All broad sentiments, all real catholic humanity
 expires; and the mind gets gradually stiffened into one position--becomes
 so habituated to a contracted atmosphere, that it shudders and withers
 under the least draught of the free air that circulates in the general
 field of mankind.
 
 Specialism in Society then is, we think, one cause of our present state.
 Specialism in study is another.  We doubt whether this has ever been a
 good thing since the world began; but we are sure it is much worse now
 than it was.  Formerly, when a man became a specialist, it was out of
 affection for his subject.  With a somewhat grand devotion he left all
 the world of Science to follow his true love; and he contrived to find
 that strange pedantic interest which inspired the man who
 
     'Settled _Hoti's_ business--let it be--
        Properly based _Oun--_
     Gave us the doctrine of the enclitic _De_,
        Dead from the waist down.'
 
 Nowadays it is quite different.  Our pedantry wants even the saving
 clause of Enthusiasm.  The election is now matter of necessity and not of
 choice.  Knowledge is now too broad a field for your Jack-of-all-Trades;
 and, from beautifully utilitarian reasons, he makes his choice, draws his
 pen through a dozen branches of study, and behold--John the Specialist.
 That this is the way to be wealthy we shall not deny; but we hold that it
 is _not_ the way to be healthy or wise.  The whole mind becomes narrowed
 and circumscribed to one 'punctual spot' of knowledge.  A rank unhealthy
 soil breeds a harvest of prejudices.  Feeling himself above others in his
 one little branch--in the classification of toadstools, or Carthaginian
 history--he waxes great in his own eyes and looks down on others.  Having
 all his sympathies educated in one way, they die out in every other; and
 he is apt to remain a peevish, narrow, and intolerant bigot.  Dilettante
 is now a term of reproach; but there is a certain form of dilettantism to
 which no one can object.  It is this that we want among our students.  We
 wish them to abandon no subject until they have seen and felt its
 merit--to act under a general interest in all branches of knowledge, not
 a commercial eagerness to excel in one.
 
 In both these directions our sympathies are constipated.  We are apostles
 of our own caste and our own subject of study, instead of being, as we
 should, true men and _loving_ students.  Of course both of these could be
 corrected by the students themselves; but this is nothing to the purpose:
 it is more important to ask whether the Senatus or the body of alumni
 could do nothing towards the growth of better feeling and wider
 sentiments.  Perhaps in another paper we may say something upon this
 head.
 
 One other word, however, before we have done.  What shall we be when we
 grow really old?  Of yore, a man was thought to lay on restrictions and
 acquire new deadweight of mournful experience with every year, till he
 looked back on his youth as the very summer of impulse and freedom.  We
 please ourselves with thinking that it cannot be so with us.  We would
 fain hope that, as we have begun in one way, we may end in another; and
 that when we are in fact the octogenarians that we _seem_ at present,
 there shall be no merrier men on earth.  It is pleasant to picture us,
 sunning ourselves in Princes Street of a morning, or chirping over our
 evening cups, with all the merriment that we wanted in youth.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--DEBATING SOCIETIES
 
 
 A debating society is at first somewhat of a disappointment.  You do not
 often find the youthful Demosthenes chewing his pebbles in the same room
 with you; or, even if you do, you will probably think the performance
 little to be admired.  As a general rule, the members speak shamefully
 ill.  The subjects of debate are heavy; and so are the fines.  The Ballot
 Question--oldest of dialectic nightmares--is often found astride of a
 somnolent sederunt.  The Greeks and Romans, too, are reserved as sort of
 _general-utility_ men, to do all the dirty work of illustration; and they
 fill as many functions as the famous waterfall scene at the 'Princess's,'
 which I found doing duty on one evening as a gorge in Peru, a haunt of
 German robbers, and a peaceful vale in the Scottish borders.  There is a
 sad absence of striking argument or real lively discussion.  Indeed, you
 feel a growing contempt for your fellow-members; and it is not until you
 rise yourself to hawk and hesitate and sit shamefully down again, amid
 eleemosynary applause, that you begin to find your level and value others
 rightly.  Even then, even when failure has damped your critical ardour,
 you will see many things to be laughed at in the deportment of your
 rivals.
 
 Most laughable, perhaps, are your indefatigable strivers after eloquence.
 They are of those who 'pursue with eagerness the phantoms of hope,' and
 who, since they expect that 'the deficiencies of last sentence will be
 supplied by the next,' have been recommended by Dr. Samuel Johnson to
 'attend to the History of Rasselas, Prince of Abyssinia.'  They are
 characterised by a hectic hopefulness.  Nothing damps them.  They rise
 from the ruins of one abortive sentence, to launch forth into another
 with unabated vigour.  They have all the manner of an orator.  From the
 tone of their voice, you would expect a splendid period--and lo! a string
 of broken-backed, disjointed clauses, eked out with stammerings and
 throat-clearings.  They possess the art (learned from the pulpit) of
 rounding an uneuphonious sentence by dwelling on a single syllable--of
 striking a balance in a top-heavy period by lengthening out a word into a
 melancholy quaver.  Withal, they never cease to hope.  Even at last, even
 when they have exhausted all their ideas, even after the would-be
 peroration has finally refused to perorate, they remain upon their feet
 with their mouths open, waiting for some further inspiration, like
 Chaucer's widow's son in the dung-hole, after
 
     'His throat was kit unto the nekke bone,'
 
 in vain expectation of that seed that was to be laid upon his tongue, and
 give him renewed and clearer utterance.
 
 These men may have something to say, if they could only say it--indeed
 they generally have; but the next class are people who, having nothing to
 say, are cursed with a facility and an unhappy command of words, that
 makes them the prime nuisances of the society they affect.  They try to
 cover their absence of matter by an unwholesome vitality of delivery.
 They look triumphantly round the room, as if courting applause, after a
 torrent of diluted truism.  They talk in a circle, harping on the same
 dull round of argument, and returning again and again to the same remark
 with the same sprightliness, the same irritating appearance of novelty.
 
 After this set, any one is tolerable; so we shall merely hint at a few
 other varieties.  There is your man who is pre-eminently conscientious,
 whose face beams with sincerity as he opens on the negative, and who
 votes on the affirmative at the end, looking round the room with an air
 of chastened pride.  There is also the irrelevant speaker, who rises,
 emits a joke or two, and then sits down again, without ever attempting to
 tackle the subject of debate.  Again, we have men who ride pick-a-back on
 their family reputation, or, if their family have none, identify
 themselves with some well-known statesman, use his opinions, and lend him
 their patronage on all occasions.  This is a dangerous plan, and serves
 oftener, I am afraid, to point a difference than to adorn a speech.
 
 But alas! a striking failure may be reached without tempting Providence
 by any of these ambitious tricks.  Our own stature will be found high
 enough for shame.  The success of three simple sentences lures us into a
 fatal parenthesis in the fourth, from whose shut brackets we may never
 disentangle the thread of our discourse.  A momentary flush tempts us
 into a quotation; and we may be left helpless in the middle of one of
 Pope's couplets, a white film gathering before our eyes, and our kind
 friends charitably trying to cover our disgrace by a feeble round of
 applause.  _Amis lecteurs_, this is a painful topic.  It is possible that
 we too, we, the 'potent, grave, and reverend' editor, may have suffered
 these things, and drunk as deep as any of the cup of shameful failure.
 Let us dwell no longer on so delicate a subject.
 
 In spite, however, of these disagreeables, I should recommend any student
 to suffer them with Spartan courage, as the benefits he receives should
 repay him an hundredfold for them all.  The life of the debating society
 is a handy antidote to the life of the classroom and quadrangle.  Nothing
 could be conceived more excellent as a weapon against many of those
 _peccant humours_ that we have been railing against in the jeremiad of
 our last 'College Paper'--particularly in the field of intellect.  It is
 a sad sight to see our heather-scented students, our boys of seventeen,
 coming up to College with determined views--_roues_ in
 speculation--having gauged the vanity of philosophy or learned to shun it
 as the middle-man of heresy--a company of determined, deliberate
 opinionists, not to be moved by all the sleights of logic.  What have
 such men to do with study?  If their minds are made up irrevocably, why
 burn the 'studious lamp' in search of further confirmation?  Every set
 opinion I hear a student deliver I feel a certain lowering of my regard.
 He who studies, he who is yet employed in groping for his premises,
 should keep his mind fluent and sensitive, keen to mark flaws, and
 willing to surrender untenable positions.  He should keep himself
 teachable, or cease the expensive farce of being taught.  It is to
 further this docile spirit that we desire to press the claims of debating
 societies.  It is as a means of melting down this museum of premature
 petrifactions into living and impressionable soul that we insist on their
 utility.  If we could once prevail on our students to feel no shame in
 avowing an uncertain attitude towards any subject, if we could teach them
 that it was unnecessary for every lad to have his _opinionette_ on every
 topic, we should have gone a far way towards bracing the intellectual
 tone of the coming race of thinkers; and this it is which debating
 societies are so well fitted to perform.
 
 We there meet people of every shade of opinion, and make friends with
 them.  We are taught to rail against a man the whole session through, and
 then hob-a-nob with him at the concluding entertainment.  We find men of
 talent far exceeding our own, whose conclusions are widely different from
 ours; and we are thus taught to distrust ourselves.  But the best means
 of all towards catholicity is that wholesome rule which some folk are
 most inclined to condemn--I mean the law of _obliged speeches_.  Your
 senior member commands; and you must take the affirmative or the
 negative, just as suits his best convenience.  This tends to the most
 perfect liberality.  It is no good hearing the arguments of an opponent,
 for in good verity you rarely follow them; and even if you do take the
 trouble to listen, it is merely in a captious search for weaknesses.
 This is proved, I fear, in every debate; when you hear each speaker
 arguing out his own prepared _specialite_ (he never intended speaking, of
 course, until some remarks of, etc.), arguing out, I say, his own
 _coached-up_ subject without the least attention to what has gone before,
 as utterly at sea about the drift of his adversary's speech as Panurge
 when he argued with Thaumaste, and merely linking his own prelection to
 the last by a few flippant criticisms.  Now, as the rule stands, you are
 saddled with the side you disapprove, and so you are forced, by regard
 for your own fame, to argue out, to feel with, to elaborate completely,
 the case as it stands against yourself; and what a fund of wisdom do you
 not turn up in this idle digging of the vineyard!  How many new
 difficulties take form before your eyes? how many superannuated arguments
 cripple finally into limbo, under the glance of your enforced
 eclecticism!
 
 Nor is this the only merit of Debating Societies.  They tend also to
 foster taste, and to promote friendship between University men.  This
 last, as we have had occasion before to say, is the great requirement of
 our student life; and it will therefore be no waste of time if we devote
 a paragraph to this subject in its connection with Debating Societies.
 At present they partake too much of the nature of a _clique_.  Friends
 propose friends, and mutual friends second them, until the society
 degenerates into a sort of family party.  You may confirm old
 acquaintances, but you can rarely make new ones.  You find yourself in
 the atmosphere of your own daily intercourse.  Now, this is an
 unfortunate circumstance, which it seems to me might readily be
 rectified.  Our Principal has shown himself so friendly towards all
 College improvements that I cherish the hope of seeing shortly realised a
 certain suggestion, which is not a new one with me, and which must often
 have been proposed and canvassed heretofore--I mean, a real _University
 Debating Society_, patronised by the Senatus, presided over by the
 Professors, to which every one might gain ready admittance on sight of
 his matriculation ticket, where it would be a favour and not a necessity
 to speak, and where the obscure student might have another object for
 attendance besides the mere desire to save his fines: to wit, the chance
 of drawing on himself the favourable consideration of his teachers.  This
 would be merely following in the good tendency, which has been so
 noticeable during all this session, to increase and multiply student
 societies and clubs of every sort.  Nor would it be a matter of much
 difficulty.  The united societies would form a nucleus: one of the
 class-rooms at first, and perhaps afterwards the great hall above the
 library, might be the place of meeting.  There would be no want of
 attendance or enthusiasm, I am sure; for it is a very different thing to
 speak under the bushel of a private club on the one hand, and, on the
 other, in a public place, where a happy period or a subtle argument may
 do the speaker permanent service in after life.  Such a club might end,
 perhaps, by rivalling the 'Union' at Cambridge or the 'Union' at Oxford.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--THE PHILOSOPHY OF UMBRELLAS {151}
 
 
 It is wonderful to think what a turn has been given to our whole Society
 by the fact that we live under the sign of Aquarius--that our climate is
 essentially wet.  A mere arbitrary distinction, like the walking-swords
 of yore, might have remained the symbol of foresight and respectability,
 had not the raw mists and dropping showers of our island pointed the
 inclination of Society to another exponent of those virtues.  A ribbon of
 the Legion of Honour or a string of medals may prove a person's courage;
 a title may prove his birth; a professorial chair his study and
 acquirement; but it is the habitual carriage of the umbrella that is the
 stamp of Respectability.  The umbrella has become the acknowledged index
 of social position.
 
 Robinson Crusoe presents us with a touching instance of the hankering
 after them inherent in the civilised and educated mind.  To the
 superficial, the hot suns of Juan Fernandez may sufficiently account for
 his quaint choice of a luxury; but surely one who had borne the hard
 labour of a seaman under the tropics for all these years could have
 supported an excursion after goats or a peaceful _constitutional_ arm in
 arm with the nude Friday.  No, it was not this: the memory of a vanished
 respectability called for some outward manifestation, and the result
 was--an umbrella.  A pious castaway might have rigged up a belfry and
 solaced his Sunday mornings with the mimicry of church-bells; but Crusoe
 was rather a moralist than a pietist, and his leaf-umbrella is as fine an
 example of the civilised mind striving to express itself under adverse
 circumstances as we have ever met with.
 
 It is not for nothing, either, that the umbrella has become the very
 foremost badge of modern civilisation--the Urim and Thummim of
 respectability.  Its pregnant symbolism has taken its rise in the most
 natural manner.  Consider, for a moment, when umbrellas were first
 introduced into this country, what manner of men would use them, and what
 class would adhere to the useless but ornamental cane.  The first,
 without doubt, would be the hypochondriacal, out of solicitude for their
 health, or the frugal, out of care for their raiment; the second, it is
 equally plain, would include the fop, the fool, and the Bobadil.  Any one
 acquainted with the growth of Society, and knowing out of what small
 seeds of cause are produced great revolutions, and wholly new conditions
 of intercourse, sees from this simple thought how the carriage of an
 umbrella came to indicate frugality, judicious regard for bodily welfare,
 and scorn for mere outward adornment, and, in one word, all those homely
 and solid virtues implied in the term RESPECTABILITY.  Not that the
 umbrella's costliness has nothing to do with its great influence.  Its
 possession, besides symbolising (as we have already indicated) the change
 from wild Esau to plain Jacob dwelling in tents, implies a certain
 comfortable provision of fortune.  It is not every one that can expose
 twenty-six shillings' worth of property to so many chances of loss and
 theft.  So strongly do we feel on this point, indeed, that we are almost
 inclined to consider all who possess really well-conditioned umbrellas as
 worthy of the Franchise.  They have a qualification standing in their
 lobbies; they carry a sufficient stake in the common-weal below their
 arm.  One who bears with him an umbrella--such a complicated structure of
 whalebone, of silk, and of cane, that it becomes a very microcosm of
 modern industry--is necessarily a man of peace.  A half-crown cane may be
 applied to an offender's head on a very moderate provocation; but a
 six-and-twenty shilling silk is a possession too precious to be
 adventured in the shock of war.
 
 These are but a few glances at how umbrellas (in the general) came to
 their present high estate.  But the true Umbrella-Philosopher meets with
 far stranger applications as he goes about the streets.
 
 Umbrellas, like faces, acquire a certain sympathy with the individual who
 carries them: indeed, they are far more capable of betraying his trust;
 for whereas a face is given to us so far ready made, and all our power
 over it is in frowning, and laughing, and grimacing, during the first
 three or four decades of life, each umbrella is selected from a whole
 shopful, as being most consonant to the purchaser's disposition.  An
 undoubted power of diagnosis rests with the practised
 Umbrella-Philosopher.  O you who lisp, and amble, and change the fashion
 of your countenances--you who conceal all these, how little do you think
 that you left a proof of your weakness in our umbrella-stand--that even
 now, as you shake out the folds to meet the thickening snow, we read in
 its ivory handle the outward and visible sign of your snobbery, or from
 the exposed gingham of its cover detect, through coat and waistcoat, the
 hidden hypocrisy of the '_dickey_'!  But alas! even the umbrella is no
 certain criterion.  The falsity and the folly of the human race have
 degraded that graceful symbol to the ends of dishonesty; and while some
 umbrellas, from carelessness in selection, are not strikingly
 characteristic (for it is only in what a man loves that he displays his
 real nature), others, from certain prudential motives, are chosen
 directly opposite to the person's disposition.  A mendacious umbrella is
 a sign of great moral degradation.  Hypocrisy naturally shelters itself
 below a silk; while the fast youth goes to visit his religious friends
 armed with the decent and reputable gingham.  May it not be said of the
 bearers of these inappropriate umbrellas that they go about the streets
 'with a lie in their right hand'?
 
 The kings of Siam, as we read, besides having a graduated social scale of
 umbrellas (which was a good thing), prevented the great bulk of their
 subjects from having any at all, which was certainly a bad thing.  We
 should be sorry to believe that this Eastern legislator was a fool--the
 idea of an aristocracy of umbrellas is too philosophic to have originated
 in a nobody--and we have accordingly taken exceeding pains to find out
 the reason of this harsh restriction.  We think we have succeeded; but,
 while admiring the principle at which he aimed, and while cordially
 recognising in the Siamese potentate the only man before ourselves who
 had taken a real grasp of the umbrella, we must be allowed to point out
 how unphilosophically the great man acted in this particular.  His
 object, plainly, was to prevent any unworthy persons from bearing the
 sacred symbol of domestic virtues.  We cannot excuse his limiting these
 virtues to the circle of his court.  We must only remember that such was
 the feeling of the age in which he lived.  Liberalism had not yet raised
 the war-cry of the working classes.  But here was his mistake: it was a
 needless regulation.  Except in a very few cases of hypocrisy joined to a
 powerful intellect, men, not by nature _umbrellarians_, have tried again
 and again to become so by art, and yet have failed--have expended their
 patrimony in the purchase of umbrella after umbrella, and yet have
 systematically lost them, and have finally, with contrite spirits and
 shrunken purses, given up their vain struggle, and relied on theft and
 borrowing for the remainder of their lives.  This is the most remarkable
 fact that we have had occasion to notice; and yet we challenge the candid
 reader to call it in question.  Now, as there cannot be any _moral
 selection_ in a mere dead piece of furniture--as the umbrella cannot be
 supposed to have an affinity for individual men equal and reciprocal to
 that which men certainly feel toward individual umbrellas--we took the
 trouble of consulting a scientific friend as to whether there was any
 possible physical explanation of the phenomenon.  He was unable to supply
 a plausible theory, or even hypothesis; but we extract from his letter
 the following interesting passage relative to the physical peculiarities
 of umbrellas: 'Not the least important, and by far the most curious
 property of the umbrella, is the energy which it displays in affecting
 the atmospheric strata.  There is no fact in meteorology better
 established--indeed, it is almost the only one on which meteorologists
 are agreed--than that the carriage of an umbrella produces desiccation of
 the air; while if it be left at home, aqueous vapour is largely produced,
 and is soon deposited in the form of rain.  No theory,' my friend
 continues, 'competent to explain this hygrometric law has been given (as
 far as I am aware) by Herschel, Dove, Glaisher, Tait, Buchan, or any
 other writer; nor do I pretend to supply the defect.  I venture, however,
 to throw out the conjecture that it will be ultimately found to belong to
 the same class of natural laws as that agreeable to which a slice of
 toast always descends with the buttered surface downwards.'
 
 But it is time to draw to a close.  We could expatiate much longer upon
 this topic, but want of space constrains us to leave unfinished these few
 desultory remarks--slender contributions towards a subject which has
 fallen sadly backward, and which, we grieve to say, was better understood
 by the king of Siam in 1686 than by all the philosophers of to-day.  If,
 however, we have awakened in any rational mind an interest in the
 symbolism of umbrellas--in any generous heart a more complete sympathy
 with the dumb companion of his daily walk--or in any grasping spirit a
 pure notion of respectability strong enough to make him expend his
 six-and-twenty shillings--we shall have deserved well of the world, to
 say nothing of the many industrious persons employed in the manufacture
 of the article.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V--THE PHILOSOPHY OF NOMENCLATURE
 
 
     'How many Caesars and Pompeys, by mere inspirations of the names,
     have been rendered worthy of them?  And how many are there, who might
     have done exceeding well in the world, had not their characters and
     spirits been totally depressed and Nicodemus'd into
     nothing?'--_Tristram Shandy_, vol. I. chap xix.
 
 Such were the views of the late Walter Shandy, Esq., Turkey merchant.  To
 the best of my belief, Mr. Shandy is the first who fairly pointed out the
 incalculable influence of nomenclature upon the whole life--who seems
 first to have recognised the one child, happy in an heroic appellation,
 soaring upwards on the wings of fortune, and the other, like the dead
 sailor in his shotted hammock, haled down by sheer weight of name into
 the abysses of social failure.  Solomon possibly had his eye on some such
 theory when he said that 'a good name is better than precious ointment';
 and perhaps we may trace a similar spirit in the compilers of the English
 Catechism, and the affectionate interest with which they linger round the
 catechumen's name at the very threshold of their work.  But, be these as
 they may, I think no one can censure me for appending, in pursuance of
 the expressed wish of his son, the Turkey merchant's name to his system,
 and pronouncing, without further preface, a short epitome of the
 'Shandean Philosophy of Nomenclature.'
 
 To begin, then: the influence of our name makes itself felt from the very
 cradle.  As a schoolboy I remember the pride with which I hailed Robin
 Hood, Robert Bruce, and Robert le Diable as my name-fellows; and the
 feeling of sore disappointment that fell on my heart when I found a
 freebooter or a general who did not share with me a single one of my
 numerous _praenomina_.  Look at the delight with which two children find
 they have the same name.  They are friends from that moment forth; they
 have a bond of union stronger than exchange of nuts and sweetmeats.  This
 feeling, I own, wears off in later life.  Our names lose their freshness
 and interest, become trite and indifferent.  But this, dear reader, is
 merely one of the sad effects of those 'shades of the prison-house' which
 come gradually betwixt us and nature with advancing years; it affords no
 weapon against the philosophy of names.
 
 In after life, although we fail to trace its working, that name which
 careless godfathers lightly applied to your unconscious infancy will have
 been moulding your character, and influencing with irresistible power the
 whole course of your earthly fortunes.  But the last name, overlooked by
 Mr. Shandy, is no whit less important as a condition of success.  Family
 names, we must recollect, are but inherited nicknames; and if the
 _sobriquet_ were applicable to the ancestor, it is most likely applicable
 to the descendant also.  You would not expect to find Mr. M'Phun acting
 as a mute, or Mr. M'Lumpha excelling as a professor of dancing.
 Therefore, in what follows, we shall consider names, independent of
 whether they are first or last.  And to begin with, look what a pull
 _Cromwell_ had over _Pym_--the one name full of a resonant imperialism,
 the other, mean, pettifogging, and unheroic to a degree.  Who would
 expect eloquence from _Pym_--who would read poems by _Pym_--who would bow
 to the opinion of _Pym_?  He might have been a dentist, but he should
 never have aspired to be a statesman.  I can only wonder that he
 succeeded as he did.  Pym and Habakkuk stand first upon the roll of men
 who have triumphed, by sheer force of genius, over the most unfavourable
 appellations.  But even these have suffered; and, had they been more
 fitly named, the one might have been Lord Protector, and the other have
 shared the laurels with Isaiah.  In this matter we must not forget that
 all our great poets have borne great names.  Chaucer, Spenser,
 Shakespeare, Milton, Pope, Wordsworth, Shelley--what a constellation of
 lordly words!  Not a single common-place name among them--not a Brown,
 not a Jones, not a Robinson; they are all names that one would stop and
 look at on a door-plate.  Now, imagine if _Pepys_ had tried to clamber
 somehow into the enclosure of poetry, what a blot would that word have
 made upon the list!  The thing was impossible.  In the first place a
 certain natural consciousness that men would have held him down to the
 level of his name, would have prevented him from rising above the Pepsine
 standard, and so haply withheld him altogether from attempting verse.
 Next, the booksellers would refuse to publish, and the world to read
 them, on the mere evidence of the fatal appellation.  And now, before I
 close this section, I must say one word as to _punnable_ names, names
 that stand alone, that have a significance and life apart from him that
 bears them.  These are the bitterest of all.  One friend of mine goes
 bowed and humbled through life under the weight of this misfortune; for
 it is an awful thing when a man's name is a joke, when he cannot be
 mentioned without exciting merriment, and when even the intimation of his
 death bids fair to carry laughter into many a home.
 
 So much for people who are badly named.  Now for people who are _too_
 well named, who go top-heavy from the font, who are baptized into a false
 position, and find themselves beginning life eclipsed under the fame of
 some of the great ones of the past.  A man, for instance, called William
 Shakespeare could never dare to write plays.  He is thrown into too
 humbling an apposition with the author of _Hamlet_.  Its own name coming
 after is such an anti-climax.  'The plays of William Shakespeare'? says
 the reader--'O no!  The plays of William Shakespeare Cockerill,' and he
 throws the book aside.  In wise pursuance of such views, Mr. John Milton
 Hengler, who not long since delighted us in this favoured town, has never
 attempted to write an epic, but has chosen a new path, and has excelled
 upon the tight-rope.  A marked example of triumph over this is the case
 of Mr. Dante Gabriel Rossetti.  On the face of the matter, I should have
 advised him to imitate the pleasing modesty of the last-named gentleman,
 and confine his ambition to the sawdust.  But Mr. Rossetti has triumphed.
 He has even dared to translate from his mighty name-father; and the voice
 of fame supports him in his boldness.
 
 Dear readers, one might write a year upon this matter.  A lifetime of
 comparison and research could scarce suffice for its elucidation.  So
 here, if it please you, we shall let it rest.  Slight as these notes have
 been, I would that the great founder of the system had been alive to see
 them.  How he had warmed and brightened, how his persuasive eloquence
 would have fallen on the ears of Toby; and what a letter of praise and
 sympathy would not the editor have received before the month was out!
 Alas, the thing was not to be.  Walter Shandy died and was duly buried,
 while yet his theory lay forgotten and neglected by his
 fellow-countrymen.  But, reader, the day will come, I hope, when a
 paternal government will stamp out, as seeds of national weakness, all
 depressing patronymics, and when godfathers and godmothers will soberly
 and earnestly debate the interest of the nameless one, and not rush
 blindfold to the christening.  In these days there shall be written a
 'Godfather's Assistant,' in shape of a dictionary of names, with their
 concomitant virtues and vices; and this book shall be scattered broadcast
 through the land, and shall be on the table of every one eligible for
 godfathership, until such a thing as a vicious or untoward appellation
 shall have ceased from off the face of the earth.
 
 
 
 
 CRITICISMS
 
 
 CHAPTER I--LORD LYTTON'S 'FABLES IN SONG'
 
 
 It seems as if Lord Lytton, in this new book of his, had found the form
 most natural to his talent.  In some ways, indeed, it may be held
 inferior to _Chronicles and Characters_; we look in vain for anything
 like the terrible intensity of the night-scene in _Irene_, or for any
 such passages of massive and memorable writing as appeared, here and
 there, in the earlier work, and made it not altogether unworthy of its
 model, Hugo's _Legend of the Ages_.  But it becomes evident, on the most
 hasty retrospect, that this earlier work was a step on the way towards
 the later.  It seems as if the author had been feeling about for his
 definite medium, and was already, in the language of the child's game,
 growing hot.  There are many pieces in _Chronicles and Characters_ that
 might be detached from their original setting, and embodied, as they
 stand, among the _Fables in Song_.
 
 For the term Fable is not very easy to define rigorously.  In the most
 typical form some moral precept is set forth by means of a conception
 purely fantastic, and usually somewhat trivial into the bargain; there is
 something playful about it, that will not support a very exacting
 criticism, and the lesson must be apprehended by the fancy at half a
 hint.  Such is the great mass of the old stories of wise animals or
 foolish men that have amused our childhood.  But we should expect the
 fable, in company with other and more important literary forms, to be
 more and more loosely, or at least largely, comprehended as time went on,
 and so to degenerate in conception from this original type.  That
 depended for much of its piquancy on the very fact that it was fantastic:
 the point of the thing lay in a sort of humorous inappropriateness; and
 it is natural enough that pleasantry of this description should become
 less common, as men learn to suspect some serious analogy underneath.
 Thus a comical story of an ape touches us quite differently after the
 proposition of Mr. Darwin's theory.  Moreover, there lay, perhaps, at the
 bottom of this primitive sort of fable, a humanity, a tenderness of rough
 truths; so that at the end of some story, in which vice or folly had met
 with its destined punishment, the fabulist might be able to assure his
 auditors, as we have often to assure tearful children on the like
 occasions, that they may dry their eyes, for none of it was true.
 
 But this benefit of fiction becomes lost with more sophisticated hearers
 and authors: a man is no longer the dupe of his own artifice, and cannot
 deal playfully with truths that are a matter of bitter concern to him in
 his life.  And hence, in the progressive centralisation of modern
 thought, we should expect the old form of fable to fall gradually into
 desuetude, and be gradually succeeded by another, which is a fable in all
 points except that it is not altogether fabulous.  And this new form,
 such as we should expect, and such as we do indeed find, still presents
 the essential character of brevity; as in any other fable also, there is,
 underlying and animating the brief action, a moral idea; and as in any
 other fable, the object is to bring this home to the reader through the
 intellect rather than through the feelings; so that, without being very
 deeply moved or interested by the characters of the piece, we should
 recognise vividly the hinges on which the little plot revolves.  But the
 fabulist now seeks analogies where before he merely sought humorous
 situations.  There will be now a logical nexus between the moral
 expressed and the machinery employed to express it.  The machinery, in
 fact, as this change is developed, becomes less and less fabulous.  We
 find ourselves in presence of quite a serious, if quite a miniature
 division of creative literature; and sometimes we have the lesson
 embodied in a sober, everyday narration, as in the parables of the New
 Testament, and sometimes merely the statement or, at most, the
 collocation of significant facts in life, the reader being left to
 resolve for himself the vague, troublesome, and not yet definitely moral
 sentiment which has been thus created.  And step by step with the
 development of this change, yet another is developed: the moral tends to
 become more indeterminate and large.  It ceases to be possible to append
 it, in a tag, to the bottom of the piece, as one might write the name
 below a caricature; and the fable begins to take rank with all other
 forms of creative literature, as something too ambitious, in spite of its
 miniature dimensions, to be resumed in any succinct formula without the
 loss of all that is deepest and most suggestive in it.
 
 Now it is in this widest sense that Lord Lytton understands the term;
 there are examples in his two pleasant volumes of all the forms already
 mentioned, and even of another which can only be admitted among fables by
 the utmost possible leniency of construction.  'Composure,' 'Et Caetera,'
 and several more, are merely similes poetically elaborated.  So, too, is
 the pathetic story of the grandfather and grandchild: the child, having
 treasured away an icicle and forgotten it for ten minutes, comes back to
 find it already nearly melted, and no longer beautiful: at the same time,
 the grandfather has just remembered and taken out a bundle of
 love-letters, which he too had stored away in years gone by, and then
 long neglected; and, behold! the letters are as faded and sorrowfully
 disappointing as the icicle.  This is merely a simile poetically worked
 out; and yet it is in such as these, and some others, to be mentioned
 further on, that the author seems at his best.  Wherever he has really
 written after the old model, there is something to be deprecated: in
 spite of all the spirit and freshness, in spite of his happy assumption
 of that cheerful acceptation of things as they are, which, rightly or
 wrongly, we come to attribute to the ideal fabulist, there is ever a
 sense as of something a little out of place.  A form of literature so
 very innocent and primitive looks a little over-written in Lord Lytton's
 conscious and highly-coloured style.  It may be bad taste, but sometimes
 we should prefer a few sentences of plain prose narration, and a little
 Bewick by way of tail-piece.  So that it is not among those fables that
 conform most nearly to the old model, but one had nearly said among those
 that most widely differ from it, that we find the most satisfactory
 examples of the author's manner.
 
 In the mere matter of ingenuity, the metaphysical fables are the most
 remarkable; such as that of the windmill who imagined that it was he who
 raised the wind; or that of the grocer's balance ('Cogito ergo sum') who
 considered himself endowed with free-will, reason, and an infallible
 practical judgment; until, one fine day, the police made a descent upon
 the shop, and find the weights false and the scales unequal; and the
 whole thing is broken up for old iron.  Capital fables, also, in the same
 ironical spirit, are 'Prometheus Unbound,' the tale of the vainglorying
 of a champagne-cork, and 'Teleology,' where a nettle justifies the ways
 of God to nettles while all goes well with it, and, upon a change of
 luck, promptly changes its divinity.
 
 In all these there is still plenty of the fabulous if you will, although,
 even here, there may be two opinions possible; but there is another
 group, of an order of merit perhaps still higher, where we look in vain
 for any such playful liberties with Nature.  Thus we have 'Conservation
 of Force'; where a musician, thinking of a certain picture, improvises in
 the twilight; a poet, hearing the music, goes home inspired, and writes a
 poem; and then a painter, under the influence of this poem, paints
 another picture, thus lineally descended from the first.  This is
 fiction, but not what we have been used to call fable.  We miss the
 incredible element, the point of audacity with which the fabulist was
 wont to mock at his readers.  And still more so is this the case with
 others.  'The Horse and the Fly' states one of the unanswerable problems
 of life in quite a realistic and straightforward way.  A fly startles a
 cab-horse, the coach is overset; a newly-married pair within and the
 driver, a man with a wife and family, are all killed.  The horse
 continues to gallop off in the loose traces, and ends the tragedy by
 running over an only child; and there is some little pathetic detail here
 introduced in the telling, that makes the reader's indignation very
 white-hot against some one.  It remains to be seen who that some one is
 to be: the fly?  Nay, but on closer inspection, it appears that the fly,
 actuated by maternal instinct, was only seeking a place for her eggs: is
 maternal instinct, then, 'sole author of these mischiefs all'?  'Who's in
 the Right?' one of the best fables in the book, is somewhat in the same
 vein.  After a battle has been won, a group of officers assemble inside a
 battery, and debate together who should have the honour of the success;
 the Prince, the general staff, the cavalry, the engineer who posted the
 battery in which they then stand talking, are successively named: the
 sergeant, who pointed the guns, sneers to himself at the mention of the
 engineer; and, close by, the gunner, who had applied the match, passes
 away with a smile of triumph, since it was through his hand that the
 victorious blow had been dealt.  Meanwhile, the cannon claims the honour
 over the gunner; the cannon-ball, who actually goes forth on the dread
 mission, claims it over the cannon, who remains idly behind; the powder
 reminds the cannon-ball that, but for him, it would still be lying on the
 arsenal floor; and the match caps the discussion; powder, cannon-ball,
 and cannon would be all equally vain and ineffectual without fire.  Just
 then there comes on a shower of rain, which wets the powder and puts out
 the match, and completes this lesson of dependence, by indicating the
 negative conditions which are as necessary for any effect, in their
 absence, as is the presence of this great fraternity of positive
 conditions, not any one of which can claim priority over any other.  But
 the fable does not end here, as perhaps, in all logical strictness, it
 should.  It wanders off into a discussion as to which is the truer
 greatness, that of the vanquished fire or that of the victorious rain.
 And the speech of the rain is charming:
 
     'Lo, with my little drops I bless again
     And beautify the fields which thou didst blast!
     Rend, wither, waste, and ruin, what thou wilt,
     But call not Greatness what the Gods call Guilt.
     Blossoms and grass from blood in battle spilt,
     And poppied corn, I bring.
     'Mid mouldering Babels, to oblivion built,
     My violets spring.
     Little by little my small drops have strength
     To deck with green delights the grateful earth.'
 
 And so forth, not quite germane (it seems to me) to the matter in hand,
 but welcome for its own sake.
 
 Best of all are the fables that deal more immediately with the emotions.
 There is, for instance, that of 'The Two Travellers,' which is profoundly
 moving in conception, although by no means as well written as some
 others.  In this, one of the two, fearfully frost-bitten, saves his life
 out of the snow at the cost of all that was comely in his body; just as,
 long before, the other, who has now quietly resigned himself to death,
 had violently freed himself from Love at the cost of all that was finest
 and fairest in his character.  Very graceful and sweet is the fable (if
 so it should be called) in which the author sings the praises of that
 'kindly perspective,' which lets a wheat-stalk near the eye cover twenty
 leagues of distant country, and makes the humble circle about a man's
 hearth more to him than all the possibilities of the external world.  The
 companion fable to this is also excellent.  It tells us of a man who had,
 all his life through, entertained a passion for certain blue hills on the
 far horizon, and had promised himself to travel thither ere he died, and
 become familiar with these distant friends.  At last, in some political
 trouble, he is banished to the very place of his dreams.  He arrives
 there overnight, and, when he rises and goes forth in the morning, there
 sure enough are the blue hills, only now they have changed places with
 him, and smile across to him, distant as ever, from the old home whence
 he has come.  Such a story might have been very cynically treated; but it
 is not so done, the whole tone is kindly and consolatory, and the
 disenchanted man submissively takes the lesson, and understands that
 things far away are to be loved for their own sake, and that the
 unattainable is not truly unattainable, when we can make the beauty of it
 our own.  Indeed, throughout all these two volumes, though there is much
 practical scepticism, and much irony on abstract questions, this kindly
 and consolatory spirit is never absent.  There is much that is cheerful
 and, after a sedate, fireside fashion, hopeful.  No one will be
 discouraged by reading the book; but the ground of all this hopefulness
 and cheerfulness remains to the end somewhat vague.  It does not seem to
 arise from any practical belief in the future either of the individual or
 the race, but rather from the profound personal contentment of the
 writer.  This is, I suppose, all we must look for in the case.  It is as
 much as we can expect, if the fabulist shall prove a shrewd and cheerful
 fellow-wayfarer, one with whom the world does not seem to have gone much
 amiss, but who has yet laughingly learned something of its evil.  It will
 depend much, of course, upon our own character and circumstances, whether
 the encounter will be agreeable and bracing to the spirits, or offend us
 as an ill-timed mockery.  But where, as here, there is a little tincture
 of bitterness along with the good-nature, where it is plainly not the
 humour of a man cheerfully ignorant, but of one who looks on, tolerant
 and superior and smilingly attentive, upon the good and bad of our
 existence, it will go hardly if we do not catch some reflection of the
 same spirit to help us on our way.  There is here no impertinent and
 lying proclamation of peace--none of the cheap optimism of the
 well-to-do; what we find here is a view of life that would be even
 grievous, were it not enlivened with this abiding cheerfulness, and ever
 and anon redeemed by a stroke of pathos.
 
 It is natural enough, I suppose, that we should find wanting in this book
 some of the intenser qualities of the author's work; and their absence is
 made up for by much happy description after a quieter fashion.  The burst
 of jubilation over the departure of the snow, which forms the prelude to
 'The Thistle,' is full of spirit and of pleasant images.  The speech of
 the forest in 'Sans Souci' is inspired by a beautiful sentiment for
 nature of the modern sort, and pleases us more, I think, as poetry should
 please us, than anything in _Chronicles and Characters_.  There are some
 admirable felicities of expression here and there; as that of the hill,
 whose summit
 
              'Did print
     The azure air with pines.'
 
 Moreover, I do not recollect in the author's former work any symptom of
 that sympathetic treatment of still life, which is noticeable now and
 again in the fables; and perhaps most noticeably, when he sketches the
 burned letters as they hover along the gusty flue, 'Thin, sable veils,
 wherein a restless spark Yet trembled.'  But the description is at its
 best when the subjects are unpleasant, or even grisly.  There are a few
 capital lines in this key on the last spasm of the battle before alluded
 to.  Surely nothing could be better, in its own way, than the fish in
 'The Last Cruise of the Arrogant,' 'the shadowy, side-faced, silent
 things,' that come butting and staring with lidless eyes at the sunken
 steam-engine.  And although, in yet another, we are told, pleasantly
 enough, how the water went down into the valleys, where it set itself
 gaily to saw wood, and on into the plains, where it would soberly carry
 grain to town; yet the real strength of the fable is when it dealt with
 the shut pool in which certain unfortunate raindrops are imprisoned among
 slugs and snails, and in the company of an old toad.  The sodden
 contentment of the fallen acorn is strangely significant; and it is
 astonishing how unpleasantly we are startled by the appearance of her
 horrible lover, the maggot.
 
 And now for a last word, about the style.  This is not easy to criticise.
 It is impossible to deny to it rapidity, spirit, and a full sound; the
 lines are never lame, and the sense is carried forward with an
 uninterrupted, impetuous rush.  But it is not equal.  After passages of
 really admirable versification, the author falls back upon a sort of
 loose, cavalry manner, not unlike the style of some of Mr. Browning's
 minor pieces, and almost inseparable from wordiness, and an easy
 acceptation of somewhat cheap finish.  There is nothing here of that
 compression which is the note of a really sovereign style.  It is unfair,
 perhaps, to set a not remarkable passage from Lord Lytton side by side
 with one of the signal masterpieces of another, and a very perfect poet;
 and yet it is interesting, when we see how the portraiture of a dog,
 detailed through thirty odd lines, is frittered down and finally almost
 lost in the mere laxity of the style, to compare it with the clear,
 simple, vigorous delineation that Burns, in four couplets, has given us
 of the ploughman's collie.  It is interesting, at first, and then it
 becomes a little irritating; for when we think of other passages so much
 more finished and adroit, we cannot help feeling, that with a little more
 ardour after perfection of form, criticism would have found nothing left
 for her to censure.  A similar mark of precipitate work is the number of
 adjectives tumultuously heaped together, sometimes to help out the sense,
 and sometimes (as one cannot but suspect) to help out the sound of the
 verses.  I do not believe, for instance, that Lord Lytton himself would
 defend the lines in which we are told how Laocoon 'Revealed to Roman
 crowds, now _Christian_ grown, That _Pagan_ anguish which, in _Parian_
 stone, The _Rhodian_ artist,' and so on.  It is not only that this is bad
 in itself; but that it is unworthy of the company in which it is found;
 that such verses should not have appeared with the name of a good
 versifier like Lord Lytton.  We must take exception, also, in conclusion,
 to the excess of alliteration.  Alliteration is so liable to be abused
 that we can scarcely be too sparing of it; and yet it is a trick that
 seems to grow upon the author with years.  It is a pity to see fine
 verses, such as some in 'Demos,' absolutely spoiled by the recurrence of
 one wearisome consonant.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--SALVINI'S MACBETH
 
 
 Salvini closed his short visit to Edinburgh by a performance of
 _Macbeth_.  It was, perhaps, from a sentiment of local colour that he
 chose to play the Scottish usurper for the first time before Scotsmen;
 and the audience were not insensible of the privilege.  Few things,
 indeed, can move a stronger interest than to see a great creation taking
 shape for the first time.  If it is not purely artistic, the sentiment is
 surely human.  And the thought that you are before all the world, and
 have the start of so many others as eager as yourself, at least keeps you
 in a more unbearable suspense before the curtain rises, if it does not
 enhance the delight with which you follow the performance and see the
 actor 'bend up each corporal agent' to realise a masterpiece of a few
 hours' duration.  With a player so variable as Salvini, who trusts to the
 feelings of the moment for so much detail, and who, night after night,
 does the same thing differently but always well, it can never be safe to
 pass judgment after a single hearing.  And this is more particularly true
 of last week's _Macbeth_; for the whole third act was marred by a
 grievously humorous misadventure.  Several minutes too soon the ghost of
 Banquo joined the party, and after having sat helpless a while at a
 table, was ignominiously withdrawn.  Twice was this ghostly
 Jack-in-the-box obtruded on the stage before his time; twice removed
 again; and yet he showed so little hurry when he was really wanted, that,
 after an awkward pause, Macbeth had to begin his apostrophe to empty air.
 The arrival of the belated spectre in the middle, with a jerk that made
 him nod all over, was the last accident in the chapter, and worthily
 topped the whole.  It may be imagined how lamely matters went throughout
 these cross purposes.
 
 In spite of this, and some other hitches, Salvini's Macbeth had an
 emphatic success.  The creation is worthy of a place beside the same
 artist's Othello and Hamlet.  It is the simplest and most unsympathetic
 of the three; but the absence of the finer lineaments of Hamlet is
 redeemed by gusto, breadth, and a headlong unity.  Salvini sees nothing
 great in Macbeth beyond the royalty of muscle, and that courage which
 comes of strong and copious circulation.  The moral smallness of the man
 is insisted on from the first, in the shudder of uncontrollable jealousy
 with which he sees Duncan embracing Banquo.  He may have some northern
 poetry of speech, but he has not much logical understanding.  In his
 dealings with the supernatural powers he is like a savage with his
 fetich, trusting them beyond bounds while all goes well, and whenever he
 is crossed, casting his belief aside and calling 'fate into the list.'
 For his wife, he is little more than an agent, a frame of bone and sinew
 for her fiery spirit to command.  The nature of his feeling towards her
 is rendered with a most precise and delicate touch.  He always yields to
 the woman's fascination; and yet his caresses (and we know how much
 meaning Salvini can give to a caress) are singularly hard and unloving.
 Sometimes he lays his hand on her as he might take hold of any one who
 happened to be nearest to him at a moment of excitement.  Love has fallen
 out of this marriage by the way, and left a curious friendship.  Only
 once--at the very moment when she is showing herself so little a woman
 and so much a high-spirited man--only once is he very deeply stirred
 towards her; and that finds expression in the strange and horrible
 transport of admiration, doubly strange and horrible on Salvini's
 lips--'Bring forth men-children only!'
 
 The murder scene, as was to be expected, pleased the audience best.
 Macbeth's voice, in the talk with his wife, was a thing not to be
 forgotten; and when he spoke of his hangman's hands he seemed to have
 blood in his utterance.  Never for a moment, even in the very article of
 the murder, does he possess his own soul.  He is a man on wires.  From
 first to last it is an exhibition of hideous cowardice.  For, after all,
 it is not here, but in broad daylight, with the exhilaration of conflict,
 where he can assure himself at every blow he has the longest sword and
 the heaviest hand, that this man's physical bravery can keep him up; he
 is an unwieldy ship, and needs plenty of way on before he will steer.
 
 In the banquet scene, while the first murderer gives account of what he
 has done, there comes a flash of truculent joy at the 'twenty trenched
 gashes' on Banquo's head.  Thus Macbeth makes welcome to his imagination
 those very details of physical horror which are so soon to turn sour in
 him.  As he runs out to embrace these cruel circumstances, as he seeks to
 realise to his mind's eye the reassuring spectacle of his dead enemy, he
 is dressing out the phantom to terrify himself; and his imagination,
 playing the part of justice, is to 'commend to his own lips the
 ingredients of his poisoned chalice.'  With the recollection of Hamlet
 and his father's spirit still fresh upon him, and the holy awe with which
 that good man encountered things not dreamt of in his philosophy, it was
 not possible to avoid looking for resemblances between the two
 apparitions and the two men haunted.  But there are none to be found.
 Macbeth has a purely physical dislike for Banquo's spirit and the 'twenty
 trenched gashes.'  He is afraid of he knows not what.  He is abject, and
 again blustering.  In the end he so far forgets himself, his terror, and
 the nature of what is before him, that he rushes upon it as he would upon
 a man.  When his wife tells him he needs repose, there is something
 really childish in the way he looks about the room, and, seeing nothing,
 with an expression of almost sensual relief, plucks up heart enough to go
 to bed.  And what is the upshot of the visitation?  It is written in
 Shakespeare, but should be read with the commentary of Salvini's voice
 and expression:--'O! _siam nell' opra ancor fanciulli_'--'We are yet but
 young in deed.'  Circle below circle.  He is looking with horrible
 satisfaction into the mouth of hell.  There may still be a prick to-day;
 but to-morrow conscience will be dead, and he may move untroubled in this
 element of blood.
 
 In the fifth act we see this lowest circle reached; and it is Salvini's
 finest moment throughout the play.  From the first he was admirably made
 up, and looked Macbeth to the full as perfectly as ever he looked
 Othello.  From the first moment he steps upon the stage you can see this
 character is a creation to the fullest meaning of the phrase; for the man
 before you is a type you know well already.  He arrives with Banquo on
 the heath, fair and red-bearded, sparing of gesture, full of pride and
 the sense of animal wellbeing, and satisfied after the battle like a
 beast who has eaten his fill.  But in the fifth act there is a change.
 This is still the big, burly, fleshly, handsome-looking Thane; here is
 still the same face which in the earlier acts could be superficially
 good-humoured and sometimes royally courteous.  But now the atmosphere of
 blood, which pervades the whole tragedy, has entered into the man and
 subdued him to its own nature; and an indescribable degradation, a
 slackness and puffiness, has overtaken his features.  He has breathed the
 air of carnage, and supped full of horrors.  Lady Macbeth complains of
 the smell of blood on her hand: Macbeth makes no complaint--he has ceased
 to notice it now; but the same smell is in his nostrils.  A contained
 fury and disgust possesses him.  He taunts the messenger and the doctor
 as people would taunt their mortal enemies.  And, indeed, as he knows
 right well, every one is his enemy now, except his wife.  About her he
 questions the doctor with something like a last human anxiety; and, in
 tones of grisly mystery, asks him if he can 'minister to a mind
 diseased.'  When the news of her death is brought him, he is staggered
 and falls into a seat; but somehow it is not anything we can call grief
 that he displays.  There had been two of them against God and man; and
 now, when there is only one, it makes perhaps less difference than he had
 expected.  And so her death is not only an affliction, but one more
 disillusion; and he redoubles in bitterness.  The speech that follows,
 given with tragic cynicism in every word, is a dirge, not so much for her
 as for himself.  From that time forth there is nothing human left in him,
 only 'the fiend of Scotland,' Macduff's 'hell-hound,' whom, with a stern
 glee, we see baited like a bear and hunted down like a wolf.  He is
 inspired and set above fate by a demoniacal energy, a lust of wounds and
 slaughter.  Even after he meets Macduff his courage does not fail; but
 when he hears the Thane was not born of woman, all virtue goes out of
 him; and though he speaks sounding words of defiance, the last combat is
 little better than a suicide.
 
 The whole performance is, as I said, so full of gusto and a headlong
 unity; the personality of Macbeth is so sharp and powerful; and within
 these somewhat narrow limits there is so much play and saliency that, so
 far as concerns Salvini himself, a third great success seems indubitable.
 Unfortunately, however, a great actor cannot fill more than a very small
 fraction of the boards; and though Banquo's ghost will probably be more
 seasonable in his future apparitions, there are some more inherent
 difficulties in the piece.  The company at large did not distinguish
 themselves.  Macduff, to the huge delight of the gallery, out-Macduff'd
 the average ranter.  The lady who filled the principal female part has
 done better on other occasions, but I fear she has not metal for what she
 tried last week.  Not to succeed in the sleep-walking scene is to make a
 memorable failure.  As it was given, it succeeded in being wrong in art
 without being true to nature.
 
 And there is yet another difficulty, happily easy to reform, which
 somewhat interfered with the success of the performance.  At the end of
 the incantation scene the Italian translator has made Macbeth fall
 insensible upon the stage.  This is a change of questionable propriety
 from a psychological point of view; while in point of view of effect it
 leaves the stage for some moments empty of all business.  To remedy this,
 a bevy of green ballet-girls came forth and pointed their toes about the
 prostrate king.  A dance of High Church curates, or a hornpipe by Mr. T.
 P. Cooke, would not be more out of the key; though the gravity of a Scots
 audience was not to be overcome, and they merely expressed their
 disapprobation by a round of moderate hisses, a similar irruption of
 Christmas fairies would most likely convulse a London theatre from pit to
 gallery with inextinguishable laughter.  It is, I am told, the Italian
 tradition; but it is one more honoured in the breach than the observance.
 With the total disappearance of these damsels, with a stronger Lady
 Macbeth, and, if possible, with some compression of those scenes in which
 Salvini does not appear, and the spectator is left at the mercy of
 Macduffs and Duncans, the play would go twice as well, and we should be
 better able to follow and enjoy an admirable work of dramatic art.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--BAGSTER'S 'PILGRIM'S PROGRESS'
 
 
 I have here before me an edition of the _Pilgrim's Progress_, bound in
 green, without a date, and described as 'illustrated by nearly three
 hundred engravings, and memoir of Bunyan.'  On the outside it is lettered
 'Bagster's Illustrated Edition,' and after the author's apology, facing
 the first page of the tale, a folding pictorial 'Plan of the Road' is
 marked as 'drawn by the late Mr. T. Conder,' and engraved by J. Basire.
 No further information is anywhere vouchsafed; perhaps the publishers had
 judged the work too unimportant; and we are still left ignorant whether
 or not we owe the woodcuts in the body of the volume to the same hand
 that drew the plan.  It seems, however, more than probable.  The literal
 particularity of mind which, in the map, laid down the flower-plots in
 the devil's garden, and carefully introduced the court-house in the town
 of Vanity, is closely paralleled in many of the cuts; and in both, the
 architecture of the buildings and the disposition of the gardens have a
 kindred and entirely English air.  Whoever he was, the author of these
 wonderful little pictures may lay claim to be the best illustrator of
 Bunyan. {183}  They are not only good illustrations, like so many others;
 but they are like so few, good illustrations of Bunyan.  Their spirit, in
 defect and quality, is still the same as his own.  The designer also has
 lain down and dreamed a dream, as literal, as quaint, and almost as
 apposite as Bunyan's; and text and pictures make but the two sides of the
 same homespun yet impassioned story.  To do justice to the designs, it
 will be necessary to say, for the hundredth time, a word or two about the
 masterpiece which they adorn.
 
 All allegories have a tendency to escape from the purpose of their
 creators; and as the characters and incidents become more and more
 interesting in themselves, the moral, which these were to show forth,
 falls more and more into neglect.  An architect may command a wreath of
 vine-leaves round the cornice of a monument; but if, as each leaf came
 from the chisel, it took proper life and fluttered freely on the wall,
 and if the vine grew, and the building were hidden over with foliage and
 fruit, the architect would stand in much the same situation as the writer
 of allegories.  The _Faery Queen_ was an allegory, I am willing to
 believe; but it survives as an imaginative tale in incomparable verse.
 The case of Bunyan is widely different; and yet in this also Allegory,
 poor nymph, although never quite forgotten, is sometimes rudely thrust
 against the wall.  Bunyan was fervently in earnest; with 'his fingers in
 his ears, he ran on,' straight for his mark.  He tells us himself, in the
 conclusion to the first part, that he did not fear to raise a laugh;
 indeed, he feared nothing, and said anything; and he was greatly served
 in this by a certain rustic privilege of his style, which, like the talk
 of strong uneducated men, when it does not impress by its force, still
 charms by its simplicity.  The mere story and the allegorical design
 enjoyed perhaps his equal favour.  He believed in both with an energy of
 faith that was capable of moving mountains.  And we have to remark in
 him, not the parts where inspiration fails and is supplied by cold and
 merely decorative invention, but the parts where faith has grown to be
 credulity, and his characters become so real to him that he forgets the
 end of their creation.  We can follow him step by step into the trap
 which he lays for himself by his own entire good faith and triumphant
 literality of vision, till the trap closes and shuts him in an
 inconsistency.  The allegories of the Interpreter and of the Shepherds of
 the Delectable Mountains are all actually performed, like stage-plays,
 before the pilgrims.  The son of Mr. Great-grace visibly 'tumbles hills
 about with his words.'  Adam the First has his condemnation written
 visibly on his forehead, so that Faithful reads it.  At the very instant
 the net closes round the pilgrims, 'the white robe falls from the black
 man's body.'  Despair 'getteth him a grievous crab-tree cudgel'; it was
 in 'sunshiny weather' that he had his fits; and the birds in the grove
 about the House Beautiful, 'our country birds,' only sing their little
 pious verses 'at the spring, when the flowers appear and the sun shines
 warm.'  'I often,' says Piety, 'go out to hear them; we also ofttimes
 keep them tame on our house.'  The post between Beulah and the Celestial
 City sounds his horn, as you may yet hear in country places.  Madam
 Bubble, that 'tall, comely dame, something of a swarthy complexion, in
 very pleasant attire, but old,' 'gives you a smile at the end of each
 sentence'--a real woman she; we all know her.  Christiana dying 'gave Mr.
 Stand-fast a ring,' for no possible reason in the allegory, merely
 because the touch was human and affecting.  Look at Great-heart, with his
 soldierly ways, garrison ways, as I had almost called them; with his
 taste in weapons; his delight in any that 'he found to be a man of his
 hands'; his chivalrous point of honour, letting Giant Maul get up again
 when he was down, a thing fairly flying in the teeth of the moral; above
 all, with his language in the inimitable tale of Mr. Fearing: 'I thought
 I should have lost my man'--'chicken-hearted'--'at last he came in, and I
 will say that for my lord, he carried it wonderful lovingly to him.'
 This is no Independent minister; this is a stout, honest, big-busted
 ancient, adjusting his shoulder-belts, twirling his long moustaches as he
 speaks.  Last and most remarkable, 'My sword,' says the dying
 Valiant-for-Truth, he in whom Great-heart delighted, 'my sword I give to
 him that shall succeed me in my pilgrimage, _and my courage and skill to
 him that can get it_.'  And after this boast, more arrogantly unorthodox
 than was ever dreamed of by the rejected Ignorance, we are told that 'all
 the trumpets sounded for him on the other side.'
 
 In every page the book is stamped with the same energy of vision and the
 same energy of belief.  The quality is equally and indifferently
 displayed in the spirit of the fighting, the tenderness of the pathos,
 the startling vigour and strangeness of the incidents, the natural strain
 of the conversations, and the humanity and charm of the characters.
 Trivial talk over a meal, the dying words of heroes, the delights of
 Beulah or the Celestial City, Apollyon and my Lord Hate-good,
 Great-heart, and Mr. Worldly-Wiseman, all have been imagined with the
 same clearness, all written of with equal gusto and precision, all
 created in the same mixed element, of simplicity that is almost comical,
 and art that, for its purpose, is faultless.
 
 It was in much the same spirit that our artist sat down to his drawings.
 He is by nature a Bunyan of the pencil.  He, too, will draw anything,
 from a butcher at work on a dead sheep, up to the courts of Heaven.  'A
 Lamb for Supper' is the name of one of his designs, 'Their Glorious
 Entry' of another.  He has the same disregard for the ridiculous, and
 enjoys somewhat of the same privilege of style, so that we are pleased
 even when we laugh the most.  He is literal to the verge of folly.  If
 dust is to be raised from the unswept parlour, you may be sure it will
 'fly abundantly' in the picture.  If Faithful is to lie 'as dead' before
 Moses, dead he shall lie with a warrant--dead and stiff like granite; nay
 (and here the artist must enhance upon the symbolism of the author), it
 is with the identical stone tables of the law that Moses fells the
 sinner.  Good and bad people, whom we at once distinguish in the text by
 their names, Hopeful, Honest, and Valiant-for-Truth, on the one hand, as
 against By-ends, Sir Having Greedy, and the Lord Old-man on the other,
 are in these drawings as simply distinguished by their costume.  Good
 people, when not armed _cap-a-pie_, wear a speckled tunic girt about the
 waist, and low hats, apparently of straw.  Bad people swagger in
 tail-coats and chimney-pots, a few with knee-breeches, but the large
 majority in trousers, and for all the world like guests at a
 garden-party.  Worldly-Wiseman alone, by some inexplicable quirk, stands
 before Christian in laced hat, embroidered waistcoat, and trunk-hose.
 But above all examples of this artist's intrepidity, commend me to the
 print entitled 'Christian Finds it Deep.'  'A great darkness and horror,'
 says the text, have fallen on the pilgrim; it is the comfortless deathbed
 with which Bunyan so strikingly concludes the sorrows and conflicts of
 his hero.  How to represent this worthily the artist knew not; and yet he
 was determined to represent it somehow.  This was how he did: Hopeful is
 still shown to his neck above the water of death; but Christian has
 bodily disappeared, and a blot of solid blackness indicates his place.
 
 As you continue to look at these pictures, about an inch square for the
 most part, sometimes printed three or more to the page, and each having a
 printed legend of its own, however trivial the event recorded, you will
 soon become aware of two things: first, that the man can draw, and,
 second, that he possesses the gift of an imagination.  'Obstinate
 reviles,' says the legend; and you should see Obstinate reviling.  'He
 warily retraces his steps'; and there is Christian, posting through the
 plain, terror and speed in every muscle.  'Mercy yearns to go' shows you
 a plain interior with packing going forward, and, right in the middle,
 Mercy yearning to go--every line of the girl's figure yearning.  In 'The
 Chamber called Peace' we see a simple English room, bed with white
 curtains, window valance and door, as may be found in many thousand
 unpretentious houses; but far off, through the open window, we behold the
 sun uprising out of a great plain, and Christian hails it with his hand:
 
     'Where am I now! is this the love and care
     Of Jesus, for the men that pilgrims are!
     Thus to provide!  That I should be forgiven!
     And dwell already the next door to heaven!'
 
 A page or two further, from the top of the House Beautiful, the damsels
 point his gaze toward the Delectable Mountains: 'The Prospect,' so the
 cut is ticketed--and I shall be surprised, if on less than a square inch
 of paper you can show me one so wide and fair.  Down a cross road on an
 English plain, a cathedral city outlined on the horizon, a hazel shaw
 upon the left, comes Madam Wanton dancing with her fair enchanted cup,
 and Faithful, book in hand, half pauses.  The cut is perfect as a symbol;
 the giddy movement of the sorceress, the uncertain poise of the man
 struck to the heart by a temptation, the contrast of that even plain of
 life whereon he journeys with the bold, ideal bearing of the wanton--the
 artist who invented and portrayed this had not merely read Bunyan, he had
 also thoughtfully lived.  The Delectable Mountains--I continue skimming
 the first part--are not on the whole happily rendered.  Once, and once
 only, the note is struck, when Christian and Hopeful are seen coming,
 shoulder-high, through a thicket of green shrubs--box, perhaps, or
 perfumed nutmeg; while behind them, domed or pointed, the hills stand
 ranged against the sky.  A little further, and we come to that
 masterpiece of Bunyan's insight into life, the Enchanted Ground; where,
 in a few traits, he has set down the latter end of such a number of the
 would-be good; where his allegory goes so deep that, to people looking
 seriously on life, it cuts like satire.  The true significance of this
 invention lies, of course, far out of the way of drawing; only one
 feature, the great tedium of the land, the growing weariness in
 well-doing, may be somewhat represented in a symbol.  The pilgrims are
 near the end: 'Two Miles Yet,' says the legend.  The road goes ploughing
 up and down over a rolling heath; the wayfarers, with outstretched arms,
 are already sunk to the knees over the brow of the nearest hill; they
 have just passed a milestone with the cipher two; from overhead a great,
 piled, summer cumulus, as of a slumberous summer afternoon, beshadows
 them: two miles! it might be hundreds.  In dealing with the Land of
 Beulah the artist lags, in both parts, miserably behind the text, but in
 the distant prospect of the Celestial City more than regains his own.
 You will remember when Christian and Hopeful 'with desire fell sick.'
 'Effect of the Sunbeams' is the artist's title.  Against the sky, upon a
 cliffy mountain, the radiant temple beams upon them over deep, subjacent
 woods; they, behind a mound, as if seeking shelter from the
 splendour--one prostrate on his face, one kneeling, and with hands
 ecstatically lifted--yearn with passion after that immortal city.  Turn
 the page, and we behold them walking by the very shores of death; Heaven,
 from this nigher view, has risen half-way to the zenith, and sheds a
 wider glory; and the two pilgrims, dark against that brightness, walk and
 sing out of the fulness of their hearts.  No cut more thoroughly
 illustrates at once the merit and the weakness of the artist.  Each
 pilgrim sings with a book in his grasp--a family Bible at the least for
 bigness; tomes so recklessly enormous that our second, impulse is to
 laughter.  And yet that is not the first thought, nor perhaps the last.
 Something in the attitude of the manikins--faces they have none, they are
 too small for that--something in the way they swing these monstrous
 volumes to their singing, something perhaps borrowed from the text, some
 subtle differentiation from the cut that went before and the cut that
 follows after--something, at least, speaks clearly of a fearful joy, of
 Heaven seen from the deathbed, of the horror of the last passage no less
 than of the glorious coming home.  There is that in the action of one of
 them which always reminds me, with a difference, of that haunting last
 glimpse of Thomas Idle, travelling to Tyburn in the cart.  Next come the
 Shining Ones, wooden and trivial enough; the pilgrims pass into the
 river; the blot already mentioned settles over and obliterates Christian.
 In two more cuts we behold them drawing nearer to the other shore; and
 then, between two radiant angels, one of whom points upward, we see them
 mounting in new weeds, their former lendings left behind them on the inky
 river.  More angels meet them; Heaven is displayed, and if no better,
 certainly no worse, than it has been shown by others--a place, at least,
 infinitely populous and glorious with light--a place that haunts solemnly
 the hearts of children.  And then this symbolic draughtsman once more
 strikes into his proper vein.  Three cuts conclude the first part.  In
 the first the gates close, black against the glory struggling from
 within.  The second shows us Ignorance--alas! poor Arminian!--hailing, in
 a sad twilight, the ferryman Vain-Hope; and in the third we behold him,
 bound hand and foot, and black already with the hue of his eternal fate,
 carried high over the mountain-tops of the world by two angels of the
 anger of the Lord.  'Carried to Another Place,' the artist enigmatically
 names his plate--a terrible design.
 
 Wherever he touches on the black side of the supernatural his pencil
 grows more daring and incisive.  He has many true inventions in the
 perilous and diabolic; he has many startling nightmares realised.  It is
 not easy to select the best; some may like one and some another; the
 nude, depilated devil bounding and casting darts against the Wicket Gate;
 the scroll of flying horrors that hang over Christian by the Mouth of
 Hell; the horned shade that comes behind him whispering blasphemies; the
 daylight breaking through that rent cave-mouth of the mountains and
 falling chill adown the haunted tunnel; Christian's further progress
 along the causeway, between the two black pools, where, at every yard or
 two, a gin, a pitfall, or a snare awaits the passer-by--loathsome white
 devilkins harbouring close under the bank to work the springes, Christian
 himself pausing and pricking with his sword's point at the nearest noose,
 and pale discomfortable mountains rising on the farther side; or yet
 again, the two ill-favoured ones that beset the first of Christian's
 journey, with the frog-like structure of the skull, the frog-like
 limberness of limbs--crafty, slippery, lustful-looking devils, drawn
 always in outline as though possessed of a dim, infernal luminosity.
 Horrid fellows are they, one and all; horrid fellows and horrific scenes.
 In another spirit that Good-Conscience 'to whom Mr. Honest had spoken in
 his lifetime,' a cowled, grey, awful figure, one hand pointing to the
 heavenly shore, realises, I will not say all, but some at least of the
 strange impressiveness of Bunyan's words.  It is no easy nor pleasant
 thing to speak in one's lifetime with Good-Conscience; he is an austere,
 unearthly friend, whom maybe Torquemada knew; and the folds of his
 raiment are not merely claustral, but have something of the horror of the
 pall.  Be not afraid, however; with the hand of that appearance Mr.
 Honest will get safe across.
 
 Yet perhaps it is in sequences that this artist best displays himself.
 He loves to look at either side of a thing: as, for instance, when he
 shows us both sides of the wall--'Grace Inextinguishable' on the one
 side, with the devil vainly pouring buckets on the flame, and 'The Oil of
 Grace' on the other, where the Holy Spirit, vessel in hand, still
 secretly supplies the fire.  He loves, also, to show us the same event
 twice over, and to repeat his instantaneous photographs at the interval
 of but a moment.  So we have, first, the whole troop of pilgrims coming
 up to Valiant, and Great-heart to the front, spear in hand and parleying;
 and next, the same cross-roads, from a more distant view, the convoy now
 scattered and looking safely and curiously on, and Valiant handing over
 for inspection his 'right Jerusalem blade.'  It is true that this
 designer has no great care after consistency: Apollyon's spear is laid
 by, his quiver of darts will disappear, whenever they might hinder the
 designer's freedom; and the fiend's tail is blobbed or forked at his good
 pleasure.  But this is not unsuitable to the illustration of the fervent
 Bunyan, breathing hurry and momentary inspiration.  He, with his hot
 purpose, hunting sinners with a lasso, shall himself forget the things
 that he has written yesterday.  He shall first slay Heedless in the
 Valley of the Shadow, and then take leave of him talking in his sleep, as
 if nothing had happened, in an arbour on the Enchanted Ground.  And
 again, in his rhymed prologue, he shall assign some of the glory of the
 siege of Doubting Castle to his favourite Valiant-for-the-Truth, who did
 not meet with the besiegers till long after, at that dangerous corner by
 Deadman's Lane.  And, with all inconsistencies and freedoms, there is a
 power shown in these sequences of cuts: a power of joining on one action
 or one humour to another; a power of following out the moods, even of the
 dismal subterhuman fiends engendered by the artist's fancy; a power of
 sustained continuous realisation, step by step, in nature's order, that
 can tell a story, in all its ins and outs, its pauses and surprises,
 fully and figuratively, like the art of words.
 
 One such sequence is the fight of Christian and Apollyon--six cuts, weird
 and fiery, like the text.  The pilgrim is throughout a pale and stockish
 figure; but the devil covers a multitude of defects.  There is no better
 devil of the conventional order than our artist's Apollyon, with his
 mane, his wings, his bestial legs, his changing and terrifying
 expression, his infernal energy to slay.  In cut the first you see him
 afar off, still obscure in form, but already formidable in suggestion.
 Cut the second, 'The Fiend in Discourse,' represents him, not reasoning,
 railing rather, shaking his spear at the pilgrim, his shoulder advanced,
 his tail writhing in the air, his foot ready for a spring, while
 Christian stands back a little, timidly defensive.  The third illustrates
 these magnificent words: 'Then Apollyon straddled quite over the whole
 breadth of the way, and said, I am void of fear in this matter: prepare
 thyself to die; for I swear by my infernal den that thou shalt go no
 farther: here will I spill thy soul!  And with that he threw a flaming
 dart at his breast.'  In the cut he throws a dart with either hand,
 belching pointed flames out of his mouth, spreading his broad vans, and
 straddling the while across the path, as only a fiend can straddle who
 has just sworn by his infernal den.  The defence will not be long against
 such vice, such flames, such red-hot nether energy.  And in the fourth
 cut, to be sure, he has leaped bodily upon his victim, sped by foot and
 pinion, and roaring as he leaps.  The fifth shows the climacteric of the
 battle; Christian has reached nimbly out and got his sword, and dealt
 that deadly home-thrust, the fiend still stretched upon him, but 'giving
 back, as one that had received his mortal wound.'  The raised head, the
 bellowing mouth, the paw clapped upon the sword, the one wing relaxed in
 agony, all realise vividly these words of the text.  In the sixth and
 last, the trivial armed figure of the pilgrim is seen kneeling with
 clasped hands on the betrodden scene of contest and among the shivers of
 the darts; while just at the margin the hinder quarters and the tail of
 Apollyon are whisking off, indignant and discounted.
 
 In one point only do these pictures seem to be unworthy of the text, and
 that point is one rather of the difference of arts than the difference of
 artists.  Throughout his best and worst, in his highest and most divine
 imaginations as in the narrowest sallies of his sectarianism, the
 human-hearted piety of Bunyan touches and ennobles, convinces, accuses
 the reader.  Through no art beside the art of words can the kindness of a
 man's affections be expressed.  In the cuts you shall find faithfully
 parodied the quaintness and the power, the triviality and the surprising
 freshness of the author's fancy; there you shall find him out-stripped in
 ready symbolism and the art of bringing things essentially invisible
 before the eyes: but to feel the contact of essential goodness, to be
 made in love with piety, the book must be read and not the prints
 examined.
 
 Farewell should not be taken with a grudge; nor can I dismiss in any
 other words than those of gratitude a series of pictures which have, to
 one at least, been the visible embodiment of Bunyan from childhood up,
 and shown him, through all his years, Great-heart lungeing at Giant Maul,
 and Apollyon breathing fire at Christian, and every turn and town along
 the road to the Celestial City, and that bright place itself, seen as to
 a stave of music, shining afar off upon the hill-top, the candle of the
 world.
 
 
 
 
 SKETCHES
 
 
 I.  THE SATIRIST
 
 
 My companion enjoyed a cheap reputation for wit and insight.  He was by
 habit and repute a satirist.  If he did occasionally condemn anything or
 anybody who richly deserved it, and whose demerits had hitherto escaped,
 it was simply because he condemned everything and everybody.  While I was
 with him he disposed of St. Paul with an epigram, shook my reverence for
 Shakespeare in a neat antithesis, and fell foul of the Almighty Himself,
 on the score of one or two out of the ten commandments.  Nothing escaped
 his blighting censure.  At every sentence he overthrew an idol, or
 lowered my estimation of a friend.  I saw everything with new eyes, and
 could only marvel at my former blindness.  How was it possible that I had
 not before observed A's false hair, B's selfishness, or C's boorish
 manners?  I and my companion, methought, walked the streets like a couple
 of gods among a swarm of vermin; for every one we saw seemed to bear
 openly upon his brow the mark of the apocalyptic beast.  I half expected
 that these miserable beings, like the people of Lystra, would recognise
 their betters and force us to the altar; in which case, warned by the
 late of Paul and Barnabas, I do not know that my modesty would have
 prevailed upon me to decline.  But there was no need for such churlish
 virtue.  More blinded than the Lycaonians, the people saw no divinity in
 our gait; and as our temporary godhead lay more in the way of observing
 than healing their infirmities, we were content to pass them by in scorn.
 
 I could not leave my companion, not from regard or even from interest,
 but from a very natural feeling, inseparable from the case.  To
 understand it, let us take a simile.  Suppose yourself walking down the
 street with a man who continues to sprinkle the crowd out of a flask of
 vitriol.  You would be much diverted with the grimaces and contortions of
 his victims; and at the same time you would fear to leave his arm until
 his bottle was empty, knowing that, when once among the crowd, you would
 run a good chance yourself of baptism with his biting liquor.  Now my
 companion's vitriol was inexhaustible.
 
 It was perhaps the consciousness of this, the knowledge that I was being
 anointed already out of the vials of his wrath, that made me fall to
 criticising the critic, whenever we had parted.
 
 After all, I thought, our satirist has just gone far enough into his
 neighbours to find that the outside is false, without caring to go
 farther and discover what is really true.  He is content to find that
 things are not what they seem, and broadly generalises from it that they
 do not exist at all.  He sees our virtues are not what they pretend they
 are; and, on the strength of that, he denies us the possession of virtue
 altogether.  He has learnt the first lesson, that no man is wholly good;
 but he has not even suspected that there is another equally true, to wit,
 that no man is wholly bad.  Like the inmate of a coloured star, he has
 eyes for one colour alone.  He has a keen scent after evil, but his
 nostrils are plugged against all good, as people plugged their nostrils
 before going about the streets of the plague-struck city.
 
 Why does he do this?  It is most unreasonable to flee the knowledge of
 good like the infection of a horrible disease, and batten and grow fat in
 the real atmosphere of a lazar-house.  This was my first thought; but my
 second was not like unto it, and I saw that our satirist was wise, wise
 in his generation, like the unjust steward.  He does not want light,
 because the darkness is more pleasant.  He does not wish to see the good,
 because he is happier without it.  I recollect that when I walked with
 him, I was in a state of divine exaltation, such as Adam and Eve must
 have enjoyed when the savour of the fruit was still unfaded between their
 lips; and I recognise that this must be the man's habitual state.  He has
 the forbidden fruit in his waist-coat pocket, and can make himself a god
 as often and as long as he likes.  He has raised himself upon a glorious
 pedestal above his fellows; he has touched the summit of ambition; and he
 envies neither King nor Kaiser, Prophet nor Priest, content in an
 elevation as high as theirs, and much more easily attained.  Yes, certes,
 much more easily attained.  He has not risen by climbing himself, but by
 pushing others down.  He has grown great in his own estimation, not by
 blowing himself out, and risking the fate of AEsop's frog, but simply by
 the habitual use of a diminishing glass on everybody else.  And I think
 altogether that his is a better, a safer, and a surer recipe than most
 others.
 
 After all, however, looking back on what I have written, I detect a
 spirit suspiciously like his own.  All through, I have been comparing
 myself with our satirist, and all through, I have had the best of the
 comparison.  Well, well, contagion is as often mental as physical; and I
 do not think my readers, who have all been under his lash, will blame me
 very much for giving the headsman a mouthful of his own sawdust.
 
 
 
 II.  NUITS BLANCHES
 
 
 If any one should know the pleasure and pain of a sleepless night, it
 should be I.  I remember, so long ago, the sickly child that woke from
 his few hours' slumber with the sweat of a nightmare on his brow, to lie
 awake and listen and long for the first signs of life among the silent
 streets.  These nights of pain and weariness are graven on my mind; and
 so when the same thing happened to me again, everything that I heard or
 saw was rather a recollection than a discovery.
 
 Weighed upon by the opaque and almost sensible darkness, I listened
 eagerly for anything to break the sepulchral quiet.  But nothing came,
 save, perhaps, an emphatic crack from the old cabinet that was made by
 Deacon Brodie, or the dry rustle of the coals on the extinguished fire.
 It was a calm; or I know that I should have heard in the roar and clatter
 of the storm, as I have not heard it for so many years, the wild career
 of a horseman, always scouring up from the distance and passing swiftly
 below the window; yet always returning again from the place whence first
 he came, as though, baffled by some higher power, he had retraced his
 steps to gain impetus for another and another attempt.
 
 As I lay there, there arose out of the utter stillness the rumbling of a
 carriage a very great way off, that drew near, and passed within a few
 streets of the house, and died away as gradually as it had arisen.  This,
 too, was as a reminiscence.
 
 I rose and lifted a corner of the blind.  Over the black belt of the
 garden I saw the long line of Queen Street, with here and there a lighted
 window.  How often before had my nurse lifted me out of bed and pointed
 them out to me, while we wondered together if, there also, there were
 children that could not sleep, and if these lighted oblongs were signs of
 those that waited like us for the morning.
 
 I went out into the lobby, and looked down into the great deep well of
 the staircase.  For what cause I know not, just as it used to be in the
 old days that the feverish child might be the better served, a peep of
 gas illuminated a narrow circle far below me.  But where I was, all was
 darkness and silence, save the dry monotonous ticking of the clock that
 came ceaselessly up to my ear.
 
 The final crown of it all, however, the last touch of reproduction on the
 pictures of my memory, was the arrival of that time for which, all night
 through, I waited and longed of old.  It was my custom, as the hours
 dragged on, to repeat the question, 'When will the carts come in?' and
 repeat it again and again until at last those sounds arose in the street
 that I have heard once more this morning.  The road before our house is a
 great thoroughfare for early carts.  I know not, and I never have known,
 what they carry, whence they come, or whither they go.  But I know that,
 long ere dawn, and for hours together, they stream continuously past,
 with the same rolling and jerking of wheels and the same clink of horses'
 feet.  It was not for nothing that they made the burthen of my wishes all
 night through.  They are really the first throbbings of life, the
 harbingers of day; and it pleases you as much to hear them as it must
 please a shipwrecked seaman once again to grasp a hand of flesh and blood
 after years of miserable solitude.  They have the freshness of the
 daylight life about them.  You can hear the carters cracking their whips
 and crying hoarsely to their horses or to one another; and sometimes even
 a peal of healthy, harsh horse-laughter comes up to you through the
 darkness.  There is now an end of mystery and fear.  Like the knocking at
 the door in _Macbeth_, {205} or the cry of the watchman in the _Tour de
 Nesle_, they show that the horrible caesura is over and the nightmares
 have fled away, because the day is breaking and the ordinary life of men
 is beginning to bestir itself among the streets.
 
 In the middle of it all I fell asleep, to be wakened by the officious
 knocking at my door, and I find myself twelve years older than I had
 dreamed myself all night.
 
 
 
 III.  THE WREATH OF IMMORTELLES
 
 
 It is all very well to talk of death as 'a pleasant potion of
 immortality', but the most of us, I suspect, are of 'queasy stomachs,'
 and find it none of the sweetest. {206a}  The graveyard may be cloak-room
 to Heaven; but we must admit that it is a very ugly and offensive
 vestibule in itself, however fair may be the life to which it leads.  And
 though Enoch and Elias went into the temple through a gate which
 certainly may be called Beautiful, the rest of us have to find our way to
 it through Ezekiel's low-bowed door and the vault full of creeping things
 and all manner of abominable beasts.  Nevertheless, there is a certain
 frame of mind to which a cemetery is, if not an antidote, at least an
 alleviation.  If you are in a fit of the blues, go nowhere else.  It was
 in obedience to this wise regulation that the other morning found me
 lighting my pipe at the entrance to Old Greyfriars', thoroughly sick of
 the town, the country, and myself.
 
 Two of the men were talking at the gate, one of them carrying a spade in
 hands still crusted with the soil of graves.  Their very aspect was
 delightful to me; and I crept nearer to them, thinking to pick up some
 snatch of sexton gossip, some 'talk fit for a charnel,' {206b} something,
 in fine, worthy of that fastidious logician, that adept in coroner's law,
 who has come down to us as the patron of Yaughan's liquor, and the very
 prince of gravediggers.  Scots people in general are so much wrapped up
 in their profession that I had a good chance of overhearing such
 conversation: the talk of fish-mongers running usually on stockfish and
 haddocks; while of the Scots sexton I could repeat stories and speeches
 that positively smell of the graveyard.  But on this occasion I was
 doomed to disappointment.  My two friends were far into the region of
 generalities.  Their profession was forgotten in their electorship.
 Politics had engulfed the narrower economy of grave-digging.  'Na, na,'
 said the one, 'ye're a' wrang.'  'The English and Irish Churches,'
 answered the other, in a tone as if he had made the remark before, and it
 had been called in question--'The English and Irish Churches have
 _impoverished_ the country.'
 
 'Such are the results of education,' thought I as I passed beside them
 and came fairly among the tombs.  Here, at least, there were no
 commonplace politics, no diluted this-morning's leader, to distract or
 offend me.  The old shabby church showed, as usual, its quaint extent of
 roofage and the relievo skeleton on one gable, still blackened with the
 fire of thirty years ago.  A chill dank mist lay over all.  The Old
 Greyfriars' churchyard was in perfection that morning, and one could go
 round and reckon up the associations with no fear of vulgar interruption.
 On this stone the Covenant was signed.  In that vault, as the story goes,
 John Knox took hiding in some Reformation broil.  From that window Burke
 the murderer looked out many a time across the tombs, and perhaps o'
 nights let himself down over the sill to rob some new-made grave.
 Certainly he would have a selection here.  The very walks have been
 carried over forgotten resting-places; and the whole ground is uneven,
 because (as I was once quaintly told) 'when the wood rots it stands to
 reason the soil should fall in,' which, from the law of gravitation, is
 certainly beyond denial.  But it is round the boundary that there are the
 finest tombs.  The whole irregular space is, as it were, fringed with
 quaint old monuments, rich in death's-heads and scythes and hour-glasses,
 and doubly rich in pious epitaphs and Latin mottoes--rich in them to such
 an extent that their proper space has run over, and they have crawled
 end-long up the shafts of columns and ensconced themselves in all sorts
 of odd corners among the sculpture.  These tombs raise their backs
 against the rabble of squalid dwelling-houses, and every here and there a
 clothes-pole projects between two monuments its fluttering trophy of
 white and yellow and red.  With a grim irony they recall the banners in
 the Invalides, banners as appropriate perhaps over the sepulchres of
 tailors and weavers as these others above the dust of armies.  Why they
 put things out to dry on that particular morning it was hard to imagine.
 The grass was grey with drops of rain, the headstones black with
 moisture.  Yet, in despite of weather and common sense, there they hung
 between the tombs; and beyond them I could see through open windows into
 miserable rooms where whole families were born and fed, and slept and
 died.  At one a girl sat singing merrily with her back to the graveyard;
 and from another came the shrill tones of a scolding woman.  Every here
 and there was a town garden full of sickly flowers, or a pile of crockery
 inside upon the window-seat.  But you do not grasp the full connection
 between these houses of the dead and the living, the unnatural marriage
 of stately sepulchres and squalid houses, till, lower down, where the
 road has sunk far below the surface of the cemetery, and the very roofs
 are scarcely on a level with its wall, you observe that a proprietor has
 taken advantage of a tall monument and trained a chimney-stack against
 its back.  It startles you to see the red, modern pots peering over the
 shoulder of the tomb.
 
 A man was at work on a grave, his spade clinking away the drift of bones
 that permeates the thin brown soil; but my first disappointment had
 taught me to expect little from Greyfriars' sextons, and I passed him by
 in silence.  A slater on the slope of a neighbouring roof eyed me
 curiously.  A lean black cat, looking as if it had battened on strange
 meats, slipped past me.  A little boy at a window put his finger to his
 nose in so offensive a manner that I was put upon my dignity, and turned
 grandly off to read old epitaphs and peer through the gratings into the
 shadow of vaults.
 
 Just then I saw two women coming down a path, one of them old, and the
 other younger, with a child in her arms.  Both had faces eaten with
 famine and hardened with sin, and both had reached that stage of
 degradation, much lower in a woman than a man, when all care for dress is
 lost.  As they came down they neared a grave, where some pious friend or
 relative had laid a wreath of immortelles, and put a bell glass over it,
 as is the custom.  The effect of that ring of dull yellow among so many
 blackened and dusty sculptures was more pleasant than it is in modern
 cemeteries, where every second mound can boast a similar coronal; and
 here, where it was the exception and not the rule, I could even fancy the
 drops of moisture that dimmed the covering were the tears of those who
 laid it where it was.  As the two women came up to it, one of them
 kneeled down on the wet grass and looked long and silently through the
 clouded shade, while the second stood above her, gently oscillating to
 and fro to lull the muling baby.  I was struck a great way off with
 something religious in the attitude of these two unkempt and haggard
 women; and I drew near faster, but still cautiously, to hear what they
 were saying.  Surely on them the spirit of death and decay had descended;
 I had no education to dread here: should I not have a chance of seeing
 nature?  Alas! a pawnbroker could not have been more practical and
 commonplace, for this was what the kneeling woman said to the woman
 upright--this and nothing more: 'Eh, what extravagance!'
 
 O nineteenth century, wonderful art thou indeed--wonderful, but wearisome
 in thy stale and deadly uniformity.  Thy men are more like numerals than
 men.  They must bear their idiosyncrasies or their professions written on
 a placard about their neck, like the scenery in Shakespeare's theatre.
 Thy precepts of economy have pierced into the lowest ranks of life; and
 there is now a decorum in vice, a respectability among the disreputable,
 a pure spirit of Philistinism among the waifs and strays of thy Bohemia.
 For lo! thy very gravediggers talk politics; and thy castaways kneel upon
 new graves, to discuss the cost of the monument and grumble at the
 improvidence of love.
 
 Such was the elegant apostrophe that I made as I went out of the gates
 again, happily satisfied in myself, and feeling that I alone of all whom
 I had seen was able to profit by the silent poem of these green mounds
 and blackened headstones.
 
 
 
 IV.  NURSES
 
 
 I knew one once, and the room where, lonely and old, she waited for
 death.  It was pleasant enough, high up above the lane, and looking forth
 upon a hill-side, covered all day with sheets and yellow blankets, and
 with long lines of underclothing fluttering between the battered posts.
 There were any number of cheap prints, and a drawing by one of 'her
 children,' and there were flowers in the window, and a sickly canary
 withered into consumption in an ornamental cage.  The bed, with its
 checked coverlid, was in a closet.  A great Bible lay on the table; and
 her drawers were full of 'scones,' which it was her pleasure to give to
 young visitors such as I was then.
 
 You may not think this a melancholy picture; but the canary, and the cat,
 and the white mouse that she had for a while, and that died, were all
 indications of the want that ate into her heart.  I think I know a little
 of what that old woman felt; and I am as sure as if I had seen her, that
 she sat many an hour in silent tears, with the big Bible open before her
 clouded eyes.
 
 If you could look back upon her life, and feel the great chain that had
 linked her to one child after another, sometimes to be wrenched suddenly
 through, and sometimes, which is infinitely worse, to be torn gradually
 off through years of growing neglect, or perhaps growing dislike!  She
 had, like the mother, overcome that natural repugnance--repugnance which
 no man can conquer--towards the infirm and helpless mass of putty of the
 earlier stage.  She had spent her best and happiest years in tending,
 watching, and learning to love like a mother this child, with which she
 has no connection and to which she has no tie.  Perhaps she refused some
 sweetheart (such things have been), or put him off and off, until he lost
 heart and turned to some one else, all for fear of leaving this creature
 that had wound itself about her heart.  And the end of it all--her
 month's warning, and a present perhaps, and the rest of the life to vain
 regret.  Or, worse still, to see the child gradually forgetting and
 forsaking her, fostered in disrespect and neglect on the plea of growing
 manliness, and at last beginning to treat her as a servant whom he had
 treated a few years before as a mother.  She sees the Bible or the
 Psalm-book, which with gladness and love unutterable in her heart she had
 bought for him years ago out of her slender savings, neglected for some
 newer gift of his father, lying in dust in the lumber-room or given away
 to a poor child, and the act applauded for its unfeeling charity.  Little
 wonder if she becomes hurt and angry, and attempts to tyrannise and to
 grasp her old power back again.  We are not all patient Grizzels, by good
 fortune, but the most of us human beings with feelings and tempers of our
 own.
 
 And so, in the end, behold her in the room that I described.  Very likely
 and very naturally, in some fling of feverish misery or recoil of
 thwarted love, she has quarrelled with her old employers and the children
 are forbidden to see her or to speak to her; or at best she gets her rent
 paid and a little to herself, and now and then her late charges are sent
 up (with another nurse, perhaps) to pay her a short visit.  How bright
 these visits seem as she looks forward to them on her lonely bed!  How
 unsatisfactory their realisation, when the forgetful child, half
 wondering, checks with every word and action the outpouring of her
 maternal love!  How bitter and restless the memories that they leave
 behind!  And for the rest, what else has she?--to watch them with eager
 eyes as they go to school, to sit in church where she can see them every
 Sunday, to be passed some day unnoticed in the street, or deliberately
 cut because the great man or the great woman are with friends before whom
 they are ashamed to recognise the old woman that loved them.
 
 When she goes home that night, how lonely will the room appear to her!
 Perhaps the neighbours may hear her sobbing to herself in the dark, with
 the fire burnt out for want of fuel, and the candle still unlit upon the
 table.
 
 And it is for this that they live, these quasi-mothers--mothers in
 everything but the travail and the thanks.  It is for this that they have
 remained virtuous in youth, living the dull life of a household servant.
 It is for this that they refused the old sweetheart, and have no fireside
 or offspring of their own.
 
 I believe in a better state of things, that there will be no more nurses,
 and that every mother will nurse her own offspring; for what can be more
 hardening and demoralising than to call forth the tenderest feelings of a
 woman's heart and cherish them yourself as long as you need them, as long
 as your children require a nurse to love them, and then to blight and
 thwart and destroy them, whenever your own use for them is at an end.
 This may be Utopian; but it is always a little thing if one mother or two
 mothers can be brought to feel more tenderly to those who share their
 toil and have no part in their reward.
 
 
 
 V.  A CHARACTER
 
 
 The man has a red, bloated face, and his figure is short and squat.  So
 far there is nothing in him to notice, but when you see his eyes, you can
 read in these hard and shallow orbs a depravity beyond measure depraved,
 a thirst after wickedness, the pure, disinterested love of Hell for its
 own sake.  The other night, in the street, I was watching an omnibus
 passing with lit-up windows, when I heard some one coughing at my side as
 though he would cough his soul out; and turning round, I saw him stopping
 under a lamp, with a brown greatcoat buttoned round him and his whole
 face convulsed.  It seemed as if he could not live long; and so the sight
 set my mind upon a train of thought, as I finished my cigar up and down
 the lighted streets.
 
 He is old, but all these years have not yet quenched his thirst for evil,
 and his eyes still delight themselves in wickedness.  He is dumb; but he
 will not let that hinder his foul trade, or perhaps I should say, his yet
 fouler amusement, and he has pressed a slate into the service of
 corruption.  Look at him, and he will sign to you with his bloated head,
 and when you go to him in answer to the sign, thinking perhaps that the
 poor dumb man has lost his way, you will see what he writes upon his
 slate.  He haunts the doors of schools, and shows such inscriptions as
 these to the innocent children that come out.  He hangs about
 picture-galleries, and makes the noblest pictures the text for some
 silent homily of vice.  His industry is a lesson to ourselves.  Is it not
 wonderful how he can triumph over his infirmities and do such an amount
 of harm without a tongue?  Wonderful industry--strange, fruitless,
 pleasureless toil?  Must not the very devil feel a soft emotion to see
 his disinterested and laborious service?  Ah, but the devil knows better
 than this: he knows that this man is penetrated with the love of evil and
 that all his pleasure is shut up in wickedness: he recognises him,
 perhaps, as a fit type for mankind of his satanic self, and watches over
 his effigy as we might watch over a favourite likeness.  As the business
 man comes to love the toil, which he only looked upon at first as a
 ladder towards other desires and less unnatural gratifications, so the
 dumb man has felt the charm of his trade and fallen captivated before the
 eyes of sin.  It is a mistake when preachers tell us that vice is hideous
 and loathsome; for even vice has her Horsel and her devotees, who love
 her for her own sake.
 
 
 
 
 THE GREAT NORTH ROAD
 
 
 CHAPTER I--NANCE AT THE 'GREEN DRAGON'
 
 
 Nance Holdaway was on her knees before the fire blowing the green wood
 that voluminously smoked upon the dogs, and only now and then shot forth
 a smothered flame; her knees already ached and her eyes smarted, for she
 had been some while at this ungrateful task, but her mind was gone far
 away to meet the coming stranger.  Now she met him in the wood, now at
 the castle gate, now in the kitchen by candle-light; each fresh
 presentment eclipsed the one before; a form so elegant, manners so
 sedate, a countenance so brave and comely, a voice so winning and
 resolute--sure such a man was never seen!  The thick-coming fancies
 poured and brightened in her head like the smoke and flames upon the
 hearth.
 
 Presently the heavy foot of her uncle Jonathan was heard upon the stair,
 and as he entered the room she bent the closer to her work.  He glanced
 at the green fagots with a sneer, and looked askance at the bed and the
 white sheets, at the strip of carpet laid, like an island, on the great
 expanse of the stone floor, and at the broken glazing of the casement
 clumsily repaired with paper.
 
 'Leave that fire a-be,' he cried.  'What, have I toiled all my life to
 turn innkeeper at the hind end?  Leave it a-be, I say.'
 
 'La, uncle, it doesn't burn a bit; it only smokes,' said Nance, looking
 up from her position.
 
 'You are come of decent people on both sides,' returned the old man.
 'Who are you to blow the coals for any Robin-run-agate?  Get up, get on
 your hood, make yourself useful, and be off to the "Green Dragon."'
 
 'I thought you was to go yourself,' Nance faltered.
 
 'So did I,' quoth Jonathan; 'but it appears I was mistook.'
 
 The very excess of her eagerness alarmed her, and she began to hang back.
 'I think I would rather not, dear uncle,' she said.  'Night is at hand,
 and I think, dear, I would rather not.'
 
 'Now you look here,' replied Jonathan, 'I have my lord's orders, have I
 not?  Little he gives me, but it's all my livelihood.  And do you fancy,
 if I disobey my lord, I'm likely to turn round for a lass like you?  No,
 I've that hell-fire of pain in my old knee, I wouldn't walk a mile, not
 for King George upon his bended knees.'  And he walked to the window and
 looked down the steep scarp to where the river foamed in the bottom of
 the dell.
 
 Nance stayed for no more bidding.  In her own room, by the glimmer of the
 twilight, she washed her hands and pulled on her Sunday mittens; adjusted
 her black hood, and tied a dozen times its cherry ribbons; and in less
 than ten minutes, with a fluttering heart and excellently bright eyes,
 she passed forth under the arch and over the bridge, into the thickening
 shadows of the groves.  A well-marked wheel-track conducted her.  The
 wood, which upon both sides of the river dell was a mere scrambling
 thicket of hazel, hawthorn, and holly, boasted on the level of more
 considerable timber.  Beeches came to a good growth, with here and there
 an oak; and the track now passed under a high arcade of branches, and now
 ran under the open sky in glades.  As the girl proceeded these glades
 became more frequent, the trees began again to decline in size, and the
 wood to degenerate into furzy coverts.  Last of all there was a fringe of
 elders; and beyond that the track came forth upon an open, rolling
 moorland, dotted with wind-bowed and scanty bushes, and all golden brown
 with the winter, like a grouse.  Right over against the girl the last red
 embers of the sunset burned under horizontal clouds; the night fell clear
 and still and frosty, and the track in low and marshy passages began to
 crackle under foot with ice.
 
 Some half a mile beyond the borders of the wood the lights of the 'Green
 Dragon' hove in sight, and running close beside them, very faint in the
 dying dusk, the pale ribbon of the Great North Road.  It was the back of
 the post-house that was presented to Nance Holdaway; and as she continued
 to draw near and the night to fall more completely, she became aware of
 an unusual brightness and bustle.  A post-chaise stood in the yard, its
 lamps already lighted: light shone hospitably in the windows and from the
 open door; moving lights and shadows testified to the activity of
 servants bearing lanterns.  The clank of pails, the stamping of hoofs on
 the firm causeway, the jingle of harness, and, last of all, the energetic
 hissing of a groom, began to fall upon her ear.  By the stir you would
 have thought the mail was at the door, but it was still too early in the
 night.  The down mail was not due at the 'Green Dragon' for hard upon an
 hour; the up mail from Scotland not before two in the black morning.
 
 Nance entered the yard somewhat dazzled.  Sam, the tall ostler, was
 polishing a curb-chain wit sand; the lantern at his feet letting up
 spouts of candle-light through the holes with which its conical roof was
 peppered.
 
 'Hey, miss,' said he jocularly, 'you won't look at me any more, now you
 have gentry at the castle.'
 
 Her cheeks burned with anger.
 
 'That's my lord's chay,' the man continued, nodding at the chaise, 'Lord
 Windermoor's.  Came all in a fluster--dinner, bowl of punch, and put the
 horses to. For all the world like a runaway match, my dear--bar the
 bride.  He brought Mr. Archer in the chay with him.'
 
 'Is that Holdaway?' cried the landlord from the lighted entry, where he
 stood shading his eyes.
 
 'Only me, sir,' answered Nance.
 
 'O, you, Miss Nance,' he said.  'Well, come in quick, my pretty.  My lord
 is waiting for your uncle.'
 
 And he ushered Nance into a room cased with yellow wainscot and lighted
 by tall candles, where two gentlemen sat at a table finishing a bowl of
 punch.  One of these was stout, elderly, and irascible, with a face like
 a full moon, well dyed with liquor, thick tremulous lips, a short, purple
 hand, in which he brandished a long pipe, and an abrupt and gobbling
 utterance.  This was my Lord Windermoor.  In his companion Nance beheld a
 younger man, tall, quiet, grave, demurely dressed, and wearing his own
 hair.  Her glance but lighted on him, and she flushed, for in that second
 she made sure that she had twice betrayed herself--betrayed by the
 involuntary flash of her black eyes her secret impatience to behold this
 new companion, and, what was far worse, betrayed her disappointment in
 the realisation of her dreams.  He, meanwhile, as if unconscious,
 continued to regard her with unmoved decorum.
 
 'O, a man of wood,' thought Nance.
 
 'What--what?' said his lordship.  'Who is this?'
 
 'If you please, my lord, I am Holdaway's niece,' replied Nance, with a
 curtsey.
 
 'Should have been here himself,' observed his lordship.  'Well, you tell
 Holdaway that I'm aground, not a stiver--not a stiver.  I'm running from
 the beagles--going abroad, tell Holdaway.  And he need look for no more
 wages: glad of 'em myself, if I could get 'em.  He can live in the castle
 if he likes, or go to the devil.  O, and here is Mr. Archer; and I
 recommend him to take him in--a friend of mine--and Mr. Archer will pay,
 as I wrote.  And I regard that in the light of a precious good thing for
 Holdaway, let me tell you, and a set-off against the wages.'
 
 'But O, my lord!' cried Nance, 'we live upon the wages, and what are we
 to do without?'
 
 'What am I to do?--what am I to do?' replied Lord Windermoor with some
 exasperation.  'I have no wages.  And there is Mr. Archer.  And if
 Holdaway doesn't like it, he can go to the devil, and you with him!--and
 you with him!'
 
 'And yet, my lord,' said Mr. Archer, 'these good people will have as keen
 a sense of loss as you or I; keener, perhaps, since they have done
 nothing to deserve it.'
 
 'Deserve it?' cried the peer.  'What?  What?  If a rascally highwayman
 comes up to me with a confounded pistol, do you say that I've deserved
 it?  How often am I to tell you, sir, that I was cheated--that I was
 cheated?'
 
 'You are happy in the belief,' returned Mr. Archer gravely.
 
 'Archer, you would be the death of me!' exclaimed his lordship.  'You
 know you're drunk; you know it, sir; and yet you can't get up a spark of
 animation.'
 
 'I have drunk fair, my lord,' replied the younger man; 'but I own I am
 conscious of no exhilaration.'
 
 'If you had as black a look-out as me, sir,' cried the peer, 'you would
 be very glad of a little innocent exhilaration, let me tell you.  I am
 glad of it--glad of it, and I only wish I was drunker.  For let me tell
 you it's a cruel hard thing upon a man of my time of life and my
 position, to be brought down to beggary because the world is full of
 thieves and rascals--thieves and rascals.  What?  For all I know, you may
 be a thief and a rascal yourself; and I would fight you for a pinch of
 snuff--a pinch of snuff,' exclaimed his lordship.
 
 Here Mr. Archer turned to Nance Holdaway with a pleasant smile, so full
 of sweetness, kindness, and composure that, at one bound, her dreams
 returned to her.  'My good Miss Holdaway,' said he, 'if you are willing
 to show me the road, I am even eager to be gone.  As for his lordship and
 myself, compose yourself; there is no fear; this is his lordship's way.'
 
 'What? what?' cried his lordship.  'My way?  Ish no such a thing, my
 way.'
 
 'Come, my lord,' cried Archer; 'you and I very thoroughly understand each
 other; and let me suggest, it is time that both of us were gone.  The
 mail will soon be due.  Here, then, my lord, I take my leave of you, with
 the most earnest assurance of my gratitude for the past, and a sincere
 offer of any services I may be able to render in the future.'
 
 'Archer,' exclaimed Lord Windermoor, 'I love you like a son.  Le' 's have
 another bowl.'
 
 'My lord, for both our sakes, you will excuse me,' replied Mr. Archer.
 'We both require caution; we must both, for some while at least, avoid
 the chance of a pursuit.'
 
 'Archer,' quoth his lordship, 'this is a rank ingratishood.  What?  I'm
 to go firing away in the dark in the cold po'chaise, and not so much as a
 game of ecarte possible, unless I stop and play with the postillion, the
 postillion; and the whole country swarming with thieves and rascals and
 highwaymen.'
 
 'I beg your lordship's pardon,' put in the landlord, who now appeared in
 the doorway to announce the chaise, 'but this part of the North Road is
 known for safety.  There has not been a robbery, to call a robbery, this
 five years' time.  Further south, of course, it's nearer London, and
 another story,' he added.
 
 'Well, then, if that's so,' concluded my lord, 'le' 's have t'other bowl
 and a pack of cards.'
 
 'My lord, you forget,' said Archer, 'I might still gain; but it is hardly
 possible for me to lose.'
 
 'Think I'm a sharper?' inquired the peer.  'Gen'leman's parole's all I
 ask.'
 
 But Mr. Archer was proof against these blandishments, and said farewell
 gravely enough to Lord Windermoor, shaking his hand and at the same time
 bowing very low.  'You will never know,' says he, 'the service you have
 done me.'  And with that, and before my lord had finally taken up his
 meaning, he had slipped about the table, touched Nance lightly but
 imperiously on the arm, and left the room.  In face of the outbreak of
 his lordship's lamentations she made haste to follow the truant.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--IN WHICH MR. ARCHER IS INSTALLED
 
 
 The chaise had been driven round to the front door; the courtyard lay all
 deserted, and only lit by a lantern set upon a window-sill.  Through this
 Nance rapidly led the way, and began to ascend the swellings of the moor
 with a heart that somewhat fluttered in her bosom.  She was not afraid,
 but in the course of these last passages with Lord Windermoor Mr. Archer
 had ascended to that pedestal on which her fancy waited to instal him.
 The reality, she felt, excelled her dreams, and this cold night walk was
 the first romantic incident in her experience.
 
 It was the rule in these days to see gentlemen unsteady after dinner, yet
 Nance was both surprised and amused when her companion, who had spoken so
 soberly, began to stumble and waver by her side with the most airy
 divagations.  Sometimes he would get so close to her that she must edge
 away; and at others lurch clear out of the track and plough among deep
 heather.  His courtesy and gravity meanwhile remained unaltered.  He
 asked her how far they had to go; whether the way lay all upon the
 moorland, and when he learned they had to pass a wood expressed his
 pleasure.  'For,' said he, 'I am passionately fond of trees.  Trees and
 fair lawns, if you consider of it rightly, are the ornaments of nature,
 as palaces and fine approaches--'  And here he stumbled into a patch of
 slough and nearly fell.  The girl had hard work not to laugh, but at
 heart she was lost in admiration for one who talked so elegantly.
 
 They had got to about a quarter of a mile from the 'Green Dragon,' and
 were near the summit of the rise, when a sudden rush of wheels arrested
 them.  Turning and looking back, they saw the post-house, now much
 declined in brightness; and speeding away northward the two tremulous
 bright dots of my Lord Windermoor's chaise-lamps.  Mr. Archer followed
 these yellow and unsteady stars until they dwindled into points and
 disappeared.
 
 'There goes my only friend,' he said.  'Death has cut off those that
 loved me, and change of fortune estranged my flatterers; and but for you,
 poor bankrupt, my life is as lonely as this moor.'
 
 The tone of his voice affected both of them.  They stood there on the
 side of the moor, and became thrillingly conscious of the void waste of
 the night, without a feature for the eye, and except for the fainting
 whisper of the carriage-wheels without a murmur for the ear.  And
 instantly, like a mockery, there broke out, very far away, but clear and
 jolly, the note of the mail-guard's horn.  'Over the hills' was his air.
 It rose to the two watchers on the moor with the most cheerful sentiment
 of human company and travel, and at the same time in and around the
 'Green Dragon' it woke up a great bustle of lights running to and fro and
 clattering hoofs.  Presently after, out of the darkness to southward, the
 mail grew near with a growing rumble.  Its lamps were very large and
 bright, and threw their radiance forward in overlapping cones; the four
 cantering horses swarmed and steamed; the body of the coach followed like
 a great shadow; and this lit picture slid with a sort of ineffectual
 swiftness over the black field of night, and was eclipsed by the
 buildings of the 'Green Dragon.'
 
 Mr. Archer turned abruptly and resumed his former walk; only that he was
 now more steady, kept better alongside his young conductor, and had
 fallen into a silence broken by sighs.  Nance waxed very pitiful over his
 fate, contrasting an imaginary past of courts and great society, and
 perhaps the King himself, with the tumbledown ruin in a wood to which she
 was now conducting him.
 
 'You must try, sir, to keep your spirits up,' said she.  'To be sure this
 is a great change for one like you; but who knows the future?'
 
 Mr. Archer turned towards her in the darkness, and she could clearly
 perceive that he smiled upon her very kindly.  'There spoke a sweet
 nature,' said he, 'and I must thank you for these words.  But I would not
 have you fancy that I regret the past for any happiness found in it, or
 that I fear the simplicity and hardship of the country.  I am a man that
 has been much tossed about in life; now up, now down; and do you think
 that I shall not be able to support what you support--you who are kind,
 and therefore know how to feel pain; who are beautiful, and therefore
 hope; who are young, and therefore (or am I the more mistaken?)
 discontented?'
 
 'Nay, sir, not that, at least,' said Nance; 'not discontented.  If I were
 to be discontented, how should I look those that have real sorrows in the
 face?  I have faults enough, but not that fault; and I have my merits
 too, for I have a good opinion of myself.  But for beauty, I am not so
 simple but that I can tell a banter from a compliment.'
 
 'Nay, nay,' said Mr. Archer, 'I had half forgotten; grief is selfish, and
 I was thinking of myself and not of you, or I had never blurted out so
 bold a piece of praise.  'Tis the best proof of my sincerity.  But come,
 now, I would lay a wager you are no coward?'
 
 'Indeed, sir, I am not more afraid than another,' said Nance.  'None of
 my blood are given to fear.'
 
 'And you are honest?' he returned.
 
 'I will answer for that,' said she.
 
 'Well, then, to be brave, to be honest, to be kind, and to be contented,
 since you say you are so--is not that to fill up a great part of virtue?'
 
 'I fear you are but a flatterer,' said Nance, but she did not say it
 clearly, for what with bewilderment and satisfaction, her heart was quite
 oppressed.
 
 There could be no harm, certainly, in these grave compliments; but yet
 they charmed and frightened her, and to find favour, for reasons however
 obscure, in the eyes of this elegant, serious, and most unfortunate young
 gentleman, was a giddy elevation, was almost an apotheosis, for a country
 maid.
 
 But she was to be no more exercised; for Mr. Archer, disclaiming any
 thought of flattery, turned off to other subjects, and held her all
 through the wood in conversation, addressing her with an air of perfect
 sincerity, and listening to her answers with every mark of interest.  Had
 open flattery continued, Nance would have soon found refuge in good
 sense; but the more subtle lure she could not suspect, much less avoid.
 It was the first time she had ever taken part in a conversation
 illuminated by any ideas.  All was then true that she had heard and
 dreamed of gentlemen; they were a race apart, like deities knowing good
 and evil.  And then there burst upon her soul a divine thought, hope's
 glorious sunrise: since she could understand, since it seemed that she
 too, even she, could interest this sorrowful Apollo, might she not learn?
 or was she not learning?  Would not her soul awake and put forth wings?
 Was she not, in fact, an enchanted princess, waiting but a touch to
 become royal?  She saw herself transformed, radiantly attired, but in the
 most exquisite taste: her face grown longer and more refined; her tint
 etherealised; and she heard herself with delighted wonder talking like a
 book.
 
 Meanwhile they had arrived at where the track comes out above the river
 dell, and saw in front of them the castle, faintly shadowed on the night,
 covering with its broken battlements a bold projection of the bank, and
 showing at the extreme end, where were the habitable tower and wing, some
 crevices of candle-light.  Hence she called loudly upon her uncle, and he
 was seen to issue, lantern in hand, from the tower door, and, where the
 ruins did not intervene, to pick his way over the swarded courtyard,
 avoiding treacherous cellars and winding among blocks of fallen masonry.
 The arch of the great gate was still entire, flanked by two tottering
 bastions, and it was here that Jonathan met them, standing at the edge of
 the bridge, bent somewhat forward, and blinking at them through the glow
 of his own lantern.  Mr. Archer greeted him with civility; but the old
 man was in no humour of compliance.  He guided the newcomer across the
 court-yard, looking sharply and quickly in his face, and grumbling all
 the time about the cold, and the discomfort and dilapidation of the
 castle.  He was sure he hoped that Mr. Archer would like it; but in truth
 he could not think what brought him there.  Doubtless he had a good
 reason--this with a look of cunning scrutiny--but, indeed, the place was
 quite unfit for any person of repute; he himself was eaten up with the
 rheumatics.  It was the most rheumaticky place in England, and some fine
 day the whole habitable part (to call it habitable) would fetch away
 bodily and go down the slope into the river.  He had seen the cracks
 widening; there was a plaguy issue in the bank below; he thought a spring
 was mining it; it might be to-morrow, it might be next day; but they were
 all sure of a come-down sooner or later.  'And that is a poor death,'
 said he, 'for any one, let alone a gentleman, to have a whole old ruin
 dumped upon his belly.  Have a care to your left there; these cellar
 vaults have all broke down, and the grass and hemlock hide 'em.  Well,
 sir, here is welcome to you, such as it is, and wishing you well away.'
 
 And with that Jonathan ushered his guest through the tower door, and down
 three steps on the left hand into the kitchen or common room of the
 castle.  It was a huge, low room, as large as a meadow, occupying the
 whole width of the habitable wing, with six barred windows looking on the
 court, and two into the river valley.  A dresser, a table, and a few
 chairs stood dotted here and there upon the uneven flags.  Under the
 great chimney a good fire burned in an iron fire-basket; a high old
 settee, rudely carved with figures and Gothic lettering, flanked it on
 either side; there was a hinge table and a stone bench in the chimney
 corner, and above the arch hung guns, axes, lanterns, and great sheaves
 of rusty keys.
 
 Jonathan looked about him, holding up the lantern, and shrugged his
 shoulders, with a pitying grimace.  'Here it is,' he said.  'See the damp
 on the floor, look at the moss; where there's moss you may be sure that
 it's rheumaticky.  Try and get near that fire for to warm yourself; it'll
 blow the coat off your back.  And with a young gentleman with a face like
 yours, as pale as a tallow-candle, I'd be afeard of a churchyard cough
 and a galloping decline,' says Jonathan, naming the maladies with gloomy
 gusto, 'or the cold might strike and turn your blood,' he added.
 
 Mr. Archer fairly laughed.  'My good Mr. Holdaway,' said he, 'I was born
 with that same tallow-candle face, and the only fear that you inspire me
 with is the fear that I intrude unwelcomely upon your private hours.  But
 I think I can promise you that I am very little troublesome, and I am
 inclined to hope that the terms which I can offer may still pay you the
 derangement.'
 
 'Yes, the terms,' said Jonathan, 'I was thinking of that.  As you say,
 they are very small,' and he shook his head.
 
 'Unhappily, I can afford no more,' said Mr. Archer.  'But this we have
 arranged already,' he added with a certain stiffness; 'and as I am aware
 that Miss Holdaway has matter to communicate, I will, if you permit,
 retire at once.  To-night I must bivouac; to-morrow my trunk is to follow
 from the "Dragon."  So if you will show me to my room I shall wish you a
 good slumber and a better awakening.'
 
 Jonathan silently gave the lantern to Nance, and she, turning and
 curtseying in the doorway, proceeded to conduct their guest up the broad
 winding staircase of the tower.  He followed with a very brooding face.
 
 'Alas!' cried Nance, as she entered the room, 'your fire black out,' and,
 setting down the lantern, she clapped upon her knees before the chimney
 and began to rearrange the charred and still smouldering remains.  Mr.
 Archer looked about the gaunt apartment with a sort of shudder.  The
 great height, the bare stone, the shattered windows, the aspect of the
 uncurtained bed, with one of its four fluted columns broken short, all
 struck a chill upon his fancy.  From this dismal survey his eyes returned
 to Nance crouching before the fire, the candle in one hand and artfully
 puffing at the embers; the flames as they broke forth played upon the
 soft outline of her cheek--she was alive and young, coloured with the
 bright hues of life, and a woman.  He looked upon her, softening; and
 then sat down and continued to admire the picture.
 
 'There, sir,' said she, getting upon her feet, 'your fire is doing
 bravely now.  Good-night.'
 
 He rose and held out his hand.  'Come,' said he, 'you are my only friend
 in these parts, and you must shake hands.'
 
 She brushed her hand upon her skirt and offered it, blushing.
 
 'God bless you, my dear,' said he.
 
 And then, when he was alone, he opened one of the windows, and stared
 down into the dark valley.  A gentle wimpling of the river among stones
 ascended to his ear; the trees upon the other bank stood very black
 against the sky; farther away an owl was hooting.  It was dreary and
 cold, and as he turned back to the hearth and the fine glow of fire,
 'Heavens!' said he to himself, 'what an unfortunate destiny is mine!'
 
 He went to bed, but sleep only visited his pillow in uneasy snatches.
 Outbreaks of loud speech came up the staircase; he heard the old stones
 of the castle crack in the frosty night with sharp reverberations, and
 the bed complained under his tossings.  Lastly, far on into the morning,
 he awakened from a doze to hear, very far off, in the extreme and
 breathless quiet, a wailing flourish on the horn.  The down mail was
 drawing near to the 'Green Dragon.'  He sat up in bed; the sound was
 tragical by distance, and the modulation appealed to his ear like human
 speech.  It seemed to call upon him with a dreary insistence--to call him
 far away, to address him personally, and to have a meaning that he failed
 to seize.  It was thus, at least, in this nodding castle, in a cold, miry
 woodland, and so far from men and society, that the traffic on the Great
 North Road spoke to him in the intervals of slumber.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--JONATHAN HOLDAWAY
 
 
 Nance descended the tower stair, pausing at every step.  She was in no
 hurry to confront her uncle with bad news, and she must dwell a little
 longer on the rich note of Mr. Archer's voice, the charm of his kind
 words, and the beauty of his manner and person.  But, once at the
 stair-foot, she threw aside the spell and recovered her sensible and
 workaday self.
 
 Jonathan was seated in the middle of the settle, a mug of ale beside him,
 in the attitude of one prepared for trouble; but he did not speak, and
 suffered her to fetch her supper and eat of it, with a very excellent
 appetite, in silence.  When she had done, she, too, drew a tankard of
 home-brewed, and came and planted herself in front of him upon the
 settle.
 
 'Well?' said Jonathan.
 
 'My lord has run away,' said Nance.
 
 'What?' cried the old man.
 
 'Abroad,' she continued; 'run away from creditors.  He said he had not a
 stiver, but he was drunk enough.  He said you might live on in the
 castle, and Mr. Archer would pay you; but you was to look for no more
 wages, since he would be glad of them himself.'
 
 Jonathan's face contracted; the flush of a black, bilious anger mounted
 to the roots of his hair; he gave an inarticulate cry, leapt upon his
 feet, and began rapidly pacing the stone floor.  At first he kept his
 hands behind his back in a tight knot; then he began to gesticulate as he
 turned.
 
 'This man--this lord,' he shouted, 'who is he?  He was born with a gold
 spoon in his mouth, and I with a dirty straw.  He rolled in his coach
 when he was a baby.  I have dug and toiled and laboured since I was that
 high--that high.'  And he shouted again.  'I'm bent and broke, and full
 of pains.  D' ye think I don't know the taste of sweat?  Many's the
 gallon I've drunk of it--ay, in the midwinter, toiling like a slave.  All
 through, what has my life been?  Bend, bend, bend my old creaking back
 till it would ache like breaking; wade about in the foul mire, never a
 dry stitch; empty belly, sore hands, hat off to my Lord Redface; kicks
 and ha'pence; and now, here, at the hind end, when I'm worn to my poor
 bones, a kick and done with it.'  He walked a little while in silence,
 and then, extending his hand, 'Now you, Nance Holdaway,' says he, 'you
 come of my blood, and you're a good girl.  When that man was a boy, I
 used to carry his gun for him.  I carried the gun all day on my two feet,
 and many a stitch I had, and chewed a bullet for.  He rode upon a horse,
 with feathers in his hat; but it was him that had the shots and took the
 game home.  Did I complain?  Not I.  I knew my station.  What did I ask,
 but just the chance to live and die honest?  Nance Holdaway, don't let
 them deny it to me--don't let them do it.  I've been as poor as Job, and
 as honest as the day, but now, my girl, you mark these words of mine, I'm
 getting tired of it.'
 
 'I wouldn't say such words, at least,' said Nance.
 
 'You wouldn't?' said the old man grimly.  'Well, and did I when I was
 your age?  Wait till your back's broke and your hands tremble, and your
 eyes fail, and you're weary of the battle and ask no more but to lie down
 in your bed and give the ghost up like an honest man; and then let there
 up and come some insolent, ungodly fellow--ah! if I had him in these
 hands!  "Where's my money that you gambled?" I should say.  "Where's my
 money that you drank and diced?"  "Thief!" is what I would say; "Thief!"'
 he roared, '"Thief"'
 
 'Mr. Archer will hear you if you don't take care,' said Nance, 'and I
 would be ashamed, for one, that he should hear a brave, old, honest,
 hard-working man like Jonathan Holdaway talk nonsense like a boy.'
 
 'D' ye think I mind for Mr. Archer?' he cried shrilly, with a clack of
 laughter; and then he came close up to her, stooped down with his two
 palms upon his knees, and looked her in the eyes, with a strange hard
 expression, something like a smile.  'Do I mind for God, my girl?' he
 said; 'that's what it's come to be now, do I mind for God?'
 
 'Uncle Jonathan,' she said, getting up and taking him by the arm; 'you
 sit down again, where you were sitting.  There, sit still; I'll have no
 more of this; you'll do yourself a mischief.  Come, take a drink of this
 good ale, and I'll warm a tankard for you.  La, we'll pull through,
 you'll see.  I'm young, as you say, and it's my turn to carry the bundle;
 and don't you worry your bile, or we'll have sickness, too, as well as
 sorrow.'
 
 'D' ye think that I'd forgotten you?' said Jonathan, with something like
 a groan; and thereupon his teeth clicked to, and he sat silent with the
 tankard in his hand and staring straight before him.
 
 'Why,' says Nance, setting on the ale to mull, 'men are always children,
 they say, however old; and if ever I heard a thing like this, to set to
 and make yourself sick, just when the money's failing.  Keep a good heart
 up; you haven't kept a good heart these seventy years, nigh hand, to
 break down about a pound or two.  Here's this Mr. Archer come to lodge,
 that you disliked so much.  Well, now you see it was a clear Providence.
 Come, let's think upon our mercies.  And here is the ale mulling lovely;
 smell of it; I'll take a drop myself, it smells so sweet.  And, Uncle
 Jonathan, you let me say one word.  You've lost more than money before
 now; you lost my aunt, and bore it like a man.  Bear this.'
 
 His face once more contracted; his fist doubled, and shot forth into the
 air, and trembled.  'Let them look out!' he shouted.  'Here, I warn all
 men; I've done with this foul kennel of knaves.  Let them look out!'
 
 'Hush, hush! for pity's sake,' cried Nance.
 
 And then all of a sudden he dropped his face into his hands, and broke
 out with a great hiccoughing dry sob that was horrible to hear.  'O,' he
 cried, 'my God, if my son hadn't left me, if my Dick was here!' and the
 sobs shook him; Nance sitting still and watching him, with distress.  'O,
 if he were here to help his father!' he went on again.  'If I had a son
 like other fathers, he would save me now, when all is breaking down; O,
 he would save me!  Ay, but where is he?  Raking taverns, a thief perhaps.
 My curse be on him!' he added, rising again into wrath.
 
 'Hush!' cried Nance, springing to her feet: 'your boy, your dead wife's
 boy--Aunt Susan's baby that she loved--would you curse him?  O, God
 forbid!'
 
 The energy of her address surprised him from his mood.  He looked upon
 her, tearless and confused.  'Let me go to my bed,' he said at last, and
 he rose, and, shaking as with ague, but quite silent, lighted his candle,
 and left the kitchen.
 
 Poor Nance! the pleasant current of her dreams was all diverted.  She
 beheld a golden city, where she aspired to dwell; she had spoken with a
 deity, and had told herself that she might rise to be his equal; and now
 the earthly ligaments that bound her down had been tightened.  She was
 like a tree looking skyward, her roots were in the ground.  It seemed to
 her a thing so coarse, so rustic, to be thus concerned about a loss in
 money; when Mr. Archer, fallen from the sky-level of counts and nobles,
 faced his changed destiny with so immovable a courage.  To weary of
 honesty; that, at least, no one could do, but even to name it was already
 a disgrace; and she beheld in fancy her uncle, and the young lad, all
 laced and feathered, hand upon hip, bestriding his small horse.  The
 opposition seemed to perpetuate itself from generation to generation; one
 side still doomed to the clumsy and the servile, the other born to
 beauty.
 
 She thought of the golden zones in which gentlemen were bred, and figured
 with so excellent a grace; zones in which wisdom and smooth words, white
 linen and slim hands, were the mark of the desired inhabitants; where low
 temptations were unknown, and honesty no virtue, but a thing as natural
 as breathing.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV--MINGLING THREADS
 
 
 It was nearly seven before Mr. Archer left his apartment.  On the landing
 he found another door beside his own opening on a roofless corridor, and
 presently he was walking on the top of the ruins.  On one hand he could
 look down a good depth into the green court-yard; on the other his eye
 roved along the downward course of the river, the wet woods all smoking,
 the shadows long and blue, the mists golden and rosy in the sun, here and
 there the water flashing across an obstacle.  His heart expanded and
 softened to a grateful melancholy, and with his eye fixed upon the
 distance, and no thought of present danger, he continued to stroll along
 the elevated and treacherous promenade.
 
 A terror-stricken cry rose to him from the courtyard.  He looked down,
 and saw in a glimpse Nance standing below with hands clasped in horror
 and his own foot trembling on the margin of a gulf.  He recoiled and
 leant against a pillar, quaking from head to foot, and covering his face
 with his hands; and Nance had time to run round by the stair and rejoin
 him where he stood before he had changed a line of his position.
 
 'Ah!' he cried, and clutched her wrist; 'don't leave me.  The place
 rocks; I have no head for altitudes.'
 
 'Sit down against that pillar,' said Nance.  'Don't you be afraid; I
 won't leave you, and don't look up or down: look straight at me.  How
 white you are!'
 
 'The gulf,' he said, and closed his eyes again and shuddered.
 
 'Why,' said Nance, 'what a poor climber you must be!  That was where my
 cousin Dick used to get out of the castle after Uncle Jonathan had shut
 the gate.  I've been down there myself with him helping me.  I wouldn't
 try with you,' she said, and laughed merrily.
 
 The sound of her laughter was sincere and musical, and perhaps its beauty
 barbed the offence to Mr. Archer.  The blood came into his face with a
 quick jet, and then left it paler than before.  'It is a physical
 weakness,' he said harshly, 'and very droll, no doubt, but one that I can
 conquer on necessity.  See, I am still shaking.  Well, I advance to the
 battlements and look down.  Show me your cousin's path.'
 
 'He would go sure-foot along that little ledge,' said Nance, pointing as
 she spoke; 'then out through the breach and down by yonder buttress.  It
 is easier coming back, of course, because you see where you are going.
 From the buttress foot a sheep-walk goes along the scarp--see, you can
 follow it from here in the dry grass.  And now, sir,' she added, with a
 touch of womanly pity, 'I would come away from here if I were you, for
 indeed you are not fit.'
 
 Sure enough Mr. Archer's pallor and agitation had continued to increase;
 his cheeks were deathly, his clenched fingers trembled pitifully.  'The
 weakness is physical,' he sighed, and had nearly fallen.  Nance led him
 from the spot, and he was no sooner back in the tower-stair, than he fell
 heavily against the wall and put his arm across his eyes.  A cup of
 brandy had to be brought him before he could descend to breakfast; and
 the perfection of Nance's dream was for the first time troubled.
 
 Jonathan was waiting for them at table, with yellow, blood-shot eyes and
 a peculiar dusky complexion.  He hardly waited till they found their
 seats, before, raising one hand, and stooping with his mouth above his
 plate, he put up a prayer for a blessing on the food and a spirit of
 gratitude in the eaters, and thereupon, and without more civility, fell
 to.  But it was notable that he was no less speedily satisfied than he
 had been greedy to begin.  He pushed his plate away and drummed upon the
 table.
 
 'These are silly prayers,' said he, 'that they teach us.  Eat and be
 thankful, that's no such wonder.  Speak to me of starving--there's the
 touch.  You're a man, they tell me, Mr. Archer, that has met with some
 reverses?'
 
 'I have met with many,' replied Mr. Archer.
 
 'Ha!' said Jonathan.  'None reckons but the last.  Now, see; I tried to
 make this girl here understand me.'
 
 'Uncle,' said Nance, 'what should Mr. Archer care for your concerns?  He
 hath troubles of his own, and came to be at peace, I think.'
 
 'I tried to make her understand me,' repeated Jonathan doggedly; 'and now
 I'll try you.  Do you think this world is fair?'
 
 'Fair and false!' quoth Mr. Archer.
 
 The old man laughed immoderately.  'Good,' said he, 'very good, but what
 I mean is this: do you know what it is to get up early and go to bed
 late, and never take so much as a holiday but four: and one of these your
 own marriage day, and the other three the funerals of folk you loved, and
 all that, to have a quiet old age in shelter, and bread for your old
 belly, and a bed to lay your crazy bones upon, with a clear conscience?'
 
 'Sir,' said Mr. Archer, with an inclination of his head, 'you portray a
 very brave existence.'
 
 'Well,' continued Jonathan, 'and in the end thieves deceive you, thieves
 rob and rook you, thieves turn you out in your old age and send you
 begging.  What have you got for all your honesty?  A fine return!  You
 that might have stole scores of pounds, there you are out in the rain
 with your rheumatics!'
 
 Mr. Archer had forgotten to eat; with his hand upon his chin he was
 studying the old man's countenance.  'And you conclude?' he asked.
 
 'Conclude!' cried Jonathan.  'I conclude I'll be upsides with them.'
 
 'Ay,' said the other, 'we are all tempted to revenge.'
 
 'You have lost money?' asked Jonathan.
 
 'A great estate,' said Archer quietly.
 
 'See now!' says Jonathan, 'and where is it?'
 
 'Nay, I sometimes think that every one has had his share of it but me,'
 was the reply.  'All England hath paid his taxes with my patrimony: I was
 a sheep that left my wool on every briar.'
 
 'And you sit down under that?' cried the old man.  'Come now, Mr. Archer,
 you and me belong to different stations; and I know mine--no man
 better--but since we have both been rooked, and are both sore with it,
 why, here's my hand with a very good heart, and I ask for yours, and no
 offence, I hope.'
 
 'There is surely no offence, my friend,' returned Mr. Archer, as they
 shook hands across the table; 'for, believe me, my sympathies are quite
 acquired to you.  This life is an arena where we fight with beasts; and,
 indeed,' he added, sighing, 'I sometimes marvel why we go down to it
 unarmed.'
 
 In the meanwhile a creaking of ungreased axles had been heard descending
 through the wood; and presently after, the door opened, and the tall
 ostler entered the kitchen carrying one end of Mr. Archer's trunk.  The
 other was carried by an aged beggar man of that district, known and
 welcome for some twenty miles about under the name of 'Old Cumberland.'
 Each was soon perched upon a settle, with a cup of ale; and the ostler,
 who valued himself upon his affability, began to entertain the company,
 still with half an eye on Nance, to whom in gallant terms he expressly
 dedicated every sip of ale.  First he told of the trouble they had to get
 his Lordship started in the chaise; and how he had dropped a rouleau of
 gold on the threshold, and the passage and doorstep had been strewn with
 guinea-pieces.  At this old Jonathan looked at Mr. Archer.  Next the
 visitor turned to news of a more thrilling character: how the down mail
 had been stopped again near Grantham by three men on horseback--a white
 and two bays; how they had handkerchiefs on their faces; how Tom the
 guard's blunderbuss missed fire, but he swore he had winged one of them
 with a pistol; and how they had got clean away with seventy pounds in
 money, some valuable papers, and a watch or two.
 
 'Brave! brave!' cried Jonathan in ecstasy.  'Seventy pounds!  O, it's
 brave!'
 
 'Well, I don't see the great bravery,' observed the ostler,
 misapprehending him.  'Three men, and you may call that three to one.
 I'll call it brave when some one stops the mail single-handed; that's a
 risk.'
 
 'And why should they hesitate?' inquired Mr. Archer.  'The poor souls who
 are fallen to such a way of life, pray what have they to lose?  If they
 get the money, well; but if a ball should put them from their troubles,
 why, so better.'
 
 'Well, sir,' said the ostler, 'I believe you'll find they won't agree
 with you.  They count on a good fling, you see; or who would risk
 it?--And here's my best respects to you, Miss Nance.'
 
 'And I forgot the part of cowardice,' resumed Mr. Archer.  'All men
 fear.'
 
 'O, surely not!' cried Nance.
 
 'All men,' reiterated Mr. Archer.
 
 'Ay, that's a true word,' observed Old Cumberland, 'and a thief, anyway,
 for it's a coward's trade.'
 
 'But these fellows, now,' said Jonathan, with a curious, appealing
 manner--'these fellows with their seventy pounds!  Perhaps, Mr. Archer,
 they were no true thieves after all, but just people who had been robbed
 and tried to get their own again.  What was that you said, about all
 England and the taxes?  One takes, another gives; why, that's almost
 fair.  If I've been rooked and robbed, and the coat taken off my back, I
 call it almost fair to take another's.'
 
 'Ask Old Cumberland,' observed the ostler; 'you ask Old Cumberland, Miss
 Nance!' and he bestowed a wink upon his favoured fair one.
 
 'Why that?' asked Jonathan.
 
 'He had his coat taken--ay, and his shirt too,' returned the ostler.
 
 'Is that so?' cried Jonathan eagerly.  'Was you robbed too?'
 
 'That was I,' replied Cumberland, 'with a warrant!  I was a well-to-do
 man when I was young.'
 
 'Ay!  See that!' says Jonathan.  'And you don't long for a revenge?'
 
 'Eh!  Not me!' answered the beggar.  'It's too long ago.  But if you'll
 give me another mug of your good ale, my pretty lady, I won't say no to
 that.'
 
 'And shalt have!  And shalt have!' cried Jonathan.  'Or brandy even, if
 you like it better.'
 
 And as Cumberland did like it better, and the ostler chimed in, the party
 pledged each other in a dram of brandy before separating.
 
 As for Nance, she slipped forth into the ruins, partly to avoid the
 ostler's gallantries, partly to lament over the defects of Mr. Archer.
 Plainly, he was no hero.  She pitied him; she began to feel a protecting
 interest mingle with and almost supersede her admiration, and was at the
 same time disappointed and yet drawn to him.  She was, indeed, conscious
 of such unshaken fortitude in her own heart, that she was almost tempted
 by an occasion to be bold for two.  She saw herself, in a brave attitude,
 shielding her imperfect hero from the world; and she saw, like a piece of
 heaven, his gratitude for her protection.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V--LIFE IN THE CASTLE
 
 
 From that day forth the life of these three persons in the ruin ran very
 smoothly.  Mr. Archer now sat by the fire with a book, and now passed
 whole days abroad, returning late, dead weary.  His manner was a mask;
 but it was half transparent; through the even tenor of his gravity and
 courtesy profound revolutions of feeling were betrayed, seasons of numb
 despair, of restlessness, of aching temper.  For days he would say
 nothing beyond his usual courtesies and solemn compliments; and then, all
 of a sudden, some fine evening beside the kitchen fire, he would fall
 into a vein of elegant gossip, tell of strange and interesting events,
 the secrets of families, brave deeds of war, the miraculous discovery of
 crime, the visitations of the dead.  Nance and her uncle would sit till
 the small hours with eyes wide open: Jonathan applauding the unexpected
 incidents with many a slap of his big hand; Nance, perhaps, more pleased
 with the narrator's eloquence and wise reflections; and then, again, days
 would follow of abstraction, of listless humming, of frequent apologies
 and long hours of silence.  Once only, and then after a week of
 unrelieved melancholy, he went over to the 'Green Dragon,' spent the
 afternoon with the landlord and a bowl of punch, and returned as on the
 first night, devious in step but courteous and unperturbed of speech.
 
 If he seemed more natural and more at his ease it was when he found Nance
 alone; and, laying by some of his reserve, talked before her rather than
 to her of his destiny, character and hopes.  To Nance these interviews
 were but a doubtful privilege.  At times he would seem to take a pleasure
 in her presence, to consult her gravely, to hear and to discuss her
 counsels; at times even, but these were rare and brief, he would talk of
 herself, praise the qualities that she possessed, touch indulgently on
 her defects, and lend her books to read and even examine her upon her
 reading; but far more often he would fall into a half unconsciousness,
 put her a question and then answer it himself, drop into the veiled tone
 of voice of one soliloquising, and leave her at last as though he had
 forgotten her existence.  It was odd, too, that in all this random
 converse, not a fact of his past life, and scarce a name, should ever
 cross his lips.  A profound reserve kept watch upon his most unguarded
 moments.  He spoke continually of himself, indeed, but still in enigmas;
 a veiled prophet of egoism.
 
 The base of Nance's feelings for Mr. Archer was admiration as for a
 superior being; and with this, his treatment, consciously or not,
 accorded happily.  When he forgot her, she took the blame upon herself.
 His formal politeness was so exquisite that this essential brutality
 stood excused.  His compliments, besides, were always grave and rational;
 he would offer reason for his praise, convict her of merit, and thus
 disarm suspicion.  Nay, and the very hours when he forgot and remembered
 her alternately could by the ardent fallacies of youth be read in the
 light of an attention.  She might be far from his confidence; but still
 she was nearer it than any one.  He might ignore her presence, but yet he
 sought it.
 
 Moreover, she, upon her side, was conscious of one point of superiority.
 Beside this rather dismal, rather effeminate man, who recoiled from a
 worm, who grew giddy on the castle wall, who bore so helplessly the
 weight of his misfortunes, she felt herself a head and shoulders taller
 in cheerful and sterling courage.  She could walk head in air along the
 most precarious rafter; her hand feared neither the grossness nor the
 harshness of life's web, but was thrust cheerfully, if need were, into
 the briar bush, and could take hold of any crawling horror.  Ruin was
 mining the walls of her cottage, as already it had mined and subverted
 Mr. Archer's palace.  Well, she faced it with a bright countenance and a
 busy hand.  She had got some washing, some rough seamstress work from the
 'Green Dragon,' and from another neighbour ten miles away across the
 moor.  At this she cheerfully laboured, and from that height she could
 afford to pity the useless talents and poor attitude of Mr. Archer.  It
 did not change her admiration, but it made it bearable.  He was above her
 in all ways; but she was above him in one.  She kept it to herself, and
 hugged it.  When, like all young creatures, she made long stories to
 justify, to nourish, and to forecast the course of her affection, it was
 this private superiority that made all rosy, that cut the knot, and that,
 at last, in some great situation, fetched to her knees the dazzling but
 imperfect hero.  With this pretty exercise she beguiled the hours of
 labour, and consoled herself for Mr. Archer's bearing.
 
 Pity was her weapon and her weakness.  To accept the loved one's faults,
 although it has an air of freedom, is to kiss the chain, and this pity it
 was which, lying nearer to her heart, lent the one element of true
 emotion to a fanciful and merely brain-sick love.
 
 Thus it fell out one day that she had gone to the 'Green Dragon' and
 brought back thence a letter to Mr. Archer.  He, upon seeing it, winced
 like a man under the knife: pain, shame, sorrow, and the most trenchant
 edge of mortification cut into his heart and wrung the steady composure
 of his face.
 
 'Dear heart! have you bad news?' she cried.
 
 But he only replied by a gesture and fled to his room, and when, later
 on, she ventured to refer to it, he stopped her on the threshold, as if
 with words prepared beforehand.  'There are some pains,' said he, 'too
 acute for consolation, or I would bring them to my kind consoler.  Let
 the memory of that letter, if you please, be buried.'  And then as she
 continued to gaze at him, being, in spite of herself, pained by his
 elaborate phrase, doubtfully sincere in word and manner: 'Let it be
 enough,' he added haughtily, 'that if this matter wring my heart, it doth
 not touch my conscience.  I am a man, I would have you to know, who
 suffers undeservedly.'
 
 He had never spoken so directly: never with so convincing an emotion; and
 her heart thrilled for him.  She could have taken his pains and died of
 them with joy.
 
 Meanwhile she was left without support.  Jonathan now swore by his
 lodger, and lived for him.  He was a fine talker.  He knew the finest
 sight of stories; he was a man and a gentleman, take him for all in all,
 and a perfect credit to Old England.  Such were the old man's declared
 sentiments, and sure enough he clung to Mr. Archer's side, hung upon his
 utterance when he spoke, and watched him with unwearing interest when he
 was silent.  And yet his feeling was not clear; in the partial wreck of
 his mind, which was leaning to decay, some after-thought was strongly
 present.  As he gazed in Mr. Archer's face a sudden brightness would
 kindle in his rheumy eyes, his eye-brows would lift as with a sudden
 thought, his mouth would open as though to speak, and close again on
 silence.  Once or twice he even called Mr. Archer mysteriously forth into
 the dark courtyard, took him by the button, and laid a demonstrative
 finger on his chest; but there his ideas or his courage failed him; he
 would shufflingly excuse himself and return to his position by the fire
 without a word of explanation.  'The good man was growing old,' said Mr.
 Archer with a suspicion of a shrug.  But the good man had his idea, and
 even when he was alone the name of Mr. Archer fell from his lips
 continually in the course of mumbled and gesticulative conversation.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI--THE BAD HALF-CROWN
 
 
 However early Nance arose, and she was no sluggard, the old man, who had
 begun to outlive the earthly habit of slumber, would usually have been up
 long before, the fire would be burning brightly, and she would see him
 wandering among the ruins, lantern in hand, and talking assiduously to
 himself.  One day, however, after he had returned late from the market
 town, she found that she had stolen a march upon that indefatigable early
 riser.  The kitchen was all blackness.  She crossed the castle-yard to
 the wood-cellar, her steps printing the thick hoarfrost.  A scathing
 breeze blew out of the north-east and slowly carried a regiment of black
 and tattered clouds over the face of heaven, which was already kindled
 with the wild light of morning, but where she walked, in shelter of the
 ruins, the flame of her candle burned steady.  The extreme cold smote
 upon her conscience.  She could not bear to think this bitter business
 fell usually to the lot of one so old as Jonathan, and made desperate
 resolutions to be earlier in the future.
 
 The fire was a good blaze before he entered, limping dismally into the
 kitchen.  'Nance,' said he, 'I be all knotted up with the rheumatics;
 will you rub me a bit?'  She came and rubbed him where and how he bade
 her.  'This is a cruel thing that old age should be rheumaticky,' said
 he.  'When I was young I stood my turn of the teethache like a man! for
 why? because it couldn't last for ever; but these rheumatics come to live
 and die with you.  Your aunt was took before the time came; never had an
 ache to mention.  Now I lie all night in my single bed and the blood
 never warms in me; this knee of mine it seems like lighted up with
 rheumatics; it seems as though you could see to sew by it; and all the
 strings of my old body ache, as if devils was pulling 'em.  Thank you
 kindly; that's someways easier now, but an old man, my dear, has little
 to look for; it's pain, pain, pain to the end of the business, and I'll
 never be rightly warm again till I get under the sod,' he said, and
 looked down at her with a face so aged and weary that she had nearly
 wept.
 
 'I lay awake all night,' he continued; 'I do so mostly, and a long walk
 kills me.  Eh, deary me, to think that life should run to such a puddle!
 And I remember long syne when I was strong, and the blood all hot and
 good about me, and I loved to run, too--deary me, to run!  Well, that's
 all by.  You'd better pray to be took early, Nance, and not live on till
 you get to be like me, and are robbed in your grey old age, your cold,
 shivering, dark old age, that's like a winter's morning'; and he bitterly
 shuddered, spreading his hands before the fire.
 
 'Come now,' said Nance, 'the more you say the less you'll like it, Uncle
 Jonathan; but if I were you I would be proud for to have lived all your
 days honest and beloved, and come near the end with your good name: isn't
 that a fine thing to be proud of?  Mr. Archer was telling me in some
 strange land they used to run races each with a lighted candle, and the
 art was to keep the candle burning.  Well, now, I thought that was like
 life: a man's good conscience is the flame he gets to carry, and if he
 comes to the winning-post with that still burning, why, take it how you
 will, the man's a hero--even if he was low-born like you and me.'
 
 'Did Mr. Archer tell you that?' asked Jonathan.
 
 'No, dear,' said she, 'that's my own thought about it.  He told me of the
 race.  But see, now,' she continued, putting on the porridge, 'you say
 old age is a hard season, but so is youth.  You're half out of the
 battle, I would say; you loved my aunt and got her, and buried her, and
 some of these days soon you'll go to meet her; and take her my love and
 tell her I tried to take good care of you; for so I do, Uncle Jonathan.'
 
 Jonathan struck with his fist upon the settle.  'D' ye think I want to
 die, ye vixen?' he shouted.  'I want to live ten hundred years.'
 
 This was a mystery beyond Nance's penetration, and she stared in wonder
 as she made the porridge.
 
 'I want to live,' he continued, 'I want to live and to grow rich.  I want
 to drive my carriage and to dice in hells and see the ring, I do.  Is
 this a life that I lived?  I want to be a rake, d' ye understand?  I want
 to know what things are like.  I don't want to die like a blind kitten,
 and me seventy-six.'
 
 'O fie!' said Nance.
 
 The old man thrust out his jaw at her, with the grimace of an irreverent
 schoolboy.  Upon that aged face it seemed a blasphemy.  Then he took out
 of his bosom a long leather purse, and emptying its contents on the
 settle, began to count and recount the pieces, ringing and examining
 each, and suddenly he leapt like a young man.  'What!' he screamed.
 'Bad?  O Lord!  I'm robbed again!'  And falling on his knees before the
 settle he began to pour forth the most dreadful curses on the head of his
 deceiver.  His eyes were shut, for to him this vile solemnity was prayer.
 He held up the bad half-crown in his right hand, as though he were
 displaying it to Heaven, and what increased the horror of the scene, the
 curses he invoked were those whose efficacy he had tasted--old age and
 poverty, rheumatism and an ungrateful son.  Nance listened appalled; then
 she sprang forward and dragged down his arm and laid her hand upon his
 mouth.
 
 'Whist!' she cried.  'Whist ye, for God's sake!  O my man, whist ye!  If
 Heaven were to hear; if poor Aunt Susan were to hear!  Think, she may be
 listening.'  And with the histrionism of strong emotion she pointed to a
 corner of the kitchen.
 
 His eyes followed her finger.  He looked there for a little, thinking,
 blinking; then he got stiffly to his feet and resumed his place upon the
 settle, the bad piece still in his hand.  So he sat for some time,
 looking upon the half-crown, and now wondering to himself on the
 injustice and partiality of the law, now computing again and again the
 nature of his loss.  So he was still sitting when Mr. Archer entered the
 kitchen.  At this a light came into his face, and after some seconds of
 rumination he dispatched Nance upon an errand.
 
 'Mr. Archer,' said he, as soon as they were alone together, 'would you
 give me a guinea-piece for silver?'
 
 'Why, sir, I believe I can,' said Mr. Archer.
 
 And the exchange was just effected when Nance re-entered the apartment.
 The blood shot into her face.
 
 'What's to do here?' she asked rudely.
 
 'Nothing, my dearie,' said old Jonathan, with a touch of whine.
 
 'What's to do?' she said again.
 
 'Your uncle was but changing me a piece of gold,' returned Mr. Archer.
 
 'Let me see what he hath given you, Mr. Archer,' replied the girl.  'I
 had a bad piece, and I fear it is mixed up among the good.'
 
 'Well, well,' replied Mr. Archer, smiling, 'I must take the merchant's
 risk of it.  The money is now mixed.'
 
 'I know my piece,' quoth Nance.  'Come, let me see your silver, Mr.
 Archer.  If I have to get it by a theft I'll see that money,' she cried.
 
 'Nay, child, if you put as much passion to be honest as the world to
 steal, I must give way, though I betray myself,' said Mr. Archer.  'There
 it is as I received it.'
 
 Nance quickly found the bad half-crown.
 
 'Give him another,' she said, looking Jonathan in the face; and when that
 had been done, she walked over to the chimney and flung the guilty piece
 into the reddest of the fire.  Its base constituents began immediately to
 run; even as she watched it the disc crumbled, and the lineaments of the
 King became confused.  Jonathan, who had followed close behind, beheld
 these changes from over her shoulder, and his face darkened sorely.
 
 'Now,' said she, 'come back to table, and to-day it is I that shall say
 grace, as I used to do in the old times, day about with Dick'; and
 covering her eyes with one hand, 'O Lord,' said she with deep emotion,
 'make us thankful; and, O Lord, deliver us from evil!  For the love of
 the poor souls that watch for us in heaven, O deliver us from evil.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII--THE BLEACHING-GREEN
 
 
 The year moved on to March; and March, though it blew bitter keen from
 the North Sea, yet blinked kindly between whiles on the river dell.  The
 mire dried up in the closest covert; life ran in the bare branches, and
 the air of the afternoon would be suddenly sweet with the fragrance of
 new grass.
 
 Above and below the castle the river crooked like the letter 'S.'  The
 lower loop was to the left, and embraced the high and steep projection
 which was crowned by the ruins; the upper loop enclosed a lawny
 promontory, fringed by thorn and willow.  It was easy to reach it from
 the castle side, for the river ran in this part very quietly among
 innumerable boulders and over dam-like walls of rock.  The place was all
 enclosed, the wind a stranger, the turf smooth and solid; so it was
 chosen by Nance to be her bleaching-green.
 
 One day she brought a bucketful of linen, and had but begun to wring and
 lay them out when Mr. Archer stepped from the thicket on the far side,
 drew very deliberately near, and sat down in silence on the grass.  Nance
 looked up to greet him with a smile, but finding her smile was not
 returned, she fell into embarrassment and stuck the more busily to her
 employment.  Man or woman, the whole world looks well at any work to
 which they are accustomed; but the girl was ashamed of what she did.  She
 was ashamed, besides, of the sun-bonnet that so well became her, and
 ashamed of her bare arms, which were her greatest beauty.
 
 'Nausicaa,' said Mr. Archer at last, 'I find you like Nausicaa.'
 
 'And who was she?' asked Nance, and laughed in spite of herself, an empty
 and embarrassed laugh, that sounded in Mr. Archer's ears, indeed, like
 music, but to her own like the last grossness of rusticity.
 
 'She was a princess of the Grecian islands,' he replied.  'A king, being
 shipwrecked, found her washing by the shore.  Certainly I, too, was
 shipwrecked,' he continued, plucking at the grass.  'There was never a
 more desperate castaway--to fall from polite life, fortune, a shrine of
 honour, a grateful conscience, duties willingly taken up and faithfully
 discharged; and to fall to this--idleness, poverty, inutility, remorse.'
 He seemed to have forgotten her presence, but here he remembered her
 again.  'Nance,' said he, 'would you have a man sit down and suffer or
 rise up and strive?'
 
 'Nay,' she said.  'I would always rather see him doing.'
 
 'Ha!' said Mr. Archer, 'but yet you speak from an imperfect knowledge.
 Conceive a man damned to a choice of only evil--misconduct upon either
 side, not a fault behind him, and yet naught before him but this choice
 of sins.  How would you say then?'
 
 'I would say that he was much deceived, Mr. Archer,' returned Nance.  'I
 would say there was a third choice, and that the right one.'
 
 'I tell you,' said Mr. Archer, 'the man I have in view hath two ways
 open, and no more.  One to wait, like a poor mewling baby, till Fate save
 or ruin him; the other to take his troubles in his hand, and to perish or
 be saved at once.  It is no point of morals; both are wrong.  Either way
 this step-child of Providence must fall; which shall he choose, by doing
 or not doing?'
 
 'Fall, then, is what I would say,' replied Nance.  'Fall where you will,
 but do it!  For O, Mr. Archer,' she continued, stooping to her work, 'you
 that are good and kind, and so wise, it doth sometimes go against my
 heart to see you live on here like a sheep in a turnip-field!  If you
 were braver--' and here she paused, conscience-smitten.
 
 'Do I, indeed, lack courage?' inquired Mr. Archer of himself.  'Courage,
 the footstool of the virtues, upon which they stand?  Courage, that a
 poor private carrying a musket has to spare of; that does not fail a
 weasel or a rat; that is a brutish faculty?  I to fail there, I wonder?
 But what is courage, then?  The constancy to endure oneself or to see
 others suffer?  The itch of ill-advised activity: mere
 shuttle-wittedness, or to be still and patient?  To inquire of the
 significance of words is to rob ourselves of what we seem to know, and
 yet, of all things, certainly to stand still is the least heroic.
 Nance,' he said, 'did you ever hear of _Hamlet_?'
 
 'Never,' said Nance.
 
 ''Tis an old play,' returned Mr. Archer, 'and frequently enacted.  This
 while I have been talking Hamlet.  You must know this Hamlet was a Prince
 among the Danes,' and he told her the play in a very good style, here and
 there quoting a verse or two with solemn emphasis.
 
 'It is strange,' said Nance; 'he was then a very poor creature?'
 
 'That was what he could not tell,' said Mr. Archer.  'Look at me, am I as
 poor a creature?'
 
 She looked, and what she saw was the familiar thought of all her hours;
 the tall figure very plainly habited in black, the spotless ruffles, the
 slim hands; the long, well-shapen, serious, shaven face, the wide and
 somewhat thin-lipped mouth, the dark eyes that were so full of depth and
 change and colour.  He was gazing at her with his brows a little knit,
 his chin upon one hand and that elbow resting on his knee.
 
 'Ye look a man!' she cried, 'ay, and should be a great one!  The more
 shame to you to lie here idle like a dog before the fire.'
 
 'My fair Holdaway,' quoth Mr. Archer, 'you are much set on action.  I
 cannot dig, to beg I am ashamed.'  He continued, looking at her with a
 half-absent fixity, ''Tis a strange thing, certainly, that in my years of
 fortune I should never taste happiness, and now when I am broke, enjoy so
 much of it, for was I ever happier than to-day?  Was the grass softer,
 the stream pleasanter in sound, the air milder, the heart more at peace?
 Why should I not sink?  To dig--why, after all, it should be easy.  To
 take a mate, too?  Love is of all grades since Jupiter; love fails to
 none; and children'--but here he passed his hand suddenly over his eyes.
 'O fool and coward, fool and coward!' he said bitterly; 'can you forget
 your fetters?  You did not know that I was fettered, Nance?' he asked,
 again addressing her.
 
 But Nance was somewhat sore.  'I know you keep talking,' she said, and,
 turning half away from him, began to wring out a sheet across her
 shoulder.  'I wonder you are not wearied of your voice.  When the hands
 lie abed the tongue takes a walk.'
 
 Mr. Archer laughed unpleasantly, rose and moved to the water's edge.  In
 this part the body of the river poured across a little narrow fell, ran
 some ten feet very smoothly over a bed of pebbles, then getting wind, as
 it were, of another shelf of rock which barred the channel, began, by
 imperceptible degrees, to separate towards either shore in dancing
 currents, and to leave the middle clear and stagnant.  The set towards
 either side was nearly equal; about one half of the whole water plunged
 on the side of the castle, through a narrow gullet; about one half ran
 ripping past the margin of the green and slipped across a babbling rapid.
 
 'Here,' said Mr. Archer, after he had looked for some time at the fine
 and shifting demarcation of these currents, 'come here and see me try my
 fortune.'
 
 'I am not like a man,' said Nance; 'I have no time to waste.'
 
 'Come here,' he said again.  'I ask you seriously, Nance.  We are not
 always childish when we seem so.'
 
 She drew a little nearer.
 
 'Now,' said he, 'you see these two channels--choose one.'
 
 'I'll choose the nearest, to save time,' said Nance.
 
 'Well, that shall be for action,' returned Mr. Archer.  'And since I wish
 to have the odds against me, not only the other channel but yon stagnant
 water in the midst shall be for lying still.  You see this?' he
 continued, pulling up a withered rush.  'I break it in three.  I shall
 put each separately at the top of the upper fall, and according as they
 go by your way or by the other I shall guide my life.'
 
 'This is very silly,' said Nance, with a movement of her shoulders.
 
 'I do not think it so,' said Mr. Archer.
 
 'And then,' she resumed, 'if you are to try your fortune, why not
 evenly?'
 
 'Nay,' returned Mr. Archer with a smile, 'no man can put complete
 reliance in blind fate; he must still cog the dice.'
 
 By this time he had got upon the rock beside the upper fall, and, bidding
 her look out, dropped a piece of rush into the middle of the intake.  The
 rusty fragment was sucked at once over the fall, came up again far on the
 right hand, leaned ever more and more in the same direction, and
 disappeared under the hanging grasses on the castle side.
 
 'One,' said Mr. Archer, 'one for standing still.'
 
 But the next launch had a different fate, and after hanging for a while
 about the edge of the stagnant water, steadily approached the
 bleaching-green and danced down the rapid under Nance's eyes.
 
 'One for me,' she cried with some exultation; and then she observed that
 Mr. Archer had grown pale, and was kneeling on the rock, with his hand
 raised like a person petrified.  'Why,' said she, 'you do not mind it, do
 you?'
 
 'Does a man not mind a throw of dice by which a fortune hangs?' said Mr.
 Archer, rather hoarsely.  'And this is more than fortune.  Nance, if you
 have any kindness for my fate, put up a prayer before I launch the next
 one.'
 
 'A prayer,' she cried, 'about a game like this?  I would not be so
 heathen.'
 
 'Well,' said he, 'then without,' and he closed his eyes and dropped the
 piece of rush.  This time there was no doubt.  It went for the rapid as
 straight as any arrow.
 
 'Action then!' said Mr. Archer, getting to his feet; 'and then God
 forgive us,' he added, almost to himself.
 
 'God forgive us, indeed,' cried Nance, 'for wasting the good daylight!
 But come, Mr. Archer, if I see you look so serious I shall begin to think
 you was in earnest.'
 
 'Nay,' he said, turning upon her suddenly, with a full smile; 'but is not
 this good advice?  I have consulted God and demigod; the nymph of the
 river, and what I far more admire and trust, my blue-eyed Minerva.  Both
 have said the same.  My own heart was telling it already.  Action, then,
 be mine; and into the deep sea with all this paralysing casuistry.  I am
 happy to-day for the first time.'
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII--THE MAIL GUARD
 
 
 Somewhere about two in the morning a squall had burst upon the castle, a
 clap of screaming wind that made the towers rock, and a copious drift of
 rain that streamed from the windows.  The wind soon blew itself out, but
 the day broke cloudy and dripping, and when the little party assembled at
 breakfast their humours appeared to have changed with the change of
 weather.  Nance had been brooding on the scene at the river-side,
 applying it in various ways to her particular aspirations, and the
 result, which was hardly to her mind, had taken the colour out of her
 cheeks.  Mr. Archer, too, was somewhat absent, his thoughts were of a
 mingled strain; and even upon his usually impassive countenance there
 were betrayed successive depths of depression and starts of exultation,
 which the girl translated in terms of her own hopes and fears.  But
 Jonathan was the most altered: he was strangely silent, hardly passing a
 word, and watched Mr. Archer with an eager and furtive eye.  It seemed as
 if the idea that had so long hovered before him had now taken a more
 solid shape, and, while it still attracted, somewhat alarmed his
 imagination.
 
 At this rate, conversation languished into a silence which was only
 broken by the gentle and ghostly noises of the rain on the stone roof and
 about all that field of ruins; and they were all relieved when the note
 of a man whistling and the sound of approaching footsteps in the grassy
 court announced a visitor.  It was the ostler from the 'Green Dragon'
 bringing a letter for Mr. Archer.  Nance saw her hero's face contract and
 then relax again at sight of it; and she thought that she knew why, for
 the sprawling, gross black characters of the address were easily
 distinguishable from the fine writing on the former letter that had so
 much disturbed him.  He opened it and began to read; while the ostler sat
 down to table with a pot of ale, and proceeded to make himself agreeable
 after his fashion.
 
 'Fine doings down our way, Miss Nance,' said he.  'I haven't been abed
 this blessed night.'
 
 Nance expressed a polite interest, but her eye was on Mr. Archer, who was
 reading his letter with a face of such extreme indifference that she was
 tempted to suspect him of assumption.
 
 'Yes,' continued the ostler, 'not been the like of it this fifteen years:
 the North Mail stopped at the three stones.'
 
 Jonathan's cup was at his lip, but at this moment he choked with a great
 splutter; and Mr. Archer, as if startled by the noise, made so sudden a
 movement that one corner of the sheet tore off and stayed between his
 finger and thumb.  It was some little time before the old man was
 sufficiently recovered to beg the ostler to go on, and he still kept
 coughing and crying and rubbing his eyes.  Mr. Archer, on his side, laid
 the letter down, and, putting his hands in his pocket, listened gravely
 to the tale.
 
 'Yes,' resumed Sam, 'the North Mail was stopped by a single horseman;
 dash my wig, but I admire him!  There were four insides and two out, and
 poor Tom Oglethorpe, the guard.  Tom showed himself a man; let fly his
 blunderbuss at him; had him covered, too, and could swear to that; but
 the Captain never let on, up with a pistol and fetched poor Tom a bullet
 through the body.  Tom, he squelched upon the seat, all over blood.  Up
 comes the Captain to the window.  "Oblige me," says he, "with what you
 have."  Would you believe it?  Not a man says cheep!--not them.  "Thy
 hands over thy head."  Four watches, rings, snuff-boxes, seven-and-forty
 pounds overhead in gold.  One Dicksee, a grazier, tries it on: gives him
 a guinea.  "Beg your pardon," says the Captain, "I think too highly of
 you to take it at your hand.  I will not take less than ten from such a
 gentleman."  This Dicksee had his money in his stocking, but there was
 the pistol at his eye.  Down he goes, offs with his stocking, and there
 was thirty golden guineas.  "Now," says the Captain, "you've tried it on
 with me, but I scorns the advantage.  Ten I said," he says, "and ten I
 take."  So, dash my buttons, I call that man a man!' cried Sam in cordial
 admiration.
 
 'Well, and then?' says Mr. Archer.
 
 'Then,' resumed Sam, 'that old fat fagot Engleton, him as held the
 ribbons and drew up like a lamb when he was told to, picks up his cattle,
 and drives off again.  Down they came to the "Dragon," all singing like
 as if they was scalded, and poor Tom saying nothing.  You would 'a'
 thought they had all lost the King's crown to hear them.  Down gets this
 Dicksee.  "Postmaster," he says, taking him by the arm, "this is a most
 abominable thing," he says.  Down gets a Major Clayton, and gets the old
 man by the other arm.  "We've been robbed," he cries, "robbed!"  Down
 gets the others, and all around the old man telling their story, and what
 they had lost, and how they was all as good as ruined; till at last Old
 Engleton says, says he, "How about Oglethorpe?" says he.  "Ay," says the
 others, "how about the guard?"  Well, with that we bousted him down, as
 white as a rag and all blooded like a sop.  I thought he was dead.  Well,
 he ain't dead; but he's dying, I fancy.'
 
 'Did you say four watches?' said Jonathan.
 
 'Four, I think.  I wish it had been forty,' cried Sam.  'Such a party of
 soused herrings I never did see--not a man among them bar poor Tom.  But
 us that are the servants on the road have all the risk and none of the
 profit.'
 
 'And this brave fellow,' asked Mr. Archer, very quietly, 'this
 Oglethorpe--how is he now?'
 
 'Well, sir, with my respects, I take it he has a hole bang through him,'
 said Sam.  'The doctor hasn't been yet.  He'd 'a' been bright and early
 if it had been a passenger.  But, doctor or no, I'll make a good guess
 that Tom won't see to-morrow.  He'll die on a Sunday, will poor Tom; and
 they do say that's fortunate.'
 
 'Did Tom see him that did it?' asked Jonathan.
 
 'Well, he saw him,' replied Sam, 'but not to swear by.  Said he was a
 very tall man, and very big, and had a 'ankerchief about his face, and a
 very quick shot, and sat his horse like a thorough gentleman, as he is.'
 
 'A gentleman!' cried Nance.  'The dirty knave!'
 
 'Well, I calls a man like that a gentleman,' returned the ostler; 'that's
 what I mean by a gentleman.'
 
 'You don't know much of them, then,' said Nance.
 
 'A gentleman would scorn to stoop to such a thing.  I call my uncle a
 better gentleman than any thief.'
 
 'And you would be right,' said Mr. Archer.
 
 'How many snuff-boxes did he get?' asked Jonathan.
 
 'O, dang me if I know,' said Sam; 'I didn't take an inventory.'
 
 'I will go back with you, if you please,' said Mr. Archer.  'I should
 like to see poor Oglethorpe.  He has behaved well.'
 
 'At your service, sir,' said Sam, jumping to his feet.  'I dare to say a
 gentleman like you would not forget a poor fellow like Tom--no, nor a
 plain man like me, sir, that went without his sleep to nurse him.  And
 excuse me, sir,' added Sam, 'you won't forget about the letter neither?'
 
 'Surely not,' said Mr. Archer.
 
 Oglethorpe lay in a low bed, one of several in a long garret of the inn.
 The rain soaked in places through the roof and fell in minute drops;
 there was but one small window; the beds were occupied by servants, the
 air of the garret was both close and chilly.  Mr. Archer's heart sank at
 the threshold to see a man lying perhaps mortally hurt in so poor a
 sick-room, and as he drew near the low bed he took his hat off.  The
 guard was a big, blowsy, innocent-looking soul with a thick lip and a
 broad nose, comically turned up; his cheeks were crimson, and when Mr.
 Archer laid a finger on his brow he found him burning with fever.
 
 'I fear you suffer much,' he said, with a catch in his voice, as he sat
 down on the bedside.
 
 'I suppose I do, sir,' returned Oglethorpe; 'it is main sore.'
 
 'I am used to wounds and wounded men,' returned the visitor.  'I have
 been in the wars and nursed brave fellows before now; and, if you will
 suffer me, I propose to stay beside you till the doctor comes.'
 
 'It is very good of you, sir, I am sure,' said Oglethorpe.  'The trouble
 is they won't none of them let me drink.'
 
 'If you will not tell the doctor,' said Mr. Archer, 'I will give you some
 water.  They say it is bad for a green wound, but in the Low Countries we
 all drank water when we found the chance, and I could never perceive we
 were the worse for it.'
 
 'Been wounded yourself, sir, perhaps?' called Oglethorpe.
 
 'Twice,' said Mr. Archer, 'and was as proud of these hurts as any lady of
 her bracelets.  'Tis a fine thing to smart for one's duty; even in the
 pangs of it there is contentment.'
 
 'Ah, well!' replied the guard, 'if you've been shot yourself, that
 explains.  But as for contentment, why, sir, you see, it smarts, as you
 say.  And then, I have a good wife, you see, and a bit of a brat--a
 little thing, so high.'
 
 'Don't move,' said Mr. Archer.
 
 'No, sir, I will not, and thank you kindly,' said Oglethorpe.  'At York
 they are.  A very good lass is my wife--far too good for me.  And the
 little rascal--well, I don't know how to say it, but he sort of comes
 round you.  If I were to go, sir, it would be hard on my poor girl--main
 hard on her!'
 
 'Ay, you must feel bitter hardly to the rogue that laid you here,' said
 Archer.
 
 'Why, no, sir, more against Engleton and the passengers,' replied the
 guard.  'He played his hand, if you come to look at it; and I wish he had
 shot worse, or me better.  And yet I'll go to my grave but what I covered
 him,' he cried.  'It looks like witchcraft.  I'll go to my grave but what
 he was drove full of slugs like a pepper-box.'
 
 'Quietly,' said Mr. Archer, 'you must not excite yourself.  These
 deceptions are very usual in war; the eye, in the moment of alert, is
 hardly to be trusted, and when the smoke blows away you see the man you
 fired at, taking aim, it may be, at yourself.  You should observe, too,
 that you were in the dark night, and somewhat dazzled by the lamps, and
 that the sudden stopping of the mail had jolted you.  In such
 circumstances a man may miss, ay, even with a blunder-buss, and no blame
 attach to his marksmanship.' . . .
 
 
 
 
 THE YOUNG CHEVALIER
 
 
 PROLOGUE--THE WINE-SELLER'S WIFE
 
 
 There was a wine-seller's shop, as you went down to the river in the city
 of the Anti-popes.  There a man was served with good wine of the country
 and plain country fare; and the place being clean and quiet, with a
 prospect on the river, certain gentlemen who dwelt in that city in
 attendance on a great personage made it a practice (when they had any
 silver in their purses) to come and eat there and be private.
 
 They called the wine-seller Paradou.  He was built more like a bullock
 than a man, huge in bone and brawn, high in colour, and with a hand like
 a baby for size.  Marie-Madeleine was the name of his wife; she was of
 Marseilles, a city of entrancing women, nor was any fairer than herself.
 She was tall, being almost of a height with Paradou; full-girdled,
 point-device in every form, with an exquisite delicacy in the face; her
 nose and nostrils a delight to look at from the fineness of the
 sculpture, her eyes inclined a hair's-breadth inward, her colour between
 dark and fair, and laid on even like a flower's.  A faint rose dwelt in
 it, as though she had been found unawares bathing, and had blushed from
 head to foot.  She was of a grave countenance, rarely smiling; yet it
 seemed to be written upon every part of her that she rejoiced in life.
 Her husband loved the heels of her feet and the knuckles of her fingers;
 he loved her like a glutton and a brute; his love hung about her like an
 atmosphere; one that came by chance into the wine-shop was aware of that
 passion; and it might be said that by the strength of it the woman had
 been drugged or spell-bound.  She knew not if she loved or loathed him;
 he was always in her eyes like something monstrous--monstrous in his
 love, monstrous in his person, horrific but imposing in his violence; and
 her sentiment swung back and forward from desire to sickness.  But the
 mean, where it dwelt chiefly, was an apathetic fascination, partly of
 horror; as of Europa in mid ocean with her bull.
 
 On the 10th November 1749 there sat two of the foreign gentlemen in the
 wine-seller's shop.  They were both handsome men of a good presence,
 richly dressed.  The first was swarthy and long and lean, with an alert,
 black look, and a mole upon his cheek.  The other was more fair.  He
 seemed very easy and sedate, and a little melancholy for so young a man,
 but his smile was charming.  In his grey eyes there was much abstraction,
 as of one recalling fondly that which was past and lost.  Yet there was
 strength and swiftness in his limbs; and his mouth set straight across
 his face, the under lip a thought upon side, like that of a man
 accustomed to resolve.  These two talked together in a rude outlandish
 speech that no frequenter of that wine-shop understood.  The swarthy man
 answered to the name of _Ballantrae_; he of the dreamy eyes was sometimes
 called _Balmile_, and sometimes _my Lord_, or _my Lord Gladsmuir_; but
 when the title was given him, he seemed to put it by as if in jesting,
 not without bitterness.
 
 The mistral blew in the city.  The first day of that wind, they say in
 the countries where its voice is heard, it blows away all the dust, the
 second all the stones, and the third it blows back others from the
 mountains.  It was now come to the third day; outside the pebbles flew
 like hail, and the face of the river was puckered, and the very
 building-stones in the walls of houses seemed to be curdled with the
 savage cold and fury of that continuous blast.  It could be heard to hoot
 in all the chimneys of the city; it swept about the wine-shop, filling
 the room with eddies; the chill and gritty touch of it passed between the
 nearest clothes and the bare flesh; and the two gentlemen at the far
 table kept their mantles loose about their shoulders.  The roughness of
 these outer hulls, for they were plain travellers' cloaks that had seen
 service, set the greater mark of richness on what showed below of their
 laced clothes; for the one was in scarlet and the other in violet and
 white, like men come from a scene of ceremony; as indeed they were.
 
 It chanced that these fine clothes were not without their influence on
 the scene which followed, and which makes the prologue of our tale.  For
 a long time Balmile was in the habit to come to the wine-shop and eat a
 meal or drink a measure of wine; sometimes with a comrade; more often
 alone, when he would sit and dream and drum upon the table, and the
 thoughts would show in the man's face in little glooms and lightenings,
 like the sun and the clouds upon a water.  For a long time
 Marie-Madeleine had observed him apart.  His sadness, the beauty of his
 smile when by any chance he remembered her existence and addressed her,
 the changes of his mind signalled forth by an abstruse play of feature,
 the mere fact that he was foreign and a thing detached from the local and
 the accustomed, insensibly attracted and affected her.  Kindness was
 ready in her mind; it but lacked the touch of an occasion to effervesce
 and crystallise.  Now Balmile had come hitherto in a very poor plain
 habit; and this day of the mistral, when his mantle was just open, and
 she saw beneath it the glancing of the violet and the velvet and the
 silver, and the clustering fineness of the lace, it seemed to set the man
 in a new light, with which he shone resplendent to her fancy.
 
 The high inhuman note of the wind, the violence and continuity of its
 outpouring, and the fierce touch of it upon man's whole periphery,
 accelerated the functions of the mind.  It set thoughts whirling, as it
 whirled the trees of the forest; it stirred them up in flights, as it
 stirred up the dust in chambers.  As brief as sparks, the fancies
 glittered and succeeded each other in the mind of Marie-Madeleine; and
 the grave man with the smile, and the bright clothes under the plain
 mantle, haunted her with incongruous explanations.  She considered him,
 the unknown, the speaker of an unknown tongue, the hero (as she placed
 him) of an unknown romance, the dweller upon unknown memories.  She
 recalled him sitting there alone, so immersed, so stupefied; yet she was
 sure he was not stupid.  She recalled one day when he had remained a long
 time motionless, with parted lips, like one in the act of starting up,
 his eyes fixed on vacancy.  Any one else must have looked foolish; but
 not he.  She tried to conceive what manner of memory had thus entranced
 him; she forged for him a past; she showed him to herself in every light
 of heroism and greatness and misfortune; she brooded with petulant
 intensity on all she knew and guessed of him.  Yet, though she was
 already gone so deep, she was still unashamed, still unalarmed; her
 thoughts were still disinterested; she had still to reach the stage at
 which--beside the image of that other whom we love to contemplate and to
 adorn--we place the image of ourself and behold them together with
 delight.
 
 She stood within the counter, her hands clasped behind her back, her
 shoulders pressed against the wall, her feet braced out.  Her face was
 bright with the wind and her own thoughts; as a fire in a similar day of
 tempest glows and brightens on a hearth, so she seemed to glow, standing
 there, and to breathe out energy.  It was the first time Ballantrae had
 visited that wine-seller's, the first time he had seen the wife; and his
 eyes were true to her.
 
 'I perceive your reason for carrying me to this very draughty tavern,' he
 said at last.
 
 'I believe it is propinquity,' returned Balmile.
 
 'You play dark,' said Ballantrae, 'but have a care!  Be more frank with
 me, or I will cut you out.  I go through no form of qualifying my threat,
 which would be commonplace and not conscientious.  There is only one
 point in these campaigns: that is the degree of admiration offered by the
 man; and to our hostess I am in a posture to make victorious love.'
 
 'If you think you have the time, or the game worth the candle,' replied
 the other with a shrug.
 
 'One would suppose you were never at the pains to observe her,' said
 Ballantrae.
 
 'I am not very observant,' said Balmile.  'She seems comely.'
 
 'You very dear and dull dog!' cried Ballantrae; 'chastity is the most
 besotting of the virtues.  Why, she has a look in her face beyond
 singing!  I believe, if you was to push me hard, I might trace it home to
 a trifle of a squint.  What matters?  The height of beauty is in the
 touch that's wrong, that's the modulation in a tune.  'Tis the devil we
 all love; I owe many a conquest to my mole'--he touched it as he spoke
 with a smile, and his eyes glittered;--'we are all hunchbacks, and beauty
 is only that kind of deformity that I happen to admire.  But come!
 Because you are chaste, for which I am sure I pay you my respects, that
 is no reason why you should be blind.  Look at her, look at the delicious
 nose of her, look at her cheek, look at her ear, look at her hand and
 wrist--look at the whole baggage from heels to crown, and tell me if she
 wouldn't melt on a man's tongue.'
 
 As Ballantrae spoke, half jesting, half enthusiastic, Balmile was
 constrained to do as he was bidden.  He looked at the woman, admired her
 excellences, and was at the same time ashamed for himself and his
 companion.  So it befell that when Marie-Madeleine raised her eyes, she
 met those of the subject of her contemplations fixed directly on herself
 with a look that is unmistakable, the look of a person measuring and
 valuing another--and, to clench the false impression, that his glance was
 instantly and guiltily withdrawn.  The blood beat back upon her heart and
 leaped again; her obscure thoughts flashed clear before her; she flew in
 fancy straight to his arms like a wanton, and fled again on the instant
 like a nymph.  And at that moment there chanced an interruption, which
 not only spared her embarrassment, but set the last consecration on her
 now articulate love.
 
 Into the wine-shop there came a French gentleman, arrayed in the last
 refinement of the fashion, though a little tumbled by his passage in the
 wind.  It was to be judged he had come from the same formal gathering at
 which the others had preceded him; and perhaps that he had gone there in
 the hope to meet with them, for he came up to Ballantrae with
 unceremonious eagerness.
 
 'At last, here you are!' he cried in French.  'I thought I was to miss
 you altogether.'
 
 The Scotsmen rose, and Ballantrae, after the first greetings, laid his
 hand on his companion's shoulder.
 
 'My lord,' said he, 'allow me to present to you one of my best friends
 and one of our best soldiers, the Lord Viscount Gladsmuir.'
 
 The two bowed with the elaborate elegance of the period.
 
 '_Monseigneur_,' said Balmile, '_je n'ai pas la pretention de m'affubler
 d'un titre que la mauvaise fortune de mon roi ne me permet pas de porter
 comma il sied_.  _Je m'appelle_, _pour vous servir_, _Blair de Balmile
 tout court_.'  [My lord, I have not the effrontery to cumber myself with
 a title which the ill fortunes of my king will not suffer me to bear the
 way it should be.  I call myself, at your service, plain Blair of
 Balmile.]
 
 '_Monsieur le Vicomte ou monsieur Bler' de Balmail_,' replied the
 newcomer, '_le nom n'y fait rien_, _et l'on connait vos beaux faits_.'
 [The name matters nothing, your gallant actions are known.]
 
 A few more ceremonies, and these three, sitting down together to the
 table, called for wine.  It was the happiness of Marie-Madeleine to wait
 unobserved upon the prince of her desires.  She poured the wine, he drank
 of it; and that link between them seemed to her, for the moment, close as
 a caress.  Though they lowered their tones, she surprised great names
 passing in their conversation, names of kings, the names of de Gesvre and
 Belle-Isle; and the man who dealt in these high matters, and she who was
 now coupled with him in her own thoughts, seemed to swim in mid air in a
 transfiguration.  Love is a crude core, but it has singular and
 far-reaching fringes; in that passionate attraction for the stranger that
 now swayed and mastered her, his harsh incomprehensible language, and
 these names of grandees in his talk, were each an element.
 
 The Frenchman stayed not long, but it was plain he left behind him matter
 of much interest to his companions; they spoke together earnestly, their
 heads down, the woman of the wine-shop totally forgotten; and they were
 still so occupied when Paradou returned.
 
 This man's love was unsleeping.  The even bluster of the mistral, with
 which he had been combating some hours, had not suspended, though it had
 embittered, that predominant passion.  His first look was for his wife, a
 look of hope and suspicion, menace and humility and love, that made the
 over-blooming brute appear for the moment almost beautiful.  She returned
 his glance, at first as though she knew him not, then with a swiftly
 waxing coldness of intent; and at last, without changing their direction,
 she had closed her eyes.
 
 There passed across her mind during that period much that Paradou could
 not have understood had it been told to him in words: chiefly the sense
 of an enlightening contrast betwixt the man who talked of kings and the
 man who kept a wine-shop, betwixt the love she yearned for and that to
 which she had been long exposed like a victim bound upon the altar.
 There swelled upon her, swifter than the Rhone, a tide of abhorrence and
 disgust.  She had succumbed to the monster, humbling herself below
 animals; and now she loved a hero, aspiring to the semi-divine.  It was
 in the pang of that humiliating thought that she had closed her eyes.
 
 Paradou--quick as beasts are quick, to translate silence--felt the insult
 through his blood; his inarticulate soul bellowed within him for revenge.
 He glanced about the shop.  He saw the two indifferent gentlemen deep in
 talk, and passed them over: his fancy flying not so high.  There was but
 one other present, a country lout who stood swallowing his wine, equally
 unobserved by all and unobserving--to him he dealt a glance of murderous
 suspicion, and turned direct upon his wife.  The wine-shop had lain
 hitherto, a space of shelter, the scene of a few ceremonial passages and
 some whispered conversation, in the howling river of the wind; the clock
 had not yet ticked a score of times since Paradou's appearance; and now,
 as he suddenly gave tongue, it seemed as though the mistral had entered
 at his heels.
 
 'What ails you, woman?' he cried, smiting on the counter.
 
 'Nothing ails me,' she replied.  It was strange; but she spoke and stood
 at that moment like a lady of degree, drawn upward by her aspirations.
 
 'You speak to me, by God, as though you scorned me!' cried the husband.
 
 The man's passion was always formidable; she had often looked on upon its
 violence with a thrill, it had been one ingredient in her fascination;
 and she was now surprised to behold him, as from afar off, gesticulating
 but impotent.  His fury might be dangerous like a torrent or a gust of
 wind, but it was inhuman; it might be feared or braved, it should never
 be respected.  And with that there came in her a sudden glow of courage
 and that readiness to die which attends so closely upon all strong
 passions.
 
 'I do scorn you,' she said.
 
 'What is that?' he cried.
 
 'I scorn you,' she repeated, smiling.
 
 'You love another man!' said he.
 
 'With all my soul,' was her reply.
 
 The wine-seller roared aloud so that the house rang and shook with it.
 
 'Is this the--?' he cried, using a foul word, common in the South; and he
 seized the young countryman and dashed him to the ground.  There he lay
 for the least interval of time insensible; thence fled from the house,
 the most terrified person in the county.  The heavy measure had escaped
 from his hands, splashing the wine high upon the wall.  Paradou caught
 it.  'And you?' he roared to his wife, giving her the same name in the
 feminine, and he aimed at her the deadly missile.  She expected it,
 motionless, with radiant eyes.
 
 But before it sped, Paradou was met by another adversary, and the
 unconscious rivals stood confronted.  It was hard to say at that moment
 which appeared the more formidable.  In Paradou, the whole muddy and
 truculent depths of the half-man were stirred to frenzy; the lust of
 destruction raged in him; there was not a feature in his face but it
 talked murder.  Balmile had dropped his cloak: he shone out at once in
 his finery, and stood to his full stature; girt in mind and body all his
 resources, all his temper, perfectly in command in his face the light of
 battle.  Neither spoke; there was no blow nor threat of one; it was war
 reduced to its last element, the spiritual; and the huge wine-seller
 slowly lowered his weapon.  Balmile was a noble, he a commoner; Balmile
 exulted in an honourable cause.  Paradou already perhaps began to be
 ashamed of his violence.  Of a sudden, at least, the tortured brute
 turned and fled from the shop in the footsteps of his former victim, to
 whose continued flight his reappearance added wings.
 
 So soon as Balmile appeared between her husband and herself,
 Marie-Madeleine transferred to him her eyes.  It might be her last
 moment, and she fed upon that face; reading there inimitable courage and
 illimitable valour to protect.  And when the momentary peril was gone by,
 and the champion turned a little awkwardly towards her whom he had
 rescued, it was to meet, and quail before, a gaze of admiration more
 distinct than words.  He bowed, he stammered, his words failed him; he
 who had crossed the floor a moment ago, like a young god, to smite,
 returned like one discomfited; got somehow to his place by the table,
 muffled himself again in his discarded cloak, and for a last touch of the
 ridiculous, seeking for anything to restore his countenance, drank of the
 wine before him, deep as a porter after a heavy lift.  It was little
 wonder if Ballantrae, reading the scene with malevolent eyes, laughed out
 loud and brief, and drank with raised glass, 'To the champion of the
 Fair.'
 
 Marie-Madeleine stood in her old place within the counter; she disdained
 the mocking laughter; it fell on her ears, but it did not reach her
 spirit.  For her, the world of living persons was all resumed again into
 one pair, as in the days of Eden; there was but the one end in life, the
 one hope before her, the one thing needful, the one thing possible--to be
 his.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I--THE PRINCE
 
 
 That same night there was in the city of Avignon a young man in distress
 of mind.  Now he sat, now walked in a high apartment, full of draughts
 and shadows.  A single candle made the darkness visible; and the light
 scarce sufficed to show upon the wall, where they had been recently and
 rudely nailed, a few miniatures and a copper medal of the young man's
 head.  The same was being sold that year in London, to admiring
 thousands.  The original was fair; he had beautiful brown eyes, a
 beautiful bright open face; a little feminine, a little hard, a little
 weak; still full of the light of youth, but already beginning to be
 vulgarised; a sordid bloom come upon it, the lines coarsened with a touch
 of puffiness.  He was dressed, as for a gala, in peach-colour and silver;
 his breast sparkled with stars and was bright with ribbons; for he had
 held a levee in the afternoon and received a distinguished personage
 incognito.  Now he sat with a bowed head, now walked precipitately to and
 fro, now went and gazed from the uncurtained window, where the wind was
 still blowing, and the lights winked in the darkness.
 
 The bells of Avignon rose into song as he was gazing; and the high notes
 and the deep tossed and drowned, boomed suddenly near or were suddenly
 swallowed up, in the current of the mistral.  Tears sprang in the pale
 blue eyes; the expression of his face was changed to that of a more
 active misery, it seemed as if the voices of the bells reached, and
 touched and pained him, in a waste of vacancy where even pain was
 welcome.  Outside in the night they continued to sound on, swelling and
 fainting; and the listener heard in his memory, as it were their
 harmonies, joy-bells clashing in a northern city, and the acclamations of
 a multitude, the cries of battle, the gross voices of cannon, the stridor
 of an animated life.  And then all died away, and he stood face to face
 with himself in the waste of vacancy, and a horror came upon his mind,
 and a faintness on his brain, such as seizes men upon the brink of
 cliffs.
 
 On the table, by the side of the candle, stood a tray of glasses, a
 bottle, and a silver bell.  He went thither swiftly, then his hand
 lowered first above the bell, then settled on the bottle.  Slowly he
 filled a glass, slowly drank it out; and, as a tide of animal warmth
 recomforted the recesses of his nature, stood there smiling at himself.
 He remembered he was young; the funeral curtains rose, and he saw his
 life shine and broaden and flow out majestically, like a river sunward.
 The smile still on his lips, he lit a second candle and a third; a fire
 stood ready built in a chimney, he lit that also; and the fir-cones and
 the gnarled olive billets were swift to break in flame and to crackle on
 the hearth, and the room brightened and enlarged about him like his
 hopes.  To and fro, to and fro, he went, his hands lightly clasped, his
 breath deeply and pleasurably taken.  Victory walked with him; he marched
 to crowns and empires among shouting followers; glory was his dress.  And
 presently again the shadows closed upon the solitary.  Under the gilt of
 flame and candle-light, the stone walls of the apartment showed down bare
 and cold; behind the depicted triumph loomed up the actual failure:
 defeat, the long distress of the flight, exile, despair, broken
 followers, mourning faces, empty pockets, friends estranged.  The memory
 of his father rose in his mind: he, too, estranged and defied; despair
 sharpened into wrath.  There was one who had led armies in the field, who
 had staked his life upon the family enterprise, a man of action and
 experience, of the open air, the camp, the court, the council-room; and
 he was to accept direction from an old, pompous gentleman in a home in
 Italy, and buzzed about by priests?  A pretty king, if he had not a
 martial son to lean upon!  A king at all?
 
 'There was a weaver (of all people) joined me at St. Ninians; he was more
 of a man than my papa!' he thought.  'I saw him lie doubled in his blood
 and a grenadier below him--and he died for my papa!  All died for him, or
 risked the dying, and I lay for him all those months in the rain and
 skulked in heather like a fox; and now he writes me his advice! calls me
 Carluccio--me, the man of the house, the only king in that king's race.'
 He ground his teeth.  'The only king in Europe!'  Who else?  Who has done
 and suffered except me? who has lain and run and hidden with his faithful
 subjects, like a second Bruce?  Not my accursed cousin, Louis of France,
 at least, the lewd effeminate traitor!'  And filling the glass to the
 brim, he drank a king's damnation.  Ah, if he had the power of Louis,
 what a king were here!
 
 The minutes followed each other into the past, and still he persevered in
 this debilitating cycle of emotions, still fed the fire of his excitement
 with driblets of Rhine wine: a boy at odds with life, a boy with a spark
 of the heroic, which he was now burning out and drowning down in futile
 reverie and solitary excess.
 
 From two rooms beyond, the sudden sound of a raised voice attracted him.
 
 'By . . .
 
 
 
 
 HEATHERCAT
 
 
 CHAPTER I--TRAQUAIRS OF MONTROYMONT
 
 
 The period of this tale is in the heat of the _killing-time_; the scene
 laid for the most part in solitary hills and morasses, haunted only by
 the so-called Mountain Wanderers, the dragoons that came in chase of
 them, the women that wept on their dead bodies, and the wild birds of the
 moorland that have cried there since the beginning.  It is a land of many
 rain-clouds; a land of much mute history, written there in prehistoric
 symbols.  Strange green raths are to be seen commonly in the country,
 above all by the kirkyards; barrows of the dead, standing stones; beside
 these, the faint, durable footprints and handmarks of the Roman; and an
 antiquity older perhaps than any, and still living and active--a complete
 Celtic nomenclature and a scarce-mingled Celtic population.  These rugged
 and grey hills were once included in the boundaries of the Caledonian
 Forest.  Merlin sat here below his apple-tree and lamented Gwendolen;
 here spoke with Kentigern; here fell into his enchanted trance.  And the
 legend of his slumber seems to body forth the story of that Celtic race,
 deprived for so many centuries of their authentic speech, surviving with
 their ancestral inheritance of melancholy perversity and patient,
 unfortunate courage.
 
 The Traquairs of Montroymont (_Mons Romanus_, as the erudite expound it)
 had long held their seat about the head-waters of the Dule and in the
 back parts of the moorland parish of Balweary.  For two hundred years
 they had enjoyed in these upland quarters a certain decency (almost to be
 named distinction) of repute; and the annals of their house, or what is
 remembered of them, were obscure and bloody.  Ninian Traquair was
 'cruallie slochtered' by the Crozers at the kirk-door of Balweary, anno
 1482.  Francis killed Simon Ruthven of Drumshoreland, anno 1540; bought
 letters of slayers at the widow and heir, and, by a barbarous form of
 compounding, married (without tocher) Simon's daughter Grizzel, which is
 the way the Traquairs and Ruthvens came first to an intermarriage.  About
 the last Traquair and Ruthven marriage, it is the business of this book,
 among many other things, to tell.
 
 The Traquairs were always strong for the Covenant; for the King also, but
 the Covenant first; and it began to be ill days for Montroymont when the
 Bishops came in and the dragoons at the heels of them.  Ninian (then
 laird) was an anxious husband of himself and the property, as the times
 required, and it may be said of him, that he lost both.  He was heavily
 suspected of the Pentland Hills rebellion.  When it came the length of
 Bothwell Brig, he stood his trial before the Secret Council, and was
 convicted of talking with some insurgents by the wayside, the subject of
 the conversation not very clearly appearing, and of the reset and
 maintenance of one Gale, a gardener man, who was seen before Bothwell
 with a musket, and afterwards, for a continuance of months, delved the
 garden at Montroymont.  Matters went very ill with Ninian at the Council;
 some of the lords were clear for treason; and even the boot was talked
 of.  But he was spared that torture; and at last, having pretty good
 friendship among great men, he came off with a fine of seven thousand
 marks, that caused the estate to groan.  In this case, as in so many
 others, it was the wife that made the trouble.  She was a great keeper of
 conventicles; would ride ten miles to one, and when she was fined,
 rejoiced greatly to suffer for the Kirk; but it was rather her husband
 that suffered.  She had their only son, Francis, baptized privately by
 the hands of Mr. Kidd; there was that much the more to pay for!  She
 could neither be driven nor wiled into the parish kirk; as for taking the
 sacrament at the hands of any Episcopalian curate, and tenfold more at
 those of Curate Haddo, there was nothing further from her purposes; and
 Montroymont had to put his hand in his pocket month by month and year by
 year.  Once, indeed, the little lady was cast in prison, and the laird,
 worthy, heavy, uninterested man, had to ride up and take her place; from
 which he was not discharged under nine months and a sharp fine.  It
 scarce seemed she had any gratitude to him; she came out of gaol herself,
 and plunged immediately deeper in conventicles, resetting recusants, and
 all her old, expensive folly, only with greater vigour and openness,
 because Montroymont was safe in the Tolbooth and she had no witness to
 consider.  When he was liberated and came back, with his fingers singed,
 in December 1680, and late in the black night, my lady was from home.  He
 came into the house at his alighting, with a riding-rod yet in his hand;
 and, on the servant-maid telling him, caught her by the scruff of the
 neck, beat her violently, flung her down in the passageway, and went
 upstairs to his bed fasting and without a light.  It was three in the
 morning when my lady returned from that conventicle, and, hearing of the
 assault (because the maid had sat up for her, weeping), went to their
 common chamber with a lantern in hand and stamping with her shoes so as
 to wake the dead; it was supposed, by those that heard her, from a design
 to have it out with the good man at once.  The house-servants gathered on
 the stair, because it was a main interest with them to know which of
 these two was the better horse; and for the space of two hours they were
 heard to go at the matter, hammer and tongs.  Montroymont alleged he was
 at the end of possibilities; it was no longer within his power to pay the
 annual rents; she had served him basely by keeping conventicles while he
 lay in prison for her sake; his friends were weary, and there was nothing
 else before him but the entire loss of the family lands, and to begin
 life again by the wayside as a common beggar.  She took him up very sharp
 and high: called upon him, if he were a Christian? and which he most
 considered, the loss of a few dirty, miry glebes, or of his soul?
 Presently he was heard to weep, and my lady's voice to go on continually
 like a running burn, only the words indistinguishable; whereupon it was
 supposed a victory for her ladyship, and the domestics took themselves to
 bed.  The next day Traquair appeared like a man who had gone under the
 harrows; and his lady wife thenceforward continued in her old course
 without the least deflection.
 
 Thenceforward Ninian went on his way without complaint, and suffered his
 wife to go on hers without remonstrance.  He still minded his estate, of
 which it might be said he took daily a fresh farewell, and counted it
 already lost; looking ruefully on the acres and the graves of his
 fathers, on the moorlands where the wild-fowl consorted, the low,
 gurgling pool of the trout, and the high, windy place of the calling
 curlews--things that were yet his for the day and would be another's
 to-morrow; coming back again, and sitting ciphering till the dusk at his
 approaching ruin, which no device of arithmetic could postpone beyond a
 year or two.  He was essentially the simple ancient man, the farmer and
 landholder; he would have been content to watch the seasons come and go,
 and his cattle increase, until the limit of age; he would have been
 content at any time to die, if he could have left the estates
 undiminished to an heir-male of his ancestors, that duty standing first
 in his instinctive calendar.  And now he saw everywhere the image of the
 new proprietor come to meet him, and go sowing and reaping, or fowling
 for his pleasure on the red moors, or eating the very gooseberries in the
 Place garden; and saw always, on the other hand, the figure of Francis go
 forth, a beggar, into the broad world.
 
 It was in vain the poor gentleman sought to moderate; took every test and
 took advantage of every indulgence; went and drank with the dragoons in
 Balweary; attended the communion and came regularly to the church to
 Curate Haddo, with his son beside him.  The mad, raging, Presbyterian
 zealot of a wife at home made all of no avail; and indeed the house must
 have fallen years before if it had not been for the secret indulgence of
 the curate, who had a great sympathy with the laird, and winked hard at
 the doings in Montroymont.  This curate was a man very ill reputed in the
 countryside, and indeed in all Scotland.  'Infamous Haddo' is Shield's
 expression.  But Patrick Walker is more copious.  'Curate Hall Haddo,'
 says he, _sub voce_ Peden, 'or _Hell_ Haddo, as he was more justly to be
 called, a pokeful of old condemned errors and the filthy vile lusts of
 the flesh, a published whore-monger, a common gross drunkard, continually
 and godlessly scraping and skirling on a fiddle, continually breathing
 flames against the remnant of Israel.  But the Lord put an end to his
 piping, and all these offences were composed into one bloody grave.'  No
 doubt this was written to excuse his slaughter; and I have never heard it
 claimed for Walker that he was either a just witness or an indulgent
 judge.  At least, in a merely human character, Haddo comes off not wholly
 amiss in the matter of these Traquairs: not that he showed any graces of
 the Christian, but had a sort of Pagan decency, which might almost tempt
 one to be concerned about his sudden, violent, and unprepared fate.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II--FRANCIE
 
 
 Francie was eleven years old, shy, secret, and rather childish of his
 age, though not backward in schooling, which had been pushed on far by a
 private governor, one M'Brair, a forfeited minister harboured in that
 capacity at Montroymont.  The boy, already much employed in secret by his
 mother, was the most apt hand conceivable to run upon a message, to carry
 food to lurking fugitives, or to stand sentry on the skyline above a
 conventicle.  It seemed no place on the moorlands was so naked but what
 he would find cover there; and as he knew every hag, boulder, and
 heather-bush in a circuit of seven miles about Montroymont, there was
 scarce any spot but what he could leave or approach it unseen.  This
 dexterity had won him a reputation in that part of the country; and among
 the many children employed in these dangerous affairs, he passed under
 the by-name of Heathercat.
 
 How much his father knew of this employment might be doubted.  He took
 much forethought for the boy's future, seeing he was like to be left so
 poorly, and would sometimes assist at his lessons, sighing heavily,
 yawning deep, and now and again patting Francie on the shoulder if he
 seemed to be doing ill, by way of a private, kind encouragement.  But a
 great part of the day was passed in aimless wanderings with his eyes
 sealed, or in his cabinet sitting bemused over the particulars of the
 coming bankruptcy; and the boy would be absent a dozen times for once
 that his father would observe it.
 
 On 2nd of July 1682 the boy had an errand from his mother, which must be
 kept private from all, the father included in the first of them.
 Crossing the braes, he hears the clatter of a horse's shoes, and claps
 down incontinent in a hag by the wayside.  And presently he spied his
 father come riding from one direction, and Curate Haddo walking from
 another; and Montroymont leaning down from the saddle, and Haddo getting
 on his toes (for he was a little, ruddy, bald-pated man, more like a
 dwarf), they greeted kindly, and came to a halt within two fathoms of the
 child.
 
 'Montroymont,' the curate said, 'the deil's in 't but I'll have to
 denunciate your leddy again.'
 
 'Deil's in 't indeed!' says the laird.
 
 'Man! can ye no induce her to come to the kirk?' pursues Haddo; 'or to a
 communion at the least of it?  For the conventicles, let be! and the same
 for yon solemn fule, M'Brair: I can blink at them.  But she's got to come
 to the kirk, Montroymont.'
 
 'Dinna speak of it,' says the laird.  'I can do nothing with her.'
 
 'Couldn't ye try the stick to her? it works wonders whiles,' suggested
 Haddo.  'No?  I'm wae to hear it.  And I suppose ye ken where you're
 going?'
 
 'Fine!' said Montroymont.  'Fine do I ken where: bankrup'cy and the Bass
 Rock!'
 
 'Praise to my bones that I never married!' cried the curate.  'Well, it's
 a grievous thing to me to see an auld house dung down that was here
 before Flodden Field.  But naebody can say it was with my wish.'
 
 'No more they can, Haddo!' says the laird.  'A good friend ye've been to
 me, first and last.  I can give you that character with a clear
 conscience.'
 
 Whereupon they separated, and Montroymont rode briskly down into the Dule
 Valley.  But of the curate Francis was not to be quit so easily.  He went
 on with his little, brisk steps to the corner of a dyke, and stopped and
 whistled and waved upon a lassie that was herding cattle there.  This
 Janet M'Clour was a big lass, being taller than the curate; and what made
 her look the more so, she was kilted very high.  It seemed for a while
 she would not come, and Francie heard her calling Haddo a 'daft auld
 fule,' and saw her running and dodging him among the whins and hags till
 he was fairly blown.  But at the last he gets a bottle from his
 plaid-neuk and holds it up to her; whereupon she came at once into a
 composition, and the pair sat, drinking of the bottle, and daffing and
 laughing together, on a mound of heather.  The boy had scarce heard of
 these vanities, or he might have been minded of a nymph and satyr, if
 anybody could have taken long-leggit Janet for a nymph.  But they seemed
 to be huge friends, he thought; and was the more surprised, when the
 curate had taken his leave, to see the lassie fling stones after him with
 screeches of laughter, and Haddo turn about and caper, and shake his
 staff at her, and laugh louder than herself.  A wonderful merry pair,
 they seemed; and when Francie had crawled out of the hag, he had a great
 deal to consider in his mind.  It was possible they were all fallen in
 error about Mr. Haddo, he reflected--having seen him so tender with
 Montroymont, and so kind and playful with the lass Janet; and he had a
 temptation to go out of his road and question her herself upon the
 matter.  But he had a strong spirit of duty on him; and plodded on
 instead over the braes till he came near the House of Cairngorm.  There,
 in a hollow place by the burnside that was shaded by some birks, he was
 aware of a barefoot boy, perhaps a matter of three years older than
 himself.  The two approached with the precautions of a pair of strange
 dogs, looking at each other queerly.
 
 'It's ill weather on the hills,' said the stranger, giving the watchword.
 
 'For a season,' said Francie, 'but the Lord will appear.'
 
 'Richt,' said the barefoot boy; 'wha're ye frae?'
 
 'The Leddy Montroymont,' says Francie.
 
 'Ha'e, then!' says the stranger, and handed him a folded paper, and they
 stood and looked at each other again.  'It's unco het,' said the boy.
 
 'Dooms het,' says Francie.
 
 'What do they ca' ye?' says the other.
 
 'Francie,' says he.  'I'm young Montroymont.  They ca' me Heathercat.'
 
 'I'm Jock Crozer,' said the boy.  And there was another pause, while each
 rolled a stone under his foot.
 
 'Cast your jaiket and I'll fecht ye for a bawbee,' cried the elder boy
 with sudden violence, and dramatically throwing back his jacket.
 
 'Na, I've nae time the now,' said Francie, with a sharp thrill of alarm,
 because Crozer was much the heavier boy.
 
 'Ye're feared.  Heathercat indeed!' said Crozer, for among this infantile
 army of spies and messengers, the fame of Crozer had gone forth and was
 resented by his rivals.  And with that they separated.
 
 On his way home Francie was a good deal occupied with the recollection of
 this untoward incident.  The challenge had been fairly offered and basely
 refused: the tale would be carried all over the country, and the lustre
 of the name of Heathercat be dimmed.  But the scene between Curate Haddo
 and Janet M'Clour had also given him much to think of: and he was still
 puzzling over the case of the curate, and why such ill words were said of
 him, and why, if he were so merry-spirited, he should yet preach so dry,
 when coming over a knowe, whom should he see but Janet, sitting with her
 back to him, minding her cattle!  He was always a great child for secret,
 stealthy ways, having been employed by his mother on errands when the
 same was necessary; and he came behind the lass without her hearing.
 
 'Jennet,' says he.
 
 'Keep me,' cries Janet, springing up.  'O, it's you, Maister Francie!
 Save us, what a fricht ye gied me.'
 
 'Ay, it's me,' said Francie.  'I've been thinking, Jennet; I saw you and
 the curate a while back--'
 
 'Brat!' cried Janet, and coloured up crimson; and the one moment made as
 if she would have stricken him with a ragged stick she had to chase her
 bestial with, and the next was begging and praying that he would mention
 it to none.  It was 'naebody's business, whatever,' she said; 'it would
 just start a clash in the country'; and there would be nothing left for
 her but to drown herself in Dule Water.
 
 'Why?' says Francie.
 
 The girl looked at him and grew scarlet again.
 
 'And it isna that, anyway,' continued Francie.  'It was just that he
 seemed so good to ye--like our Father in heaven, I thought; and I thought
 that mebbe, perhaps, we had all been wrong about him from the first.  But
 I'll have to tell Mr. M'Brair; I'm under a kind of a bargain to him to
 tell him all.'
 
 'Tell it to the divil if ye like for me!' cried the lass.  'I've naething
 to be ashamed of.  Tell M'Brair to mind his ain affairs,' she cried
 again: 'they'll be hot eneugh for him, if Haddie likes!'  And so strode
 off, shoving her beasts before her, and ever and again looking back and
 crying angry words to the boy, where he stood mystified.
 
 By the time he had got home his mind was made up that he would say
 nothing to his mother.  My Lady Montroymont was in the keeping-room,
 reading a godly book; she was a wonderful frail little wife to make so
 much noise in the world and be able to steer about that patient sheep her
 husband; her eyes were like sloes, the fingers of her hands were like
 tobacco-pipe shanks, her mouth shut tight like a trap; and even when she
 was the most serious, and still more when she was angry, there hung about
 her face the terrifying semblance of a smile.
 
 'Have ye gotten the billet, Francie said she; and when he had handed it
 over, and she had read and burned it, 'Did you see anybody?' she asked.
 
 'I saw the laird,' said Francie.
 
 'He didna see you, though?' asked his mother.
 
 'Deil a fear,' from Francie.
 
 'Francie!' she cried.  'What's that I hear? an aith?  The Lord forgive
 me, have I broughten forth a brand for the burning, a fagot for
 hell-fire?'
 
 'I'm very sorry, ma'am,' said Francie.  'I humbly beg the Lord's pardon,
 and yours, for my wickedness.'
 
 'H'm,' grunted the lady.  'Did ye see nobody else?'
 
 'No, ma'am,' said Francie, with the face of an angel, 'except Jock
 Crozer, that gied me the billet.'
 
 'Jock Crozer!' cried the lady.  'I'll Crozer them!  Crozers indeed!  What
 next?  Are we to repose the lives of a suffering remnant in Crozers?  The
 whole clan of them wants hanging, and if I had my way of it, they wouldna
 want it long.  Are you aware, sir, that these Crozers killed your
 forebear at the kirk-door?'
 
 'You see, he was bigger 'n me,' said Francie.
 
 'Jock Crozer!' continued the lady.  'That'll be Clement's son, the
 biggest thief and reiver in the country-side.  To trust a note to him!
 But I'll give the benefit of my opinions to Lady Whitecross when we two
 forgather.  Let her look to herself!  I have no patience with
 half-hearted carlines, that complies on the Lord's day morning with the
 kirk, and comes taigling the same night to the conventicle.  The one or
 the other! is what I say: hell or heaven--Haddie's abominations or the
 pure word of God dreeping from the lips of Mr. Arnot,
 
     '"Like honey from the honeycomb
        That dreepeth, sweeter far."'
 
 My lady was now fairly launched, and that upon two congenial subjects:
 the deficiencies of the Lady Whitecross and the turpitudes of the whole
 Crozer race--which, indeed, had never been conspicuous for
 respectability.  She pursued the pair of them for twenty minutes on the
 clock with wonderful animation and detail, something of the pulpit
 manner, and the spirit of one possessed.  'O hellish compliance!' she
 exclaimed.  'I would not suffer a complier to break bread with Christian
 folk.  Of all the sins of this day there is not one so God-defying, so
 Christ-humiliating, as damnable compliance': the boy standing before her
 meanwhile, and brokenly pursuing other thoughts, mainly of Haddo and
 Janet, and Jock Crozer stripping off his jacket.  And yet, with all his
 distraction, it might be argued that he heard too much: his father and
 himself being 'compliers'--that is to say, attending the church of the
 parish as the law required.
 
 Presently, the lady's passion beginning to decline, or her flux of ill
 words to be exhausted, she dismissed her audience.  Francie bowed low,
 left the room, closed the door behind him: and then turned him about in
 the passage-way, and with a low voice, but a prodigious deal of
 sentiment, repeated the name of the evil one twenty times over, to the
 end of which, for the greater efficacy, he tacked on 'damnable' and
 'hellish.'  _Fas est ab hoste doceri_--disrespect is made more pungent by
 quotation; and there is no doubt but he felt relieved, and went upstairs
 into his tutor's chamber with a quiet mind.  M'Brair sat by the cheek of
 the peat-fire and shivered, for he had a quartan ague and this was his
 day.  The great night-cap and plaid, the dark unshaven cheeks of the man,
 and the white, thin hands that held the plaid about his chittering body,
 made a sorrowful picture.  But Francie knew and loved him; came straight
 in, nestled close to the refugee, and told his story.  M'Brair had been
 at the College with Haddo; the Presbytery had licensed both on the same
 day; and at this tale, told with so much innocency by the boy, the heart
 of the tutor was commoved.
 
 'Woe upon him!  Woe upon that man!' he cried.  'O the unfaithful
 shepherd!  O the hireling and apostate minister!  Make my matters hot for
 me? quo' she! the shameless limmer!  And true it is, that he could repose
 me in that nasty, stinking hole, the Canongate Tolbooth, from which your
 mother drew me out--the Lord reward her for it!--or to that cold,
 unbieldy, marine place of the Bass Rock, which, with my delicate kist,
 would be fair ruin to me.  But I will be valiant in my Master's service.
 I have a duty here: a duty to my God, to myself, and to Haddo: in His
 strength, I will perform it.'
 
 Then he straitly discharged Francie to repeat the tale, and bade him in
 the future to avert his very eyes from the doings of the curate.  'You
 must go to his place of idolatry; look upon him there!' says he, 'but
 nowhere else.  Avert your eyes, close your ears, pass him by like a three
 days' corp.  He is like that damnable monster Basiliscus, which
 defiles--yea, poisons!--by the sight.'--All which was hardly claratory to
 the boy's mind.
 
 Presently Montroymont came home, and called up the stairs to Francie.
 Traquair was a good shot and swordsman: and it was his pleasure to walk
 with his son over the braes of the moorfowl, or to teach him arms in the
 back court, when they made a mighty comely pair, the child being so lean,
 and light, and active, and the laird himself a man of a manly, pretty
 stature, his hair (the periwig being laid aside) showing already white
 with many anxieties, and his face of an even, flaccid red.  But this day
 Francie's heart was not in the fencing.
 
 'Sir,' says he, suddenly lowering his point, 'will ye tell me a thing if
 I was to ask it?'
 
 'Ask away,' says the father.
 
 'Well, it's this,' said Francie: 'Why do you and me comply if it's so
 wicked?'
 
 'Ay, ye have the cant of it too!' cries Montroymont.  'But I'll tell ye
 for all that.  It's to try and see if we can keep the rigging on this
 house, Francie.  If she had her way, we would be beggar-folk, and hold
 our hands out by the wayside.  When ye hear her--when ye hear folk,' he
 corrected himself briskly, 'call me a coward, and one that betrayed the
 Lord, and I kenna what else, just mind it was to keep a bed to ye to
 sleep in and a bite for ye to eat.--On guard!' he cried, and the lesson
 proceeded again till they were called to supper.
 
 'There's another thing yet,' said Francie, stopping his father.  'There's
 another thing that I am not sure that I am very caring for.  She--she
 sends me errands.'
 
 'Obey her, then, as is your bounden duty,' said Traquair.
 
 'Ay, but wait till I tell ye,' says the boy.  'If I was to see you I was
 to hide.'
 
 Montroymont sighed.  'Well, and that's good of her too,' said he.  'The
 less that I ken of thir doings the better for me; and the best thing you
 can do is just to obey her, and see and be a good son to her, the same as
 ye are to me, Francie.'
 
 At the tenderness of this expression the heart of Francie swelled within
 his bosom, and his remorse was poured out.  'Faither!' he cried, 'I said
 "deil" to-day; many's the time I said it, and _damnable_ too, and
 _hellitsh_.  I ken they're all right; they're beeblical.  But I didna say
 them beeblically; I said them for sweir words--that's the truth of it.'
 
 'Hout, ye silly bairn!' said the father, 'dinna do it nae mair, and come
 in by to your supper.'  And he took the boy, and drew him close to him a
 moment, as they went through the door, with something very fond and
 secret, like a caress between a pair of lovers.
 
 The next day M'Brair was abroad in the afternoon, and had a long advising
 with Janet on the braes where she herded cattle.  What passed was never
 wholly known; but the lass wept bitterly, and fell on her knees to him
 among the whins.  The same night, as soon as it was dark, he took the
 road again for Balweary.  In the Kirkton, where the dragoons quartered,
 he saw many lights, and heard the noise of a ranting song and people
 laughing grossly, which was highly offensive to his mind.  He gave it the
 wider berth, keeping among fields; and came down at last by the
 water-side, where the manse stands solitary between the river and the
 road.  He tapped at the back door, and the old woman called upon him to
 come in, and guided him through the house to the study, as they still
 called it, though there was little enough study there in Haddo's days,
 and more song-books than theology.
 
 'Here's yin to speak wi' ye, Mr. Haddie!' cries the old wife.
 
 And M'Brair, opening the door and entering, found the little, round, red
 man seated in one chair and his feet upon another.  A clear fire and a
 tallow dip lighted him barely.  He was taking tobacco in a pipe, and
 smiling to himself; and a brandy-bottle and glass, and his fiddle and
 bow, were beside him on the table.
 
 'Hech, Patey M'Briar, is this you?' said he, a trifle tipsily.  'Step in
 by, man, and have a drop brandy: for the stomach's sake!  Even the deil
 can quote Scripture--eh, Patey?'
 
 'I will neither eat nor drink with you,' replied M'Brair.  'I am come
 upon my Master's errand: woe be upon me if I should anyways mince the
 same.  Hall Haddo, I summon you to quit this kirk which you encumber.'
 
 'Muckle obleeged!' says Haddo, winking.
 
 'You and me have been to kirk and market together,' pursued M'Brair; 'we
 have had blessed seasons in the kirk, we have sat in the same
 teaching-rooms and read in the same book; and I know you still retain for
 me some carnal kindness.  It would be my shame if I denied it; I live
 here at your mercy and by your favour, and glory to acknowledge it.  You
 have pity on my wretched body, which is but grass, and must soon be
 trodden under: but O, Haddo! how much greater is the yearning with which
 I yearn after and pity your immortal soul!  Come now, let us reason
 together!  I drop all points of controversy, weighty though these be; I
 take your defaced and damnified kirk on your own terms; and I ask you,
 Are you a worthy minister?  The communion season approaches; how can you
 pronounce thir solemn words, "The elders will now bring forrit the
 elements," and not quail?  A parishioner may be summoned to-night; you
 may have to rise from your miserable orgies; and I ask you, Haddo, what
 does your conscience tell you?  Are you fit?  Are you fit to smooth the
 pillow of a parting Christian?  And if the summons should be for
 yourself, how then?'
 
 Haddo was startled out of all composure and the better part of his
 temper.  'What's this of it?' he cried.  'I'm no waur than my neebours.
 I never set up to be speeritual; I never did.  I'm a plain, canty
 creature; godliness is cheerfulness, says I; give me my fiddle and a
 dram, and I wouldna hairm a flee.'
 
 'And I repeat my question,' said M'Brair: 'Are you fit--fit for this
 great charge? fit to carry and save souls?'
 
 'Fit?  Blethers!  As fit's yoursel',' cried Haddo.
 
 'Are you so great a self-deceiver?' said M'Brair.  'Wretched man,
 trampler upon God's covenants, crucifier of your Lord afresh.  I will
 ding you to the earth with one word: How about the young woman, Janet
 M'Clour?'
 
 'Weel, what about her? what do I ken?' cries Haddo.  'M'Brair, ye daft
 auld wife, I tell ye as true's truth, I never meddled her.  It was just
 daffing, I tell ye: daffing, and nae mair: a piece of fun, like!  I'm no
 denying but what I'm fond of fun, sma' blame to me!  But for onything
 sarious--hout, man, it might come to a deposeetion!  I'll sweir it to ye.
 Where's a Bible, till you hear me sweir?'
 
 'There is nae Bible in your study,' said M'Brair severely.
 
 And Haddo, after a few distracted turns, was constrained to accept the
 fact.
 
 'Weel, and suppose there isna?' he cried, stamping.  'What mair can ye
 say of us, but just that I'm fond of my joke, and so's she?  I declare to
 God, by what I ken, she might be the Virgin Mary--if she would just keep
 clear of the dragoons.  But me! na, deil haet o' me!'
 
 'She is penitent at least,' says M'Brair.
 
 'Do you mean to actually up and tell me to my face that she accused me?'
 cried the curate.
 
 'I canna just say that,' replied M'Brair.  'But I rebuked her in the name
 of God, and she repented before me on her bended knees.'
 
 'Weel, I daursay she's been ower far wi' the dragoons,' said Haddo.  'I
 never denied that.  I ken naething by it.'
 
 'Man, you but show your nakedness the more plainly,' said M'Brair.
 'Poor, blind, besotted creature--and I see you stoytering on the brink of
 dissolution: your light out, and your hours numbered.  Awake, man!' he
 shouted with a formidable voice, 'awake, or it be ower late.'
 
 'Be damned if I stand this!' exclaimed Haddo, casting his tobacco-pipe
 violently on the table, where it was smashed in pieces.  'Out of my house
 with ye, or I'll call for the dragoons.'
 
 'The speerit of the Lord is upon me,' said M'Brair with solemn ecstasy.
 'I sist you to compear before the Great White Throne, and I warn you the
 summons shall be bloody and sudden.'
 
 And at this, with more agility than could have been expected, he got
 clear of the room and slammed the door behind him in the face of the
 pursuing curate.  The next Lord's day the curate was ill, and the kirk
 closed, but for all his ill words, Mr. M'Brair abode unmolested in the
 house of Montroymont.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III--THE HILL-END OF DRUMLOWE
 
 
 This was a bit of a steep broken hill that overlooked upon the west a
 moorish valley, full of ink-black pools.  These presently drained into a
 burn that made off, with little noise and no celerity of pace, about the
 corner of the hill.  On the far side the ground swelled into a bare
 heath, black with junipers, and spotted with the presence of the standing
 stones for which the place was famous.  They were many in that part,
 shapeless, white with lichen--you would have said with age: and had made
 their abode there for untold centuries, since first the heathens shouted
 for their installation.  The ancients had hallowed them to some ill
 religion, and their neighbourhood had long been avoided by the prudent
 before the fall of day; but of late, on the upspringing of new
 requirements, these lonely stones on the moor had again become a place of
 assembly.  A watchful picket on the Hill-end commanded all the northern
 and eastern approaches; and such was the disposition of the ground, that
 by certain cunningly posted sentries the west also could be made secure
 against surprise: there was no place in the country where a conventicle
 could meet with more quiet of mind or a more certain retreat open, in the
 case of interference from the dragoons.  The minister spoke from a knowe
 close to the edge of the ring, and poured out the words God gave him on
 the very threshold of the devils of yore.  When they pitched a tent
 (which was often in wet weather, upon a communion occasion) it was rigged
 over the huge isolated pillar that had the name of Anes-Errand, none knew
 why.  And the congregation sat partly clustered on the slope below, and
 partly among the idolatrous monoliths and on the turfy soil of the Ring
 itself.  In truth the situation was well qualified to give a zest to
 Christian doctrines, had there been any wanted.  But these congregations
 assembled under conditions at once so formidable and romantic as made a
 zealot of the most cold.  They were the last of the faithful; God, who
 had averted His face from all other countries of the world, still leaned
 from heaven to observe, with swelling sympathy, the doings of His
 moorland remnant; Christ was by them with His eternal wounds, with
 dropping tears; the Holy Ghost (never perfectly realised nor firmly
 adopted by Protestant imaginations) was dimly supposed to be in the heart
 of each and on the lips of the minister.  And over against them was the
 army of the hierarchies, from the men Charles and James Stuart, on to
 King Lewie and the Emperor; and the scarlet Pope, and the muckle black
 devil himself, peering out the red mouth of hell in an ecstasy of hate
 and hope.  'One pull more!' he seemed to cry; 'one pull more, and it's
 done.  There's only Clydesdale and the Stewartry, and the three
 Bailiaries of Ayr, left for God.'  And with such an august assistance of
 powers and principalities looking on at the last conflict of good and
 evil, it was scarce possible to spare a thought to those old, infirm,
 debile, _ab agendo_ devils whose holy place they were now violating.
 
 There might have been three hundred to four hundred present.  At least
 there were three hundred horses tethered for the most part in the ring;
 though some of the hearers on the outskirts of the crowd stood with their
 bridles in their hand, ready to mount at the first signal.  The circle of
 faces was strangely characteristic; long, serious, strongly marked, the
 tackle standing out in the lean brown cheeks, the mouth set and the eyes
 shining with a fierce enthusiasm; the shepherd, the labouring man, and
 the rarer laird, stood there in their broad blue bonnets or laced hats,
 and presenting an essential identity of type.  From time to time a
 long-drawn groan of adhesion rose in this audience, and was propagated
 like a wave to the outskirts, and died away among the keepers of the
 horses.  It had a name; it was called 'a holy groan.'
 
 A squall came up; a great volley of flying mist went out before it and
 whelmed the scene; the wind stormed with a sudden fierceness that carried
 away the minister's voice and twitched his tails and made him stagger,
 and turned the congregation for a moment into a mere pother of blowing
 plaid-ends and prancing horses; and the rain followed and was dashed
 straight into their faces.  Men and women panted aloud in the shock of
 that violent shower-bath; the teeth were bared along all the line in an
 involuntary grimace; plaids, mantles, and riding-coats were proved vain,
 and the worshippers felt the water stream on their naked flesh.  The
 minister, reinforcing his great and shrill voice, continued to contend
 against and triumph over the rising of the squall and the dashing of the
 rain.
 
 'In that day ye may go thirty mile and not hear a crawing cock,' he said;
 'and fifty mile and not get a light to your pipe; and an hundred mile and
 not see a smoking house.  For there'll be naething in all Scotland but
 deid men's banes and blackness, and the living anger of the Lord.  O,
 where to find a bield--O sirs, where to find a bield from the wind of the
 Lord's anger?  Do ye call _this_ a wind?  Bethankit!  Sirs, this is but a
 temporary dispensation; this is but a puff of wind, this is but a spit of
 rain and by with it.  Already there's a blue bow in the west, and the sun
 will take the crown of the causeway again, and your things'll be dried
 upon ye, and your flesh will be warm upon your bones.  But O, sirs, sirs!
 for the day of the Lord's anger!'
 
 His rhetoric was set forth with an ear-piercing elocution, and a voice
 that sometimes crashed like cannon.  Such as it was, it was the gift of
 all hill-preachers, to a singular degree of likeness or identity.  Their
 images scarce ranged beyond the red horizon of the moor and the rainy
 hill-top, the shepherd and his sheep, a fowling-piece, a spade, a pipe, a
 dunghill, a crowing cock, the shining and the withdrawal of the sun.  An
 occasional pathos of simple humanity, and frequent patches of big
 Biblical words, relieved the homely tissue.  It was a poetry apart;
 bleak, austere, but genuine, and redolent of the soil.
 
 A little before the coming of the squall there was a different scene
 enacting at the outposts.  For the most part, the sentinels were faithful
 to their important duty; the Hill-end of Drumlowe was known to be a safe
 meeting-place; and the out-pickets on this particular day had been
 somewhat lax from the beginning, and grew laxer during the inordinate
 length of the discourse.  Francie lay there in his appointed hiding-hole,
 looking abroad between two whin-bushes.  His view was across the course
 of the burn, then over a piece of plain moorland, to a gap between two
 hills; nothing moved but grouse, and some cattle who slowly traversed his
 field of view, heading northward: he heard the psalms, and sang words of
 his own to the savage and melancholy music; for he had his own design in
 hand, and terror and cowardice prevailed in his bosom alternately, like
 the hot and the cold fit of an ague.  Courage was uppermost during the
 singing, which he accompanied through all its length with this impromptu
 strain:
 
     'And I will ding Jock Crozer down
        No later than the day.'
 
 Presently the voice of the preacher came to him in wafts, at the wind's
 will, as by the opening and shutting of a door; wild spasms of screaming,
 as of some undiscerned gigantic hill-bird stirred with inordinate
 passion, succeeded to intervals of silence; and Francie heard them with a
 critical ear.  'Ay,' he thought at last, 'he'll do; he has the bit in his
 mou' fairly.'
 
 He had observed that his friend, or rather his enemy, Jock Crozer, had
 been established at a very critical part of the line of outposts; namely,
 where the burn issues by an abrupt gorge from the semicircle of high
 moors.  If anything was calculated to nerve him to battle it was this.
 The post was important; next to the Hill-end itself, it might be called
 the key to the position; and it was where the cover was bad, and in which
 it was most natural to place a child.  It should have been Heathercat's;
 why had it been given to Crozer?  An exquisite fear of what should be the
 answer passed through his marrow every time he faced the question.  Was
 it possible that Crozer could have boasted? that there were rumours
 abroad to his--Heathercat's--discredit? that his honour was publicly
 sullied?  All the world went dark about him at the thought; he sank
 without a struggle into the midnight pool of despair; and every time he
 so sank, he brought back with him--not drowned heroism indeed, but
 half-drowned courage by the locks.  His heart beat very slowly as he
 deserted his station, and began to crawl towards that of Crozer.
 Something pulled him back, and it was not the sense of duty, but a
 remembrance of Crozer's build and hateful readiness of fist.  Duty, as he
 conceived it, pointed him forward on the rueful path that he was
 travelling.  Duty bade him redeem his name if he were able, at the risk
 of broken bones; and his bones and every tooth in his head ached by
 anticipation.  An awful subsidiary fear whispered him that if he were
 hurt, he should disgrace himself by weeping.  He consoled himself,
 boy-like, with the consideration that he was not yet committed; he could
 easily steal over unseen to Crozer's post, and he had a continuous
 private idea that he would very probably steal back again.  His course
 took him so near the minister that he could hear some of his words: 'What
 news, minister, of Claver'se?  He's going round like a roaring rampaging
 lion. . . .
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                 * * * * *
 
          Printed by T. and A. CONSTABLE, Printers to His Majesty
                     at the Edinburgh University Press.
 
 
 
 
 Footnotes:
 
 
 {0}  With special reference to _Father Damien_, pp. 63-81.
 
 {65}  From the Sydney _Presbyterian_, October 26, 1889.
 
 {85}  _Theater of Mortality_, p. 10; Edin. 1713.
 
 {86}  _History of My Own Times_, beginning 1660, by Bishop Gilbert
 Burnet, p. 158.
 
 {87a}  Wodrow's _Church History_, Book II. chap. i. sect. I.
 
 {87b}  Crookshank's _Church History_, 1751, second ed. p. 202.
 
 {88}  Burnet, p. 348.
 
 {89}  _Fuller's Historie of the Holy Warre_, fourth ed. 1651.
 
 {90}  Wodrow, vol. ii. p. 17.
 
 {92}  Sir J. Turner's _Memoirs_, pp. 148-50.
 
 {93}  _A Cloud of Witnesses_, p. 376.
 
 {94a}  Wodrow, pp. 19, 20.
 
 {94b}  _A Hind Let Loose_, p. 123.
 
 {95}  Turner, p. 163.
 
 {96a}  Turner, p. 198.
 
 {96b}  _Ibid._ p. 167.
 
 {97}  Wodrow, p. 29.
 
 {98}  Turner, Wodrow, and _Church History_ by James Kirkton, an outed
 minister of the period.
 
 {99}  Kirkton, p. 244.
 
 {101a}  Kirkton.
 
 {101b}  Turner.
 
 {102}  Kirkton.
 
 {103}  Kirkton.
 
 {104}  _Cloud of Witnesses_, p. 389; Edin. 1765.
 
 {105a}  Kirkton, p. 247.
 
 {105b}  Ibid. p. 254.
 
 {105c}  _Ibid._ p. 247.
 
 {105d}  _Ibid._ pp. 247, 248.
 
 {106}  Kirkton, p. 248.
 
 {107a}  Kirkton, p. 249.
 
 {107b}  _Naphtali_, p. 205; Glasgow, 1721.
 
 {107c}  Wodrow, p. 59.
 
 {108a}  Kirkton, p. 246.
 
 {108b}  Defoe's _History of the Church of Scotland_.
 
 {151}  'This paper was written in collaboration with James Waiter
 Ferrier, and if reprinted this is to be stated, though his principal
 collaboration was to lie back in an easy-chair and laugh.'--[R.L.S., Oct.
 25, 1894.]
 
 {183}  The illustrator was, in fact, a lady, Miss Eunice Bagster, eldest
 daughter of the publisher, Samuel Bagster; except in the case of the cuts
 depicting the fight with Apollyon, which were designed by her brother,
 Mr. Jonathan Bagster.  The edition was published in 1845.  I am indebted
 for this information to the kindness of Mr. Robert Bagster, the present
 managing director of the firm.--[SIR SIDNEY COLVIN'S NOTE.]
 
 {205}  See a short essay of De Quincey's.
 
 {206a}  _Religio Medici_, Part ii.
 
 {206b}  _Duchess of Malfi_.
 
 

 
 Transcribed from the 1913 Chatto and Windus edition by David Price, email
 ccx074@pglaf.org
 
 
 
 
 
                             WEIR OF HERMISTON
 
 
                           AN UNFINISHED ROMANCE
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                     BY
                           ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
                        [Picture: Decorative image]
 
                             FINE-PAPER EDITION
 
                                 * * * * *
 
                                   LONDON
                              CHATTO & WINDUS
                                    1913
 
                    Printed by BALLANTYNE, HANSON & CO.
                     at the Ballantyne Press, Edinburgh
 
 
 
 
 TO MY WIFE
 
 
    _I saw rain falling and the rainbow drawn_
    _On Lammermuir_.  _Hearkening I heard again_
    _In my precipitous city beaten bells_
    _Winnow the keen sea wind_.  _And here afar_,
    _Intent on my own race and place_, _I wrote_.
        _Take thou the writing_: _thine it is_.  _For who_
    _Burnished the sword_, _blew on the drowsy coal_,
    _Held still the target higher_, _chary of praise_
    _And prodigal of counselwho but thou_?
    _So now_, _in the end_, _if this the least be good_,
    _If any deed be done_, _if any fire_
    _Burn in the imperfect page_, _the praise be thine_.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTORY
 
 
 In the wild end of a moorland parish, far out of the sight of any house,
 there stands a cairn among the heather, and a little by east of it, in
 the going down of the brae-side, a monument with some verses half
 defaced.  It was here that Claverhouse shot with his own hand the Praying
 Weaver of Balweary, and the chisel of Old Mortality has clinked on that
 lonely gravestone.  Public and domestic history have thus marked with a
 bloody finger this hollow among the hills; and since the Cameronian gave
 his life there, two hundred years ago, in a glorious folly, and without
 comprehension or regret, the silence of the moss has been broken once
 again by the report of firearms and the cry of the dying.
 
 The Deils Hags was the old name.  But the place is now called Francies
 Cairn.  For a while it was told that Francie walked.  Aggic Hogg met him
 in the gloaming by the cairnside, and he spoke to her, with chattering
 teeth, so that his words were lost.  He pursued Rob Todd (if any one
 could have believed Robbie) for the space of half a mile with pitiful
 entreaties.  But the age is one of incredulity; these superstitious
 decorations speedily fell off; and the facts of the story itself, like
 the bones of a giant buried there and half dug up, survived, naked and
 imperfect, in the memory of the scattered neighbours.  To this day, of
 winter nights, when the sleet is on the window and the cattle are quiet
 in the byre, there will be told again, amid the silence of the young and
 the additions and corrections of the old, the tale of the Justice-Clerk
 and of his son, young Hermiston, that vanished from mens knowledge; of
 the two Kirsties and the Four Black Brothers of the Cauldstaneslap; and
 of Frank Innes, the young fool advocate, that came into these moorland
 parts to find his destiny.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER ILIFE AND DEATH OF MRS. WEIR
 
 
 The Lord Justice-Clerk was a stranger in that part of the country; but
 his lady wife was known there from a child, as her race had been before
 her.  The old riding Rutherfords of Hermiston, of whom she was the last
 descendant, had been famous men of yore, ill neighbours, ill subjects,
 and ill husbands to their wives though not their properties.  Tales of
 them were rife for twenty miles about; and their name was even printed in
 the page of our Scots histories, not always to their credit.  One bit the
 dust at Flodden; one was hanged at his peel door by James the Fifth;
 another fell dead in a carouse with Tom Dalyell; while a fourth (and that
 was Jeans own father) died presiding at a Hell-Fire Club, of which he
 was the founder.  There were many heads shaken in Crossmichael at that
 judgment; the more so as the man had a villainous reputation among high
 and low, and both with the godly and the worldly.  At that very hour of
 his demise, he had ten going pleas before the Session, eight of them
 oppressive.  And the same doom extended even to his agents; his grieve,
 that had been his right hand in many a left-hand business, being cast
 from his horse one night and drowned in a peat-hag on the Kye-skairs; and
 his very doer (although lawyers have long spoons) surviving him not long,
 and dying on a sudden in a bloody flux.
 
 In all these generations, while a male Rutherford was in the saddle with
 his lads, or brawling in a change-house, there would be always a
 white-faced wife immured at home in the old peel or the later
 mansion-house.  It seemed this succession of martyrs bided long, but took
 their vengeance in the end, and that was in the person of the last
 descendant, Jean.  She bore the name of the Rutherfords, but she was the
 daughter of their trembling wives.  At the first she was not wholly
 without charm.  Neighbours recalled in her, as a child, a strain of elfin
 wilfulness, gentle little mutinies, sad little gaieties, even a morning
 gleam of beauty that was not to be fulfilled.  She withered in the
 growing, and (whether it was the sins of her sires or the sorrows of her
 mothers) came to her maturity depressed, and, as it were, defaced; no
 blood of life in her, no grasp or gaiety; pious, anxious, tender,
 tearful, and incompetent.
 
 It was a wonder to many that she had marriedseeming so wholly of the
 stuff that makes old maids.  But chance cast her in the path of Adam
 Weir, then the new Lord-Advocate, a recognised, risen man, the conqueror
 of many obstacles, and thus late in the day beginning to think upon a
 wife.  He was one who looked rather to obedience than beauty, yet it
 would seem he was struck with her at the first look.  Whas she? he
 said, turning to his host; and, when he had been told, Ay, says he,
 she looks menseful.  She minds me; and then, after a pause (which some
 have been daring enough to set down to sentimental recollections), Is
 she releegious? he asked, and was shortly after, at his own request,
 presented.  The acquaintance, which it seems profane to call a courtship,
 was pursued with Mr. Weirs accustomed industry, and was long a legend,
 or rather a source of legends, in the Parliament House.  He was described
 coming, rosy with much port, into the drawing-room, walking direct up to
 the lady, and assailing her with pleasantries, to which the embarrassed
 fair one responded, in what seemed a kind of agony, Eh, Mr. Weir! or
 O, Mr. Weir! or Keep me, Mr. Weir!  On the very eve of their
 engagement, it was related that one had drawn near to the tender couple,
 and had overheard the lady cry out, with the tones of one who talked for
 the sake of talking, Keep me, Mr. Weir, and what became of him? and the
 profound accents of the suitor reply, Haangit, mem, haangit.  The
 motives upon either side were much debated.  Mr. Weir must have supposed
 his bride to be somehow suitable; perhaps he belonged to that class of
 men who think a weak head the ornament of womenan opinion invariably
 punished in this life.  Her descent and her estate were beyond question.
 Her wayfaring ancestors and her litigious father had done well by Jean.
 There was ready money and there were broad acres, ready to fall wholly to
 the husband, to lend dignity to his descendants, and to himself a title,
 when he should be called upon the Bench.  On the side of Jean, there was
 perhaps some fascination of curiosity as to this unknown male animal that
 approached her with the roughness of a ploughman and the _aplomb_ of an
 advocate.  Being so trenchantly opposed to all she knew, loved, or
 understood, he may well have seemed to her the extreme, if scarcely the
 ideal, of his sex.  And besides, he was an ill man to refuse.  A little
 over forty at the period of his marriage, he looked already older, and to
 the force of manhood added the senatorial dignity of years; it was,
 perhaps, with an unreverend awe, but he was awful.  The Bench, the Bar,
 and the most experienced and reluctant witness, bowed to his
 authorityand why not Jeannie Rutherford?
 
 The heresy about foolish women is always punished, I have said, and Lord
 Hermiston began to pay the penalty at once.  His house in George Square
 was wretchedly ill-guided; nothing answerable to the expense of
 maintenance but the cellar, which was his own private care.  When things
 went wrong at dinner, as they continually did, my lord would look up the
 table at his wife: I think these broth would be better to sweem in than
 to sup.  Or else to the butler: Here, MKillop, awa wi this Raadical
 gigottak it to the French, man, and bring me some puddocks!  It seems
 rather a sore kind of a business that I should be all day in Court
 haanging Raadicals, and get nawthing to my denner.  Of course this was
 but a manner of speaking, and he had never hanged a man for being a
 Radical in his life; the law, of which he was the faithful minister,
 directing otherwise.  And of course these growls were in the nature of
 pleasantry, but it was of a recondite sort; and uttered as they were in
 his resounding voice, and commented on by that expression which they
 called in the Parliament House Hermistons hanging facethey struck
 mere dismay into the wife.  She sat before him speechless and fluttering;
 at each dish, as at a fresh ordeal, her eye hovered toward my lords
 countenance and fell again; if he but ate in silence, unspeakable relief
 was her portion; if there were complaint, the world was darkened.  She
 would seek out the cook, who was always her _sister in the Lord_.  O, my
 dear, this is the most dreidful thing that my lord can never be contented
 in his own house! she would begin; and weep and pray with the cook; and
 then the cook would pray with Mrs. Weir; and the next days meal would
 never be a penny the betterand the next cook (when she came) would be
 worse, if anything, but just as pious.  It was often wondered that Lord
 Hermiston bore it as he did; indeed, he was a stoical old voluptuary,
 contented with sound wine and plenty of it.  But there were moments when
 he overflowed.  Perhaps half a dozen times in the history of his married
 lifeHere! tak it awa, and bring me a piece bread and kebbuck! he had
 exclaimed, with an appalling explosion of his voice and rare gestures.
 None thought to dispute or to make excuses; the service was arrested;
 Mrs. Weir sat at the head of the table whimpering without disguise; and
 his lordship opposite munched his bread and cheese in ostentatious
 disregard.  Once only, Mrs. Weir had ventured to appeal.  He was passing
 her chair on his way into the study.
 
 O, Edom! she wailed, in a voice tragic with tears, and reaching out to
 him both hands, in one of which she held a sopping pocket-handkerchief.
 
 He paused and looked upon her with a face of wrath, into which there
 stole, as he looked, a twinkle of humour.
 
 Noansense! he said.  You and your noansense!  What do I want with a
 Christian faimly?  I want Christian broth!  Get me a lass that can
 plain-boil a potato, if she was a whre off the streets.  And with these
 words, which echoed in her tender ears like blasphemy, he had passed on
 to his study and shut the door behind him.
 
 Such was the housewifery in George Square.  It was better at Hermiston,
 where Kirstie Elliott, the sister of a neighbouring bonnet-laird, and an
 eighteenth cousin of the ladys, bore the charge of all, and kept a trim
 house and a good country table.  Kirstie was a woman in a thousand,
 clean, capable, notable; once a moorland Helen, and still comely as a
 blood horse and healthy as the hill wind.  High in flesh and voice and
 colour, she ran the house with her whole intemperate soul, in a bustle,
 not without buffets.  Scarce more pious than decency in those days
 required, she was the cause of many an anxious thought and many a tearful
 prayer to Mrs. Weir.  Housekeeper and mistress renewed the parts of
 Martha and Mary; and though with a pricking conscience, Mary reposed on
 Marthas strength as on a rock.  Even Lord Hermiston held Kirstie in a
 particular regard.  There were few with whom he unbent so gladly, few
 whom he favoured with so many pleasantries.  Kirstie and me maun have
 our joke, he would declare in high good-humour, as he buttered Kirsties
 scones, and she waited at table.  A man who had no need either of love or
 of popularity, a keen reader of men and of events, there was perhaps only
 one truth for which he was quite unprepared: he would have been quite
 unprepared to learn that Kirstie hated him.  He thought maid and master
 were well matched; hard, bandy, healthy, broad Scots folk, without a hair
 of nonsense to the pair of them.  And the fact was that she made a
 goddess and an only child of the effete and tearful lady; and even as she
 waited at table her hands would sometimes itch for my lords ears.
 
 Thus, at least, when the family were at Hermiston, not only my lord, but
 Mrs. Weir too, enjoyed a holiday.  Free from the dreadful looking-for of
 the miscarried dinner, she would mind her seam, read her piety books, and
 take her walk (which was my lords orders), sometimes by herself,
 sometimes with Archie, the only child of that scarce natural union.  The
 child was her next bond to life.  Her frosted sentiment bloomed again,
 she breathed deep of life, she let loose her heart, in that society.  The
 miracle of her motherhood was ever new to her.  The sight of the little
 man at her skirt intoxicated her with the sense of power, and froze her
 with the consciousness of her responsibility.  She looked forward, and,
 seeing him in fancy grow up and play his diverse part on the worlds
 theatre, caught in her breath and lifted up her courage with a lively
 effort.  It was only with the child that she forgot herself and was at
 moments natural; yet it was only with the child that she had conceived
 and managed to pursue a scheme of conduct.  Archie was to be a great man
 and a good; a minister if possible, a saint for certain.  She tried to
 engage his mind upon her favourite books, Rutherfords _Letters_,
 Scougalls _Grace Abounding_, and the like.  It was a common practice of
 hers (and strange to remember now) that she would carry the child to the
 Deils Hags, sit with him on the Praying Weavers stone, and talk of the
 Covenanters till their tears ran down.  Her view of history was wholly
 artless, a design in snow and ink; upon the one side, tender innocents
 with psalms upon their lips; upon the other, the persecutors, booted,
 bloody-minded, flushed with wine: a suffering Christ, a raging Beelzebub.
 _Persecutor_ was a word that knocked upon the womans heart; it was her
 highest thought of wickedness, and the mark of it was on her house.  Her
 great-great-grandfather had drawn the sword against the Lords anointed
 on the field of Rullion Green, and breathed his last (tradition said) in
 the arms of the detestable Dalyell.  Nor could she blind herself to this,
 that had they lived in those old days, Hermiston himself would have been
 numbered alongside of Bloody MacKenzie and the politic Lauderdale and
 Rothes, in the band of Gods immediate enemies.  The sense of this moved
 her to the more fervour; she had a voice for that name of _persecutor_
 that thrilled in the childs marrow; and when one day the mob hooted and
 hissed them all in my lords travelling carriage, and cried, Down with
 the persecutor! down with Hanging Hermiston! and mamma covered her eyes
 and wept, and papa let down the glass and looked out upon the rabble with
 his droll formidable face, bitter and smiling, as they said he sometimes
 looked when he gave sentence, Archie was for the moment too much amazed
 to be alarmed, but he had scarce got his mother by herself before his
 shrill voice was raised demanding an explanation: why had they called
 papa a persecutor?
 
 Keep me, my precious! she exclaimed.  Keep me, my dear! this is
 poleetical.  Ye must never ask me anything poleetical, Erchie.  Your
 faither is a great man, my dear, and its no for me or you to be judging
 him.  It would be telling us all, if we behaved ourselves in our several
 stations the way your faither does in his high office; and let me hear no
 more of any such disrespectful and undutiful questions!  No that you
 meant to be undutiful, my lamb; your mother kens thatshe kens it well,
 dearie!  And so slid off to safer topics, and left on the mind of the
 child an obscure but ineradicable sense of something wrong.
 
 Mrs. Weirs philosophy of life was summed in one expressiontenderness.
 In her view of the universe, which was all lighted up with a glow out of
 the doors of hell, good people must walk there in a kind of ecstasy of
 tenderness.  The beasts and plants had no souls; they were here but for a
 day, and let their day pass gently!  And as for the immortal men, on what
 black, downward path were many of them wending, and to what a horror of
 an immortality!  Are not two sparrows, Whosoever shall smite thee,
 God sendeth His rain, Judge not, that ye be not judgedthese texts
 made her body of divinity; she put them on in the morning with her
 clothes and lay down to sleep with them at night; they haunted her like a
 favourite air, they clung about her like a favourite perfume.  Their
 minister was a marrowy expounder of the law, and my lord sat under him
 with relish; but Mrs. Weir respected him from far off; heard him (like
 the cannon of a beleaguered city) usefully booming outside on the
 dogmatic ramparts; and meanwhile, within and out of shot, dwelt in her
 private garden which she watered with grateful tears.  It seems strange
 to say of this colourless and ineffectual woman, but she was a true
 enthusiast, and might have made the sunshine and the glory of a cloister.
 Perhaps none but Archie knew she could be eloquent; perhaps none but he
 had seen herher colour raised, her hands clasped or quiveringglow with
 gentle ardour.  There is a corner of the policy of Hermiston, where you
 come suddenly in view of the summit of Black Fell, sometimes like the
 mere grass top of a hill, sometimes (and this is her own expression) like
 a precious jewel in the heavens.  On such days, upon the sudden view of
 it, her hand would tighten on the childs fingers, her voice rise like a
 song.  _I to the hills_! she would repeat.  And O, Erchie, are nae
 these like the hills of Naphtali? and her tears would flow.
 
 Upon an impressionable child the effect of this continual and pretty
 accompaniment to life was deep.  The womans quietism and piety passed on
 to his different nature undiminished; but whereas in her it was a native
 sentiment, in him it was only an implanted dogma.  Nature and the childs
 pugnacity at times revolted.  A cad from the Potterrow once struck him in
 the mouth; he struck back, the pair fought it out in the back stable lane
 towards the Meadows, and Archie returned with a considerable decline in
 the number of his front teeth, and unregenerately boasting of the losses
 of the foe.  It was a sore day for Mrs. Weir; she wept and prayed over
 the infant backslider until my lord was due from Court, and she must
 resume that air of tremulous composure with which she always greeted him.
 The judge was that day in an observant mood, and remarked upon the absent
 teeth.
 
 I am afraid Erchie will have been fechting with some of they blagyard
 lads, said Mrs. Weir.
 
 My lords voice rang out as it did seldom in the privacy of his own
 house.  Ill have norm of that, sir! he cried.  Do you hear me?nonn
 of that!  No son of mine shall be speldering in the glaur with any dirty
 raibble.
 
 The anxious mother was grateful for so much support; she had even feared
 the contrary.  And that night when she put the child to bedNow, my
 dear, ye see! she said, I told you what your faither would think of it,
 if he heard ye had fallen into this dreidful sin; and let you and me pray
 to God that ye may be keepit from the like temptation or strengthened to
 resist it!
 
 The womanly falsity of this was thrown away.  Ice and iron cannot be
 welded; and the points of view of the Justice-Clerk and Mrs. Weir were
 not less unassimilable.  The character and position of his father had
 long been a stumbling-block to Archie, and with every year of his age the
 difficulty grew more instant.  The man was mostly silent; when he spoke
 at all, it was to speak of the things of the world, always in a worldly
 spirit, often in language that the child had been schooled to think
 coarse, and sometimes with words that he knew to be sins in themselves.
 Tenderness was the first duty, and my lord was invariably harsh.  God was
 love; the name of my lord (to all who knew him) was fear.  In the world,
 as schematised for Archie by his mother, the place was marked for such a
 creature.  There were some whom it was good to pity and well (though very
 likely useless) to pray for; they were named reprobates, goats, Gods
 enemies, brands for the burning; and Archie tallied every mark of
 identification, and drew the inevitable private inference that the Lord
 Justice-Clerk was the chief of sinners.
 
 The mothers honesty was scarce complete.  There was one influence she
 feared for the child and still secretly combated; that was my lords; and
 half unconsciously, half in a wilful blindness, she continued to
 undermine her husband with his son.  As long as Archie remained silent,
 she did so ruthlessly, with a single eye to heaven and the childs
 salvation; but the day came when Archie spoke.  It was 1801, and Archie
 was seven, and beyond his years for curiosity and logic, when he brought
 the case up openly.  If judging were sinful and forbidden, how came papa
 to be a judge? to have that sin for a trade? to bear the name of it for a
 distinction?
 
 I cant see it, said the little Rabbi, and wagged his head.
 
 Mrs. Weir abounded in commonplace replies.
 
 No, I cannae see it, reiterated Archie.  And Ill tell you what,
 mamma, I dont think you and mes justifeed in staying with him.
 
 The woman awoke to remorse, she saw herself disloyal to her man, her
 sovereign and bread-winner, in whom (with what she had of worldliness)
 she took a certain subdued pride.  She expatiated in reply on my lords
 honour and greatness; his useful services in this world of sorrow and
 wrong, and the place in which he stood, far above where babes and
 innocents could hope to see or criticise.  But she had builded too
 wellArchie had his answers pat: Were not babes and innocents the type of
 the kingdom of heaven?  Were not honour and greatness the badges of the
 world?  And at any rate, how about the mob that had once seethed about
 the carriage?
 
 Its all very fine, he concluded, but in my opinion papa has no right
 to be it.  And it seems thats not the worst yet of it.  It seems hes
 called The Hanging judgeit seems hes crooool.  Ill tell you what it
 is, mamma, theres a tex borne in upon me: It were better for that man
 if a milestone were bound upon his back and him flung into the
 deepestmost pairts of the sea.
 
 O, my lamb, ye must never say the like of that! she cried.  Yere to
 honour faither and mother, dear, that your days may be long in the land.
 Its Atheists that cry out against himFrench Atheists, Erchie!  Ye would
 never surely even yourself down to be saying the same thing as French
 Atheists?  It would break my heart to think that of you.  And O, Erchie,
 here arena _you_ setting up to _judge_?  And have ye no forgot Gods
 plain commandthe First with Promise, dear?  Mind you upon the beam and
 the mote!
 
 Having thus carried the war into the enemys camp, the terrified lady
 breathed again.  And no doubt it is easy thus to circumvent a child with
 catchwords, but it may be questioned how far it is effectual.  An
 instinct in his breast detects the quibble, and a voice condemns it.  He
 will instantly submit, privately hold the same opinion.  For even in this
 simple and antique relation of the mother and the child, hypocrisies are
 multiplied.
 
 When the Court rose that year and the family returned to Hermiston, it
 was a common remark in all the country that the lady was sore failed.
 She seemed to loose and seize again her touch with life, now sitting
 inert in a sort of durable bewilderment, anon waking to feverish and weak
 activity.  She dawdled about the lasses at their work, looking stupidly
 on; she fell to rummaging in old cabinets and presses, and desisted when
 half through; she would begin remarks with an air of animation and drop
 them without a struggle.  Her common appearance was of one who has
 forgotten something and is trying to remember; and when she overhauled,
 one after another, the worthless and touching mementoes of her youth, she
 might have been seeking the clue to that lost thought.  During this
 period, she gave many gifts to the neighbours and house lasses, giving
 them with a manner of regret that embarrassed the recipients.
 
 The last night of all she was busy on some female work, and toiled upon
 it with so manifest and painful a devotion that my lord (who was not
 often curious) inquired as to its nature.
 
 She blushed to the eyes.  O, Edom, its for you! she said.  Its
 slippers. II hae never made ye any.
 
 Ye daft auld wife! returned his lordship.  A bonny figure I would be,
 palmering about in bauchles!
 
 The next day, at the hour of her walk, Kirstie interfered.  Kirstie took
 this decay of her mistress very hard; bore her a grudge, quarrelled with
 and railed upon her, the anxiety of a genuine love wearing the disguise
 of temper.  This day of all days she insisted disrespectfully, with
 rustic fury, that Mrs. Weir should stay at home.  But, No, no, she
 said, its my lords orders, and set forth as usual.  Archie was
 visible in the acre bog, engaged upon some childish enterprise, the
 instrument of which was mire; and she stood and looked at him a while
 like one about to call; then thought otherwise, sighed, and shook her
 head, and proceeded on her rounds alone.  The house lasses were at the
 burnside washing, and saw her pass with her loose, weary, dowdy gait.
 
 Shes a terrible feckless wife, the mistress! said the one.
 
 Tut, said the other, the wummans seeck.
 
 Weel, I canna see nae differ in her, returned the first.  A
 fushionless quean, a feckless carline.
 
 The poor creature thus discussed rambled a while in the grounds without a
 purpose.  Tides in her mind ebbed and flowed, and carried her to and fro
 like seaweed.  She tried a path, paused, returned, and tried another;
 questing, forgetting her quest; the spirit of choice extinct in her
 bosom, or devoid of sequency.  On a sudden, it appeared as though she had
 remembered, or had formed a resolution, wheeled about, returned with
 hurried steps, and appeared in the dining-room, where Kirstie was at the
 cleaning, like one charged with an important errand.
 
 Kirstie! she began, and paused; and then with conviction, Mr. Weir
 isna speeritually minded, but he has been a good man to me.
 
 It was perhaps the first time since her husbands elevation that she had
 forgotten the handle to his name, of which the tender, inconsistent woman
 was not a little proud.  And when Kirstie looked up at the speakers
 face, she was aware of a change.
 
 Godsake, whats the maitter wi ye, mem? cried the housekeeper,
 starting from the rug.
 
 I do not ken, answered her mistress, shaking her head.  But he is not
 speeritually minded, my dear.
 
 Here, sit down with ye!  Godsake, what ails the wife? cried Kirstie,
 and helped and forced her into my lords own chair by the cheek of the
 hearth.
 
 Keep me, whats this? she gasped.  Kirstie, whats this?  Im
 frichened.
 
 They were her last words.
 
 It was the lowering nightfall when my lord returned.  He had the sunset
 in his back, all clouds and glory; and before him, by the wayside, spied
 Kirstie Elliott waiting.  She was dissolved in tears, and addressed him
 in the high, false note of barbarous mourning, such as still lingers
 modified among Scots heather.
 
 The Lord peety ye, Hermiston! the Lord prepare ye! she keened out.
 Weary upon me, that I should have to tell it!
 
 He reined in his horse and looked upon her with the hanging face.
 
 Has the French landit? cried he.
 
 Man, man, she said, is that a ye can think of?  The Lord prepare ye:
 the Lord comfort and support ye!
 
 Is onybody deid? said his lordship.  Its no Erchie?
 
 Bethankit, no! exclaimed the woman, startled into a more natural tone.
 Na, na, its no sae bad as that.  Its the mistress, my lord; she just
 fair flittit before my een.  She just gied a sab and was by wi it.
 Eh, my bonny Miss Jeannie, that I mind sae weel!  And forth again upon
 that pouring tide of lamentation in which women of her class excel and
 over-abound.
 
 Lord Hermiston sat in the saddle beholding her.  Then he seemed to
 recover command upon himself.
 
 Well, its something of the suddenest, said he.  But she was a dwaibly
 body from the first.
 
 And he rode home at a precipitate amble with Kirstie at his horses
 heels.
 
 Dressed as she was for her last walk, they had laid the dead lady on her
 bed.  She was never interesting in life; in death she was not impressive;
 and as her husband stood before her, with his hands crossed behind his
 powerful back, that which he looked upon was the very image of the
 insignificant.
 
 Her and me were never cut out for one another, he remarked at last.
 It was a daft-like marriage.  And then, with a most unusual gentleness
 of tone, Puir bitch, said he, puir bitch!  Then suddenly: Wheres
 Erchie?
 
 Kirstie had decoyed him to her room and given him a jeely-piece.
 
 Ye have some kind of gumption, too, observed the judge, and considered
 his housekeeper grimly.  When alls said, he added, I micht have done
 waurI micht have been marriet upon a skirting Jezebel like you!
 
 Theres naebody thinking of you, Hermiston! cried the offended woman.
 We think of her thats out of her sorrows.  And could _she_ have done
 waur?  Tell me that, Hermistontell me that before her clay-cauld corp!
 
 Weel, theres some of them gey an ill to please, observed his
 lordship.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIFATHER AND SON
 
 
 My Lord Justice-Clerk was known to many; the man Adam Weir perhaps to
 none.  He had nothing to explain or to conceal; he sufficed wholly and
 silently to himself; and that part of our nature which goes out (too
 often with false coin) to acquire glory or love, seemed in him to be
 omitted.  He did not try to be loved, he did not care to be; it is
 probable the very thought of it was a stranger to his mind.  He was an
 admired lawyer, a highly unpopular judge; and he looked down upon those
 who were his inferiors in either distinction, who were lawyers of less
 grasp or judges not so much detested.  In all the rest of his days and
 doings, not one trace of vanity appeared; and he went on through life
 with a mechanical movement, as of the unconscious; that was almost
 august.
 
 He saw little of his son.  In the childish maladies with which the boy
 was troubled, he would make daily inquiries and daily pay him a visit,
 entering the sick-room with a facetious and appalling countenance,
 letting off a few perfunctory jests, and going again swiftly, to the
 patients relief.  Once, a court holiday falling opportunely, my lord had
 his carriage, and drove the child himself to Hermiston, the customary
 place of convalescence.  It is conceivable he had been more than usually
 anxious, for that journey always remained in Archies memory as a thing
 apart, his father having related to him from beginning to end, and with
 much detail, three authentic murder cases.  Archie went the usual round
 of other Edinburgh boys, the high school and the college; and Hermiston
 looked on, or rather looked away, with scarce an affectation of interest
 in his progress.  Daily, indeed, upon a signal after dinner, he was
 brought in, given nuts and a glass of port, regarded sardonically,
 sarcastically questioned.  Well, sir, and what have you donn with your
 book to-day? my lord might begin, and set him posers in law Latin.  To a
 child just stumbling into Corderius, Papinian and Paul proved quite
 invincible.  But papa had memory of no other.  He was not harsh to the
 little scholar, having a vast fund of patience learned upon the bench,
 and was at no pains whether to conceal or to express his disappointment.
 Well, ye have a long jaunt before ye yet! he might observe, yawning,
 and fall back on his own thoughts (as like as not) until the time came
 for separation, and my lord would take the decanter and the glass, and be
 off to the back chamber looking on the Meadows, where he toiled on his
 cases till the hours were small.  There was no fuller man on the bench;
 his memory was marvellous, though wholly legal; if he had to advise
 extempore, none did it better; yet there was none who more earnestly
 prepared.  As he thus watched in the night, or sat at table and forgot
 the presence of his son, no doubt but he tasted deeply of recondite
 pleasures.  To be wholly devoted to some intellectual exercise is to have
 succeeded in life; and perhaps only in law and the higher mathematics may
 this devotion be maintained, suffice to itself without reaction, and find
 continual rewards without excitement.  This atmosphere of his fathers
 sterling industry was the best of Archies education.  Assuredly it did
 not attract him; assuredly it rather rebutted and depressed.  Yet it was
 still present, unobserved like the ticking of a clock, an arid ideal, a
 tasteless stimulant in the boys life.
 
 But Hermiston was not all of one piece.  He was, besides, a mighty toper;
 he could sit at wine until the day dawned, and pass directly from the
 table to the bench with a steady hand and a clear head.  Beyond the third
 bottle, he showed the plebeian in a larger print; the low, gross accent,
 the low, foul mirth, grew broader and commoner; he became less
 formidable, and infinitely more disgusting.  Now, the boy had inherited
 from Jean Rutherford a shivering delicacy, unequally mated with potential
 violence.  In the playing-fields, and amongst his own companions, he
 repaid a coarse expression with a blow; at his fathers table (when the
 time came for him to join these revels) he turned pale and sickened in
 silence. Of all the guests whom he there encountered, he had toleration
 for only one: David Keith Carnegie, Lord Glenalmond.  Lord Glenalmond was
 tall and emaciated, with long features and long delicate hands.  He was
 often compared with the statue of Forbes of Culloden in the Parliament
 House; and his blue eye, at more than sixty, preserved some of the fire
 of youth.  His exquisite disparity with any of his fellow-guests, his
 appearance as of an artist and an aristocrat stranded in rude company,
 riveted the boys attention; and as curiosity and interest are the things
 in the world that are the most immediately and certainly rewarded, Lord
 Glenalmond was attracted by the boy.
 
 And so this is your son, Hermiston? he asked, laying his hand on
 Archies shoulder.  Hes getting a big lad.
 
 Hout! said the gracious father, just his mother over againdaurna say
 boo to a goose!
 
 But the stranger retained the boy, talked to him, drew him out, found in
 him a taste for letters, and a fine, ardent, modest, youthful soul; and
 encouraged him to be a visitor on Sunday evenings in his bare, cold,
 lonely dining-room, where he sat and read in the isolation of a bachelor
 grown old in refinement.  The beautiful gentleness and grace of the old
 judge, and the delicacy of his person, thoughts, and language, spoke to
 Archies heart in its own tongue.  He conceived the ambition to be such
 another; and, when the day came for him to choose a profession, it was in
 emulation of Lord Glenalmond, not of Lord Hermiston, that he chose the
 Bar.  Hermiston looked on at this friendship with some secret pride, but
 openly with the intolerance of scorn.  He scarce lost an opportunity to
 put them down with a rough jape; and, to say truth, it was not difficult,
 for they were neither of them quick.  He had a word of contempt for the
 whole crowd of poets, painters, fiddlers, and their admirers, the bastard
 race of amateurs, which was continually on his lips.  Signor
 Feedle-eerie! he would say.  O, for Goads sake, no more of the
 Signor!
 
 You and my father are great friends, are you not? asked Archie once.
 
 There is no man that I more respect, Archie, replied Lord Glenalmond.
 He is two things of price.  He is a great lawyer, and he is upright as
 the day.
 
 You and he are so different, said the boy, his eyes dwelling on those
 of his old friend, like a lovers on his mistresss.
 
 Indeed so, replied the judge; very different.  And so I fear are you
 and he.  Yet I would like it very ill if my young friend were to misjudge
 his father.  He has all the Roman virtues: Cato and Brutus were such; I
 think a sons heart might well be proud of such an ancestry of one.
 
 And I would sooner he were a plaided herd, cried Archie, with sudden
 bitterness.
 
 And that is neither very wise, nor I believe entirely true, returned
 Glenalmond.  Before you are done you will find some of these expressions
 rise on you like a remorse.  They are merely literary and decorative;
 they do not aptly express your thought, nor is your thought clearly
 apprehended, and no doubt your father (if he were here) would say,
 Signor Feedle-eerie!
 
 With the infinitely delicate sense of youth, Archie avoided the subject
 from that hour.  It was perhaps a pity.  Had he but talkedtalked
 freelylet himself gush out in words (the way youth loves to do and
 should), there might have been no tale to write upon the Weirs of
 Hermiston.  But the shadow of a threat of ridicule sufficed; in the
 slight tartness of these words he read a prohibition; and it is likely
 that Glenalmond meant it so.
 
 Besides the veteran, the boy was without confidant or friend.  Serious
 and eager, he came through school and college, and moved among a crowd of
 the indifferent, in the seclusion of his shyness.  He grew up handsome,
 with an open, speaking countenance, with graceful, youthful ways; he was
 clever, he took prizes, he shone in the Speculative Society.  It should
 seem he must become the centre of a crowd of friends; but something that
 was in part the delicacy of his mother, in part the austerity of his
 father, held him aloof from all.  It is a fact, and a strange one, that
 among his contemporaries Hermistons son was thought to be a chip of the
 old block.  Youre a friend of Archie Weirs? said one to Frank Innes;
 and Innes replied, with his usual flippancy and more than his usual
 insight: I know Weir, but I never met Archie.  No one had met Archie, a
 malady most incident to only sons.  He flew his private signal, and none
 heeded it; it seemed he was abroad in a world from which the very hope of
 intimacy was banished; and he looked round about him on the concourse of
 his fellow-students, and forward to the trivial days and acquaintances
 that were to come, without hope or interest.
 
 As time went on, the tough and rough old sinner felt himself drawn to the
 son of his loins and sole continuator of his new family, with softnesses
 of sentiment that he could hardly credit and was wholly impotent to
 express.  With a face, voice, and manner trained through forty years to
 terrify and repel, Rhadamanthus may be great, but he will scarce be
 engaging.  It is a fact that he tried to propitiate Archie, but a fact
 that cannot be too lightly taken; the attempt was so unconspicuously
 made, the failure so stoically supported.  Sympathy is not due to these
 steadfast iron natures.  If he failed to gain his sons friendship, or
 even his sons toleration, on he went up the great, bare staircase of his
 duty, uncheered and undepressed.  There might have been more pleasure in
 his relations with Archie, so much he may have recognised at moments; but
 pleasure was a by-product of the singular chemistry of life, which only
 fools expected.
 
 An idea of Archies attitude, since we are all grown up and have
 forgotten the days of our youth, it is more difficult to convey.  He made
 no attempt whatsoever to understand the man with whom he dined and
 breakfasted.  Parsimony of pain, glut of pleasure, these are the two
 alternating ends of youth; and Archie was of the parsimonious.  The wind
 blew cold out of a certain quarterhe turned his back upon it; stayed as
 little as was possible in his fathers presence; and when there, averted
 his eyes as much as was decent from his fathers face.  The lamp shone
 for many hundred days upon these two at tablemy lord, ruddy, gloomy, and
 unreverent; Archie with a potential brightness that was always dimmed and
 veiled in that society; and there were not, perhaps, in Christendom two
 men more radically strangers.  The father, with a grand simplicity,
 either spoke of what interested himself, or maintained an unaffected
 silence.  The son turned in his head for some topic that should be quite
 safe, that would spare him fresh evidences either of my lords inherent
 grossness or of the innocence of his inhumanity; treading gingerly the
 ways of intercourse, like a lady gathering up her skirts in a by-path.
 If he made a mistake, and my lord began to abound in matter of offence,
 Archie drew himself up, his brow grew dark, his share of the talk
 expired; but my lord would faithfully and cheerfully continue to pour out
 the worst of himself before his silent and offended son.
 
 Well, its a poor hert that never rejoices! he would say, at the
 conclusion of such a nightmare interview.  But I must get to my
 plew-stilts. And he would seclude himself as usual in his back room, and
 Archie go forth into the night and the city quivering with animosity and
 scorn.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IIIIN THE MATTER OF THE HANGING OF DUNCAN JOPP
 
 
 It chanced in the year 1813 that Archie strayed one day into the
 Justiciary Court.  The macer made room for the son of the presiding
 judge.  In the dock, the centre of mens eyes, there stood a
 whey-coloured, misbegotten caitiff, Duncan Jopp, on trial for his life.
 His story, as it was raked out before him in that public scene, was one
 of disgrace and vice and cowardice, the very nakedness of crime; and the
 creature heard and it seemed at times as though he understoodas if at
 times he forgot the horror of the place he stood in, and remembered the
 shame of what had brought him there.  He kept his head bowed and his
 hands clutched upon the rail; his hair dropped in his eyes and at times
 he flung it back; and now he glanced about the audience in a sudden
 fellness of terror, and now looked in the face of his judge and gulped.
 There was pinned about his throat a piece of dingy flannel; and this it
 was perhaps that turned the scale in Archies mind between disgust and
 pity.  The creature stood in a vanishing point; yet a little while, and
 he was still a man, and had eyes and apprehension; yet a little longer,
 and with a last sordid piece of pageantry, he would cease to be.  And
 here, in the meantime, with a trait of human nature that caught at the
 beholders breath, he was tending a sore throat.
 
 Over against him, my Lord Hermiston occupied the bench in the red robes
 of criminal jurisdiction, his face framed in the white wig.  Honest all
 through, he did not affect the virtue of impartiality; this was no case
 for refinement; there was a man to be hanged, he would have said, and he
 was hanging him.  Nor was it possible to see his lordship, and acquit him
 of gusto in the task.  It was plain he gloried in the exercise of his
 trained faculties, in the clear sight which pierced at once into the
 joint of fact, in the rude, unvarnished gibes with which he demolished
 every figment of defence.  He took his ease and jested, unbending in that
 solemn place with some of the freedom of the tavern; and the rag of man
 with the flannel round his neck was hunted gallowsward with jeers.
 
 Duncan had a mistress, scarce less forlorn and greatly older than
 himself, who came up, whimpering and curtseying, to add the weight of her
 betrayal.  My lord gave her the oath in his most roaring voice, and added
 an intolerant warning.
 
 Mind what ye say now, Janet, said he.  I have an ee upon ye, Im ill
 to jest with.
 
 Presently, after she was tremblingly embarked on her story, And what
 made ye do this, ye auld runt? the Court interposed.  Do ye mean to
 tell me ye was the panels mistress?
 
 If you please, ma loard, whined the female.
 
 Godsake! ye made a bonny couple, observed his lordship; and there was
 something so formidable and ferocious in his scorn that not even the
 galleries thought to laugh.
 
 The summing up contained some jewels.
 
 These two peetiable creatures seem to have made up thegither, its not
 for us to explain why.The panel, who (whatever else he may be) appears
 to be equally ill set-out in mind and boady.Neither the panel nor yet
 the old wife appears to have had so much common sense as even to tell a
 lie when it was necessary.  And in the course of sentencing, my lord had
 this _obiter dictum_: I have been the means, under God, of haanging a
 great number, but never just such a disjaskit rascal as yourself.  The
 words were strong in themselves; the light and heat and detonation of
 their delivery, and the savage pleasure of the speaker in his task, made
 them tingle in the ears.
 
 When all was over, Archie came forth again into a changed world.  Had
 there been the least redeeming greatness in the crime, any obscurity, any
 dubiety, perhaps he might have understood.  But the culprit stood, with
 his sore throat, in the sweat of his mortal agony, without defence or
 excuse: a thing to cover up with blushes: a being so much sunk beneath
 the zones of sympathy that pity might seem harmless.  And the judge had
 pursued him with a monstrous, relishing gaiety, horrible to be conceived,
 a trait for nightmares.  It is one thing to spear a tiger, another to
 crush a toad; there are sthetics even of the slaughter-house; and the
 loathsomeness of Duncan Jopp enveloped and infected the image of his
 judge.
 
 Archie passed by his friends in the High Street with incoherent words and
 gestures.  He saw Holyrood in a dream, remembrance of its romance awoke
 in him and faded; he had a vision of the old radiant stories, of Queen
 Mary and Prince Charlie, of the hooded stag, of the splendour and crime,
 the velvet and bright iron of the past; and dismissed them with a cry of
 pain.  He lay and moaned in the Hunters Bog, and the heavens were dark
 above him and the grass of the field an offence.  This is my father, he
 said.  I draw my life from him; the flesh upon my bones is his, the
 bread I am fed with is the wages of these horrors.  He recalled his
 mother, and ground his forehead in the earth.  He thought of flight, and
 where was he to flee to? of other lives, but was there any life worth
 living in this den of savage and jeering animals?
 
 The interval before the execution was like a violent dream.  He met his
 father; he would not look at him, he could not speak to him.  It seemed
 there was no living creature but must have been swift to recognise that
 imminent animosity; but the hide of the Justice-Clerk remained
 impenetrable.  Had my lord been talkative, the truce could never have
 subsisted; but he was by fortune in one of his humours of sour silence;
 and under the very guns of his broadside, Archie nursed the enthusiasm of
 rebellion.  It seemed to him, from the top of his nineteen years
 experience, as if he were marked at birth to be the perpetrator of some
 signal action, to set back fallen Mercy, to overthrow the usurping devil
 that sat, horned and hoofed, on her throne.  Seductive Jacobin figments,
 which he had often refuted at the Speculative, swam up in his mind and
 startled him as with voices: and he seemed to himself to walk accompanied
 by an almost tangible presence of new beliefs and duties.
 
 On the named morning he was at the place of execution.  He saw the
 fleering rabble, the flinching wretch produced.  He looked on for a while
 at a certain parody of devotion, which seemed to strip the wretch of his
 last claim to manhood.  Then followed the brutal instant of extinction,
 and the paltry dangling of the remains like a broken jumping-jack.  He
 had been prepared for something terrible, not for this tragic meanness.
 He stood a moment silent, and thenI denounce this God-defying murder,
 he shouted; and his father, if he must have disclaimed the sentiment,
 might have owned the stentorian voice with which it was uttered.
 
 Frank Innes dragged him from the spot.  The two handsome lads followed
 the same course of study and recreation, and felt a certain mutual
 attraction, founded mainly on good looks.  It had never gone deep; Frank
 was by nature a thin, jeering creature, not truly susceptible whether of
 feeling or inspiring friendship; and the relation between the pair was
 altogether on the outside, a thing of common knowledge and the
 pleasantries that spring from a common acquaintance.  The more credit to
 Frank that he was appalled by Archies outburst, and at least conceived
 the design of keeping him in sight, and, if possible, in hand, for the
 day.  But Archie, who had just defiedwas it God or Satan?would not
 listen to the word of a college companion.
 
 I will not go with you, he said.  I do not desire your company, sir; I
 would be alone.
 
 Here, Weir, man, dont be absurd, said Innes, keeping a tight hold upon
 his sleeve.  I will not let you go until I know what you mean to do with
 yourself; its no use brandishing that staff.  For indeed at that moment
 Archie had made a suddenperhaps a warlikemovement.  This has been the
 most insane affair; you know it has.  You know very well that Im playing
 the good Samaritan.  All I wish is to keep you quiet.
 
 If quietness is what you wish, Mr. Innes, said Archie, and you will
 promise to leave me entirely to myself, I will tell you so much, that I
 am going to walk in the country and admire the beauties of nature.
 
 Honour bright? asked Frank.
 
 I am not in the habit of lying, Mr. Innes, retorted Archie.  I have
 the honour of wishing you good-day.
 
 You wont forget the Spec.? asked Innes.
 
 The Spec.? said Archie.  O no, I wont forget the Spec.
 
 And the one young man carried his tortured spirit forth of the city and
 all the day long, by one road and another, in an endless pilgrimage of
 misery; while the other hastened smilingly to spread the news of Weirs
 access of insanity, and to drum up for that night a full attendance at
 the Speculative, where further eccentric developments might certainly be
 looked for.  I doubt if Innes had the least belief in his prediction; I
 think it flowed rather from a wish to make the story as good and the
 scandal as great as possible; not from any ill-will to Archiefrom the
 mere pleasure of beholding interested faces.  But for all that his words
 were prophetic.  Archie did not forget the Spec.; he put in an appearance
 there at the due time, and, before the evening was over, had dealt a
 memorable shock to his companions.  It chanced he was the president of
 the night.  He sat in the same room where the Society still meetsonly
 the portraits were not there: the men who afterwards sat for them were
 then but beginning their career.  The same lustre of many tapers shed its
 light over the meeting; the same chair, perhaps, supported him that so
 many of us have sat in since.  At times he seemed to forget the business
 of the evening, but even in these periods he sat with a great air of
 energy and determination.  At times he meddled bitterly, and launched
 with defiance those fines which are the precious and rarely used
 artillery of the president.  He little thought, as he did so, how he
 resembled his father, but his friends remarked upon it, chuckling.  So
 far, in his high place above his fellow-students, he seemed set beyond
 the possibility of any scandal; but his mind was made uphe was
 determined to fulfil the sphere of his offence.  He signed to Innes (whom
 he had just fined, and who just impeached his ruling) to succeed him in
 the chair, stepped down from the platform, and took his place by the
 chimney-piece, the shine of many wax tapers from above illuminating his
 pale face, the glow of the great red fire relieving from behind his slim
 figure.  He had to propose, as an amendment to the next subject in the
 case-book, Whether capital punishment be consistent with Gods will or
 mans policy?
 
 A breath of embarrassment, of something like alarm, passed round the
 room, so daring did these words appear upon the lips of Hermistons only
 son.  But the amendment was not seconded; the previous question was
 promptly moved and unanimously voted, and the momentary scandal smuggled
 by.  Innes triumphed in the fulfilment of his prophecy.  He and Archie
 were now become the heroes of the night; but whereas every one crowded
 about Innes, when the meeting broke up, but one of all his companions
 came to speak to Archie.
 
 Weir, man!  That was an extraordinary raid of yours! observed this
 courageous member, taking him confidentially by the arm as they went out.
 
 I dont think it a raid, said Archie grimly.  More like a war.  I saw
 that poor brute hanged this morning, and my gorge rises at it yet.
 
 Hut-tut, returned his companion, and, dropping his arm like something
 hot, he sought the less tense society of others.
 
 Archie found himself alone.  The last of the faithfulor was it only the
 boldest of the curious?had fled.  He watched the black huddle of his
 fellow-students draw off down and up the street, in whispering or
 boisterous gangs.  And the isolation of the moment weighed upon him like
 an omen and an emblem of his destiny in life.  Bred up in unbroken fear
 himself, among trembling servants, and in a house which (at the least
 ruffle in the masters voice) shuddered into silence, he saw himself on
 the brink of the red valley of war, and measured the danger and length of
 it with awe.  He made a detour in the glimmer and shadow of the streets,
 came into the back stable lane, and watched for a long while the light
 burn steady in the Judges room.  The longer he gazed upon that
 illuminated window-blind, the more blank became the picture of the man
 who sat behind it, endlessly turning over sheets of process, pausing to
 sip a glass of port, or rising and passing heavily about his book-lined
 walls to verify some reference.  He could not combine the brutal judge
 and the industrious, dispassionate student; the connecting link escaped
 him; from such a dual nature, it was impossible he should predict
 behaviour; and he asked himself if he had done well to plunge into a
 business of which the end could not be foreseen? and presently after,
 with a sickening decline of confidence, if he had done loyally to strike
 his father?  For he had struck himdefied him twice over and before a
 cloud of witnessesstruck him a public buffet before crowds.  Who had
 called him to judge his father in these precarious and high questions?
 The office was usurped.  It might have become a stranger; in a sonthere
 was no blinking itin a son, it was disloyal.  And now, between these two
 natures so antipathetic, so hateful to each other, there was depending an
 unpardonable affront: and the providence of God alone might foresee the
 manner in which it would be resented by Lord Hermiston.
 
 These misgivings tortured him all night and arose with him in the
 winters morning; they followed him from class to class, they made him
 shrinkingly sensitive to every shade of manner in his companions, they
 sounded in his ears through the current voice of the professor; and he
 brought them home with him at night unabated and indeed increased.  The
 cause of this increase lay in a chance encounter with the celebrated Dr.
 Gregory.  Archie stood looking vaguely in the lighted window of a book
 shop, trying to nerve himself for the approaching ordeal.  My lord and he
 had met and parted in the morning as they had now done for long, with
 scarcely the ordinary civilities of life; and it was plain to the son
 that nothing had yet reached the fathers ears.  Indeed, when he recalled
 the awful countenance of my lord, a timid hope sprang up in him that
 perhaps there would be found no one bold enough to carry tales.  If this
 were so, he asked himself, would he begin again? and he found no answer.
 It was at this moment that a hand was laid upon his arm, and a voice said
 in his ear, My dear Mr. Archie, you had better come and see me.
 
 He started, turned round, and found himself face to face with Dr.
 Gregory.  And why should I come to see you? he asked, with the defiance
 of the miserable.
 
 Because you are looking exceedingly ill, said the doctor, and you very
 evidently want looking after, my young friend.  Good folk are scarce, you
 know; and it is not every one that would be quite so much missed as
 yourself.  It is not every one that Hermiston would miss.
 
 And with a nod and a smile, the doctor passed on.
 
 A moment after, Archie was in pursuit, and had in turn, but more roughly,
 seized him by the arm.
 
 What do you mean? what did you mean by saying that?  What makes you
 think that Hermismy father would have missed me?
 
 The doctor turned about and looked him all over with a clinical eye.  A
 far more stupid man than Dr. Gregory might have guessed the truth; but
 ninety-nine out of a hundred, even if they had been equally inclined to
 kindness, would have blundered by some touch of charitable exaggeration.
 The doctor was better inspired.  He knew the father well; in that white
 face of intelligence and suffering, he divined something of the son; and
 he told, without apology or adornment, the plain truth.
 
 When you had the measles, Mr. Archibald, you had them gey and ill; and I
 thought you were going to slip between my fingers, he said.  Well, your
 father was anxious.  How did I know it? says you.  Simply because I am a
 trained observer.  The sign that I saw him make, ten thousand would have
 missed; and perhaps_perhaps_, I say, because hes a hard man to judge
 ofbut perhaps he never made another.  A strange thing to consider!  It
 was this.  One day I came to him: Hermiston, said I, theres a
 change.  He never said a word, just glowered at me (if yell pardon the
 phrase) like a wild beast.  A change for the better, said I.  And I
 distinctly heard him take his breath.
 
 The doctor left no opportunity for anti-climax; nodding his cocked hat (a
 piece of antiquity to which he clung) and repeating Distinctly with
 raised eye-brows, he took his departure, and left Archie speechless in
 the street.
 
 The anecdote might be called infinitely little, and yet its meaning for
 Archie was immense.  I did not know the old man had so much blood in
 him.  He had never dreamed this sire of his, this aboriginal antique,
 this adamantine Adam, had even so much of a heart as to be moved in the
 least degree for anotherand that other himself, who had insulted him!
 With the generosity of youth, Archie was instantly under arms upon the
 other side: had instantly created a new image of Lord Hermiston, that of
 a man who was all iron without and all sensibility within.  The mind of
 the vile jester, the tongue that had pursued Duncan Jopp with unmanly
 insults, the unbeloved countenance that he had known and feared for so
 long, were all forgotten; and he hastened home, impatient to confess his
 misdeeds, impatient to throw himself on the mercy of this imaginary
 character.
 
 He was not to be long without a rude awakening.  It was in the gloaming
 when he drew near the door-step of the lighted house, and was aware of
 the figure of his father approaching from the opposite side.  Little
 daylight lingered; but on the door being opened, the strong yellow shine
 of the lamp gushed out upon the landing and shone full on Archie, as he
 stood, in the old-fashioned observance of respect, to yield precedence.
 The judge came without haste, stepping stately and firm; his chin raised,
 his face (as he entered the lamplight) strongly illumined, his mouth set
 hard.  There was never a wink of change in his expression; without
 looking to the right or left, he mounted the stair, passed close to
 Archie, and entered the house.  Instinctively, the boy, upon his first
 coming, had made a movement to meet him; instinctively he recoiled
 against the railing, as the old man swept by him in a pomp of
 indignation.  Words were needless; he knew allperhaps more than alland
 the hour of judgment was at hand.
 
 It is possible that, in this sudden revulsion of hope, and before these
 symptoms of impending danger, Archie might have fled.  But not even that
 was left to him.  My lord, after hanging up his cloak and hat, turned
 round in the lighted entry, and made him an imperative and silent gesture
 with his thumb, and with the strange instinct of obedience, Archie
 followed him into the house.
 
 All dinner-time there reigned over the Judges table a palpable silence,
 and as soon as the solids were despatched he rose to his feet.
 
 MKillup, tak the wine into my room, said he; and then to his son:
 Archie, you and me has to have a talk.
 
 It was at this sickening moment that Archies courage, for the first and
 last time, entirely deserted him.  I have an appointment, said he.
 
 Itll have to be broken, then, said Hermiston, and led the way into his
 study.
 
 The lamp was shaded, the fire trimmed to a nicety, the table covered deep
 with orderly documents, the backs of law books made a frame upon all
 sides that was only broken by the window and the doors.
 
 For a moment Hermiston warmed his hands at the fire, presenting his back
 to Archie; then suddenly disclosed on him the terrors of the Hanging
 Face.
 
 Whats this I hear of ye? he asked.
 
 There was no answer possible to Archie.
 
 Ill have to tell ye, then, pursued Hermiston.  It seems yeve been
 skirting against the father that begot ye, and one of his Maijestys
 Judges in this land; and that in the public street, and while an order of
 the Court was being executit.  Forbye which, it would appear that yeve
 been airing your opeenions in a Coallege Debatin Society; he paused a
 moment: and then, with extraordinary bitterness, added: Ye damned
 eediot.
 
 I had meant to tell you, stammered Archie.  I see you are well
 informed.
 
 Muckle obleeged to ye, said his lordship, and took his usual seat.
 And so you disapprove of Caapital Punishment? he added.
 
 I am sorry, sir, I do, said Archie.
 
 I am sorry, too, said his lordship.  And now, if you please, we shall
 approach this business with a little more parteecularity.  I hear that at
 the hanging of Duncan Joppand, man! ye had a fine client therein the
 middle of all the riff-raff of the ceety, ye thought fit to cry out,
 This is a damned murder, and my gorge rises at the man that haangit
 him.
 
 No, sir, these were not my words, cried Archie.
 
 What were yer words, then? asked the Judge.
 
 I believe I said, I denounce it as a murder! said the son.  I beg
 your pardona God-defying murder.  I have no wish to conceal the truth,
 he added, and looked his father for a moment in the face.
 
 God, it would only need that of it next! cried Hermiston.  There was
 nothing about your gorge rising, then?
 
 That was afterwards, my lord, as I was leaving the Speculative.  I said
 I had been to see the miserable creature hanged, and my gorge rose at
 it.
 
 Did ye, though? said Hermiston.  And I suppose ye knew who haangit
 him?
 
 I was present at the trial, I ought to tell you that, I ought to
 explain.  I ask your pardon beforehand for any expression that may seem
 undutiful.  The position in which I stand is wretched, said the unhappy
 hero, now fairly face to face with the business he had chosen.  I have
 been reading some of your cases.  I was present while Jopp was tried.  It
 was a hideous business.  Father, it was a hideous thing!  Grant he was
 vile, why should you hunt him with a vileness equal to his own?  It was
 done with gleethat is the wordyou did it with glee; and I looked on,
 God help me! with horror.
 
 Youre a young gentleman that doesna approve of Caapital Punishment,
 said Hermiston.  Weel, Im an auld man that does.  I was glad to get
 Jopp haangit, and what for would I pretend I wasna?  Youre all for
 honesty, it seems; you couldnt even steik your mouth on the public
 street.  What for should I steik mines upon the bench, the Kings
 officer, bearing the sword, a dreid to evil-doers, as I was from the
 beginning, and as I will be to the end!  Mair than enough of it!
 Heedious!  I never gave twa thoughts to heediousness, I have no call to
 be bonny.  Im a man that gets through with my days business, and let
 that suffice.
 
 The ring of sarcasm had died out of his voice as he went on; the plain
 words became invested with some of the dignity of the Justice-seat.
 
 It would be telling you if you could say as much, the speaker resumed.
 But ye cannot.  Yeve been reading some of my cases, ye say.  But it was
 not for the law in them, it was to spy out your faithers nakedness, a
 fine employment in a son.  Youre splairging; youre running at lairge in
 life like a wild nowt.  Its impossible you should think any longer of
 coming to the Bar.  Youre not fit for it; no splairger is.  And another
 thing: son of mines or no son of mines, you have flung fylement in public
 on one of the Senators of the Coallege of Justice, and I would make it my
 business to see that ye were never admitted there yourself.  There is a
 kind of a decency to be observit.  Then comes the next of itwhat am I to
 do with ye next?  Yell have to find some kind of a trade, for Ill never
 support ye in idleset.  What do ye fancy yell be fit for?  The pulpit?
 Na, they could never get diveenity into that bloackhead.  Him that the
 law of man whammles is no likely to do muckle better by the law of God.
 What would ye make of hell?  Wouldna your gorge rise at that?  Na,
 theres no room for splairgers under the fower quarters of John Calvin.
 What else is there?  Speak up.  Have ye got nothing of your own?
 
 Father, let me go to the Peninsula, said Archie.  Thats all Im fit
 forto fight.
 
 All? quo he! returned the Judge.  And it would be enough too, if I
 thought it.  But Ill never trust ye so near the French, you thats so
 Frenchi-feed.
 
 You do me injustice there, sir, said Archie.  I am loyal; I will not
 boast; but any interest I may have ever felt in the French
 
 Have ye been so loyal to me? interrupted his father.
 
 There came no reply.
 
 I think not, continued Hermiston.  And I would send no man to be a
 servant to the King, God bless him! that has proved such a shauchling son
 to his own faither.  You can splairge here on Edinburgh street, and
 wheres the hairm?  It doesna play buff on me!  And if there were twenty
 thousand eediots like yourself, sorrow a Duncan Jopp would hang the
 fewer.  But theres no splairging possible in a camp; and if ye were to
 go to it, you would find out for yourself whether Lord Wellnton
 approves of caapital punishment or not.  You a sodger! he cried, with a
 sudden burst of scorn.  Ye auld wife, the sodgers would bray at ye like
 cuddies!
 
 As at the drawing of a curtain, Archie was aware of some illogicality in
 his position, and stood abashed.  He had a strong impression, besides, of
 the essential valour of the old gentleman before him, how conveyed it
 would be hard to say.
 
 Well, have ye no other proposeetion? said my lord again.
 
 You have taken this so calmly, sir, that I cannot but stand ashamed,
 began Archie.
 
 Im nearer voamiting, though, than you would fancy, said my lord.  The
 blood rose to Archies brow.
 
 I beg your pardon, I should have said that you had accepted my affront.
 . . . I admit it was an affront; I did not think to apologise, but I do,
 I ask your pardon; it will not be so again, I pass you my word of honour.
 . . . I should have said that I admired your magnanimity
 withthisoffender, Archie concluded with a gulp.
 
 I have no other son, ye see, said Hermiston.  A bonny one I have
 gotten!  But I must just do the best I can wi him, and what am I to do?
 If ye had been younger, I would have wheepit ye for this rideeculous
 exhibeetion.  The way it is, I have just to grin and bear.  But one thing
 is to be clearly understood.  As a faither, I must grin and bear it; but
 if I had been the Lord Advocate instead of the Lord Justice-Clerk, son or
 no son, Mr. Erchibald Weir would have been in a jyle the night.
 
 Archie was now dominated.  Lord Hermiston was coarse and cruel; and yet
 the son was aware of a bloomless nobility, an ungracious abnegation of
 the mans self in the mans office.  At every word, this sense of the
 greatness of Lord Hermistons spirit struck more home; and along with it
 that of his own impotence, who had struckand perhaps basely struckat
 his own father, and not reached so far as to have even nettled him.
 
 I place myself in your hands without reserve, he said.
 
 Thats the first sensible word Ive had of ye the night, said
 Hermiston.  I can tell ye, that would have been the end of it, the one
 way or the other; but its better ye should come there yourself, than
 what I would have had to hirstle ye.  Weel, by my way of itand my way is
 the besttheres just the one thing its possible that ye might be with
 decency, and thats a laird.  Yell be out of hairms way at the least of
 it.  If ye have to rowt, ye can rowt amang the kye; and the maist feck of
 the caapital punishment yere like to come acrossll be guddling trouts.
 Now, Im for no idle lairdies; every man has to work, if its only at
 peddling ballants; to work, or to be wheeped, or to be haangit.  If I set
 ye down at Hermiston Ill have to see you work that place the way it has
 never been workit yet; ye must ken about the sheep like a herd; ye must
 be my grieve there, and Ill see that I gain by ye.  Is that understood?
 
 I will do my best, said Archie.
 
 Well, then, Ill send Kirstie word the morn, and ye can go yourself the
 day after, said Hermiston.  And just try to be less of an eediot! he
 concluded with a freezing smile, and turned immediately to the papers on
 his desk.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IVOPINIONS OF THE BENCH
 
 
 Late the same night, after a disordered walk, Archie was admitted into
 Lord Glenalmonds dining-room, where he sat with a book upon his knee,
 beside three frugal coals of fire.  In his robes upon the bench,
 Glenalmond had a certain air of burliness: plucked of these, it was a
 may-pole of a man that rose unsteadily from his chair to give his visitor
 welcome.  Archie had suffered much in the last days, he had suffered
 again that evening; his face was white and drawn, his eyes wild and dark.
 But Lord Glenalmond greeted him without the least mark of surprise or
 curiosity.
 
 Come in, come in, said he.  Come in and take a seat.  Carstairs (to
 his servant), make up the fire, and then you can bring a bit of supper,
 and again to Archie, with a very trivial accent: I was half expecting
 you, he added.
 
 No supper, said Archie.  It is impossible that I should eat.
 
 Not impossible, said the tall old man, laying his hand upon his
 shoulder, and, if you will believe me, necessary.
 
 You know what brings me? said Archie, as soon as the servant had left
 the room.
 
 I have a guess, I have a guess, replied Glenalmond.  We will talk of
 it presentlywhen Carstairs has come and gone, and you have had a piece
 of my good Cheddar cheese and a pull at the porter tankard: not before.
 
 It is impossible I should eat repeated Archie.
 
 Tut, tut! said Lord Glenalmond.  You have eaten nothing to-day, and I
 venture to add, nothing yesterday.  There is no case that may not be made
 worse; this may be a very disagreeable business, but if you were to fall
 sick and die, it would be still more so, and for all concernedfor all
 concerned.
 
 I see you must know all, said Archie.  Where did you hear it?
 
 In the mart of scandal, in the Parliament House, said Glenalmond.  It
 runs riot below among the bar and the public, but it sifts up to us upon
 the bench, and rumour has some of her voices even in the divisions.
 
 Carstairs returned at this moment, and rapidly laid out a little supper;
 during which Lord Glenalmond spoke at large and a little vaguely on
 indifferent subjects, so that it might be rather said of him that he made
 a cheerful noise, than that he contributed to human conversation; and
 Archie sat upon the other side, not heeding him, brooding over his wrongs
 and errors.
 
 But so soon as the servant was gone, he broke forth again at once.  Who
 told my father?  Who dared to tell him?  Could it have been you?
 
 No, it was not me, said the Judge; althoughto be quite frank with
 you, and after I had seen and warned youit might have been meI believe
 it was Glenkindie.
 
 That shrimp! cried Archie.
 
 As you say, that shrimp, returned my lord; although really it is
 scarce a fitting mode of expression for one of the senators of the
 College of Justice.  We were hearing the parties in a long, crucial case,
 before the fifteen; Creech was moving at some length for an infeftment;
 when I saw Glenkindie lean forward to Hermiston with his hand over his
 mouth and make him a secret communication.  No one could have guessed its
 nature from your father: from Glenkindie, yes, his malice sparked out of
 him a little grossly.  But your father, no.  A man of granite.  The next
 moment he pounced upon Creech.  Mr. Creech, says he, Ill take a look
 of that sasine, and for thirty minutes after, said Glenalmond, with a
 smile, Messrs. Creech and Co. were fighting a pretty up-hill battle,
 which resulted, I need hardly add, in their total rout.  The case was
 dismissed.  No, I doubt if ever I heard Hermiston better inspired.  He
 was literally rejoicing _in apicibus juris_.
 
 Archie was able to endure no longer.  He thrust his plate away and
 interrupted the deliberate and insignificant stream of talk.  Here, he
 said, I have made a fool of myself, if I have not made something worse.
 Do you judge between usjudge between a father and a son.  I can speak to
 you; it is not like . . . I will tell you what I feel and what I mean to
 do; and you shall be the judge, he repeated.
 
 I decline jurisdiction, said Glenalmond, with extreme seriousness.
 But, my dear boy, if it will do you any good to talk, and if it will
 interest you at all to hear what I may choose to say when I have heard
 you, I am quite at your command.  Let an old man say it, for once, and
 not need to blush: I love you like a son.
 
 There came a sudden sharp sound in Archies throat.  Ay, he cried, and
 there it is!  Love!  Like a son!  And how do you think I love my father?
 
 Quietly, quietly, says my lord.
 
 I will be very quiet, replied Archie.  And I will be baldly frank.  I
 do not love my father; I wonder sometimes if I do not hate him.  Theres
 my shame; perhaps my sin; at least, and in the sight of God, not my
 fault.  How was I to love him?  He has never spoken to me, never smiled
 upon me; I do not think he ever touched me.  You know the way he talks?
 You do not talk so, yet you can sit and hear him without shuddering, and
 I cannot.  My soul is sick when he begins with it; I could smite him in
 the mouth.  And all thats nothing.  I was at the trial of this Jopp.
 You were not there, but you must have heard him often; the mans
 notorious for it, for beinglook at my position! hes my father and this
 is how I have to speak of himnotorious for being a brute and cruel and a
 coward.  Lord Glenalmond, I give you my word, when I came out of that
 Court, I longed to diethe shame of it was beyond my strength: but II
 he rose from his seat and began to pace the room in a disorder.  Well,
 who am I?  A boy, who have never been tried, have never done anything
 except this twopenny impotent folly with my father.  But I tell you, my
 lord, and I know myself, I am at least that kind of a manor that kind of
 a boy, if you prefer itthat I could die in torments rather than that any
 one should suffer as that scoundrel suffered.  Well, and what have I
 done?  I see it now.  I have made a fool of myself, as I said in the
 beginning; and I have gone back, and asked my fathers pardon, and placed
 myself wholly in his handsand he has sent me to Hermiston, with a
 wretched smile, for life, I supposeand what can I say? he strikes me as
 having done quite right, and let me off better than I had deserved.
 
 My poor, dear boy! observed Glenalmond.  My poor dear and, if you will
 allow me to say so, very foolish boy!  You are only discovering where you
 are; to one of your temperament, or of mine, a painful discovery.  The
 world was not made for us; it was made for ten hundred millions of men,
 all different from each other and from us; theres no royal road there,
 we just have to sclamber and tumble.  Dont think that I am at all
 disposed to be surprised; dont suppose that I ever think of blaming you;
 indeed I rather admire!  But there fall to be offered one or two
 observations on the case which occur to me and which (if you will listen
 to them dispassionately) may be the means of inducing you to view the
 matter more calmly.  First of all, I cannot acquit you of a good deal of
 what is called intolerance.  You seem to have been very much offended
 because your father talks a little sculduddery after dinner, which it is
 perfectly licit for him to do, and which (although I am not very fond of
 it myself) appears to be entirely an affair of taste.  Your father, I
 scarcely like to remind you, since it is so trite a commonplace, is older
 than yourself.  At least, he is _major_ and _sui juris_, and may please
 himself in the matter of his conversation.  And, do you know, I wonder if
 he might not have as good an answer against you and me?  We say we
 sometimes find him _coarse_, but I suspect he might retort that he finds
 us always dull.  Perhaps a relevant exception.
 
 He beamed on Archie, but no smile could be elicited.
 
 And now, proceeded the Judge, for Archibald on Capital Punishment.
 This is a very plausible academic opinion; of course I do not and I
 cannot hold it; but thats not to say that many able and excellent
 persons have not done so in the past.  Possibly, in the past also, I may
 have a little dipped myself in the same heresy.  My third client, or
 possibly my fourth, was the means of a return in my opinions.  I never
 saw the man I more believed in; I would have put my hand in the fire, I
 would have gone to the cross for him; and when it came to trial he was
 gradually pictured before me, by undeniable probation, in the light of so
 gross, so cold-blooded, and so black-hearted a villain, that I had a mind
 to have cast my brief upon the table.  I was then boiling against the man
 with even a more tropical temperature than I had been boiling for him.
 But I said to myself: No, you have taken up his case; and because you
 have changed your mind it must not be suffered to let drop.  All that
 rich tide of eloquence that you prepared last night with so much
 enthusiasm is out of place, and yet you must not desert him, you must say
 something.  So I said something, and I got him off.  It made my
 reputation.  But an experience of that kind is formative.  A man must not
 bring his passions to the baror to the bench, he added.
 
 The story had slightly rekindled Archies interest.  I could never
 deny, he beganI mean I can conceive that some men would be better
 dead.  But who are we to know all the springs of Gods unfortunate
 creatures?  Who are we to trust ourselves where it seems that God Himself
 must think twice before He treads, and to do it with delight? Yes, with
 delight.  _Tigris ut aspera_.
 
 Perhaps not a pleasant spectacle, said Glenalmond.  And yet, do you
 know, I think somehow a great one.
 
 Ive had a long talk with him to-night, said Archie.
 
 I was supposing so, said Glenalmond.
 
 And he struck meI cannot deny that he struck me as something very big,
 pursued the son.  Yes, he is big.  He never spoke about himself; only
 about me.  I suppose I admired him.  The dreadful part
 
 Suppose we did not talk about that, interrupted Glenalmond.  You know
 it very well, it cannot in any way help that you should brood upon it,
 and I sometimes wonder whether you and Iwho are a pair of
 sentimentalistsare quite good judges of plain men.
 
 How do you mean? asked Archie.
 
 _Fair_ judges, mean, replied Glenalmond.  Can we be just to them?  Do
 we not ask too much?  There was a word of yours just now that impressed
 me a little when you asked me who we were to know all the springs of
 Gods unfortunate creatures.  You applied that, as I understood, to
 capital cases only.  But does itI ask myselfdoes it not apply all
 through?  Is it any less difficult to judge of a good man or of a
 half-good man, than of the worst criminal at the bar?  And may not each
 have relevant excuses?
 
 Ah, but we do not talk of punishing the good, cried Archie.
 
 No, we do not talk of it, said Glenalmond.  But I think we do it.
 Your father, for instance.
 
 You think I have punished him? cried Archie.
 
 Lord Glenalmond bowed his head.
 
 I think I have, said Archie.  And the worst is, I think he feels it!
 How much, who can tell, with such a being?  But I think he does.
 
 And I am sure of it, said Glenalmond.
 
 Has he spoken to you, then? cried Archie.
 
 O no, replied the judge.
 
 I tell you honestly, said Archie, I want to make it up to him.  I will
 go, I have already pledged myself to go to Hermiston.  That was to him.
 And now I pledge myself to you, in the sight of God, that I will close my
 mouth on capital punishment and all other subjects where our views may
 clash, forhow long shall I say? when shall I have sense enough?ten
 years.  Is that well?
 
 It is well, said my lord.
 
 As far as it goes, said Archie.  It is enough as regards myself, it is
 to lay down enough of my conceit.  But as regards him, whom I have
 publicly insulted?  What am I to do to him?  How do you pay attentions to
 aan Alp like that?
 
 Only in one way, replied Glenalmond.  Only by obedience, punctual,
 prompt, and scrupulous.
 
 And I promise that he shall have it, answered Archie.  I offer you my
 hand in pledge of it.
 
 And I take your hand as a solemnity, replied the judge.  God bless
 you, my dear, and enable you to keep your promise.  God guide you in the
 true way, and spare your days, and preserve to you your honest heart. At
 that, he kissed the young man upon the forehead in a gracious, distant,
 antiquated way; and instantly launched, with a marked change of voice,
 into another subject.  And now, let us replenish the tankard; and I
 believe if you will try my Cheddar again, you would find you had a better
 appetite.  The Court has spoken, and the case is dismissed.
 
 No, there is one thing I must say, cried Archie.  I must say it in
 justice to himself.  I knowI believe faithfully, slavishly, after our
 talkhe will never ask me anything unjust.  I am proud to feel it, that
 we have that much in common, I am proud to say it to you.
 
 The Judge, with shining eyes, raised his tankard.  And I think perhaps
 that we might permit ourselves a toast, said he.  I should like to
 propose the health of a man very different from me and very much my
 superiora man from whom I have often differed, who has often (in the
 trivial expression) rubbed me the wrong way, but whom I have never ceased
 to respect and, I may add, to be not a little afraid of.  Shall I give
 you his name?
 
 The Lord Justice-Clerk, Lord Hermiston, said Archie, almost with
 gaiety; and the pair drank the toast deeply.
 
 It was not precisely easy to re-establish, after these emotional
 passages, the natural flow of conversation.  But the Judge eked out what
 was wanting with kind looks, produced his snuff-box (which was very
 rarely seen) to fill in a pause, and at last, despairing of any further
 social success, was upon the point of getting down a book to read a
 favourite passage, when there came a rather startling summons at the
 front door, and Carstairs ushered in my Lord Glenkindie, hot from a
 midnight supper.  I am not aware that Glenkindie was ever a beautiful
 object, being short, and gross-bodied, and with an expression of
 sensuality comparable to a bears.  At that moment, coming in hissing
 from many potations, with a flushed countenance and blurred eyes, he was
 strikingly contrasted with the tall, pale, kingly figure of Glenalmond.
 A rush of confused thought came over Archieof shame that this was one of
 his fathers elect friends; of pride, that at the least of it Hermiston
 could carry his liquor; and last of all, of rage, that he should have
 here under his eyes the man that had betrayed him.  And then that too
 passed away; and he sat quiet, biding his opportunity.
 
 The tipsy senator plunged at once into an explanation with Glenalmond.
 There was a point reserved yesterday, he had been able to make neither
 head nor tail of it, and seeing lights in the house, he had just dropped
 in for a glass of porterand at this point he became aware of the third
 person.  Archie saw the cods mouth and the blunt lips of Glenkindie gape
 at him for a moment, and the recognition twinkle in his eyes.
 
 Whos this? said he.  What? is this possibly you, Don Quickshot?  And
 how are ye?  And hows your father?  And whats all this we hear of you?
 It seems youre a most extraordinary leveller, by all tales.  No king, no
 parliaments, and your gorge rises at the macers, worthy men!  Hoot, toot!
 Dear, dear me!  Your fathers son too!  Most rideeculous!
 
 Archie was on his feet, flushing a little at the reappearance of his
 unhappy figure of speech, but perfectly self-possessed.  My lordand
 you, Lord Glenalmond, my dear friend, he began, this is a happy chance
 for me, that I can make my confession and offer my apologies to two of
 you at once.
 
 Ah, but I dont know about that.  Confession?  Itll be judeecial, my
 young friend, cried the jocular Glenkindie.  And Im afraid to listen
 to ye.  Think if ye were to make me a coanvert!
 
 If you would allow me, my lord, returned Archie, what I have to say is
 very serious to me; and be pleased to be humorous after I am gone!
 
 Remember, Ill hear nothing against the macers! put in the incorrigible
 Glenkindie.
 
 But Archie continued as though he had not spoken.  I have played, both
 yesterday and to-day, a part for which I can only offer the excuse of
 youth.  I was so unwise as to go to an execution; it seems I made a scene
 at the gallows; not content with which, I spoke the same night in a
 college society against capital punishment.  This is the extent of what I
 have done, and in case you hear more alleged against me, I protest my
 innocence.  I have expressed my regret already to my father, who is so
 good as to pass my conduct overin a degree, and upon the condition that
 I am to leave my law studies. . . .
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VWINTER ON THE MOORS
 
 
 I. At Hermiston
 
 
 The road to Hermiston runs for a great part of the way up the valley of a
 stream, a favourite with anglers and with midges, full of falls and
 pools, and shaded by willows and natural woods of birch.  Here and there,
 but at great distances, a byway branches off, and a gaunt farmhouse may
 be descried above in a fold of the hill; but the more part of the time,
 the road would be quite empty of passage and the hills of habitation.
 Hermiston parish is one of the least populous in Scotland; and, by the
 time you came that length, you would scarce be surprised at the
 inimitable smallness of the kirk, a dwarfish, ancient place seated for
 fifty, and standing in a green by the burn-side among two-score
 gravestones.  The manse close by, although no more than a cottage, is
 surrounded by the brightness of a flower-garden and the straw roofs of
 bees; and the whole colony, kirk and manse, garden and graveyard, finds
 harbourage in a grove of rowans, and is all the year round in a great
 silence broken only by the drone of the bees, the tinkle of the burn, and
 the bell on Sundays.  A mile beyond the kirk the road leaves the valley
 by a precipitous ascent, and brings you a little after to the place of
 Hermiston, where it comes to an end in the back-yard before the
 coach-house.  All beyond and about is the great field, of the hills; the
 plover, the curlew, and the lark cry there; the wind blows as it blows in
 a ships rigging, hard and cold and pure; and the hill-tops huddle one
 behind another like a herd of cattle into the sunset.
 
 The house was sixty years old, unsightly, comfortable; a farmyard and a
 kitchen-garden on the left, with a fruit wall where little hard green
 pears came to their maturity about the end of October.
 
 The policy (as who should say the park) was of some extent, but very ill
 reclaimed; heather and moorfowl had crossed the boundary wall and spread
 and roosted within; and it would have tasked a landscape gardener to say
 where policy ended and unpolicied nature began.  My lord had been led by
 the influence of Mr. Sheriff Scott into a considerable design of
 planting; many acres were accordingly set out with fir, and the little
 feathery besoms gave a false scale and lent a strange air of a toy-shop
 to the moors.  A great, rooty sweetness of bogs was in the air, and at
 all seasons an infinite melancholy piping of hill birds.  Standing so
 high and with so little shelter, it was a cold, exposed house, splashed
 by showers, drenched by continuous rains that made the gutters to spout,
 beaten upon and buffeted by all the winds of heaven; and the prospect
 would be often black with tempest, and often white with the snows of
 winter.  But the house was wind and weather proof, the hearths were kept
 bright, and the rooms pleasant with live fires of peat; and Archie might
 sit of an evening and hear the squalls bugle on the moorland, and watch
 the fire prosper in the earthy fuel, and the smoke winding up the
 chimney, and drink deep of the pleasures of shelter.
 
 Solitary as the place was, Archie did not want neighbours.  Every night,
 if he chose, he might go down to the manse and share a brewst of toddy
 with the ministera hare-brained ancient gentleman, long and light and
 still active, though his knees were loosened with age, and his voice
 broke continually in childish treblesand his lady wife, a heavy, comely
 dame, without a word to say for herself beyond good-even and good-day.
 Harum-scarum, clodpole young lairds of the neighbourhood paid him the
 compliment of a visit.  Young Hay of Romanes rode down to call, on his
 crop-eared pony; young Pringle of Drumanno came up on his bony grey.  Hay
 remained on the hospitable field, and must be carried to bed; Pringle got
 somehow to his saddle about 3 A.M., and (as Archie stood with the lamp on
 the upper doorstep) lurched, uttered a senseless view-holloa, and
 vanished out of the small circle of illumination like a wraith.  Yet a
 minute or two longer the clatter of his break-neck flight was audible,
 then it was cut off by the intervening steepness of the hill; and again,
 a great while after, the renewed beating of phantom horse-hoofs, far in
 the valley of the Hermiston, showed that the horse at least, if not his
 rider, was still on the homeward way.
 
 There was a Tuesday club at the Cross-keys in Crossmichael, where the
 young bloods of the country-side congregated and drank deep on a
 percentage of the expense, so that he was left gainer who should have
 drunk the most.  Archie had no great mind to this diversion, but he took
 it like a duty laid upon him, went with a decent regularity, did his
 manfullest with the liquor, held up his head in the local jests, and got
 home again and was able to put up his horse, to the admiration of Kirstie
 and the lass that helped her.  He dined at Driffel, supped at Windielaws.
 He went to the new years ball at Huntsfield and was made welcome, and
 thereafter rode to hounds with my Lord Muirfell, upon whose name, as that
 of a legitimate Lord of Parliament, in a work so full of Lords of
 Session, my pen should pause reverently.  Yet the same fate attended him
 here as in Edinburgh.  The habit of solitude tends to perpetuate itself,
 and an austerity of which he was quite unconscious, and a pride which
 seemed arrogance, and perhaps was chiefly shyness, discouraged and
 offended his new companions.  Hay did not return more than twice, Pringle
 never at all, and there came a time when Archie even desisted from the
 Tuesday Club, and became in all thingswhat he had had the name of almost
 from the firstthe Recluse of Hermiston.  High-nosed Miss Pringle of
 Drumanno and high-stepping Miss Marshall of the Mains were understood to
 have had a difference of opinion about him the day after the ballhe was
 none the wiser, he could not suppose himself to be remarked by these
 entrancing ladies.  At the ball itself my Lord Muirfells daughter, the
 Lady Flora, spoke to him twice, and the second time with a touch of
 appeal, so that her colour rose and her voice trembled a little in his
 ear, like a passing grace in music.  He stepped back with a heart on
 fire, coldly and not ungracefully excused himself, and a little after
 watched her dancing with young Drumanno of the empty laugh, and was
 harrowed at the sight, and raged to himself that this was a world in
 which it was given to Drumanno to please, and to himself only to stand
 aside and envy.  He seemed excluded, as of right, from the favour of such
 societyseemed to extinguish mirth wherever he came, and was quick to
 feel the wound, and desist, and retire into solitude.  If he had but
 understood the figure he presented, and the impression he made on these
 bright eyes and tender hearts; if he had but guessed that the Recluse of
 Hermiston, young, graceful, well spoken, but always cold, stirred the
 maidens of the county with the charm of Byronism when Byronism was new,
 it may be questioned whether his destiny might not even yet have been
 modified.  It may be questioned, and I think it should be doubted.  It
 was in his horoscope to be parsimonious of pain to himself, or of the
 chance of pain, even to the avoidance of any opportunity of pleasure; to
 have a Roman sense of duty, an instinctive aristocracy of manners and
 taste; to be the son of Adam Weir and Jean Rutherford.
 
 
 
 2. Kirstie
 
 
 Kirstie was now over fifty, and might have sat to a sculptor.  Long of
 limb, and still light of foot, deep-breasted, robust-loined, her golden
 hair not yet mingled with any trace of silver, the years had but caressed
 and embellished her.  By the lines of a rich and vigorous maternity, she
 seemed destined to be the bride of heroes and the mother of their
 children; and behold, by the iniquity of fate, she had passed through her
 youth alone, and drew near to the confines of age, a childless woman.
 The tender ambitions that she had received at birth had been, by time and
 disappointment, diverted into a certain barren zeal of industry and fury
 of interference.  She carried her thwarted ardours into housework, she
 washed floors with her empty heart.  If she could not win the love of one
 with love, she must dominate all by her temper.  Hasty, wordy, and
 wrathful, she had a drawn quarrel with most of her neighbours, and with
 the others not much more than armed neutrality.  The grieves wife had
 been sneisty; the sister of the gardener who kept house for him had
 shown herself upsitten; and she wrote to Lord Hermiston about once a
 year demanding the discharge of the offenders, and justifying the demand
 by much wealth of detail.  For it must not be supposed that the quarrel
 rested with the wife and did not take in the husband alsoor with the
 gardeners sister, and did not speedily include the gardener himself.  As
 the upshot of all this petty quarrelling and intemperate speech, she was
 practically excluded (like a lightkeeper on his tower) from the comforts
 of human association; except with her own indoor drudge, who, being but a
 lassie and entirely at her mercy, must submit to the shifty weather of
 the mistresss moods without complaint, and be willing to take buffets
 or caresses according to the temper of the hour.  To Kirstie, thus
 situate and in the Indian summer of her heart, which was slow to submit
 to age, the gods sent this equivocal good thing of Archies presence.
 She had known him in the cradle and paddled him when he misbehaved; and
 yet, as she had not so much as set eyes on him since he was eleven and
 had his last serious illness, the tall, slender, refined, and rather
 melancholy young gentleman of twenty came upon her with the shock of a
 new acquaintance.  He was Young Hermiston, the laird himsel: he had
 an air of distinctive superiority, a cold straight glance of his black
 eyes, that abashed the womans tantrums in the beginning, and therefore
 the possibility of any quarrel was excluded.  He was new, and therefore
 immediately aroused her curiosity; he was reticent, and kept it awake.
 And lastly he was dark and she fair, and he was male and she female, the
 everlasting fountains of interest.
 
 Her feeling partook of the loyalty of a clanswoman, the hero-worship of a
 maiden aunt, and the idolatry due to a god.  No matter what he had asked
 of her, ridiculous or tragic, she would have done it and joyed to do it.
 Her passion, for it was nothing less, entirely filled her.  It was a rich
 physical pleasure to make his bed or light his lamp for him when he was
 absent, to pull off his wet boots or wait on him at dinner when he
 returned.  A young man who should have so doted on the idea, moral and
 physical, of any woman, might be properly described as being in love,
 head and heels, and would have behaved himself accordingly.  But
 Kirstiethough her heart leaped at his coming footstepsthough, when he
 patted her shoulder, her face brightened for the dayhad not a hope or
 thought beyond the present moment and its perpetuation to the end of
 time.  Till the end of time she would have had nothing altered, but still
 continue delightedly to serve her idol, and be repaid (say twice in the
 month) with a clap on the shoulder.
 
 I have said her heart leapedit is the accepted phrase.  But rather, when
 she was alone in any chamber of the house, and heard his foot passing on
 the corridors, something in her bosom rose slowly until her breath was
 suspended, and as slowly fell again with a deep sigh, when the steps had
 passed and she was disappointed of her eyes desire.  This perpetual
 hunger and thirst of his presence kept her all day on the alert.  When he
 went forth at morning, she would stand and follow him with admiring
 looks.  As it grew late and drew to the time of his return, she would
 steal forth to a corner of the policy wall and be seen standing there
 sometimes by the hour together, gazing with shaded eyes, waiting the
 exquisite and barren pleasure of his view a mile off on the mountains.
 When at night she had trimmed and gathered the fire, turned down his bed,
 and laid out his night-gearwhen there was no more to be done for the
 kings pleasure, but to remember him fervently in her usually very tepid
 prayers, and go to bed brooding upon his perfections, his future career,
 and what she should give him the next day for dinnerthere still remained
 before her one more opportunity; she was still to take in the tray and
 say good-night.  Sometimes Archie would glance up from his book with a
 preoccupied nod and a perfunctory salutation which was in truth a
 dismissal; sometimesand by degrees more oftenthe volume would be laid
 aside, he would meet her coming with a look of relief; and the
 conversation would be engaged, last out the supper, and be prolonged till
 the small hours by the waning fire.  It was no wonder that Archie was
 fond of company after his solitary days; and Kirstie, upon her side,
 exerted all the arts of her vigorous nature to ensnare his attention.
 She would keep back some piece of news during dinner to be fired off with
 the entrance of the supper tray, and form as it were the _lever de
 rideau_ of the evenings entertainment.  Once he had heard her tongue
 wag, she made sure of the result.  From one subject to another she moved
 by insidious transitions, fearing the least silence, fearing almost to
 give him time for an answer lest it should slip into a hint of
 separation.  Like so many people of her class, she was a brave narrator;
 her place was on the hearth-rug and she made it a rostrum, mimeing her
 stories as she told them, fitting them with vital detail, spinning them
 out with endless quo hes and quo shes, her voice sinking into a
 whisper over the supernatural or the horrific; until she would suddenly
 spring up in affected surprise, and pointing to the clock, Mercy, Mr.
 Archie! she would say, whatten a time o night is this of it!  God
 forgive me for a daft wife!  So it befell, by good management, that she
 was not only the first to begin these nocturnal conversations, but
 invariably the first to break them off; so she managed to retire and not
 to be dismissed.
 
 
 
 3. A Border Family
 
 
 Such an unequal intimacy has never been uncommon in Scotland, where the
 clan spirit survives; where the servant tends to spend her life in the
 same service, a helpmeet at first, then a tyrant, and at last a
 pensioner; where, besides, she is not necessarily destitute of the pride
 of birth, but is, perhaps, like Kirstie, a connection of her masters,
 and at least knows the legend of her own family, and may count kinship
 with some illustrious dead.  For that is the mark of the Scot of all
 classes: that he stands in an attitude towards the past unthinkable to
 Englishmen, and remembers and cherishes the memory of his forebears, good
 or bad; and there burns alive in him a sense of identity with the dead
 even to the twentieth generation.  No more characteristic instance could
 be found than in the family of Kirstie Elliott.  They were all, and
 Kirstie the first of all, ready and eager to pour forth the particulars
 of their genealogy, embellished with every detail that memory had handed
 down or fancy fabricated; and, behold! from every ramification of that
 tree there dangled a halter.  The Elliotts themselves have had a
 chequered history; but these Elliotts deduced, besides, from three of the
 most unfortunate of the border clansthe Nicksons, the Ellwalds, and the
 Crozers.  One ancestor after another might be seen appearing a moment out
 of the rain and the hill mist upon his furtive business, speeding home,
 perhaps, with a paltry booty of lame horses and lean kine, or squealing
 and dealing death in some moorland feud of the ferrets and the wild cats.
 One after another closed his obscure adventures in mid-air, triced up to
 the arm of the royal gibbet or the Barons dule-tree.  For the rusty
 blunderbuss of Scots criminal justice, which usually hurt nobody but
 jurymen, became a weapon of precision for the Nicksons, the Ellwalds, and
 the Crozers.  The exhilaration of their exploits seemed to haunt the
 memories of their descendants alone, and the shame to be forgotten.
 Pride glowed in their bosoms to publish their relationship to Andrew
 Ellwald of the Laverockstanes, called Unchancy Dand, who was justifeed
 wi seeven mair of the same name at Jeddart in the days of King James the
 Sax.  In all this tissue of crime and misfortune, the Elliotts of
 Cauldstaneslap had one boast which must appear legitimate: the males were
 gallows-birds, born outlaws, petty thieves, and deadly brawlers; but,
 according to the same tradition, the females were all chaste and
 faithful.  The power of ancestry on the character is not limited to the
 inheritance of cells.  If I buy ancestors by the gross from the
 benevolence of Lyon King of Arms, my grandson (if he is Scottish) will
 feel a quickening emulation of their deeds.  The men of the Elliotts were
 proud, lawless, violent as of right, cherishing and prolonging a
 tradition.  In like manner with the women.  And the woman, essentially
 passionate and reckless, who crouched on the rug, in the shine of the
 peat fire, telling these tales, had cherished through life a wild
 integrity of virtue.
 
 Her father Gilbert had been deeply pious, a savage disciplinarian in the
 antique style, and withal a notorious smuggler.  I mind when I was a
 bairn getting mony a skelp and being shood to bed like poutry, she
 would say.  That would be when the lads and their bit kegs were on the
 road.  Weve had the riffraff of two-three counties in our kitchen,
 monys the time, betwix the twelve and the three; and their lanterns
 would be standing in the forecourt, ay, a score o them at once.  But
 there was nae ungodly talk permitted at Cauldstaneslap.  My faither was a
 consistent man in walk and conversation; just let slip an aith, and there
 was the door to ye!  He had that zeal for the Lord, it was a fair wonder
 to hear him pray, but the family has aye had a gift that way. This
 father was twice married, once to a dark woman of the old Ellwald stock,
 by whom he had Gilbert, presently of Cauldstaneslap; and, secondly, to
 the mother of Kirstie.  He was an auld man when he married her, a fell
 auld man wi a muckle voiceyou could hear him rowting from the top o
 the Kye-skairs, she said; but for her, it appears she was a perfit
 wonder.  It was gentle blood she had, Mr. Archie, for it was your ain.
 The country-side gaed gyte about her and her gowden hair.  Mines is no to
 be mentioned wi it, and theres few weemen has mair hair than what I
 have, or yet a bonnier colour.  Often would I tell my dear Miss
 Jeanniethat was your mother, dear, she was cruel taen up about her
 hair, it was unco tender, ye seeHouts, Miss Jeannie, I would say,
 just fling your washes and your French dentifrishes in the back o the
 fire, for thats the place for them; and awa down to a burn side, and
 wash yersel in cauld hill water, and dry your bonny hair in the caller
 wind o the muirs, the way that my mother aye washed hers, and that I
 have aye made it a practice to have wishen minesjust you do what I tell
 ye, my dear, and yell give me news of it!  Yell have hair, and routh of
 hair, a pigtail as thicks my arm, I said, and the bonniest colour like
 the clear gowden guineas, so as the lads in kirkll no can keep their
 eyes off it!  Weel, it lasted out her time, puir thing!  I cuttit a lock
 of it upon her corp that was lying there sae cauld.  Ill show it ye some
 of thir days if yere good.  But, as I was sayin, my mither
 
 On the death of the father there remained golden-haired Kirstie, who took
 service with her distant kinsfolk, the Rutherfords, and black-a-vised
 Gilbert, twenty years older, who farmed the Cauldstaneslap, married, and
 begot four sons between 1773 and 1784, and a daughter, like a postscript,
 in 97, the year of Camperdown and Cape St. Vincent.  It seemed it was a
 tradition in the family to wind up with a belated girl.  In 1804, at the
 age of sixty, Gilbert met an end that might be called heroic.  He was due
 home from market any time from eight at night till five in the morning,
 and in any condition from the quarrelsome to the speechless, for he
 maintained to that age the goodly customs of the Scots farmer.  It was
 known on this occasion that he had a good bit of money to bring home; the
 word had gone round loosely.  The laird had shown his guineas, and if
 anybody had but noticed it, there was an ill-looking, vagabond crew, the
 scum of Edinburgh, that drew out of the market long ere it was dusk and
 took the hill-road by Hermiston, where it was not to be believed that
 they had lawful business.  One of the country-side, one Dickieson, they
 took with them to be their guide, and dear he paid for it!  Of a sudden
 in the ford of the Broken Dykes, this vermin clan fell on the laird, six
 to one, and him three parts asleep, having drunk hard.  But it is ill to
 catch an Elliott.  For a while, in the night and the black water that was
 deep as to his saddle-girths, he wrought with his staff like a smith at
 his stithy, and great was the sound of oaths and blows.  With that the
 ambuscade was burst, and he rode for home with a pistol-ball in him,
 three knife wounds, the loss of his front teeth, a broken rib and bridle,
 and a dying horse.  That was a race with death that the laird rode!  In
 the mirk night, with his broken bridle and his head swimming, he dug his
 spurs to the rowels in the horses side, and the horse, that was even
 worse off than himself, the poor creature! screamed out loud like a
 person as he went, so that the hills echoed with it, and the folks at
 Cauldstaneslap got to their feet about the table and looked at each other
 with white faces.  The horse fell dead at the yard gate, the laird won
 the length of the house and fell there on the threshold.  To the son that
 raised him he gave the bag of money.  Hae, said he.  All the way up the
 thieves had seemed to him to be at his heels, but now the hallucination
 left himhe saw them again in the place of the ambuscadeand the thirst
 of vengeance seized on his dying mind.  Raising himself and pointing with
 an imperious finger into the black night from which he had come, he
 uttered the single command, Brocken Dykes, and fainted.  He had never
 been loved, but he had been feared in honour.  At that sight, at that
 word, gasped out at them from a toothless and bleeding mouth, the old
 Elliott spirit awoke with a shout in the four sons.  Wanting the hat,
 continues my author, Kirstie, whom I but haltingly follow, for she told
 this tale like one inspired, wanting guns, for there wasna twa grains o
 pouder in the house, wi nae mair weepons than their sticks into their
 hands, the fower o them took the road.  Only Hob, and that was the
 eldest, hunkered at the doorsill where the blood had rin, fyled his hand
 wi itand haddit it up to Heeven in the way o the auld Border aith.
 Hell shall have her ain again this nicht! he raired, and rode forth
 upon his earrand.  It was three miles to Broken Dykes, down hill, and a
 sore road.  Kirstie has seen men from Edinburgh dismounting there in
 plain day to lead their horses.  But the four brothers rode it as if Auld
 Hornie were behind and Heaven in front.  Come to the ford, and there was
 Dickieson.  By all tales, he was not dead, but breathed and reared upon
 his elbow, and cried out to them for help.  It was at a graceless face
 that he asked mercy.  As soon as Hob saw, by the glint of the lantern,
 the eyes shining and the whiteness of the teeth in the mans face, Damn
 you! says he; ye hae your teeth, hae ye? and rode his horse to and fro
 upon that human remnant.  Beyond that, Dandie must dismount with the
 lantern to be their guide; he was the youngest son, scarce twenty at the
 time.  A nicht long they gaed in the wet heath and jennipers, and whaur
 they gaed they neither knew nor cared, but just followed the bluid stains
 and the footprints o their faithers murderers.  And a nicht Dandie had
 his nose to the grund like a tyke, and the ithers followed and spak
 naething, neither black nor white.  There was nae noise to be heard, but
 just the sough of the swalled burns, and Hob, the dour yin, risping his
 teeth as he gaed. With the first glint of the morning they saw they were
 on the drove road, and at that the four stopped and had a dram to their
 breakfasts, for they knew that Dand must have guided them right, and the
 rogues could be but little ahead, hot foot for Edinburgh by the way of
 the Pentland Hills.  By eight oclock they had word of thema shepherd
 had seen four men uncoly mishandled go by in the last hour.  Thats
 yin a piece, says Clem, and swung his cudgel.  Five o them! says Hob.
 Gods death, but the faither was a man!  And him drunk!  And then there
 befell them what my author termed a sair misbegowk, for they were
 overtaken by a posse of mounted neighbours come to aid in the pursuit.
 Four sour faces looked on the reinforcement.  The Deils broughten you!
 said Clem, and they rode thenceforward in the rear of the party with
 hanging heads.  Before ten they had found and secured the rogues, and by
 three of the afternoon, as they rode up the Vennel with their prisoners,
 they were aware of a concourse of people bearing in their midst something
 that dripped.  For the boady of the saxt, pursued Kirstie, wi his
 head smashed like a hazelnit, had been a that nicht in the chairge o
 Hermiston Water, and it dunting it on the stanes, and grunding it on the
 shallows, and flinging the deid thing heels-ower-hurdie at the Fas o
 Spango; and in the first o the day, Tweed had got a hold o him and
 carried him off like a wind, for it was uncoly swalled, and raced wi
 him, bobbing under brae-sides, and was long playing with the creature in
 the drumlie lynns under the castle, and at the hinder end of all cuist
 him up on the starling of Crossmichael brig.  Sae there they were
 athegither at last (for Dickieson had been brought in on a cart long
 syne), and folk could see what mainner oman my brither had been that had
 held his head again sax and saved the siller, and him drunk!  Thus died
 of honourable injuries and in the savour of fame Gilbert Elliott of the
 Cauldstaneslap; but his sons had scarce less glory out of the business.
 Their savage haste, the skill with which Dand had found and followed the
 trail, the barbarity to the wounded Dickieson (which was like an open
 secret in the county), and the doom which it was currently supposed they
 had intended for the others, struck and stirred popular imagination.
 Some century earlier the last of the minstrels might have fashioned the
 last of the ballads out of that Homeric fight and chase; but the spirit
 was dead, or had been reincarnated already in Mr. Sheriff Scott, and the
 degenerate moorsmen must be content to tell the tale in prose, and to
 make of the Four Black Brothers a unit after the fashion of the Twelve
 Apostles or the Three Musketeers.
 
 Robert, Gilbert, Clement, and Andrewin the proper Border diminutives,
 Hob, Gib, Clem, and Dand Elliottthese ballad heroes, had much in common;
 in particular, their high sense of the family and the family honour; but
 they went diverse ways, and prospered and failed in different businesses.
 According to Kirstie, they had a bees in their bonnets but Hob.  Hob
 the laird was, indeed, essentially a decent man.  An elder of the Kirk,
 nobody had heard an oath upon his lips, save perhaps thrice or so at the
 sheep-washing, since the chase of his fathers murderers.  The figure he
 had shown on that eventful night disappeared as if swallowed by a trap.
 He who had ecstatically dipped his hand in the red blood, he who had
 ridden down Dickieson, became, from that moment on, a stiff and rather
 graceless model of the rustic proprieties; cannily profiting by the high
 war prices, and yearly stowing away a little nest-egg in the bank against
 calamity; approved of and sometimes consulted by the greater lairds for
 the massive and placid sense of what he said, when he could be induced to
 say anything; and particularly valued by the minister, Mr. Torrance, as a
 right-hand man in the parish, and a model to parents.  The
 transfiguration had been for the moment only; some Barbarossa, some old
 Adam of our ancestors, sleeps in all of us till the fit circumstance
 shall call it into action; and, for as sober as he now seemed, Hob had
 given once for all the measure of the devil that haunted him.  He was
 married, and, by reason of the effulgence of that legendary night, was
 adored by his wife.  He had a mob of little lusty, barefoot children who
 marched in a caravan the long miles to school, the stages of whose
 pilgrimage were marked by acts of spoliation and mischief, and who were
 qualified in the country-side as fair pests.  But in the house, if
 faither was in, they were quiet as mice.  In short, Hob moved through
 life in a great peacethe reward of any one who shall have killed his
 man, with any formidable and figurative circumstance, in the midst of a
 country gagged and swaddled with civilisation.
 
 It was a current remark that the Elliotts were guid and bad, like
 sanguishes; and certainly there was a curious distinction, the men of
 business coming alternately with the dreamers.  The second brother, Gib,
 was a weaver by trade, had gone out early into the world to Edinburgh,
 and come home again with his wings singed.  There was an exaltation in
 his nature which had led him to embrace with enthusiasm the principles of
 the French Revolution, and had ended by bringing him under the hawse of
 my Lord Hermiston in that furious onslaught of his upon the Liberals,
 which sent Muir and Palmer into exile and dashed the party into chaff.
 It was whispered that my lord, in his great scorn for the movement, and
 prevailed upon a little by a sense of neighbourliness, had given Gib a
 hint.  Meeting him one day in the Potterrow, my lord had stopped in front
 of him: Gib, ye eediot, he had said, whats this I hear of you?
 Poalitics, poalitics, poalitics, weavers poalitics, is the way of it, I
 hear.  If ye arena athegither dozened with cediocy, yell gang your ways
 back to Cauldstaneslap, and ca your loom, and ca your loom, man! And
 Gilbert had taken him at the word and returned, with an expedition almost
 to be called flight, to the house of his father.  The clearest of his
 inheritance was that family gift of prayer of which Kirstie had boasted;
 and the baffled politician now turned his attention to religious
 mattersor, as others said, to heresy and schism.  Every Sunday morning
 he was in Crossmichael, where he had gathered together, one by one, a
 sect of about a dozen persons, who called themselves Gods Remnant of
 the True Faithful, or, for short, Gods Remnant. To the profane, they
 were known as Gibs Deils.  Bailie Sweedie, a noted humorist in the
 town, vowed that the proceedings always opened to the tune of The Deil
 Fly Away with the Exciseman, and that the sacrament was dispensed in the
 form of hot whisky-toddy; both wicked hits at the evangelist, who had
 been suspected of smuggling in his youth, and had been overtaken (as the
 phrase went) on the streets of Crossmichael one Fair day.  It was known
 that every Sunday they prayed for a blessing on the arms of Bonaparte.
 For this Gods Remnant, as they were skailing from the cottage that
 did duty for a temple, had been repeatedly stoned by the bairns, and Gib
 himself hooted by a squadron of Border volunteers in which his own
 brother, Dand, rode in a uniform and with a drawn sword.  The Remnant
 were believed, besides, to be antinomian in principle, which might
 otherwise have been a serious charge, but the way public opinion then
 blew it was quite swallowed up and forgotten in the scandal about
 Bonaparte.  For the rest, Gilbert had set up his loom in an outhouse at
 Cauldstaneslap, where he laboured assiduously six days of the week.  His
 brothers, appalled by his political opinions, and willing to avoid
 dissension in the household, spoke but little to him; he less to them,
 remaining absorbed in the study of the Bible and almost constant prayer.
 The gaunt weaver was dry-nurse at Cauldstaneslap, and the bairns loved
 him dearly.  Except when he was carrying an infant in his arms, he was
 rarely seen to smileas, indeed, there were few smilers in that family.
 When his sister-in-law rallied him, and proposed that he should get a
 wife and bairns of his own, since he was so fond of them, I have no
 clearness of mind upon that point, he would reply.  If nobody called him
 in to dinner, he stayed out.  Mrs. Hob, a hard, unsympathetic woman, once
 tried the experiment.  He went without food all day, but at dusk, as the
 light began to fail him, he came into the house of his own accord,
 looking puzzled.  Ive had a great gale of prayer upon my speerit, said
 he.  I canna mind sae muckles what I had for denner. The creed of
 Gods Remnant was justified in the life of its founder.  And yet I dinna
 ken, said Kirstie.  Hes maybe no more stockfish than his neeghbours!
 He rode wi the rest o them, and had a good stamach to the work, by a
 that I hear!  Gods Remnant!  The deils clavers!  There wasna muckle
 Christianity in the way Hob guided Johnny Dickieson, at the least of it;
 but Guid kens!  Is he a Christian even?  He might be a Mahommedan or a
 Deevil or a Fire-worshipper, for what I ken.
 
 The third brother had his name on a door-plate, no less, in the city of
 Glasgow, Mr. Clement Elliott, as long as your arm.  In his case, that
 spirit of innovation which had shown itself timidly in the case of Hob by
 the admission of new manures, and which had run to waste with Gilbert in
 subversive politics and heretical religions, bore useful fruit in many
 ingenious mechanical improvements.  In boyhood, from his addiction to
 strange devices of sticks and string, he had been counted the most
 eccentric of the family.  But that was all by now; and he was a partner
 of his firm, and looked to die a bailie.  He too had married, and was
 rearing a plentiful family in the smoke and din of Glasgow; he was
 wealthy, and could have bought out his brother, the cock-laird, six times
 over, it was whispered; and when he slipped away to Cauldstaneslap for a
 well-earned holiday, which he did as often as he was able, he astonished
 the neighbours with his broadcloth, his beaver hat, and the ample plies
 of his neckcloth.  Though an eminently solid man at bottom, after the
 pattern of Hob, he had contracted a certain Glasgow briskness and
 _aplomb_ which set him off.  All the other Elliotts were as lean as a
 rake, but Clement was laying on fat, and he panted sorely when he must
 get into his boots.  Dand said, chuckling: Ay, Clem has the elements of
 a corporation.  A provost and corporation, returned Clem.  And his
 readiness was much admired.
 
 The fourth brother, Dand, was a shepherd to his trade, and by starts,
 when he could bring his mind to it, excelled in the business.  Nobody
 could train a dog like Dandie; nobody, through the peril of great storms
 in the winter time, could do more gallantly.  But if his dexterity were
 exquisite, his diligence was but fitful; and he served his brother for
 bed and board, and a trifle of pocket-money when he asked for it.  He
 loved money well enough, knew very well how to spend it, and could make a
 shrewd bargain when he liked.  But he preferred a vague knowledge that he
 was well to windward to any counted coins in the pocket; he felt himself
 richer so.  Hob would expostulate: Im an amature herd.  Dand would
 reply, Ill keep your sheep to you when Im so minded, but Ill keep my
 liberty too.  Thirs no man can coandescend on what Im worth. Clein
 would expound to him the miraculous results of compound interest, and
 recommend investments.  Ay, man? Dand would say; and do you think, if
 I took Hobs siller, that I wouldna drink it or wear it on the lassies?
 And, anyway, my kingdom is no of this world.  Either Im a poet or else
 Im nothing.  Clem would remind him of old age.  Ill die young, like,
 Robbie Burns, he would say stoutly.  No question but he had a certain
 accomplishment in minor verse.  His Hermiston Burn, with its pretty
 refrain
 
     I love to gang thinking whaur ye gang linking,
              Hermiston burn, in the howe;
 
 his Auld, auld Elliotts, clay-cauld Elliotts, dour, bauld Elliotts of
 auld, and his really fascinating piece about the Praying Weavers Stone,
 had gained him in the neighbourhood the reputation, still possible in
 Scotland, of a local bard; and, though not printed himself, he was
 recognised by others who were and who had become famous.  Walter Scott
 owed to Dandie the text of the Raid of Wearie in the _Minstrelsy_; and
 made him welcome at his house, and appreciated his talents, such as they
 were, with all his usual generosity.  The Ettrick Shepherd was his sworn
 crony; they would meet, drink to excess, roar out their lyrics in each
 others faces, and quarrel and make it up again till bedtime.  And
 besides these recognitions, almost to be called official, Dandie was made
 welcome for the sake of his gift through the farmhouses of several
 contiguous dales, and was thus exposed to manifold temptations which he
 rather sought than fled.  He had figured on the stool of repentance, for
 once fulfilling to the letter the tradition of his hero and model.  His
 humorous verses to Mr. Torrance on that occasionKenspeckle here my lane
 I standunfortunately too indelicate for further citation, ran through
 the country like a fiery crossthey were recited, quoted, paraphrased,
 and laughed over as far away as Dumfries on the one hand and Dunbar on
 the other.
 
 These four brothers were united by a close bond, the bond of that mutual
 admirationor rather mutual hero-worshipwhich is so strong among the
 members of secluded families who have much ability and little culture.
 Even the extremes admired each other.  Hob, who had as much poetry as the
 tongs, professed to find pleasure in Dands verses; Clem, who had no more
 religion than Claverhouse, nourished a heartfelt, at least an
 open-mouthed, admiration of Gibs prayers; and Dandie followed with
 relish the rise of Clems fortunes.  Indulgence followed hard on the
 heels of admiration.  The laird, Clem, and Dand, who were Tories and
 patriots of the hottest quality, excused to themselves, with a certain
 bashfulness, the radical and revolutionary heresies of Gib.  By another
 division of the family, the laird, Clem, and Gib, who were men exactly
 virtuous, swallowed the dose of Dands irregularities as a kind of clog
 or drawback in the mysterious providence of God affixed to bards, and
 distinctly probative of poetical genius.  To appreciate the simplicity of
 their mutual admiration it was necessary to hear Clem, arrived upon one
 of his visits, and dealing in a spirit of continuous irony with the
 affairs and personalities of that great city of Glasgow where he lived
 and transacted business.  The various personages, ministers of the
 church, municipal officers, mercantile big-wigs, whom he had occasion to
 introduce, were all alike denigrated, all served but as reflectors to
 cast back a flattering side-light on the house of Cauldstaneslap.  The
 Provost, for whom Clem by exception entertained a measure of respect, he
 would liken to Hob.  He minds me o the laird there, he would say.  He
 has some of Hobs grand, whunstane sense, and the same way with him of
 steiking his mouth when hes no very pleased.  And Hob, all unconscious,
 would draw down his upper lip and produce, as if for comparison, the
 formidable grimace referred to.  The unsatisfactory incumbent of St.
 Enochs Kirk was thus briefly dismissed: If he had but twa fingers o
 Gibs, he would waken them up.  And Gib, honest man! would look down and
 secretly smile.  Clem was a spy whom they had sent out into the world of
 men.  He had come back with the good news that there was nobody to
 compare with the Four Black Brothers, no position that they would not
 adorn, no official that it would not be well they should replace, no
 interest of mankind, secular or spiritual, which would not immediately
 bloom under their supervision.  The excuse of their folly is in two
 words: scarce the breadth of a hair divided them from the peasantry.  The
 measure of their sense is this: that these symposia of rustic vanity were
 kept entirely within the family, like some secret ancestral practice.  To
 the world their serious faces were never deformed by the suspicion of any
 simper of self-contentment.  Yet it was known.  They hae a guid pride o
 themsels! was the word in the country-side.
 
 Lastly, in a Border story, there should be added their two-names.  Hob
 was The Laird.  Roy ne puis, prince ne daigne; he was the laird of
 Cauldstaneslapsay fifty acres_ipsissimus_.  Clement was Mr. Elliott, as
 upon his door-plate, the earlier Dafty having been discarded as no longer
 applicable, and indeed only a reminder of misjudgment and the imbecility
 of the public; and the youngest, in honour of his perpetual wanderings,
 was known by the sobriquet of Randy Dand.
 
 It will be understood that not all this information was communicated by
 the aunt, who had too much of the family failing herself to appreciate it
 thoroughly in others.  But as time went on, Archie began to observe an
 omission in the family chronicle.
 
 Is there not a girl too? he asked.
 
 Ay: Kirstie.  She was named for me, or my grandmother at leastits the
 same thing, returned the aunt, and went on again about Dand, whom she
 secretly preferred by reason of his gallantries.
 
 But what is your niece like? said Archie at the next opportunity.
 
 Her?  As blacks your hat!  But I dinna suppose she would maybe be what
 you would ca _ill-looked_ athegither.  Na, shes a kind of a handsome
 jauda kind o gipsy, said the aunt, who had two sets of scales for men
 and womenor perhaps it would be more fair to say that she had three, and
 the third and the most loaded was for girls.
 
 How comes it that I never see her in church? said Archie.
 
 Deed, and I believe shes in Glesgie with Clem and his wife.  A heap
 good shes like to get of it!  I dinna say for men folk, but where weemen
 folk are born, there let them bide.  Glory to God, I was never farer
 from here than Crossmichael.
 
 In the meanwhile it began to strike Archie as strange, that while she
 thus sang the praises of her kinsfolk, and manifestly relished their
 virtues and (I may say) their vices like a thing creditable to herself,
 there should appear not the least sign of cordiality between the house of
 Hermiston and that of Cauldstaneslap.  Going to church of a Sunday, as
 the lady housekeeper stepped with her skirts kilted, three tucks of her
 white petticoat showing below, and her best India shawl upon her back (if
 the day were fine) in a pattern of radiant dyes, she would sometimes
 overtake her relatives preceding her more leisurely in the same
 direction.  Gib of course was absent: by skreigh of day he had been gone
 to Crossmichael and his fellow-heretics; but the rest of the family would
 be seen marching in open order: Hob and Dand, stiff-necked,
 straight-backed six-footers, with severe dark faces, and their plaids
 about their shoulders; the convoy of children scattering (in a state of
 high polish) on the wayside, and every now and again collected by the
 shrill summons of the mother; and the mother herself, by a suggestive
 circumstance which might have afforded matter of thought to a more
 experienced observer than Archie, wrapped in a shawl nearly identical
 with Kirsties, but a thought more gaudy and conspicuously newer.  At the
 sight, Kirstie grew more tallKirstie showed her classical profile, nose
 in air and nostril spread, the pure blood came in her cheek evenly in a
 delicate living pink.
 
 A braw day to ye, Mistress Elliott, said she, and hostility and
 gentility were nicely mingled in her tones.  A fine day, mem, the
 lairds wife would reply with a miraculous curtsey, spreading the while
 her plumagesetting off, in other words, and with arts unknown to the
 mere man, the pattern of her India shawl.  Behind her, the whole
 Cauldstaneslap contingent marched in closer order, and with an
 indescribable air of being in the presence of the foe; and while Dandie
 saluted his aunt with a certain familiarity as of one who was well in
 court, Hob marched on in awful immobility.  There appeared upon the face
 of this attitude in the family the consequences of some dreadful feud.
 Presumably the two women had been principals in the original encounter,
 and the laird had probably been drawn into the quarrel by the ears, too
 late to be included in the present skin-deep reconciliation.
 
 Kirstie, said Archie one day, what is this you have against your
 family?
 
 I dinna complean, said Kirstie, with a flush.  I say naething.
 
 I see you do notnot even good-day to your own nephew, said he.
 
 I hae naething to be ashamed of, said she.  I can say the Lords
 prayer with a good grace.  If Hob was ill, or in preeson or poverty, I
 would see to him blithely.  But for curtchying and complimenting and
 colloguing, thank ye kindly!
 
 Archie had a bit of a smile: he leaned back in his chair.  I think you
 and Mrs. Robert are not very good friends, says he slyly, when you have
 your India shawls on?
 
 She looked upon him in silence, with a sparkling eye but an
 indecipherable expression; and that was all that Archie was ever destined
 to learn of the battle of the India shawls.
 
 Do none of them ever come here to see you? he inquired.
 
 Mr. Archie, said she, I hope that I ken my place better.  It would be
 a queer thing, I think, if I was to clamjamfry up your faithers
 housethat I should say it!wi a dirty, black-a-vised clan, no ane o
 them it was worth while to mar soap upon but just mysel!  Na, theyre
 all damnifeed wi the black Ellwalds.  I have nae patience wi black
 folk. Then, with a sudden consciousness of the case of Archie, No that
 it maitters for men sae muckle, she made haste to add, but theres
 naebody can deny that its unwomanly.  Long hair is the ornament o woman
 ony way; weve good warrandise for thatits in the Bibleand wha can
 doubt that the Apostle had some gowden-haired lassie in his mindApostle
 and all, for what was he but just a man like yersel?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIA LEAF FROM CHRISTINAS PSALM-BOOK
 
 
 Archie was sedulous at church.  Sunday after Sunday he sat down and stood
 up with that small company, heard the voice of Mr. Torrance leaping like
 an ill-played clarionet from key to key, and had an opportunity to study
 his moth-eaten gown and the black thread mittens that he joined together
 in prayer, and lifted up with a reverent solemnity in the act of
 benediction.  Hermiston pew was a little square box, dwarfish in
 proportion with the kirk itself, and enclosing a table not much bigger
 than a footstool.  There sat Archie, an apparent prince, the only
 undeniable gentleman and the only great heritor in the parish, taking his
 ease in the only pew, for no other in the kirk had doors.  Thence he
 might command an undisturbed view of that congregation of solid plaided
 men, strapping wives and daughters, oppressed children, and uneasy
 sheep-dogs.  It was strange how Archie missed the look of race; except
 the dogs, with their refined foxy faces and inimitably curling tails,
 there was no one present with the least claim to gentility.  The
 Cauldstaneslap party was scarcely an exception; Dandie perhaps, as he
 amused himself making verses through the interminable burden of the
 service, stood out a little by the glow in his eye and a certain superior
 animation of face and alertness of body; but even Dandie slouched like a
 rustic.  The rest of the congregation, like so many sheep, oppressed him
 with a sense of hob-nailed routine, day following dayof physical labour
 in the open air, oatmeal porridge, peas bannock the somnolent fireside in
 the evening, and the night-long nasal slumbers in a box-bed.  Yet he knew
 many of them to be shrewd and humorous, men of character, notable women,
 making a bustle in the world and radiating an influence from their
 low-browed doors.  He knew besides they were like other men; below the
 crust of custom, rapture found a way; he had heard them beat the timbrel
 before Bacchushad heard them shout and carouse over their whisky-toddy;
 and not the most Dutch-bottomed and severe faces among them all, not even
 the solemn elders themselves, but were capable of singular gambols at the
 voice of love.  Men drawing near to an end of lifes adventurous
 journeymaids thrilling with fear and curiosity on the threshold of
 entrancewomen who had borne and perhaps buried children, who could
 remember the clinging of the small dead hands and the patter of the
 little feet now silenthe marvelled that among all those faces there
 should be no face of expectation, none that was mobile, none into which
 the rhythm and poetry of life had entered.  O for a live face, he
 thought; and at times he had a memory of Lady Flora; and at times he
 would study the living gallery before him with despair, and would see
 himself go on to waste his days in that joyless pastoral place, and death
 come to him, and his grave be dug under the rowans, and the Spirit of the
 Earth laugh out in a thunder-peal at the huge fiasco.
 
 On this particular Sunday, there was no doubt but that the spring had
 come at last.  It was warm, with a latent shiver in the air that made the
 warmth only the more welcome.  The shallows of the stream glittered and
 tinkled among bunches of primrose.  Vagrant scents of the earth arrested
 Archie by the way with moments of ethereal intoxication.  The grey
 Quakerish dale was still only awakened in places and patches from the
 sobriety of its winter colouring; and he wondered at its beauty; an
 essential beauty of the old earth it seemed to him, not resident in
 particulars but breathing to him from the whole.  He surprised himself by
 a sudden impulse to write poetryhe did so sometimes, loose, galloping
 octo-syllabics in the vein of Scottand when he had taken his place on a
 boulder, near some fairy falls and shaded by a whip of a tree that was
 already radiant with new leaves, it still more surprised him that he
 should have nothing to write.  His heart perhaps beat in time to some
 vast indwelling rhythm of the universe.  By the time he came to a corner
 of the valley and could see the kirk, he had so lingered by the way that
 the first psalm was finishing.  The nasal psalmody, full of turns and
 trills and graceless graces, seemed the essential voice of the kirk
 itself upraised in thanksgiving, Everythings alive, he said; and again
 cries it aloud, thank God, everythings alive!  He lingered yet a while
 in the kirk-yard.  A tuft of primroses was blooming hard by the leg of an
 old black table tombstone, and he stopped to contemplate the random
 apologue.  They stood forth on the cold earth with a trenchancy of
 contrast; and he was struck with a sense of incompleteness in the day,
 the season, and the beauty that surrounded himthe chill there was in the
 warmth, the gross black clods about the opening primroses, the damp
 earthy smell that was everywhere intermingled with the scents.  The voice
 of the aged Torrance within rose in an ecstasy.  And he wondered if
 Torrance also felt in his old bones the joyous influence of the spring
 morning; Torrance, or the shadow of what once was Torrance, that must
 come so soon to lie outside here in the sun and rain with all his
 rheumatisms, while a new minister stood in his room and thundered from
 his own familiar pulpit?  The pity of it, and something of the chill of
 the grave, shook him for a moment as he made haste to enter.
 
 He went up the aisle reverently, and took his place in the pew with
 lowered eyes, for he feared he had already offended the kind old
 gentleman in the pulpit, and was sedulous to offend no further.  He could
 not follow the prayer, not even the heads of it.  Brightnesses of azure,
 clouds of fragrance, a tinkle of falling water and singing birds, rose
 like exhalations from some deeper, aboriginal memory, that was not his,
 but belonged to the flesh on his bones.  His body remembered; and it
 seemed to him that his body was in no way gross, but ethereal and
 perishable like a strain of music; and he felt for it an exquisite
 tenderness as for a child, an innocent, full of beautiful instincts and
 destined to an early death.  And he felt for old Torranceof the many
 supplications, of the few daysa pity that was near to tears.  The prayer
 ended.  Right over him was a tablet in the wall, the only ornament in the
 roughly masoned chapelfor it was no more; the tablet commemorated, I was
 about to say the virtues, but rather the existence of a former Rutherford
 of Hermiston; and Archie, under that trophy of his long descent and local
 greatness, leaned back in the pew and contemplated vacancy with the
 shadow of a smile between playful and sad, that became him strangely.
 Dandies sister, sitting by the side of Clem in her new Glasgow finery,
 chose that moment to observe the young laird.  Aware of the stir of his
 entrance, the little formalist had kept her eyes fastened and her face
 prettily composed during the prayer.  It was not hypocrisy, there was no
 one further from a hypocrite.  The girl had been taught to behave: to
 look up, to look down, to look unconscious, to look seriously impressed
 in church, and in every conjuncture to look her best.  That was the game
 of female life, and she played it frankly.  Archie was the one person in
 church who was of interest, who was somebody new, reputed eccentric,
 known to be young, and a laird, and still unseen by Christina.  Small
 wonder that, as she stood there in her attitude of pretty decency, her
 mind should run upon him!  If he spared a glance in her direction, he
 should know she was a well-behaved young lady who had been to Glasgow.
 In reason he must admire her clothes, and it was possible that he should
 think her pretty.  At that her heart beat the least thing in the world;
 and she proceeded, by way of a corrective, to call up and dismiss a
 series of fancied pictures of the young man who should now, by rights, be
 looking at her.  She settled on the plainest of them,a pink short young
 man with a dish face and no figure, at whose admiration she could afford
 to smile; but for all that, the consciousness of his gaze (which was
 really fixed on Torrance and his mittens) kept her in something of a
 flutter till the word Amen.  Even then, she was far too well-bred to
 gratify her curiosity with any impatience.  She resumed her seat
 languidlythis was a Glasgow touchshe composed her dress, rearranged her
 nosegay of primroses, looked first in front, then behind upon the other
 side, and at last allowed her eyes to move, without hurry, in the
 direction of the Hermiston pew.  For a moment, they were riveted.  Next
 she had plucked her gaze home again like a tame bird who should have
 meditated flight.  Possibilities crowded on her; she hung over the future
 and grew dizzy; the image of this young man, slim, graceful, dark, with
 the inscrutable half-smile, attracted and repelled her like a chasm.  I
 wonder, will I have met my fate? she thought, and her heart swelled.
 
 Torrance was got some way into his first exposition, positing a deep
 layer of texts as he went along, laying the foundations of his discourse,
 which was to deal with a nice point in divinity, before Archie suffered
 his eyes to wander.  They fell first of all on Clem, looking
 insupportably prosperous, and patronising Torrance with the favour of a
 modified attention, as of one who was used to better things in Glasgow.
 Though he had never before set eyes on him, Archie had no difficulty in
 identifying him, and no hesitation in pronouncing him vulgar, the worst
 of the family.  Clem was leaning lazily forward when Archie first saw
 him.  Presently he leaned nonchalantly back; and that deadly instrument,
 the maiden, was suddenly unmasked in profile.  Though not quite in the
 front of the fashion (had anybody cared!), certain artful Glasgow
 mantua-makers, and her own inherent taste, had arrayed her to great
 advantage.  Her accoutrement was, indeed, a cause of heart-burning, and
 almost of scandal, in that infinitesimal kirk company.  Mrs. Hob had said
 her say at Cauldstaneslap.  Daft-like! she had pronounced it.  A
 jaiket thatll no meet!  Whaurs the sense of a jaiket thatll no button
 upon you, if it should come to be weet?  What do ye ca thir things?
 Demmy brokens, dye say?  Theyll be brokens wi a vengeance or ye can
 win back!  Weel, I have nae thing to do wi itits no good taste.
 Clem, whose purse had thus metamorphosed his sister, and who was not
 insensible to the advertisement, had come to the rescue with a Hoot,
 woman!  What do you ken of good taste that has never been to the ceety?
 And Hob, looking on the girl with pleased smiles, as she timidly
 displayed her finery in the midst of the dark kitchen, had thus ended the
 dispute: The cutty looks weel, he had said, and its no very like
 rain.  Wear them the day, hizzie; but its no a thing to make a practice
 o.  In the breasts of her rivals, coming to the kirk very conscious of
 white under-linen, and their faces splendid with much soap, the sight of
 the toilet had raised a storm of varying emotion, from the mere unenvious
 admiration that was expressed in a long-drawn Eh! to the angrier
 feeling that found vent in an emphatic Set her up!  Her frock was of
 straw-coloured jaconet muslin, cut low at the bosom and short at the
 ankle, so as to display her _demi-broquins_ of Regency violet, crossing
 with many straps upon a yellow cobweb stocking.  According to the pretty
 fashion in which our grandmothers did not hesitate to appear, and our
 great-aunts went forth armed for the pursuit and capture of our
 great-uncles, the dress was drawn up so as to mould the contour of both
 breasts, and in the nook between, a cairngorm brooch maintained it.
 Here, too, surely in a very enviable position, trembled the nosegay of
 primroses.  She wore on her shouldersor rather on her back and not her
 shoulders, which it scarcely passeda French coat of sarsenet, tied in
 front with Margate braces, and of the same colour with her violet shoes.
 About her face clustered a disorder of dark ringlets, a little garland of
 yellow French roses surmounted her brow, and the whole was crowned by a
 village hat of chipped straw.  Amongst all the rosy and all the weathered
 faces that surrounded her in church, she glowed like an open flowergirl
 and raiment, and the cairngorm that caught the daylight and returned it
 in a fiery flash, and the threads of bronze and gold that played in her
 hair.
 
 Archie was attracted by the bright thing like a child.  He looked at her
 again and yet again, and their looks crossed.  The lip was lifted from
 her little teeth.  He saw the red blood work vividly under her tawny
 skin.  Her eye, which was great as a stags, struck and held his gaze.
 He knew who she must beKirstie, she of the harsh diminutive, his
 housekeepers niece, the sister of the rustic prophet, Giband he found
 in her the answer to his wishes.
 
 Christina felt the shock of their encountering glances, and seemed to
 rise, clothed in smiles, into a region of the vague and bright.  But the
 gratification was not more exquisite than it was brief.  She looked away
 abruptly, and immediately began to blame herself for that abruptness.
 She knew what she should have done, too lateturned slowly with her nose
 in the air.  And meantime his look was not removed, but continued to play
 upon her like a battery of cannon constantly aimed, and now seemed to
 isolate her alone with him, and now seemed to uplift her, as on a
 pillory, before the congregation.  For Archie continued to drink her in
 with his eyes, even as a wayfarer comes to a well-head on a mountain, and
 stoops his face, and drinks with thirst unassuageable.  In the cleft of
 her little breasts the fiery eye of the topaz and the pale florets of
 primrose fascinated him.  He saw the breasts heave, and the flowers shake
 with the heaving, and marvelled what should so much discompose the girl.
 And Christina was conscious of his gazesaw it, perhaps, with the dainty
 plaything of an ear that peeped among her ringlets; she was conscious of
 changing colour, conscious of her unsteady breath.  Like a creature
 tracked, run down, surrounded, she sought in a dozen ways to give herself
 a countenance.  She used her handkerchiefit was a really fine onethen
 she desisted in a panic: He would only think I was too warm.  She took
 to reading in the metrical psalms, and then remembered it was
 sermon-time.  Last she put a sugar-bool in her mouth, and the next
 moment repented of the step.  It was such a homely-like thing!  Mr.
 Archie would never be eating sweeties in kirk; and, with a palpable
 effort, she swallowed it whole, and her colour flamed high.  At this
 signal of distress Archie awoke to a sense of his ill-behaviour.  What
 had he been doing?  He had been exquisitely rude in church to the niece
 of his housekeeper; he had stared like a lackey and a libertine at a
 beautiful and modest girl.  It was possible, it was even likely, he would
 be presented to her after service in the kirk-yard, and then how was he
 to look?  And there was no excuse.  He had marked the tokens of her
 shame, of her increasing indignation, and he was such a fool that he had
 not understood them.  Shame bowed him down, and he looked resolutely at
 Mr. Torrance; who little supposed, good, worthy man, as he continued to
 expound justification by faith, what was his true business: to play the
 part of derivative to a pair of children at the old game of falling in
 love.
 
 Christina was greatly relieved at first.  It seemed to her that she was
 clothed again.  She looked back on what had passed.  All would have been
 right if she had not blushed, a silly fool!  There was nothing to blush
 at, if she _had_ taken a sugar-bool.  Mrs. MacTaggart, the elders wife
 in St. Enochs, took them often.  And if he had looked at her, what was
 more natural than that a young gentleman should look at the best-dressed
 girl in church?  And at the same time, she knew far otherwise, she knew
 there was nothing casual or ordinary in the look, and valued herself on
 its memory like a decoration.  Well, it was a blessing he had found
 something else to look at!  And presently she began to have other
 thoughts.  It was necessary, she fancied, that she should put herself
 right by a repetition of the incident, better managed.  If the wish was
 father to the thought, she did not know or she would not recognise it.
 It was simply as a manuvre of propriety, as something called for to
 lessen the significance of what had gone before, that she should a second
 time meet his eyes, and this time without blushing.  And at the memory of
 the blush, she blushed again, and became one general blush burning from
 head to foot.  Was ever anything so indelicate, so forward, done by a
 girl before?  And here she was, making an exhibition of herself before
 the congregation about nothing!  She stole a glance upon her neighbours,
 and behold! they were steadily indifferent, and Clem had gone to sleep.
 And still the one idea was becoming more and more potent with her, that
 in common prudence she must look again before the service ended.
 Something of the same sort was going forward in the mind of Archie, as he
 struggled with the load of penitence.  So it chanced that, in the flutter
 of the moment when the last psalm was given out, and Torrance was reading
 the verse, and the leaves of every psalm-book in church were rustling
 under busy fingers, two stealthy glances were sent out like antenn among
 the pews and on the indifferent and absorbed occupants, and drew timidly
 nearer to the straight line between Archie and Christina.  They met, they
 lingered together for the least fraction of time, and that was enough.  A
 charge as of electricity passed through Christina, and behold! the leaf
 of her psalm-book was torn across.
 
 Archie was outside by the gate of the graveyard, conversing with Hob and
 the minister and shaking hands all round with the scattering
 congregation, when Clem and Christina were brought up to be presented.
 The laird took off his hat and bowed to her with grace and respect.
 Christina made her Glasgow curtsey to the laird, and went on again up the
 road for Hermiston and Cauldstaneslap, walking fast, breathing hurriedly
 with a heightened colour, and in this strange frame of mind, that when
 she was alone she seemed in high happiness, and when any one addressed
 her she resented it like a contradiction.  A part of the way she had the
 company of some neighbour girls and a loutish young man; never had they
 seemed so insipid, never had she made herself so disagreeable.  But these
 struck aside to their various destinations or were out-walked and left
 behind; and when she had driven off with sharp words the proffered convoy
 of some of her nephews and nieces, she was free to go on alone up
 Hermiston brae, walking on air, dwelling intoxicated among clouds of
 happiness.  Near to the summit she heard steps behind her, a mans steps,
 light and very rapid.  She knew the foot at once and walked the faster.
 If its me hes wanting, he can run for it, she thought, smiling.
 
 Archie overtook her like a man whose mind was made up.
 
 Miss Kirstie, he began.
 
 Miss Christina, if you please, Mr. Weir, she interrupted.  I canna
 bear the contraction.
 
 You forget it has a friendly sound for me.  Your aunt is an old friend
 of mine, and a very good one.  I hope we shall see much of you at
 Hermiston?
 
 My aunt and my sister-in-law doesna agree very well.  Not that I have
 much ado with it.  But still when Im stopping in the house, if I was to
 be visiting my aunt, it would not look considerate-like.
 
 I am sorry, said Archie.
 
 I thank you kindly, Mr. Weir, she said.  I whiles think myself its a
 great peety.
 
 Ah, I am sure your voice would always be for peace! he cried.
 
 I wouldna be too sure of that, she said.  I have my days like other
 folk, I suppose.
 
 Do you know, in our old kirk, among our good old grey dames, you made an
 effect like sunshine.
 
 Ah, but that would be my Glasgow clothes!
 
 I did not think I was so much under the influence of pretty frocks.
 
 She smiled with a half look at him.  Theres more than you! she said.
 But you see Im only Cinderella.  Ill have to put all these things by
 in my trunk; next Sunday Ill be as grey as the rest.  Theyre Glasgow
 clothes, you see, and it would never do to make a practice of it.  It
 would seem terrible conspicuous.
 
 By that they were come to the place where their ways severed.  The old
 grey moors were all about them; in the midst a few sheep wandered; and
 they could see on the one hand the straggling caravan scaling the braes
 in front of them for Cauldstaneslap, and on the other, the contingent
 from Hermiston bending off and beginning to disappear by detachments into
 the policy gate.  It was in these circumstances that they turned to say
 farewell, and deliberately exchanged a glance as they shook hands.  All
 passed as it should, genteelly; and in Christinas mind, as she mounted
 the first steep ascent for Cauldstaneslap, a gratifying sense of triumph
 prevailed over the recollection of minor lapses and mistakes.  She had
 kilted her gown, as she did usually at that rugged pass; but when she
 spied Archie still standing and gazing after her, the skirts came down
 again as if by enchantment.  Here was a piece of nicety for that upland
 parish, where the matrons marched with their coats kilted in the rain,
 and the lasses walked barefoot to kirk through the dust of summer, and
 went bravely down by the burn-side, and sat on stones to make a public
 toilet before entering!  It was perhaps an air wafted from Glasgow; or
 perhaps it marked a stage of that dizziness of gratified vanity, in which
 the instinctive act passed unperceived.  He was looking after!  She
 unloaded her bosom of a prodigious sigh that was all pleasure, and betook
 herself to run.  When she had overtaken the stragglers of her family, she
 caught up the niece whom she had so recently repulsed, and kissed and
 slapped her, and drove her away again, and ran after her with pretty
 cries and laughter.  Perhaps she thought the laird might still be
 looking!  But it chanced the little scene came under the view of eyes
 less favourable; for she overtook Mrs. Hob marching with Clem and Dand.
 
 Youre shrely fey, lass! quoth Dandie.
 
 Think shame to yersel, miss! said the strident Mrs. Hob.  Is this the
 gait to guide yersel on the way hame frae kirk?  Youre shiirely no
 sponsible the day!  And anyway I would mind my guid claes.
 
 Hoot! said Christina, and went on before them head in air, treading the
 rough track with the tread of a wild doe.
 
 She was in love with herself, her destiny, the air of the hills, the
 benediction of the sun.  All the way home, she continued under the
 intoxication of these sky-scraping spirits.  At table she could talk
 freely of young Hermiston; gave her opinion of him off-hand and with a
 loud voice, that he was a handsome young gentleman, real well mannered
 and sensible-like, but it was a pity he looked doleful.  Onlythe moment
 aftera memory of his eyes in church embarrassed her.  But for this
 inconsiderable check, all through meal-time she had a good appetite, and
 she kept them laughing at table, until Gib (who had returned before them
 from Crossmichael and his separative worship) reproved the whole of them
 for their levity.
 
 Singing in to herself as she went, her mind still in the turmoil of a
 glad confusion, she rose and tripped upstairs to a little loft, lighted
 by four panes in the gable, where she slept with one of her nieces.  The
 niece, who followed her, presuming on Aunties high spirits, was
 flounced out of the apartment with small ceremony, and retired, smarting
 and half tearful, to bury her woes in the byre among the hay.  Still
 humming, Christina divested herself of her finery, and put her treasures
 one by one in her great green trunk.  The last of these was the
 psalm-book; it was a fine piece, the gift of Mistress Clem, in distinct
 old-faced type, on paper that had begun to grow foxy in the warehousenot
 by serviceand she was used to wrap it in a handkerchief every Sunday
 after its period of service was over, and bury it end-wise at the head of
 her trunk.  As she now took it in hand the book fell open where the leaf
 was torn, and she stood and gazed upon that evidence of her bygone
 discomposure.  There returned again the vision of the two brown eyes
 staring at her, intent and bright, out of that dark corner of the kirk.
 The whole appearance and attitude, the smile, the suggested gesture of
 young Hermiston came before her in a flash at the sight of the torn page.
 I was surely fey! she said, echoing the words of Dandie, and at the
 suggested doom her high spirits deserted her.  She flung herself prone
 upon the bed, and lay there, holding the psalm-book in her hands for
 hours, for the more part in a mere stupor of unconsenting pleasure and
 unreasoning fear.  The fear was superstitious; there came up again and
 again in her memory Dandies ill-omened words, and a hundred grisly and
 black tales out of the immediate neighbourhood read her a commentary on
 their force.  The pleasure was never realised.  You might say the joints
 of her body thought and remembered, and were gladdened, but her essential
 self, in the immediate theatre of consciousness, talked feverishly of
 something else, like a nervous person at a fire.  The image that she most
 complacently dwelt on was that of Miss Christina in her character of the
 Fair Lass of Cauldstaneslap, carrying all before her in the
 straw-coloured frock, the violet mantle, and the yellow cobweb stockings.
 Archies image, on the other hand, when it presented itself was never
 welcomedfar less welcomed with any ardour, and it was exposed at times
 to merciless criticism.  In the long vague dialogues she held in her
 mind, often with imaginary, often with unrealised interlocutors, Archie,
 if he were referred to at all came in for savage handling.  He was
 described as looking like a stork, staring like a caulf, a face like
 a ghaists.  Do you call that manners? she said; or, I soon put him
 in his place.  _Miss Christina_, _if you please_, _Mr. Weir_! says I,
 and just flyped up my skirt tails.  With gabble like this she would
 entertain herself long whiles together, and then her eye would perhaps
 fall on the torn leaf, and the eyes of Archie would appear again from the
 darkness of the wall, and the voluble words deserted her, and she would
 lie still and stupid, and think upon nothing with devotion, and be
 sometimes raised by a quiet sigh.  Had a doctor of medicine come into
 that loft, he would have diagnosed a healthy, well-developed, eminently
 vivacious lass lying on her face in a fit of the sulks; not one who had
 just contracted, or was just contracting, a mortal sickness of the mind
 which should yet carry her towards death and despair.  Had it been a
 doctor of psychology, he might have been pardoned for divining in the
 girl a passion of childish vanity, self-love _in excelsis_, and no more.
 It is to be understood that I have been painting chaos and describing the
 inarticulate.  Every lineament that appears is too precise, almost every
 word used too strong.  Take a finger-post in the mountains on a day of
 rolling mists; I have but copied the names that appear upon the pointers,
 the names of definite and famous cities far distant, and now perhaps
 basking in sunshine; but Christina remained all these hours, as it were,
 at the foot of the post itself, not moving, and enveloped in mutable and
 blinding wreaths of haze.
 
 The day was growing late and the sunbeams long and level, when she sat
 suddenly up, and wrapped in its handkerchief and put by that psalm-book
 which had already played a part so decisive in the first chapter of her
 love-story.  In the absence of the mesmerists eye, we are told nowadays
 that the head of a bright nail may fill his place, if it be steadfastly
 regarded.  So that torn page had riveted her attention on what might else
 have been but little, and perhaps soon forgotten; while the ominous words
 of Dandieheard, not heeded, and still rememberedhad lent to her
 thoughts, or rather to her mood, a cast of solemnity, and that idea of
 Fatea pagan Fate, uncontrolled by any Christian deity, obscure, lawless,
 and augustmoving indissuadably in the affairs of Christian men.  Thus
 even that phenomenon of love at first sight, which is so rare and seems
 so simple and violent, like a disruption of lifes tissue, may be
 decomposed into a sequence of accidents happily concurring.
 
 She put on a grey frock and a pink kerchief, looked at herself a moment
 with approval in the small square of glass that served her for a toilet
 mirror, and went softly downstairs through the sleeping house that
 resounded with the sound of afternoon snoring.  Just outside the door,
 Dandie was sitting with a book in his hand, not reading, only honouring
 the Sabbath by a sacred vacancy of mind.  She came near him and stood
 still.
 
 Im for off up the muirs, Dandie, she said.
 
 There was something unusually soft in her tones that made him look up.
 She was pale, her eyes dark and bright; no trace remained of the levity
 of the morning.
 
 Ay, lass?  Yell have yer ups and downs like me, Im thinkin, he
 observed.
 
 What for do ye say that? she asked.
 
 O, for naething, says Dand.  Only I think yere mair like me than the
 lave of them.  Yeve mair of the poetic temper, tho Guid kens little
 enough of the poetic taalent.  Its an ill gift at the best.  Look at
 yoursel.  At denner you were all sunshine and flowers and laughter, and
 now youre like the star of evening on a lake.
 
 She drank in this hackneyed compliment like wine, and it glowed in her
 veins.
 
 But Im saying, Dandshe came nearer himIm for the muirs.  I must
 have a braith of air.  If Clem was to be speiring for me, try and quaiet
 him, will ye no?
 
 What way? said Dandie.  I ken but the ae way, and thats leein.  Ill
 say ye had a sair heid, if ye like.
 
 But I havena, she objected.
 
 I daursay no, he returned.  I said I would say ye had; and if ye like
 to nay-say me when ye come back, itll no mateerially maitter, for my
 charaters clean gane aready past reca.
 
 O, Dand, are ye a lecar? she asked, lingering.
 
 Folks say sae, replied the bard.
 
 Wha says sae? she pursued.
 
 Them that should ken the best, he responded.  The lassies, for ane.
 
 But, Dand, you would never lee to me? she asked.
 
 Ill leave that for your pairt of it, ye girzie, said he.  Yell lee
 to me fast eneuch, when ye hae gotten a jo.  Im tellin ye and its
 true; when you have a jo, Miss Kirstie, itll be for guid and ill.  I
 ken: I was made that way mysel, but the deil was in my luck!  Here, gang
 awa wi ye to your muirs, and let me be; Im in an hour of inspiraution,
 ye upsetting tawpie!
 
 But she clung to her brothers neighbourhood, she knew not why.
 
 Will ye no gies a kiss, Dand? she said.  I aye likit ye fine.
 
 He kissed her and considered her a moment; he found something strange in
 her.  But he was a libertine through and through, nourished equal
 contempt and suspicion of all womankind, and paid his way among them
 habitually with idle compliments.
 
 Gae wa wi ye! said he.  Yere a dentie baby, and be content wi
 that!
 
 That was Dandies way; a kiss and a comfit to Jennya bawbee and my
 blessing to Jilland goodnight to the whole clan of ye, my dears! When
 anything approached the serious, it became a matter for men, he both
 thought and said.  Women, when they did not absorb, were only children to
 be shood away.  Merely in his character of connoisseur, however, Dandie
 glanced carelessly after his sister as she crossed the meadow.  The
 brats no that bad! he thought with surprise, for though he had just
 been paying her compliments, he had not really looked at her.  Hey!
 whats yon?  For the grey dress was cut with short sleeves and skirts,
 and displayed her trim strong legs clad in pink stockings of the same
 shade as the kerchief she wore round her shoulders, and that shimmered as
 she went.  This was not her way in undress; he knew her ways and the ways
 of the whole sex in the country-side, no one better; when they did not go
 barefoot, they wore stout rig and furrow woollen hose of an invisible
 blue mostly, when they were not black outright; and Dandie, at sight of
 this daintiness, put two and two together.  It was a silk handkerchief,
 then they would be silken hose; they matchedthen the whole outfit was a
 present of Clems, a costly present, and not something to be worn through
 bog and briar, or on a late afternoon of Sunday.  He whistled.  My denty
 May, either your heids fair turned, or theres some ongoings! he
 observed, and dismissed the subject.
 
 She went slowly at first, but ever straighter and faster for the
 Cauldstaneslap, a pass among the hills to which the farm owed its name.
 The Slap opened like a doorway between two rounded hillocks; and through
 this ran the short cut to Hermiston.  Immediately on the other side it
 went down through the Deils Hags, a considerable marshy hollow of the
 hill tops, full of springs, and crouching junipers, and pools where the
 black peat-water slumbered.  There was no view from here.  A man might
 have sat upon the Praying Weavers stone a half century, and seen none
 but the Cauldstaneslap children twice in the twenty-four hours on their
 way to the school and back again, an occasional shepherd, the irruption
 of a clan of sheep, or the birds who haunted about the springs, drinking
 and shrilly piping.  So, when she had once passed the Slap, Kirstie was
 received into seclusion.  She looked back a last time at the farm.  It
 still lay deserted except for the figure of Dandie, who was now seen to
 be scribbling in his lap, the hour of expected inspiration having come to
 him at last.  Thence she passed rapidly through the morass, and came to
 the farther end of it, where a sluggish burn discharges, and the path for
 Hermiston accompanies it on the beginning of its downward path.  From
 this corner a wide view was opened to her of the whole stretch of braes
 upon the other side, still sallow and in places rusty with the winter,
 with the path marked boldly, here and there by the burn-side a tuft of
 birches, andtwo miles off as the crow fliesfrom its enclosures and
 young plantations, the windows of Hermiston glittering in the western
 sun.
 
 Here she sat down and waited, and looked for a long time at these
 far-away bright panes of glass.  It amused her to have so extended a
 view, she thought.  It amused her to see the house of Hermistonto see
 folk; and there was an indistinguishable human unit, perhaps the
 gardener, visibly sauntering on the gravel paths.
 
 By the time the sun was down and all the easterly braes lay plunged in
 clear shadow, she was aware of another figure coming up the path at a
 most unequal rate of approach, now half running, now pausing and seeming
 to hesitate.  She watched him at first with a total suspension of
 thought.  She held her thought as a person holds his breathing.  Then she
 consented to recognise him.  Hell no be coming here, he canna be; its
 no possible.  And there began to grow upon her a subdued choking
 suspense.  He _was_ coming; his hesitations had quite ceased, his step
 grew firm and swift; no doubt remained; and the question loomed up before
 her instant: what was she to do?  It was all very well to say that her
 brother was a laird himself: it was all very well to speak of casual
 intermarriages and to count cousinship, like Auntie Kirstie.  The
 difference in their social station was trenchant; propriety, prudence,
 all that she had ever learned, all that she knew, bade her flee.  But on
 the other hand the cup of life now offered to her was too enchanting.
 For one moment, she saw the question clearly, and definitely made her
 choice.  She stood up and showed herself an instant in the gap relieved
 upon the sky line; and the next, fled trembling and sat down glowing with
 excitement on the Weavers stone.  She shut her eyes, seeking, praying
 for composure.  Her hand shook in her lap, and her mind was full of
 incongruous and futile speeches.  What was there to make a work about?
 She could take care of herself, she supposed!  There was no harm in
 seeing the laird.  It was the best thing that could happen.  She would
 mark a proper distance to him once and for all.  Gradually the wheels of
 her nature ceased to go round so madly, and she sat in passive
 expectation, a quiet, solitary figure in the midst of the grey moss.  I
 have said she was no hypocrite, but here I am at fault.  She never
 admitted to herself that she had come up the hill to look for Archie.
 And perhaps after all she did not know, perhaps came as a stone falls.
 For the steps of love in the young, and especially in girls, are
 instinctive and unconscious.
 
 In the meantime Archie was drawing rapidly near, and he at least was
 consciously seeking her neighbourhood.  The afternoon had turned to ashes
 in his mouth; the memory of the girl had kept him from reading and drawn
 him as with cords; and at last, as the cool of the evening began to come
 on, he had taken his hat and set forth, with a smothered ejaculation, by
 the moor path to Cauldstaneslap.  He had no hope to find her; he took the
 off chance without expectation of result and to relieve his uneasiness.
 The greater was his surprise, as he surmounted the slope and came into
 the hollow of the Deils Hags, to see there, like an answer to his
 wishes, the little womanly figure in the grey dress and the pink kerchief
 sitting little, and low, and lost, and acutely solitary, in these
 desolate surroundings and on the weather-beaten stone of the dead weaver.
 Those things that still smacked of winter were all rusty about her, and
 those things that already relished of the spring had put forth the tender
 and lively colours of the season.  Even in the unchanging face of the
 death-stone, changes were to be remarked; and in the channeled lettering,
 the moss began to renew itself in jewels of green.  By an afterthought
 that was a stroke of art, she had turned up over her head the back of the
 kerchief; so that it now framed becomingly her vivacious and yet pensive
 face.  Her feet were gathered under her on the one side, and she leaned
 on her bare arm, which showed out strong and round, tapered to a slim
 wrist, and shimmered in the fading light.
 
 Young Hermiston was struck with a certain chill.  He was reminded that he
 now dealt in serious matters of life and death.  This was a grown woman
 he was approaching, endowed with her mysterious potencies and
 attractions, the treasury of the continued race, and he was neither
 better nor worse than the average of his sex and age.  He had a certain
 delicacy which had preserved him hitherto unspotted, and which (had
 either of them guessed it) made him a more dangerous companion when his
 heart should be really stirred.  His throat was dry as he came near; but
 the appealing sweetness of her smile stood between them like a guardian
 angel.
 
 For she turned to him and smiled, though without rising.  There was a
 shade in this cavalier greeting that neither of them perceived; neither
 he, who simply thought it gracious and charming as herself; nor yet she,
 who did not observe (quick as she was) the difference between rising to
 meet the laird, and remaining seated to receive the expected admirer.
 
 Are ye stepping west, Hermiston? said she, giving him his territorial
 name after the fashion of the country-side.
 
 I was, said he, a little hoarsely, but I think I will be about the end
 of my stroll now.  Are you like me, Miss Christina?  The house would not
 hold me.  I came here seeking air.
 
 He took his seat at the other end of the tombstone and studied her,
 wondering what was she.  There was infinite import in the question alike
 for her and him.
 
 Ay, she said.  I couldna bear the roof either.  Its a habit of mine
 to come up here about the gloaming when its quaiet and caller.
 
 It was a habit of my mothers also, he said gravely.  The recollection
 half startled him as he expressed it.  He looked around.  I have scarce
 been here since.  Its peaceful, he said, with a long breath.
 
 Its no like Glasgow, she replied.  A weary place, yon Glasgow!  But
 what a day have I had for my homecoming, and what a bonny evening!
 
 Indeed, it was a wonderful day, said Archie.  I think I will remember
 it years and years until I come to die.  On days like thisI do not know
 if you feel as I dobut everything appears so brief, and fragile, and
 exquisite, that I am afraid to touch life.  We are here for so short a
 time; and all the old people before usRutherfords of Hermiston, Elliotts
 of the Cauldstaneslapthat were here but a while since riding about and
 keeping up a great noise in this quiet cornermaking love too, and
 marryingwhy, where are they now?  Its deadly commonplace, but, after
 all, the commonplaces are the great poetic truths.
 
 He was sounding her, semi-consciously, to see if she could understand
 him; to learn if she were only an animal the colour of flowers, or had a
 soul in her to keep her sweet.  She, on her part, her means well in hand,
 watched, womanlike, for any opportunity to shine, to abound in his
 humour, whatever that might be.  The dramatic artist, that lies dormant
 or only half awake in most human beings, had in her sprung to his feet in
 a divine fury, and chance had served her well.  She looked upon him with
 a subdued twilight look that became the hour of the day and the train of
 thought; earnestness shone through her like stars in the purple west; and
 from the great but controlled upheaval of her whole nature there passed
 into her voice, and rang in her lightest words, a thrill of emotion.
 
 Have you mind of Dands song? she answered.  I think hell have been
 trying to say what you have been thinking.
 
 No, I never heard it, he said.  Repeat it to me, can you?
 
 Its nothing wanting the tune, said Kirstie.
 
 Then sing it me, said he.
 
 On the Lords Day?  That would never do, Mr. Weir!
 
 I am afraid I am not so strict a keeper of the Sabbath, and there is no
 one in this place to hear us, unless the poor old ancient under the
 stone.
 
 No that Im thinking that really, she said.  By my way of thinking,
 its just as serious as a psalm.  Will I sooth it to ye, then?
 
 If you please, said he, and, drawing near to her on the tombstone,
 prepared to listen.
 
 She sat up as if to sing.  Ill only can sooth it to ye, she explained.
 I wouldna like to sing out loud on the Sabbath.  I think the birds would
 carry news of it to Gilbert, and she smiled.  Its about the Elliotts,
 she continued, and I think theres few bonnier bits in the book-poets,
 though Dand has never got printed yet.
 
 And she began, in the low, clear tones of her half voice, now sinking
 almost to a whisper, now rising to a particular note which was her best,
 and which Archie learned to wait for with growing emotion:
 
     O they rade in the rain, in the days that are gane,
        In the rain and the wind and the lave,
     They shoutit in the ha and they routit on the hill,
        But theyre a quaitit noo in the grave.
     Auld, auld Elliotts, clay-cauld Elliotts, dour, bauld Elliotte of
     auld!
 
 All the time she sang she looked steadfastly before her, her knees
 straight, her hands upon her knee, her head cast back and up.  The
 expression was admirable throughout, for had she not learned it from the
 lips and under the criticism of the author?  When it was done, she turned
 upon Archie a face softly bright, and eyes gently suffused and shining in
 the twilight, and his heart rose and went out to her with boundless pity
 and sympathy.  His question was answered.  She was a human being tuned to
 a sense of the tragedy of life; there were pathos and music and a great
 heart in the girl.
 
 He arose instinctively, she also; for she saw she had gained a point, and
 scored the impression deeper, and she had wit enough left to flee upon a
 victory.  They were but commonplaces that remained to be exchanged, but
 the low, moved voices in which they passed made them sacred in the
 memory.  In the falling greyness of the evening he watched her figure
 winding through the morass, saw it turn a last time and wave a hand, and
 then pass through the Slap; and it seemed to him as if something went
 along with her out of the deepest of his heart.  And something surely had
 come, and come to dwell there.  He had retained from childhood a picture,
 now half obliterated by the passage of time and the multitude of fresh
 impressions, of his mother telling him, with the fluttered earnestness of
 her voice, and often with dropping tears, the tale of the Praying
 Weaver, on the very scene of his brief tragedy and long repose.  And now
 there was a companion piece; and he beheld, and he should behold for
 ever, Christina perched on the same tomb, in the grey colours of the
 evening, gracious, dainty, perfect as a flower, and she also singing
 
     Of old, unhappy far off things,
     And battles long ago,
 
 of their common ancestors now dead, of their rude wars composed, their
 weapons buried with them, and of these strange changelings, their
 descendants, who lingered a little in their places, and would soon be
 gone also, and perhaps sung of by others at the gloaming hour.  By one of
 the unconscious arts of tenderness the two women were enshrined together
 in his memory.  Tears, in that hour of sensibility, came into his eyes
 indifferently at the thought of either; and the girl, from being
 something merely bright and shapely, was caught up into the zone of
 things serious as life and death and his dead mother.  So that in all
 ways and on either side, Fate played his game artfully with this poor
 pair of children.  The generations were prepared, the pangs were made
 ready, before the curtain rose on the dark drama.
 
 In the same moment of time that she disappeared from Archie, there opened
 before Kirsties eyes the cup-like hollow in which the farm lay.  She
 saw, some five hundred feet below her, the house making itself bright
 with candles, and this was a broad hint to her to hurry.  For they were
 only kindled on a Sabbath night with a view to that family worship which
 rounded in the incomparable tedium of the day and brought on the
 relaxation of supper.  Already she knew that Robert must be within-sides
 at the head of the table, waling the portions; for it was Robert in his
 quality of family priest and judge, not the gifted Gilbert, who
 officiated.  She made good time accordingly down the steep ascent, and
 came up to the door panting as the three younger brothers, all roused at
 last from slumber, stood together in the cool and the dark of the evening
 with a fry of nephews and nieces about them, chatting and awaiting the
 expected signal.  She stood back; she had no mind to direct attention to
 her late arrival or to her labouring breath.
 
 Kirstie, ye have shaved it this time, my lass? said Clem.  Whaur were
 ye?
 
 O, just taking a dander by mysel, said Kirstie.
 
 And the talk continued on the subject of the American War, without
 further reference to the truant who stood by them in the covert of the
 dusk, thrilling with happiness and the sense of guilt.
 
 The signal was given, and the brothers began to go in one after another,
 amid the jostle and throng of Hobs children.
 
 Only Dandie, waiting till the last, caught Kirstie by the arm.  When did
 ye begin to dander in pink hosen, Mistress Elliott? he whispered slyly.
 
 She looked down; she was one blush.  I maun have forgotten to change
 them, said she; and went into prayers in her turn with a troubled mind,
 between anxiety as to whether Dand should have observed her yellow
 stockings at church, and should thus detect her in a palpable falsehood,
 and shame that she had already made good his prophecy.  She remembered
 the words of it, how it was to be when she had gotten a jo, and that that
 would be for good and evil.  Will I have gotten my jo now? she thought
 with a secret rapture.
 
 And all through prayers, where it was her principal business to conceal
 the pink stockings from the eyes of the indifferent Mrs. Hoband all
 through supper, as she made a feint of eating and sat at the table
 radiant and constrainedand again when she had left them and come into
 her chamber, and was alone with her sleeping niece, and could at last lay
 aside the armour of societythe same words sounded within her, the same
 profound note of happiness, of a world all changed and renewed, of a day
 that had been passed in Paradise, and of a night that was to be heaven
 opened.  All night she seemed to be conveyed smoothly upon a shallow
 stream of sleep and waking, and through the bowers of Beulah; all night
 she cherished to her heart that exquisite hope; and if, towards morning,
 she forgot it a while in a more profound unconsciousness, it was to catch
 again the rainbow thought with her first moment of awaking.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIIENTER MEPHISTOPHELES
 
 
 Two days later a gig from Crossmichael deposited Frank Innes at the doors
 of Hermiston.  Once in a way, during the past winter, Archie, in some
 acute phase of boredom, had written him a letter.  It had contained
 something in the nature of an invitation or a reference to an
 invitationprecisely what, neither of them now remembered.  When Innes
 had received it, there had been nothing further from his mind than to
 bury himself in the moors with Archie; but not even the most acute
 political heads are guided through the steps of life with unerring
 directness.  That would require a gift of prophecy which has been denied
 to man.  For instance, who could have imagined that, not a month after he
 had received the letter, and turned it into mockery, and put off
 answering it, and in the end lost it, misfortunes of a gloomy cast should
 begin to thicken over Franks career?  His case may be briefly stated.
 His father, a small Morayshire laird with a large family, became
 recalcitrant and cut off the supplies; he had fitted himself out with the
 beginnings of quite a good law library, which, upon some sudden losses on
 the turf, he had been obliged to sell before they were paid for; and his
 bookseller, hearing some rumour of the event, took out a warrant for his
 arrest.  Innes had early word of it, and was able to take precautions.
 In this immediate welter of his affairs, with an unpleasant charge
 hanging over him, he had judged it the part of prudence to be off
 instantly, had written a fervid letter to his father at Inverauld, and
 put himself in the coach for Crossmichael.  Any port in a storm!  He was
 manfully turning his back on the Parliament House and its gay babble, on
 porter and oysters, the race-course and the ring; and manfully prepared,
 until these clouds should have blown by, to share a living grave with
 Archie Weir at Hermiston.
 
 To do him justice, he was no less surprised to be going than Archie was
 to see him come; and he carried off his wonder with an infinitely better
 grace.
 
 Well, here I am! said he, as he alighted.  Pylades has come to Orestes
 at last.  By the way, did you get my answer?  No?  How very provoking!
 Well, here I am to answer for myself, and thats better still.
 
 I am very glad to see you, of course, said Archie.  I make you
 heartily welcome, of course.  But you surely have not come to stay, with
 the Courts still sitting; is that not most unwise?
 
 Damn the Courts! says Frank.  What are the Courts to friendship and a
 little fishing?
 
 And so it was agreed that he was to stay, with no term to the visit but
 the term which he had privily set to it himselfthe day, namely, when his
 father should have come down with the dust, and he should be able to
 pacify the bookseller.  On such vague conditions there began for these
 two young men (who were not even friends) a life of great familiarity
 and, as the days drew on, less and less intimacy.  They were together at
 meal times, together o nights when the hour had come for whisky-toddy;
 but it might have been noticed (had there been any one to pay heed) that
 they were rarely so much together by day.  Archie had Hermiston to attend
 to, multifarious activities in the hills, in which he did not require,
 and had even refused, Franks escort.  He would be off sometimes in the
 morning and leave only a note on the breakfast table to announce the
 fact; and sometimes, with no notice at all, he would not return for
 dinner until the hour was long past.  Innes groaned under these
 desertions; it required all his philosophy to sit down to a solitary
 breakfast with composure, and all his unaffected good-nature to be able
 to greet Archie with friendliness on the more rare occasions when he came
 home late for dinner.
 
 I wonder what on earth he finds to do, Mrs. Elliott? said he one
 morning, after he had just read the hasty billet and sat down to table.
 
 I suppose it will be business, sir, replied the housekeeper drily,
 measuring his distance off to him by an indicated curtsy.
 
 But I cant imagine what business! he reiterated.
 
 I suppose it will be _his_ business, retorted the austere Kirstie.
 
 He turned to her with that happy brightness that made the charm of his
 disposition, and broke into a peal of healthy and natural laughter.
 
 Well played, Mrs. Elliott! he cried; and the housekeepers face relaxed
 into the shadow of an iron smile.  Well played indeed! said he.  But
 you must not be making a stranger of me like that.  Why, Archie and I
 were at the High School together, and weve been to college together, and
 we were going to the Bar together, whenyou know!  Dear, dear me! what a
 pity that was!  A life spoiled, a fine young fellow as good as buried
 here in the wilderness with rustics; and all for what?  A frolic, silly,
 if you like, but no more.  God, how good your scones are, Mrs. Elliott!
 
 Theyre no mines, it was the lassie made them, said Kirstie; and,
 saving your presence, theres little sense in taking the Lords name in
 vain about idle vivers that you fill your kyte wi.
 
 I daresay youre perfectly right, maam, quoth the imperturbable Frank.
 But as I was saying, this is a pitiable business, this about poor
 Archie; and you and I might do worse than put our heads together, like a
 couple of sensible people, and bring it to an end.  Let me tell you,
 maam, that Archie is really quite a promising young man, and in my
 opinion he would do well at the Bar.  As for his father, no one can deny
 his ability, and I dont fancy any one would care to deny that he has the
 deils own temper
 
 If youll excuse me, Mr. Innes, I think the lass is crying on me, said
 Kirstie, and flounced from the room.
 
 The damned, cross-grained, old broomstick! ejaculated Innes.
 
 In the meantime, Kirstie had escaped into the kitchen, and before her
 vassal gave vent to her feelings.
 
 Here, ettercap!  Yell have to wait on yon Innes!  I canna haud myself
 in.  Puir Erchie!  Id puir Erchie him, if I had my way!  And
 Hermiston with the deils ain temper!  God, let him take Hermistons
 scones out of his mouth first.  Theres no a hair on ayther o the Weirs
 that hasna mair spunk and dirdum to it than what he has in his hale
 dwaibly body!  Settin up his snash to me!  Let him gang to the black
 toon where hes mebbe wantitbirling in a curriclewi pimatum on his
 heidmaking a mess o himsel wi nesty hizziesa fair disgrace!  It was
 impossible to hear without admiration Kirsties graduated disgust, as she
 brought forth, one after another, these somewhat baseless charges.  Then
 she remembered her immediate purpose, and turned again on her fascinated
 auditor.  Do ye no hear me, tawpie? Do ye no hear what Im tellin ye?
 Will I have to shoo ye in to him? If I come to attend to ye, mistress!
 And the maid fled the kitchen, which had become practically dangerous, to
 attend on Innes wants in the front parlour.
 
 _Tantaene irae_?  Has the reader perceived the reason?  Since Franks
 coming there were no more hours of gossip over the supper tray!  All his
 blandishments were in vain; he had started handicapped on the race for
 Mrs. Elliotts favour.
 
 But it was a strange thing how misfortune dogged him in his efforts to be
 genial.  I must guard the reader against accepting Kirsties epithets as
 evidence; she was more concerned for their vigour than for their
 accuracy.  Dwaibly, for instance; nothing could be more calumnious.
 Frank was the very picture of good looks, good humour, and manly youth.
 He had bright eyes with a sparkle and a dance to them, curly hair, a
 charming smile, brilliant teeth, an admirable carriage of the head, the
 look of a gentleman, the address of one accustomed to please at first
 sight and to improve the impression.  And with all these advantages, he
 failed with every one about Hermiston; with the silent shepherd, with the
 obsequious grieve, with the groom who was also the ploughman, with the
 gardener and the gardeners sistera pious, down-hearted woman with a
 shawl over her earshe failed equally and flatly.  They did not like him,
 and they showed it.  The little maid, indeed, was an exception; she
 admired him devoutly, probably dreamed of him in her private hours; but
 she was accustomed to play the part of silent auditor to Kirsties
 tirades and silent recipient of Kirsties buffets, and she had learned
 not only to be a very capable girl of her years, but a very secret and
 prudent one besides.  Frank was thus conscious that he had one ally and
 sympathiser in the midst of that general union of disfavour that
 surrounded, watched, and waited on him in the house of Hermiston; but he
 had little comfort or society from that alliance, and the demure little
 maid (twelve on her last birthday) preserved her own counsel, and tripped
 on his service, brisk, dumbly responsive, but inexorably
 unconversational.  For the others, they were beyond hope and beyond
 endurance.  Never had a young Apollo been cast among such rustic
 barbarians.  But perhaps the cause of his ill-success lay in one trait
 which was habitual and unconscious with him, yet diagnostic of the man.
 It was his practice to approach any one person at the expense of some one
 else.  He offered you an alliance against the some one else; he flattered
 you by slighting him; you were drawn into a small intrigue against him
 before you knew how.  Wonderful are the virtues of this process
 generally; but Franks mistake was in the choice of the some one else.
 He was not politic in that; he listened to the voice of irritation.
 Archie had offended him at first by what he had felt to be rather a dry
 reception, had offended him since by his frequent absences.  He was
 besides the one figure continually present in Franks eye; and it was to
 his immediate dependants that Frank could offer the snare of his
 sympathy.  Now the truth is that the Weirs, father and son, were
 surrounded by a posse of strenuous loyalists.  Of my lord they were
 vastly proud.  It was a distinction in itself to be one of the vassals of
 the Hanging Judge, and his gross, formidable joviality was far from
 unpopular in the neighbourhood of his home.  For Archie they had, one and
 all, a sensitive affection and respect which recoiled from a word of
 belittlement.
 
 Nor was Frank more successful when he went farther afield.  To the Four
 Black Brothers, for instance, he was antipathetic in the highest degree.
 Hob thought him too light, Gib too profane.  Clem, who saw him but for a
 day or two before he went to Glasgow, wanted to know what the fules
 business was, and whether he meant to stay here all session time! Yons
 a drone, he pronounced.  As for Dand, it will be enough to describe
 their first meeting, when Frank had been whipping a river and the rustic
 celebrity chanced to come along the path.
 
 Im told youre quite a poet, Frank had said.
 
 Wha tellt ye that, mannie? had been the unconciliating answer.
 
 O, everybody! says Frank.
 
 God!  Heres fame! said the sardonic poet, and he had passed on his
 way.
 
 Come to think of it, we have here perhaps a truer explanation of Franks
 failures.  Had he met Mr. Sheriff Scott he could have turned a neater
 compliment, because Mr. Scott would have been a friend worth making.
 Dand, on the other hand, he did not value sixpence, and he showed it even
 while he tried to flatter.  Condescension is an excellent thing, but it
 is strange how one-sided the pleasure of it is!  He who goes fishing
 among the Scots peasantry with condescension for a bait will have an
 empty basket by evening.
 
 In proof of this theory Frank made a great success of it at the
 Crossmichael Club, to which Archie took him immediately on his arrival;
 his own last appearance on that scene of gaiety.  Frank was made welcome
 there at once, continued to go regularly, and had attended a meeting (as
 the members ever after loved to tell) on the evening before his death.
 Young Hay and young Pringle appeared again.  There was another supper at
 Windiclaws, another dinner at Driffel; and it resulted in Frank being
 taken to the bosom of the county people as unreservedly as he had been
 repudiated by the country folk.  He occupied Hermiston after the manner
 of an invader in a conquered capital.  He was perpetually issuing from
 it, as from a base, to toddy parties, fishing parties, and dinner
 parties, to which Archie was not invited, or to which Archie would not
 go.  It was now that the name of The Recluse became general for the young
 man.  Some say that Innes invented it; Innes, at least, spread it abroad.
 
 Hows all with your Recluse to-day? people would ask.
 
 O, reclusing away! Innes would declare, with his bright air of saying
 something witty; and immediately interrupt the general laughter which he
 had provoked much more by his air than his words, Mind you, its all
 very well laughing, but Im not very well pleased.  Poor Archie is a good
 fellow, an excellent fellow, a fellow I always liked.  I think it small
 of him to take his little disgrace so hard, and shut himself up.  Grant
 that it is a ridiculous story, painfully ridiculous, I keep telling him.
 Be a man!  Live it down, man!  But not he.  Of course, its just
 solitude, and shame, and all that.  But I confess Im beginning to fear
 the result.  It would be all the pities in the world if a really
 promising fellow like Weir was to end ill.  Im seriously tempted to
 write to Lord Hermiston, and put it plainly to him.
 
 I would if I were you, some of his auditors would say, shaking the
 head, sitting bewildered and confused at this new view of the matter, so
 deftly indicated by a single word.  A capital idea! they would add, and
 wonder at the _aplomb_ and position of this young man, who talked as a
 matter of course of writing to Hermiston and correcting him upon his
 private affairs.
 
 And Frank would proceed, sweetly confidential: Ill give you an idea,
 now.  Hes actually sore about the way that Im received and hes left
 out in the countyactually jealous and sore.  Ive rallied him and Ive
 reasoned with him, told him that every one was most kindly inclined
 towards him, told him even that I was received merely because I was his
 guest.  But its no use.  He will neither accept the invitations he gets,
 nor stop brooding about the ones where hes left out.  What Im afraid of
 is that the wounds ulcerating.  He had always one of those dark, secret,
 angry naturesa little underhand and plenty of bileyou know the sort.
 He must have inherited it from the Weirs, whom I suspect to have been a
 worthy family of weavers somewhere; whats the cant phrase?sedentary
 occupation.  Its precisely the kind of character to go wrong in a false
 position like what his fathers made for him, or hes making for himself,
 whichever you like to call it.  And for my part, I think it a disgrace,
 Frank would say generously.
 
 Presently the sorrow and anxiety of this disinterested friend took shape.
 He began in private, in conversations of two, to talk vaguely of bad
 habits and low habits.  I must say Im afraid hes going wrong
 altogether, he would say.  Ill tell you plainly, and between
 ourselves, I scarcely like to stay there any longer; only, man, Im
 positively afraid to leave him alone.  Youll see, I shall be blamed for
 it later on.  Im staying at a great sacrifice.  Im hindering my chances
 at the Bar, and I cant blind my eyes to it.  And what Im afraid of is
 that Im going to get kicked for it all round before alls done.  You
 see, nobody believes in friendship nowadays.
 
 Well, Innes, his interlocutor would reply, its very good of you, I
 must say that.  If theres any blame going, youll always be sure of _my_
 good word, for one thing.
 
 Well, Frank would continue, candidly, I dont say its pleasant.  He
 has a very rough way with him; his fathers son, you know.  I dont say
 hes rudeof course, I couldnt be expected to stand thatbut he steers
 very near the wind.  No, its not pleasant; but I tell ye, man, in
 conscience I dont think it would be fair to leave him.  Mind you, I
 dont say theres anything actually wrong.  What I say is that I dont
 like the looks of it, man! and he would press the arm of his momentary
 confidant.
 
 In the early stages I am persuaded there was no malice.  He talked but
 for the pleasure of airing himself.  He was essentially glib, as becomes
 the young advocate, and essentially careless of the truth, which is the
 mark of the young ass; and so he talked at random.  There was no
 particular bias, but that one which is indigenous and universal, to
 flatter himself and to please and interest the present friend.  And by
 thus milling air out of his mouth, he had presently built up a
 presentation of Archie which was known and talked of in all corners of
 the county.  Wherever there was a residential house and a walled garden,
 wherever there was a dwarfish castle and a park, wherever a quadruple
 cottage by the ruins of a peel-tower showed an old family going down, and
 wherever a handsome villa with a carriage approach and a shrubbery marked
 the coming up of a new oneprobably on the wheels of machineryArchie
 began to be regarded in the light of a dark, perhaps a vicious mystery,
 and the future developments of his career to be looked for with
 uneasiness and confidential whispering.  He had done something
 disgraceful, my dear.  What, was not precisely known, and that good kind
 young man, Mr. Innes, did his best to make light of it.  But there it
 was.  And Mr. Innes was very anxious about him now; he was really uneasy,
 my dear; he was positively wrecking his own prospects because he dared
 not leave him alone.  How wholly we all lie at the mercy of a single
 prater, not needfully with any malign purpose!  And if a man but talks of
 himself in the right spirit, refers to his virtuous actions by the way,
 and never applies to them the name of virtue, how easily his evidence is
 accepted in the court of public opinion!
 
 All this while, however, there was a more poisonous ferment at work
 between the two lads, which came late indeed to the surface, but had
 modified and magnified their dissensions from the first.  To an idle,
 shallow, easy-going customer like Frank, the smell of a mystery was
 attractive.  It gave his mind something to play with, like a new toy to a
 child; and it took him on the weak side, for like many young men coming
 to the Bar, and before they had been tried and found wanting, he
 flattered himself he was a fellow of unusual quickness and penetration.
 They knew nothing of Sherlock Holmes in those days, but there was a good
 deal said of Talleyrand.  And if you could have caught Frank off his
 guard, he would have confessed with a smirk that, if he resembled any
 one, it was the Marquis de Talleyrand-Perigord.  It was on the occasion
 of Archies first absence that this interest took root.  It was vastly
 deepened when Kirstie resented his curiosity at breakfast, and that same
 afternoon there occurred another scene which clinched the business.  He
 was fishing Swingleburn, Archie accompanying him, when the latter looked
 at his watch.
 
 Well, good-bye, said he.  I have something to do.  See you at dinner.
 
 Dont be in such a hurry, cries Frank.  Hold on till I get my rod up.
 Ill go with you; Im sick of flogging this ditch.
 
 And he began to reel up his line.
 
 Archie stood speechless.  He took a long while to recover his wits under
 this direct attack; but by the time he was ready with his answer, and the
 angle was almost packed up, he had become completely Weir, and the
 hanging face gloomed on his young shoulders.  He spoke with a laboured
 composure, a laboured kindness even; but a child could see that his mind
 was made up.
 
 I beg your pardon, Innes; I dont want to be disagreeable, but let us
 understand one another from the beginning.  When I want your company,
 Ill let you know.
 
 O! cries Frank, you dont want my company, dont you?
 
 Apparently not just now, replied Archie.  I even indicated to you when
 I did, if youll rememberand that was at dinner.  If we two fellows are
 to live together pleasantlyand I see no reason why we should notit can
 only be by respecting each others privacy.  If we begin intruding
 
 O, come!  Ill take this at no mans hands.  Is this the way you treat a
 guest and an old friend? cried Innes.
 
 Just go home and think over what I said by yourself, continued Archie,
 whether its reasonable, or whether its really offensive or not; and
 lets meet at dinner as though nothing had happened, Ill put it this
 way, if you likethat I know my own character, that Im looking forward
 (with great pleasure, I assure you) to a long visit from you, and that
 Im taking precautions at the first.  I see the thing that wethat I, if
 you likemight fall out upon, and I step in and _obsto principiis_.  I
 wager you five pounds youll end by seeing that I mean friendliness, and
 I assure you, Francie, I do, he added, relenting.
 
 Bursting with anger, but incapable of speech, Innes shouldered his rod,
 made a gesture of farewell, and strode off down the burn-side.  Archie
 watched him go without moving.  He was sorry, but quite unashamed.  He
 hated to be inhospitable, but in one thing he was his fathers son.  He
 had a strong sense that his house was his own and no man elses; and to
 lie at a guests mercy was what he refused.  He hated to seem harsh.  But
 that was Franks lookout.  If Frank had been commonly discreet, he would
 have been decently courteous.  And there was another consideration.  The
 secret he was protecting was not his own merely; it was hers: it belonged
 to that inexpressible she who was fast taking possession of his soul, and
 whom he would soon have defended at the cost of burning cities.  By the
 time he had watched Frank as far as the Swingleburn-foot, appearing and
 disappearing in the tarnished heather, still stalking at a fierce gait
 but already dwindled in the distance into less than the smallness of
 Lilliput, he could afford to smile at the occurrence.  Either Frank would
 go, and that would be a reliefor he would continue to stay, and his host
 must continue to endure him.  And Archie was now freeby devious paths,
 behind hillocks and in the hollow of burnsto make for the trysting-place
 where Kirstie, cried about by the curlew and the plover, waited and
 burned for his coming by the Covenanters stone.
 
 Innes went off down-hill in a passion of resentment, easy to be
 understood, but which yielded progressively to the needs of his
 situation.  He cursed Archie for a cold-hearted, unfriendly, rude, rude
 dog; and himself still more passionately for a fool in having come to
 Hermiston when he might have sought refuge in almost any other house in
 Scotland.  But the step once taken, was practically irretrievable.  He
 had no more ready money to go anywhere else; he would have to borrow from
 Archie the next club-night; and ill as he thought of his hosts manners,
 he was sure of his practical generosity.  Franks resemblance to
 Talleyrand strikes me as imaginary; but at least not Talleyrand himself
 could have more obediently taken his lesson from the facts.  He met
 Archie at dinner without resentment, almost with cordiality.  You must
 take your friends as you find them, he would have said.  Archie couldnt
 help being his fathers son, or his grandfathers, the hypothetical
 weavers, grandson.  The son of a hunks, he was still a hunks at heart,
 incapable of true generosity and consideration; but he had other
 qualities with which Frank could divert himself in the meanwhile, and to
 enjoy which it was necessary that Frank should keep his temper.
 
 So excellently was it controlled that he awoke next morning with his head
 full of a different, though a cognate subject.  What was Archies little
 game?  Why did he shun Franks company?  What was he keeping secret?  Was
 he keeping tryst with somebody, and was it a woman?  It would be a good
 joke and a fair revenge to discover.  To that task he set himself with a
 great deal of patience, which might have surprised his friends, for he
 had been always credited not with patience so much as brilliancy; and
 little by little, from one point to another, he at last succeeded in
 piecing out the situation.  First he remarked that, although Archie set
 out in all the directions of the compass, he always came home again from
 some point between the south and west.  From the study of a map, and in
 consideration of the great expanse of untenanted moorland running in that
 direction towards the sources of the Clyde, he laid his finger on
 Cauldstaneslap and two other neighbouring farms, Kingsmuirs and
 Polintarf.  But it was difficult to advance farther.  With his rod for a
 pretext, he vainly visited each of them in turn; nothing was to be seen
 suspicious about this trinity of moorland settlements.  He would have
 tried to follow Archie, had it been the least possible, but the nature of
 the land precluded the idea.  He did the next best, ensconced himself in
 a quiet corner, and pursued his movements with a telescope.  It was
 equally in vain, and he soon wearied of his futile vigilance, left the
 telescope at home, and had almost given the matter up in despair, when,
 on the twenty-seventh day of his visit, he was suddenly confronted with
 the person whom he sought.  The first Sunday Kirstie had managed to stay
 away from kirk on some pretext of indisposition, which was more truly
 modesty; the pleasure of beholding Archie seeming too sacred, too vivid
 for that public place.  On the two following, Frank had himself been
 absent on some of his excursions among the neighbouring families.  It was
 not until the fourth, accordingly, that Frank had occasion to set eyes on
 the enchantress.  With the first look, all hesitation was over.  She came
 with the Cauldstaneslap party; then she lived at Cauldstaneslap.  Here
 was Archies secret, here was the woman, and more than thatthough I have
 need here of every manageable attenuation of languagewith the first
 look, he had already entered himself as rival.  It was a good deal in
 pique, it was a little in revenge, it was much in genuine admiration: the
 devil may decide the proportions!  I cannot, and it is very likely that
 Frank could not.
 
 Mighty attractive milkmaid, he observed, on the way home.
 
 Who? said Archie.
 
 O, the girl youre looking atarent you?  Forward there on the road.
 She came attended by the rustic bard; presumably, therefore, belongs to
 his exalted family.  The single objection! for the four black brothers
 are awkward customers.  If anything were to go wrong, Gib would gibber,
 and Clem would prove inclement; and Dand fly in danders, and Hob blow up
 in gobbets.  It would be a Helliott of a business!
 
 Very humorous, I am sure, said Archie.
 
 Well, I am trying to be so, said Frank.  Its none too easy in this
 place, and with your solemn society, my dear fellow.  But confess that
 the milkmaid has found favour in your eyes, or resign all claim to be a
 man of taste.
 
 It is no matter, returned Archie.
 
 But the other continued to look at him, steadily and quizzically, and his
 colour slowly rose and deepened under the glance, until not impudence
 itself could have denied that he was blushing.  And at this Archie lost
 some of his control.  He changed his stick from one hand to the other,
 andO, for Gods sake, dont be an ass! he cried.
 
 Ass?  Thats the retort delicate without doubt, says Frank.  Beware of
 the homespun brothers, dear.  If they come into the dance, youll see
 whos an ass.  Think now, if they only applied (say) a quarter as much
 talent as I have applied to the question of what Mr. Archie does with his
 evening hours, and why he is so unaffectedly nasty when the subjects
 touched on
 
 You are touching on it now, interrupted Archie with a wince.
 
 Thank you.  That was all I wanted, an articulate confession, said
 Frank.
 
 I beg to remind you began Archie.
 
 But he was interrupted in turn.  My dear fellow, dont.  Its quite
 needless.  The subjects dead and buried.
 
 And Frank began to talk hastily on other matters, an art in which he was
 an adept, for it was his gift to be fluent on anything or nothing.  But
 although Archie had the grace or the timidity to suffer him to rattle on,
 he was by no means done with the subject.  When he came home to dinner,
 he was greeted with a sly demand, how things were looking Cauldstaneslap
 ways.  Frank took his first glass of port out after dinner to the toast
 of Kirstie, and later in the evening he returned to the charge again.
 
 I say, Weir, youll excuse me for returning again to this affair.  Ive
 been thinking it over, and I wish to beg you very seriously to be more
 careful.  Its not a safe business.  Not safe, my boy, said he.
 
 What? said Archie.
 
 Well, its your own fault if I must put a name on the thing; but really,
 as a friend, I cannot stand by and see you rushing head down into these
 dangers.  My dear boy, said he, holding up a warning cigar, consider!
 What is to be the end of it?
 
 The end of what?Archie, helpless with irritation, persisted in this
 dangerous and ungracious guard.
 
 Well, the end of the milkmaid; or, to speak more by the card, the end of
 Miss Christina Elliott of the Cauldstaneslap.
 
 I assure you, Archie broke out, this is all a figment of your
 imagination.  There is nothing to be said against that young lady; you
 have no right to introduce her name into the conversation.
 
 Ill make a note of it, said Frank.  She shall henceforth be nameless,
 nameless, nameless, Grigalach!  I make a note besides of your valuable
 testimony to her character.  I only want to look at this thing as a man
 of the world.  Admitted shes an angelbut, my good fellow, is she a
 lady?
 
 This was torture to Archie.  I beg your pardon, he said, struggling to
 be composed, but because you have wormed yourself into my confidence
 
 O, come! cried Frank.  Your confidence?  It was rosy but unconsenting.
 Your confidence, indeed?  Now, look!  This is what I must say, Weir, for
 it concerns your safety and good character, and therefore my honour as
 your friend.  You say I wormed myself into your confidence.  Wormed is
 good.  But what have I done?  I have put two and two together, just as
 the parish will be doing tomorrow, and the whole of Tweeddale in two
 weeks, and the black brotherswell, I wont put a date on that; it will
 be a dark and stormy morning!  Your secret, in other words, is poor
 Polls.  And I want to ask of you as a friend whether you like the
 prospect?  There are two horns to your dilemma, and I must say for myself
 I should look mighty ruefully on either.  Do you see yourself explaining
 to the four Black Brothers? or do you see yourself presenting the
 milkmaid to papa as the future lady of Hermiston?  Do you?  I tell you
 plainly, I dont!
 
 Archie rose.  I will hear no more of this, he said, in a trembling
 voice.
 
 But Frank again held up his cigar.  Tell me one thing first.  Tell me if
 this is not a friends part that I am playing?
 
 I believe you think it so, replied Archle.  I can go as far as that.
 I can do so much justice to your motives.  But I will hear no more of it.
 I am going to bed.
 
 Thats right, Weir, said Frank heartily.  Go to bed and think over it;
 and I say, man, dont forget your prayers!  I dont often do the
 moraldont go in for that sort of thingbut when I do theres one thing
 sure, that I mean it.
 
 So Archie marched off to bed, and Frank sat alone by the table for
 another hour or so, smiling to himself richly.  There was nothing
 vindictive in his nature; but, if revenge came in his way, it might as
 well be good, and the thought of Archies pillow reflections that night
 was indescribably sweet to him.  He felt a pleasant sense of power.  He
 looked down on Archie as on a very little boy whose strings he pulledas
 on a horse whom he had backed and bridled by sheer power of intelligence,
 and whom he might ride to glory or the grave at pleasure.  Which was it
 to be?  He lingered long, relishing the details of schemes that he was
 too idle to pursue.  Poor cork upon a torrent, he tasted that night the
 sweets of omnipotence, and brooded like a deity over the strands of that
 intrigue which was to shatter him before the summer waned.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIIIA NOCTURNAL VISIT
 
 
 Kirstie had many causes of distress.  More and more as we grow oldand
 yet more and more as we grow old and are women, frozen by the fear of
 agewe come to rely on the voice as the single outlet of the soul.  Only
 thus, in the curtailment of our means, can we relieve the straitened cry
 of the passion within us; only thus, in the bitter and sensitive shyness
 of advancing years, can we maintain relations with those vivacious
 figures of the young that still show before us and tend daily to become
 no more than the moving wall-paper of life.  Talk is the last link, the
 last relation.  But with the end of the conversation, when the voice
 stops and the bright face of the listener is turned away, solitude falls
 again on the bruised heart.  Kirstie had lost her cannie hour at een;
 she could no more wander with Archie, a ghost if you will, but a happy
 ghost, in fields Elysian.  And to her it was as if the whole world had
 fallen silent; to him, but an unremarkable change of amusements.  And she
 raged to know it.  The effervescency of her passionate and irritable
 nature rose within her at times to bursting point.
 
 This is the price paid by age for unseasonable ardours of feeling.  It
 must have been so for Kirstie at any time when the occasion chanced; but
 it so fell out that she was deprived of this delight in the hour when she
 had most need of it, when she had most to say, most to ask, and when she
 trembled to recognise her sovereignty not merely in abeyance but
 annulled.  For, with the clairvoyance of a genuine love, she had pierced
 the mystery that had so long embarrassed Frank.  She was conscious, even
 before it was carried out, even on that Sunday night when it began, of an
 invasion of her rights; and a voice told her the invaders name.  Since
 then, by arts, by accident, by small things observed, and by the general
 drift of Archies humour, she had passed beyond all possibility of doubt.
 With a sense of justice that Lord Hermiston might have envied, she had
 that day in church considered and admitted the attractions of the younger
 Kirstie; and with the profound humanity and sentimentality of her nature,
 she had recognised the coming of fate.  Not thus would she have chosen.
 She had seen, in imagination, Archie wedded to some tall, powerful, and
 rosy heroine of the golden locks, made in her own image, for whom she
 would have strewed the bride-bed with delight; and now she could have
 wept to see the ambition falsified.  But the gods had pronounced, and her
 doom was otherwise.
 
 She lay tossing in bed that night, besieged with feverish thoughts.
 There were dangerous matters pending, a battle was toward, over the fate
 of which she hung in jealousy, sympathy, fear, and alternate loyalty and
 disloyalty to either side.  Now she was reincarnated in her niece, and
 now in Archie.  Now she saw, through the girls eyes, the youth on his
 knees to her, heard his persuasive instances with a deadly weakness, and
 received his overmastering caresses.  Anon, with a revulsion, her temper
 raged to see such utmost favours of fortune and love squandered on a brat
 of a girl, one of her own house, using her own namea deadly
 ingredientand that didna ken her ain mind an was as blacks your hat.
 Now she trembled lest her deity should plead in vain, loving the idea of
 success for him like a triumph of nature; anon, with returning loyalty to
 her own family and sex, she trembled for Kirstie and the credit of the
 Elliotts.  And again she had a vision of herself, the day over for her
 old-world tales and local gossip, bidding farewell to her last link with
 life and brightness and love; and behind and beyond, she saw but the
 blank butt-end where she must crawl to die.  Had she then come to the
 lees? she, so great, so beautiful, with a heart as fresh as a girls and
 strong as womanhood?  It could not be, and yet it was so; and for a
 moment her bed was horrible to her as the sides of the grave.  And she
 looked forward over a waste of hours, and saw herself go on to rage, and
 tremble, and be softened, and rage again, until the day came and the
 labours of the day must be renewed.
 
 Suddenly she heard feet on the stairshis feet, and soon after the sound
 of a window-sash flung open.  She sat up with her heart beating.  He had
 gone to his room alone, and he had not gone to bed.  She might again have
 one of her night cracks; and at the entrancing prospect, a change came
 over her mind; with the approach of this hope of pleasure, all the baser
 metal became immediately obliterated from her thoughts.  She rose, all
 woman, and all the best of woman, tender, pitiful, hating the wrong,
 loyal to her own sexand all the weakest of that dear miscellany,
 nourishing, cherishing next her soft heart, voicelessly flattering, hopes
 that she would have died sooner than have acknowledged.  She tore off her
 nightcap, and her hair fell about her shoulders in profusion.  Undying
 coquetry awoke.  By the faint light of her nocturnal rush, she stood
 before the looking-glass, carried her shapely arms above her head, and
 gathered up the treasures of her tresses.  She was never backward to
 admire herself; that kind of modesty was a stranger to her nature; and
 she paused, struck with a pleased wonder at the sight.  Ye daft auld
 wife! she said, answering a thought that was not; and she blushed with
 the innocent consciousness of a child.  Hastily she did up the massive
 and shining coils, hastily donned a wrapper, and with the rushlight in
 her hand, stole into the hall.  Below stairs she heard the clock ticking
 the deliberate seconds, and Frank jingling with the decanters in the
 dining-room.  Aversion rose in her, bitter and momentary.  Nesty,
 tippling puggy! she thought; and the next moment she had knocked
 guardedly at Archies door and was bidden enter.
 
 Archie had been looking out into the ancient blackness, pierced here and
 there with a rayless star; taking the sweet air of the moors and the
 night into his bosom deeply; seeking, perhaps finding, peace after the
 manner of the unhappy.  He turned round as she came in, and showed her a
 pale face against the window-frame.
 
 Is that you, Kirstie? he asked.  Come in!
 
 Its unco late, my dear, said Kirstie, affecting unwillingness.
 
 No, no, he answered, not at all.  Come in, if you want a crack.  I am
 not sleepy, God knows!
 
 She advanced, took a chair by the toilet table and the candle, and set
 the rushlight at her foot.  Somethingit might be in the comparative
 disorder of her dress, it might be the emotion that now welled in her
 bosomhad touched her with a wand of transformation, and she seemed young
 with the youth of goddesses.
 
 Mr. Erchie, she began, whats this thats come to ye?
 
 I am not aware of anything that has come, said Archie, and blushed, and
 repented bitterly that he had let her in.
 
 O, my dear, thatll no dae! said Kirstie.  Its ill to blend the eyes
 of love.  O, Mr. Erchie, tak a thocht ere its ower late.  Ye shouldna be
 impatient o the braws o life, theyll a come in their saison, like the
 sun and the rain.  Yere young yet; yeve mony cantie years afore ye.
 See and dinna wreck yersel at the outset like sae mony ithers! Hae
 patiencethey telled me aye that was the owercome o lifehae patience,
 theres a braw day coming yet.  Gude kens it never cam to me; and here I
 am, wi nayther man nor bairn to ca my ain, wearying a folks wi my ill
 tongue, and you just the first, Mr. Erchie!
 
 I have a difficulty in knowing what you mean, said Archie.
 
 Weel, and Ill tell ye, she said.  Its just this, that Im feared.
 Im feared for ye, my dear.  Remember, your faither is a hard man,
 reaping where he hasna sowed and gaithering where he hasna strawed.  Its
 easy speakin, but mind!  Yell have to look in the gurly face om, where
 its ill to look, and vain to look for mercy.  Ye mind me o a bonny ship
 pitten oot into the black and gowsty seasyere a safe still, sittin
 quait and crackin wi Kirstie in your lown chalmer; but whaur will ye be
 the morn, and in whatten horror o the fearsome tempest, cryin on the
 hills to cover ye?
 
 Why, Kirstie, youre very enigmatical to-nightand very eloquent,
 Archie put in.
 
 And, my dear Mr. Erchie, she continued, with a change of voice, ye
 mauna think that I canna sympathise wi ye.  Ye mauna think that I havena
 been young mysel.  Lang syne, when I was a bit lassie, no twenty yet
 She paused and sighed.  Clean and caller, wi a fit like the hinney
 bee, she continned.  I was aye big and buirdly, ye maun understand; a
 bonny figure o a woman, though I say it that suldnabuilt to rear
 bairnsbraw bairns they suld hae been, and grand I would hae likit it!
 But I was young, dear, wi the bonny glint o youth in my een, and
 little I dreamed Id ever be tellin ye this, an auld, lanely, rudas
 wife!  Weel, Mr. Erchie, there was a lad cam courtin me, as was but
 naetural.  Mony had come before, and I would nane o them.  But this yin
 had a tongue to wile the birds frae the lift and the bees frae the
 foxglove bells.  Deary me, but its lang syne!  Folk have deed sinsyne
 and been buried, and are forgotten, and bairns been born and got merrit
 and got bairns o their ain.  Sinsyne woods have been plantit, and have
 grawn up and are bonny trees, and the joes sit in their shadow, and
 sinsyne auld estates have changed hands, and there have been wars and
 rumours of wars on the face of the earth.  And here Im stilllike an
 auld droopit crawlookin on and craikin!  But, Mr. Erchie, do ye no
 think that I have mind o it a still?  I was dwalling then in my
 faithers house; and its a curious thing that we were whiles trysted in
 the Deils Hags.  And do ye no think that I have mind of the bonny simmer
 days, the lang miles o the bluid-red heather, the cryin of the whaups,
 and the lad and the lassie that was trysted?  Do ye no think that I mind
 how the hilly sweetness ran about my hairt?  Ay, Mr. Erchie, I ken the
 way o itfine do I ken the wayhow the grace o God takes them, like
 Paul of Tarsus, when they think it least, and drives the pair o them
 into a land which is like a dream, and the world and the folks int are
 nae mair than clouds to the puir lassie, and heeven nae mair than
 windle-straes, if she can but pleesure him!  Until Tam deedthat was my
 story, she broke off to say, he deed, and I wasna at the buryin.  But
 while he was here, I could take care o mysel.  And can yon puir
 lassie?
 
 Kirstie, her eyes shining with unshed tears, stretched out her hand
 towards him appealingly; the bright and the dull gold of her hair flashed
 and smouldered in the coils behind her comely head, like the rays of an
 eternal youth; the pure colour had risen in her face; and Archie was
 abashed alike by her beauty and her story.  He came towards her slowly
 from the window, took up her hand in his and kissed it.
 
 Kirstie, he said hoarsely, you have misjudged me sorely.  I have
 always thought of her, I wouldna harm her for the universe, my woman!
 
 Eh, lad, and thats easy sayin, cried Kirstie, but its nane sae easy
 doin!  Man, do ye no comprehend that its Gods wull we should be
 blendit and glamoured, and have nae command over our ain members at a
 time like that?  My bairn, she cried, still holding his hand, think o
 the puir lass! have pity upon her, Erchie! and O, be wise for twa! Think
 o the risk she rins!  I have seen ye, and whats to prevent ithers!  I
 saw ye once in the Hags, in my ain howl, and I was wae to see ye therein
 pairt for the omen, for I think theres a weird on the placeand in pairt
 for pure nakit envy and bitterness o hairt.  Its strange ye should
 forgather there tae!  God! but yon puir, thrawn, auld Covenanters seen a
 heap o human natur since he lookit his last on the musket barrels, if he
 never saw nane afore, she added, with a kind of wonder in her eyes.
 
 I swear by my honour I have done her no wrong, said Archie.  I swear
 by my honour and the redemption of my soul that there shall none be done
 her.  I have heard of this before.  I have been foolish, Kirstie, not
 unkind, and, above all, not base.
 
 Theres my bairn! said Kirstie, rising.  Ill can trust ye noo, Ill
 can gang to my bed wi an easy hairt.  And then she saw in a flash how
 barren had been her triumph.  Archie had promised to spare the girl, and
 he would keep it; but who had promised to spare Archie?  What was to be
 the end of it?  Over a maze of difficulties she glanced, and saw, at the
 end of every passage, the flinty countenance of Hermiston.  And a kind of
 horror fell upon her at what she had done.  She wore a tragic mask.
 Erchie, the Lord peety you, dear, and peety me!  I have buildit on this
 foundationlaying her hand heavily on his shoulderand buildit hie, and
 pit my hairt in the buildin of it.  If the hale hypothec were to fa, I
 think, laddie, I would dee!  Excuse a daft wife that loves ye, and that
 kenned your mither.  And for His names sake keep yersel frae inordinate
 desires; haud your heart in baith your hands, carry it canny and laigh;
 dinna send it up like a hairns kite into the collieshangic o the wunds!
 Mind, Maister Erchie dear, that this lifes a disappointment, and a
 mouthfu o mools is the appointed end.
 
 Ay, but Kirstie, my woman, youre asking me ower much at last, said
 Archie, profoundly moved, and lapsing into the broad Scots.  Yere
 asking what nae man can grant ye, what only the Lord of heaven can grant
 ye if He see fit.  Ay!  And can even He!  I can promise ye what I shall
 do, and you can depend on that.  But how I shall feelmy woman, that is
 long past thinking of!
 
 They were both standing by now opposite each other.  The face of Archie
 wore the wretched semblance of a smile; hers was convulsed for a moment.
 
 Promise me ae thing, she cried in a sharp voice.  Promise me yell
 never do naething without telling me.
 
 No, Kirstie, I canna promise ye that, he replied.  I have promised
 enough, God kens!
 
 May the blessing of God lift and rest upon ye dear! she said.
 
 God bless ye, my old friend, said he.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IXAT THE WEAVERS STONE
 
 
 It was late in the afternoon when Archie drew near by the hill path to
 the Praying Weavers stone.  The Hags were in shadow.  But still, through
 the gate of the Slap, the sun shot a last arrow, which sped far and
 straight across the surface of the moss, here and there touching and
 shining on a tussock, and lighted at length on the gravestone and the
 small figure awaiting him there.  The emptiness and solitude of the great
 moors seemed to be concentrated there, and Kirstie pointed out by that
 figure of sunshine for the only inhabitant.  His first sight of her was
 thus excruciatingly sad, like a glimpse of a world from which all light,
 comfort, and society were on the point of vanishing.  And the next
 moment, when she had turned her face to him and the quick smile had
 enlightened it, the whole face of nature smiled upon him in her smile of
 welcome.  Archies slow pace was quickened; his legs hasted to her though
 his heart was hanging back.  The girl, upon her side, drew herself
 together slowly and stood up, expectant; she was all languor, her face
 was gone white; her arms ached for him, her soul was on tip-toes.  But he
 deceived her, pausing a few steps away, not less white than herself, and
 holding up his hand with a gesture of denial.
 
 No, Christina, not to-day, he said.  To-day I have to talk to you
 seriously.  Sit ye down, please, there where you were.  Please! he
 repeated.
 
 The revulsion of feeling in Christinas heart was violent.  To have
 longed and waited these weary hours for him, rehearsing her
 endearmentsto have seen him at last cometo have been ready there,
 breathless, wholly passive, his to do what he would withand suddenly to
 have found herself confronted with a grey-faced, harsh schoolmasterit
 was too rude a shock.  She could have wept, but pride withheld her.  She
 sat down on the stone, from which she had arisen, part with the instinct
 of obedience, part as though she had been thrust there.  What was this?
 Why was she rejected?  Had she ceased to please?  She stood here offering
 her wares, and he would none of them!  And yet they were all his!  His to
 take and keep, not his to refuse though!  In her quick petulant nature, a
 moment ago on fire with hope, thwarted love and wounded vanity wrought.
 The schoolmaster that there is in all men, to the despair of all girls
 and most women, was now completely in possession of Archie.  He had
 passed a night of sermons, a day of reflection; he had come wound up to
 do his duty; and the set mouth, which in him only betrayed the effort of
 his will, to her seemed the expression of an averted heart.  It was the
 same with his constrained voice and embarrassed utterance; and if soif
 it was all overthe pang of the thought took away from her the power of
 thinking.
 
 He stood before her some way off.  Kirstie, theres been too much of
 this.  Weve seen too much of each other.  She looked up quickly and her
 eyes contracted.  Theres no good ever comes of these secret meetings.
 Theyre not frank, not honest truly, and I ought to have seen it.  People
 have begun to talk; and its not right of me.  Do you see?
 
 I see somebody will have been talking to ye, she said sullenly.
 
 They have, more than one of them, replied Archie.
 
 And whae were they? she cried.  And what kind o love do ye ca that,
 thats ready to gang round like a whirligig at folk talking?  Do ye think
 they havena talked to me?
 
 Have they indeed? said Archie, with a quick breath.  That is what I
 feared.  Who were they?  Who has dared?
 
 Archie was on the point of losing his temper.
 
 As a matter of fact, not any one had talked to Christina on the matter;
 and she strenuously repeated her own first question in a panic of
 self-defence.
 
 Ah, well! what does it matter? he said.  They were good folk that
 wished well to us, and the great affair is that there are people talking.
 My dear girl, we have to be wise.  We must not wreck our lives at the
 outset.  They may be long and happy yet, and we must see to it, Kirstie,
 like Gods rational creatures and not like fool children.  There is one
 thing we must see to before all.  Youre worth waiting for, Kirstie!
 worth waiting for a generation; it would be enough reward.And here he
 remembered the schoolmaster again, and very unwisely took to following
 wisdom.  The first thing that we must see to, is that there shall be no
 scandal about for my fathers sake.  That would ruin all; do ye no see
 that?
 
 Kirstie was a little pleased, there had been some show of warmth of
 sentiment in what Archie had said last.  But the dull irritation still
 persisted in her bosom; with the aboriginal instinct, having suffered
 herself, she wished to make Archie suffer.
 
 And besides, there had come out the word she had always feared to hear
 from his lips, the name of his father.  It is not to be supposed that,
 during so many days with a love avowed between them, some reference had
 not been made to their conjoint future.  It had in fact been often
 touched upon, and from the first had been the sore point.  Kirstie had
 wilfully closed the eye of thought; she would not argue even with
 herself; gallant, desperate little heart, she had accepted the command of
 that supreme attraction like the call of fate and marched blindfold on
 her doom.  But Archie, with his masculine sense of responsibility, must
 reason; he must dwell on some future good, when the present good was all
 in all to Kirstie; he must talkand talk lamely, as necessity drove
 himof what was to be.  Again and again he had touched on marriage; again
 and again been driven back into indistinctness by a memory of Lord
 Hermiston.  And Kirstie had been swift to understand and quick to choke
 down and smother the understanding; swift to leap up in flame at a
 mention of that hope, which spoke volumes to her vanity and her love,
 that she might one day be Mrs. Weir of Hermiston; swift, also, to
 recognise in his stumbling or throttled utterance the death-knell of
 these expectations, and constant, poor girl! in her large-minded madness,
 to go on and to reck nothing of the future.  But these unfinished
 references, these blinks in which his heart spoke, and his memory and
 reason rose up to silence it before the words were well uttered, gave her
 unqualifiable agony.  She was raised up and dashed down again bleeding.
 The recurrence of the subject forced her, for however short a time, to
 open her eyes on what she did not wish to see; and it had invariably
 ended in another disappointment.  So now again, at the mere wind of its
 coming, at the mere mention of his fathers namewho might seem indeed to
 have accompanied them in their whole moorland courtship, an awful figure
 in a wig with an ironical and bitter smile, present to guilty
 consciousnessshe fled from it head down.
 
 Ye havena told me yet, she said, who was it spoke?
 
 Your aunt for one, said Archie.
 
 Auntie Kirstie? she cried.  And what do I care for my Auntie Kirstie?
 
 She cares a great deal for her niece, replied Archie, in kind reproof.
 
 Troth, and its the first Ive heard of it, retorted the girl.
 
 The question here is not who it is, but what they say, what they have
 noticed, pursued the lucid schoolmaster.  That is what we have to think
 of in self-defence.
 
 Auntie Kirstie, indeed!  A bitter, thrawn auld maid thats fomented
 trouble in the country before I was born, and will be doing it still, I
 daur say, when Im deid!  Its in her nature; its as natural for her as
 its for a sheep to eat.
 
 Pardon me, Kirstie, she was not the only one, interposed Archie.  I
 had two warnings, two sermons, last night, both most kind and
 considerate.  Had you been there, I promise you you would have grat, my
 dear!  And they opened my eyes.  I saw we were going a wrong way.
 
 Who was the other one? Kirstie demanded.
 
 By this time Archie was in the condition of a hunted beast.  He had come,
 braced and resolute; he was to trace out a line of conduct for the pair
 of them in a few cold, convincing sentences; he had now been there some
 time, and he was still staggering round the outworks and undergoing what
 he felt to be a savage cross-examination.
 
 Mr. Frank! she cried.  What nex, I would like to ken?
 
 He spoke most kindly and truly.
 
 What like did he say?
 
 I am not going to tell you; you have nothing to do with that, cried
 Archie, startled to find he had admitted so much.
 
 O, I have naething to do with it! she repeated, springing to her feet.
 Abody at Hermistons free to pass their opinions upon me, but I have
 naething to do wi it!  Was this at prayers like?  Did ye ca the grieve
 into the consultation?  Little wonder if abodys talking, when ye make
 abody yer confidants!  But as you say, Mr. Weir,most kindly, most
 considerately, most truly, Im sure,I have naething to do with it.  And
 I think Ill better be going.  Ill be wishing you good evening, Mr.
 Weir.  And she made him a stately curtsey, shaking as she did so from
 head to foot, with the barren ecstasy of temper.
 
 Poor Archie stood dumbfounded.  She had moved some steps away from him
 before he recovered the gift of articulate speech.
 
 Kirstie! he cried.  O, Kirstie woman!
 
 There was in his voice a ring of appeal, a clang of mere astonishment
 that showed the schoolmaster was vanquished.
 
 She turned round on him.  What do ye Kirstie me for? she retorted.
 What have ye to do wi me!  Gang to your ain freends and deave them!
 
 He could only repeat the appealing Kirstie!
 
 Kirstie, indeed! cried the girl, her eyes blazing in her white face.
 My name is Miss Christina Elliott, I would have ye to ken, and I daur ye
 to ca me out of it.  If I canna get love, Ill have respect, Mr. Weir.
 Im come of decent people, and Ill have respect.  What have I done that
 ye should lightly me?  What have I done?  What have I done? O, what have
 I done? and her voice rose upon the third repetition.  I thochtI
 thochtI thocht I was sae happy! and the first sob broke from her like
 the paroxysm of some mortal sickness.
 
 Archie ran to her.  He took the poor child in his arms, and she nestled
 to his breast as to a mothers, and clasped him in hands that were strong
 like vices.  He felt her whole body shaken by the throes of distress, and
 had pity upon her beyond speech.  Pity, and at the same time a bewildered
 fear of this explosive engine in his arms, whose works he did not
 understand, and yet had been tampering with.  There arose from before him
 the curtains of boyhood, and he saw for the first time the ambiguous face
 of woman as she is.  In vain he looked back over the interview; he saw
 not where he had offended.  It seemed unprovoked, a wilful convulsion of
 brute nature. . . .
 
 
 
 
 EDITORIAL NOTE
 
 
 With the words last printed, a wilful convulsion of brute nature, the
 romance of _Weir of Hermiston_ breaks off.  They were dictated, I
 believe, on the very morning of the writers sudden seizure and death.
 _Weir of Hermiston_ thus remains in the work of Stevenson what _Edwin
 Droid_ is in the work of Dickens or _Denis Duval_ in that of Thackeray:
 or rather it remains relatively more, for if each of those fragments
 holds an honourable place among its authors writings, among Stevensons
 the fragment of _Weir_ holds certainly the highest.
 
 Readers may be divided in opinion on the question whether they would or
 they would not wish to hear more of the intended course of the story and
 destinies of the characters.  To some, silence may seem best, and that
 the mind should be left to its own conjectures as to the sequel, with the
 help of such indications as the text affords.  I confess that this is the
 view which has my sympathy.  But since others, and those almost certainly
 a majority, are anxious to be told all they can, and since editors and
 publishers join in the request, I can scarce do otherwise than comply.
 The intended argument, then, so far as it was known at the time of the
 writers death to his step-daughter and devoted amanuensis, Mrs. Strong,
 was nearly as follows:
 
 Archie persists in his good resolution of avoiding further conduct
 compromising to young Kirsties good name.  Taking advantage of the
 situation thus created, and of the girls unhappiness and wounded vanity,
 Frank Innes pursues his purpose of seduction; and Kirstie, though still
 caring for Archie in her heart, allows herself to become Franks victim.
 Old Kirstie is the first to perceive something amiss with her, and
 believing Archie to be the culprit, accuses him, thus making him aware
 for the first time that mischief has happened.  He does not at once deny
 the charge, but seeks out and questions young Kirstie, who confesses the
 truth to him; and he, still loving her, promises to protect and defend
 her in her trouble.  He then has an interview with Frank Innes on the
 moor, which ends in a quarrel, and in Archie killing Frank beside the
 Weavers Stone.  Meanwhile the Four Black Brothers, having become aware
 of their sisters betrayal, are bent on vengeance against Archie as her
 supposed seducer.  They are about to close in upon him with this purpose
 when he is arrested by the officers of the law for the murder of Frank.
 He is tried before his own father, the Lord Justice-Clerk, found guilty,
 and condemned to death.  Meanwhile the elder Kirstie, having discovered
 from the girl how matters really stand, informs her nephews of the truth;
 and they, in a great revulsion of feeling in Archies favour, determine
 on an action after the ancient manner of their house.  They gather a
 following, and after a great fight break the prison where Archie lies
 confined, and rescue him.  He and young Kirstie thereafter escape to
 America.  But the ordeal of taking part in the trial of his own son has
 been too much for the Lord Justice-Clerk, who dies of the shock.  I do
 not know, adds the amanuensis, what becomes of old Kirstie, but that
 character grew and strengthened so in the writing that I am sure he had
 some dramatic destiny for her.
 
 The plan of every imaginative work is subject, of course, to change under
 the artists hand as he carries it out; and not merely the character of
 the elder Kirstie, but other elements of the design no less, might well
 have deviated from the lines originally traced.  It seems certain,
 however, that the next stage in the relations of Archie and the younger
 Kirstie would have been as above foreshadowed; and this conception of the
 lovers unconventional chivalry and unshaken devotion to his mistress
 after her fault is very characteristic of the writers mind.  The
 vengeance to be taken on the seducer beside the Weavers Stone is
 prepared for in the first words of the Introduction; while the situation
 and fate of the judge, confronting like a Brutus, but unable to survive,
 the duty of sending his own son to the gallows, seem clearly to have been
 destined to furnish the climax and essential tragedy of the tale.
 
 How this last circumstance was to have been brought about, within the
 limits of legal usage and possibility, seems hard to conjecture; but it
 was a point to which the author had evidently given careful
 consideration.  Mrs. Strong says simply that the Lord Justice-Clerk, like
 an old Roman, condemns his son to death; but I am assured on the best
 legal authority of Scotland that no judge, however powerful either by
 character or office, could have insisted on presiding at the trial of a
 near kinsman of his own.  The Lord Justice-Clerk was head of the criminal
 justiciary of the country; he might have insisted on his right of being
 present on the bench when his son was tried: but he would never have been
 allowed to preside or to pass sentence.  Now in a letter of Stevensons
 to Mr. Baxter, of October 1892, I find him asking for materials in terms
 which seem to indicate that he knew this quite well:I wish Pitcairns
 Criminal Trials, _quam primum_.  Also an absolutely correct text of the
 Scots judiciary oath.  Also, in case Pitcairn does not come down late
 enough, I wish as full a report as possible of a Scots murder trial
 between 17901820.  Understand the _fullest possible_.  Is there any book
 which would guide me to the following facts?  The Justice-Clerk tries
 some people capitally on circuit.  Certain evidence cropping up, the
 charge is transferred to the Justice-Clerks own son.  Of course in the
 next trial the Justice-Clerk is excluded, and the case is called before
 the Lord Justice-General.  Where would this trial have to be?  I fear in
 Edinburgh, which would not suit my view.  Could it be again at the
 circuit town?  The point was referred to a quondam fellow-member with
 Stevenson of the Edinburgh Speculative Society, Mr. Graham Murray, the
 present Solicitor-General for Scotland; whose reply was to the effect
 that there would be no difficulty in making the new trial take place at
 the circuit town; that it would have to be held there in spring or
 autumn, before two Lords of Justiciary; and that the Lord Justice-General
 would have nothing to do with it, this title being at the date in
 question only a nominal one held by a layman (which is no longer the
 case).  On this Stevenson writes, Graham Murrays note _re_ the venue
 was highly satisfactory, and did me all the good in the world.  The
 terms of his inquiry seem to imply that he intended other persons, before
 Archie, to have fallen first under suspicion of the murder; and
 alsodoubtless in order to make the rescue by the Black Brothers
 possiblethat he wanted Archie to be imprisoned not in Edinburgh but in
 the circuit town.  But they do not show how he meant to get over the main
 difficulty, which at the same time he fully recognises.  Can it have been
 that Lord Hermistons part was to have been limited to presiding at the
 _first_ trial, where the evidence incriminating Archie was unexpectedly
 brought forward, and to directing that the law should take its course?
 
 Whether the final escape and union of Archie and Christina would have
 proved equally essential to the plot may perhaps to some readers seem
 questionable.  They may rather feel that a tragic destiny is foreshadowed
 from the beginning for all concerned, and is inherent in the very
 conditions of the tale.  But on this point, and other matters of general
 criticism connected with it, I find an interesting discussion by the
 author himself in his correspondence.  Writing to Mr. J. M. Barrie, under
 date November 1, 1892, and criticising that authors famous story of _The
 Little Minister_, Stevenson says:
 
 Your descriptions of your dealings with Lord Rintoul are frightfully
 unconscientious. . . .  The _Little Minister_ ought to have ended badly;
 we all know it _did_, and we are infinitely grateful to you for the grace
 and good feeling with which you have lied about it.  If you had told the
 truth, I for one could never have forgiven you.  As you had conceived and
 written the earlier parts, the truth about the end, though indisputably
 true to fact, would have been a lie, or what is worse, a discord, in art.
 If you are going to make a book end badly, it must end badly from the
 beginning.  Now, your book began to end well.  You let yourself fall in
 love with, and fondle, and smile at your puppets.  Once you had done
 that, your honour was committedat the cost of truth to life you were
 bound to save them.  It is the blot on _Richard Feverel_ for instance,
 that it begins to end well; and then tricks you and ends ill.  But in
 this case, there is worse behind, for the ill ending does not inherently
 issue from the plotthe story had, in fact, ended well after the great
 last interview between Richard and Lucyand the blind, illogical bullet
 which smashes all has no more to do between the boards than a fly has to
 do with a room into whose open window it comes buzzing.  It might have so
 happened; it needed not; and unless needs must, we have no right to pain
 our readers.  I have had a heavy case of conscience of the same kind
 about my Braxfield story.  Braxfieldonly his name is Hermistonhas a son
 who is condemned to death; plainly there is a fine tempting fitness about
 thisand I meant he was to hang.  But on considering my minor characters,
 I saw there were five people who wouldin a sense, who mustbreak prison
 and attempt his rescue.  They are capable hardy folks too, who might very
 well succeed.  Why should they not then?  Why should not young Hermiston
 escape clear out of the country? and be happy, if he could, with hisbut
 soft!  I will not betray my secret nor my heroine. . . .
 
 To pass, now, from the question how the story would have ended to the
 question how it originated and grew in the writers mind.  The character
 of the hero, Weir of Hermiston, is avowedly suggested by the historical
 personality of Robert Macqueen, Lord Braxfield.  This famous judge has
 been for generations the subject of a hundred Edinburgh tales and
 anecdotes.  Readers of Stevensons essay on the Raeburn exhibition, in
 _Virginibus Puerisque_, will remember how he is fascinated by Raeburns
 portrait of Braxfield, even as Lockhart had been fascinated by a
 different portrait of the same worthy sixty years before (see _Peters
 Letters to his Kinsfolk_); nor did his interest in the character diminish
 in later life.  Again, the case of a judge involved by the exigencies of
 his office in a strong conflict between public duty and private interest
 or affection, was one which had always attracted and exercised
 Stevensons imagination.  In the days when he and Mr. Henley were
 collaborating with a view to the stage, Mr. Henley once proposed a plot
 founded on the story of Mr. Justice Harbottle in Sheridan Le Fanus _In a
 Glass Darkly_, in which the wicked judge goes headlong _per fas et nefas_
 to his object of getting the husband of his mistress hanged.  Some time
 later Stevenson and his wife together wrote a play called _The Hanging
 Judge_.  In this, the title character is tempted for the first time in
 his life to tamper with the course of justice, in order to shield his
 wife from persecution by a former husband who reappears after being
 supposed dead.  Bulwers novel of _Paul Clifford_, with its final
 situation of the worldly-minded judge, Sir William Brandon, learning that
 the highwayman whom he is in the act of sentencing is his own son, and
 dying of the knowledge, was also well known to Stevenson, and no doubt
 counted for something in the suggestion of the present story.
 
 Once more, the difficulties often attending the relation of father and
 son in actual life had pressed heavily on Stevensons mind and conscience
 from the days of his youth, when in obeying the law of his own nature he
 had been constrained to disappoint, distress, and for a time to be much
 misunderstood by, a father whom he justly loved and admired with all his
 heart.  Difficulties of this kind he had already handled in a lighter
 vein once or twice in fictionas for instance in the _Story of a Lie_ and
 in _The Wrecker_before he grappled with them in the acute and tragic
 phase in which they occur in the present story.
 
 These three elements, then, the interest of the historical personality of
 Lord Braxfield, the problems and emotions arising from a violent conflict
 between duty and nature in a judge, and the difficulties due to
 incompatibility and misunderstanding between father and son, lie at the
 foundations of the present story.  To touch on minor matters, it is
 perhaps worth notice, as Mr. Henley reminds me, that the name of Weir had
 from of old a special significance for Stevensons imagination, from the
 traditional fame in Edinburgh of Major Weir, burned as a warlock,
 together with his sister, under circumstances of peculiar atrocity.
 Another name, that of the episodical personage of Mr. Torrance the
 minister, is borrowed direct from life, as indeed are the whole figure
 and its surroundingskirkyard, kirk, and mansedown even to the black
 thread mittens: witness the following passage from a letter of the early
 seventies:Ive been to church and am not depresseda great step.  It
 was at that beautiful church [of Glencorse in the Pentlands, three miles
 from his fathers country house at Swanston].  It is a little cruciform
 place, with a steep slate roof.  The small kirkyard is full of old
 grave-stones; one of a Frenchman from Dunkerque, I suppose he died
 prisoner in the military prison hard by.  And one, the most pathetic
 memorial I ever saw: a poor school-slate, in a wooden frame, with the
 inscription cut into it evidently by the fathers own hand.  In church,
 old Mr. Torrance preached, over eighty and a relic of times forgotten,
 with his black thread gloves and mild old face.  A side hint for a
 particular trait in the character of Mrs. Weir we can trace in some
 family traditions concerning the writers own grandmother, who is
 reported to have valued piety much more than efficiency in her domestic
 servants.  The other women characters seem, so far at least as I know, to
 have been pure creation, and especially that new and admirable
 incarnation of the eternal feminine in the elder Kirstie.  The little
 that he says about her himself is in a letter written a few days before
 his death to Mr. Gosse.  The allusions are to the various moods and
 attitudes of people in regard to middle age, and are suggested by Mr.
 Gosses volume of poems, _In Russet and Silver_.  It seems rather
 funny, he writes, that this matter should come up just now, as I am at
 present engaged in treating a severe case of middle age in one of my
 stories, _The Justice-Clerk_.  The case is that of a woman, and I think I
 am doing her justice.  You will be interested, I believe, to see the
 difference in our treatments.  _Secreta Vit_ [the title of one of Mr.
 Gosses poems] comes nearer to the case of my poor Kirstie.  From the
 wonderful midnight scene between her and Archie, we may judge what we
 have lost in those later scenes where she was to have taxed him with the
 fault that was not histo have presently learned his innocence from the
 lips of his supposed victimto have then vindicated him to her kinsmen
 and fired them to the action of his rescue.  The scene of the
 prison-breaking here planned by Stevenson would have gained interest (as
 will already have occurred to readers) from comparison with the two
 famous precedents in Scott, the Porteous mob and the breaking of
 Portanferry jail.
 
 The best account of Stevensons methods of imaginative work is in the
 following sentences from a letter of his own to Mr. W. Craibe Angus of
 Glasgow:I am still a slow study, and sit for a long while silent on
 my eggs.  Unconscious thought, there is the only method: macerate your
 subject, let it boil slow, then take the lid off and look inand there
 your stuff isgood or bad.  The several elements above noted having been
 left to work for many years in his mind, it was in the autumn of 1892
 that he was moved to take the lid off and look in,under the influence,
 it would seem, of a special and overmastering wave of that feeling for
 the romance of Scottish scenery and character which was at all times so
 strong in him, and which his exile did so much to intensify.  I quote
 again from his letter to Mr. Barrie on November 1st in that year:It is
 a singular thing that I should live here in the South Seas under
 conditions so new and so striking, and yet my imagination so continually
 inhabit the cold old huddle of grey hills from which we come.  I have
 finished _David Balfour_, I have another book on the stocks, _The Young
 Chevalier_, which is to be part in France and part in Scotland, and to
 deal with Prince Charlie about the year 1749; and now what have I done
 but begun a third, which is to be all moorland together, and is to have
 for a centre-piece a figure that I think you will appreciatethat of the
 immortal Braxfield.  Braxfield himself is my grand premieror since you
 are so much involved in the British drama, let me say my heavy lead.
 Writing to me at the same date he makes the same announcement more
 briefly, with a list of the characters and an indication of the scene and
 date of the story.  To Mr. Baxter he writes a month later, I have a
 novel on the stocks to be called _The Justice-Clerk_.  It is pretty
 Scotch; the grand premier is taken from Braxfield (O, by the by, send me
 Cockburns _Memorials_), and some of the story is, well, queer.  The
 heroine is seduced by one man, and finally disappears with the other man
 who shot him. . . .  Mind you, I expect _The Justice-Clerk_ to be my
 masterpiece.  My Braxfield is already a thing of beauty and a joy for
 ever, and so far as he has gone, far my best character.  From the last
 extract it appears that he had already at this date drafted some of the
 earlier chapters of the book.  He also about the same time composed the
 dedication to his wife, who found it pinned to her bed-curtains one
 morning on awaking.  It was always his habit to keep several books in
 progress at the same time, turning from one to another as the fancy took
 him, and finding relief in the change of labour; and for many months
 after the date of this letter, first illness,then a voyage to
 Auckland,then work on the _Ebb-Tide_, on a new tale called _St. Ives_,
 which was begun during an attack of influenza, and on his projected book
 of family history,prevented his making any continuous progress with
 _Weir_.  In August 1893 he says he has been recasting the beginning.  A
 year later, still only the first four or five chapters had been drafted.
 Then, in the last weeks of his life, he attacked the task again, in a
 sudden heat of inspiration, and worked at it ardently and without
 interruption until the end came.  No wonder if during these weeks he was
 sometimes aware of a tension of the spirit difficult to sustain.  How
 can I keep this pitch? he is reported to have said after finishing one
 of the chapters; and all the world knows how that frail organism in fact
 betrayed him in mid effort.  The greatness of the loss to his countrys
 letters can for the first time be fully measured from the foregoing
 pages.
 
 There remains one more point to be mentioned, as to the speech and
 manners of the Hanging Judge himself.  That these are not a whit
 exaggerated, in comparison with what is recorded of his historic
 prototype, Lord Braxfield, is certain.  The _locus classicus_ in regard
 to this personage is in Lord Cockburns _Memorials of his Time_.  Strong
 built and dark, with rough eyebrows, powerful eyes, threatening lips, and
 a low growling voice, he was like a formidable blacksmith.  His accent
 and dialect were exaggerated Scotch; his language, like his thoughts,
 short, strong, and conclusive.  Illiterate and without any taste for any
 refined enjoyment, strength of understanding, which gave him power
 without cultivation, only encouraged him to a more contemptuous disdain
 of all natures less coarse than his own.  It may be doubted if he was
 ever so much in his element as when tauntingly repelling the last
 despairing claim of a wretched culprit, and sending him to Botany Bay or
 the gallows with an insulting jest.  Yet this was not from cruelty, for
 which he was too strong and too jovial, but from cherished coarseness.
 Readers, nevertheless, who are at all acquainted with the social history
 of Scotland will hardly have failed to make the observation that
 Braxfields is an extreme case of eighteenth-century manners, as he
 himself was an eighteenth-century personage (he died in 1799, in his
 seventy-eighth year); and that for the date in which the story is cast
 (1814) such manners are somewhat of an anachronism.  During the
 generation contemporary with the French Revolution and the Napoleonic
 warsor to put it another way, the generation that elapsed between the
 days when Scott roamed the country as a High School and University
 student and those when he settled in the fulness of fame and prosperity
 at Abbotsford,or again (the allusions will appeal to readers of the
 admirable Galt) during the interval between the first and the last
 provostry of Bailie Pawkie in the borough of Gudetown, or between the
 earlier and the final ministrations of Mr. Balwhidder in the parish of
 Dalmailing,during this period a great softening had taken place in
 Scottish manners generally, and in those of the Bar and Bench not least.
 Since the death of Lord Justice-Clerk Macqueen of Braxfield, says
 Lockhart, writing about 1817, the whole exterior of judicial deportment
 has been quite altered.  A similar criticism may probably hold good on
 the picture of border life contained in the chapter concerning the Four
 Black Brothers of Cauldstaneslap, namely, that it rather suggests the
 ways of an earlier generation; nor have I any clue to the reasons which
 led Stevenson to choose this particular date, in the year preceding
 Waterloo, for a story which, in regard to some of its features at least,
 might seem more naturally placed some twenty-five or thirty years before.
 
 If the reader seeks, further, to know whether the scenery of Hermiston
 can be identified with any one special place familiar to the writers
 early experience, the answer, I think, must be in the negative.  Rather
 it is distilled from a number of different haunts and associations among
 the moorlands of southern Scotland.  In the dedication and in a letter to
 me he indicates the Lammermuirs as the scene of his tragedy.  And Mrs.
 Stevenson (his mother) tells me that she thinks he was inspired by
 recollections of a visit paid in boyhood to an uncle living at a remote
 farmhouse in that district called Overshiels, in the parish of Stow.  But
 though he may have thought of the Lammermuirs in the first instance, we
 have already found him drawing his description of the kirk and manse from
 another haunt of his youth, namely, Glencorse in the Pentlands; while
 passages in chapters v. and viii. point explicitly to a third district,
 that is, Upper Tweeddale, with the country stretching thence towards the
 wells of Clyde.  With this country also holiday rides and excursions from
 Peebles had made him familiar as a boy: and this seems certainly the most
 natural scene of the story, if only from its proximity to the proper home
 of the Elliotts, which of course is in the heart of the Border,
 especially Teviotdale and Ettrick.  Some of the geographical names
 mentioned are clearly not meant to furnish literal indications.  The
 Spango, for instance, is a water running, I believe, not into the Tweed
 but into the Nith, and Crossmichael as the name of a town is borrowed
 from Galloway.
 
 But it is with the general and essential that the artist deals, and
 questions of strict historical perspective or local definition are beside
 the mark in considering his work.  Nor will any reader expect, or be
 grateful for, comment in this place on matters which are more properly to
 the pointon the seizing and penetrating power of the authors ripened
 art as exhibited in the foregoing pages, the wide range of character and
 emotion over which he sweeps with so assured a hand, his vital poetry of
 vision and magic of presentment.  Surely no son of Scotland has died
 leaving with his last breath a worthier tribute to the land he loved.
 
                                                                      S. C.
 
 
 
 
 GLOSSARY
 
 
 Ae, one.
 
 Antinomian, one of a sect which holds that under the gospel dispensation
 the moral law is not obligatory.
 
 Auld Hornie, the Devil.
 
 Ballant, ballad.
 
 Bauchles, brogues, old shoes.
 
 Bauld, bold.
 
 Bees in their bonnet, eccentricities.
 
 Birling, whirling.
 
 Black-a-vised, dark-complexioned.
 
 Bonnet-laird, small landed proprietor, yeoman.
 
 Bool, ball.
 
 Brae, rising ground.
 
 Brig, bridge.
 
 Buff, play buff on, to make a fool of, to deceive.
 
 Burn, stream.
 
 Butt end, end of a cottage.
 
 Byre, cow-house.
 
 Ca, drive.
 
 Caller, fresh.
 
 Canna, cannot.
 
 Canny, careful, shrewd.
 
 Cantie, cheerful.
 
 Carline, old woman.
 
 Cauld, cold.
 
 Chalmer, chamber.
 
 Claes, clothes.
 
 Clamjamfry, crowd.
 
 Clavers, idle talk.
 
 Cock-laird.  See Bonnet-laird.
 
 Collieshangie, turmoil.
 
 Crack, to converse.
 
 Cuist, cast.
 
 Cuddy, donkey.
 
 Cutty, jade, also used playfully = brat.
 
 Daft, mad, frolicsome.
 
 Dander, to saunter.
 
 Danders, cinders.
 
 Daurna, dare not.
 
 Deave, to deafen.
 
 Denty, dainty.
 
 Dirdum, vigour.
 
 Disjaskit, worn out, disreputable-looking.
 
 Doer, law agent.
 
 Dour, hard.
 
 Drumlie, dark.
 
 Dunting, knocking.
 
 Dwaibly, infirm, rickety.
 
 Dule-tree, the tree of lamentation, the hanging-tree.
 
 Earrand, errand.
 
 Ettercap, vixen.
 
 Fechting, fighting.
 
 Feck, quantity, portion.
 
 Feckless, feeble, powerless.
 
 Fell, strong and fiery.
 
 Fey, unlike yourself, strange, as if urged on by fate, or as persons are
 observed to be in the hour of approaching death or disaster.
 
 Fit, foot.
 
 Flit, to depart.
 
 Flyped, turned up, turned in-side out.
 
 Forbye, in addition to.
 
 Forgather, to fall in with.
 
 Fower, four.
 
 Fushionless, pithless, weak.
 
 Fyle, to soil, to defile.
 
 Fylement, obloquy, defilement.
 
 Gaed, Went.
 
 Gang, to go.
 
 Gey an, very.
 
 Gigot, leg of mutton.
 
 Girzie, lit. diminutive of Grizel, here a playful nickname.
 
 Glaur, mud.
 
 Glint, glance, sparkle.
 
 Gloaming, twilight.
 
 Glower, to scowl.
 
 Gobbets, small lumps.
 
 Gowden, golden.
 
 Gowsty, gusty.
 
 Grat, wept.
 
 Grieve, land-steward.
 
 Guddle, to catch fish with the hands by groping under the stones or
 banks.
 
 Gumption, common sense, judgment.
 
 Guid, good.
 
 Gurley, stormy, surly.
 
 Gyte, beside itself.
 
 Hae, have, take.
 
 Haddit, held.
 
 Hale, whole.
 
 Heels-ower-hurdie, heels over head.
 
 Hinney, honey.
 
 Hirstle, to bustle.
 
 Hizzie, wench.
 
 Howe, hollow.
 
 Howl, hovel.
 
 Hunkered, crouched.
 
 Hypothec, lit. in Scots law the furnishings of a house, and formerly the
 produce and stock of a farm hypothecated by law to the landlord as
 security for rent; colloquially the whole structure, the whole
 concern.
 
 Idleset, idleness.
 
 Infeftment, a term in Scots law originally synonymous with investiture.
 
 Jaud, jade.
 
 Jeely-piece, a slice of bread and jelly.
 
 Jennipers, juniper.
 
 Jo, sweetheart.
 
 Justifeed, executed, made the victim of justice.
 
 Jyle, jail
 
 Kebbuck, cheese.
 
 Ken, to know.
 
 Kenspeckle, conspicuous.
 
 Kilted, tucked up.
 
 Kyte, belly.
 
 Laigh, low.
 
 Laird, landed proprietor.
 
 Lane, alone.
 
 Lave, rest, remainder.
 
 Linking, tripping.
 
 Lown, lonely, still.
 
 Lynn, cataract.
 
 Lyon King of Arms, the chief of the Court of Heraldry in Scotland.
 
 Macers, offiers of the supreme court. [Cf.  Guy Mannering, last chapter.]
 
 Maun, must.
 
 Menseful, of good manners.
 
 Mirk, dark.
 
 Misbegowk, deception, disappointment.
 
 Mools, mould, earth.
 
 Muckle, much, great, big.
 
 My lane, by myself.
 
 Nowt, black cattle.
 
 Palmering, walking infirmly.
 
 Panel, in Scots law, the accused person in a criminal action, the
 prisoner.
 
 Peel, fortified watch-tower.
 
 Plew-stilts, plough-handles.
 
 Policy, ornamental grounds of a country mansion.
 
 Puddock, frog.
 
 Quean, wench.
 
 Rair, to roar.
 
 Riff-raff, rabble.
 
 Risping, grating.
 
 Rout, rowt, to roar, to rant.
 
 Rowth, abundance.
 
 Rudas, haggard old woman.
 
 Runt, an old cow past breeding; opprobriously, an old woman.
 
 Sab, sob.
 
 Sanguishes, sandwiches.
 
 Sasine, in Scots law, the act of giving legal possession of feudal
 property, or, colloquially, the deed by which that possession is proved.
 
 Sclamber, to scramble.
 
 Sculduddery, impropriety, grossness.
 
 Session, the Court of Session, the supreme court of Scotland.
 
 Shauchling, shuffling, slipshod.
 
 Shoo, to chase gently.
 
 Siller, money.
 
 Sinsyne, since then.
 
 Skailing, dispersing.
 
 Skelp, slap.
 
 Skirling, screaming.
 
 Skriegh-oday, daybreak.
 
 Snash, abuse.
 
 Sneisty, supercilious.
 
 Sooth, to hum.
 
 Sough, sound, murmur.
 
 Spec, The Speculative Society, a debating Society connected with
 Edingburgh University.
 
 Speir, to ask.
 
 Speldering, sprawling.
 
 Splairge, to splash.
 
 Spunk, spirit, fire.
 
 Steik, to shut.
 
 Stockfish, hard, savourless.
 
 Suger-bool, suger-plum.
 
 Syne, since, then.
 
 Tawpie, a slow foolish slut, also used playfully = monkey.
 
 Telling you, a good thing for you.
 
 Thir, these.
 
 Thrawn, cross-grained.
 
 Toon, town.
 
 Two-names, local soubriquets in addition to patronymic.
 
 Tyke, dog.
 
 Unchancy, unlucky.
 
 Unco, strange, extraordinary, very.
 
 Upsitten, impertinent.
 
 Vennel, alley, lane.  The Vennel, a narrow lane in Edingburgh, running
 out of the Grassmarket.
 
 Vivers, victuals.
 
 Wae, sad, unhappy.
 
 Waling, choosing.
 
 Warrandise, warranty.
 
 Waur, worse.
 
 Weird, destiny.
 
 Whammle, to upset.
 
 Whaup, curlew.
 
 Whiles, sometimes.
 
 Windlestae, crested dogs-tail, grass.
 
 Wund, wind.
 
 Yin, one.
 
 

 
 
 [Editor's Note: It has been called to our attention that Project Gutenberg ebook #43 which is the same title as this, is much easier to read than file #42 which you have presently opened.]
 
 
 
 
                                STRANGE CASE OF
                                DR. JEKYLL AND
                                   MR. HYDE
 
                                      BY
                             ROBERT LOUIS STEVENSON
 
 
 
 
 1)
 
 
 
                              STORY OF THE DOOR
 
 MR. UTTERSON the lawyer was a man of a rugged countenance, that was
 never lighted by a smile; cold, scanty and embarrassed in
 discourse; backward in sentiment; lean, long, dusty, dreary, and
 yet somehow lovable. At friendly meetings, and when the wine was to
 his taste, something eminently human beaconed from his eye;
 something indeed which never found its way into his talk, but which
 spoke not only in these silent symbols of the after-dinner face, but
 more often and loudly in the acts of his life. He was austere with
 himself; drank gin when he was alone, to mortify a taste for
 vintages; and though he enjoyed the theatre, had not crossed the
 doors of one for twenty years. But he had an approved tolerance for
 others; sometimes wondering, almost with envy, at the high pressure
 of spirits involved in their misdeeds; and in any extremity inclined
 to help rather than to reprove.
 
 2)
 
 "I incline to Cain's heresy," he used to say quaintly: "I let my
 brother go to the devil in his own way." In this character, it was
 frequently his fortune to be the last reputable acquaintance and the
 last good influence in the lives of down-going men. And to such as
 these, so long as they came about his chambers, he never marked a
 shade of change in his demeanour.
 
 No doubt the feat was easy to Mr. Utterson; for he was
 undemonstrative at the best, and even his friendship seemed to be
 founded in a similar catholicity of good-nature. It is the mark of a
 modest man to accept his friendly circle ready-made from the hands
 of opportunity; and that was the lawyer's way. His friends were
 those of his own blood or those whom he had known the longest; his
 affections, like ivy, were the growth of time, they implied no
 aptness in the object. Hence, no doubt, the bond that united him to
 Mr. Richard Enfield, his distant kinsman, the well-known man about
 town. It was a nut to crack for many, what these two could see in
 each other, or what subject they could find in common. It was
 reported by those who encountered them in their Sunday walks, that
 they said nothing, looked singularly dull, and would hail with
 obvious relief the appearance of a friend. For all that, the two men
 put the greatest store by these excursions, counted them the chief
 jewel of each week, and not only set aside occasions of pleasure,
 but even resisted the calls
 
 3)
 
 of business, that they might enjoy them uninterrupted.
 
 It chanced on one of these rambles that their way led them down a
 by-street in a busy quarter of London. The street was small and
 what is called quiet, but it drove a thriving trade on the
 week-days. The inhabitants were all doing well, it seemed, and all
 emulously hoping to do better still, and laying out the surplus of
 their gains in coquetry; so that the shop fronts stood along that
 thoroughfare with an air of invitation, like rows of smiling
 saleswomen. Even on Sunday, when it veiled its more florid charms
 and lay comparatively empty of passage, the street shone out in
 contrast to its dingy neighbourhood, like a fire in a forest; and
 with its freshly painted shutters, well-polished brasses, and
 general cleanliness and gaiety of note, instantly caught and pleased
 the eye of the passenger.
 
 Two doors from one corner, on the left hand going east, the line
 was broken by the entry of a court; and just at that point, a
 certain sinister block of building thrust forward its gable on the
 street. It was two stories high; showed no window, nothing but a
 door on the lower story and a blind forehead of discoloured wall on
 the upper; and bore in every feature, the marks of prolonged and
 sordid negligence. The door, which was equipped with neither bell
 nor knocker, was blistered and distained. Tramps slouched into the
 recess and struck matches on
 
 4)
 
 the panels; children kept shop upon the steps; the schoolboy had
 tried his knife on the mouldings; and for close on a generation, no
 one had appeared to drive away these random visitors or to repair
 their ravages.
 
 Mr. Enfield and the lawyer were on the other side of the by-street;
 but when they came abreast of the entry, the former lifted up his
 cane and pointed.
 
 "Did you ever remark that door?" he asked; and when his companion
 had replied in the affirmative, "It is connected in my mind," added
 he, "with a very odd story."
 
 "Indeed?" said Mr. Utterson, with a slight change of voice, "and
 what was that?"
 
 "Well, it was this way," returned Mr. Enfield: "I was coming home
 from some place at the end of the world, about three o'clock of a
 black winter morning, and my way lay through a part of town where
 there was literally nothing to be seen but lamps. Street after
 street, and all the folks asleep--street after street, all lighted
 up as if for a procession and all as empty as a church--till at
 last I got into that state of mind when a man listens and listens
 and begins to long for the sight of a policeman. All at once, I saw
 two figures: one a little man who was stumping along eastward at a
 good walk, and the other a girl of maybe eight or ten who was
 running as hard as she was able down a cross street. Well, sir, the
 two ran into one another naturally enough at the
 
 5)
 
 corner; and then came the horrible part of the thing; for the man
 trampled calmly over the child's body and left her screaming on
 the ground. It sounds nothing to hear, but it was hellish to see.
 It wasn't like a man; it was like some damned Juggernaut. I gave a
 view-halloa, took to my heels, collared my gentleman, and brought
 him back to where there was already quite a group about the
 screaming child. He was perfectly cool and made no resistance, but
 gave me one look, so ugly that it brought out the sweat on me like
 running. The people who had turned out were the girl's own family;
 and pretty soon, the doctor, for whom she had been sent, put in his
 appearance. Well, the child was not much the worse, more frightened,
 according to the Sawbones; and there you might have supposed would
 be an end to it. But there was one curious circumstance. I had taken
 a loathing to my gentleman at first sight. So had the child's
 family, which was only natural. But the doctor's case was what
 struck me. He was the usual cut-and-dry apothecary, of no particular
 age and colour, with a strong Edinburgh accent, and about as
 emotional as a bagpipe. Well, sir, he was like the rest of us; every
 time he looked at my prisoner, I saw that Sawbones turn sick and
 white with the desire to kill him. I knew what was in his mind, just
 as he knew what was in mine; and killing being out of the question,
 we did the next best. We told the man we could
 
 6)
 
 and would make such a scandal out of this, as should make his name
 stink from one end of London to the other. If he had any friends or
 any credit, we undertook that he should lose them. And all the time,
 as we were pitching it in red hot, we were keeping the women off him
 as best we could, for they were as wild as harpies. I never saw a
 circle of such hateful faces; and there was the man in the middle,
 with a kind of black, sneering coolness--frightened too, I could
 see that--but carrying it off, sir, really like Satan. 'If you
 choose to make capital out of this accident,' said he, 'I am
 naturally helpless. No gentleman but wishes to avoid a scene,' says
 he. 'Name your figure.' Well, we screwed him up to a hundred pounds
 for the child's family; he would have clearly liked to stick out;
 but there was something about the lot of us that meant mischief, and
 at last he struck. The next thing was to get the money; and where
 do you think he carried us but to that place with the door?--
 whipped out a key, went in, and presently came back with the matter
 of ten pounds in gold and a cheque for the balance on Coutts's,
 drawn payable to bearer and signed with a name that I can't mention,
 though it's one of the points of my story, but it was a name at
 least very well known and often printed. The figure was stiff; but
 the signature was good for more than that, if it was only genuine. I
 took the liberty of pointing out to my gentleman that the whole
 
 7)
 
 business looked apocryphal, and that a man does not, in real life,
 walk into a cellar door at four in the morning and come out of it
 with another man's cheque for close upon a hundred pounds. But he
 was quite easy and sneering. 'Set your mind at rest,' says he, 'I
 will stay with you till the banks open and cash the cheque myself.'
 So we all set off, the doctor, and the child's father, and our
 friend and myself, and passed the rest of the night in my chambers;
 and next day, when we had breakfasted, went in a body to the bank. I
 gave in the check myself, and said I had every reason to believe it
 was a forgery. Not a bit of it. The cheque was genuine."
 
 "Tut-tut," said Mr. Utterson.
 
 "I see you feel as I do," said Mr. Enfield. "Yes, it's a bad story.
 For my man was a fellow that nobody could have to do with, a really
 damnable man; and the person that drew the cheque is the very pink
 of the proprieties, celebrated too, and (what makes it worse) one of
 your fellows who do what they call good. Black-mail, I suppose; an
 honest man paying through the nose for some of the capers of his
 youth. Black-Mail House is what I call that place with the door, in
 consequence. Though even that, you know, is far from explaining
 all," he added, and with the words fell into a vein of musing.
 
 From this he was recalled by Mr. Utterson asking rather suddenly:
 "And you don't know if the drawer of the cheque lives there?"
 
 8)
 
 "A likely place, isn't it?" returned Mr. Enfield. "But I happen to
 have noticed his address; he lives in some square or other."
 
 "And you never asked about the--place with the door?" said Mr.
 Utterson.
 
 "No, sir: I had a delicacy," was the reply. "I feel very strongly
 about putting questions; it partakes too much of the style of the
 day of judgment. You start a question, and it's like starting a
 stone. You sit quietly on the top of a hill; and away the stone
 goes, starting others; and presently some bland old bird (the last
 you would have thought of) is knocked on the head in his own
 back-garden and the family have to change their name. No, sir, I
 make it a rule of mine: the more it looks like Queer Street, the
 less I ask."
 
 "A very good rule, too," said the lawyer.
 
 "But I have studied the place for myself," continued Mr. Enfield.
 "It seems scarcely a house. There is no other door, and nobody goes
 in or out of that one but, once in a great while, the gentleman of
 my adventure. There are three windows looking on the court on the
 first floor; none below; the windows are always shut but they're
 clean. And then there is a chimney which is generally smoking; so
 somebody must live there. And yet it's not so sure; for the
 buildings are so packed together about that court, that it's hard to
 say where one ends and another begins."
 
 9)
 
 The pair walked on again for a while in silence; and then,
 "Enfield," said Mr. Utterson, "that's a good rule of yours."
 
 "Yes, I think it is," returned Enfield.
 
 "But for all that," continued the lawyer, "there's one point I want
 to ask: I want to ask the name of that man who walked over the
 child."
 
 "Well," said Mr. Enfield, "I can't see what harm it would do. It
 was a man of the name of Hyde."
 
 "H'm," said Mr. Utterson. "What sort of a man is he to see?"
 
 "He is not easy to describe. There is something wrong with his
 appearance; something displeasing, something downright detestable. I
 never saw a man I so disliked, and yet I scarce know why. He must be
 deformed somewhere; he gives a strong feeling of deformity, although
 I couldn't specify the point. He's an extraordinary-looking man, and
 yet I really can name nothing out of the way. No, sir; I can make no
 hand of it; I can't describe him. And it's not want of memory; for I
 declare I can see him this moment."
 
 Mr. Utterson again walked some way in silence and obviously under a
 weight of consideration.
 
 "You are sure he used a key?" he inquired at last.
 
 "My dear sir..." began Enfield, surprised out of himself.
 
 10)
 
 "Yes, I know," said Utterson; "I know it must seem strange. The
 fact is, if I do not ask you the name of the other party, it is
 because I know it already. You see, Richard, your tale has gone
 home. If you have been inexact in any point, you had better correct
 it."
 
 "I think you might have warned me," returned the other, with a
 touch of sullenness. "But I have been pedantically exact, as you
 call it. The fellow had a key; and what's more, he has it still. I
 saw him use it, not a week ago."
 
 Mr. Utterson sighed deeply but said never a word; and the young man
 presently resumed. "Here is another lesson to say nothing," said he.
 "I am ashamed of my long tongue. Let us make a bargain never to
 refer to this again."
 
 "With all my heart," said the lawyer. "I shake hands on that,
 Richard."
 
 11)
 
 
                         SEARCH FOR MR. HYDE
 
 THAT evening Mr. Utterson came home to his bachelor house in sombre
 spirits and sat down to dinner without relish. It was his custom of
 a Sunday, when this meal was over, to sit close by the fire, a
 volume of some dry divinity on his reading-desk, until the clock of
 the neighbouring church rang out the hour of twelve, when he would
 go soberly and gratefully to bed. On this night, however, as soon as
 the cloth was taken away, he took up a candle and went into his
 business-room. There he opened his safe, took from the most private
 part of it a document endorsed on the envelope as Dr. Jekyll's Will,
 and sat down with a clouded brow to study its contents. The will was
 holograph, for Mr. Utterson, though he took charge of it now that it
 was made, had refused to lend the least assistance in the making of
 it; it provided not only that, in case of the decease of Henry
 Jekyll, M.D., D.C.L., L.L.D., F.R.S., etc., all his possessions were
 to pass into the hands of his "friend and benefactor Edward Hyde,"
 but that in case of
 
 12)
 
 Dr. Jekyll's "disappearance or unexplained absence for any period
 exceeding three calendar months," the said Edward Hyde should step
 into the said Henry Jekyll's shoes without further delay and free
 from any burthen or obligation, beyond the payment of a few small
 sums to the members of the doctor's household. This document had
 long been the lawyer's eyesore. It offended him both as a lawyer and
 as a lover of the sane and customary sides of life, to whom the
 fanciful was the immodest. And hitherto it was his ignorance of Mr.
 Hyde that had swelled his indignation; now, by a sudden turn, it was
 his knowledge. It was already bad enough when the name was but a
 name of which he could learn no more. It was worse when it began to
 be clothed upon with detestable attributes; and out of the shifting,
 insubstantial mists that had so long baffled his eye, there leaped
 up the sudden, definite presentment of a fiend.
 
 "I thought it was madness," he said, as he replaced the obnoxious
 paper in the safe, "and now I begin to fear it is disgrace."
 
 With that he blew out his candle, put on a great-coat, and set
 forth in the direction of Cavendish Square, that citadel of
 medicine, where his friend, the great Dr. Lanyon, had his house and
 received his crowding patients. "If any one knows, it will be
 Lanyon," he had thought.
 
 The solemn butler knew and welcomed him;
 
 13)
 
 he was subjected to no stage of delay, but ushered direct from the
 door to the dining-room where Dr. Lanyon sat alone over his wine.
 This was a hearty, healthy, dapper, red-faced gentleman, with a
 shock of hair prematurely white, and a boisterous and decided
 manner. At sight of Mr. Utterson, he sprang up from his chair and
 welcomed him with both hands. The geniality, as was the way of the
 man, was somewhat theatrical to the eye; but it reposed on genuine
 feeling. For these two were old friends, old mates both at school
 and college, both thorough respecters of themselves and of each
 other, and, what does not always follow, men who thoroughly enjoyed
 each other's company.
 
 After a little rambling talk, the lawyer led up to the subject
 which so disagreeably pre-occupied his mind.
 
 "I suppose, Lanyon," said he "you and I must be the two oldest
 friends that Henry Jekyll has?"
 
 "I wish the friends were younger," chuckled Dr. Lanyon. "But I
 suppose we are. And what of that? I see little of him now."
 
 
 "Indeed?" said Utterson. "I thought you had a bond of common
 interest."
 
 "We had," was the reply. "But it is more than ten years since Henry
 Jekyll became too fanciful for me. He began to go wrong, wrong in
 mind; and though of course I continue to take an interest in him for
 old sake's sake, as they say,
 
 14)
 
 I see and I have seen devilish little of the man. Such unscientific
 balderdash," added the doctor, flushing suddenly purple, "would have
 estranged Damon and Pythias."
 
 This little spirit of temper was somewhat of a relief to Mr.
 Utterson. "They have only differed on some point of science," he
 thought; and being a man of no scientific passions (except in the
 matter of conveyancing), he even added: "It is nothing worse than
 that!" He gave his friend a few seconds to recover his composure,
 and then approached the question he had come to put. "Did you ever
 come across a protege of his--one Hyde?" he asked.
 
 "Hyde?" repeated Lanyon. "No. Never heard of him. Since my time."
 
 That was the amount of information that the lawyer carried back
 with him to the great, dark bed on which he tossed to and fro,
 until the small hours of the morning began to grow large. It was a
 night of little ease to his toiling mind, toiling in mere darkness
 and besieged by questions.
 
 Six o'clock struck on the bells of the church that was so
 conveniently near to Mr. Utterson's dwelling, and still he was
 digging at the problem. Hitherto it had touched him on the
 intellectual side alone; but now his imagination also was engaged,
 or rather enslaved; and as he lay and tossed in the gross darkness
 of the night and the curtained room, Mr. Enfield's tale went by
 
 15)
 
 before his mind in a scroll of lighted pictures. He would be aware
 of the great field of lamps of a nocturnal city; then of the figure
 of a man walking swiftly; then of a child running from the doctor's;
 and then these met, and that human Juggernaut trod the child down
 and passed on regardless of her screams. Or else he would see a room
 in a rich house, where his friend lay asleep, dreaming and smiling
 at his dreams; and then the door of that room would be opened, the
 curtains of the bed plucked apart, the sleeper recalled, and lo!
 there would stand by his side a figure to whom power was given, and
 even at that dead hour, he must rise and do its bidding. The figure
 in these two phases haunted the lawyer all night; and if at any time
 he dozed over, it was but to see it glide more stealthily through
 sleeping houses, or move the more swiftly and still the more
 swiftly, even to dizziness, through wider labyrinths of lamplighted
 city, and at every street-corner crush a child and leave her
 screaming. And still the figure had no face by which he might know
 it; even in his dreams, it had no face, or one that baffled him and
 melted before his eyes; and thus it was that there sprang up and
 grew apace in the lawyer's mind a singularly strong, almost an
 inordinate, curiosity to behold the features of the real Mr. Hyde.
 If he could but once set eyes on him, he thought the mystery would
 lighten and perhaps roll altogether away, as was the habit of
 mysterious
 
 16)
 
 things when well examined. He might see a reason for his friend's
 strange preference or bondage (call it which you please) and even
 for the startling clause of the will. At least it would be a face
 worth seeing: the face of a man who was without bowels of mercy: a
 face which had but to show itself to raise up, in the mind of the
 unimpressionable Enfield, a spirit of enduring hatred.
 
 From that time forward, Mr. Utterson began to haunt the door in the
 by-street of shops. In the morning before office hours, at noon when
 business was plenty, and time scarce, at night under the face of the
 fogged city moon, by all lights and at all hours of solitude or
 concourse, the lawyer was to be found on his chosen post.
 
 "If he be Mr. Hyde," he had thought, "I shall be Mr. Seek."
 
 And at last his patience was rewarded. It was a fine dry night;
 frost in the air; the streets as clean as a ballroom floor; the
 lamps, unshaken, by any wind, drawing a regular pattern of light
 and shadow. By ten o'clock, when the shops were closed, the
 by-street was very solitary and, in spite of the low growl of
 London from all round, very silent. Small sounds carried far;
 domestic sounds out of the houses were clearly audible on either
 side of the roadway; and the rumour of the approach of any
 passenger preceded him by a long time. Mr. Utterson had been some
 minutes at his post, when he was
 
 17)
 
 aware of an odd, light footstep drawing near. In the course of his
 nightly patrols, he had long grown accustomed to the quaint effect
 with which the footfalls of a single person, while he is still a
 great way off, suddenly spring out distinct from the vast hum and
 clatter of the city. Yet his attention had never before been so
 sharply and decisively arrested; and it was with a strong,
 superstitious prevision of success that he withdrew into the entry
 of the court.
 
 The steps drew swiftly nearer, and swelled out suddenly louder as
 they turned the end of the street. The lawyer, looking forth from
 the entry, could soon see what manner of man he had to deal with.
 He was small and very plainly dressed, and the look of him, even at
 that distance, went somehow strongly against the watcher's
 inclination. But he made straight for the door, crossing the
 roadway to save time; and as he came, he drew a key from his pocket
 like one approaching home.
 
 Mr. Utterson stepped out and touched him on the shoulder as he
 passed. "Mr. Hyde, I think?"
 
 Mr. Hyde shrank back with a hissing intake of the breath. But his
 fear was only momentary; and though he did not look the lawyer in
 the face, he answered coolly enough: "That is my name. What do you
 want?"
 
 "I see you are going in," returned the lawyer. "I am an old friend
 of Dr. Jekyll's--Mr. Utter-
 
 18)
 
 son of Gaunt Street--you must have heard my name; and meeting you
 so conveniently, I thought you might admit me."
 
 "You will not find Dr. Jekyll; he is from home," replied Mr. Hyde,
 blowing in the key. And then suddenly, but still without looking up,
 "How did you know me?" he asked.
 
 "On your side," said Mr. Utterson, "will you do me a favour?"
 
 "With pleasure," replied the other. "What shall it be?"
 
 "Will you let me see your face?" asked the lawyer.
 
 Mr. Hyde appeared to hesitate, and then, as if upon some sudden
 reflection, fronted about with an air of defiance; and the pair
 stared at each other pretty fixedly for a few seconds. "Now I shall
 know you again," said Mr. Utterson. "It may be useful."
 
 "Yes," returned Mr. Hyde, "it is as well we have, met; and a
 propos, you should have my address." And he gave a number of a
 street in Soho.
 
 "Good God!" thought Mr. Utterson, "can he, too, have been thinking
 of the will?" But he kept his feelings to himself and only grunted
 in acknowledgment of the address.
 
 "And now," said the other, "how did you know me?"
 
 "By description," was the reply.
 
 "Whose description?"
 
 19)
 
 "We have common friends," said Mr. Utterson.
 
 "Common friends?" echoed Mr. Hyde, a little hoarsely. "Who are
 they?"
 
 "Jekyll, for instance," said the lawyer.
 
 "He never told you," cried Mr. Hyde, with a flush of anger. "I did
 not think you would have lied."
 
 "Come," said Mr. Utterson, "that is not fitting language."
 
 
 The other snarled aloud into a savage laugh; and the next moment,
 with extraordinary quickness, he had unlocked the door and
 disappeared into the house.
 
 The lawyer stood awhile when Mr. Hyde had left him, the picture of
 disquietude. Then he began slowly to mount the street, pausing
 every step or two and putting his hand to his brow like a man in
 mental perplexity. The problem he was thus debating as he walked,
 was one of a class that is rarely solved. Mr. Hyde was pale and
 dwarfish, he gave an impression of deformity without any nameable
 malformation, he had a displeasing smile, he had borne himself to
 the lawyer with a sort of murderous mixture of timidity and
 boldness, and he spoke with a husky, whispering and somewhat broken
 voice; all these were points against him, but not all of these
 together could explain the hitherto unknown disgust, loathing, and
 fear with which Mr. Utterson regarded him. "There must be some-
 
 20)
 
 thing else," said the perplexed gentleman. "There is something
 more, if I could find a name for it. God bless me, the man seems
 hardly human! Something troglodytic, shall we say? or can it be the
 old story of Dr. Fell? or is it the mere radiance of a foul soul
 that thus transpires through, and transfigures, its clay continent?
 The last, I think; for, O my poor old Harry Jekyll, if ever I read
 Satan's signature upon a face, it is on that of your new friend."
 
 Round the corner from the by-street, there was a square of ancient,
 handsome houses, now for the most part decayed from their high
 estate and let in flats and chambers to all sorts and conditions of
 men: map-engravers, architects, shady lawyers, and the agents of
 obscure enterprises. One house, however, second from the corner, was
 still occupied entire; and at the door of this, which wore a great
 air of wealth and comfort, though it was now plunged in darkness
 except for the fan-light, Mr. Utterson stopped and knocked. A
 well-dressed, elderly servant opened the door.
 
 "Is Dr. Jekyll at home, Poole?" asked the lawyer.
 
 "I will see, Mr. Utterson," said Poole, admitting the visitor, as
 he spoke, into a large, low-roofed, comfortable hall, paved with
 flags, warmed (after the fashion of a country house) by a bright,
 open fire, and furnished with costly cabinets of oak. "Will you
 wait here by the
 
 21)
 
 fire, sir? or shall I give you a light in the dining room?"
 
 "Here, thank you," said the lawyer, and he drew near and leaned on
 the tall fender. This hall, in which he was now left alone, was a
 pet fancy of his friend the doctor's; and Utterson himself was wont
 to speak of it as the pleasantest room in London. But to-night there
 was a shudder in his blood; the face of Hyde sat heavy on his
 memory; he felt (what was rare with him) a nausea and distaste of
 life; and in the gloom of his spirits, he seemed to read a menace in
 the flickering of the firelight on the polished cabinets and the
 uneasy starting of the shadow on the roof. He was ashamed of his
 relief, when Poole presently returned to announce that Dr. Jekyll
 was gone out.
 
 "I saw Mr. Hyde go in by the old dissecting-room door, Poole," he
 said. "Is that right, when Dr. Jekyll is from home?"
 
 "Quite right, Mr. Utterson, sir," replied the servant. "Mr. Hyde
 has a key."
 
 "Your master seems to repose a great deal of trust in that young
 man, Poole," resumed the other musingly.
 
 "Yes, sir, he do indeed," said Poole. "We have all orders to obey
 him."
 
 "I do not think I ever met Mr. Hyde?" asked Utterson.
 
 
 "O, dear no, sir. He never dines here," replied the butler. "Indeed
 we see very little of
 
 22)
 
 him on this side of the house; he mostly comes and goes by the
 laboratory."
 
 "Well, good-night, Poole."
 
 "Good-night, Mr. Utterson." And the lawyer set out homeward with a
 very heavy heart. "Poor Harry Jekyll," he thought, "my mind
 misgives me he is in deep waters! He was wild when he was young; a
 long while ago to be sure; but in the law of God, there is no
 statute of limitations. Ay, it must be that; the ghost of some old
 sin, the cancer of some concealed disgrace: punishment coming, PEDE
 CLAUDO, years after memory has forgotten and self-love condoned the
 fault." And the lawyer, scared by the thought, brooded a while on
 his own past, groping in all the corners of memory, lest by chance
 some Jack-in-the-Box of an old iniquity should leap to light there.
 His past was fairly blameless; few men could read the rolls of their
 life with less apprehension; yet he was humbled to the dust by the
 many ill things he had done, and raised up again into a sober and
 fearful gratitude by the many that he had come so near to doing, yet
 avoided. And then by a return on his former subject, he conceived a
 spark of hope. "This Master Hyde, if he were studied," thought he,
 "must have secrets of his own; black secrets, by the look of him;
 secrets compared to which poor Jekyll's worst would be like
 sunshine. Things cannot continue as they are. It turns me cold to
 think of this creature stealing like a
 
 23)
 
 thief to Harry's bedside; poor Harry, what a wakening! And the
 danger of it; for if this Hyde suspects the existence of the will,
 he may grow impatient to inherit. Ay, I must put my shoulder to the
 wheel if Jekyll will but let me," he added, "if Jekyll will only let
 me." For once more he saw before his mind's eye, as clear as a
 transparency, the strange clauses of the will.
 
 24)
 
 
 
                       DR. JEKYLL WAS QUITE AT EASE
 
 A FORTNIGHT later, by excellent good fortune, the doctor gave one
 of his pleasant dinners to some five or six old cronies, all
 intelligent, reputable men and all judges of good wine; and Mr.
 Utterson so contrived that he remained behind after the others had
 departed. This was no new arrangement, but a thing that had
 befallen many scores of times. Where Utterson was liked, he was
 liked well. Hosts loved to detain the dry lawyer, when the
 light-hearted and the loose-tongued had already their foot on the
 threshold; they liked to sit a while in his unobtrusive company,
 practising for solitude, sobering their minds in the man's rich
 silence after the expense and strain of gaiety. To this rule, Dr.
 Jekyll was no exception; and as he now sat on the opposite side of
 the fire--a large, well-made, smooth-faced man of fifty, with
 something of a slyish cast perhaps, but every mark of capacity and
 kindness--you could see by his looks that he cherished for Mr.
 Utterson a sincere and warm affection.
 
 25)
 
 
 "I have been wanting to speak to you, Jekyll," began the latter.
 "You know that will of yours?"
 
 A close observer might have gathered that the topic was
 distasteful; but the doctor carried it off gaily. "My poor
 Utterson," said he, "you are unfortunate in such a client. I never
 saw a man so distressed as you were by my will; unless it were that
 hide-bound pedant, Lanyon, at what he called my scientific heresies.
 Oh, I know he's a good fellow--you needn't frown--an excellent
 fellow, and I always mean to see more of him; but a hide-bound
 pedant for all that; an ignorant, blatant pedant. I was never more
 disappointed in any man than Lanyon."
 
 "You know I never approved of it," pursued Utterson, ruthlessly
 disregarding the fresh topic.
 
 "My will? Yes, certainly, I know that," said the doctor, a trifle
 sharply. "You have told me so."
 
 "Well, I tell you so again," continued the lawyer. "I have been
 learning something of young Hyde."
 
 The large handsome face of Dr. Jekyll grew pale to the very lips,
 and there came a blackness about his eyes. "I do not care to hear
 more," said he. "This is a matter I thought we had agreed to drop."
 
 "What I heard was abominable," said Utterson.
 
 "It can make no change. You do not under-
 
 26)
 
 stand my position," returned the doctor, with a certain incoherency
 of manner. "I am painfully situated, Utterson; my position is a very
 strange--a very strange one. It is one of those affairs that
 cannot be mended by talking."
 
 "Jekyll," said Utterson, "you know me: I am a man to be trusted.
 Make a clean breast of this in confidence; and I make no doubt I
 can get you out of it."
 
 "My good Utterson," said the doctor, "this is very good of you,
 this is downright good of you, and I cannot find words to thank you
 in. I believe you fully; I would trust you before any man alive, ay,
 before myself, if I could make the choice; but indeed it isn't what
 you fancy; it is not so bad as that; and just to put your good heart
 at rest, I will tell you one thing: the moment I choose, I can be
 rid of Mr. Hyde. I give you my hand upon that; and I thank you again
 and again; and I will just add one little word, Utterson, that I'm
 sure you'll take in good part: this is a private matter, and I beg
 of you to let it sleep."
 
 
 Utterson reflected a little, looking in the fire.
 
 "I have no doubt you are perfectly right," he said at last, getting
 to his feet.
 
 "Well, but since we have touched upon this business, and for the
 last time I hope," continued the doctor, "there is one point I
 should like you to understand. I have really a very great interest
 in poor Hyde. I know you have seen
 
 27)
 
 him; he told me so; and I fear he was rude. But, I do sincerely
 take a great, a very great interest in that young man; and if I am
 taken away, Utterson, I wish you to promise me that you will bear
 with him and get his rights for him. I think you would, if you knew
 all; and it would be a weight off my mind if you would promise."
 
 "I can't pretend that I shall ever like him," said the lawyer.
 
 "I don't ask that," pleaded Jekyll, laying his hand upon the
 other's arm; "I only ask for justice; I only ask you to help him
 for my sake, when I am no longer here."
 
 Utterson heaved an irrepressible sigh. "Well," said he, "I
 promise."
 
 28)
 
 
 
                       THE CAREW MURDER CASE
 
 NEARLY a year later, in the month of October, 18---, London was
 startled by a crime of singular ferocity and rendered all the more
 notable by the high position of the victim. The details were few and
 startling. A maid servant living alone in a house not far from the
 river, had gone up-stairs to bed about eleven. Although a fog rolled
 over the city in the small hours, the early part of the night was
 cloudless, and the lane, which the maid's window overlooked, was
 brilliantly lit by the full moon. It seems she was romantically
 given, for she sat down upon her box, which stood immediately under
 the window, and fell into a dream of musing. Never (she used to say,
 with streaming tears, when she narrated that experience), never had
 she felt more at peace with all men or thought more kindly of the
 world. And as she so sat she became aware of an aged and beautiful
 gentleman with white hair, drawing near along the lane; and
 advancing to meet him, another and very small gentleman, to whom at
 first she
 
 29)
 
 paid less attention. When they had come within speech (which was
 just under the maid's eyes) the older man bowed and accosted the
 other with a very pretty manner of politeness. It did not seem as
 if the subject of his address were of great importance; indeed,
 from his pointing, it sometimes appeared as if he were only
 inquiring his way; but the moon shone on his face as he spoke, and
 the girl was pleased to watch it, it seemed to breathe such an
 innocent and old-world kindness of disposition, yet with something
 high too, as of a well-founded self-content. Presently her eye
 wandered to the other, and she was surprised to recognise in him a
 certain Mr. Hyde, who had once visited her master and for whom she
 had conceived a dislike. He had in his hand a heavy cane, with which
 he was trifling; but he answered never a word, and seemed to listen
 with an ill-contained impatience. And then all of a sudden he broke
 out in a great flame of anger, stamping with his foot, brandishing
 the cane, and carrying on (as the maid described it) like a madman.
 The old gentleman took a step back, with the air of one very much
 surprised and a trifle hurt; and at that Mr. Hyde broke out of all
 bounds and clubbed him to the earth. And next moment, with ape-like
 fury, he was trampling his victim under foot and hailing down a
 storm of blows, under which the bones were audibly shattered and the
 body jumped upon the roadway. At the horror of these sights and
 sounds, the maid fainted.
 
 30)
 
 It was two o'clock when she came to herself and called for the
 police. The murderer was gone long ago; but there lay his victim in
 the middle of the lane, incredibly mangled. The stick with which the
 deed had been done, although it was of some rare and very tough and
 heavy wood, had broken in the middle under the stress of this
 insensate cruelty; and one splintered half had rolled in the
 neighbouring gutter--the other, without doubt, had been carried
 away by the murderer. A purse and a gold watch were found upon the
 victim: but no cards or papers, except a sealed and stamped
 envelope, which he had been probably carrying to the post, and which
 bore the name and address of Mr. Utterson.
 
 This was brought to the lawyer the next morning, before he was out
 of bed; and he had no sooner seen it, and been told the
 circumstances, than he shot out a solemn lip. "I shall say nothing
 till I have seen the body," said he; "this may be very serious. Have
 the kindness to wait while I dress." And with the same grave
 countenance he hurried through his breakfast and drove to the police
 station, whither the body had been carried. As soon as he came into
 the cell, he nodded.
 
 "Yes," said he, "I recognise him. I am sorry to say that this is
 Sir Danvers Carew."
 
 "Good God, sir," exclaimed the officer, "is it possible?" And the
 next moment his eye
 
 31)
 
 lighted up with professional ambition. "This will make a deal of
 noise," he said. "And perhaps you can help us to the man." And he
 briefly narrated what the maid had seen, and showed the broken
 stick.
 
 Mr. Utterson had already quailed at the name of Hyde; but when the
 stick was laid before him, he could doubt no longer; broken and
 battered as it was, he recognised it for one that he had himself
 presented many years before to Henry Jekyll.
 
 "Is this Mr. Hyde a person of small stature?" he inquired.
 
 "Particularly small and particularly wicked-looking, is what the
 maid calls him," said the officer.
 
 Mr. Utterson reflected; and then, raising his head, "If you will
 come with me in my cab," he said, "I think I can take you to his
 house."
 
 It was by this time about nine in the morning, and the first fog of
 the season. A great chocolate-coloured pall lowered over heaven, but
 the wind was continually charging and routing these embattled
 vapours; so that as the cab crawled from street to street, Mr.
 Utterson beheld a marvellous number of degrees and hues of twilight;
 for here it would be dark like the back-end of evening; and there
 would be a glow of a rich, lurid brown, like the light of some
 strange conflagration; and here, for a moment, the fog would be
 quite broken up, and a haggard shaft
 
 32)
 
 of daylight would glance in between the swirling wreaths. The
 dismal quarter of Soho seen under these changing glimpses, with its
 muddy ways, and slatternly passengers, and its lamps, which had
 never been extinguished or had been kindled afresh to combat this
 mournful re-invasion of darkness, seemed, in the lawyer's eyes, like
 a district of some city in a nightmare. The thoughts of his mind,
 besides, were of the gloomiest dye; and when he glanced at the
 companion of his drive, he was conscious of some touch of that
 terror of the law and the law's officers, which may at times assail
 the most honest.
 
 As the cab drew up before the address indicated, the fog lifted a
 little and showed him a dingy street, a gin palace, a low French
 eating-house, a shop for the retail of penny numbers and twopenny
 salads, many ragged children huddled in the doorways, and many
 women of different nationalities passing out, key in hand, to have a
 morning glass; and the next moment the fog settled down again upon
 that part, as brown as umber, and cut him off from his blackguardly
 surroundings. This was the home of Henry Jekyll's favourite; of a
 man who was heir to a quarter of a million sterling.
 
 An ivory-faced and silvery-haired old woman opened the door. She
 had an evil face, smoothed by hypocrisy; but her manners were
 excellent. Yes, she said, this was Mr. Hyde's, but he was not at
 home; he had been in that night very late,
 
 33)
 
 but had gone away again in less than an hour; there was nothing
 strange in that; his habits were very irregular, and he was often
 absent; for instance, it was nearly two months since she had seen
 him till yesterday.
 
 "Very well, then, we wish to see his rooms," said the lawyer; and
 when the woman began to declare it was impossible, "I had better
 tell you who this person is," he added. "This is Inspector Newcomen
 of Scotland Yard."
 
 A flash of odious joy appeared upon the woman's face. "Ah!" said
 she, "he is in trouble! What has he done?"
 
 Mr. Utterson and the inspector exchanged glances. "He don't seem a
 very popular character," observed the latter. "And now, my good
 woman, just let me and this gentleman have a look about us."
 
 In the whole extent of the house, which but for the old woman
 remained otherwise empty, Mr. Hyde had only used a couple of rooms;
 but these were furnished with luxury and good taste. A closet was
 filled with wine; the plate was of silver, the napery elegant; a
 good picture hung upon the walls, a gift (as Utterson supposed) from
 Henry Jekyll, who was much of a connoisseur; and the carpets were of
 many plies and agreeable in colour. At this moment, however, the
 rooms bore every mark of having been recently and hurriedly
 ransacked; clothes lay about the floor, with their pockets inside
 out;
 
 34)
 
 lock-fast drawers stood open; and on the hearth there lay a pile of
 grey ashes, as though many papers had been burned. From these
 embers the inspector disinterred the butt-end of a green
 cheque-book, which had resisted the action of the fire; the other
 half of the stick was found behind the door; and as this clinched
 his suspicions, the officer declared himself delighted. A visit to
 the bank, where several thousand pounds were found to be lying to
 the murderer's credit, completed his gratification.
 
 "You may depend upon it, sir," he told Mr. Utterson: "I have him in
 my hand. He must have lost his head, or he never would have left the
 stick or, above all, burned the cheque-book. Why, money's life to
 the man. We have nothing to do but wait for him at the bank, and get
 out the handbills."
 
 This last, however, was not so easy of accomplishment; for Mr. Hyde
 had numbered few familiars--even the master of the servant-maid
 had only seen him twice; his family could nowhere be traced; he had
 never been photographed; and the few who could describe him differed
 widely, as common observers will. Only on one point, were they
 agreed; and that was the haunting sense of unexpressed deformity
 with which the fugitive impressed his beholders.
 
 35)
 
 
 
                      INCIDENT OF THE LETTER
 
 IT was late in the afternoon, when Mr. Utterson found his way to
 Dr. Jekyll's door, where he was at once admitted by Poole, and
 carried down by the kitchen offices and across a yard which had
 once been a garden, to the building which was indifferently known
 as the laboratory or the dissecting-rooms. The doctor had bought
 the house from the heirs of a celebrated surgeon; and his own
 tastes being rather chemical than anatomical, had changed the
 destination of the block at the bottom of the garden. It was the
 first time that the lawyer had been received in that part of his
 friend's quarters; and he eyed the dingy, windowless structure with
 curiosity, and gazed round with a distasteful sense of strangeness
 as he crossed the theatre, once crowded with eager students and now
 lying gaunt and silent, the tables laden with chemical apparatus,
 the floor strewn with crates and littered with packing straw, and
 the light falling dimly through the foggy cupola. At the further
 end, a flight of stairs mounted to a door covered with red baize;
 
 36)
 
 and through this, Mr. Utterson was at last received into the
 doctor's cabinet. It was a large room, fitted round with glass
 presses, furnished, among other things, with a cheval-glass and a
 business table, and looking out upon the court by three dusty
 windows barred with iron. A fire burned in the grate; a lamp was
 set lighted on the chimney shelf, for even in the houses the fog
 began to lie thickly; and there, close up to the warmth, sat Dr.
 Jekyll, looking deadly sick. He did not rise to meet his visitor,
 but held out a cold hand and bade him welcome in a changed voice.
 
 "And now," said Mr. Utterson, as soon as Poole had left them, "you
 have heard the news?"
 
 The doctor shuddered. "They were crying it in the square," he said.
 "I heard them in my dining-room."
 
 "One word," said the lawyer. "Carew was my client, but so are you,
 and I want to know what I am doing. You have not been mad enough to
 hide this fellow?"
 
 "Utterson, I swear to God," cried the doctor, "I swear to God I
 will never set eyes on him again. I bind my honour to you that I am
 done with him in this world. It is all at an end. And indeed he does
 not want my help; you do not know him as I do; he is safe, he is
 quite safe; mark my words, he will never more be heard of."
 
 
 The lawyer listened gloomily; he did not like his friend's feverish
 manner. "You seem pretty
 
 37)
 
 sure of him," said he; "and for your sake, I hope you may be right.
 If it came to a trial, your name might appear."
 
 "I am quite sure of him," replied Jekyll; "I have grounds for
 certainty that I cannot share with any one. But there is one thing
 on which you may advise me. I have--I have received a letter; and
 I am at a loss whether I should show it to the police. I should like
 to leave it in your hands, Utterson; you would judge wisely, I am
 sure; I have so great a trust in you."
 
 "You fear, I suppose, that it might lead to his detection?" asked
 the lawyer.
 
 "No," said the other. "I cannot say that I care what becomes of
 Hyde; I am quite done with him. I was thinking of my own character,
 which this hateful business has rather exposed."
 
 Utterson ruminated a while; he was surprised at his friend's
 selfishness, and yet relieved by it. "Well," said he, at last, "let
 me see the letter."
 
 The letter was written in an odd, upright hand and signed "Edward
 Hyde": and it signified, briefly enough, that the writer's
 benefactor, Dr. Jekyll, whom he had long so unworthily repaid for a
 thousand generosities, need labour under no alarm for his safety, as
 he had means of escape on which he placed a sure dependence. The
 lawyer liked this letter well enough; it put a better colour on the
 intimacy than he had looked for; and he blamed himself for some of
 his past suspicions.
 
 38)
 
 
 "Have you the envelope?" he asked.
 
 "I burned it," replied Jekyll, "before I thought what I was about.
 But it bore no postmark. The note was handed in."
 
 "Shall I keep this and sleep upon it?" asked Utterson.
 
 "I wish you to judge for me entirely," was the reply. "I have lost
 confidence in myself."
 
 "Well, I shall consider," returned the lawyer. "And now one word
 more: it was Hyde who dictated the terms in your will about that
 disappearance?"
 
 The doctor seemed seized with a qualm of faintness: he shut his
 mouth tight and nodded.
 
 "I knew it," said Utterson. "He meant to murder you. You have had a
 fine escape."
 
 "I have had what is far more to the purpose," returned the doctor
 solemnly: "I have had a lesson--O God, Utterson, what a lesson I
 have had!" And he covered his face for a moment with his hands.
 
 On his way out, the lawyer stopped and had a word or two with
 Poole. "By the by," said he, "there was a letter handed in to-day:
 what was the messenger like?" But Poole was positive nothing had
 come except by post; "and only circulars by that," he added.
 
 This news sent off the visitor with his fears renewed. Plainly the
 letter had come by the laboratory door; possibly, indeed, it had
 been
 
 39)
 
 written in the cabinet; and if that were so, it must be differently
 judged, and handled with the more caution. The newsboys, as he went,
 were crying themselves hoarse along the footways: "Special edition.
 Shocking murder of an M. P." That was the funeral oration of one
 friend and client; and he could not help a certain apprehension lest
 the good name of another should be sucked down in the eddy of the
 scandal. It was, at least, a ticklish decision that he had to make;
 and self-reliant as he was by habit, he began to cherish a longing
 for advice. It was not to be had directly; but perhaps, he thought,
 it might be fished for.
 
 Presently after, he sat on one side of his own hearth, with Mr.
 Guest, his head clerk, upon the other, and midway between, at a
 nicely calculated distance from the fire, a bottle of a particular
 old wine that had long dwelt unsunned in the foundations of his
 house. The fog still slept on the wing above the drowned city, where
 the lamps glimmered like carbuncles; and through the muffle and
 smother of these fallen clouds, the procession of the town's life
 was still rolling in through the great arteries with a sound as of a
 mighty wind. But the room was gay with firelight. In the bottle the
 acids were long ago resolved; the imperial dye had softened with
 time, As the colour grows richer in stained windows; and the glow of
 hot autumn afternoons on hillside vineyards was ready to be set free
 
 40)
 
 and to disperse the fogs of London. Insensibly the lawyer melted.
 There was no man from whom he kept fewer secrets than Mr. Guest;
 and he was not always sure that he kept as many as he meant. Guest
 had often been on business to the doctor's; he knew Poole; he could
 scarce have failed to hear of Mr. Hyde's familiarity about the
 house; he might draw conclusions: was it not as well, then, that he
 should see a letter which put that mystery to rights? and above all
 since Guest, being a great student and critic of handwriting, would
 consider the step natural and obliging? The clerk, besides, was a
 man of counsel; he would scarce read so strange a document without
 dropping a remark; and by that remark Mr. Utterson might shape his
 future course.
 
 "This is a sad business about Sir Danvers," he said.
 
 "Yes, sir, indeed. It has elicited a great deal of public feeling,"
 returned Guest. "The man, of course, was mad."
 
 "I should like to hear your views on that," replied Utterson. "I
 have a document here in his handwriting; it is between ourselves,
 for I scarce know what to do about it; it is an ugly business at
 the best. But there it is; quite in your way a murderer's
 autograph."
 
 Guest's eyes brightened, and he sat down at once and studied it
 with passion. "No, sir," he said: "not mad; but it is an odd hand."
 
 41)
 
 "And by all accounts a very odd writer," added the lawyer.
 
 Just then the servant entered with a note.
 
 "Is that from Dr. Jekyll, sir?" inquired the clerk. "I thought I
 knew the writing. Anything private, Mr. Utterson?"
 
 "Only an invitation to dinner. Why? Do you want to see it?"
 
 "One moment. I thank you, sir"; and the clerk laid the two sheets
 of paper alongside and sedulously compared their contents. "Thank
 you, sir," he said at last, returning both; "it's a very
 interesting autograph."
 
 There was a pause, during which Mr. Utterson struggled with
 himself. "Why did you compare them, Guest?" he inquired suddenly.
 
 "Well, sir," returned the clerk, "there's a rather singular
 resemblance; the two hands are in many points identical: only
 differently sloped."
 
 "Rather quaint," said Utterson.
 
 "It is, as you say, rather quaint," returned Guest.
 
 "I wouldn't speak of this note, you know," said the master.
 
 "No, sir," said the clerk. "I understand."
 
 But no sooner was Mr. Utterson alone that night than he locked the
 note into his safe, where it reposed from that time forward.
 "What!" he thought. "Henry Jekyll forge for a murderer!" And his
 blood ran cold in his veins.
 
 
 
 42)
 
 
 
                      REMARKABLE INCIDENT OF DR. LANYON
 
 TIME ran on; thousands of pounds were offered in reward, for the
 death of Sir Danvers was resented as a public injury; but Mr. Hyde
 had disappeared out of the ken of the police as though he had never
 existed. Much of his past was unearthed, indeed, and all
 disreputable: tales came out of the man's cruelty, at once so
 callous and violent; of his vile life, of his strange associates,
 of the hatred that seemed to have surrounded his career; but of his
 present whereabouts, not a whisper. From the time he had left the
 house in Soho on the morning of the murder, he was simply blotted
 out; and gradually, as time drew on, Mr. Utterson began to recover
 from the hotness of his alarm, and to grow more at quiet with
 himself. The death of Sir Danvers was, to his way of thinking, more
 than paid for by the disappearance of Mr. Hyde. Now that that evil
 influence had been withdrawn, a new life began for Dr. Jekyll. He
 came out of his seclusion, renewed relations with his friends,
 became once more their familiar guest
 
 43)
 
 and entertainer; and whilst he had always been known for
 charities, he was now no less distinguished for religion. He was
 busy, he was much in the open air, he did good; his face seemed to
 open and brighten, as if with an inward consciousness of service;
 and for more than two months, the doctor was at peace.
 
 On the 8th of January Utterson had dined at the doctor's with a
 small party; Lanyon had been there; and the face of the host had
 looked from one to the other as in the old days when the trio were
 inseparable friends. On the 12th, and again on the 14th, the door
 was shut against the lawyer. "The doctor was confined to the
 house," Poole said, "and saw no one." On the 15th, he tried again,
 and was again refused; and having now been used for the last two
 months to see his friend almost daily, he found this return of
 solitude to weigh upon his spirits. The fifth night he had in Guest
 to dine with him; and the sixth he betook himself to Dr. Lanyon's.
 
 There at least he was not denied admittance; but when he came in,
 he was shocked at the change which had taken place in the doctor's
 appearance. He had his death-warrant written legibly upon his face.
 The rosy man had grown pale; his flesh had fallen away; he was
 visibly balder and older; and yet it was not so much, these tokens
 of a swift physical decay that arrested the lawyer's notice, as a
 look in the eye and quality of manner that seemed to testify to
 
 44)
 
 some deep-seated terror of the mind. It was unlikely that the
 doctor should fear death; and yet that was what Utterson was
 tempted to suspect. "Yes," he thought; "he is a doctor, he must
 know his own state and that his days are counted; and the knowledge
 is more than he can bear." And yet when Utterson remarked on his
 ill-looks, it was with an air of greatness that Lanyon declared
 himself a doomed man.
 
 "I have had a shock," he said, "and I shall never recover. It is a
 question of weeks. Well, life has been pleasant; I liked it; yes,
 sir, I used to like it. I sometimes think if we knew all, we should
 be more glad to get away."
 
 "Jekyll is ill, too," observed Utterson. "Have you seen him?"
 
 But Lanyon's face changed, and he held up a trembling hand. "I wish
 to see or hear no more of Dr. Jekyll," he said in a loud, unsteady
 voice. "I am quite done with that person; and I beg that you will
 spare me any allusion to one whom I regard as dead."
 
 "Tut-tut," said Mr. Utterson; and then after a considerable pause,
 "Can't I do anything?" he inquired. "We are three very old friends,
 Lanyon; we shall not live to make others."
 
 "Nothing can be done," returned Lanyon; "ask himself."
 
 "He will not see me," said the lawyer.
 
 "I am not surprised at that," was the reply. "Some day, Utterson,
 after I am dead, you may
 
 45)
 
 perhaps come to learn the right and wrong of this. I cannot tell
 you. And in the meantime, if you can sit and talk with me of other
 things, for God's sake, stay and do so; but if you cannot keep clear
 of this accursed topic, then, in God's name, go, for I cannot bear
 it."
 
 As soon as he got home, Utterson sat down and wrote to Jekyll,
 complaining of his exclusion from the house, and asking the cause
 of this unhappy break with Lanyon; and the next day brought him a
 long answer, often very pathetically worded, and sometimes darkly
 mysterious in drift. The quarrel with Lanyon was incurable. "I do
 not blame our old friend," Jekyll wrote, "but I share his view
 that we must never meet. I mean from henceforth to lead a life of
 extreme seclusion; you must not be surprised, nor must you doubt
 my friendship, if my door is often shut even to you. You must
 suffer me to go my own dark way. I have brought on myself a
 punishment and a danger that I cannot name. If I am the chief of
 sinners, I am the chief of sufferers also. I could not think that
 this earth contained a place for sufferings and terrors so
 unmanning; and you can do but one thing, Utterson, to lighten
 this destiny, and that is to respect my silence." Utterson was
 amazed; the dark influence of Hyde had been withdrawn, the doctor
 had returned to his old tasks and amities; a week ago, the
 prospect had smiled with every promise of a cheerful and an
 honoured age;
 
 46)
 
 and now in a moment, friendship, and peace of mind, and the whole
 tenor of his life were wrecked. So great and unprepared a change
 pointed to madness; but in view of Lanyon's manner and words,
 there must lie for it some deeper ground.
 
 A week afterwards Dr. Lanyon took to his bed, and in something
 less than a fortnight he was dead. The night after the funeral,
 at which he had been sadly affected, Utterson locked the door of
 his business room, and sitting there by the light of a melancholy
 candle, drew out and set before him an envelope addressed by the
 hand and sealed with the seal of his dead friend. "PRIVATE: for
 the hands of G. J. Utterson ALONE and in case of his predecease
 to be destroyed unread," so it was emphatically superscribed; and
 the lawyer dreaded to behold the contents. "I have buried one
 friend to-day," he thought: "what if this should cost me
 another?" And then he condemned the fear as a disloyalty, and
 broke the seal. Within there was another enclosure, likewise
 sealed, and marked upon the cover as "not to be opened till the
 death or disappearance of Dr. Henry Jekyll." Utterson could not
 trust his eyes. Yes, it was disappearance; here again, as in the
 mad will which he had long ago restored to its author, here again
 were the idea of a disappearance and the name of Henry Jekyll
 bracketed. But in the will, that idea had sprung from the
 sinister suggestion of
 
 47)
 
 the man Hyde; it was set there with a purpose all too plain and
 horrible. Written by the hand of Lanyon, what should it mean? A
 great curiosity came on the trustee, to disregard the prohibition
 and dive at once to the bottom of these mysteries; but
 professional honour and faith to his dead friend were stringent
 obligations; and the packet slept in the inmost corner of his
 private safe.
 
 It is one thing to mortify curiosity, another to conquer it; and
 it may be doubted if, from that day forth, Utterson desired the
 society of his surviving friend with the same eagerness. He
 thought of him kindly; but his thoughts were disquieted and
 fearful. He went to call indeed; but he was perhaps relieved to
 be denied admittance; perhaps, in his heart, he preferred to
 speak with Poole upon the doorstep and surrounded by the air and
 sounds of the open city, rather than to be admitted into that
 house of voluntary bondage, and to sit and speak with its
 inscrutable recluse. Poole had, indeed, no very pleasant news to
 communicate. The doctor, it appeared, now more than ever confined
 himself to the cabinet over the laboratory, where he would
 sometimes even sleep; he was out of spirits, he had grown very
 silent, he did not read; it seemed as if he had something on his
 mind. Utterson became so used to the unvarying character of these
 reports, that he fell off little by little in the frequency of
 his visits.
 
 48)
 
 
 
                       INCIDENT AT THE WINDOW
 
 IT chanced on Sunday, when Mr. Utterson was on his usual walk
 with Mr. Enfield, that their way lay once again through the
 by-street; and that when they came in front of the door, both
 stopped to gaze on it.
 
 "Well," said Enfield, "that story's at an end at least. We shall
 never see more of Mr. Hyde."
 
 "I hope not," said Utterson. "Did I ever tell you that I once saw
 him, and shared your feeling of repulsion?"
 
 "It was impossible to do the one without the other," returned
 Enfield. "And by the way, what an ass you must have thought me,
 not to know that this was a back way to Dr. Jekyll's! It was
 partly your own fault that I found it out, even when I did."
 
 "So you found it out, did you?" said Utterson. "But if that be
 so, we may step into the court and take a look at the windows. To
 tell you the truth, I am uneasy about poor Jekyll; and even
 outside, I feel as if the presence of a friend might do him
 good."
 
 49)
 
 The court was very cool and a little damp, and full of premature
 twilight, although the sky, high up overhead, was still bright
 with sunset. The middle one of the three windows was half-way
 open; and sitting close beside it, taking the air with an
 infinite sadness of mien, like some disconsolate prisoner,
 Utterson saw Dr. Jekyll.
 
 "What! Jekyll!" he cried. "I trust you are better."
 
 "I am very low, Utterson," replied the doctor, drearily, "very
 low. It will not last long, thank God."
 
 "You stay too much indoors," said the lawyer. "You should be out,
 whipping up the circulation like Mr. Enfield and me. (This is my
 cousin--Mr. Enfield--Dr. Jekyll.) Come, now; get your hat and
 take a quick turn with us."
 
 "You are very good," sighed the other. "I should like to very
 much; but no, no, no, it is quite impossible; I dare not. But
 indeed, Utterson, I am very glad to see you; this is really a
 great pleasure; I would ask you and Mr. Enfield up, but the place
 is really not fit."
 
 "Why then," said the lawyer, good-naturedly, "the best thing we
 can do is to stay down here and speak with you from where we
 are."
 
 "That is just what I was about to venture to propose," returned
 the doctor with a smile. But the words were hardly uttered,
 before the smile was struck out of his face and succeeded
 
 50)
 
 by an expression of such abject terror and despair, as froze the
 very blood of the two gentlemen below. They saw it but for a
 glimpse, for the window was instantly thrust down; but that
 glimpse had been sufficient, and they turned and left the court
 without a word. In silence, too, they traversed the by-street;
 and it was not until they had come into a neighbouring
 thoroughfare, where even upon a Sunday there were still some
 stirrings of life, that Mr. Utterson at last turned and looked at
 his companion. They were both pale; and there was an answering
 horror in their eyes.
 
 "God forgive us, God forgive us," said Mr. Utterson.
 
 But Mr. Enfield only nodded his head very seriously and walked on
 once more in silence.
 
 51)
 
 
 
                              THE LAST NIGHT
 
 MR. UTTERSON was sitting by his fireside one evening after
 dinner, when he was surprised to receive a visit from Poole.
 
 "Bless me, Poole, what brings you here?" he cried; and then
 taking a second look at him, "What ails you?" he added; "is the
 doctor ill?"
 
 "Mr. Utterson," said the man, "there is something wrong."
 
 
 "Take a seat, and here is a glass of wine for you," said the
 lawyer. "Now, take your time, and tell me plainly what you want."
 
 "You know the doctor's ways, sir," replied Poole, "and how he
 shuts himself up. Well, he's shut up again in the cabinet; and I
 don't like it, sir--I wish I may die if I like it. Mr. Utterson,
 sir, I'm afraid."
 
 "Now, my good man," said the lawyer, "be explicit. What are you
 afraid of?"
 
 "I've been afraid for about a week," returned Poole, doggedly
 disregarding the question, "and I can bear it no more."
 
 The man's appearance amply bore out his
 
 52)
 
 words; his manner was altered for the worse; and except for the
 moment when he had first announced his terror, he had not once
 looked the lawyer in the face. Even now, he sat with the glass of
 wine untasted on his knee, and his eyes directed to a corner of
 the floor. "I can bear it no more," he repeated.
 
 "Come," said the lawyer, "I see you have some good reason, Poole;
 I see there is something seriously amiss. Try to tell me what it
 is."
 
 "I think there's been foul play," said Poole, hoarsely.
 
 
 "Foul play!" cried the lawyer, a good deal frightened and rather
 inclined to be irritated in consequence. "What foul play? What
 does the man mean?"
 
 "I daren't say, sir," was the answer; "but will you come along
 with me and see for yourself?"
 
 Mr. Utterson's only answer was to rise and get his hat and
 great-coat; but he observed with wonder the greatness of the
 relief that appeared upon the butler's face, and perhaps with no
 less, that the wine was still untasted when he set it down to
 follow.
 
 It was a wild, cold, seasonable night of March, with a pale moon,
 lying on her back as though the wind had tilted her, and a flying
 wrack of the most diaphanous and lawny texture. The wind made
 talking difficult, and flecked the blood into the face. It seemed
 to have swept the
 
 53)
 
 streets unusually bare of passengers, besides; for Mr. Utterson
 thought he had never seen that part of London so deserted. He
 could have wished it otherwise; never in his life had he been
 conscious of so sharp a wish to see and touch his
 fellow-creatures; for struggle as he might, there was borne in
 upon his mind a crushing anticipation of calamity. The square,
 when they got there, was all full of wind and dust, and the thin
 trees in the garden were lashing themselves along the railing.
 Poole, who had kept all the way a pace or two ahead, now pulled
 up in the middle of the pavement, and in spite of the biting
 weather, took off his hat and mopped his brow with a red
 pocket-handkerchief. But for all the hurry of his coming, these
 were not the dews of exertion that he wiped away, but the
 moisture of some strangling anguish; for his face was white and
 his voice, when he spoke, harsh and broken.
 
 "Well, sir," he said, "here we are, and God grant there be
 nothing wrong."
 
 "Amen, Poole," said the lawyer.
 
 Thereupon the servant knocked in a very guarded manner; the door
 was opened on the chain; and a voice asked from within, "Is that
 you, Poole?"
 
 "It's all right," said Poole. "Open the door." The hall, when
 they entered it, was brightly lighted up; the fire was built
 high; and about the hearth the whole of the servants, men and
 
 54)
 
 women, stood huddled together like a flock of sheep. At the sight
 of Mr. Utterson, the housemaid broke into hysterical whimpering;
 and the cook, crying out, "Bless God! it's Mr. Utterson," ran
 forward as if to take him in her arms.
 
 "What, what? Are you all here?" said the lawyer peevishly. "Very
 irregular, very unseemly; your master would be far from pleased."
 
 "They're all afraid," said Poole.
 
 Blank silence followed, no one protesting; only the maid lifted
 up her voice and now wept loudly.
 
 "Hold your tongue!" Poole said to her, with a ferocity of accent
 that testified to his own jangled nerves; and indeed, when the
 girl had so suddenly raised the note of her lamentation, they had
 all started and turned toward the inner door with faces of
 dreadful expectation. "And now," continued the butler, addressing
 the knife-boy, "reach me a candle, and we'll get this through
 hands at once." And then he begged Mr. Utterson to follow him,
 and led the way to the back-garden.
 
 "Now, sir," said he, "you come as gently as you can. I want you
 to hear, and I don't want you to be heard. And see here, sir, if
 by any chance he was to ask you in, don't go."
 
 Mr. Utterson's nerves, at this unlooked-for termination, gave a
 jerk that nearly threw him from his balance; but he re-collected
 his courage
 
 55)
 
 and followed the butler into the laboratory building and through
 the surgical theatre, with its lumber of crates and bottles, to
 the foot of the stair. Here Poole motioned him to stand on one
 side and listen; while he himself, setting down the candle and
 making a great and obvious call on his resolution, mounted the
 steps and knocked with a somewhat uncertain hand on the red baize
 of the cabinet door.
 
 "Mr. Utterson, sir, asking to see you," he called; and even as he
 did so, once more violently signed to the lawyer to give ear.
 
 A voice answered from within: "Tell him I cannot see any one," it
 said complainingly.
 
 "Thank you, sir," said Poole, with a note of something like
 triumph in his voice; and taking up his candle, he led Mr.
 Utterson back across the yard and into the great kitchen, where
 the fire was out and the beetles were leaping on the floor.
 
 "Sir," he said, looking Mr. Utterson in the eyes, "was that my
 master's voice?"
 
 "It seems much changed," replied the lawyer, very pale, but
 giving look for look.
 
 "Changed? Well, yes, I think so," said the butler. "Have I been
 twenty years in this man's house, to be deceived about his voice?
 No, sir; master's made away with; he was made, away with eight
 days ago, when we heard him cry out upon the name of God; and
 who's in there instead of him, and why it stays there, is a thing
 that cries to Heaven, Mr. Utterson!"
 
 56)
 
 "This is a very strange tale, Poole; this is rather a wild tale,
 my man," said Mr. Utterson, biting his finger. "Suppose it were
 as you suppose, supposing Dr. Jekyll to have been--well,
 murdered, what could induce the murderer to stay? That won't hold
 water; it doesn't commend itself to reason."
 
 "Well, Mr. Utterson, you are a hard man to satisfy, but I'll do
 it yet," said Poole. "All this last week (you must know) him, or
 it, or whatever it is that lives in that cabinet, has been crying
 night and day for some sort of medicine and cannot get it to his
 mind. It was sometimes his way--the master's, that is--to
 write his orders on a sheet of paper and throw it on the stair.
 We've had nothing else this week back; nothing but papers, and a
 closed door, and the very meals left there to be smuggled in when
 nobody was looking. Well, sir, every day, ay, and twice and
 thrice in the same day, there have been orders and complaints,
 and I have been sent flying to all the wholesale chemists in
 town. Every time I brought the stuff back, there would be another
 paper telling me to return it, because it was not pure, and
 another order to a different firm. This drug is wanted bitter
 bad, sir, whatever for."
 
 "Have you any of these papers?" asked Mr. Utterson.
 
 Poole felt in his pocket and handed out a crumpled note, which
 the lawyer, bending nearer
 
 57)
 
 to the candle, carefully examined. Its contents ran thus: "Dr.
 Jekyll presents his compliments to Messrs. Maw. He assures them
 that their last sample is impure and quite useless for his
 present purpose. In the year 18---, Dr. J. purchased a somewhat
 large quantity from Messrs. M. He now begs them to search with
 the most sedulous care, and should any of the same quality be
 left, to forward it to him at once. Expense is no consideration.
 The importance of this to Dr. J. can hardly be exaggerated." So
 far the letter had run composedly enough, but here with a sudden
 splutter of the pen, the writer's emotion had broken loose. "For
 God's sake," he had added, "find me some of the old."
 
 "This is a strange note," said Mr. Utterson; and then sharply,
 "How do you come to have it open?"
 
 "The man at Maw's was main angry, sir, and he threw it back to me
 like so much dirt," returned Poole.
 
 "This is unquestionably the doctor's hand, do you know?" resumed
 the lawyer.
 
 "I thought it looked like it," said the servant rather sulkily;
 and then, with another voice, "But what matters hand-of-write?"
 he said. "I've seen him!"
 
 "Seen him?" repeated Mr. Utterson. "Well?"
 
 "That's it!" said Poole. "It was this way. I came suddenly into
 the theatre from the
 
 58)
 
 garden. It seems he had slipped out to look for this drug or
 whatever it is; for the cabinet door was open, and there he was
 at the far end of the room digging among the crates. He looked up
 when I came in, gave a kind of cry, and whipped up-stairs into
 the cabinet. It was but for one minute that I saw him, but the
 hair stood upon my head like quills. Sir, if that was my master,
 why had he a mask upon his face? If it was my master, why did he
 cry out like a rat, and run from me? I have served him long
 enough. And then..." The man paused and passed his hand over his
 face.
 
 "These are all very strange circumstances," said Mr. Utterson,
 "but I think I begin to see daylight. Your master, Poole, is
 plainly seized with one of those maladies that both torture and
 deform the sufferer; hence, for aught I know, the alteration of
 his voice; hence the mask and the avoidance of his friends; hence
 his eagerness to find this drug, by means of which the poor soul
 retains some hope of ultimate recovery--God grant that he be
 not deceived! There is my explanation; it is sad enough, Poole,
 ay, and appalling to consider; but it is plain and natural, hangs
 well together, and delivers us from all exorbitant alarms."
 
 "Sir," said the butler, turning to a sort of mottled pallor,
 "that thing was not my master, and there's the truth. My master"
 here he looked round him and began to whisper--"is
 
 59)
 
 a tall, fine build of a man, and this was more of a dwarf."
 Utterson attempted to protest. "O, sir," cried Poole, "do you
 think I do not know my master after twenty years? Do you think I
 do not know where his head comes to in the cabinet door, where I
 saw him every morning of my life? No, Sir, that thing in the mask
 was never Dr. Jekyll--God knows what it was, but it was never
 Dr. Jekyll; and it is the belief of my heart that there was
 murder done."
 
 "Poole," replied the lawyer, "if you say that, it will become my
 duty to make certain. Much as I desire to spare your master's
 feelings, much as I am puzzled by this note which seems to prove
 him to be still alive, I shall consider it my duty to break in
 that door."
 
 "Ah Mr. Utterson, that's talking!" cried the butler.
 
 "And now comes the second question," resumed Utterson: "Who is
 going to do it?"
 
 "Why, you and me," was the undaunted reply.
 
 "That's very well said," returned the lawyer; "and whatever comes
 of it, I shall make it my business to see you are no loser."
 
 "There is an axe in the theatre," continued Poole; "and you might
 take the kitchen poker for yourself."
 
 The lawyer took that rude but weighty instrument into his hand,
 and balanced it. "Do you know, Poole," he said, looking up, "that
 
 60)
 
 you and I are about to place ourselves in a position of some
 peril?"
 
 "You may say so, sir, indeed," returned the butler.
 
 "It is well, then, that we should be frank," said the other. "We
 both think more than we have said; let us make a clean breast.
 This masked figure that you saw, did you recognise it?"
 
 "Well, sir, it went so quick, and the creature was so doubled up,
 that I could hardly swear to that," was the answer. "But if you
 mean, was it Mr. Hyde?--why, yes, I think it was! You see, it
 was much of the same bigness; and it had the same quick, light
 way with it; and then who else could have got in by the
 laboratory door? You have not forgot, sir that at the time of the
 murder he had still the key with him? But that's not all. I don't
 know, Mr. Utterson, if ever you met this Mr. Hyde?"
 
 "Yes," said the lawyer, "I once spoke with him."
 
 "Then you must know as well as the rest of us that there was
 something queer about that gentleman--something that gave a man
 a turn--I don't know rightly how to say it, sir, beyond this:
 that you felt it in your marrow kind of cold and thin."
 
 "I own I felt something of what you describe," said Mr. Utterson.
 
 "Quite so, sir," returned Poole. "Well, when
 
 61)
 
 that masked thing like a monkey jumped from among the chemicals
 and whipped into the cabinet, it went down my spine like ice. Oh,
 I know it's not evidence, Mr. Utterson. I'm book-learned enough
 for that; but a man has his feelings, and I give you my
 Bible-word it was Mr. Hyde!"
 
 "Ay, ay," said the lawyer. "My fears incline to the same point.
 Evil, I fear, founded--evil was sure to come--of that
 connection. Ay, truly, I believe you; I believe poor Harry is
 killed; and I believe his murderer (for what purpose, God alone
 can tell) is still lurking in his victim's room. Well, let our
 name be vengeance. Call Bradshaw."
 
 The footman came at the summons, very white and nervous.
 
 
 "Pull yourself together, Bradshaw," said the lawyer. "This
 suspense, I know, is telling upon all of you; but it is now our
 intention to make an end of it. Poole, here, and I are going to
 force our way into the cabinet. If all is well, my shoulders are
 broad enough to bear the blame. Meanwhile, lest anything should
 really be amiss, or any malefactor seek to escape by the back,
 you and the boy must go round the corner with a pair of good
 sticks and take your post at the laboratory door. We give you ten
 minutes to get to your stations."
 
 As Bradshaw left, the lawyer looked at his watch. "And now,
 Poole, let us get to ours,"
 
 62)
 
 he said; and taking the poker under his arm, led the way into the
 yard. The scud had banked over the moon, and it was now quite
 dark. The wind, which only broke in puffs and draughts into that
 deep well of building, tossed the light of the candle to and fro
 about their steps, until they came into the shelter of the
 theatre, where they sat down silently to wait. London hummed
 solemnly all around; but nearer at hand, the stillness was only
 broken by the sounds of a footfall moving to and fro along the
 cabinet floor.
 
 "So it will walk all day, sir," whispered Poole; "ay, and the
 better part of the night. Only when a new sample comes from the
 chemist, there's a bit of a break. Ah, it's an ill conscience
 that's such an enemy to rest! Ah, sir, there's blood foully shed
 in every step of it! But hark again, a little closer--put your
 heart in your ears, Mr. Utterson, and tell me, is that the
 doctor's foot?"
 
 The steps fell lightly and oddly, with a certain swing, for all
 they went so slowly; it was different indeed from the heavy
 creaking tread of Henry Jekyll. Utterson sighed. "Is there never
 anything else?" he asked.
 
 Poole nodded. "Once," he said. "Once I heard it weeping!"
 
 "Weeping? how that?" said the lawyer, conscious of a sudden chill
 of horror.
 
 "Weeping like a woman or a lost soul," said
 
 63)
 
 the butler. "I came away with that upon my heart, that I could
 have wept too."
 
 But now the ten minutes drew to an end. Poole disinterred the axe
 from under a stack of packing straw; the candle was set upon the
 nearest table to light them to the attack; and they drew near
 with bated breath to where that patient foot was still going up
 and down, up and down, in the quiet of the night.
 
 "Jekyll," cried Utterson, with a loud voice, "I demand to see
 you." He paused a moment, but there came no reply. "I give you
 fair warning, our suspicions are aroused, and I must and shall
 see you," he resumed; "if not by fair means, then by foul! if not
 of your consent, then by brute force!"
 
 "Utterson," said the voice, "for God's sake, have mercy!"
 
 
 "Ah, that's not Jekyll's voice--it's Hyde's!" cried Utterson.
 "Down with the door, Poole!"
 
 Poole swung the axe over his shoulder; the blow shook the
 building, and the red baize door leaped against the lock and
 hinges. A dismal screech, as of mere animal terror, rang from the
 cabinet. Up went the axe again, and again the panels crashed and
 the frame bounded; four times the blow fell; but the wood was
 tough and the fittings were of excellent workmanship; and it was
 not until the fifth, that the lock burst in sunder and the wreck
 of the door fell inwards on the carpet.
 
 64)
 
 
 The besiegers, appalled by their own riot and the stillness that
 had succeeded, stood back a little and peered in. There lay the
 cabinet before their eyes in the quiet lamplight, a good fire
 glowing and chattering on the hearth, the kettle singing its thin
 strain, a drawer or two open, papers neatly set forth on the
 business-table, and nearer the fire, the things laid out for tea:
 the quietest room, you would have said, and, but for the glazed
 presses full of chemicals, the most commonplace that night in
 London.
 
 Right in the midst there lay the body of a man sorely contorted
 and still twitching. They drew near on tiptoe, turned it on its
 back and beheld the face of Edward Hyde. He was dressed in
 clothes far too large for him, clothes of the doctor's bigness;
 the cords of his face still moved with a semblance of life, but
 life was quite gone; and by the crushed phial in the hand and the
 strong smell of kernels that hung upon the air, Utterson knew
 that he was looking on the body of a self-destroyer.
 
 "We have come too late," he said sternly, "whether to save or
 punish. Hyde is gone to his account; and it only remains for us
 to find the body of your master."
 
 The far greater proportion of the building was occupied by the
 theatre, which filled almost the whole ground story and was
 lighted from above, and by the cabinet, which formed an upper
 story at one end and looked upon the
 
 65)
 
 court. A corridor joined the theatre to the door on the
 by-street; and with this the cabinet communicated separately by a
 second flight of stairs. There were besides a few dark closets
 and a spacious cellar. All these they now thoroughly examined.
 Each closet needed but a glance, for all were empty, and all, by
 the dust that fell from their doors, had stood long unopened. The
 cellar, indeed, was filled with crazy lumber, mostly dating from
 the times of the surgeon who was Jekyll's predecessor; but even
 as they opened the door they were advertised of the uselessness
 of further search, by the fall of a perfect mat of cobweb which
 had for years sealed up the entrance. Nowhere was there any trace
 of Henry Jekyll, dead or alive.
 
 Poole stamped on the flags of the corridor. "He must be buried
 here," he said, hearkening to the sound.
 
 "Or he may have fled," said Utterson, and he turned to examine
 the door in the by-street. It was locked; and lying near by on
 the flags, they found the key, already stained with rust.
 
 "This does not look like use," observed the lawyer.
 
 "Use!" echoed Poole. "Do you not see, sir, it is broken? much as
 if a man had stamped on it."
 
 "Ay," continued Utterson, "and the fractures, too, are rusty."
 The two men looked at each other with a scare. "This is beyond
 me,
 
 66)
 
 Poole," said the lawyer. "Let us go back to the cabinet."
 
 They mounted the stair in silence, and still with an occasional
 awe-struck glance at the dead body, proceeded more thoroughly to
 examine the contents of the cabinet. At one table, there were
 traces of chemical work, various measured heaps of some white
 salt being laid on glass saucers, as though for an experiment in
 which the unhappy man had been prevented.
 
 "That is the same drug that I was always bringing him," said
 Poole; and even as he spoke, the kettle with a startling noise
 boiled over.
 
 This brought them to the fireside, where the easy-chair was drawn
 cosily up, and the tea-things stood ready to the sitter's elbow,
 the very sugar in the cup. There were several books on a shelf;
 one lay beside the tea-things open, and Utterson was amazed to
 find it a copy of a pious work, for which Jekyll had several
 times expressed a great esteem, annotated, in his own hand, with
 startling blasphemies.
 
 Next, in the course of their review of the chamber, the searchers
 came to the cheval glass, into whose depths they looked with an
 involuntary horror. But it was so turned as to show them nothing
 but the rosy glow playing on the roof, the fire sparkling in a
 hundred repetitions along the glazed front of the presses, and
 their own pale and fearful countenances stooping to look in.
 
 67)
 
 "This glass have seen some strange things, sir," whispered Poole.
 
 "And surely none stranger than itself," echoed the lawyer in the
 same tones. "For what did Jekyll"--he caught himself up at the
 word with a start, and then conquering the weakness--"what
 could Jekyll want with it?" he said.
 
 "You may say that!" said Poole. Next they turned to the
 business-table. On the desk among the neat array of papers, a
 large envelope was uppermost, and bore, in the doctor's hand, the
 name of Mr. Utterson. The lawyer unsealed it, and several
 enclosures fell to the floor. The first was a will, drawn in the
 same eccentric terms as the one which he had returned six months
 before, to serve as a testament in case of death and as a deed of
 gift in case of disappearance; but, in place of the name of
 Edward Hyde, the lawyer, with indescribable amazement, read the
 name of Gabriel John Utterson. He looked at Poole, and then back
 at the paper, and last of all at the dead malefactor stretched
 upon the carpet.
 
 "My head goes round," he said. "He has been all these days in
 possession; he had no cause to like me; he must have raged to see
 himself displaced; and he has not destroyed this document."
 
 He caught up the next paper; it was a brief note in the doctor's
 hand and dated at the top.
 
 68)
 
 "O Poole!" the lawyer cried, "he was alive and here this day. He
 cannot have been disposed of in so short a space, he must be
 still alive, he must have fled! And then, why fled? and how? and
 in that case, can we venture to declare this suicide? Oh, we must
 be careful. I foresee that we may yet involve your master in some
 dire catastrophe."
 
 "Why don't you read it, sir?" asked Poole.
 
 "Because I fear," replied the lawyer solemnly. "God grant I have
 no cause for it!" And with that he brought the paper to his eyes
 and read as follows:
 
 
 "MY DEAR UTTERSON,--When this shall fall into your hands, I
 shall have disappeared, under what circumstances I have not the
 penetration to foresee, but my instinct and all the circumstances
 of my nameless situation tell me that the end is sure and must be
 early. Go then, and first read the narrative which Lanyon warned
 me he was to place in your hands; and if you care to hear more,
 turn to the confession of
 
                   "Your unworthy and unhappy friend,
                                         "HENRY JEKYLL."
 
 
 "There was a third enclosure?" asked Utterson.
 
 "Here, sir," said Poole, and gave into his hands a considerable
 packet sealed in several places.
 
 69)
 
 The lawyer put it in his pocket. "I would say nothing of this
 paper. If your master has fled or is dead, we may at least save
 his credit. It is now ten; I must go home and read these
 documents in quiet; but I shall be back before midnight, when we
 shall send for the police."
 
 They went out, locking the door of the theatre behind them; and
 Utterson, once more leaving the servants gathered about the fire
 in the hall, trudged back to his office to read the two
 narratives in which this mystery was now to be explained.
 
 70)
 
 
 
                           DR. LANYON'S NARRATIVE
 
 ON the ninth of January, now four days ago, I received by the
 evening delivery a registered envelope, addressed in the hand of
 my colleague and old school-companion, Henry Jekyll. I was a good
 deal surprised by this; for we were by no means in the habit of
 correspondence; I had seen the man, dined with him, indeed, the
 night before; and I could imagine nothing in our intercourse that
 should justify formality of registration. The contents increased
 my wonder; for this is how the letter ran:
 
                                  "10th December, 18---
 
 "DEAR LANYON, You are one of my oldest friends; and although we
 may have differed at times on scientific questions, I cannot
 remember, at least on my side, any break in our affection. There
 was never a day when, if you had said to me, 'Jekyll, my life, my
 honour, my reason, depend upon you,' I would not have sacrificed
 my left hand to help you. Lanyon, my life, my honour my reason,
 are all at your mercy;
 
 71)
 
 if you fail me to-night I am lost. You might suppose, after this
 preface, that I am going to ask you for something dishonourable
 to grant. Judge for yourself.
 
 "I want you to postpone all other engagements for to-night--ay,
 even if you were summoned to the bedside of an emperor; to take a
 cab, unless your carriage should be actually at the door; and
 with this letter in your hand for consultation, to drive straight
 to my house. Poole, my butler, has his orders; you will find, him
 waiting your arrival with a locksmith. The door of my cabinet is
 then to be forced: and you are to go in alone; to open the glazed
 press (letter E) on the left hand, breaking the lock if it be
 shut; and to draw out, with all its contents as they stand, the
 fourth drawer from the top or (which is the same thing) the third
 from the bottom. In my extreme distress of wind, I have a morbid
 fear of misdirecting you; but even if I am in error, you may know
 the right drawer by its contents: some powders, a phial and a
 paper book. This drawer I beg of you to carry back with you to
 Cavendish Square exactly as it stands.
 
 "That is the first part of the service: now for the second. You
 should be back, if you set out at once on the receipt of this,
 long before midnight; but I will leave you that amount of margin,
 not only in the fear of one of those obstacles that can neither
 be prevented nor fore-
 
 72)
 
 seen, but because an hour when your servants are in bed is to be
 preferred for what will then remain to do. At midnight, then, I
 have to ask you to be alone in your consulting-room, to admit
 with your own hand into the house a man who will present himself
 in my name, and to place in his hands the drawer that you will
 have brought with you from my cabinet. Then you will have played
 your part and earned my gratitude completely. Five minutes
 afterwards, if you insist upon an explanation, you will have
 understood that these arrangements are of capital importance; and
 that by the neglect of one of them, fantastic as they must
 appear, you might have charged your conscience with my death or
 the shipwreck of my reason.
 
 "Confident as I am that you will not trifle with this appeal, my
 heart sinks and my hand trembles at the bare thought of such a
 possibility. Think of me at this hour, in a strange place,
 labouring under a blackness of distress that no fancy can
 exaggerate, and yet well aware that, if you will but punctually
 serve me, my troubles will roll away like a story that is told.
 Serve me, my dear Lanyon, and save
                                        "Your friend,
 
                                             "H. J.
 
 "P. S. I had already sealed this up when a fresh terror struck
 upon my soul. It is possible that the postoffice may fail me, and
 this letter
 
 73)
 
 not come into your hands until to-morrow morning. In that case,
 dear Lanyon, do my errand when it shall be most convenient for
 you in the course of the day; and once more expect my messenger
 at midnight. It may then already be too late; and if that night
 passes without event, you will know that you have seen the last
 of Henry Jekyll."
 
 
 Upon the reading of this letter, I made sure my colleague was
 insane; but till that was proved beyond the possibility of doubt,
 I felt bound to do as he requested. The less I understood of this
 farrago, the less I was in a position to judge of its importance;
 and an appeal so worded could not be set aside without a grave
 responsibility. I rose accordingly from table, got into a hansom,
 and drove straight to Jekyll's house. The butler was awaiting my
 arrival; he had received by the same post as mine a registered
 letter of instruction, and had sent at once for a locksmith and a
 carpenter. The tradesmen came while we were yet speaking; and we
 moved in a body to old Dr. Denman's surgical theatre, from which
 (as you are doubtless aware) Jekyll's private cabinet is most
 conveniently entered. The door was very strong, the lock
 excellent; the carpenter avowed he would have great trouble and
 have to do much damage, if force were to be used; and the
 locksmith was near despair. But this last was a handy fellow,
 
 74)
 
 and after two hours' work, the door stood open. The press marked
 E was unlocked; and I took out the drawer, had it filled up with
 straw and tied in a sheet, and returned with it to Cavendish
 Square.
 
 Here I proceeded to examine its contents. The powders were neatly
 enough made up, but not with the nicety of the dispensing
 chemist; so that it was plain they were of Jekyll's private
 manufacture; and when I opened one of the wrappers I found what
 seemed to me a simple crystalline salt of a white colour. The
 phial, to which I next turned my attention, might have been about
 half-full of a blood-red liquor, which was highly pungent to the
 sense of smell and seemed to me to contain phosphorus and some
 volatile ether. At the other ingredients I could make no guess.
 The book was an ordinary version-book and contained little but a
 series of dates. These covered a period of many years, but I
 observed that the entries ceased nearly a year ago and quite
 abruptly. Here and there a brief remark was appended to a date,
 usually no more than a single word: "double" occurring perhaps
 six times in a total of several hundred entries; and once very
 early in the list and followed by several marks of exclamation,
 "total failure!!!" All this, though it whetted my curiosity, told
 me little that was definite. Here were a phial of some tincture,
 a paper of some salt, and the record of a series of experi-
 
 75)
 
 ments that had led (like too many of Jekyll's investigations) to
 no end of practical usefulness. How could the presence of these
 articles in my house affect either the honour, the sanity, or the
 life of my flighty colleague? If his messenger could go to one
 place, why could he not go to another? And even granting some
 impediment, why was this gentleman to be received by me in
 secret? The more I reflected the more convinced I grew that I was
 dealing with a case of cerebral disease: and though I dismissed
 my servants to bed, I loaded an old revolver, that I might be
 found in some posture of self-defence.
 
 Twelve o'clock had scarce rung out over London, ere the knocker
 sounded very gently on the door. I went myself at the summons,
 and found a small man crouching against the pillars of the
 portico.
 
 "Are you come from Dr. Jekyll?" I asked.
 
 He told me "yes" by a constrained gesture; and when I had bidden
 him enter, he did not obey me without a searching backward glance
 into the darkness of the square. There was a policeman not far
 off, advancing with his bull's eye open; and at the sight, I
 thought my visitor started and made greater haste.
 
 These particulars struck me, I confess, disagreeably; and as I
 followed him into the bright light of the consulting-room, I kept
 my hand ready on my weapon. Here, at last, I had a
 
 76)
 
 chance of clearly seeing him. I had never set eyes on him before,
 so much was certain. He was small, as I have said; I was struck
 besides with the shocking expression of his face, with his
 remarkable combination of great muscular activity and great
 apparent debility of constitution, and--last but not least--
 with the odd, subjective disturbance caused by his neighbourhood.
 This bore some resemblance to incipient rigour, and was
 accompanied by a marked sinking of the pulse. At the time, I set
 it down to some idiosyncratic, personal distaste, and merely
 wondered at the acuteness of the symptoms; but I have since had
 reason to believe the cause to lie much deeper in the nature of
 man, and to turn on some nobler hinge than the principle of
 hatred.
 
 This person (who had thus, from the first moment of his entrance,
 struck in me what I can only describe as a disgustful curiosity)
 was dressed in a fashion that would have made an ordinary person
 laughable; his clothes, that is to say, although they were of
 rich and sober fabric, were enormously too large for him in every
 measurement--the trousers hanging on his legs and rolled up to
 keep them from the ground, the waist of the coat below his
 haunches, and the collar sprawling wide upon his shoulders.
 Strange to relate, this ludicrous accoutrement was far from
 moving me to laughter. Rather, as there was something abnormal
 and misbe-
 
 77)
 
 gotten in the very essence of the creature that now faced me--
 something seizing, surprising, and revolting--this fresh
 disparity seemed but to fit in with and to reinforce it; so that
 to my interest in the man's nature and character, there was added
 a curiosity as to his origin, his life, his fortune and status in
 the world.
 
 These observations, though they have taken so great a space to be
 set down in, were yet the work of a few seconds. My visitor was,
 indeed, on fire with sombre excitement.
 
 "Have you got it?" he cried. "Have you got it?" And so lively was
 his impatience that he even laid his hand upon my arm and sought
 to shake me.
 
 I put him back, conscious at his touch of a certain icy pang
 along my blood. "Come, sir," said I. "You forget that I have not
 yet the pleasure of your acquaintance. Be seated, if you please."
 And I showed him an example, and sat down myself in my customary
 seat and with as fair an imitation of my ordinary manner to a
 patient, as the lateness of the hour, the nature of my
 pre-occupations, and the horror I had of my visitor, would suffer
 me to muster.
 
 "I beg your pardon, Dr. Lanyon," he replied civilly enough. "What
 you say is very well founded; and my impatience has shown its
 heels to my politeness. I come here at the instance of your
 colleague, Dr. Henry Jekyll, on a piece of business of some
 moment; and I under-
 
 78)
 
 stood..." He paused and put his hand to his throat, and I could
 see, in spite of his collected manner, that he was wrestling
 against the approaches of the hysteria--"I understood, a
 drawer..."
 
 But here I took pity on my visitor's suspense, and some perhaps
 on my own growing curiosity.
 
 "There it is, sir," said I, pointing to the drawer, where it lay
 on the floor behind a table and still covered with the sheet.
 
 He sprang to it, and then paused, and laid his hand upon his
 heart: I could hear his teeth grate with the convulsive action of
 his jaws; and his face was so ghastly to see that I grew alarmed
 both for his life and reason.
 
 "Compose yourself," said I.
 
 He turned a dreadful smile to me, and as if with the decision of
 despair, plucked away the sheet. At sight of the contents, he
 uttered one loud sob of such immense relief that I sat petrified.
 And the next moment, in a voice that was already fairly well
 under control, "Have you a graduated glass?" he asked.
 
 I rose from my place with something of an effort and gave him
 what he asked.
 
 He thanked me with a smiling nod, measured out a few minims of
 the red tincture and added one of the powders. The mixture, which
 was at first of a reddish hue, began, in proportion as the
 crystals melted, to brighten in colour, to effervesce audibly,
 and to throw off small
 
 79)
 
 fumes of vapour. Suddenly and at the same moment, the ebullition
 ceased and the compound changed to a dark purple, which faded
 again more slowly to a watery green. My visitor, who had watched
 these metamorphoses with a keen eye, smiled, set down the glass
 upon the table, and then turned and looked upon me with an air of
 scrutiny.
 
 "And now," said he, "to settle what remains. Will you be wise?
 will you be guided? will you suffer me to take this glass in my
 hand and to go forth from your house without further parley? or
 has the greed of curiosity too much command of you? Think before
 you answer, for it shall be done as you decide. As you decide,
 you shall be left as you were before, and neither richer nor
 wiser, unless the sense of service rendered to a man in mortal
 distress may be counted as a kind of riches of the soul. Or, if
 you shall so prefer to choose, a new province of knowledge and
 new avenues to fame and power shall be laid open to you, here, in
 this room, upon the instant; and your sight shall be blasted by a
 prodigy to stagger the unbelief of Satan."
 
 "Sir," said I, affecting a coolness that I was far from truly
 possessing, "you speak enigmas, and you will perhaps not wonder
 that I hear you with no very strong impression of belief. But I
 have gone too far in the way of inexplicable services to pause
 before I see the end."
 
 "It is well," replied my visitor. "Lanyon,
 
 80)
 
 you remember your vows: what follows is under the seal of our
 profession. And now, you who have so long been bound to the most
 narrow and material views, you who have denied the virtue of
 transcendental medicine, you who have derided your superiors--
 behold!"
 
 He put the glass to his lips and drank at one gulp. A cry
 followed; he reeled, staggered, clutched at the table and held
 on, staring with injected eyes, gasping with open mouth; and as I
 looked there came, I thought, a change--he seemed to swell--
 his face became suddenly black and the features seemed to melt
 and alter--and the next moment, I had sprung to my feet and
 leaped back against the wall, my arm raised to shield me from
 that prodigy, my mind submerged in terror.
 
 "O God!" I screamed, and "O God!" again and again; for there
 before my eyes--pale and shaken, and half-fainting, and groping
 before him with his hands, like a man restored from death--
 there stood Henry Jekyll!
 
 What he told me in the next hour, I cannot bring my mind to set
 on paper. I saw what I saw, I heard what I heard, and my soul
 sickened at it; and yet now when that sight has faded from my
 eyes, I ask myself if I believe it, and I cannot answer. My life
 is shaken to its roots; sleep has left me; the deadliest terror
 sits by me at all hours of the day and night; I feel that my days
 are numbered, and that I
 
 81)
 
 must die; and yet I shall die incredulous. As for the moral
 turpitude that man unveiled to me, even with tears of penitence,
 I cannot, even in memory, dwell on it without a start of horror.
 I will say but one thing, Utterson, and that (if you can bring
 your mind to credit it) will be more than enough. The creature
 who crept into my house that night was, on Jekyll's own
 confession, known by the name of Hyde and hunted for in every
 corner of the land as the murderer of Carew.
                                                HASTIE LANYON
 
 82)
 
 
 
                 HENRY JEKYLL'S FULL STATEMENT OF THE CASE
 
 I WAS born in the year 18--- to a large fortune, endowed besides
 with excellent parts, inclined by nature to industry, fond of the
 respect of the wise and good among my fellow-men, and thus, as
 might have been supposed, with every guarantee of an honourable
 and distinguished future. And indeed the worst of my faults was a
 certain impatient gaiety of disposition, such as has made the
 happiness of many, but such as I found it hard to reconcile with
 my imperious desire to carry my head high, and wear a more than
 commonly grave countenance before the public. Hence it came about
 that I concealed my pleasures; and that when I reached years of
 reflection, and began to look round me and take stock of my
 progress and position in the world, I stood already committed to
 a profound duplicity of life. Many a man would have even blazoned
 such irregularities as I was guilty of; but from the high views
 that I had set before me, I regarded and hid them with an almost
 morbid sense of shame. It was thus rather the exacting
 
 83)
 
 nature of my aspirations than any particular degradation in my
 faults, that made me what I was and, with even a deeper trench
 than in the majority of men, severed in me those provinces of
 good and ill which divide and compound man's dual nature. In this
 case, I was driven to reflect deeply and inveterately on that
 hard law of life, which lies at the root of religion and is one
 of the most plentiful springs of distress. Though so profound a
 double-dealer, I was in no sense a hypocrite; both sides of me
 were in dead earnest; I was no more myself when I laid aside
 restraint and plunged in shame, than when I laboured, in the eye
 of day, at the furtherance of knowledge or the relief of sorrow
 and suffering. And it chanced that the direction of my scientific
 studies, which led wholly toward the mystic and the
 transcendental, re-acted and shed a strong light on this
 consciousness of the perennial war among my members. With every
 day, and from both sides of my intelligence, the moral and the
 intellectual, I thus drew steadily nearer to that truth, by whose
 partial discovery I have been doomed to such a dreadful
 shipwreck: that man is not truly one, but truly two. I say two,
 because the state of my own knowledge does not pass beyond that
 point. Others will follow, others will outstrip me on the same
 lines; and I hazard the guess that man will be ultimately known
 for a mere polity of multifarious, incongruous, and independent
 denizens. I, for my
 
 84)
 
 part, from the nature of my life, advanced infallibly in one
 direction and in one direction only. It was on the moral side,
 and in my own person, that I learned to recognise the thorough
 and primitive duality of man; I saw that, of the two natures that
 contended in the field of my consciousness, even if I could
 rightly be said to be either, it was only because I was radically
 both; and from an early date, even before the course of my
 scientific discoveries had begun to suggest the most naked
 possibility of such a miracle, I had learned to dwell with
 pleasure, as a beloved day-dream, on the thought of the
 separation of these elements. If each, I told myself, could but
 be housed in separate identities, life would be relieved of all
 that was unbearable; the unjust delivered from the aspirations
 might go his way, and remorse of his more upright twin; and the
 just could walk steadfastly and securely on his upward path,
 doing the good things in which he found his pleasure, and no
 longer exposed to disgrace and penitence by the hands of this
 extraneous evil. It was the curse of mankind that these
 incongruous fagots were thus bound together that in the agonised
 womb of consciousness, these polar twins should be continuously
 struggling. How, then, were they dissociated?
 
 I was so far in my reflections when, as I have said, a side-light
 began to shine upon the subject from the laboratory table. I
 began to perceive
 
 85)
 
 more deeply than it has ever yet been stated, the trembling
 immateriality, the mist-like transience of this seemingly so
 solid body in which we walk attired. Certain agents I found to
 have the power to shake and to pluck back that fleshly vestment,
 even as a wind might toss the curtains of a pavilion. For two
 good reasons, I will not enter deeply into this scientific branch
 of my confession. First, because I have been made to learn that
 the doom and burthen of our life is bound for ever on man's
 shoulders, and when the attempt is made to cast it off, it but
 returns upon us with more unfamiliar and more awful pressure.
 Second, because, as my narrative will make, alas! too evident, my
 discoveries were incomplete. Enough, then, that I not only
 recognised my natural body for the mere aura and effulgence of
 certain of the powers that made up my spirit, but managed to
 compound a drug by which these powers should be dethroned from
 their supremacy, and a second form and countenance substituted,
 none the less natural to me because they were the expression, and
 bore the stamp, of lower elements in my soul.
 
 I hesitated long before I put this theory to the test of
 practice. I knew well that I risked death; for any drug that so
 potently controlled and shook the very fortress of identity,
 might by the least scruple of an overdose or at the least
 inopportunity in the moment of exhibition, utterly blot out that
 immaterial tabernacle which I
 
 86)
 
 looked to it to change. But the temptation of a discovery so
 singular and profound, at last overcame the suggestions of alarm.
 I had long since prepared my tincture; I purchased at once, from
 a firm of wholesale chemists, a large quantity of a particular
 salt which I knew, from my experiments, to be the last ingredient
 required; and late one accursed night, I compounded the elements,
 watched them boil and smoke together in the glass, and when the
 ebullition had subsided, with a strong glow of courage, drank off
 the potion.
 
 The most racking pangs succeeded: a grinding in the bones, deadly
 nausea, and a horror of the spirit that cannot be exceeded at the
 hour of birth or death. Then these agonies began swiftly to
 subside, and I came to myself as if out of a great sickness.
 There was something strange in my sensations, something
 indescribably new and, from its very novelty, incredibly sweet. I
 felt younger, lighter, happier in body; within I was conscious of
 a heady recklessness, a current of disordered sensual images
 running like a mill-race in my fancy, a solution of the bonds of
 obligation, an unknown but not an innocent freedom of the soul. I
 knew myself, at the first breath of this new life, to be more
 wicked, tenfold more wicked, sold a slave to my original evil;
 and the thought, in that moment, braced and delighted me like
 wine. I stretched out my hands, exulting in the freshness of
 these
 
 87)
 
 sensations; and in the act, I was suddenly aware that I had lost
 in stature.
 
 There was no mirror, at that date, in my room; that which stands
 beside me as I write, was brought there later on and for the very
 purpose of these transformations. The night, however, was far
 gone into the morning--the morning, black as it was, was nearly
 ripe for the conception of the day--the inmates of my house
 were locked in the most rigorous hours of slumber; and I
 determined, flushed as I was with hope and triumph, to venture in
 my new shape as far as to my bedroom. I crossed the yard, wherein
 the constellations looked down upon me, I could have thought,
 with wonder, the first creature of that sort that their
 unsleeping vigilance had yet disclosed to them; I stole through
 the corridors, a stranger in my own house; and coming to my room,
 I saw for the first time the appearance of Edward Hyde.
 
 I must here speak by theory alone, saying not that which I know,
 but that which I suppose to be most probable. The evil side of my
 nature, to which I had now transferred the stamping efficacy, was
 less robust and less developed than the good which I had just
 deposed. Again, in the course of my life, which had been, after
 all, nine-tenths a life of effort, virtue, and control, it had
 been much less exercised and much less exhausted. And hence, as I
 think, it came about that Edward Hyde was so much smaller,
 
 88)
 
 slighter, and younger than Henry Jekyll. Even as good shone upon
 the countenance of the one, evil was written broadly and plainly
 on the face of the other. Evil besides (which I must still
 believe to be the lethal side of man) had left on that body an
 imprint of deformity and decay. And yet when I looked upon that
 ugly idol in the glass, I was conscious of no repugnance, rather
 of a leap of welcome. This, too, was myself. It seemed natural
 and human. In my eyes it bore a livelier image of the spirit, it
 seemed more express and single, than the imperfect and divided
 countenance I had been hitherto accustomed to call mine. And in
 so far I was doubtless right. I have observed that when I wore
 the semblance of Edward Hyde, none could come near to me at first
 without a visible misgiving of the flesh. This, as I take it, was
 because all human beings, as we meet them, are commingled out of
 good and evil: and Edward Hyde, alone in the ranks of mankind,
 was pure evil.
 
 I lingered but a moment at the mirror: the second and conclusive
 experiment had yet to be attempted; it yet remained to be seen if
 I had lost my identity beyond redemption and must flee before
 daylight from a house that was no longer mine; and hurrying back
 to my cabinet, I once more prepared and drank the cup, once more
 suffered the pangs of dissolution, and came to myself once more
 with the character, the stature, and the face of Henry Jekyll.
 
 89)
 
 That night I had come to the fatal cross-roads. Had I approached
 my discovery in a more noble spirit, had I risked the experiment
 while under the empire of generous or pious aspirations, all must
 have been otherwise, and from these agonies of death and birth, I
 had come forth an angel instead of a fiend. The drug had no
 discriminating action; it was neither diabolical nor divine; it
 but shook the doors of the prison-house of my disposition; and
 like the captives of Philippi, that which stood within ran forth.
 At that time my virtue slumbered; my evil, kept awake by
 ambition, was alert and swift to seize the occasion; and the
 thing that was projected was Edward Hyde. Hence, although I had
 now two characters as well as two appearances, one was wholly
 evil, and the other was still the old Henry Jekyll, that
 incongruous compound of whose reformation and improvement I had
 already learned to despair. The movement was thus wholly toward
 the worse.
 
 Even at that time, I had not yet conquered my aversion to the
 dryness of a life of study. I would still be merrily disposed at
 times; and as my pleasures were (to say the least) undignified,
 and I was not only well known and highly considered, but growing
 toward the elderly man, this incoherency of my life was daily
 growing more unwelcome. It was on this side that my new power
 tempted me until I fell in slavery. I had but to drink the cup,
 to doff at once the body
 
 90)
 
 of the noted professor, and to assume, like a thick cloak, that
 of Edward Hyde. I smiled at the notion; it seemed to me at the
 time to be humorous; and I made my preparations with the most
 studious care. I took and furnished that house in Soho, to which
 Hyde was tracked by the police; and engaged as housekeeper a
 creature whom I well knew to be silent and unscrupulous. On the
 other side, I announced to my servants that a Mr. Hyde (whom I
 described) was to have full liberty and power about my house in
 the square; and to parry mishaps, I even called and made myself a
 familiar object, in my second character. I next drew up that will
 to which you so much objected; so that if anything befell me in
 the person of Dr. Jekyll, I could enter on that of Edward Hyde
 without pecuniary loss. And thus fortified, as I supposed, on
 every side, I began to profit by the strange immunities of my
 position.
 
 Men have before hired bravos to transact their crimes, while
 their own person and reputation sat under shelter. I was the
 first that ever did so for his pleasures. I was the first that
 could thus plod in the public eye with a load of genial
 respectability, and in a moment, like a schoolboy, strip off
 these lendings and spring headlong into the sea of liberty. But
 for me, in my impenetrable mantle, the safety was complete. Think
 of it--I did not even exist! Let me but escape into my
 laboratory door, give me but a second or
 
 91)
 
 two to mix and swallow the draught that I had always standing
 ready; and whatever he had done, Edward Hyde would pass away like
 the stain of breath upon a mirror; and there in his stead,
 quietly at home, trimming the midnight lamp in his study, a man
 who could afford to laugh at suspicion, would be Henry Jekyll.
 
 The pleasures which I made haste to seek in my disguise were, as
 I have said, undignified; I would scarce use a harder term. But
 in the hands of Edward Hyde, they soon began to turn toward the
 monstrous. When I would come back from these excursions, I was
 often plunged into a kind of wonder at my vicarious depravity.
 This familiar that I called out of my own soul, and sent forth
 alone to do his good pleasure, was a being inherently malign and
 villainous; his every act and thought centred on self; drinking
 pleasure with bestial avidity from any degree of torture to
 another; relentless like a man of stone. Henry Jekyll stood at
 times aghast before the acts of Edward Hyde; but the situation
 was apart from ordinary laws, and insidiously relaxed the grasp
 of conscience. It was Hyde, after all, and Hyde alone, that was
 guilty. Jekyll was no worse; he woke again to his good qualities
 seemingly unimpaired; he would even make haste, where it was
 possible, to undo the evil done by Hyde. And thus his conscience
 slumbered.
 
 Into the details of the infamy at which I thus
 
 92)
 
 connived (for even now I can scarce grant that I committed it) I
 have no design of entering; I mean but to point out the warnings
 and the successive steps with which my chastisement approached. I
 met with one accident which, as it brought on no consequence, I
 shall no more than mention. An act of cruelty to a child aroused
 against me the anger of a passer-by, whom I recognised the other
 day in the person of your kinsman; the doctor and the child's
 family joined him; there were moments when I feared for my life;
 and at last, in order to pacify their too just resentment, Edward
 Hyde had to bring them to the door, and pay them in a cheque
 drawn in the name of Henry Jekyll. But this danger was easily
 eliminated from the future, by opening an account at another bank
 in the name of Edward Hyde himself; and when, by sloping my own
 hand backward, I had supplied my double with a signature, I
 thought I sat beyond the reach of fate.
 
 Some two months before the murder of Sir Danvers, I had been out
 for one of my adventures, had returned at a late hour, and woke
 the next day in bed with somewhat odd sensations. It was in vain
 I looked about me; in vain I saw the decent furniture and tall
 proportions of my room in the square; in vain that I recognised
 the pattern of the bed-curtains and the design of the mahogany
 frame; something still kept insisting that I was not where I was,
 
 93)
 
 that I had not wakened where I seemed to be, but in the little
 room in Soho where I was accustomed to sleep in the body of
 Edward Hyde. I smiled to myself, and, in my psychological way
 began lazily to inquire into the elements of this illusion,
 occasionally, even as I did so, dropping back into a comfortable
 morning doze. I was still so engaged when, in one of my more
 wakeful moments, my eyes fell upon my hand. Now the hand of Henry
 Jekyll (as you have often remarked) was professional in shape and
 size: it was large, firm, white, and comely. But the hand which I
 now saw, clearly enough, in the yellow light of a mid-London
 morning, lying half shut on the bed-clothes, was lean, corded,
 knuckly, of a dusky pallor and thickly shaded with a swart growth
 of hair. It was the hand of Edward Hyde.
 
 I must have stared upon it for near half a minute, sunk as I was
 in the mere stupidity of wonder, before terror woke up in my
 breast as sudden and startling as the crash of cymbals; and
 bounding from my bed, I rushed to the mirror. At the sight that
 met my eyes, my blood was changed into something exquisitely thin
 and icy. Yes, I had gone to bed Henry Jekyll, I had awakened
 Edward Hyde. How was this to be explained? I asked myself, and
 then, with another bound of terror--how was it to be remedied?
 It was well on in the morning; the servants were up; all my drugs
 were in the
 
 94)
 
 cabinet--a long journey down two pairs of stairs, through the
 back passage, across the open court and through the anatomical
 theatre, from where I was then standing horror-struck. It might
 indeed be possible to cover my face; but of what use was that,
 when I was unable to conceal the alteration in my stature? And
 then with an overpowering sweetness of relief, it came back upon
 my mind that the servants were already used to the coming and
 going of my second self. I had soon dressed, as well as I was
 able, in clothes of my own size: had soon passed through the
 house, where Bradshaw stared and drew back at seeing Mr. Hyde at
 such an hour and in such a strange array; and ten minutes later,
 Dr. Jekyll had returned to his own shape and was sitting down,
 with a darkened brow, to make a feint of breakfasting.
 
 Small indeed was my appetite. This inexplicable incident, this
 reversal of my previous experience, seemed, like the Babylonian
 finger on the wall, to be spelling out the letters of my
 judgment; and I began to reflect more seriously than ever before
 on the issues and possibilities of my double existence. That part
 of me which I had the power of projecting, had lately been much
 exercised and nourished; it had seemed to me of late as though
 the body of Edward Hyde had grown in stature, as though (when I
 wore that form) I were conscious of a more generous tide of
 blood; and I began to spy a danger that,
 
 95)
 
 if this were much prolonged, the balance of my nature might be
 permanently overthrown, the power of voluntary change be
 forfeited, and the character of Edward Hyde become irrevocably
 mine. The power of the drug had not been always equally
 displayed. Once, very early in my career, it had totally failed
 me; since then I had been obliged on more than one occasion to
 double, and once, with infinite risk of death, to treble the
 amount; and these rare uncertainties had cast hitherto the sole
 shadow on my contentment. Now, however, and in the light of that
 morning's accident, I was led to remark that whereas, in the
 beginning, the difficulty had been to throw off the body of
 Jekyll, it had of late gradually but decidedly transferred itself
 to the other side. All things therefore seemed to point to this:
 that I was slowly losing hold of my original and better self, and
 becoming slowly incorporated with my second and worse.
 
 Between these two, I now felt I had to choose. My two natures had
 memory in common, but all other faculties were most unequally
 shared between them. Jekyll (who was composite) now with the most
 sensitive apprehensions, now with a greedy gusto, projected and
 shared in the pleasures and adventures of Hyde; but Hyde was
 indifferent to Jekyll, or but remembered him as the mountain
 bandit remembers the cavern in which he conceals himself from
 pursuit. Jekyll had more than a father's interest; Hyde
 
 96)
 
 had more than a son's indifference. To cast in my lot with
 Jekyll, was to die to those appetites which I had long secretly
 indulged and had of late begun to pamper. To cast it in with
 Hyde, was to die to a thousand interests and aspirations, and to
 become, at a blow and for ever, despised and friendless. The
 bargain might appear unequal; but there was still another
 consideration in the scales; for while Jekyll would suffer
 smartingly in the fires of abstinence, Hyde would be not even
 conscious of all that he had lost. Strange as my circumstances
 were, the terms of this debate are as old and commonplace as man;
 much the same inducements and alarms cast the die for any tempted
 and trembling sinner; and it fell out with me, as it falls with
 so vast a majority of my fellows, that I chose the better part
 and was found wanting in the strength to keep to it.
 
 Yes, I preferred the elderly and discontented doctor, surrounded
 by friends and cherishing honest hopes; and bade a resolute
 farewell to the liberty, the comparative youth, the light step,
 leaping impulses and secret pleasures, that I had enjoyed in the
 disguise of Hyde. I made this choice perhaps with some
 unconscious reservation, for I neither gave up the house in Soho,
 nor destroyed the clothes of Edward Hyde, which still lay ready
 in my cabinet. For two months, however, I was true to my
 determination; for two months I led a life of such
 
 97)
 
 severity as I had never before attained to, and enjoyed the
 compensations of an approving conscience. But time began at last
 to obliterate the freshness of my alarm; the praises of
 conscience began to grow into a thing of course; I began to be
 tortured with throes and longings, as of Hyde struggling after
 freedom; and at last, in an hour of moral weakness, I once again
 compounded and swallowed the transforming draught.
 
 I do not suppose that, when a drunkard reasons with himself upon
 his vice, he is once out of five hundred times affected by the
 dangers that he runs through his brutish, physical insensibility;
 neither had I, long as I had considered my position, made enough
 allowance for the complete moral insensibility and insensate
 readiness to evil, which were the leading characters of Edward
 Hyde. Yet it was by these that I was punished. My devil had been
 long caged, he came out roaring. I was conscious, even when I
 took the draught, of a more unbridled, a more furious propensity
 to ill. It must have been this, I suppose, that stirred in my
 soul that tempest of impatience with which I listened to the
 civilities of my unhappy victim; I declare, at least, before God,
 no man morally sane could have been guilty of that crime upon so
 pitiful a provocation; and that I struck in no more reasonable
 spirit than that in which a sick child may break a plaything. But
 I had voluntarily stripped myself of all those balancing
 instincts
 
 98)
 
 by which even the worst of us continues to walk with some degree
 of steadiness among temptations; and in my case, to be tempted,
 however slightly, was to fall.
 
 Instantly the spirit of hell awoke in me and raged. With a
 transport of glee, I mauled the unresisting body, tasting delight
 from every blow; and it was not till weariness had begun to
 succeed, that I was suddenly, in the top fit of my delirium,
 struck through the heart by a cold thrill of terror. A mist
 dispersed; I saw my life to be forfeit; and fled from the scene
 of these excesses, at once glorying and trembling, my lust of
 evil gratified and stimulated, my love of life screwed to the
 topmost peg. I ran to the house in Soho, and (to make assurance
 doubly sure) destroyed my papers; thence I set out through the
 lamplit streets, in the same divided ecstasy of mind, gloating on
 my crime, light-headedly devising others in the future, and yet
 still hastening and still hearkening in my wake for the steps of
 the avenger. Hyde had a song upon his lips as he compounded the
 draught, and as he drank it, pledged the dead man. The pangs of
 transformation had not done tearing him, before Henry Jekyll,
 with streaming tears of gratitude and remorse, had fallen upon
 his knees and lifted his clasped hands to God. The veil of
 self-indulgence was rent from head to foot, I saw my life as a
 whole: I followed it up from the days of childhood, when I had
 walked
 
 99)
 
 with my father's hand, and through the self-denying toils of my
 professional life, to arrive again and again, with the same sense
 of unreality, at the damned horrors of the evening. I could have
 screamed aloud; I sought with tears and prayers to smother down
 the crowd of hideous images and sounds with which my memory
 swarmed against me; and still, between the petitions, the ugly
 face of my iniquity stared into my soul. As the acuteness of this
 remorse began to die away, it was succeeded by a sense of joy.
 The problem of my conduct was solved. Hyde was thenceforth
 impossible; whether I would or not, I was now confined to the
 better part of my existence; and oh, how I rejoiced to think it!
 with what willing humility, I embraced anew the restrictions of
 natural life! with what sincere renunciation, I locked the door
 by which I had so often gone and come, and ground the key under
 my heel!
 
 The next day, came the news that the murder had been overlooked,
 that the guilt of Hyde was patent to the world, and that the
 victim was a man high in public estimation. It was not only a
 crime, it had been a tragic folly. I think I was glad to know it;
 I think I was glad to have my better impulses thus buttressed and
 guarded by the terrors of the scaffold. Jekyll was now my city of
 refuge; let but Hyde peep out an instant, and the hands of all
 men would be raised to take and slay him.
 
 100)
 
 I resolved in my future conduct to redeem the past; and I can say
 with honesty that my resolve was fruitful of some good. You know
 yourself how earnestly in the last months of last year, I
 laboured to relieve suffering; you know that much was done for
 others, and that the days passed quietly, almost happily for
 myself. Nor can I truly say that I wearied of this beneficent and
 innocent life; I think instead that I daily enjoyed it more
 completely; but I was still cursed with my duality of purpose;
 and as the first edge of my penitence wore off, the lower side of
 me, so long indulged, so recently chained down, began to growl
 for licence. Not that I dreamed of resuscitating Hyde; the bare
 idea of that would startle me to frenzy: no, it was in my own
 person, that I was once more tempted to trifle with my
 conscience; and it was as an ordinary secret sinner, that I at
 last fell before the assaults of temptation.
 
 There comes an end to all things; the most capacious measure is
 filled at last; and this brief condescension to evil finally
 destroyed the balance of my soul. And yet I was not alarmed; the
 fall seemed natural, like a return to the old days before I had
 made discovery. It was a fine, clear, January day, wet under foot
 where the frost had melted, but cloudless overhead; and the
 Regent's Park was full of winter chirrupings and sweet with
 spring odours. I sat in the sun on a bench; the animal within me
 licking the
 
 101)
 
 chops of memory; the spiritual side a little drowsed, promising
 subsequent penitence, but not yet moved to begin. After all, I
 reflected, I was like my neighbours; and then I smiled, comparing
 myself with other men, comparing my active goodwill with the lazy
 cruelty of their neglect. And at the very moment of that
 vain-glorious thought, a qualm came over me, a horrid nausea and
 the most deadly shuddering. These passed away, and left me faint;
 and then as in its turn the faintness subsided, I began to be
 aware of a change in the temper of my thoughts, a greater
 boldness, a contempt of danger, a solution of the bonds of
 obligation. I looked down; my clothes hung formlessly on my
 shrunken limbs; the hand that lay on my knee was corded and
 hairy. I was once more Edward Hyde. A moment before I had been
 safe of all men's respect, wealthy, beloved--the cloth laying
 for me in the dining-room at home; and now I was the common
 quarry of mankind, hunted, houseless, a known murderer, thrall to
 the gallows.
 
 My reason wavered, but it did not fail me utterly. I have more
 than once observed that, in my second character, my faculties
 seemed sharpened to a point and my spirits more tensely elastic;
 thus it came about that, where Jekyll perhaps might have
 succumbed, Hyde rose to the importance of the moment. My drugs
 were in one of the presses of my cabinet; how was I
 
 102)
 
 to reach them? That was the problem that (crushing my temples in
 my hands) I set myself to solve. The laboratory door I had
 closed. If I sought to enter by the house, my own servants would
 consign me to the gallows. I saw I must employ another hand, and
 thought of Lanyon. How was he to be reached? how persuaded?
 Supposing that I escaped capture in the streets, how was I to
 make my way into his presence? and how should I, an unknown and
 displeasing visitor, prevail on the famous physician to rifle the
 study of his colleague, Dr. Jekyll? Then I remembered that of my
 original character, one part remained to me: I could write my own
 hand; and once I had conceived that kindling spark, the way that
 I must follow became lighted up from end to end.
 
  Thereupon, I arranged my clothes as best I could, and summoning
 a passing hansom, drove to an hotel in Portland Street, the name
 of which I chanced to remember. At my appearance (which was
 indeed comical enough, however tragic a fate these garments
 covered) the driver could not conceal his mirth. I gnashed my
 teeth upon him with a gust of devilish fury; and the smile
 withered from his face--happily for him--yet more happily for
 myself, for in another instant I had certainly dragged him from
 his perch. At the inn, as I entered, I looked about me with so
 black a countenance as made the attendants tremble; not a look
 did they exchange in my
 
 103)
 
 presence; but obsequiously took my orders, led me to a private
 room, and brought me wherewithal to write. Hyde in danger of his
 life was a creature new to me; shaken with inordinate anger,
 strung to the pitch of murder, lusting to inflict pain. Yet the
 creature was astute; mastered his fury with a great effort of the
 will; composed his two important letters, one to Lanyon and one
 to Poole; and that he might receive actual evidence of their
 being posted, sent them out with directions that they should be
 registered.
 
 Thenceforward, he sat all day over the fire in the private room,
 gnawing his nails; there he dined, sitting alone with his fears,
 the waiter visibly quailing before his eye; and thence, when the
 night was fully come, he set forth in the corner of a closed cab,
 and was driven to and fro about the streets of the city. He, I
 say--I cannot say, I. That child of Hell had nothing human;
 nothing lived in him but fear and hatred. And when at last,
 thinking the driver had begun to grow suspicious, he discharged
 the cab and ventured on foot, attired in his misfitting clothes,
 an object marked out for observation, into the midst of the
 nocturnal passengers, these two base passions raged within him
 like a tempest. He walked fast, hunted by his fears, chattering
 to himself, skulking through the less-frequented thoroughfares,
 counting the minutes that still divided him from midnight. Once a
 
 104)
 
 woman spoke to him, offering, I think, a box of lights. He smote
 her in the face, and she fled.
 
 When I came to myself at Lanyon's, the horror of my old friend
 perhaps affected me somewhat: I do not know; it was at least but
 a drop in the sea to the abhorrence with which I looked back upon
 these hours. A change had come over me. It was no longer the fear
 of the gallows, it was the horror of being Hyde that racked me. I
 received Lanyon's condemnation partly in a dream; it was partly
 in a dream that I came home to my own house and got into bed. I
 slept after the prostration of the day, with a stringent and
 profound slumber which not even the nightmares that wrung me
 could avail to break. I awoke in the morning shaken, weakened,
 but refreshed. I still hated and feared the thought of the brute
 that slept within me, and I had not of course forgotten the
 appalling dangers of the day before; but I was once more at home,
 in my own house and close to my drugs; and gratitude for my
 escape shone so strong in my soul that it almost rivalled the
 brightness of hope.
 
 I was stepping leisurely across the court after breakfast,
 drinking the chill of the air with pleasure, when I was seized
 again with those indescribable sensations that heralded the
 change; and I had but the time to gain the shelter of my cabinet,
 before I was once again raging and freezing with the passions of
 Hyde. It took on this occasion a double dose to recall me to
 
 105)
 
 myself; and alas! Six hours after, as I sat looking sadly in the
 fire, the pangs returned, and the drug had to be re-administered.
 In short, from that day forth it seemed only by a great effort as
 of gymnastics, and only under the immediate stimulation of the
 drug, that I was able to wear the countenance of Jekyll. At all
 hours of the day and night, I would be taken with the premonitory
 shudder; above all, if I slept, or even dozed for a moment in my
 chair, it was always as Hyde that I awakened. Under the strain of
 this continually-impending doom and by the sleeplessness to which
 I now condemned myself, ay, even beyond what I had thought
 possible to man, I became, in my own person, a creature eaten up
 and emptied by fever, languidly weak both in body and mind, and
 solely occupied by one thought: the horror of my other self. But
 when I slept, or when the virtue of the medicine wore off, I
 would leap almost without transition (for the pangs of
 transformation grew daily less marked) into the possession of a
 fancy brimming with images of terror, a soul boiling with
 causeless hatreds, and a body that seemed not strong enough to
 contain the raging energies of life. The powers of Hyde seemed to
 have grown with the sickliness of Jekyll. And certainly the hate
 that now divided them was equal on each side. With Jekyll, it was
 a thing of vital instinct. He had now seen the full deformity of
 that creature that shared with him some of the phenomena of
 
 106)
 
 consciousness, and was co-heir with him to death: and beyond these
 links of community, which in themselves made the most poignant
 part of his distress, he thought of Hyde, for all his energy of
 life, as of something not only hellish but inorganic. This was the
 shocking thing; that the slime of the pit seemed to utter cries
 and voices; that the amorphous dust gesticulated and sinned; that
 what was dead, and had no shape, should usurp the offices of life.
 And this again, that that insurgent horror was knit to him closer
 than a wife, closer than an eye; lay caged in his flesh, where he
 heard it mutter and felt it struggle to be born; and at every hour
 of weakness, and in the confidence of slumber, prevailed against
 him and deposed him out of life. The hatred of Hyde for Jekyll,
 was of a different order. His terror of the gallows drove him
 continually to commit temporary suicide, and return to his
 subordinate station of a part instead of a person; but he loathed
 the necessity, he loathed the despondency into which Jekyll was
 now fallen, and he resented the dislike with which he was himself
 regarded. Hence the ape-like tricks that he would play me,
 scrawling in my own hand blasphemies on the pages of my books,
 burning the letters and destroying the portrait of my father; and
 indeed, had it not been for his fear of death, he would long ago
 have ruined himself in order to involve me in the ruin. But his
 love of life is wonderful; I go further: I, who sicken
 
 107)
 
 and freeze at the mere thought of him, when I recall the
 abjection and passion of this attachment, and when I know how he
 fears my power to cut him off by suicide, I find it in my heart
 to pity him.
 
 It is useless, and the time awfully fails me, to prolong this
 description; no one has ever suffered such torments, let that
 suffice; and yet even to these, habit brought--no, not
 alleviation--but a certain callousness of soul, a certain
 acquiescence of despair; and my punishment might have gone on for
 years, but for the last calamity which has now fallen, and which
 has finally severed me from my own face and nature. My provision
 of the salt, which had never been renewed since the date of the
 first experiment, began to run low. I sent out for a fresh
 supply, and mixed the draught; the ebullition followed, and the
 first change of colour, not the second; I drank it and it was
 without efficiency. You will learn from Poole how I have had
 London ransacked; it was in vain; and I am now persuaded that my
 first supply was impure, and that it was that unknown impurity
 which lent efficacy to the draught.
 
 About a week has passed, and I am now finishing this statement
 under the influence of the last of the old powders. This, then,
 is the last time, short of a miracle, that Henry Jekyll can think
 his own thoughts or see his own face (now how sadly altered!)
 in the glass. Nor must I delay
 
 108)
 
 too long to bring my writing to an end; for if my narrative has
 hitherto escaped destruction, it has been by a combination of
 great prudence and great good luck. Should the throes of change
 take me in the act of writing it, Hyde will tear it in pieces;
 but if some time shall have elapsed after I have laid it by, his
 wonderful selfishness and Circumscription to the moment will
 probably save it once again from the action of his ape-like
 spite. And indeed the doom that is closing on us both, has
 already changed and crushed him. Half an hour from now, when I
 shall again and for ever re-indue that hated personality, I know
 how I shall sit shuddering and weeping in my chair, or continue,
 with the most strained and fear-struck ecstasy of listening, to
 pace up and down this room (my last earthly refuge) and give ear
 to every sound of menace. Will Hyde die upon the scaffold? or
 will he find courage to release himself at the last moment? God
 knows; I am careless; this is my true hour of death, and what is
 to follow concerns another than myself. Here then, as I lay down
 the pen and proceed to seal up my confession, I bring the life of
 that unhappy Henry Jekyll to an end.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
